We were seated quickly. Too bad we never got to eat. Waiter read us the specials and then asked if we wanted wine or appetizers.  We politely declined both, ordered soda and the Waiter never returned. After 15 minutes we left.
Fusili's is the reincarnation of Sam's Bistro, with an Italian flavor.  Menu is unexceptional, but food is well prepared. I had a Cobb salad for lunch, my fellow diners went for pasta dishes, all of which were described as very tasty. Service was prompt, friendly, and not overwhelming. A good place for a quick meal when you don't want to travel to Boston.
This place had fabulous Italian food.  We ordered a bowl of clam chowder, and it was a BOWL not that piddling little bit I've been served in every other restaurant I've ever been in, and I lived in San Francisco.  You could stand a spoon in it, too.  The Caesar Salad was the best I've had in a long time, since the one at Wally's in Minden NV in 1985.  The seafood casserole was excellent, too.  Highly recommended.
I had resisted going to this restaurant for the simple reason that it is a two second drive from my condo.  I finally just visited for a 50th Birthday treat from my cousin. We quizzed our server on what's good and she told us the pizza was fantastic.  She even said if this restaurant ever went out of business they could open just a pizza shop and recover.  Sold.  It was fantastic.  I had the unusual 'Potato Skin' pizza and we swapped out the mozzarella cheese for cheddar.  It was fantastic.  I enjoyed a lemon drop cocktail as an apertif and wasn't terribly impressed with the wines-by-the-glass I chose (two different glasses).  Ambiance is nice - would love it if it had more windows. It was a brilliant summer day outside and to see the daylight fade would have been fabulous.
No complaints on the meat, fish, chicken and side dishes. All came out hot and at the same time. The waitress was excellent, always checking on us. The portions were good size and we would go back again.
Let's start with the service. When you ask for a bottle of beer and they do not have that brand, that is ok, but when the waitress can not tell you what they do have, there is a problem. We came with a group of  fourteen (advance reservations) and limited menu, but the service was extremely slow and not the least bit friendly. The food was good but far from spectacular, prices were not cheap so my expectations were much higher. I would not recommend at all and will not be going back.
We have been to Fusilli's a number of times, last month it was a 15 person celebration for two friends on their "unnamed" birthdays...
This Saturday, it was a small gathering of five friends.
Consistently, we have been impressed with the high quality of service, the ambience of the restaurant, and the quality and variety of the food. Some favorites of our group are the Eggplant Parmesan, the salmon entrée and the chicken with the garden salad. The meatball appetizer and the arancini are also highly delectable.
The price point of the entrées is correlated with the quality of the food.
This is a very nice family/friend oriented restaurant.
I've been to the restaurant on a number of occasions and selected it for a  dinner with colleagues.  It worked out just fine.  They put us in a small back room where it was private and we stayed longer than we should have.  The selections are great, food excellent and hot, and prices reasonable.  Five stars for how accommodating they were.  We all had seafood and enjoyed all the dishes.
Wanted something local and hadn't tried Fusilli's Cucinia yet. (Sam's Bistro has a new name and new menu)

Great calamari appetizer!!!! I had broiled scrod...which was a very large serving. Tasty. Served with rice and brussel sprouts which were really good. My husband enjoyed his veal saltambaca...a nice salad comes with the meal.
Service was very good. It was a Tues night and early too. Don't know how weekend service is.
The breakfast was not good at all. The home fries were soggy and the bacon left an awful aftertaste in my mouth.i think they should stick to just serving lunch and dinner.
I will not return for breakfast again.
Our entrees came out piping hot. The house made pasta was a perfect texture. not soft over cooked. a true Al dente. the tomato sauce is robust fresh taste not too light or heavy/paste.  The veal was tender although the portion of veal could have been larger. We did not leave hungry and took home pasta. Our salad while not fancy was bountiful and fresh.  Our wait staff was courteous and attentive. 
The atmosphere was a bit dark but cozy and clean.
We were introduced to Fusilli's Cucina a few months ago, it had been Sam's Bistro in the past.  Well since we were introduced, we have been there mulitple times!  The food is amazing!  The staff are great and it is a very comfortable and classy restaurant that is great for a couple or even families.  It is also open for lunch and breakfast now, which are both great takes and very reasonably priced as well!  It will become one of your favorite places!
This is the third or fourth time we have been to Fusilli. We had been fairly well satisfied previously which is why we returned with friends. It did not go well. The waitress seemed to be having a bad night bringing artichokes instead of anchovies for the Caesar salad. The anchovies did arrive later. My wife ordered salmon piccata. The first meal served to her was a chicken dish which was replaced fairly quickly. The Salmon piccata which was described as salmon medallions but was served as one thick piece of salmon over pasta, tasted OK but not what was described. One friend ordered saltimbocca described as containing prosciutto but it seemed more like ham chunks than thin sliced prosciutto. My mac and cheese was dry on the top as if it had been prepared some time ago and kept warm, the bottom tasted fine but overall could have been better if the sauce was spread evenly. We skipped dessert.
I made reservations because being a Friday night, I didn't know what it would be like. We were seated right away. The hostess just dropped the menus on the table and walked away. Our server seemed a bit rough. Kind of like in a rush, but took forever. Almost like she didn't want to be there. We gave our drink order to her and when she came back with them, she tossed a stack of napkins on the table and passed out the drinks. Took our order for appetizers then came back and took our dinner orders.  Never refilled our water glasses and when we were done with dinner came back with the check without asking if we wanted dessert or coffee. Little did she know we did. She wasn't happy about that. 
The food was delicious but the service could have been way better.
After two visits to Fusilli's, we are glad to have found a new spot serving quality Italian food at reasonable prices. The service was attentive and the atmosphere very comfortable. We love that the salad comes with most entrees.  (Note to mgmt: Add that fact to the menu!) We will return and recommend you give it a try. 
Dined with a couple of friends as I had a gift card I wanted to enjoy. We were seated quickly, and waitperson was very pleasant.  Bread is very fresh and salad with a light dressing was delish.  Overall, the food is what I expected for a neighborhood restaurant.  Good portions and prices, nice staff and service.
We were with another couple.  We had received a gift certificate for Christmas.  Our meals were excellent.  Two of us got the home made fusilli with our meal which was excellent.  My meal was chicken picatta.....really tasty.  A very enjoyable evening.
This restaurant is like gathering at your family's table & enjoying a delicious home cooked meal!  Service is impeccable!  Our waitress was attentive, yet not overbearing!  Each member, from the hostess to the bar tenders to the wait staff, treat you as though you are family. 
The food is some of the best I've ever had & that includes dining in Italy!  The varied menu allows each guest to choose from  many favorites. Portions are plentiful. Each of us left with a generous portion for home!
Can't wait to return here. This family owned restaurant is a big hit!
We have had Fusilli's Pizza three times. It has been very very good each time. Excellent crust, good toppings, nice consistency to the cheese and very reasonably priced. Might be the best Pizza in Reading. 
We tried Fuscilli's, even though we really didn't like Sam's Bistro. It is the same owners, but an Italian place now. We came at an off hour and ate in bar area at high top. I wish there was a little more light and I always find the tables a little sticky ( this time and when Sam's). The hostess gave us the option and we took the bar. She said,she would be right in with menus and after about 5+ minutes, I went out to the hostess stand and got them myself. She was no where to be found. The bartender was,the waitstaff and she did a good job. She had 2 tables, people at bar and making drinks for dining room. We had chicken and veal plam. The veal was a little tough, just a little. The chicken was ok and fusilli was homemade. Wish they had a meat sauce option with the meal, especially for the pasta.  We had house salad that was good. Overall hostess disappeared, service was good, meal was OK.  Boy, I miss Luigi's in Bedford, rumor mill says it may be back, just not in Bedford. This will be an option, not a first option like Luigi's was for us. 


Only good for karaoke....previously used for poker playing.
Not good for families or anyone of quality
the food was excellent and the chief was very friendly he came out and socialized wit the customers . 
Quando fomos tinha música ao vivo, e embora fossem ótimas músicas, estava muito alto. Os pratos servidos estavam bons. O atendimento é excelente.
This review is for the mobile cupcake truck... which I visited this weekend at Everett Village fest. Tiramisu cupcake was very good, and the cupcake itself was very most. Not exactly like eating a piece of tiramisu but it was very good. I wish they had mini cupcakes.
Delicious,  fresh, unique flavors,  and a super friendly staff! !! I would recommend a stop by this hidden gem. So tasty !
Very tiny little shop, but good cupcakes. Unique cupcakes - each one has a theme and looks like a piece of art. They are the type of cupcakes that you don't want to eat because they look too pretty. Expensive though.
They certainly had lots of different cupcakes in this Newton location that's affiliated with this one. Friday they have gluten free cupcakes, so order ahead or get there early! friendly staff, and a few tables to eat in. 
Just cupcakes...I mean, you can't go too wrong with cupcakes. The interior of this store is nice and they have lots of flavors to choose from. They also host birthday parties which is probably their coolest offering.
Love the everyday flavor cupcakes that are offered as well as the specialty cakes. The s'mores as well as the salted caramel were divine. Prices are reasonable which is a treat, too!. Counter helper was very pleasant and patient as I debated which cupcakes to purchase (In retrospect I should have had one of everything!) This is a very small storefront so keep your eyes pealed for their pink flag or cupcake truck in the parking lot; you won't want to miss out.
This is a wonderful local place to buy a cupcake. Nice people. I also notice a tea/birthday party room onsite. Would be a nice place for a party! Prices are average for a cupcake!
we stopped in for Easter and bought a dozen- great selection and we shared them and all were excellent.  Quality ingredients and not to sweet, but satisfied our sweet teeth!  Counter help is very helpful describing the different cupcake selections.  Great place for stopping to pick up a quick home gift.
Really miss this place.  They had the best variety of dinners.  Even had an excellent Corn Beef Dinner.  - From beef to chicken to turkey for seafood.
Sam's Bistro has a warm inviting atmosphere and pleasant staff.  The food was good, not great, but if I were in the area again, I would certainly revisit.
I ate lunch here with a large group of ladies.
 The meal was great, there was a spillage incident, but the manager offered to pay for my dry cleaning which was kind. These things happen. At least my meal of steak tips was tasty and cooked perfectly, Everyone had a good time. My friend's pasta primavera looked terrific. I'd recommend Sam's Bistro and eat there again.
My husband bought me a gift card for Christmas so we decided to stop n for an early dinner.We were seated immediately and served right away. The fired calamari appetizer was very good. I ordered the mixed grill, chicken, steak tips and ribs. The serving sizes were average. It came with a Ceasar salad, mixed vegetables and mashed potatoes (rather bland). My husband had the Fishermans platter with a small amount of seafood, although it tasted good. He had a side of rice and coleslaw. You had other choices for sides.
He also had a Manhattan which was good, but terribly high  at 13.50! Haven;t paid that much anywhere else.
Dinner was good, but probably won't return.
Stopped in for lunch as I was driving by. Very good pizza options. Had the Yawkee and it was amazing. Service was pretty slow but I wasn't in a rush so didn't mind too much. Nice looking place as well.
Took my wife and sister-in-law for lunch on a Thursday afternoon.  Everyone enjoyed the meals - the burger was done to perfection; the Caesar salad with grilled chicken was tasty and plentiful (see photo); my BLT with fries (see photo) hit the spot.  The restaurant was nicely appointed, warm and comfortable (see photo). This was an enjoyable meal with good customer service - when in the Reading area, we will be back.
Okay, after reading the reviews and because we were given a gift certificate to this place we figured we would go before the movies one night.  Me and my husband sat at the bar and the service was okay, not great I think the 2 bartenders were more interested in talking to the regulars and each other then serving us.  That being said we ordered a drink each and the bartender asked if we wanted bread and olive oil and we were very excited about the idea, well the excitement didn't last the bartender came back with a few slices of cold sliced bread drenched in olive oil...I guess maybe I was expecting warm bread with olive oil on the side for dipping...silly me.  We ordered an appetizer of lobster ravioli which consisted off about 4 raviolis with a few pieces of lobster they were pretty good but not great.  For our entrees I ordered the Prime Rib and my husband ordered the Nantucket Pie.  The female bartender didn't even ask what we wanted for our sides so I asked her and she told me the Prime Rib came with a baked potato and butternut squash, I asked if there was something I could get instead of the butternut squash and she said that's what it came with but she would ask if I could get something else...gee thanks.  I was told I could get a side of mixed vegetables instead...how gracious...both of our entrees came with Caesar salad which was wilty and had packaged croutons...it is one of my pet peeves that a restaurant chooses not to make homemade croutons (one of the easiest and cheapest things to make,,...hey why not make them from the leftover cold bread you serve !) I knew after the salad that we were in trouble but at that point we just wanted to eat and get to the movies..our entrees came out and the Prime Rib was a lot of grissle, sp? most of it was chewy and inedible so I literally asked to pack up the rest to take home for our dogs...which by the way I didn't even give to them because they probably would have a hard time chewing it. The worst part of all is that even with the $50 gift card we were given the bill was still almost $90...Yikes, thank God we didn't have to pay $90 for that meal.  It was mediocre at best and we will not be back.  I am all for trying to support local businesses but this was overpriced and not worth the time or money.
DO NOT WASTE YOUR TIME OR MONEY...
Quick pic from viewing menu on line turned out to be a very delicious meal.
Just a short distance from Stoneham Theater.
Decor is a bit heavy on the wood side, but the food and service made up for it.
We are visiting family in the area and came to the bistro for dinner. Our waitress, Lisa was very friendly and efficient. The food is very good. I had the beef tips which were tender and flavorful. I recommend Sam's bistro if you are in the area.
I've been here many times - lunch, dinner and special events.  The food is always excellent & the staff is helpful. SOmetimes it can take a while for food to come out, but it's always been hot/fresh when served. Favorites are the pizzas, the haddock and lobster bisque.  I've never heard anyone complain about the dish they ordered, only that they wished they ordered someone else's too!
Sam's is the home of the tried and true. No surprises, and that can be a plus. I has the lobster bisque, which  was very good, with chunks of lobster floating in it; fried haddock, and a beer.
My wife and I have had dinner at Sam's Bistro three times now. And each time, dinner has been very good. We have had the Salmon, Swordfish, Steak, Prime Rib, and their specials and every dish we've had is very good. The food is served hot, the helpings are generous, and the service has been outstanding. My wife and I both like to substitute extra vegetables for the potato or rice and the restaurant is very accommodating.  This positive review is long overdue.
Being generous with the two star. Food was just alright, actually bit bland.... I ordered the steak and my wife the chicken. The restaurant was empty, but it still took a while for the food to come. Service is what ruined the experience. The waitress wasn't friendly and couldn't be bothered.
nice menu choice, very nice waitstaff…Great bar, to meet your friends for an apply and wine….Met my match date there!!  
Two of my very best friends from high school (49 years ago) got together to visit the new home of one of the women.  Sam's Bistro is right down the street.  After visiting her new condo and going through many albums of pictures that came to light in the move, we decided to visit Sam's.  It was a Wednesday night and the parking lot was full with people mostly in the restaurant section.  We decided to eat in the bar which was not full.  The waiter was very attentive, menu was extensive for a bar menu with a great variety of food.  Two of us had fish which they enjoyed and I had veal picatta with mushroom raviolis.  Excellent!.  Wine selection was good, prices reasonable.  Definitely would go again.  Also not too loud to catch up with friends.
We have been to Sam's before but this was special. It was a nice night and we needed to relax and enjoy our day. The food was excellant and the service was awesome. The staff goes out of theit way to make you feel welcome. For some reason the food was special that night.
      
Love the food and service at Sam's Bistro!  I go with my friends and family quite often.  They go out of their way to please.  If you don't see something on the menu that you've had before.....the waitstaff will ask the cook if he has the ingredients and if he does he'll prepare that meal for you.  Love the shrimp scampi....no one makes it better than Sam's Bistro!
Sam's Bistro in Reading is a very dependable spot for lunch or dinner. Food has always been very good, not fancy but cooked well, served hot and plenty of variety to suit everyone's taste. Wait staff is pleasant and efficient.
We had heard unfavorable things about Sam's Bistro....so we were pleasantly surprised when it exceeded our expectations. The food and service were really good. My friend and I each had enough to take home for a lunch the next day. The guys ate all of theirs and were full. We would go back.
Met some relatives for dinner. Parking lot was full but parked next door. The food and portions were very good, the staff was great. Found to be priced very reasonable.  Good for families, atmosphere was OK. We got reservations on the same day but the place was busy.
I have been eating Harrows chicken pot pies for more than 50 years. They are truly the best. Full of white meat. You have an option with or with out (veggies). You can buy extra gravey, rolls and pies.  Easy supper and affordable. 
They have the best chicken pot pie from jumbo to individual sizes. You can order ahead and get a hot chicken pot pie or you can pick one up and cook it at home. They come with or without vegetables. 
It used to be a restaurant but now it's just a place to pick up the food. 
You can get gravy, soup, chicken salad, squash, mashed potatoes, rolls/corn bread and blueberry or apple pies.
Great Chicken Pot Pie, with our without Veg.   Great crust and get the dinner rolls to soak up the gravy.
I absolutely love Harrows chicken pot pie. I prefer it without the veggies because the veggies take up too much room lol and you don't get as much of the wonderfully tender chicken meat. The chicken pulls apart with a fork and melts in your mouth. Delicious!  Their chicken salad is also fantastic - I buy pint every time I pick up s pot pie. 
When you just want something simple and good.  White Meat Chicken with Vegetables, I always buy more than we need that night, so I can have leftovers.  Potatoes are good as well.
Nothing better on a chilly night. Chicken pie with or without veggies. Delicious! You can get sides such as squash and mashed potatoes, and soft dinner rolls all to go. Call ahead to pick your pie up hot otherwise take it home and cook it whenever you're ready.
Harrow's (available in at least 3 locations) is the ultimate comfort food.  Their pies, available in a variety of options are just wonderful.  They no longer offer dinning in, its all to-go but its great.  Add in some cornbread and a pie and you are ready for any storm either from the weather or man made.

Well worth the trip
Take out only. Great chicken pies and excellent rolls - though expensive. Call ahead to make sure that you get a fresh, warm pie.
Harrow's has been renown for their Chicken Pot Pie for years. This CPP with vegetables was good and plentiful for about $14. It would have been "Great" if it had some dark meat and less potatoes. This Pie was heavy on potatoes, fairly light on vegetables.
Have always bought the Chicken Pot Pie here in Reading, and they are great for the family or wonderful to bring to Friends who need a little TLC because of an illness or death. They also make delicious dessert pies in many flavors. Not an eat in place anymore, just take it home and enjoy.
Harrows Chicken Pies have been around since before my mother was born!  My grandmother used to purchase chicken pies from Harrows.  I enjoy the Harrows chicken pies very much; they are delicious.  Just think of what your grandmother may have made from scratch, and that is what you will get from Harrows.  You can purchase them in different sizes, depending upon how many you wish to feed.  (My suggestion is to buy more than you think you will need. Leftovers are awesome!) They are a great New England home-made Chicken pie.  You can get them with or without vegetables.  You purchase them from the store either ready-to-eat warm or frozen.  You can call ahead and order as many chicken pies as you think you will need, to be sure they have them ready at pickup time.  They also sell scrumptious sides and desserts to go with the pies.
Their pies are always a welcome treat to send too a sick friend, or for a family or friend when someone has passed.  I often bring a pie or two to a friend's house up in Maine when we visit.  They covet the pies like the are gold!
Best pot pies I've ever had. Chock full of chicken and vegetables. Pie crust and sauce are light. Great comfort food. 
You can not go wrong with the chicken pot pie here. They come in several sizes and with or without veggies. The rolls are great too.
My family & I used to go to Harrows (Previously called Harrow's Rustic Roost) when it was an actual sit-in restaurant on Main Street. It has since become a take out only place. So we have been consuming their pot pies for decades and, frankly, I have tried other pies over the years but none could equal the flavor and amount of chicken in the Harrow's product. The owners take pride in what they produce and that keeps us buying their products year after year.
If you like Chicken pot pie, then Harrows is the place to get dinner any night.  You can pick up the pie frozen or call an hour before you arrive and they will have it ready for you.   If someone is sick it is the one stop we make to insure that family has a great dinner.   If you haven't been to Harrows, I suggest you make the stop, you won't be disappointed.
Harrow's has excellent chicken salad to go.  When we visit friends on the Cape we almost always pick up one of their chicken pies to give to our hosts.  Everyone totally enjoys them.  Also a good deal for families who cannot cook and need meals as a result of illness, death or new babies.
they just to it right.  you can call in to have a hot pie waiting for you.  the side dishes are very good and complete the meal.
I have tried chicken pies from other restaurants and always go back the Harrow's. Their pie is my wife comfort food,
In town to help a family move to Reading and we wanted a meal for kids and adults that was quick, convenient and fresh.  I would never have imagined a place would specialize in just pot pies but given Harrow has been around for 75 years, they do it right!  Great side dishes of squash, cornbread and FAB dessert pies.  We will be back!
The chicken pie is delicious and satisfying, very close to Soul Food. The fresh rolls are to die for!
Always yummy and stuffed subs,plus place is do busy  you know everything  is fresh. Italian sub is fabulous, meats falling out do delicious  soft roll. Also  good pizza  and calzones. Call ahead or expect  to  wait as always very busy. 
If you love Subs you will want to visit Anthony's Roast Beef and Pizza. This place has everything from Pizza, Salad, Pasta, Calzones and all type of Sides.  A while ago I ordered their Special Sub, it is loaded with Italian cold cuts, Roast Beef, cheese and Bacon now when I go to Anthony's for Lunch or Dinner I order this and a small onion ring   try this place  (The End) .
Anthony's is a pizza/sub shop, with all the usual suspects. If you are not interested in a belly buster, try one of their garden salads with a scoop, no, a large dollop, of chicken salad. The salads are always fresher than fresh, and they are a real value. All in all, a better than average sub shop .
Great meal deals during the week. More than enuff to share. Pizza......2 lge for around $15 , can't beat it!!
I received a menu in the mail and had a craving for a turkey sub so I figured I'd order delivery and give them a try. My mother happened to be over and really wanted cheese sticks so I called and ordered a small cheese stick side and a large turkey sub. I was pretty surprised at the price (although, I should have checked the menu to see how pricey their sides are!). It took about half an hour to arrive and the delivery man was friendly. The food wasn't very good. The cheese sticks were hard and cooked oddly. First bite, coolish but when you got to the middle, they were super hot. The sub was a real let down. Not much meat and the toppings didn't taste very good, especially the onions. For that price, I expected a nicely put together sub with lots of meat and what I got was one already soggy from the toppings with most of them fallen out the minute you opened up the paper to get to the sub. I wouldn't use them again.
We bought 2 calzones: buffalo chix and spinach with ricotta, plus a hot pastrami sandwich.  The hot pastrami sandwich was just average (I do think we have been spoiled by the ones we have had in New York.)  The calzones were greasy.  It almost tasted like fried dough.  
I don't think we will try anything from there again yet I have heard that others love their food.
This is not my first choice when I'm going out for dinner on a date, but if you're looking for great cheap bar food or a fun trivia night, this is your place. The service is always good, the prices are more than reasonable, and they serve good drinks. 
We are weekend regulars in the winter when we can't get outside all day.  The staff knows us and we don't even order anymore.  They even know how each of us takes our veggie burger.  
I have no problem with chain restaurants. We went out for dinner before a charity event and the service and food were fine. There were plenty of choices for me as I do not do spicy food well. In fact we had the 2 for $20 and I had steak, my daughter had ribs and I got the shrimp as an extra. Everything was quick and we were on our way.
This place is right down the road from my house, and it'd be nice if I actually enjoyed the Chili's Reading experience, which I do not. The food is not good quality. The service is lacking, and staff does not know the products, or how to make a visit awesome. Prices are high for small portions. We keep trying, and Chili's keeps failing.
Yes, Chili's is Chili's - nothing special, but you know what your getting.  It is conveniently located right off the highway and next door to Jordan's Furniture.

We got seated right away for lunch, ordered the Quesadilla Explosion Salad and were pleasantly surprised.  The chicken was really good and the entire salad had plenty of fixings.  It also comes with 4-5 quesadilla triangles.
Typical Chili's chain restaurant. Nothing special. Food is fine except for kids' pizza...it was nasty...definitely from the freezer.
Poorest quality Chili's I've ever been to in my life. Having been to another Chili's just two weeks ago in different location, you can clearly see that this one in Reading is seriously ruining the dining experience for the restaurant chain. They skimped on the portions of both the appetizers and main dishes. Everything tasted disgusting and metallic, most of the food was barely cooked. I even ordered the same exact meal as I normally get at Chili's and it was less than half the amount of food. Steak in the fajitas came out bloody raw and had to be sent back. Completely unsatisfied with my experience here and felt sick after eating the food...almost makes me want to never go to a Chili's again.

Your average Chili's with not so great service. i say you are always safe going with a chain, but you should really be trying new things!
We went there today the food was very good and the service was great. We had the full rack special for 13.99 and it was good. The service was fast and friendly. Plenty of food at a fair price.
I went here with my daughters for a father-daughter night. There was no wait to be seated when we arrived, which was appreciated. Then we waited... a lot. We had to wait about 5 minutes to meet the server responsible for our table, wait to have our orders taken (another 10 minutes), and wait for refills on water and beverages (25 minutes). The food was not properly prepared and was missing core ingredients. The manager was alerted to the situation and did give us a complimentary salad that I had separately ordered for takeout. The gesture was appreciated, so I gave stars for it. There are other similar restaurants in the area, so it will be a while before I return.
Food is highly salted, lots of breaking or fried items but you find a few tasty options at this chain. Service depends on the night. Sometimes bartenders are busy socializing with regulars, which might be nice for regulars, but runs the risk of not creating more regulars. I've been here dozens of times with 75% iffy service in the bar area. Soups are good. Salads fresh but a little over priced.
Granted you can't expect a lot of creativity out of these establishments and the Reading location help prove that.

We had the option to sit in the lounge (off the bar) or the normal dining room. Due to the busy lunch hour we opted for the bar for a quick bite after Jordan's shopping.

My wife ordered the Chicken Bacon Ranch Quesadilla and I got the Chipotle Chicken flatbread.  Once the food was delivered we dug right in because we were hungry.

The flatbread had great presentation but not a ton of flavor.  There was a little chicken and a few squirts of the chipotle sauce. To me it was a bland cheese pizza with some light toppings.  She couldn't find any ranch anywhere in her quesadilla, not to mention a few other ingredients listed in the description. We thought about sending it back fora correction, very few establishments are good at corrections.

After running a 10k that morning I just ordered water to drink. Refills were scarce, the waitstaff passed our table a number of times.

Bottom line, if you enjoy Chili's go there. Next time I'm in the area, I'll just stick to Fuddruckers inside Jordan's where I can assure that the food is made right.


visited on a Friday night on 5/2/2014...very loud and very crowded, almost all were families. The food although formula and very portion controlled was not bad at all and the menu includes several non-Mexican type items for broader appeal. The wait staff did amazingly well and were pleasant to boot. The only real heavy negative encountered is that a large younger couple arrived and she wore a T shirt that was a poor takeoff on the popular English "stay calm and carry on" hers in very large letters said " stay calm and go f--k yourself. I was very disappointed that she was allowed in at all. The place was loaded with very young children. I assume management has never addressed such a possibility.
Her review: The food is very good and she liked the salsa and chips.  You love the store and the make good food and it is delicious.

My review:  Good value, good food, quick and friendly service, clean, not much more you can ask for.  The salsa and chips are good, she's right.
Chili's is our go to family dinner destination for a quick and cheap place to eat. We also enjoy going here for drinks and appetizers after work, etc. Believe it or not their ribs are great! Fall off the bone goodness. Their burgers are also very scrumptious! If you are looking for a quick cheap fix Chili's is still the place to go
Stopped in her on a whim, needed a quick dinner with our 3yr old.  We love the chips and salsa to start. Everything was great.
      
Great family restaurant.  We almost always get right in without any wait.  Service and food are great and the kids love it also.

Bar and bar section is also great when you don't have the kids or a night out.
Excellent, friendly service. Good food. Prices reasonable. Very accommodating for my no-carb request, suggesting substitution.

We chose this because it was close to Jordan's IMAX theatre. It was a good decision.
Ótimo restaurante. As comidas são iguais desta rede, mas o prato estava delicioso. Funcionários atenciosos.
I know it's commercial, but I really do love Bertucci's. Their Silano pizza is amazing and they have really good salads as well. They also make some decent drinks and the prices are very reasonable, the portion sizes are very good as well. I've never had to wait very long to be seated even on a Friday or Saturday night and I have more than enough parking. Their food is even good when you get it to go! 
We got the perfect Sunset on July 4th and enjoyed some great pizza at Bertucci's in Reading.

Great service by our waitress added to the great dining experience!
Have been to many Bertucci restaurants and have been very pleased up until know.  Went for lunch after the movies.  The food was horrible.  Stale bread, old salad and the soap was cold and had a layer of grease floating on the top.  And the service made it even worse.
Went for lunch with extended family and it was great!  They gave the children a little ball of pizza dough to play with along with crayons and a placement to color.  We never heard a peep out of them which made for great adult conversation.  The food was plentiful, and only one of us said that their meal was so-so.  More importantly, the service in this restaurant is GREAT!  From the host to the waitstaff, you can always count on great service.
Where can you go and be served lunch until 4PM, have unlimited bread rolls (made from pizza dough), unlimited salad, a sandwich or mini pizza and a cup of soup or pasta salad, all for $7.99...!!!!!!    Unbelievable.....   and it all tastes great....
You will not be disappointed!
If you're wanting Italian, go to Boston.  I ordered the Chicken Marsala.  The flavor was good but the whole meal was less than room temperature.  In addition, my potatoes were al dente which isn't the way i  prefer my potatoes and my friend's pasta dish had acquired a crust on top as if it had been sitting around.  I'm not  one to slam a restaurant, but I'll never eat there again and hope this review warns others.
This Bertuccis is what you want when you go to Bertuccis. Consistently good. We sat at the bar and split a Sporkie pizza and the lunch salad. Tasty! Pizza was hot! Service was good. A cheap work lunch. 
Try the white pizza with some slices of lemon on the side to squeeze over the cheese.  I always ask for this treat if I don't see it on the menu.
The rolls made out of the pizza dough are great to dip into the oil.
First of all, let me say that there should be some kind of facial hair code that Bertucci's imposes on its waiters. Our waiter arrived with a handlebar mustache waxed on both tips and a beard at least six inches long which had been woven into a braid and had an elastic banded at the bottom. I (and other customers at other tables) had all I could do to contain myself because he looked preposterous! We ordered farmhouse salads which took 25 minutes to prepare. Honestly, I have ordered this many times at the Lexington Bertucci's and theirs tastes much better than this one. Also, our waiter kept apologizing because they were behind in making their freshly baked bread and I do think he kept us waiting until the bread was served to our table before he gave us our salads. Between the hair, the slow service and the mediocre salad, we would not return.
Used to find Bertucci's had outstanding Italian food at great prices while maintaining the feel of a family owned restaurant.

Everything seems to diminish each time I return. The service is spotty, the dishes don't seem to have to quality of ingredients and flavor they used to and it's feeling more and more like an Olive Garden.

Disappointing that just a gem had deteriorated over time.
So not all chains are the same. They may have cookie cutter recipes and pictures of how the food should look on the plate, but the head chef does make a difference and the one in reading does a nice job. Good choices, any chicken dish and get the roasted veggies on the side. Yummy and good for you. Staff are friendly and accommodating making you think management just might be supportive. Only thing I recommend is a little more cheese on margarita pizza and fresh basil. 
I remember coming here as a kid and the food was excellent, however, this was a long time ago and I probably got a basic kid's meal.  

The chicken picatta was mediocre, barely any sauce and the noodles were a bit under-cooked. The service was absolutely atrocious. The restaurant was not crowded at all and it took an extremely long time to get anything. All the while, our server was going back to other tables while neglecting ours. Would not return.
I went here a couple of times after work and found the appetizers and main course really delectable. Worth going.
Had a wonderful lunch yesterday at This Bertucci's location
The menu is changing for the spring and they are bringing back some of the favorites from the past. The  spinach, strawberry  salad with added shrimp was excellent ( small  9.99 and large at 12.99) i chose the large and it kept me full all afternoon.  There were 5 large shrimp in the salad with plenty of strawberries and it was very tasty even though spinach usually isn't so tasty the added strawberry vinegarette dressing helped it quite a bit.  My brother enjoyed a Meatball sandwich and minestrone soup.  $7.99   a nice lunch at a good price very filling for both
And don't forget the Pizza dough rolls are to die for.
We frequent this Bertucci's almost weekly for Lunch
I usually get a salad or sandwich lunch but decided this day on the "NEW" Chicken Parmesan Casserole.  For $12 this is a good luncheon portion and it consists of 2 chicken breast slices covered in Cheese on top of a ziti and sauce portion. The taste is very good and fills you nicely.
It's never a bad experience here (heck, the bread alone is delicious!), but I miss some of the old menu items... I miss the "pick two" pairing (I used to get the polenta and roasted veggies for only $7.99!) and also the antipasto arrosto... It seems like their prices are going up as well?  Also, the kids meals are lame... The "mac and cheese" was more like pasta with butter... where's the cheese?  And the kids grilled cheese is not something that most kids will recognize... Just ok.  
Today being my birthday my 2 brothers treated me to lunch. 
We arrived at the Bertucci's in Reading at about 11:30 am on a monday the 15th and were immediately seated. By 12;30 when we left it was very busy
Our waiter Ben we had as a server several times in the past so we introduced ourselves and now we all know each others names    I decided to try something different and was pleasantly surprised that the grilled salmon was about 2 x 6 inches and about 3/4 inch thick and was perfectly seasoned and grilled.  The salad was a mixture of various vegetables including some beans , kidney beans, greens, tomato's  and grilled peppers both red and green it was not hot at all but a sweet dressing covered it too.  Both brothers had  the Delicato lunch sandwich on focaccia bread. These contain different italian cold cuts including Salami etc. yummy but not for someone on a low salt diet.    Prices   The Salmon Salad (Full size ) $15 the sandwiches which include a small salad or macaroni salad are $9  good value for luch
Had a good lunch today at Bertuccis in Reading for some reason it's listed twice on this site and whoever put the photo has another Bertucci's in mind since this one is attached to a steakhouse.
A little difficult to enter the parking lot as it is an entrance in the rear of the building
Seated promptly and courteously.  Our waiter was actually the bartender Nikolas
He is very courteous too and very attentive re-filling my lemonate 3 times without having to request it. The salad had a little bit too much dressing but was tasty and my brother had his usual chicken panini sandwich which he likes and I had this time a small or Medium margharita pizza
This is one of the quintessential bertucci's pizza's you will love it. All in all a very nice lunch and under $30 with a generous tip.
The Bertuccis chain is one of my favorite haunts
A visit at least every 2 weeks is not unusual
Had a usual good tasting meal this time. My brothers chicken flatbread sandwich was great
I decided on a calzone rather than my usual this time but it was very tasty but way too liquid inside
It was supposedly meatball but there was so much ricotta added that the water separated in the heat of the oven causing the crust to be soggy and gummy
Our waiter Ben offered to replace it but we were pressed for time having waited about 20 minutes after the order was placed.  Gr.eat tasting food but the kitchen needs a little finesse to make it perfect
We find this a great lunch spot. The rolls are always warm and the family size salad is very good. The entrees and sandwiches are reasonably priced with speedy service for preople on the go.
We will eat here often.
Had the Bison Burger, the waffle fries are also awesome.
Everything is awesome!
I'd go there a lot if I lived close by. Prices aren't very high and the food is great. Big selection of fixin's that you put yourself on your burger.
We came to this location because we took the kids to Beantown and the zip line course. We were hungry so decided to eat here. We have been to a different Fuddruckers in NC and they were not at all the same experience. That being said, the place appeared clean, the staff was courteous and the food was excellent. I had the grilled chicken salad and it was extremely tasty. The kids meals looked great and it was reported that they tasted great. I do not have anything negative to report. 
Probably one of the best burger places I have been to. Quick service, good selection of topping choices - works well for lunch. 
My husband and I have gone here several times before. When we went this past week, things were so changed, it was shocking. It has been renovated, and not for the better in my opinion. There seems to be less tables, people used to walk around cleaning and wiping tables, but now I waited 10 minutes for someone to do this, then I was told, there are 2 places to clear your stuff( glasses, baskets, etc). put a sign up so people know, just don't assume people know.  No silverware, except spoons, at the stand where you get pickles, tomatoes, etc. I know I will not be going back there at all. Used to be great, but now you feel like you are on a hunt to find things, and that includes a clean table.
We used to rave about the is place, but no more. They redesigned the interior, and it's now so stark. Not a comfortable vibe as before, and the seating is way more impersonal now. Anyway, the food has slumped, too, and the prices are way higher. We tried the haddock sandwich - BEWARE - it's a paper-thin piece, almost no flavor or substance, and it's pricey, too. There are so many better burger joints these days - don't waste your cash at Fudds in Reading.
Fuddruckers always has amazing burgers cooked the way that you want.  A great place to stop before or after a movie or taking a break from shopping.  
Sometimes greasy is awesome! I'm not sure what it is about this location but every time we've eaten there, I get a super upset stomach not long after.

Food is tasty and the service is average. 

Very expensive for burgers
Stopped there on my way home; saw the Fuddruckers name and thought......oh cool!
In a mall, completely lacks the traditional Fuddrucker's feel. 
Expensive fast food.......young people running the place have no idea what customer service is. Not worth a 2nd visit..........but I'm sure it will be successful just because it is in a mall location.
We used to love this place, but it's becoming a ripoff joint. Quality, especially regarding meat, used to be off the charts. Now, it's just average. Nothing special. And, this specific location in Reading has had a remodeling done, and that's worse than before, too. We have found another go-to burger place, and it blows this place away.
     Last night was the first time I  have been to Fuddruckers

in a long time and it is still as good as ever.  I got my favorite

meal there, a buffalo burger with cole slaw and baked beans.

For a drink, I asked what was the special frappe now.  When 

the man told me pumpkin, I ordered it with pleasure and I

can tell you it was amazing.  The buffalo burger has always

been my favorite meal at Fuddruckers though the elk burger

is great, too.  I heartily recommend Fuddruckers.
Fuddruckers is great for families and this location is probably better because of its location within Jordan's. Food is nothing spectacular.
This is our first visit to this Fuddruckers & it was worth the hr drive! Everything was made fresh & so yummy! It was the 4th & everyone was friendly, helpful & full of smiles! The location was clean, I thought maybe there was a couple less toppings but we didn't go hungry. Awesome every time & every location too! I luv Fuddruckers ! You haven't lived till you had a fuddburger
We've been going to this location since it opened and it's always fun.  The hamburgers are good.  The cheese sandwich is good for vegetarians.  I always enjoy the "Reeses shake".
The location has indoor seating - or a small area just outside of the restaurant where you can really spread out (also an indoor area).  Located at the same location as the IMAX and the Richardson's ice cream.
Our party enjoyed beef and Bison burgers and one ordered a bunless turkey burger which was the best seasoned turkey burger we had ever had.The fries, regular or sweet potato are very good and the condiment bar is a welcome addition to your meal.
The food was great as it always is at Fuddruckers, but trying to find seating for even a group of 3 was like finding parking at Christmas... People were nasty and grabby.... 
what else can you say about a burger place that lets you put on all your fixings yourself. I ordered the 1/2 pound burger medium and they didn't disappoint. They have a lot of different kinds of toppings for your burgers and the fries were great,self serve soda machine too.
We went in conjunction with a trip to Jordan's.  Went early on a Friday night; it was very busy, and we had a long wait just to order, but once seated (and although busy we found seating), the food came quickly.  Very impressed by the smiling staff and efficient service.  I particularly took note of the shift supervisor, Nicole Hayes, who was smiling, helpful and pleasant while running around like a madwoman.   

The food is very good, there is much to choose from, and at a competitive price.  That said, the main business, burgers and fries, can't touch the taste of Five Guys in either.  The buns were fresh and there were many options for toppings.  The meat was just okay.  My family liked the chicken tenders with yummy honey mustard sauce.  Onion rings pretty good with a good portion for three bucks.
I finally tried the Reading, MA Fuddruckers located within the Jordan's Furniture store. I was very pleased with the personnel and the burger itself. Plus the vast amount of "fixings" that you can pile  on top of the burger is amazing. One of the best burgers I have had in quite some time and the price is not out of sight (& comes with fries).

Worth giving the place a try.
Burgers and buns are always nice and fresh with many topping that can be added.  Shakes are very tasty (probably made with Richardson's ice cream).  Definitely worth visiting when shopping at Jordan's furniture.  
Went the other night for school fun raiser. Hadn't been in a while. Appeared that the sides have gotten smaller. My wife got a milk shake and was told they ran out of glasses. So it was in a to go cup and they said it was the same amount as the regular NO WAY. Lots less, usually can get 1and a half glasses. This time maybe 3/4 of the cup was full. They need to get back to there roots. Make it like it was.
What can I say, this place is great. We've been coming here for years. Icecream is awesome! If your short on cash you can just grab an icecream and walk around with the kids and see the animals. If you wanna spend a few bucks, the batting cages are always fun or the mini golf. Can't go wrong with Richardsons!
Richardson's is by far the best ice cream in the area.   Separate check out for take out of milk and half gallons of ice cream makes it very quick and easy.   If eating in, fun to watch the ropes course at Jordan's furniture.
I love all the varieties Richardsons offers. I've tried nearly every flavor there, I loved most of them and those I didn't love I liked a lot. My son has a banana allergy, and when I told them they took it very seriously. 
I love the fact that there is a Richardson's Ice-cream inside Jordan's Furniture. The ice-cream is topnotch!
they have the best ice cream in the area no question about it. I have been going there for over 50 year sand it has always been great. The prices are fair and the servings are huge.
We enjoy cooling off inside here and enjoying the ice cream while watching people. On a hot day its nice to be able to sit somewhere cool. The ice cream is always creamy fresh and great hot fudge topping.
Its a fun place to go when you're in the area.  The lines can appear long but it moves along quickly.  The sizes are incredible too!!
Love the large variety  of flavors with coffee  being a personal  favorite. The ice cream is very creamy and never freezer  burnt. And you can watch the light show or the kids on the ropes courses  while  you eat.
Richardson's Dairy from nearby Middleton has a branch here in Reading. their ice creams are tasty cream and they do hand pack anything. Ok the location is noisy since the Jordan furniture water ballet is nearby, the the sundaies, cones and hand pack is worth it.Try the vanilla bean and the death by chocolate.
We love this place.  You know it is good, with it's long lines.  You can sit, watch the colored light water show and people doing the ropes obstacle course.  I feel better eating this ice cream, knowing it doesn't have all the hormones. The original in Middleton, MA is even better.  You can visit the cows too!  My favorite ice creams in the Mounds bar.  Coconut ice cream with chucks of dark chocolate and a chewy nut mixture. Yum!
Richardson’s has the freshest and creamiest ice cream, with the largest selection of flavors, in the area.  The prices are reasonable, and the service is fast and efficient.  While eating our ice cream, we enjoy watching the music and laser water show, as well as people using the BeanStalk Adventure Rope Course.  The area is noisy, but the seating area behind the escalator is quieter and more conducive to conversing.
Excellent Ice cream great Variety
Good for Family's & Friends.
You won't be dissapointed. It also has a miniature golf range. Plus  driving Range
Great ice cream with lots of flavors to choose from! Fantastic location that is really entertaining. There really isn't anything bad to say about this except for the noise level.
Richardson's is an institution in the area. Farming since 1695.  Once you have had their ice cream and frozen yogurt you will not go back to the national brands. They also sell their milk and cream.  In addition to the ice cream stand there is miniature golf, batting cages and all sorts of farm animals.
This location has a nice water/music show that the kids find enjoyable.  Lots of room to stretch out in this indoor location.
Maine Black Bear and Frozen Puddings are our favorites to enjoy while watching the beautiful liquid fireworks display.
Whether you go to Richardson's at Jordan furniture or in Danvers your sure to get the creamiest best tasting ice cream. The amount you get for the price is a plus, if you go to Danvers they have mini golf, batting cages and golf ranges. plus the cows are there for the little ones to see.
Was at my nearby sportsman's club and stopped for a cone on the way home. It never changes---meaning the ice cream is ALWAYS great. No frozen pieces of ice or small scoops. Rich and creamy is what you pay for and get every time.
Stopped by while shopping . Enjoyed the trapee show and liquid fire works. Ice cream is the best. Good prices on mile to

We live this place all around. I go with my children as well as night with the hubby. We love watching the water show and walking around Jordan's.
This restaurant is on the site of the former Macaroni Grill. It has great atmosphere and 
very comfortable to be in. Our server Dillon brought out a sample of their cracked black pepper chicken wings. they were delicious. More importantly, the coal fired pizza was 
very good. some coal fired pizzas can be a little on the burnt side, but this was nicely 
done. we enjoyed this place and will be going back this week. staff was great and the Mgr. came over to talk about their craft beers.
Let me start by saying the pizza was wonderful! My husband and I  truly enjoyed it. We were seated promptly, the bus boy greeted us and gave us plates and silverware very quickly. Then we waited,  and waited, we were discussing going elsewhere when a waitress finally came over and asked how long we were waiting because, she just got in. (She was serving  the table right next to us). Her perfume was overwhelming and unwelcomed. She brought my husband the wrong beer. And the absolute worse thing of all another waitress brought our pizza to us, when our waitress saw she started yelling at the poor girl right in front of us. It's the most unprofessional experience I have ever had. While I might return for another pizza, most likely I will get it to go.
Quick stop for lunch with co-workers.
The small pizza looked great, but I chose the coal chicken sandwich.  It was delicious.  Staff was fast and polite.
We went for dinner last Friday to Anthony's Coal Fire Pizza. One of the best pizzas we have ever had.

The pizza was very good, got a large sausage pizza.  As they mention, it's well done, but was not burnt.  It was crispy with a nice thin crust.

Service was very good, although it was not very busy as they had just opened.  So not sure how it would be when busier.

The one drawback for me was that they don't have bacon.  Hard to believe that today with bacon being the most popular thing on the planet and just about everyplace has it for a pizza topping, but oh well.  

I will certainly give this place another try, and maybe try dining in and having some of their other options.
We had pizza and salad.  Pizza came out fast... way to fast... didn't even finish salad.  The salad was good, much better than the pizza... The pizza had no taste. Very bland and doughy. Came out so fast I don't think they let it cook long enough.  Might be a temperature control issue with the really hot ovens.  The pizza and over all dinning experience not even close to measuring up to all the REALLY GOOD pizza places in and around the North Shore.  Salad forks or at least ones that you can eat with would be a big improvement...  nothing worse than chasing food around your plate with a fork that doesn't measure up... just like the pizza.  They could use a larger more official hostess stand instead of the over sized manager who thinks he is a bouncer who was in our face as we walked in the door... $50. for a pizza, salad, one beer and one coke is crazy....I have no problem spending that much and more at places like Flatbread or Babbos because their products and experiences are worth it and they blow Anthony's away....
First time, we were told that it was national chicken wing's day.    I was going there for the pizza, but did try a 5 chicken wing platter.   While it was well cooked, it was also very blend.    The pizza was okay, but very expensive.    Choices of pizzas are very limited.  Don't expect much here.  On our second visit, we found the menu very boring.   The staff didn't care much about us and nobody looked at us for the first 5 minutes (sitting at the bar).   I was wondering if this was the same staff that used to be at the Macaroni'n' Grill restaurant (previous restaurant at that location) that didn't work due to failure to manage the staff...  (kitchen, waitress, name it!).   Is this location doomed?!...    We ended up going for another local restaurant for an amazing pizza at a much better price value.
This is a nice looking place, could be noisy when crowded. I picked up a takeout mushroom pizza and it was ready in about 12 minutes, fiery hot. Scorched crust, just how I like it! Tons of fresh mushrooms. Looking forward to returning for a sitdown meal. Seems like the equivalent of Bertucci's, which I enjoy, but with thin crust and a smaller menu.
So disappointed! Food was okay, but the menu wasn't clear on pricing and somehow, me and my little family of four racked up a bill that was almost $100 (including tip). Let me tell you, we most definitely did not eat a hundred dollar meal!  Lemonade is just cheap bottles of the stuff that they charge almost $3 each for (the prices for which are not listed in the menu).  Waitress asked us if we wanted cheese on the side of our salad--a ridiculous $2.50 extra for a tiny side container of mozzarella.  A large margherita--which seemed to me labeled as $17 on the menu--was supposedly a "premium" pizza (seriously?) that was $5.50 more, even though it wasn't listed under the premium pizza section.  All these little extras and more added up and we will never be back. I agree it's not kid friendly.  No crayons or menus for kids to doodle on.  No kids menu. Not even plastic cups for kids' drinks.  And tables are tightly packed. 
I am not a fan of burnt pizza.  It is burnt on the edges and it is burnt on the bottom.  There is too much topping on the pizza. (Yeah - but that is me though).  The crust is not crunchy crispy.  After the recent article on eating well done foods, I am avoiding burnt foods.  The margherita pizza is nothing like any margherita pizza I've ever had before.  Save your money, go to Bertucci's.  The kids were not able to eat any of the pizza.  Not their style of pizza.
We were looking for a bite after a movie and Anthony's was right there.  Nice bar nice staff. The menu is small but that's kind of nice sometimes. The pizza was delicious. Fresh out of the oven and very tasty. It's a nice atmosphere. I can see us hanging out for the night. We will definitely be back. 
I saw how big the salads were last time I was here so I made sure I ordered

one this time.  It was well worth it.  I got a small and it was more than big enough for 

me.

For dinner, I ordered a small calzone as I was told that large was gigantic.  You get 

your choice of toppings  and it comes with tomato sauce. It was delicious and I would

gladly order it again. Our waitress Isabella was excellent.  She was friendly and served

our meals in a timely and efficient manner. I love Anthony's Coal Fired Pizza and look 

forward to returning there soon.
We were a party of two adults on a Saturday for lunch. We were seated quickly. Interior is dim, with hard surfaces, no cushions, curtains, soft lighting. It's more like an upscale fast-food interior. We were excited to try the pizza but after seeing it, we decided against it. The pizza crust is VERY WELL DONE, which is stated on signs on the wall. We each had a sandwich, which was essentially a small pizza folder in half. They seem to be proud of their meatballs so I got the meatball sandwich. Disappointing...meatballs were just average. Also, the sandwiches came with NOTHING...no side, no chips, no french fries.  Soda comes in original plastic bottle that you have to open yourself...adding to the "fast food" feeling. Our waiter had zero personality...never cracked smile. Restaurant is fairly new so it was very clean inside.
Great Place, BEST RIBS! Oh and the pizza is delicious. Service was outstanding, everyibe who works there seems happy and the manager is a hands on guy, always making sure that everything is OK. 
But they have to move the Boston sports teams out front aways for the take out area LOL. 
Keep up the good work. 
If your heading No. on 93 besure to take 95 No. it is just 1.8 miles to the exit, take a left and its only a couple hundred feet to the plaza. 
Worth the trip.
I went to Anthony's with high hopes; I'm not generally a fan of the style of pizza available here in New England, so I'm kind of continuously in search of good pizza.

We (me, my husband, and my 7-year-old girls) went to Anthony's on a Sunday evening, combining a trip to Home Depot in the same plaza.  There was not a wait for seating when we arrived (6:00pm) but it was fairly busy and we got the last available table.  The restaurant is set up like a sports bar, with many TVs playing various sporting events.  There were several large, loud tables of adults, with the hostess attempting to seat us at a particularly uncomfortable table adjacent to a rowdy group even though there was another table available.  She did very readily agree to seat us elsewhere.  

There was no children's menu.  This is a dealbreaker for us, and it will mean that we unfortunately will not be going back as a family.  I completely understand that most kids will eat pizza.  However, I like toppings that my kids don't, and I don't want to be forced to order a plain or pepperoni pizza because I can't get something for my kids.  The menu is extremely scant and really has nothing that would even appeal to most kids.  We had to order half of our pizza plain for one daughter, and a $10 tuna fish flatbread for the other that doesn't love pizza.  So I generally suppose that they're not interested in working with kids...which is fine, except that a large percentage of the population has kids.

Enough about kids.  Beverages were also a little odd.  I ordered iced tea, which at every other casual restaurant I've been to is brewed.  Here, it was out of a bottle.  So no refills unless you want to buy a second bottle.  And the tea out of a bottle just isn't as good as fresh-brewed.  Service was  good, we were served quickly, and there were no problems there.

I loved the pizza, my husband felt it was just average.  In my opinion, the crust was just right, thin but not too thin, crispy where it should be, and the toppings, cheese, and sauce were great.  My husband felt that it was cooked a little unevenly (some areas crispy, other areas soft) but that the toppings were good.

The tuna flatbread my daughter got was good.  But it was just the sandwich - no fries, chips, or sides of any sort, for $10.  For her it was enough, but for an adult, it would not have been.

The restaurant was loud, and remained so even after the large group left.  There were no specific sporting events going on, I just get the sense that this is how it is.

Overall, I at least felt the food was good, but the scant menu and lack of being even slightly child-friendly will prevent me from going back.
Pizza is good but I've had better. Big on specialty pizzas, which are to busy for my liking.
Service was slow, but place was busy. 
The arugula pizza is delicious and crust is thin and crispy.  The chicken wings are to die for!!!!  You need to order them!!!!  It's very simple menu and it's all delicious!
My girl friend and I like to go "out of the box" once in a while and I had read about this place on line and one of my co-workers recommend we try it.  we went on a Friday night perfect time, got two seats at the bar,  Eric waited on us, they all where very friendly.  they have a special if you buy 13 meatballs you get to take the pot home, which I had heard about, since we where ordering meatballs for an appetizer Eric suggest just order the 13 and you can take the remained and the pot home.  OMG the meatballs where awesome and piping hot, served with warm bread and a side of rigorta cheese.  someone beside us ordered the cauliflower pizza so we ordered a small could barely eat one piece  but it was so awesome...  took all the leftovers up to my sisters on Saturday for our dinner.... it was amazing can't wait to go back because my mom and sister also want a pot with the meat balls.... thanks for such an awesome experience and we will be back...
This place really wants you to have a satisfactory experience, as the entire staff strives to make sure that you enjoy the food.  I am glad that they have toned down the at-table inquiries ( you know, frequent visits to seek your opinion), proving that there is a fine line between being welcoming and annoying.  On a recent visit the manager very kindly comped us an order of wings when we noted that our pizza had too much dressing on it.  It has become my favorite local pizza joint.
Loved this place!  I went for lunch and was greated warmly the minute we walked in.  The place is very cute, lots of TVs and memorabilia.   Some great posters on the walls.  The waitress was fabulous.  She was training a new waitress who was just as nice.  The pizza was great.  I've never had coal fired before and I enjoyed it.  They also gave us a sampling of their new chicken wings drenched in onions.  Delicious!!  I'll come back just for those!
This particular 99 is great. Food is always hot and good.  The bar is a sports bar with atmosphere as well as a good tv.  The bar staff are a great bunch of people always eager to. Please.
This was a great experience. Our waitress Denise was friendly and easy going. Our food arrived correctly and warm. Our drinks were refilled promptly. Overall a great visit. 
We go every Sunday. Have yet to have a bad experience. Waitresses are all wonderful on the ball and take care of all of our requests. 
Went Wednesday 29th., March for dinner with friends. Everything on the menu was unappealing. All previously frozen, heavily coated in bread crumbs and what looked like the cheapest grades of beef and chicken. I always start with a Tanguray & Tonic cocktail. Mine was not  Tanguray and obviously watered down. The replacement was no better so I refused it.Then I asked for a shrimp cocktail appetizer. None.  My guests had the chicken parm and fish. Both were as dry as could be, but then what would you expect from previously frozen food. As for me I only felt safe ordering the stuffed mushrooms  and give the devil his due they were good. Value for dollar? Give me freshly prepared good food and I'll be happy. Ninety Nine is a total rip-off and again the drinks are watered down.
Ordered a simple plate of boneless hot wings, They came to the table hard, dry and recooked. Wait staff never checked back on the food order. This is the second 99 visit in less than a week. last week visited the 291 Mishawm Rd, Woburn, MA. Saint Patrick's day. Corn Beef Dinner returned twice, one time food was very cold, second time food was warmed up but you needed a steak knife to cut all the under cooked veggies. Bar tender told me this is a very difficult order to make. Isn't it just a boiled dinner? Have notified both shop that we will not be returning in the near or far future. There are plenty of locally owned and operated restaurant's in the area that should be a better choice. Avoid both of these location and keep a smile on your face
While in the area, it was suggested that I dine at this establishment.  Not knowing what to expect knowing that this was a local chain, I was very surprised with what I experienced.  Upon arriving, I was greeted with a friendly smile and we were quickly seated.  Our server greeted us with a great big smile and was eager to take our drink orders.  When she arrived, she provided with some popcorn and then offered some suggestions.  Taking her advise on a spicy shrimp and rice entrée, I was very pleased when it came to the table.  Very hot, nice portion and the taste was outstanding.  The atmosphere was alive with many patrons engaging with friendly conversations with their family and friends.  The establishment was brightly lighted and very clean.  As stated earlier, I was not sure of what I was going to expect, but I sure was surprised and very glad that I dined at this establishment.  So if you are in the area and would be interested in a place that is friendly and serves hot food with reasonable prices, may I suggest this place?  Enjoy
Although crowded at the time we arrived, we were seated within 15 minutes.  The staff very cordial and helpful.  The recommended specials we ordered were well prepared, presented and delicious.
The 99 is a typical casual restaurant and bar. There are TVs in the corners and they cater to families and groups of 4-6 in the dining room while keeping the bar for adults.

The food is average (note: boneless wings are above average) and service is consistently acceptable and unremarkable.

This is a good place that is convenient, reasonably priced, and predictable. Call first for seating and to get your name on the wait list. 
I ordered a chicken, broccoli and pasta alfredo dish. The Pasta was undercooked and it was warm but not hot. So much for the food. The local beer and the server was excellent. I was just a little disappointed with my food order. Nick, the server was excellent and very patient.
I've been a Ninety Nine customer for years.  You can count on them to have a varied menu, good prices, and good food.  And the place wasn't that noisy which is a big thing to me with most restaurants having horrible acoustics.  So this experience was just fine.
I took my grandson to the 99 Restaurant in Stoneham (his favorite!).  I had the seafood combo - it was delicious and hot when it came out (there is nothing worse than cold fried seafood). My grandson always gets the chicken finger plate with fries (delicious).  We will return many times. Great place to take grandchildren.....there's always something on the menu they love 👍👍
Have never had a bad experience at the Nines.  Food is fresh and plentiful, the wait staff is friendly and very capable.  Prices are reasonable.  I always go home with leftovers.
99 has provided excellent value over the 30 or so years I've been going there. Good Pub-type menu, reasonable prices, good value. Strongly suggest you phone-ahead on busy nights.
I often get take out from the 99 and they are fast.  You can call ahead or order there and wait.  Either way you will have your order quickly.  The only suggestion for improvement I can make is that they often cook steaks and burgers less than you ask for.  So if you want your meat done "medium", say "well done".  Otherwise, I love the nines.
The 99"s are a place you know what you will get. The menu is great and they change it often. The staff makes you feel very welcome. They open the door when they see you coming. The little extra' are well thought out.
We love the inexpensive specials. We have been many times and the food is consistantly good. The memoribility on the walls is interesting and a fun way to spend the time waiting for your meal. Good ample portions.  
My wife's favorite place for Lobster Rolls, which I like too, but given the current market for lobster, they charge too much.  
Where do I begin? From separating the paper liner from from food in those dirty unwashed baskets to the uncleaned and left on skin of the shrimp. The 99 use to have such high standards. Avoid all of them.
Bar is small and usually can not get a seat after 5pmj.....sad no more fajitas at the 9's.....
Our bedraggled group of 4 weary Texas travelers arrived right at prime eating time and the waiting area for tables was jam packed.  We had seen their sign from the highway, peering through fog & rain on a Friday that had seen airport delays, long lines and bumper to bumper traffic on our drive from Logan to Bangor Maine.  Disheartened when we were told the wait would be 30-45 minutes, my husband asked how long the wait was to sit at one of the tables in the bar.  No wait on those, we were told.  We just had to watch for a table to empty.  Less than 2 minutes later a nice booth emptied and we grabbed it.  Our waiter couldn't have been more friendly or helpful. We've dined all over the world in everything from  diners to 5-star restaurants, but this was one of our most surprisingly pleasurable experiences...right there off the highway!
Usually order one of the fabulous steaks at LongHorn, but this time I felt like trying the burger. It was not as good as the Red Robin chain, but still very tasty. In the future, I'll be going back to ordering one of their steaks instead. They are always 5 star.
Very disappointing experience: Unfriendly and unprofessional waitress, cold food, uncomfortable booths. While the wait for a table was remarkably short, the rest of the experience was rather poor. The menu did not provide prices for the beer on tap. When I asked the waitress for the price of the beer, her reply was as honest as startling: " I don't know", without offering to find out.  The salad was best part of the meal. The ribeye was quite tough and very fat. The baked potato came with a miniscule side of sour cream. The overall ambience of the steakhouse also fell short of expectations.
The prime rib is very tender and tasty.  It was also served at the requested level of cooking (rare).  For a similar price to other 'steak houses', this is a nicer cut than others offer with less fat and less edible portions.  Sometimes, you get what you pay for!

The prices are a bit higher than we typically like to spend at a restaurant (slightly higher than mid-price for our budget), but it is also a better meal than the budget (or other mid priced) restaurants that are our usual 'go to' places.


my last night in the Boston area, 3 of us went to LongHorn for dinner.  had a perfectly cooked Filet, others had excellent dishes all to everyone's liking.  good service on a busy night too.  
My family visited there on June 20 for a final family dinner to celebrate a graduation. They were seated and sat, and sat, and sat. Another party came in were seated and the waitress came right over, told them about the menu, asked for drink orders and appetizers; as our party sat and sat and sat.  Finally my wife asked the waitress for the next party for help and explained she had been sitting there for 15 minutes without anyone coming over. 

The waitress showed up finally with no excuses nor an apology for the lack of service. She asked for a drink order but was told the dinner order was ready. Two people in our party ordered cheeseburgers. They came out raw and were sent back. We observed the party next to us sending their steaks back to be cooked too because they were under cooked. 

At the end of the night the waitress for the next party apologized and even adjusted the check for the inconvenience. Our waitress came back and put the check down with nothing. We were not looking for anything but the service and quality were beyond bad.
Great meal excellent prime rib wonderful redrock shrimp. Fabulous service  our waitress was fantastic.   Very attentive.  Still my favorite place to eat 
I visited with my wife . we enjoyed it , we had two soup France union and fish coder . it was good . I had a fillet steak it was done very good,   
A consistently good steak can be found at the Longhorn in Reading. Waitstaff is always friendly.  You may have a wait to get a table, so it is a good idea to call ahead. Once seated, food wait time is not bad at all.  This place is usually hopping!
This restaurant was clean, the service amazing, and the food was really good.  As a non red-meat eater, I was pleased with shrimp chowder, baked carrots and the cinnamon sugar sweet potato.  The meat eaters in my group ate steak (they were very very happy) and chicken fingers (non-breaded, which was slightly off putting for the child).  Overall, a good experience.  
Longhorn steak house is always good.... been to many locations and have never been disappointed in the food or drinks.
I Had A Prime Rib with a baked potato mom had a steak we split a salad everything was good our waiter was very nice longhorn has a variety on their menu I recommend this restaurant 

Even though this is a steakhouse, I always get the salmon because it is better for

your health and it tastes delicious.   It comes with a  big salad with croutons that is

also highly satisfying.  For beverages I recommend the strawberry lemonade.  

     Our waitress, Lauren did a great job serving us.  I highly recommend Longhorn's.
We met for a family gathering.  Plenty of space at a long table, but you couldn't speak with people at far end of tables.  Round table would have been preferable.  Food average institutional.  Service was adequate.
The hamburg and steaks are very good.  Very nice selection of foods.  It is a little dark depending where you seat.  
We go here every once in a while when we crave steak but do not want to spend a lot of money. It is definitely not light eating but the quality of the steak is  much better than you would expect at a chain.
We have visited this restaurant twice with a great experience both times. We are 2 adults, 2 children under 12. We have been very pleasantly surprised at how great this chain restaurant is. The food is EXCELLENT and there is a decent variety, with plenty of choices for children. The interior is nicely decorated and calming/cozy, without being noisy. Both times, the service was superior!
We went for dinner, as it a little bit too warm to cook at home. We were greeted as soon as we walked in. Our server, Deidre greeted us with a bright smile and great hello. We ordered our food which was steak, shortly after our food was brought to the table, perfection. Deidre checked with us several times to make sure that everything was ok. We were very pleased with our food, but the server was fantastic.
I went to Longhorn for lunch with some friends.  Our waitress Emily K was outstanding.
The atmosphere was pleasant.  The bread was delicious.  My entree, spinach feta chicken,  was a disappointment.  The piece of chicken was very small. It was way too salty and overly spiced.  I suffered from its effects for hours.

One friend ordered a lunch combo and two ordered rib-eye steak.  All three were happy with their meals.
I ordered the entire rack of ribs ($21) and they were excellent and a large portion (included side & salad). Drop off the bone ribs.
The wife ordered the 6 oz "Flo Filet" ($20) with side & salad. Steak was tasty, however, it is a thin slice of steak so do not order it medium-well or it will come out well-done. Wife likes it just a bit pink in the center but, we believe, that since it was not a thick slice the chef over-cooked it. Wife 

They also deliver hot bread & butter to the table along with the salads.

Service was super and server was very friendly and attentive. We'll be back again.
When we want a good steak, reasonably price, we come here. Most times the food is great. Our most recent visit I was disappointed in the size of my filet and how it was cooked. I usually never speak up but because I was paying $23 for the steak, I did. I was I impressed at our server and the manager. Both accommodated my request in a pleasant  and non threatening manner. I received my steak quickly , halfway into my husband's meal. I was also offered a complimentary dessert. The wait is long between 6pm and 8pm on a Saturday. So I guess it's better to go before or after these hours. Overall a nice restaurant with good management.
I ordered delivery to home 22:56 and if  i remebered correctly the delivery man was palestin.i wish he could deliver to my home every time.really nice man.stayed outside for few minutes for a fun and short chat. :)
Not the cleanest Starbucks I've been in. Cashier is friendly but slow. Parking lot is difficult to enter/exit during am/pm rush. parking spaces are limited.
Menu is what you find at most Starbucks. Staff isn't always friendly or professional. Also in last 2 visits, my coffee order wasn't made correctly.  Parking can be an issue.
This coffee shop is close to my work, so, being a coffee lover, I visit it almost daily. The coffee is the usual great Starbucks coffee, but the staff here is really great. They are warm, friendly, helpful, get to know you by name and drink and provide a nice start to my day. The protein snack box makes a good lunch
First time at this restaurant - what a delightful find! Nice interesting menu. Our fish entrees (scallops and tuna) were very fresh and well-prepared. (Too bad the sesame chicken was a bit chewy - less than choice pieces.) Fine service. No wonder it was so crowded on a Sunday night.
 This place is kind of hit or miss. It's a little bit expensive for what it is, but the atmosphere is really cool. Sometimes they have live music which is even better. It's not the best Chinese food in the world, but their sushi certainly is not bad, there's plenty of parking and the service is good. 
We went there to listen to the entertainment of Ed Saindon.   The entertainment was excellent but found the food just okay.   It is not a place I would rush back to, unless Ed was playing.
I am not a sushi fan but some in the group thought it was good, not great.  Mai Tai was good but most of the food was average at best.  You expect chinese good to be salty but this was overboard.  Fried foods were very greasy, especially the spring rolls.  Boneless ribs were dry and over cooked.  Service for our group of 11 was very good.
Best Sushi in town. 
I was visiting for only a week and had to have lunch here twice.  So yummy and so amazing.  The staff are super nice and attentive. Refilling even you water glass at half full.  Must try Spicy scallop and spicy Salmon inside out rolls.  Wow.  Yum 
This is one of my favorite places to get sushi. I used to live near by and would come here once or twice a week! The Valentine roll is my all time favorite, very light and fresh but so filling. It's spicy shrimp, crabmeat, pineapple and avocado - typically I don't like fruit in my rolls but this just works, trust me! The avocado salad is also delicious and always gets ordered as an appetizer when I go with a group. I've also had many of their other plates and two of my favorite are the pad thai and beef & broccoli. Honestly, I haven't eaten anything here I didn't like!

I think the service at lunch time is the best because they're typically slow. The service gets a little spotty at night and especially on the weekends when they're busy but the food always makes up for it. Friday nights they have a band that starts at 8, if you are there to chat definitely ask to be seated away from where the band is set up because it is loud and you won't be able to hear each other well. There is a full bar, with maybe about 10 seats if you just want to grab drinks.

There is plenty of parking as the place is located within a complex with Bank of America, The Paper Store, Staples etc.

Price wise, it's a little more than I would like to spend but the quality of food outweighs this, hence why I keep going back!
Sushi is always fresh, well presented and delicious.  I've been here for lunch, take-out, and dine in dinner. Never disappointed. Always look forward to a return visit
They can't get much of anything right here. The food sucks. Prices are high. Service sucks - some staff isn't fluent in English. I asked our server if their California roll used real crab or fake crab (the menu stated "crab", but I wanted to make sure, because I will not eat the fake). The server assured me it was real crab. The price was fairly high, reflecting the real crab price, so I figured I'd go for it. When the roll came - it was fake - krab - NOT real crab. I asked the server about it, but she replied in quasi-gibberish, so I asked for the manager. The manager explained that "all" California rolls use "crab stick" (fake crab, mostly made from hake), and that I didn't know what I was talking about. I told her that I'd asked the server if it was real, and was told it was. The manager disregarded that. She was most difficult - not even wanting to take the roll off our bill. Unacceptable. This place is a hack ripoff joint.
This is excellent to sample a good amount of food.  More than enough for three for a starter.  Pineapple rice comes in half of a whole pineapple!  Egg Foo Young just okay.  Chicken Chow mein very good.  Drinks are awesome!  .
Recently enjoyed lunch here with friends.  It is in a small strip mall right by the exit for Jordan’s Furniture & more good shopping spots.  Small venue with pleasant atmosphere – noted signs for live Jazz nights also.  They had a long list of luncheon specials with good options for sides.  Ordered Combo Lunch specials and Pad Tais.  Everyone said their food was excellent and esp liked the Pad Tai with shrimp/chicken!  Service was efficient and pleasant.  Would come back and recommend for lunch.
Went here last night for dinner and had an excellent experience.  The host wasn't at the desk when we arrived, but a waiter came right over and sat us.  The atmosphere is nice, more formal then I had thought, but there were families there and young kids - the bar looked like a nice place to sit as well.  Our waiter was very attentive and very sweet so I'm not sure what the other reviews are talking about.  We even had a different waiter come over to refill water and clear plates, ask us if we wanted more drinks.  The food was excellent.  We ordered the Peking Ravioli to start which was perfect and came with ample sauce for dipping.  Then we got a crispy spicy tuna roll (we asked for it without asparagus and they were happy to accommodate) and the California roll and both were perfect.  They also have a full Chinese and Japanese menu so we ordered the General Gau's chicken and an order of fried rice.  Huge portions and excellent.  The chicken was perfect crispy on the outside, lots of sauce, very flavorful.  The fried rice was a huge portion and had lots of fixin's in it.  By the time we left (tuesday night) at 8pm, the dining room was pleasantly busy, but no one had to wait for an open table.  Overall we had an excellent experience at Oye's and will definitely be back.
WOW!  Beautiful space with plentiful, knowledgeable wait staff.  Service was a perfect balance of attentiveness and allowing us to have our conversation.  The Mai Tai #3 was delicious - fresh juice and top shelf rum.  The house wine was a lovely California Merlot, the Chardonnay was crisp and well chilled, the Comso was very good.  We ordered a variety of sushi and tempura as an appetizer for the table.  The sushi was fresh, well prepared, and beautifully arranged on a platter for all of us to share.  The tempura was a mix of shrimp, sweet potato, green beans, and green pepper.  Light, crunchy, served hot.  Our meal was a combination of beef noodles, general gao chicken, and spicy green beans.  There was plenty to share, we were all full, and we did not leave a morsel of food on the plates. The price was phenomenal! Bonus - LIVE three piece band set up at 7p and was not too loud and was a real treat!
We were in the area to attend a wake, and instead of heading straight home in the Friday night northbound traffic on 93, we decided to try a local restaurant and we found a GEM!! 

We were able to do call ahead seating, so when we arrived we were seated right away. The décor was modern, clean & eclectic; they even had a 3 piece band playing. Their Gluten Free menu was extensive and clearly delineated the extent that they take in their kitchens to provide their GF customers with a worry free meal. :) Our waiter was professional, cheerful and had been trained well to accommodate GF needs. We ordered cocktails, 3 appetizers and 1 dinner to split: 1/2 dozen raw oysters on the half shell, a Chicken Roll in a Tofu Wrap, Cucumber Avocado Maki, and Szechuan Spicy Chicken. Everything was fabulous!! We ate it ALL--no leftovers to take home.  

While we don't live close by, we have friends that do, so we'll definitely be back and bring them and/or make a point of stopping here coming out of Boston!
We were visiting from out west and ordered take-out.  We especially liked that everyone could have the cuisine of their choice.  Our group ordered Chinese and Japanese entrees as well as Sushi.  All were delicious and for those who eat gluten-free there are choices for them also.  No more deciding on either or.  Everyone can enjoy their favorite Asian dishes in one place.
Oye's is a cut above the average Boston Chinese restaurant.  It has a sleek modern dining room and professional waiters in uniform.  Their selections are extensive and their lunch plates are an outstanding value.  Both soup and a small appetizer are included with your entre selection and rice.  Sushi platters are amazing. 
This place is always packed and once you try it, you will know why.  I highly recommend it.
I can't say anything bad about their food! It is all delicious! My favorite is their spicy Tuna Appetizer, Hawaiian Sunshine and Snow Mountain Maki! Very good food! You won't be disappointed! Oh yes!!!! Can't forget their Crab Rangoons! Yummy!
My wife and I went to Oye's for dinner last Saturday night at about 6PM. No problem getting a nice booth. After drinks, we ordered 2  Spicy Tuna Towers as appetizers. They were excellent. Very fresh and very delicious. After the appetizers we decided to split an entree. For an entree, we ordered the shrimp served with pineapple. It was is so tasty. You cannot go wrong with those two selections. By the way, the service was very good, the waiter was very attentive and anxious to please. The ambiance could be better but the food more than made up for it.
Over last 1/2 year it's definitely declined over there. Personal service went out the window when the waitress reached into my daughters purse looking for a coupon!
The food is always fresh. The wait staff  is great . Kevin the owner is always on site and will attend to your every need
The food was awful. The dumplings were broken apart, the egg rolls cold and greasy, the crab Rangoon was soggy. This place should be avoided at all costs. Inconsistent and overpriced. Too many other good places to eat.
Back to Marlborough on my way from Salem ... quick stop for a Bagel. Great Bagel Sandwichs .... great smiles, great service!

Whoever was the young lady handing me the waste basket for my empty coffee-to-go-cup: Great service and the most beautiful smile I saw today! You made my day! :-)
Bagel World has great food! Unfortunately its so popularity that it can get crowded.  Give it a try! It is good.
Being from New York City I am pretty picky about my bagels.  The bagels at Bagel World III are the best I have tasted.  Now be patient because they are not fast if you want to have a bagel prepared.  Better off to use the express line buy your bagels and prepare it elsewhere.
Frecken awesome! !! The selection was incredible truly worth the wait ...could not believe the price 
My favorite bagels. Great bagel sandwich for lunch. Good prices
Lots of variety.     Chocolate chip, French toast, everything, veggie and all the standard flavors.
Completely in love with the bagels here.  
The sandwiches are insanely good, and the coffee too.
You need to move to Texas, PLEASE?
Bagel World's bagels have come under scrutiny for their origin. There are numerous stories as to how the original owners got the recipe and how they can't expand close to the New York State border. All of that doesn't matter because the bagels are indeed delicious - but very frustratingly their idea of how to run a business seems to be how a 5 year old runs a lemonade stand. Underprepared for more than three customers at a time, a selection that runs out most every day, and staff that don't care about you and just want your money. 
Bagel World in Reading is phenomenal.
The good: The bagels are simply better than anything in New York. I'm from New York and I love bagels. You can take this to the bank. The assortment is huge, the combos and sandwiches they offer are all amazing. Likewise, their iced coffees are to die for. Hawaiian chocolate is my favorite. 
The bad: The staff runs on Brazilian time - they are very very SLOW. This, combined with amazing food and a huge demand, means a lengthy wait either in the drive-thru or on foot, especially on the weekends.
Great tasting and fresh bagels.  Go in the morning and they are still warm.  Have to be patient as the lines (even the express line) tends to be slow.  
Had been dying to try Bagel World. I take my children to an orthodontist in Reading. After school we head to our appointments and never make it for bagels before closing. We were  thrilled when we had some time before to grab some to eat later. I know it was a half hour to closing time and a long day for the employees, but a friendly smile and hello is all a customer needs to justify a return visit. Probably will not try again. 
Bagels are large and fresh. You need to allow 30min plus to get your order. Good luck calling in an order. That takes 15 min or more to get through. The staff can be friendly it depends who serves you. they move to their own clock. No rushing here. If you have the time to wait the food is good. Coffee is in carafes so not always hot
The bagels have the same taste and consistency as any New York City bagel.  Everyone loves the bagels from Bagel World.  However be patient, the lines tend to be long (even the express line moves at a turtle's pace) and they are not the friendliest workers.  Also note they do not have online ordering or fax capability at this location.
first time ever here  ppl always  talk  about this  place  - so I guess my  review   wont keep  you away..just  hoping  the management  will see this  maybe  even respond  dont see any  so far!! the entrance   door  has papers that  are all advertisements  for other  places  The  cork  board inside the same -PUT A BIG SIGN TELLING  US  WHAT  LINE  TO BE IN__ GET  RID OF THOSE LOCAL ADS!!!!(the only  sign I seen because when  the  clerk  told  me I was in wrong  line  I looked  for a  sign  thats  why  he  took care of me) I wanted  to  try the bagels  and  get  one I  could eat now.. he was not  going  to  do it  told  me  was wrong  line  I was like seriously? you cant  just  toast it  for me  and gave  me  no other  options  but  ended up  doing  it  knowing  I was mad (and there was no  line)  the servers seemed  rude.. dont  know if I will bother  going  back  I  normally  give a place a second  chance  but when I told a friend  who  goes there  she said they are always  rude there  but the bagels are  good--WOW!  been in food service  for 20 years  and my  mgmt  would  def  do  something  about that.. FIX IT!!!....  bagels are  huge  and  good  and all different  kinds you will like them  cant  say  you  will be pleased with service, as I was talking  to the  employee  another  employee  just  stared at  us  maybe  she  could of helped and said  let  me   do that  for  you  I am  not  doing  too much  right  now ...
This is the best place for bagels, either plain, wi cream cheese or sandwiches.
It is very popular so the lines can be long at times, but they are working on a new system.
This place has great bagels, but there are times I go in there and the line is so long I give up.  I find it frustrating, the workers move so slowly and rarely smile.  I think they know they are the only show in town, and aren't motivated to show they care that we are waiting.  I heard a new place will be opening up.  Hopefully with a little competition, things will improve.
My husband and I LOVE Bagel World.  Their bagels are always fresh, taste amazing, and everything is very reasonably priced (but we did come from Boston).  We've tried their lunch sandwiches (tuna and chicken salad are great and the turkey/herb cc/sprouts sandwich is awesome).  We get sausage/egg/cheese or cc for bfast and everytime it's been perfect - makes my mouth water just thinking about them.  The biggest drawback for us is that it takes FOREVER.  Be prepared to wait 45 min for a bagel with cream cheese.  The drive through line goes into the street and the in-house line doesn't seem long, but for some reason it takes forever.  The shortest it's ever been for us is 20min at 8am which still seems crazy.  Regardless, it won't stop us from waiting because we loveeee everything they have.
Best bagels in Boston area.  Having come to Boston from out of town, I was looking for a good bagel shop.  This is the best I have been to in Boston.  Price is extremely reasonable.  Only negative was the bagel sandwich we ordered.  I am used to bagel sandwich with eggs containing freshly scrambled eggs.  The eggs served were a disappointment.  Will use this place for bagels only.
Very good bagel, ample size.  As close to a real "NY Bagel" as you can get.  

Service comes with an attitude and they always have a line.  It would appear that the "locals" have a way around the line.

good fresh toppings.
We've been buying Bagel World bagels and cream cheese forever.  The quality and the variety can't be beat, and the prices are reasonable.  However, the service is inconsistent, ranging from pleasant and courteous to rude, which is why I rated Bagel World four, rather than five, stars.
Maybe there is some place in NYC that has better bagels, but I doubt it.  The Bagel World cream cheese is also outstanding.  After their cream cheese you will not be able to ever again eat Philadelphia Cream Cheese from the supermarket.  Bagel World is simply the best, and their prices are also very reasonable.
stopped here for a lobster roll on the way back home- first time here. ordered the hot lobster roll.  expected lobster with some butter- what i got was lobster DROWNING is butter and about a tablespoon of salty spices.  Not sure what happened. couldnt eat it- save it until i got home and rinsed all this nonsense off.  WAY too much butter and salt/garlic/spices. couldnt even taste the lobster....cost $23... big  disppointment
Food is amazing and very reasonably priced.  I usually get the haddock sandwich and  my kids are hooked on the shrimp and scallops.   The Cape  is my favorite place and American Lobster Mart is one of my favorite places on the Cape.  We typically stop here both on the way to and on the way home.  We have eaten here six times this summer so far. Love the food and service is great!!.
We almost literally stumbled onto this magnificent but a Americana because it was behind our motel.  We asked the motel manager where we had to go to get a great lobster without going broke in the process, and he replied:  "Out the back door and twenty feet to your right.  We picked out the four live lobsters we wanted ($10 each if you can believe it) and they cooked them immediately and served them with coleslaw and tools to eat outside under an umbrella.  

Without exaggeration it was the sweetest, most delicious lobster we have ever eaten and  Larry, the owner, enthusiastically told us the story not only of where the lobster had been caught that morning but of this picturesque lighthouse.  An evening to remember
The fish was very fresh, very generous and came with both fries and hand breaded onion rings, Even the price was reasonable for Haddock instead of Cod. Great Job!
Seafood, eaten in a lighthouse! Good lobster rolls, yummy fries, and located right on the Bourne Bridge rotary.
The food is so fresh and the staff is amazing. They are all so knowledgeable and friendly. You will not be disappointed. Any traffic you would encounter on the bridge is worth it.
Great local family run place to get the freshest lobster and swordfish, no place to sit really, take away or buy fresh and cook yourself is the best bet. Try the lobster roll, best for the buck
Today I returned spoiled shrimp to Larry, the owner.  This is the second time we have bought shrimp that was bad.
Larry would not taste the shrimp.  He said he was not at the shop late yesterday afternoon and his employees should not have sold the shrimp.  Does this mean that we can only trust the shrimp if Larry is present?
Be careful what you buy.
I will never shop there again.
I live in Vermont.  I don't know anything about seafood.  I have eaten it and most times..."meh!"  I like to roam around.  When I am hungry I look for a building or a sign that has "character".

American Lobster Mart is one of those places.  I'm not even sure it has a sign!  I only learned the name later, by Googling "Lobster Bourne Bridge Rotary"!  I am glad to have found it and I think you will be, too.  As of this writing, this is the third time I have visited, over the years. 

It smells like fresh seawater inside!  Very clean and simple.  There is a little bit of fresh fish on display and it looks so wonderful, I want to poke it with my finger!

On this visit, I ordered a fish basket and a cup of chowder.  I thought that would be easy to manage while I was driving...and it actually WAS.

It was piping hot when delivered.  By the time I pumped gas and got back on the highway, it was just right.

This is how I know it was just right:

The french fries were still crispy and hot.  They felt dry to the hand and left the thinnest sheen of light oil on my lips.  They may have had a whisper of salt.  They tasted like a potato.  A perfect potato.  They smelled like a potato.  A lovely potato, tender inside...crispy outside.

The fish was served in easily managed pieces, with a crispy, golden, crunchy crust.  Again, leaving only a minuscule trace of oil.  Only the flavor of the firm white fish.  Crunchy and sweet is the best way to describe it.  If seasonings were used, I could not detect them...the overall flavor was translated as delicious by all my senses.

The chowder was like a meal in a bowl.  I can not tell WHAT the seafood ingredients were.  Only that there were SEVERAL, they were plentiful and they were LARGE.  I could taste each individual chunk of seafood and determine it's difference from the others.  I knew there were a few potatoes and onions.  I knew there was milk and salt and pepper.  The overall impression was that chowder is a wonderful way to use non-seafood items to bring out the best character of the seafood ingredients.

I only write about restaurant experiences when the are out of the ordinary on either end of the spectrum.  I write about American Lobster Mart because I know it is special and I suspect zillions of people drive by every day and don't even know how special it is.

One if the questions from TripAdvisor is "Is this restaurant good for dining on a budget?"  Well...no.  BUT...I will qualify that by saying a person would know they made a wise choice by foregoing a few visits to a fast food place and having one nutritious, delicious meal here.
Quick, fresh seafood.  Sit by a picnic table or get it to go! Yummy!Friend shrimp and scallops thrilled the family when I brought it home.
Larry the Lobsterman has to be hands down one of the most knowledgeable fish guys on the cape. His seafood is so fresh right from his Own boats! Save yourself the hassle of wondering if your seafood is fresh and delicious and stop by and see Larry and his staff! He always is a pleasure to do business with and everything I have ever eaten from there has been nothing but top notch!
Stopped in last night. Ice cold Pre-made lobster roll with soggy lettuce wrapped in plastic wrap. Roll was small and not toasted. lobster was mushy and shredded. Roll was served with a minuscule bag of potato chips. $15.99 rip off. 
Disregard the previous 1-star review.  For four years in a row, the final capper on our great Cape Cod vacation has been a stop on the way back home to New York at American Lobster Mart at the Rotary on the Bourne Bridge.  What a spectacular experience and great finale to our trip it is to stop at ALM and get a lobster roll and the most spectacular clam chowder we've experienced on the Cape.  All at a great price -- and the Utz chips as a side is a great touch.

Last Sunday, traffic caused us to be late to ALM, and they'd been closed for 10 minutes.  I literally made an on-my-knees plea to the owner behind the locked door and he took pity and served us the great chowder and lobster rolls they are known for -- fresh, delicious, satisfying and consistent.  The lighthouse motif of the place (squeezed in between a gas station and a hotel) tells you that this is a unique find.  One experience here and you will make sure you take a break from the horrific Sunday traffic and make it a tradition to come to ALM on your way back home.

Hey, ALM, my wife and I appreciate that you went the extra mile to accommodate us after closing hours.  I promised I would articulate my passion for ALM's lobster rolls and clam chowder here on TripAdvisor -- and here it is.  See you next year and the years thereafter!
We stopped here to grab a quick bite and swap keys with family on our way home. An insane employee came flying out and said parking was for customers only. We explained that one car was leaving in seconds and that we were staying to eat. He continued to scream and threaten. We told him he had just lost customers. He said he didn't care and made some remark about Rhode Islanders. They clearly don't like out-of-town people. Spend your money at some other tourist trap. This place obviously doesn't need it.
If you have never eaten fried lobster this a MUST for a visit to the cape. I stopped in about a week ago and the fried lobster is always awesome. I dont know if its just me but it seams to get better and better every year which I didnt think was possible. I also took home some steamers and they were so tender and not sandy at all. These guys really know sea food!!!!!!
These guys stayed late a couple times to make sure I could pick up my lobsters. Food is awesome and their prices are great
We found this wonderful place by accident,  looking for aplace to grab a bite.  

The seafood is fresh,  literally right off the boat.  

The food is cooked to order.  I had the lobster roll. Oh my gosh,  fresh and crisp and loaded worth fresh lobster.  My companion had the seafood platter... clans wroth bellies (clam strip were also available), scallops, shrimp,  haddock, and cod.  The fries are cut and cooked only when ordered. 

American Lobster also has a wide awry of fresh seafood,
4 lobster tanks,  sized per tank. 

Don't miss this gem on the rotary by the Bourne Bridge. 
If you are heading to Cape Cod, or the Islands - this stop is a MUST!!!! Not only are the co-owners charming, friendly, and great for the gab, BUT and most importantly their seafood is worth the visit. Whether you stop in for a lobster roll (to eat on site), or you do as I do - and buy up a little of everything to be enjoyed over the course of a long summer holiday weekend - you will not be disappointed here! Don't miss the seafood chowder :-)
A trip to the cape is never complete without a visit to have some fried lobster. The chunks of lobster are huge!! Its a very filling meal and if you have never tried it ad it to your bucket list.
Aft many years my friend and I popped in. The owner was very pleasant, chatty. We shared a seafood platter with fish, scallops, shrimp, clam strips, fries and cole slaw, $22. It was enough for the 2 of us to share and be contently full even though the 2 fish portions are tiny. Some of it was a little overcooked and the cole slaw was bad. He tries to by as much fresh locally caught seafood as he can. It is also a fresh seafood market, how fresh may depend on business as the steamers looked like they have been in the open air environment too long. I miss the wooden shingles that use to cover this building. The lot holds about 8 cars, inside there are 3 stools to sit at a counter, outside are many picnic tables and you use the bathroom at the butting gas station. The view is the smoggy rotary. Neither of us will go back again.
Enjoyed a delicious seafood combo dinner tonight.  The halibut, scallops and clams were fresh and lightly breaded. Their seafood is delivered fresh everyday. Service was excellent.
This is a very casual atmosphere, and we try to avoid it on bingo nights, when it gets noisy.  But the view from the patio tables, of the Bourne Bridge and Cape Cod Canal, are great. We've found service to be friendly and efficient.  I'm from the NY/NJ area, and I think this is the best pizza north of the Bronx--terrific crust.  (Two-for-one pizzas on Tuesdays.)
Stopped in for a couple of cocktails.  Both drinks I ordered they did not have the ingredients (belvedere vodka or amaretto de serano) so we didn't order food. The inside needs to be updated, but the staff was polite and accommodating.
The Trowbridge Tavern is the in-house tavern/restaurant for the Quality Inn of Bourne. I had a nice steak, my kid had a burger, and we were both full and happy.
This place is AWFUL!  There were eight if us all together and they knew we were coming,  they even set us up in the side room before we arrived.  The waitress kept ignoring us,  or food came out separately  (the first person was done and cleared by the time the last two meals arrived). The chili was hormel, out of a can,  not even a question and I paid  $7 for 3 shrimp to top my ceasar salad and they were raw.  The shrimp weren't even slightly punk, they were gray and see through. We also ordered stuffed quahogs that were dry and not served with lemon or drawn butter.  The lkale soup should have been called left over soup ad it had chunks of pork, kidney beans,  and i think cabbage...no chorizo or kilbasa. Avoid at all costs if you don't like horrible disappointment  
They do a great job with large functions. Very well organized. Excellent staff. Food is ok but it's function food. Clean, nice decor, plenty of parking and easy to find. Not the place for a nice wedding maybe but perfect for business events. 
I stayed at the motel which is part of the same complex.  It was a nice friendly atmosphere which seemed to be a mixture of locals and guests.  I'd suggest the menu to anyone.
Plenty of beer on tap but a little pricey.  The Tuesday buy one get one pizza is a local favorite but the pizza has gone down hill substantially in the past year or so.
The beer was bad. The food was awful. The pizza was burnt on the bottom and the chowder was cold. The lobster roll made my mother sick for two days. the hamburger my husband order was gross.The staff was friendly.
We ate at the restaurant during our stay at the Quality Inn at Bourne. The waitress was  attentive and the
food was great. They also have take out for bringing food back to the hotel.
We stayed at the Quality Inn, which is attached to the Trowbridge Tavern.  We'd driven a ways with our group and we were pleasantly surprised that it was so convenient.  The menu is diverse without being overwhelming and the quality of food was consistently good.  The pizza was excellent.  On our first of two evenings there, the staff was overwhelmed but our group of 10 was seated fairly quickly and any oversights were quickly resolved.   Prices were reasonable.  We'll dine here again when we're in the area.
When heading to the Cape, this is a great place to stop.  Just at the bottom of the Bourne Bridge sits this Irish Pub (attached to the Quality Inn Hotel).  Once inside, you're greeted by a friendly staff,  they have specials all through the week,  Half price apps, 2 for 1 pizza (the pizza is great). Half price fish and chips, they have entertainment, bingo, trivia,  Also, they have a huge function facility downstairs. Food portions are huge,  Try the Pizza and Mac and Cheese balls!  On St. Patricks day they have a huge party every year for the public.
The food is the best. Everytime. Service is always good. I have my meetings here. Nice atmosphere. conveniently located right over the Bourne bridge first exit off the rotary.
The food and beer selection was great!  However, when we go back we noticed that our account was charged double the amount. After several phone calls we finally got the manager. It took almost 1 week and several more calls for them to put through the credit on our account. The reason given was it was a new waitress and she (the manager) was too busy to take the time to credit our account. If we ever return, it will be cash only.
Consistently good, the Trowbridge Tavern has good pizza, burgers, wings etc.  They have a nice beer selection.  The prices seem a little high but not outrageous.  Never had a bad meal here.  Nice place to stop for a drink or a quick bite.  Gets a bit crowded on weekend nights as it is a local hangout but friendly.  Good place if you are looking for a casual meal with family or friends.
I've eaten there a few times.  Not gourmet but tasty.  I had great steak tips on my last visit.  The staff isn't super attentive but they were friendly and didn't mess anything up.  The place is a 'Cheers-like' bar first and foremost and the noise level can get pretty high.  Some guy was singing 'Heart of My Heart' at the top of his lungs when I was there last....and he was not ready for 'American Idol'.
We are frequent diners here on our trips north and we love it. The staff are all terrific, the crowd that shows up here is mostly comprised of locals and very friendly, and the value is excellent.
Every night there is something going on whether it's music, a dining special, trivia, etc. 
The fish and chips are great! The lobster roll has at least eight ounces of lobster meat and very little mayo, and the pizzas are decent and available in a personal size.
There is a large function room available for rent and it is a popular place for weddings, graduations and reunions.
We usually stay at the adjoining but unaffiliated Quality Inn (which has issues), but if we stayed elsewhere, we would still be repeat customers here. A hearty and enthusiastic thumbs up.
We stayed in the hotel which the tavern is attached to so it is very convenient. The food was good and the service was very friendly. Try the burgers you won't be disappointed. 
We were staying in the hotel so we went to the tavern. They have a decent draft bees selection but the prices were a little high. I have a burger which was outstanding. There are specials every evening. we were there on pizza night, buy one get one free. It is a little upscale but fit the area.
With hotel. Only one waitress and was too busy. Funeral party there for lunch also. Food was good. Good menu.
I've played golf at the Brookside Golf Club on numerous occasions but have never dined there so we thought we would give it a try.
Four of us dined there we did not have a reservation but that was not a problem as it was a Tuesday evening and the restaurant was not very busy.
We shared a couple of apps and we all ordered mains which were very good the only down side was I felt the portions were on the small side I had the short Rib with mash & asparagus which was very tasty we also had two deserts between us with drinks the bill came to $175 including 20% service which was on the pricey side.
But watching the sunset over the golf course was worth it.
Great food, good prices and wonderful staff. Chad on the Golf side and Andrew on the Grille side. Best Sunsets on Cape Cod.
Have been to the Sunset Grille many times for drinks and apps but haven't been in awhile for dinner. During the day, and afternoon, mostly there are golfers enjoying the "19th hole" and people enjoying afternoon cocktails. The views are spectacular, sitting outside on the porch with views of the Canal is spectacular! The menu has a mix of salads, sandwiches  and larger entrees. Had theParmesan Encrusted Cod with Creamy Saffron Risotto, Citrus Buerre Blanc  as well as the Grilled Pork Tenderloin with Garlic Mashed Potatoes and Portabella Demi-Glace. The cod was spectacular and the risotto cooked perfectly! Pork Tenderloin was great too, but the garlic mashed were a bit heavy and not very creamy. However, meal was great and would go back again. Service was a bit slow, but we were certainly in no rush and just sat back and enjoyed the view and wine. In the winter they do have a working fire place which makes it cozy to eat in the dining room. During the summertime, you might need reservations especially on the weekend if you want to sit outside on the porch and watch the sunset. Also in the summertime on Sundays, they have great  events where they have live music, set up tables, chairs and Adirondack chairs for people to sit outside, as well as serve free apps! Really fun for the whole family! This is a great place to go with friends, or bring your kids to hit a bucket of balls right in front of you while you sit and enjoy cocktails. Dinner of course was delicious!
Disappointing to say the least.  Service was slow due to a large party being served.  Food mediocre.  Ravioli dish was poorly prepared and served in a watery soup mixture.  Turkey burger was dry and flavorless.  Beet salad did not have much in the way of beets - just paper thin slices lining the bottom of the spinach.  Would not return.
My brother and I held a bereavement  lunch for our family and friends at the Sunset Grill over the past week. I want to share how terribly helpful their manager Frank was with the arrangements and providing this lunch at the last minute. I called them the day before the funeral and they were actually closed but he took my call and provided me with the confidence that this would be taken care of. We made our choice for buffet and that was it. In a time like this when the family is overwhelmed by plans and details not to mention the loss of a loved one, it was nice to know that there are still such kind people that will help you with these plans. The waitstaff were terrific and the lunch we chose was delicious. Thanks to everyone there for making our family gathering such a pleasant one. My father's burial was at the Veterans Memorial cemetery right down the street, this could not have been a more convenient or pleasant place to gather! The views here are spectacular even in the winter months!
Located a mile south of the Bourne Bridge on Route 28 (MacArther Blvd), this Course and Restaurant are situated on one of the highest points in Bourne.

That being said, go to eat on the patio around sunset and you'll be treated to a wonderful view with wonderful food. 

Great staff and if you're lucky, you'll get Jake for a Bartender. Oh they have others I imagine, but, Jake was on the night we were there.
The Sunset Grille is our local go-to place for dinner out. Specials and regular menu items are always fantastic! Our favorites are the calamari with sweet chili sauce as an appetizer and seared tuna entree. The kids love the burgers! If you time your visit right, the sunset is dynamic and wonderful!
We frequent Sunset Grille with friends or because we've just finished playing golf. The food is always really good and consistent, the drinks are always delicious and the bartenders are great. Andy the manager always makes sure that everything is going well and that we are happy. Always a great "go to" place, and the sunsets overlooking buzzards bay are amazing (an added bonus)!!! 
My husband and I frequent The Sunset Grille for their Delish salads, comfortable restaurant and beautiful grounds.  Yet, we need to send out our praises to Dana, the bartender.  He is a great bartender.  Great drink skills and serves under pressure with
Ease and friendliness.  Dana never skips a beat, follows up with his service quickly and is socially engaging!  Thank you,  Dana, for making our experience a great one!
Have eaten at the Sunset Grille several times in the past and have always come away more than satisfied with the food and the service.  Not so yesterday.  Ordered a Cobb salad (disappointing...someone should show the kitchen how to make one...looked more like a Caesar salad).  Whoever prepared my companion's sandwich loaded one side of the sandwich with the meat, the other side consisted of lettuce.  What was supposed to be a grilled sandwich was grilled alright....a strip about one inch wide on half the sandwich showed evidence of grilling (the rest of the bread was just hard).  And finally, don't know what our server's problem was, but she was one step above unpleasant.  Very, very disappointing experience.  It'll be a while before we have lunch there again.
Sunset Grill is nice, comfortable little restaurant that has some of the best sunsets on the Cape. The manager, Andy Roth is outstanding, goes out is way to make everything perfect as can be. Matt and Dana that are behind the bar are also very, very good. The food is consistentantly very good. Friday nights they have one of the best prime ribs anywhere 
A very nice place to relax, have a cocktail and enjoy the food
We decided to go out for dinner on this Monday 7/20/15...We chose the Sunset Grille because it is not far from our house. The sunsets are gorgeous, thus the name. Our waiter was Dana. The service was excellent even though it was busy for a Monday (perhaps a tournament or league eve) Dana was attentive. We got the calamari for an appetizer. Yummy. We got the ravioli special and the steak and mashed with broccolini.
Delicious. We go here frequently in the summer for a sip and an app or a little "9  and dine"
We had a very good meal, black diamond steak, crunchy codfish sandwich, onion rings and chicken fingers and a nice wedge salad. All very tasty. The server, Dana, was one of the best we've experienced in any restaurant in a long time. He was absolutely on top of everything and his timing was impeccable, despite covering several tables as well as the bar. Top notch!!!
I had an excellent piece of salmon served on their house salad and it was very good.  My husband enjoyed the Asian steak tips and our friends had the seared tuna dinner and all enjoyed their dinner.  We went to hear the band out on the patio, but it was so loud we couldn't even communicate so we went inside.  We had ordered drinks outside which were served in plastic. Once we went in for dinner I was VERY disappointed that my drink was served in a plastic cup.  If I am paying 8-9 dollars for a glass of wine, I want it in the proper wine glass.  Because of this simple reason, we may not return there for dinner again
The food is average and the price is about right or just a little high.  It is a golf club so that defines the atmosphere.  the inside is rather dark and very much like a bar room but on a nice day take a stroll out the back for a very nice view.  you can have a drink outside to see the sunset if you pick the right day.  Everyone raves about the sunsets here--not the food.  You decide what is more important to you.  Nice to try it once.
What an embarassment for this restaurant.  What were they thinking.   If you saw an add for a $5.00 burger what would you think?  Would you think, you would have to pay extra for the lettuce and tomato?  Well you do at the Sunset Grille.  We go to a restaurant in Newton, MA that advertises for lunch a $5.00 burger with all the toppings and french fries.
Adam prepared some delicious halibut with a bit of a kick. Beautiful presentation and absolutely yummy. 
I've been to the club at the golf facility so thought an Easter Brunch might work out well. Not the case. 

The place wS very disorganized. After we were seated for a while I went and asked the hostess if we had wait service as no one came to our table. We were the greeted by our server with " your early."  

Server changed in the middle of our stay. Not a big deal since it was a buffet. 

Buffet set up needed help. No bread, rolls, bagels, etc. Partially empty serving tables. One chef asked the second if he gad ever made an omelet before after I had placed my order. My husband asked for a well done piece of roast beef and was told " there isn't any. " 

When I asked what type of wine (Pinot Grigio) they had,  my waiter told me it was "good" and that it was the kind they use at all the weddings. 

The kicker came with the bill when they added 20% automatically. There were just two of us....it was a buffet...the service was nil.  Just thought it was kind if a bold move on their part. 

Well they have a year to organize. Perhaps someone with marketing and experience can lend them a hand ...
After driving golf balls , had lunch with my son. The food was ok & pricey but the view was great. Staff is  a little standoffish ,not really friendly they seem to be just putting in their time. The menu is limited and they dont seem to want to vary much from it.
I love having the option to go to the Sunset Grille for lunch. It is very welcoming and I enjoy the lunch menu. It is especially fun when Golfers come in to eat or drink. Even in January, the view is beautiful. Keep up the good work!
Had a fish and chips dinner on a Thursday night recently that was very good.  The service was fast and accurate and the meal was 're as lot good. I recommend this place to anyone. 
Drive up and not the best outside appeal. The pizza and wing dings are the family favorites. Although they have a special board that often offers delicious specials. Have tried many of them. Walk in order a pizza and wing dings you won't be disappointed. 
The fish is very fresh and the fries taste hand cut, all for under $12 you can't get that value anywhere. The waitstaff is the best, it's a nice warm neighborhood bar.
My husband and I visited Trading Post after a long, but great day on Martha's Vineyard. We were very hungry so we stopped in for a bite to eat. While it was quite busy for a Thursday, our server did her best to accommodate us. We enjoyed a pizza, which was suggested on Trip Advisor and were not disappointed.
The food is great and affordable. Eating on the cape can be extremely expensive if you go to the wrong place. The quality is consistent and I've never had a bad meal. Nothing fancy just good home style cooking the pizza, burgers and fish and chips are always a good choice. The staff has been there a long time and that alone should tell you something.
Nice friendly little local place! Good pizza! The bartender Jim was friendly & funny! A guy's guy! Definitely would come here again! A++++
Trading Post Lounge is a great little local spot that is great for families as well as going to meet for a drink with friends. You get everyone here, from people going for a cold beer after work, families with children, seniors meeting out, to people going to play pool. The pizza is mostly what they are known for, but they have a great selection of other items as well at really great, BEYOND reasonable prices.  This place is nothing glamorous inside, but the bartenders and waitstaff are top-notch! This is a small place, and fills up quickly, especially around the 5-6:30 time frame. 
Love this place it's out go-to for pizza ! We always get the same thing everytime-  the blooming onion is good too!!!  The wait staff are attentive and friendly never have had a bad experience 
This place was quaint and had a good vibe. Drinks were made well and everyone was nice. Prices decent and had a pretty good bar food menu. Parking scarce so I would image in the summer months it's hard to get in so allow time for parking!
This is the quintessential townie place, with knotty pine décor, Keno and super friendly waitresses. Stop here for a reliably good burger, great onion rings,  fish n chips and a lot of good specials - where else can you get stuffed green peppers or fried smelts?
I have been going to TPL since I was a kid (literally).  You'll be hard pressed to find a more invitng bar/pub.  Atmospher and decore are aged but thats what makes this place nostalgic.  The food is surprsingly good all the time.
This place is always good. The locals including me goes here for great eats at a budget and the staff is wonderful. Drinks are made very well here not watered down but so good to enjoy.
When you just want to get out of the house and have a beer +/- a bite to eat the Trading Post is a nice stop.  Nothing fancy here.  Cold pitchers of beer and lots of fried foods.  Pizzas are very good and on occasion they will have a fried oyster plate that is quite yummy.  There is a large screen TV for sports but generally it is just loud and no one is paying much attention to whatever game is on.  Keano and the pool table seem to be a draw for some.  there is outdoor seating for the summer but no view.  Best thing about eating here is that that it is cheap!
We went here three times during our visit. Each time we knew what to expect and were not disappointed. They also have pool tables and Keno available, along with major sporting events on TV. We played 5 rounds of pool the last night we were there at 75 cents a pop. We would go here again.
I have lived in town for over 26 years and just discovered this little gem! GREAT food and a homey atmosphere make this place tops! It is always a pleasure to be recognized by name and to have your drink order remembered! 

We made it here by the invite of a friend. The place is dated, but also clean and friendly. Once you enter, you just pick out a table and sit down. The MOST friendliest waitresses on earth are here! Yo are greeted liek a family member and greeted quickly. in addition to the small bi folded menu, there are specials on the blackboard on the wall, with the MOST expensive item at $13.95! Drinks are most reasonably priced at $5.00 for a mixed drink with premium liquor to $4.50 for a cold, large draft beer.

What else can one say? Friendly, reasonable and down home cooked food! In a single word...PERFECT! Just do not tell everybody, as it may get even more crowded than it already is!
For years, my husband and I drove past the Trading Post Lounge, never interested in checking it out.  Then one night, it snowed and we didn't want to travel far for a meal.  That was when we discovered our local favorite.

What a hidden gem!  The menu and daily special can best be described as "comfort food".  We enjoyed several tasty meals, sandwiches, and soups until we discovered...the most delicious pizza on Cape Cod.  Now we refuse to order anything else.  The thin crust pizza is delicious every time - the perfect balance of sauce, cheese, and toppings.

The waitresses are friendly and strive to remember your order from one visit to the next.  There is a large television that is always tuned into the big game.

For a casual, friendly, comfortable atmosphere with delicious comfort food - Trading Post Lounge is the place to go!
We caught a sox game here on the big screen and had some dinner. Food is solid, not fancy but many options and evening specials. It is down right cheap, which is why the quality is better than you would expect. 

Very local crowd of friendly folks. There is keno, pool tables and darts too. We were there after 8:00 and it was full but not too rowdy. 

Kids are fine to come here too. They made a good grilled cheese for our 6 year old. 

We will come by again. They have an outdoor patio but it was too cool for that in October. It is open year round too.
This place is a hole in the wall but in a good way! I personally like places with old feel to them. It is a very laid back place to casually enjoy a few drinks with some friendly locals! They also have Keno and a few outdoor tables. The fish and chips were really good! Kids are welcome, too!
We have been coming to this bar for almost 30 years.  It is still one of the best deals in town, and we have never had a bad meal.  Besides, it has lots of local charm and character.
Great food and drink (for pub fare) at reasonable prices.  Dart boards and pool tables too.  Fun place to meet friends.
You know exactly what you are going to get... and you will find it here.  Clean and efficient and restrooms too.
Been to this Dunkin Donuts many times; they always forget to provide napkins and you have to ask for them; what do they think we use our sleeve to wipe our mouth?  They   have problems with their Dunkin app on phone being slow and doesn't work at window with their register.  So just a few aggravating and inconsistent service mentions.  The owner owns 13 Dunkin Donuts in Bourne.  The best one is on Main Street, BBay, they always get your order, can hear and understand you and repeat your order correctly. And they give napkins. 
Pizza by Evan is our default pizza place.  It's terrific.  Now if we wish to dine in, we have a Greek Salad and a steak sandwich.  We add a couple of spinach pies to take with us and heat them up later for lunch at home.  The owners are terrific folks and the staff is very accommodating.  Further, there is no music blaring and only one TV set on very low volume.  It's on of our regular dining spots.
a dear friend and I were in town for the wake and funeral of a dear friend and family member......while visiting, a house full of people were wishing for pizza....we were told of this fine establishment....we arrived and ordered 8 pizza's to go....all different varieties and all were SUPER DELICIOUS
Always busy, good food, order and receive in 15 minutes.  Prices reasonable too for your budget.  Normally good.
this is a good place for pizza. the prices are very reasonable . We have gotten pizza here many times. the owner is a nice person. you cant see it off the main road as it is set back off claypond road
My husband and I order pizza from Pizza By Evan frequently. They are one of two pizza places that are allowed to deliver to Joint Base Cape Cod. We're always happy with the pizza, although a few times it has been slightly over cooked with a blackened bottom, or slightly undercooked and flimsy, but still tasty. I ordered spaghetti from here once and was very disappointed. Stick to the pizza. 
When we are at the Cape we always get dinner one night from Pizza by Evan.  They make great little pizzas so everyone can get exactly what they want.  Very yummy pizza!
My wife and I have enjoyed Pizza by Evan for fifteen years and have never been disappointed.  The staff is friendly and accommodating. Their selection has always been adequate.  We've often combined a Greek Salad with our Pizza and enjoyed the combination.  The pizza crust and toppings are the usual fare are just how we like it.  One last thing, if you choose to 'eat-in' which we often do you don't have to compete with music or video.  It's a great place for food and conversation.  Good job, gang.
Their pizza is not greasy and the crust is tasty and not chewy.  The toppings are fresh and delicious.  A sausage, mushroom & onion pizza with a side of eggplant parm as take out makes us very happy after a day at work.  They are also very friendly and the atmosphere is pleasant.
First time i went here my food was cold. Thought id give it another chance yesyerday and the gave me the wrong food. Is it that hard to make a bloody burger? Not going there again.
Wether you want just a coffee and cookie or something more it's a quick stop offering a helpful staff.  We do it often.  
Been to this McDonalds various times, various dates, various times of day.  Not the best service; they need to improve their window service.  
What can I say - it's a McDonald's.  On the other hand, the staff is friendly and accommodating, the dining area is clean and we stop there because we know what we're getting.  We've never been disappointed
spent weekend at the cape driving from Va. Got lobster rolls on the way to Chatham and whole belly clam rolls on the way home. Outstanding for both stops. fast friendly service
Great place to stop when leaving the Cape for a quick bite. The Lobster Rolls are the best in the area, full of chucky lobster meat.  Also great fried clams, and fries. Friendly staff, clean with great outdoor picnic tables for dinning.  Highly recommend.  Pete
There are some things that I'm just glad to know. Lobster rolls and clam shacks are two of them. This place is worth the drive and not because of the decor (nor the price). It's truly a drive-in shack, where you order fried food (or lobster rolls) that are delicious because - well, just because. Plentiful. Well executed. Good fries. Homemade tartar sauce (yes it can make a difference). Picnic tables away from the road, with a view of big tugs wandering down the canal. Young people behind the window. 

Yes, seafood has gotten incredibly expensive ($19 for fried scallops, $21 for clams with bellies) but this is a treat, where we don't want to overfish our welcome. 

The scallops, btw, did not have the heavy breading, they were perfect. The place also serves $6 burgers. We didn't have one but they looked good.

The noise of the road while you're waiting for your food is pretty loud but the back picnic tables are surprisingly quiet.
The service and pricing here are both poor. Food forgotten and had to run after the staff several times to remind them.
You order give your name & wait but no service for bad food is still bad food.
Still waiting for the ears of corn that came with the lobster.
The child's hot dog ice cold we asked for a replacement & it was never received.
So we stopped to the Seafood Shanty while waiting for traffic to move through towards 495! The food was great, my mom and I had a burger, while my stepdad had a roast beef sandwich! Great prices! Great views of the Cape Cod Canal! Next time I want to try their fried clam roll- although they are known for the Lobstah Roll! 
Stopped here on the way to the cap for the weekend. What a perfect meal to hit the spot. The fish and chips was delectably fried and the tarter and coleslaw were to die for! Definitely stopping again
Located between the two bridges on route to the Cape and overlooks the canal. I start to salivate two weeks before our annual trip for the best lobster roll ever. This year we arrived earlier and we're in luck the open flag had just been put out. I would have waited until the shack opened. The roll is big enough for two people but I was having the whole thing this year.. While you wait there are some pretty cool photos of celebs that have visited. Good variety on the menu. 
The lobster roll was amazing! One of the best we've ever had. The whole belly clams were just ok. The home made tarter sauce was not great and the cole slaw was unusual since it was heavy on onions. The onion rings were ok.  A lot of them and of the thinner variety. Nice portions but a bit pricey. 
Favorite stop when camping at Scussette beach.  Best lobster roll around and for my non-seafood spouse, the Shanty roast beef is the bomb. Topped off by the home made ice cream sandwich, shared of course. This place is spot on!
Seafood Shanty is our go-to spot for a lobster roll when leaving the Cape. Best clam shack in that area and our favorite just behind Arnold's in Eastham. 

Lobster rolls are very generously portioned. Meat is sweet and fresh and consistently good. Little more mayonnaise than Arnold's and more of a mixture of small and large pieces, but definitely heftier!

Whole belly fried clams are also reliably excellent - large clams, lightly fried in fresh oil. 

Highly recommend! If you have time to spare, you can picnic across the road overlooking the canal. 
 Just had some fried clams that were soaked in water wsy too long, huge mushy, tasteless whole clams here last week. I was very disappointed and did not eat most of the bellies.
This place has been my favorite seafood, especially fried clams on southshore for a few years.
My family took me here and I am so glad! I ordered a homemade ice cream sandwich and split the lobster roll. It was delicious! The best lobster roll I have had to date! The coleslaw was good and the fries weren't bad either. I will definitely return when I am in the area.
The Seafood Shanty has the best lobster roll on the Cape. Full of delicious lobster meat, very little mayo, and perfectly toasted bun. 

My in-laws live in Plymouth and I've driven past this place for years and never ate at it until this past August.  I've been missing out!  I ordered the clam strips and they were the best I've ever had!  The breading tasted good, they weren't overcooked and chewy, and they were sizable pieces of clam.  I can't wait to go back and try some of their other stuff.

The added bonus is the pretty views of the canal.  A perfect spot to eat a casual dinner on a summer evening.
Don't waste your time or money. With a name like shanty, you come in with low expectations. However, after eating at this shack they actually dropped lower.. Portions were small for the price you pay. Ordered clam and fish plates, which left my wife and I hungry . 

The other dish I was close to ordering afterwards was their lobster roll . However I smartened up, left the $20 in my wallet, and went home to see what was in my fridge.
Incredible food!  Even Henry Winkler ate here and loved it!  Outside dining only, and the seafood is to die for!
It doesn't get any better than this if you are looking for a lobster roll.  Huge portion of fresh lobster.  Fries and onion rings were great too.  Take out only to eat on the picnic tables.  They also have ice cream.  Make sure to bring plenty of cash because it ain't cheap and they don't take credit.  A real rest room instead of that nasty port a potty would have been nice.
This is a roadside stand where you order at a window and eat at a picnic table. We were in heavy traffic leaving Cape Cod and decided to pull over for lunch. I did not expect much, but what a surprise. This was some of the best fried seafood that I ate all week. It is very fresh, we saw the daily delivery truck. The food was ready very quickly.The fried clams and scallops were very good as were the French fries.  There was no greasy taste at all. They have a very unique tartar sauce. Also the lobster roll is huge. For seafood that tasted this good, the prices were low. So for great tasting seafood at a very good value stop in to the Seafood Shanty. We have been driving by this place for years. Who knew!
There are numerous places that offer lobster rolls but leave it to a Shack to impress!!!  The rolls are overflowing with lobster meat and chunks. The flavor was incredible and it was also substantial,  nothing skimpy. Highly recommended 
The lobster roll was big and fresh and reasonably priced.  I'm not a French fry girl but ate them all. Not greasy, crispy outside soft inside.   Already been back for another.  Everyone is nice.  Only problem was they had just washed the tables and benches, I wiped them off but there was so much bleach in the water, it ruined my new shorts.  Should have warned us.  
I went in for a beer and order a take out pizza.  It was about 5 pm   only a few people at the bar.  Very friendly bartender took my order.  Another lady bartender went on duty and was talking to guests and included me in conversation    Didn't have to do that.   The place did not smell funny as another person  said. The beer was fine.  People friendly And the best personal pan pizza I have had in a long time.
I went with some friends when we came back to the area and it was great. Very much a everybody knows your name kind of place. Very friendly staff and clientele. Very comfortable, nothing fancy but feels like a hometown kinda place.  Would deffenately recommend to anyone that wants to go to a laid back kinda place. 
We thought it looked busy because the parking lot was full. When we went in found out it was just the bar that was busy. Decided to try it anyway. What a mistake. They said they were famous for their fish and chips. We ordered tem and they must fry onions in the same oil that was all you could taste. It was terrible. We did not eat them and no one asked us why. From the time they brought the food till another person brought the bill no one came near us.
My husband and I went in here yesterday (10/29/2012) for a quick lunch and a game of Keno. We are not overly fussy about where or what we eat for lunch, but being from Bourne, we thought we would try something different. This place was the pits! The barmaid was literally yawning as she walked over to us. We ordered wingdings, a bowl of chili and a bowl of chowder. The wing dings were cool in the middle and so greasy that the oil ran down my hand. I thought right away that the oil was not hot enough in the fryolater when they  dropped the wings into it and they were not cooked long enough. My clam chowder had a strong "vinegar" flavor to it.  I know what rancid chowder tastes like, and this chowder was waaaay past it's "eat by" date. I didn't say anything to the barmaid, as she was busy chatting to the patrons at the other end of the bar and I just wanted to leave. I asked for the check and the barmaid didn't even ask why I had not touched my full bowl of chowder that she picked up....HELLO???  Just another example of the incompetent service we got. You would think that in this bad economy that we are experiencing and the many restaurants/grills on the upper Cape area....customers would be more appreciated.  Tried it. Hated it. Will NOT go back.
Enjoyed several meals here over that weekend.  Food was outstanding.  Everything was homemade and very good.  Waitress was very pleasant and helpful.  She always offered suggestions on our food choices when asked.  The prime rib dinner was exceptional.  The pasta dished also were great.    It is a little off the beaten path, but worth looking for.  We stayed at the hotel next door so it was very convenient.

Highly recommended.
Service was terrible. The waitress was way more interested in her friends. Food had so much salt and pepper that I could not eat it. Then she couldn't run my credit card, so she took it to the bar and added $12.95 that wasn't mine! STAY AWAY!!
Why visiting German tourists would even go into a dump like this is beyond me, but their review was right on the money. The food and service are bad beyond all description. Don't even consider eating there. Given the fair number of decent dining options in Buzzard Bay, I can't possibly imagine how this place stays in business.
Der abendliche Besuch von TJ's Bar and Grill geriet leider zum kulinarischen Desaster. Zur unfreundlichen Bedienung in einem leeren (warum nur?) Restaurant kam ein schlecht zubereitetes Abendessen, welches von einem Brotkorb mit verschimmelten Inhalt gekrönt wurde. Eine sehr lange Wartezeit kam noch hinzu.  Die Bar und die Küche machten einen sehr ungepflegten Eindruck.
A busy small town Starbucks with a great staff and service. Located right at the base of the Bourne Bridge.  I've lived on cape years and always happy with the service.  Order ahead saves the long tourist lines. 
Depending upon your route, this is a good coffee stop.  It's serves the standard Starbucks menu and you get what you expect.  It's a good stop.
I know, it's my own fault, right? $41.67 for breakfast & holiday drinks for a family of 4 is ridiculous! But, it's kind of our tradition before we head to Nyc....but please note that there is a Dunkin Donuts next door at Speedway (hint hint). We stopped mainly because the kids wanted oatmeal but holiday beverages were on my mind. The kids ordered grande peppermint mochas with half the pumps of syrup and we ordered some sandwiches as well. The clerk read back the order. We got to the window got our order & then gave her the holiday beverage promo card for our stickers and she handed it back saying we weren't eligible. This was news as Hyannis & Boston both have us the stickers. She was snippy & rude and just ignored our protests and moved on. My husband asked for a receipt which the manager brought almost 5 minutes later. The snippy girl had forgotten my daughters drink so we had to ask for that too. We got down the road and my dagger pointed out (really? she's the daughter of a reviewer?!) that the snip gave them ventis, which yes, she charged us for! This sadly is not the first issue that we've had at this location so I would highly suggest Dunkin donuts next door!
I often stop here before a long drive to or from the Cape.  They close a bit early, but if you have not turned your wifi on for the summer yet they leave it on and you can sit in your car and finish your e-mail.  Also a good place for free bags of coffee grounds mulch for the garden!  However, my soy latte is often cold from here.
Excellent Baristas here in this Starbucks and it's in the same little plaza where there's an Eastern Mountain Sports store. Best of both worlds in this little plaza atop a hill at the Bourne Bridge approach rotary. My Mocha Frappuccino is always made to my liking and great coffee of your choice of regular roast or dark roast.
This lonely Starbucks in Bourne is in a small strip mall off the Bourne roundabout. In this years (2/2015) snow it's a but of a challenge to get up the access road. Nice once your there!
Great oyster platter enough to feed two Adults easily.. Wonderful clam chowder one a must have!!! This is my second visit and we will make this our go to place for Seafood in Massachusetts!! Sunni is a very kind and pleasant waitress who knows how to treat customers . 5 stars for Sandy's
This was by far one of the best i have had the chowder and platter was enough for two people And Onion Rings  as well !!
Went here because it was right across the street from where we stayed. Food was very good, a bit pricey, but good and the seafood was fresh. Good size portions. Service was good. Would go back again if ever in the area.
My wife and I are from New Bedford, Ma. We took a ride to Sandy's for a change and what an awesome surprise! The seafood was cooked perfectly, and the portions were outstanding... The service was great as well. If you love seafood, this is the place.   Al & Janice
Fantastic food and service. This was the second time in a few weeks I came for the fried clams. They were wonderful both times. They were hot straight out if the fryer and perfectly cooked. The bellies were perfect. The batter is the best I've ever had-just the right amount of crunch. Now I can't go anywhere else for fried clams.
I have been going here since I can remember. Everything is delicious, especially the fried clams. I won't get them anywhere else. Everything is always very fresh and it tastes it. They make a lot of things to order because it is so fresh, which means you may wait a bit for your food. But, man, is it worth it!
Sunday dinner for 1st time, long time. Wife's been here 50 years ago and still going strong. Chowda was very good and the fish was done just right. Wife had clam balls and onion rings done perfectly. This place hasn't changed much and is still a friendly place for couples or family.
Ate there with a couple of friends. Got the fish and scallop combo plate. Paid the extra $1 for homemade onion rings instead of the french fries. GET THE ONION RINGS!! Literally covered my plate. Got a good decent piece of fish and about 13 scallops. Little bit pricey then most places...$21 for the plate. But so worth every penny!!
My husband and I went for a date night. We ordered shrimp and scallops. The food was really good, pricey but good. I didn't want fries as the seafood was already fried and asked for a baked potato instead, there was an up charge for that I was a bit shocked normally restaurants don't charge for that at all. Waitress was great very polite and attentive. We will be coming back! 
Waitress was sweet and very attentive, I felt badly for her. 
I ordered baked cod and it was drenched in butter and did not taste the way fish should taste. It was not edible. I politely complained to waitress of which I told her I didn't want anything in return or a new meal. She told me she would tell the owner. 
The owner came to our table and literally questioned me on what I thought was wrong with the fish. He was rude, disrespectful and acted as if he was under the influence of something. 
He left my table talking loudly about us so we could here him. When I confronted him that I could hear the words he was saying he became more disrespectful. 
I could not believe he was the owner and his attitude towards me and my complaint. The restaurant was empty from the start of our meal to the end and his attitude was most likely the main reason. 
I wouldn't bother going here or trying it at all. Not worth it, so many other places if you continue towards route 28. 
Dinner tonight at Sandy’s (reminded of by the Cape Cod Marketplace voucher, Sandy’s needs better signage for that purpose).  The parking lot had quite a few cars in it which was a positive sign but we did not eat in the dining room so I cannot address that area. We sat in the bar area in order to play Keno (I was lucky).  The area was spotless and fresh looking. Our waitress was helpful, pleasant, and present when needed. We enjoyed the seafood platter for two which we more than easily split among the three of us. This left us with a huge amount to bring home for us ALL to enjoy a second time.  The portion size was amazing and the quality, freshness and batter was perfect. Scallops, whole bellied clams, fish, and shrimp layered atop of a bed of French fries, all crowned with onion rings.  The amount of seafood was substantial and the rings and fries were as they are supposed to be, side dish portion sized.  Will we go there again? Absolutely.
This is a must when visiting Cape Cod.  The fisherman's platter is enough to feed two people.  Service is great, and food is quite tasty.
Went for dinner.  Only a few other guests.  Had fish and chips  nothing special but still very good.  Cole slaw was excellent.  Wait staff was one lady but again it was early     restrooms were very clean as was restaurant.
My friend and I stopped here after a day at the beach and I was surprised at the geniality we received from the workers. We were welcomed to wherever we wanted to sit and got prompt service. My fish sandwich was a bit small but very good, the mashed potatoes don't look fancy but taste amazing. 
This isn't fancy dining, but it is surely great New England food!

Maybe the outside is newly remodeled but the interior looks like a 70's diner.
Dark wood and uncomfortable red vinyl booths.  
Upon entering, we weren't sure this actually was a restaurant.  The first thing we saw was a board with fish and shellfish prices so we thought it was a fish market.  Then the waitress appeared and told us they had a full menu and led us to a booth.  We weren't the only ones who looked confused on entering, the next customers did the same thing.   
The menu is typical seafood fare, and they offered a  separate menu with Italian meals.  I would be too scared to try that.   The room smelled like fish and not in a good way and there were cleaning products and dirty rags left in sight. 
The waitress was friendly and quick but served my sandwich with the mayo on it and not on the side as requested so I was given a complimentary order of fries.  A very nice gesture.  The scallop roll was okay, nothing special at $14 plus $4.75 for a Corona.
I give them credit for keeping the place clean, considering what they have the work with.  Not going back.
Sandy's recently opened in April of 2015 but this was the first time we have been back since it closed.  The renovation is nice, lots of outdoor seating and now a bar area.
We were a party of four and came during lunchtime on a Sunday, while heading home from Cape Cod.  I ordered the scallop and fish plate, my husband ordered the fish platter, our friends ordered lobster roll and fish & chips.  I must say we were all presently surprised how good everything was.  The batter on the fish, scallops and onion rings was excellent.  The french fries, which I must admit that I am not a big fan of, were really good.  The scallops were jumbo size and the white fish was Cod and delicious. Our waitress was very nice and helpful in telling my husband he didn't have to order a side of onion rings, there would be plenty on his platter to share with everyone.  She was so right, there were so many we even took some home.  The lobster roll had no added filler and my friend was very pleased with the portion and price of $15.99.  Very good lunch specials from 11:30am - 4:00pm.  Prices from $7.95 to $8.95   Everything was served nice and hot except of course the lobser roll. We will most definitely go back.  Great location, last exit just before the Bourne Bridge going to the Cape and first exit coming off the Bourne Bridge leaving the cape.
We saw a review of this restaurant in one of the local papers and decided to try it on Monday night.  It was cold and rainy, so we were happy to get into the restaurant.  The dining room was completely empty at 5:30 pm (and remained so until about 6:30 pm when another group came in) and really cold inside.  The waitress was very nice, but not well-informed on the menu.  We ordered a mix of seafood and italian dishes.  The seafood we ordered was all fried, including the calamari appetizer. The calamari were all hard, rubbery rings. My seafood plate (not platter which has onion rings and more food) was not heaping, and the seafood was overcooked and oily.  The italian food we ordered was not very good, either, as the breading was falling off of the chicken parm and the sauce was the same as that served with the frozen Oreida mozzarella sticks.  The worst were the 2 orders of Lobster Alfredo. The white sauce was terrible.  We weren't going to eat leftovers, but the meal was not cheap and I asked everyone to take home what they couldn't eat so that we could literally give it to our dogs.  At the end, after paying the whole bill and tipping generously, I wanted to speak to a manager or owner just to share my disappointment. The waitress said that the owner was across the street but that she would want to talk to me, as there was a new cook on that night.  We waited, even though there was nothing to gain for us, and the first thing the owner said was, "I see you didn't like the food since you're taking it all home."  I started to leave because of that sarcastic beginning, realizing there was nothing to gain.  She then said that she was so surprised to hear we didn't enjoy the food since there are never any complaints.  I pointed out that there were 7 people in the restaurant including our 5 for the whole time we were here, so she might want to be more open to hearing her customers' thoughts.  I did share, and at the end, she offered us a $50 gift certificate with the hope that we would return and try them again. I appreciated that gesture, but given the problems with the food and the owner's attitude, and the choices available for delicious, fresh seafood on the Cape, we probably won't be back.
We welcome back Sandy's, who was closed for a while.  Cheerily painted picnic tables greet you on the outside patio.  There is a new bar/lounge when you come in.  The dining room doesn't look like much but don't let that fool you.  The service and the food is excellent.  I had popcorn shrimp appetizer reasonably priced at $7.95 and got more than I could eat.  I took the rest home and ate the next day.  Still delicious.  My husband got a lovely crisp,  fresh salad, and baked cod with cracker crumb topping and he raved about how delicious and perfectly cooked it was.  This is what fish should taste like.
Stopped in for lunch on way to Cape. Used to eat here many years ago but closed for awhile. The inside has beed redone since we were here many years ago, We chose to sit in the bar area. Waitress came over and told us the specials and took our drink order. A beer and a coffee. Took awhile for the coffee and she offered 1 refill. Another warm up would of been nice. I had the oyster plate and my friend had clam chowder and clam roll. He said the chowder was good. Both the roll and plate were good size. Both came with fries and the plate came with a small cole slaw. The oysters were ok- not the best or worse I ever had.
Stopped in on Wednesday 12/3 for early dinner. We chose to sit at the bar. I ordered fried clams and scallops and my friend had the fried shrimp and scallops.  Both meals were incredible! Light crispy batterc sweet and fresh seafood. A definite winner. I should mention the clam balls or clam cakes. Really good. Dinner was made all the more pleasurable due to the delightful conversation of Ally. 
Stopped in for dinner and had the fried oysters. They were perfectly cooked, succulent and tasty. Service, as provided by our waitress Kelly was perfection. She had just the right combination of professionalism and friendliness, efficient and humorous. We'll be back.
We have a large family and wanted to have a get together.  My husband suggested that we have Eastwind put on a clambake.  We live near the restaurant so we are regulars at the restaurant and have never always been very satisfied with the service and the food served.  Deb was in charge of coming to our home and putting on the clambake.  The young man who helped her was also personable and helpful.  Deb was great to work with and everyone who came loved the food.  The portions were generous.  We would absolutely recommend a clambake by Eastwind to others as a way to entertain a large group.
We decided to try Eastwind Seafood Restaurant, after reading rave reviews  here on Trip Advisor. Our experience was top.notch.  The seafood is fantastic and our meals arrived steaming hot and cooked to Perfection.  Succulent shrimp, generous portions, served by a fantastic waitress and superb cooks.
My husband and I had dinner at Eastwinds on a Thursday night mid-August; no trouble parking or getting a table at 6:30. Dining room is fairly small, but the tables were well spaced. It's casual but nice; families would be comfortable there. A small market case and raw bar takes up part of the area. We started with a shared shrimp cocktail and were really impressed - 8 huge shrimp, perfectly cooked and served with cocktail sauce and fresh lemon. We'd planned to get the usual Cape Cod fried seafood selection, but ended up ordering 2 dinner specials instead and were very pleased. I had fish tacos - 2 soft corn tortillas with perfectly fried white fish, shredded cabbage, tomatoes and a creamy, slightly spicy sauce - best fish tacos I've had outside of California. An oil and vinegar pasta salad came as a side, with fresh summer veggies. The rotini pasta was a little overdone for my taste but it was tasty otherwise. My husband had sushi-grade tuna, pan seared and sliced with a creamy wasabi sauce and teriyaki dipping sauce both on the side. The tuna was outstanding. Both meals were attractively plated, which we didn't expect from a casual place. Our waitress was friendly, efficient and knowledgeable about the menu. We loved the place and would definitely go back. Prices were very reasonable for Cape Cod seafood, and the atmosphere and service are both great. They even had a few microbrews and frosty mugs - it really exceeded our expectations!

Getting there is a little tricky from the rotary; coming from Bourne/Sagamore or 495, go around the rotary in the right-hand lane like you're going to Buzzards Bay, but instead of taking the exit towards Dunkin you go straight across (stop for traffic entering the rotary on your right) onto the side street next to the Way Ho Chinese restaurant. Eastwind's parking lot is on the left just beyond the Way Ho. This large parking lot, in back of Eastwind, allows you to walk directly into the dining room without climbing stairs; you can also park at the far end of the Way Ho lot in front of Eastwind, but you'll have to walk up an outside staircase. There are also a few picnic tables out back if you want to dine outside.
Went somewhat early on a Friday night for dinner and was seated promptly. Our server Tina was great and a lot of fun. The seafood was very fresh and delicious!  Would certainly go back on our next visit to this area. 
Excellent!   Used trip advisor recommendations.  Restaurant was wonderful.  Servers were very friendly and helpful
Best flounder (baked) flounder we've ever had.   Loved the Cole slaw and pickled beets

Very enjoyable restaurant and excellent meal
We used tripadvisor to search out restaurants in the area.  Based on reviews we decided to try it.    The food was excellent.  We tried the seafood chowder and swordfish tips - highly recommend both.  We had to try the pickled beets and loved them!   The restaurant is up a hill - we missed it the first time we drove by
Kelly was our server and we knew from the start we were going to enjoy our meal from start to finish! We had Clam fritters, seafood stew, Fish n chips, clam strips, and a seafood platter for two.

Appetizers came out quickly, portions were huge, food was hot and fresh. Kelly checked on us frequently and kept our drinks full. 

What I liked most about the meal (aside from the fact that the food was exactly what I wanted and absolutely delicious) is that Kelly was so personable. 

I'd highly recommend stopping here for a meal! 
My wife and I go almost every week since we live and work year round on Cape Cod.  The seafood is always fresh. The servers are all very friendly and the prices are some of the best around. We recommend this restaurant highly.
We were looking for a sit down, waiter catered restaurant in the local area near to Sagamore and Susset Beaches.  We found this welcoming seafood restaurant and were not disappointed.  My friend had their salmon special which had crisp, pickled beets as a side dish. My friend really likes beets!  It was very good.  My meal was a BLT lobster tail (2 pieces) with bacon slices on an Italian bun, lettuce and tomato.  They had a special sauce which was delicious. Prices for meals were medium and not too high to value, reasonable.  I recommend  this restaurant for families and couples away on Cape Cod for a summer day or relaxation.  We were not disappointed with our beach or our fine meals!
we found this by accident and i quickly checked TA, saw the good reviews and we stopped for a late lunch.  it doesn't look like much from the outside, but go sit on the deck, enjoy the canal view and i think you'll be happy.

there's a very large menu; everything is fresh. the fried oysters and belly clams were wonderful, fries too. the staff is friendly and will make you feel welcome.  we'll be back...
Our family of 13 had dinner at Eastwinds Seafood last night. The broad menu had something for everyone and everyone was very pleased with the quality of their food, from fried Haddock to lobster rolls, lobster BLT, grilled salmon, lazy mans lobster, calamari, clam chowder and lobster bisque, it was fantastic. Our server, Kelly, took wonderful care of us as she informed us of the menu options, efficiently served the courses and attentively made sure that none of us were ever without drink or condiment.  All the while with a personality that made you feel as if you were with family. We will be back!
Live lobster from the their store cooked for you, great stuff.
The service was great, prompt and caring 
We will be back soon.
At the bourne bridge rotary


Have been reading about this restaurant and decided to try it on a non weekend evening.  Simple restaurant with excellent fish meals and very pleasant waitress. Good prices.  Wish their AC was better.  Kind of warm inside on a hot summer night. Still glad we went and would return again.  Tricky to find parking lot off of Buzzards Bay rotary, but we found it!  Later went all the way down the road and found a beautiful overlook of the Cape Cod Canal. 
Eastwind is a homey, no frills, casual seafood spot with a family atmosphere to relax and enjoy good food and drinks. It's just off the Buzzards Bay rotary. They served a really good martini and the beers were reasonably priced. The clam chowder was tasty with plenty of clams. We had the fish sandwich and the fried clam plate. Both were delicious and fresh! The fries were good too. For a great place to chow on New England seafood in the Cape Cod area, you can't go wrong with Eastwind.
Best seafood around. If you go and you enjoy mussels you HAVE to try them. They are delicious. Also the fried shrimp were cooked perfectly. Everything fresh...
Wow this is a great place. Food is unbelievably great more than great is awesome. Let tell you first of all we were greeted with a smile in there face very very pleasant. We were seated right away. Kim our server was also with a beautiful smile in her face. She was very pleasant and very fun person. She made sure that every was fine, awesome with a smile.  My wife ordered popcorn shrimp with fries and Coleslaw was awesome. She loved it. I ordered coconut shrimp and she recommend a mango habanero source was spicy but delicious. We had a great time in Eastwind and was fun. Kim made us feel like family. If you are in the Cape Cod area I recommend you pay a visit to this great restaurant. 
We thoroughly enjoyed the Scallops wrapped in bacon served over rice pilaf and clams casino for appetizers. We also enjoyed the Fried Clam Whole Belly Plate, Fish & Chip Plate and the Swordfish Dinner Plate. Our waitress Kelly was efficient and very enjoyable. I recommend Eastwind Seafoods to anyone and well worth the trip.


Looking for  a place for lunch on our way to  a mid-week stay at the Sea Crest and decided to try the Eastwind based on the reviews.  We were not disappointed!   Had an order of steamers for a starter..  My wife had the lobster roll and I had the salmon blt sliders.  All were fresh, off high quality, well prepared, .and reasonably priced.  Tina, our server, was friendly and informative.  Will definitely be back..
This has been one  of our a favorite restaurant for years before they moved here.  Had early dinner with friends.  Everything is as good  as ever.

We had variously, fisherman platter for two, fried clam dinner and shore dinner (boiled lobster and steamers).  The clams were large  and sweet.  Fish was fresh and moist.  Everyone had the chowder which was thick and rich with clams.  Strawberry shortcake and lemoncello cake were both outstanding for dessert.

Just last week we came with even more visitors.  Every one loves the seafood here.
I'd like to start off by saying that I am a bit of an appetizer afficianado when it comes to chinese food.
I ordered all the standard fare one night. Teriyaki,,chix wing, chix fingers, boneless spareribs etc.
 I got this garbage home and as soon as I opened it I knew it was garbage but my curiousity peaked and tried it anyway. Well to make a long story very short there was a pizza delivery guy at the house in 20 minutes. DO NOT WASTE YOUR HARD EARNED MONEY
We tried Way Ho again because we were disappointed on our first visit which was quite a while ago.  The service was speedy.  There was no wait in the early afternoon.  The place was clean and tables set with fresh tablecloths.  We ordered from the luncheon menu.  I ordered the Vegetarian Delight.  My disappointment was that there was no vegetarian appetizer as an accompaniment.  One is given the choice of chicken wings or chicken fingers.  Also they do not serve brown rice which I have been able to get at other Chinese restaurants.  My husband had the shrimp with lobster sauce and fried rice.  The food was fresh, tasty, and not salty or over sauced.
Try the garlic ribs and the steamed scallops on the half shell in a seafood soy sauce with scallion and ginger
Overpriced and small. You will see more people at the bar than at the tables. Just average food. Best part about the place is the bartender is always friendly 
We've been here 5 times now and have to say that this is the freshest and most consistently great tasting Chinese food. The passion of the chefs and owner is clear as they provide great food and service time and time again. Highly recommended!
My wife and I are constantly trying different dishes. We both like the ones on the spicy side. When we were based around Boston we went either to the Golden Gate or the Shanghai.  Way Ho'  food is right there. The service is fast and the owner is there keeping things right. It’s at the Buzzards Bay rotary with parking in the rear. This is a restaurant we make sure we eat at once a month.
Local feel, all the food is fresh, stop by early in the day and watch the staff making fresh crab ragoons etc.  The best Mai Tai I have had in my life.  Been to many Chinese restaurants in NY / Boston and the food and Drinks are top notch.  No frozen food here like in other local Chinese restaurants. The owner and his family work very hard and are very involved in the day to day operations and take pride in their product.  Chris is usually behind the bar, just 4 seats but they will free up seating around the bar to sit if they are busy. I don't mind paying a little more for fresh food and great service.
Located at the Bourne Bridge Rotary this place is somewhat difficult to get into, its a quick exit off the rotary (must admit I tried more than once for this exit). Good parking in the rear. Service was friendly and efficient, waitstaff a highlight. Atmosphere bright, windows face the rotary. Small bar area, was full with TV sets going. Chix teriyaki seemed to be dipped in some type of coating, would have preferred plain, it was slightly overcooked. Fried wontons were good and fried rice ok too. Good to go in a pinch, but still looking for my go-to in this area.
It has been several years since we have eaten here, and just on a lark, we stopped in for a quick meal on a late night.  The place was busy but the service was attentive and friendly.  the food came quickly -  the basics - egg rolls, pork fried rice and a spicy chicken dish to share.  the servings were good sized but unfortunately the food was just not very tasty.  we have had Chinese at other places and did find the food to be more flavorful.  I believe that is my complaint -  the food was bland.
We stopped by here on a Sunday night on our way home from a weekend trip to get some take out. We have driven by frequently over the years, and while the exterior wasn't very appealing we had heard that the food was OK. The Plymouth area doesn't have a really good Chinese restaurant so we were willing to experiment. Not a good decision. The egg rolls were dry and filled with mystery meat, the pork fried rice tasted like it was the leftovers from Saturday, and the 'Crispy' orange chicken was mushy without any sense of orange.

I'd like to find something nice to say, but I'd be lying.
While staying in Bourne decided on Chinese and tried the Way Ho.  Having been there in the past expected a quality Chinese style meal.  Was very disappointed in the food.  Have to admit that the service was very good.
We have been to Way Ho on and off for years, and the food is always good to very good, and service is great. Very fair prices and good selections, with some veryspicy dishes. 
Go here often never disappointed!! The food is always good service is always spot on the bartender Chris is the best! Benny the owner is always there to welcome you in! My favorite place to dine in or get it to go! They have the best egg rolls and crab Rangoon's !
Not a fancy place at all but good oriental food. Atmosphere is friendly, service good and the quantity and quality what you would expect of a fair priced restaurant. Worth the stop
The crab rangoon is delicious.  Most of the other apps and dishes are average.  A bit pricey for what you get.
Really fresh, tasty food.  Slightly on the pricey side, but you certainly get what you pay for here. Easy access at the Bourne rotary too
They serve the BEST...Hot and Sour soup ! All others are a poor second to this nicely spiced delight ! The luncheon specials are reasonable and delicious .
We went to Way Ho on the spur of the moment for a late lunch on Independence Day. It's a short drive from the south side of Plymouth. The service was prompt and friendly. The atmosphere made it seem like a "local" restaurant in Hong Kong or China. The wait staff had Chinese jackets to set the mood. We had vegetable spring rolls, boneless pork ribs, velvet chicken, and bok choy. Every dish was delicious! Way Ho is definitely the best Chinese restaurant near to the South side of Plymouth. I know, as I go to hong Kong and China for business 3 or 4 times a year! We look forward to returning with friends for a dinner!
If in Bourne or Buzzards Bay and wanting Chinese Way Ho is the best around. The food is very good if not a bit pricey.  The menu is extensive and everything I tried was very good
Maybe I'm spoiled being near Boston... but this is not good chinese... and its expensive.  It took a long time to get the food as well.  If you've never had good Chinese, you'll find this acceptable
Clean and very friendly staff. Nice selection of muffins and donuts. And of course very good coffee. And they got my tea or Dr right
Great stop when leaving the Cape for that fresh brew and some donuts which are still very fresh after 5pm.  Great friendly staff and clean.  pete

Predictable..... isn't that nice.  When you want a dependable cup of coffee and a donut (or want to branch out and have something different), Dunkin' Donuts is there to answer your caffeine craving.
Every night the neighbors go for coffee at DD and it usually is right until June when they hire the foreigners who are here on work permits who don't understand English, Don't know the currency and screw up the order every night.
Had the pumpkin spice latte & muffin, always a treat! They were fast getting it to me and the place is clean. The muffin was good but not as moist as it usually was. Friend had the new pumpkin pie donut, didn't like that, it was way to sweet, and I love sweet stuff!
Always stop when I am on that side of the bridge whether I want coffee or not. The Moca madness is a car load favorite.   Brian is always friendly and a happy face to see !  
Staying in Buzzards Bay came across Betty Ann's.  They counter help was pleasant and very friendly.  The ice cream good!!  Have to admit that was all that I tried there but tried the ice cream a few nights in a row.
I hate Subway. As Jim Norton once said about Subway... "rotting meat on stale buns, prepared by savages."
This is your average yummy Subway who did serve 12 inch sandwiches and the both the girls that were working were pleasant. I gave Subway a 4 outta 5 stars because their prices are climbing and but they are placing less on the sandwich.
Anyone trying to slim down should probably not venture in. Better donuts than Dunkin', and MUCH better coffee. Great place for a quick breakfast.
My  husband and I have been  picking up  pizza and  subs at this place  and taking  it to eat at the canal. The pizza and subs have been  very  tasty  and hot.We have been  there about 6 times and always  enjoyed  our meals.They have reasonable prices  and you can call ahead 20min. and its always  been ready when  we get there.
Quick service ... Stayed at Bourne Scenic Park and they delivered... Cheese was stuck to the top of the box... French fries were good... buffalo chicken pizza wasn't anything to call home about... Price is nice but it's just another pizza place in my book... 
I am in awe of the hospitality and kindness of this establishment. A simple misunderstanding was not only corrected but I was made to feel my business was truly appreciated. 6 stars
BBHOP is always good .  This is a Go To place when you just dont feel like cooking.  Try some of their greek items...they are surprisingly good.
The dealership I work at orders from here regularly. The order is always big and it is always correct and delicious wether it be pizza, subs, or meals.
We decided to get a late pizza to watch hockey game. I ordered the small meat lovers and my wife got the Athenian specialty pizza. Both pizzas were excellent the only comment I would make on mine was the hamburger was a little overpowering canceling out the taste of some of the other meats. My wife loved her pizza. The prices we believe we're average. For two small specialty pizzas it was $25. We would return.
We are purposely trying all the pizza joints in our area to find our favorite.  When we visited here last week, we were shocked to find quite an extensive menu--subs, pizzas, appetizers, salads, burgers, and more!

We had very friendly staff, the restaurant was clean and tidy, and our food was served piping hot!  There isn't a ton of seating here, but what they have is comfortable.  

Needless to say, we ate everything but pizza that night; guess we'll have to return to try their pizza pie!
Restuarant is new and clean but pizza was expensive for being so scarce and unremarkable. We have had way better pizza elsewhere. Little crust, sauce or chesse. Veggies tiny and tasteless. Little thin tiny strips of eggplant. Couldn't even figure out what it was at first. Really? That was supposed to be vegetarian with eggplant? Will not eat there again.
Go there all the Time one of the best spots around 
Pizza is great also and they still have managed to keep the prices down wich is great when you are buying for a family of 5
I work for a local dealership and this place delivers to us maybe 2 or 3 times a day. I also order from home maybe once a week, usually Friday nights. They are ALWAYS at my office door within 15 minutes of ordering and I have NEVER had a wrong order or wrong charge. The food is more than just good, it's absolutely FANTASTIC. I honestly don't know what I would do if they ever closed. They are convenient, fast and yes, healthy food is served. The salads are always fresh and crispy. There is no better place for variety, convenience and friendly service!!
Big menu, they have lots of choices, nice clean place. parking lot is a little small. Its in a little mini mall.
I had a pile of food delivered from them it was all delish. Greek family own it, make sure you try the Greek Village Salad!
We were taking care of some family business in Buzzards Bay and didn't want to go over the bridge to grab a bite.   This place was great-- good selection, fair prices and friendly staff.  Pizza, burgers, subs-- beer and wine in a easy take out or eat-in clean place.
The subs are fresh and delicious!  Loved the eggplant parm sub.  I wasn't crazy about the pizza, but I think they use a different sauce to what I am used to.  Will be going there again when I am in the area.
I have family in the area, it apparently is one of their favorite places so when we order take-out it is from Buzzards Bay House of Pizza.  Never had the pizza - only subs and some of the Greek choices .  As with most places I've eaten in Massachusetts I find the food to be bland.  The food is adequate and the prices are reasonable.
The upper crust. This is really good Za. I will definitely stop in again. Seriously, give it a go. Their subs are equally delicious.
Try their Hawaiin pizza...their sauce and crust are the best! Not much for atmosphere, but the food is great.
Can't say that I've ever had a pizza from here, but everyone seems to enjoy them. They have an extensive pizza menu including gormet pizzas from all over the world!
I come here for the "Greek offerings". Especially like the traditional Horatiki Salad, which is a traditional Greek salad without lettuce!!! They also have Greek dinners such as Mousaka, Yemista (stuffed peppers), and Pastitsio (Greek style lasagna).
You really have to give them a try. You won't be disappointed.
Great, quality and value.  Incredible fresh sandwiches and wraps.  HUGE.  Also , Greek dishes very very good!
I really like this place. The food is really good..we usually order pizza, apps and drinks. Can't go wrong with those choices. Have not had a regular dinner here yet..maybe on my next visit. It's pretty small and fills up fast so be prepared to wait a while on the weekend nights and there is no where to wait really.. a couple of chairs by the door. Wait staff is pretty friendly.
Freda's has been my go to restaurant for years. Very clean, wonderful service, and excellent food. Best pizza and Greek Salad! Good size portions at a very reasonable price. Highly recommend. Take out is available with no extra charge.
Consistently delicious  food. Pizza and Greek salad are the best around. Very nice staff. Great value also.
This restaurant is one of the few home cooked restaurant's left. They are open to cook anything in the kitchen any way you want (within reason.) You still get a great meal and salad or soup with each entrée.   

The are very family friendly and accommodating.
Went to Freda's after my son-in-law graduated last evening. Party of six. Started out with fried pickles, and onion rings for an appetizer. Both very good. Chicken Parm, lamb kebob, pizza, fried clams, fish and chips, and grilled chicken salad for our entrees. Food was very good. Portions were suitable. Clam chowder was good as well. Server was very nice. Owners are hands on. Never had a bad meal in all the times we visited. Highly recommend....
I have been going to Freda's for many, many years.  I have enjoyed dining in as well as take out.  Recently I tried their Cheeseburger Pizza and now I am hooked on it.
Been here multiple times and have always enjoyed our meals.  The wait staff are attentive and prices are very reasonable.  Always a great spot for dinner with friends and family.
My husband and I have been coming to this restaurant for over 20 years and have recommended it to many friends. Decided to try it again for dinner last night. I ordered the prime rib special. Not sure if it was the quality of the meat or if it had been reheated but it was tough and lacking any flavor. Very disappointing meal.
While portions are ample, not really unique. Had an issue with one entree, poorly handled by management. There will be no third try.
Freda's is a restaurant the locals frequent. They do a great business, and you are always welcomed at the door. Freda's also has the friendliest waitresses. My husband and I have been going here for years, and we are never disappointed. The atmosphere is pleasant, and the food is consistently good. My favorite dish is the baked seafood casserole with fish, scallops and shrimp, accompanied with your choice of potato and vegetable. A salad is included too with your meal. The prices are reasonable. It is a great place to dine with a variety of dishes from sandwiches, pizzas to main meals. There are both tables and booths and a sports bar area. It is a casual restaurant that families and friends enjoy.
We were going out for dinner on a Saturday night and looking for somewhere new to and Freda's was recommended by a friend. It's located off the main road in a neighborhood are, a location they have occupied for about 25 years.

Upon arrival at about 6:30 PM, we were immediately greeted by a friendly hostess who offered us either a table or booth, we chose the booth.

Our super friendly waitress, Suzanne,  very quickly to take our drink orders. When she returned with them she asked if we had any questions about the menu and told us that there was an additional special prime rib available. She brought us a nice bread basket and then took our orders.

We ordered the prime rib which was declared excellent, baked haddock with seafood stuffing, the baked seafood casserole and the super Veal Mafia with shrimp, scallops and lots of lobster.

All of us agreed that this was one of the best dinners we had had in a long time. All of the food was well prepared, properly cooked and well presented.

This is a great casual dining spot for families with a sports bar and family friend air that you should checkout ASAP. We're going back on a regular basis.


The atmosphere is always great at Freda'a...Not the best meal I have ever had but always VERY good!  It must be good because I keep going back and buying gift cards for others to enjoy...In closing, a very nice restaurant with the local "flavor"...
We have been going here for over 10 years and the food is consistant!!! Excellent,hot, and plentiful. The owners and long time staff remember you, know matter how long ago you were there. This restaurant makes you feel like you are a part of their family. Atmosphere is good, people are very friendly, and the service is outstanding. This restaurant is tucked away behind some houses on a side road but once you find it , you will go back. Portions are large and pricing is not bad for what you get. Try it, you'll like it!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Freda's is a wonderful "go to" place for good food in a casual atmosphere. Last night I tried the Veal Mafia...with lobster, scallops and shrimp. It was very good. One friend had the shrimp scampi (could only eat 1/2...huge and delicious. The third person had the salmon and again, practically licked the plate clean. Cocktails were very good and the waitress was excellent, recommending a special drink that wasn't on the menu but was a HUGE hit. Of course...we will return.
I went to Freda's last night and will not be returning. The food and service was poor. The waitress was very slow with our salad and our meal. She messed up the orders of the dressing on the salad and took my salad from me and brought it to another table AFTER I took a bite of it. The food was cold and my mother asked to have it warmed up and it was not warmed up at all when it was returned. Finally, the food was just mediocre.
Freda's is our standby place and we are never disappointed.  Lots of locals to make it fun to hang out and eat and watch a game. Owners are very nice and come by to say hello and check on you.
We were looking for a restaurant in a good location to meet up with friends.  After checking with Trip Advisor we picked Freda's Restaurant in West Bridgewater.  We really lucked out!  We all had something different and all enjoyed our meals.  The waitress was excellent and very pleasant.  The restaurant looks a little dated inside but with such excellent food who cares!  Great food, great service and the prices are right.  We will be back.
My Wife and I have been going to this restaurant regularly for about ten years. I can honestly say we have never had a bad meal. Restaurant is in a hard to find out of the way place but once you find it, you will become a regular customer. The owners are always on site to greet you and come by your table to make sure everything is good. The staff has been long time people so they remember you when you come back and give that extra  personal care that helps make your visit a good visit.
The food, the pricing, the ambience. Frieda's has been a main eating fixture in WB for years but it draws more than the locals.
we are there at least twice a week.   Food is excellent. Either pizza or prime rib all is good and fresh and prices are reasonable.   The owners are on site and very friendly.  It's just a feel good place and we always leave there full and happy!
Went here for launch and sat at the bar with my spouse. The menu was quite diverse and we enjoyed everything we had from appetizers to dessert and  everything that came out of the kitchen looks great
They have complimentary soup to start. The salad and sandwiches are great for lunch, very large portions.
Excellent meal (Schrod with rice and veggies), a Friendly Atmosphere (the waitresses were very helpful), Lovely Decor (Sports Memorabilia) !
My husband and I have been going to the Boston tavern in west bridgewater for a year now, We were at Dave's Diner in Middleboro, just off the circle, and over heard someone say that Dave also owned the Boston Tavern in West Bridgewater, so we decided to try it. We dine there on Sunday's. I love fish so does my husband, Fish and chips, light flaky FRESH , just the way we like it, not greasy. Sometimes my husband has a burger, cooked just right ,juicy and with the topping that I like.  I have also had the baked scallops, Yummy! Waitresses are good, and fast coming out with the food when it is piping hot,we still go to Daves dinner for the friend chicken which the tavern does not serve, but that' ok we visit both on the weekends.
I've been here several times and always enjoy myself. The food is pretty good and the bar is quite large. Great place to meet friends for drinks and apps. There is also entertainment on the weekend.
Nothing special about food, service or atmosphere.    It's a local place for townies nothing more. Burgers and wings and fries again nothing special.
Finally had a chance to visit the Boston Tavern during my last visit to Mass.

The food is nice, standard pub fare with a hefty dose of seafood and a New England spin.
Beer selection is decent, a fair amount of regional selections. The seafood was awesome. Had a plate of Clam Bellies and fell in love.

Cannot wait until my next visit to West Bridgewater so I can eat here again!
Yet another place on the list of restaurants my Mom and I have been checking out when I take her to lunch.  First off, the management and staff are great!  VERY accomodating and very pleasant!  The menu is classic pub food, but the quality and quantity are outstanding.  The popcorn is freshly popped and flavorful.  Always seems to be a good crowd and the bar area is really nice.  A definite no-brainer.  If you are in the area and hungry, STOP.  You will be glad you did!
We always enjoy a great meal at Boston Tavern. The service is great and I love their summer salads. If you like history, you would enjoy looking at the old photos and Boston themed decor. My husband's favorite drink is the Dirty Water. I tried their key lime pie this time and it has been put to the #1 spot on my "who has the best key lime pie" list. Several coworkers also enjoy eating here. If you go on a Friday night, it is really busy on a game night so go before 6:30 so you won't have to wait long for a table.
I had not been here since the place first opened and I always see a ton on cars in the parking lot. I thought the meals were just a little more than what I had to spend. I did enjoy the popcorn as it's not as salty as other places.

Our waiter was attentive to our food but not as much as our drinks. I know some of you will understand, it it's empty ask if I want a refill. I guess that's the difference between on okay waitstaff and a great waitstaff. I would go back but now I know how much I need to spend.
Been here twice and both times was a good visit. Pub atmosphere.  Service is good.  Tables are spaced far enough apart that noise is not an issue.  I had Buffalo Chicken Mac and Cheese at a pricey $16 and change.   Chicken wings averaged out to $1.00/piece. Lunch was a burger, the mac and cheese, a beer and a maragrita was a whopping $62.  Expensive but the food is good.
Decent Pub atmosphere with good service. Food was standard, ok, nothing extraordinary. We had been a couple of times, but on this past visit we used gift cards given at Christmas. When our receipts came, they didn't show amount used or amounts remaining. Waitress could only tell us one was used up and second had $$ remaining. Rather odd, didn't feel right.
I love this place.... we go at least once a week. The people are friendly, the food is great the only problem is the bar isn't big enough for the 'regulars' let alone others.
Stopped in for a bite. Service was great, food was good . This place is busy place most of the time. We have been here a few times. Fish and chips were good.Its a good place to stop right off the highway.
My wife and I decided to try Boston Tavern on a Saturday night.  The menu has a fair amount of choices for pub/comfort food with affordable prices.  Unfortunately the food was mediocre at best.  I had the fish tacos and the fish and fries appeared to have been frozen and fried.  My wife h had the steak tips and clam strip combo.  The tips were good but clam strips were not.  The service was very good and ticket times were ten minutes or so!!  The place was very busy so I am sure many like this type of food, but we are used to much better pub food in the area.
Food was ok.  Lots of choices. Entertainment (one guy on acoustic) was really good. We were with a big group so it took a while to get a table. Sweet potato fries were really good. 
We stopped in here last week on our way to The Cape. The beer was cold and the Bloody Mary spicey and delicious. The service very good and the waitress was very attentive. Our entrees came with salad which was not notable and tasteless with blue cheese dressing that was also not very tasty. Hubby had prime rib and it was delicious and was ordered with sweet potato. A nice cut of meat but only came with a 1/2 of sweet potato. I ordered ribeye steak which was done to perfection at medium rare; however the meat was very tough and had a lot of gristle. It wasn't prime cut. Overall the dining experience was fine with great service. The prices were good. The drinks good and the food disappointing.
I wish there were more vegetable options for those of us watching our weight and carb consumption.  I have been disappointed in my salads the last 3 times, so I'm taking a break for a while.
Out for a Saturday night dinner, just two of us. We both ordered the Baked Scrod  Dinner, baked potatoes, and Cole slaw. Fish was perfectly cooked. Baked potatoes were hot and huge. The slaw was perfect. Service was great. Prices are always reasonable. All around great experience.
We stopped for drinks and appetizers after walking out of Charlie Horse. The staff was friendly and the service was good, but the nachos were bland and boring. Their place in Middleboro had better food, when we tried it 2 months earlier.
Boring Nachos
My husband and I always enjoy our Sunday mornings a little more when we include a breakfast at Daybreak!  Family-owned this restaurant will serve breakfast whenever you want it, but they also have a nice lunch menu too!  Right on route 106 in West Bridgewater.
We stopped in at this restaurant while visiting MA.  I had a crabmeat sandwich on a roll and my husband ordered a tuna sandwich also on a roll.  We also ordered french frieds.When the sandwiches arrived we were shocked at how enormous they were.  Can you say HUGE!!..The size of a small plate....The meal was delicious.  The staff was very kind and attentive.  We gathered that this is a place known by the locals...if you are looking for a nice place to grab a sandwich then this place will give you the biggest bank for your buck....Great!
been coming here for 15+ years! great breakfast,  whole hearty dishes that keep you full! always full pots of coffee! Grilled corn muffin was tasty! service is always friendly and will keep a smile on your face! Staff is real nice! Highly recomended! 
My wife and have been coming to Daybreak for years to have breakfast and have never been disappointed! This time, I decided to try one of their "Monstah" Burgers (I got the Stuffed Burger), The burger was huge and delicious! Served on a pine blank, it came on either a forcachia or sesame roll, and was a pleasant surprise...Nice Med Rare beef stuffed with bacon and cheese and covered with lettuce, tomatoes, and "Funions" and really HUGE! There was also a large side of Full Cut French Fries served in a mini fry basket! Make sure you are hungry if you order this! If you are, and you can finish it, you will not mind paying $12.95. My wife thoroughly enjoyed her Scramble Skillet. I can recommend this place to you...They have been in business for 40 years so they have been doing right for a long time!
Our family had a wonderful breakfast here recently.  The dining room is comfortable and not crowded. The servers were friendly and attentive.  Breakfast was delicious - we tried three different things and then all ended up trying the banana pancakes.  Beyond delicious !!!!!  Recommend to try !!!!!  Also they collect for Homes For Our Troops, a fine cause.
I go with my friends at least once every few months and it is always good! They cook the food very quickly and it is good, with the price spot on. 
They aren't kidding when they call them "monstah" specialty burgers...wow!!  Went to lunch with my husband and 2 sons who were craving a great burger and we found amazing delicious ones at the Daybreak.  Served with a steak knife on a butcher block with fries in a little fry-o-later basket...great presentation!  We had fresh focaccia or sesame rolls to choose from, both delish, and they actually held up and held the whole burger.  The staff are friendly and accommodating too at this mom & pop.  We'll be back!
  My wife and I come here at least a couple times a month for breakfast. Food is always hot, fresh and is served fast and with a smile! I get the Good Morning which is 3 eggs, bacon, sausage, ham, home fries and toast. Under $8! Such a deal! My wife usually has an omelette. Again... Always great! I have also stopped by after golf withy brother for their Monstah Burgers. Let me tell you... These things are awesome! 
Bottom line- great food, friendly staff, budget prices = big winner! You won't be disappointed. 
There is no place our family enjoys eating breakfast more than Daybreak.  We have been coming to Daybreak for over 18 years and are never disappointed.  The menu provides much variety, the portion sizes are generous and the food is always fresh and quick to the table.  

My daughter and I finally had lunch at Daybreak and both ordered hamburgers.  What we did not realize was they were Daybreak's signature Monstah Burgers, so large and tasty that it was impossible to fit it in our mouths.  We could each barely finish half of our burgers respectively.

We love Daybreak and are confident you will too.
Big breakfast. Delicious corned beef hash & eggs. Large portions. Ask for crispy potatoes, they are crispy. Reasonably priced. An excellent way to start the day.
Had this omellette it was delicious ver good,also my frien had steak tips with eggs toast and h.f
was ver taste good,they make very good breaskfast,we will back again..
Tied this yummy dish today on skilet with home frie carmelized onios,eggs any kind style we want toast on side taste so good omg,it delicious yummy,loved:-)
Stuffed Crepes they are yummy with whipped  cream on top,very good....
also had bowl fresh fruit very good and healthy...
My friend had steak calabrese OMG very taste and good look presentation.

This cookers at that kitchen there they do very good job....
Went here for breakfast a few times. Always know what I want until I see the specials. They are always interesting and differant (in a good way). Country omelet is my favorite. Always good with plenty of filling. I also ask for onions in my home fries and it is never a problem. Staff uses the team approach so my cup is never empty. As you walk in the door you will see shirts and hats you can buy to support our troops. I liked that as some plces hide a coffee can by the register. This is a good size display that you see when you open the door. Our favorite breakfast place.
Better than I expected. They actually have some interesting things on the menu which I wasn't expecting based on the looks of the place from the outside. Service was very efficient and friendly. Food was better than average breakfast fare. I got a florentine benedict. Home fries were really good. I would go back again!
Everyone is always pleasant and the food is served quick and hot!  
I have gone here for years.  Although, this is my first review of it.  The quality of their food has not changed, love all the different specials they come up with.  I primarily go here for Breakfast, but have gotten a burger and fries here on occasion, which is reminiscent of the Friendlys version from years and years ago.   Service here is very fast.  Parking is a bit tough, but people move in and out of here quick.  Prices have climbed in the past couple of years.  We used to be able to get the portabello and cheese omelet, with egg whites, home fries (which are the best) and toast  for about 6 bucks, when we first started going there, but now its like 8.50.  But, for myself and my husband, we will pay it, because it is tried and true, they make them the same from when we first started going, so we are never disappointed. The decor here is the only down side, although they have renovated a few years back, but being a breakfast place, its what I would expect, so I don't mind.  The place is clean, the service is good/fast and the food great, that's all that matters for me for a breakfast place.
I live up the road and this place is a great spot for a great breakfast and fast, friendly service. It is family run and they do a great job working together and taking good care of the customers. This is one of our favorite breakfast places around, and the best place in town for sure.
This was our first time there.  We were quite pleased with everything.  And the men's room was clean and sanitary.
Great menu! Great breakfast! Cheap prices and SUPER FAST service! I recomend the Flowers, the Good Morning or the linguisa omelete.
No wonder it's out of business now.   Food was bad and service was worse.    It used to be a great place the original  owner was a really really nice guy. 

 Let's hope for the area whatever goes into the space does a lot better.
My first time here on a Friday night and was expecting to enjoy some good barbecue and listen to some music. The music was excellent. Unfortunately I can't say the same for the food.  Had the ribs they were sparse of meat and way over cooked. Had a couple of other items but sadly the food is not up to par for good barbecue. So if you're just going for the food find another place.
Visited the restaurant on Sunday evening.  We were the only ones in the dining room.  Ordered the Baby-back ribs.  The menu is VERY confusing.  It says 2 sides are included with dinner.  Unfortunately most of the sides have prices next to them.  You want fries with that? Extra charge.  You want onion rings with that?  Extra charge.  This is after paying $17.00 for the plate.  My wife commented the BBQ sauce on her ribs was too spicy.  As we were leaving I suggested to the waitress the sauces should be listed as a selection.  She said they are.  We studied the menu and didn't find anything to that effect.  We won't be back.  They need to offer ALL of the sides with the meal (choice of two) for no additional charge.  Or remove the statement that two are included.  $56.00 with tip for 2 dinners and 1 beer.   
We ordered an order of wings and a sweet potato fries basket. On the menu, it said "wings comes with celery"; no celery. Like other reviewers wrote, they didn't taste good. The waitress didn't come back to check on us. We waited for a while, then had to get her attention to come to our table. We didn't know that we needed to order our beers at the bar on the other side. There was a band playing, abd they did a very good job playing blues. I don't think I'll be back to eat; probably for drinks and to listen to live music, but that's it.... unless they improve. There are other places nearby that are better.  
We visited for dinner on a Saturday evening.  We were seated on the "bar side" of the restaurant, which only has the tall pub tables, we prefer the lower tables due to knee problems.  The server immediately came over for our drink order.  We wanted to try some of their brews and the bartender offered small samples of a couple of their selections so we could decide which we would best enjoy.  This was very  nice of them. 
We decided to try the wings and a bowl of chili.  The wings were good sized and came out  very hot yet still moist.  The chili was delicious and was surrounded by seasoned corn chip.  We took half of our appetizers home.
For dinner we chose the Carolina ribs.  Their claim is big and juicy.  The big is the size of the bone, and juicy...,not really.  I like my ribs to have the meat practically falling off the bone.  These did not.  They were somewhat tough and stringy.  Big disappointment!  The sides we chose were the Cole slaw, mashed dirty potatoes with gravy and onion rings.  The Onion rings were fantastic! Hand cut and lightly battered.  The Cole slaw lacked much flavor and the mashed potatoes were disgusting.  I have no idea what that gravy was, not good!  
Prices were no bargain, all in all not worth returning.
One person was the hostess, the waitress AND the bartender. Brisket was tough, thin and dry. Tables were dirty. Won't be back.
I have been there 4 times in the last 6 months.  Once it wasn't open when they should have been. Another time, they closed early because they weren't busy. The other two times were the same thing. How can you run a restaurant like this??  I sent an email and letter 3 months ago and have received no contact. Guess they don't care. Never, never again. Beware people, beware!!!
I can't say much that hasn't already been said. When Chili Head first opened, the food wasn't bad. It was never great, mind you, but it was at least edible. The ribs were okay, and some of the other options (wings, pulled pork, etc.) were actually pretty good. Man, have they gone downhill.  I worked in North Carolina for a spell, and have tried some of the better BBQ such as Blue Ribbon and Redbones (or even Tennessee BBQ in Braintree). Chili Head does not even come close. Trying to eat the ribs is like trying to eat an overcooked shoe, although the shoe would likely have a more distinct flavor. You can try to add some flavor with one of their signature sauces, although the sauce has the viscosity of pure water, and is all but flavorless itself. Your best bet is to keep on driving until you reach one of the better options, even if that means a bit more travel time... trust me, you'll thank yourself.
Why would I do this to myself again? Tried it once and it was ok. (Ribs and wings). Second time was not so good... Everything dry and overdone. Tried again... Not good. Same results. Place is tired I think. Too many options around to eat uninspired food. Portions were big, but big portions of not-so-good food is really not-so-good. I like the atmosphere and will have a drink or 5 there. I will eat before I go. 
stopped by on a Saturday night, small crowd, four tables at bar.  ordered to go two full st Louis ribs, two mac and cheese, cole slaw, and baked beans sides. ordered a two meat combo of brisket and pull pork with dirty mash with gravy and potato salad. another two meat combo of brisket and sausage with toss salad and onion rings.  the ribs was slightly salty with no bbq sau as stated on menu. the pull pork also was missing sau. thou I am not a sau person the meat needed the sau because it was too dry without it. smoke sausage was ok.  brisket was tender but had a lot of fat. dirty mash came with no gravy even thou we paid extra for it.mac and cheese was a gluey mess. all sides could use some seasoning.  food was warm but not hot when we got home, but we 20 minute away- still could have been hotter than warm. over all, just ok, but not the worst.
In spite of the $9.99 lunch special signs outside -- and the page on the menu (which the bartender pointed out) -- don't count on a bargain. If they're out of "Chili Head lager," they won't substitute, so it's a $9.99 sandwich/chili etc. No bargain there.

I've driven by this place a lot and thought I'd grab a lunch and maybe something to take home. But the fact that the bartender looked at me like I was crazy when I asked if the special was cheaper without the beer or if they could give me another beer. She even said, we have cheaper beers like Bud -- well, if you do, offer one of those.

I walked out. To be honest, I had planned to spend a lot more than $10 so wasn't really looking for a bargain -- but I wasn't looking to get ripped off either. It felt like a classic "bait and switch." Either don't offer the special or substitute the cheap draft with another cheap beer. It's not rocket science, but it sure made me blast off.

And I won't be back.
I have driven by Chili Head thousands of times but never made it in for a meal. My brother-in-law and his friend were speaking very highly of their experience there, so my wife and I finally puled into the parking lot and entered Chili Head.

It was dark and cold and nearly empty for dinner time.

i ordered a cheeseburger tower (three mini-burgers piled up under a roll) while my wife wanted the pulled pork. My burger was okay - nothing to rave about. I have had better ones just a ways down the road. My wife's pulled pork was dry and crusty and pretty much lacking flavor.

We couldn't wait to get out into our warm car and head home!
If you want good tavern food at  a reasonable price this is the place.  Unlike the Charlie Horse the Boston Tavern is about eating with a good beverage and not the gimmicks.  I was there and got one of their burgers.  Juicy, great flavor and plenty to eat on the plate.  The meat was cooked just the way I ordered it.   And I didn't have to get a loan from the bank to enjoy it.  I'll be back.
I used to love the wings at Chilihead several years ago. But they have since gone down hill. I like the flavor of the smoked wings, but the sauces are average, the hot buffalo wings are anything but...I am not sure when they stopped serving the crazy hot Diablo wings, but the current hot wings are bland and I thought slightly under-cooked.
I consider myself to be a "wing aficionado" and I know good wings. Chilihead's wings are average at best.
As our last meal in the area, we wanted ribs and music. Paul has mastered bbq and his home made sauces are the best. The pulled pork sandwich is huge with pork stacked high. 
The entertainment was a nice addition. 
Summary: high priced for low quality. I will say the quality here can be hit or miss.  I've been to this place a number of times and the quality has been good but after my last visit, I will not be going back. My last visit in Dec 2014 was disappointing to say the least.
Let's start with the bar. Beer selection bottles and draft is poor.  They have around 7 or 8 beers on draft. The beers are good but I consider that a poor selection and the prices I thought were ridiculous. $7-$7.50 for a glass of beer I think is ridiculous. I'd expect to pay that much a concert or Gillette but not at a BBQ joint. You want Bud or Bud Light on draft, not going to find it here.
We had the St. Louis ribs, pulled pork and brisket and a couple of other items. Food was lukewarm at best. Rib flavor was just ok and the low temperature was definitely a turn off.  The brisket was cold and watery, I believe the brisket had been dunked in hot water to warm and maybe add some moisture. How can smoked brisket be watery? The pulled pork was not much better; warm and did not taste fresh. The quality of the food, especially the temperature is just not acceptable. The warmest thing was the BBQ sauces which are served in a bucket. They have 5 different sauces but calling it sauce is misleading because these were the wateriest sauces I've ever had. BBQ sauce is supposed to have some thickness to it. Not these! Our overall experience was not good.  Especially reading the recent poor reviews it's disappointing the management has not improved things. Will not be going back.
This is the fourth time we went to Chili Head. What keeps us coming back are the chicken wings (smoky, juicy, delicious), and the catfish bites (always tasty). They also have a good draft selection that changes frequently, so we can try something new.
I'm writing now because, while the food has been delicious, every time we go in there we have one issue or another; this time we had FOUR issues.
1) The fish bites were not bites, it was a full piece of catfish (still tasty, but not what I ordered). 2) My husband asked for ranch dressing with his wings (instead of blue cheese). The dressing was completely forgotten, and then when he received 2 containers of dressing, one was a container of ranch and the other was blue cheese.  3) The wings were supposed to come with a side of carrot and celery sticks. There were 2 celery sticks and no carrots. When asked, the bartender/waitress told us they were out of carrots. A few minutes later, a couple came in and sat next to us at the rail. They received catfish BITES (which they ordered), and it came with a side of carrot sticks. Also, I noticed a fresh-looking carrot stick on the floor under the table of the people sitting behind us. Hmm. 4) The bill had to be corrected twice (once for an order entered wrong; I noticed this before the food came out), and again because they tries to charge $8.99 for a SIDE OF FRIES. They fries are good, but not THAT good. She took them off the bill.
The waitress/bartender told us it was her first day working alone (not as an excuse); the visit was getting a bit strained due to the multiple issues, but she handled it well and things were left on a good note.
I really don't know if we will go back; even the good food may not be enough to overcome the inconsistencies.
Side note- the restroom was clean (and it has been at every one of our four visits).
We recently had Paul and his amazing staff cater our daughter's engagement party.  We decided on an upscale barbecue-- and with Paul's expertise the party was beyond our expectations. The food was excellent.  From the passed horsdoeuvres to the mango chicken/pulled pork/ribs, the food was loved by all.  We selected Apple cobbler for dessert!  I cannot rave enough about the food, service and attention Chilli Head paid to our event.
We walked in coming home from a day in Boston.  We should have stayed in Boston for dinner rather then come here.  I ordered a "Beefeater Martini" from our waitress "Katie".  She writes it down an then asks what kind of liquor I want in it.  REALLY?? What kind of liquor do I want in a Beefeater Martini?  Hmmm...  Ok, so not everyone is familiar with Gin I guess (even though she is in the Bar area).  I explain that Beefeater is a brand of Gin that I would like my martini made of.  

We are sitting right near the bar, and I can hear a commotion between the Bobby the bartender, the waitress and a few other staff members.  Then I see him begin to make the martini with Bombay Saphire (which I do NOT like).  So before he gets to far, I call over to him, "If that's for me, I asked for Beefeater".  His reply?  I don't have Beefeater.  My point?  If a customer calls a liquor, it's not up to the bartender to make his own substitution.  You tell the customer and let him decide.  Might not sound like a big deal, but it shows lack of respect for the customer.

The meals came.  1  Burrito and 1 Pulled pork sandwich.  Dry and uninspired.  For a place that calls itself a BBQ, there was no BBQ sauce offered, and after the fiasco trying to get my cocktail, I wasn't about to ask.

We watched the female bartender drinking beer on shift right in the open, taking personal phone calls behind the bar, a waitstaff falling over their 'favorite' customers and pretty much not caring about the rest. .

Here's the best.  When we tried to pay the check, Katie takes our credit card and goes to settle the check in their computer. After a few minutes she comes back with the credit card and bill which has not been processed to tell us she wants to give another table their beer.  Walks off and returns after a few more minutes - now she was ready to cash us out.  Nice to know that we were at the bottom of her priority list.  She and Chili Head won't have to worry about our business interfering with their socializing any more.

We will not be back until or unless the service in this place goes back to the level of quality that it had about a year ago.  Not sure what happened to the staff that cared about their customers
First the chicken wings: i have never eating such tasty wings!  It was a Caribbean dry rub and the flavor went through and through!  You will need a tall glass of water to wash this stuff down.  Our order on the ribs was the combo of Spare Ribs and Carolina Ribs.  Talk about portions... we got a half rack of each type.  We ate about 2 ribs each before we were stuffed.  More like Brontasurus ribs!  Humungus and pretty much all meat!!  Very tasty... We took home the rest and froze them into two dinners.  I don't think two people could devour this rib combo.
And yes.. the taste... dry rub again with four types of sauces to "slather" them with.  I'll have another glass of water please or better one of those mugs of beer to wash it down.  Paul the owner drops by to say hello to everyone... very nice.  Only negative here is that a few "wash 'n Dry" wet naps don't cut it.  I need a big wet hot towel.  We will be back and soon!!
Always good food and great coffee, the service is the best around. The menu is typical fair for a "dount" shop. They have sandwiches too, which makes it a great spot for a quick lunch. When I'm on the road I always look for a Honey Dew shop!...beats Dunk's every time!
We always stop for coffee when going by and occasionally have a Breakfast Sandwich or donut. It's convenient and always great!
I usually get there at 4a.m. the overnight crew is always happy and helpful andnever irritated by my sandwich order. I love the croissant sandwiches. I think they have the best croissants around. I sometimes get extras just to make lunch sandwiches or for pasta night bread. Easy in and out with the drive through setup. Never mess up the order. That is what I expect and get!
We stopped in for slices of pizza. The pizza is good and they give you good size slices. The people here are friendly and helpful.
eggplant pizza and fried clams were a great choice! nice clean eating area too! Me and my family have been going here for a few years and will be going again!
Passing by and stopped here to look for a few cheese slices before my son's practice. They had a few slices already warm and put them in a box to go. 

I thought I was going to eat them but no - my son did. Well he left me about a third of a slice. I will have to stop by here on the way home. 

Great pizza - worth the stop. 

Right off of Route 24 and directly on Route 106. 
Bloom's Pizza is just as I remember pizza being when I was a kid.  I recently moved to the Bridgewaters from out of state.  I grow up as a kid just North of Boston. Since I've moved back I had a hard time finding a Pizza place that did'nt go out of business after the first year.  Blooms has been there year after year that I've been here and i hope it stays and flourishes.  plus I love free so I always get the buy three get one free.
Nice family run place. I love the subs, Italian is my favorite. My daughter loves the pizza. We always get to go, not much room or atmosphere to eat in. A great place for a quick sandwich. 
The food at Bloom's is always tasty and the people that work there are always helpful and friendly!
Great Pizza
This restaurant began is a takeout place in the town and was fantastic. Ever since they upgraded to this new area and larger restaurant I don't feel like they got the cleanliness peace.    I was sitting at the bar last weekend and was inundated with fruit flies. Also the floors and bathrooms leave me concerned at what the kitchen they look like. 

 The food is OK but I definitely don't think it's the best pizza around the area. 
Restaurant atmosphere was casual and pleasant.  Waitress was pleasant, but not always available.  I could not locate her when trying to order a drink. While  my Reuben and fries and my wife's dinner salad were of good size, neither were memorable. In a convenient location with an extensive menu, I will try Grand Slam again soon.
excellent place for drinks and dinner.  Salads pizza, sandwiches  and meals are all excellent.  We go at least once a week.
I've been to this pub at its new location on South Main Street a few times and have enjoyed it every time. The food is fresh and you get plenty of it. The chicken parm is delicious but so was everything else that we have tried there. The prices are very affordable and the service is the wonderful. 
This place never disappoints. Always good service and cheap eats. Quality does not take a back seat to portion size which are pretty generous. I love Grand Slam!!!
I find it hardtop review sometimes. Is this a four star restaurant? No. But it is all of four stars for a grill/sports pub style place. There is a dining room if you don't want the bar atmosphere and there is more on the menu than pub food...this is the new place near the old driving range...not the sub shop. I frequented the sub shop and had a feeling they would do well with a full service place. And they did. Service was very good, food was very good, atmosphere is welcoming...nice job.
I go here often and it has never been bad. I always order the Greek salad with grilled chicken and it is awesome! Great serving sizes and they make the food quickly. 
After giving up on even getting noticed at the ribs place next door - horrible service - went here and had a delicious, fresh, amazing chicken with pesto panini.  Sat at the outdoor tables and ate off of real plates!  We'll be back.  Good fresh food at great prices.
Nice wine selection, dark, moody, music. Not a lot of seating, go early, nice staff great owner/bartender.... will definitely go back!
I have driven by Epicure thousands of times but never stopped in. Well, that streak is over with a stop on Saturday evening!

Epicure is a small and intimate jazz club. The dark atmosphere helped to enhance my dining/listening experience. We did order a couple of appetizers - a cheese and meat plate and stuffed mushrooms. The mushrooms could have been a meal on their own. Congrats to the chef as these were a true epicurean delight.

The jazz band was just setting up as we were leaving. I will return for those stuffed mushrooms and the music of the night.
People told me the food was amazing and they were right!  Everything I had was  excellent and a fantastic value.

Unmatched wine the list for the area. Great selection for the experience to wine drinker or that person interested in trying a few new unique lines.
The evening I visited Epicure there was a traditional jazz quartet playing standards. Quite pleasant, and a real exception to what one can usually find in the Bridgewaters. Nice wine and beer selection and uninspired, but nicely done, small plates. I had turkey meatballs in sauce with a couple of slices of toasted Italian bread. It was tasty with a red Zinfandel. Epicure is definitely worth your time, but save me a seat because it's pretty cozy.
Epicure Jazz and Wine Bar brings much needed elegance to an area which is devoid of any class and littered with franchise restaurant with tacky neon lights, terrible acoustics, and obnoxious TV screens. Don’t be surprised if you are greeted by the owners and their family members themselves who are warm, creative, and attentive and who will greet you with that familiar tone remiss in today’s chain restaurant atmosphere.  This is a new restaurant and the husband and wife team  have taken great pains in carefully and tastefully selecting everything from the achromatic color scheme of the décor, the symmetrically placed jazz- themed prints reminisce of an old era, the undulating light of candles against stark, black walls and even the geometrically austere plates and strikingly enticing modern dishes.  The lighting is transformative and the sound of music inductive to conversation. The musicians really “get” this place, so their sets harken back to a different era, yet, at times, their tunes are infused with whimsy. The simplicity of drink offering and tapas does keep this place sacred to those with a more refined palate and temperament to the extent that any patron can be at ease and comfortable dining solo. 
Great ambiance, music, drinks and tapas! Put on your nice shoes and check out this gem for yourself.
Love this place!!!
Owned and being run by the sweetest couple you could ever meet, Toni and Mike! You can't beat the atmosphere.... Live jazz every night we've been in so far! The beer and wine list has something for everyone. The food menu has a variety of DELICIOUS CHOICES! We left here more than satisfied every time!
Went here last night with a large group of friends. The atmosphere is nice. It is dark but your eyes adjust. This place is very small, so if you want a table, get there early. We had to get there before 7 to get their one large table. The jazz music was very nice and was a perfect volume, not too loud. You can still have conversation. The food are small appetizer plates and very expensive ($14 for a small cheese plate) For a wine bar, there wasn't a huge selection of wine. And that too was pretty pricey for the area. We had two birthdays in our group, so I asked if they had a dessert they could bring over. They had the musicians play happy birthday which was a nice touch. But, later, I saw we were charged $7 for each piece of cake. ( Again, I thought that was a bit much) Overall, I thought this would be a great date night place to go. But a bit pricey for the area. 
Epicure is a unique wine bar offering live jazz music most evenings. Easily accessible, this little gem is a unique experience for the Bridgewaters. With nothing else like it around, Epicure proved to be a refreshing break from the normal bar scene. Intimate, with a swanky Speak Easy feel, this place does not disappoint. The owners are the operators so whether it is greeting you, pouring you a drink, or cooking or serving your food they have a vested interest in pleasing their customers – and it shows! There is no need to be intimidated by their expansive wine list, Epicure is welcoming and approachable. If you aren’t sure about something just ask! They will gladly offer you tastes of the wine before you decide. In addition, they also offer a selection of draft beer with mostly local offerings.
We went on a Friday night and were the first ones in the door. We had our choice between the couches that line one corner of the room, the tables near where the music is played, or at the bar. We chose bar seats (ladies, they have hooks for your purse!) and it encouraged easy conversation with other patrons as well as the bartender/owner. We enjoyed the live music but left before the crowd came in. We understand that they were so crowded the weekend before they were adding some high top tables to accommodate the standing room only crowd!
We ended up noshing on the turkey meatballs, cheese plate, and crab cakes (big hit!) and were pleased with all of them. Capped off with a crème brulee cheesecake dessert we will surely be back. Epicure is only about a month old but well-run with attentive staff and a solid concept and menu. I look forward to watching them grow. This place should not be missed!
I went to check check out epicure this weekend and was pleasantly surprised to find such a one-of-a-kind establishment outside of the city. 

Everything from the decor to the live music was outstanding. I ordered the crabcake and the bruschetta and found both to be very delicious and fresh. 

I would highly recommend epicure to anyone  who is looking for an establishment that is out of the norm.
This epicure lounge is the perfect place to enjoy excellent wine and live music.  Happened in last Saturday night on my way home from dinner and was blown away.  Looks like a city hot spot. We didn't want to leave after we settled in on the couch with a drink in hand.

Local beers on draft, after dinner drinks, not noisy, great personable a service.  No other place like.

If you are in the area and you don't check out epicure, you'd be missing out.
This small lounge is a fantastic hidden gem outside of the city.  It just opened and features live Jazz every night in an intimate setting.

Exception specialty wine list reasonably priced and local craft brews on tap.  Small plates, Cheeses, desserts, cappuccinos and espressos.  Great staff and service.  Really tastefully done.

Worth the trip!  You won't believe your outside the city.
Finally got around to trying Niko, and i wasn't disappointed.
Located on an intersection on Rt28 we found parking no problem, although i didn't think it would to be too busy on Tuesday, but i was pleasantly surprised, it was indeed quite busy, good sign.
Hostess was friendly and seated us right away.
Our server was also very good, attentive and always there when you needed her.
We started with the grape leaves, delicious ground meat with rice wrapped tight in tasty leaves. Warm bread rolls complemented the app perfectly.
For main i went with the Gyro, its prepared a little different here.....the meat was braised lamb, and it was delicious, wrapped in a fresh pita with crisp onion, lettuce and cucumber tzatziki sauce, yum.
Also had the chicken kabob served on a bed of Spanish style tomato rice and side Greek side salad, chicken was grilled to perfection and the rice was outstanding and the Greek side salad delicious.
Place was clean and a good selection at the bar will ensure we will be back to try more items (i'm eyeballing the lamb shank for next time!)
Today had Greek salad , Buffalo chicken Pizza. The salad was delicious and huge. The Pizza came out piping hot and crispy crust and tasted great.
The food was absolutely delicious - very authentic- the owner was very gracious, charming and friendly- the NUMBER ONE BUSBOY is the absolute best employee and gives the best HUGS!! (of course I've known him for years)   Everyone who enjoys great Greek food should try Niko's.   We have been a few times and will continue to come back!!  Great Job Peter!!!
Stooped in to try out the food since the owner use to work at Christos in Brockton for a long time before it closed. I thought somehow the food might be similar. Well, it isnt. It's not bad..but for it a Greek restaurant, they make the worst stuffed grape leaves I have ever eaten. I make better grape leaves. They use ground beef instead of lamb which I think makes them dry as can be. They looked like little dried up cigars and tasted just as bad. Not to mention they were expensive. The pizza isn't bad. Prices are not cheap. I am hoping to give them a second chance in hopes they were having an off day.
This restaurant food is good but it's not the best Greek food that I've ever had. 

 The restaurant is set up kind of strange. There is an elevated bar area segregated from the dining room which is on the lower level. There's also another area that segregated from both.  There's two main entrances and only one of them has a hostess station, it's very strange and confusing. I'm not sure if that's the original design?

I think most of the hype  comes from the many regulars that hang out in this restaurant.
We decided to try something new.  This is a small restaurant, formerly called Vito's.  The staff was really nice.  The wine and menu selection was very good.   The food was Awesome !!
This place has their stuff together, and we will be back !!

We're always searching for restaurants that specialize in Greek dishes, so had to try Niko after it was recommended. Decided on the Lamb Shank and Baked,Braised Lamb Greek Style. Both dishes were flavorful, tender, and delicious. Looking forward to trying some of their other Greek specialties. The owner is very personable..he visited every table, greeting customers. It was obvious that many were repeat diners. The Baklava was also delicious, two pieces for $4.99. Generous portions and moderate prices.
the food is excellent.  all of the food both deserts and main courses are made from scratch.  the lamb is delicious.  the gyros are very good.  it is a friendly clean neighborhood place
My wife and I dined at Niko Bar and Grill Saturday evening for the first time.  We were seated immediately.  The waitress was friendly and attentive.  The atmosphere casual and pleasant,  After drinks, we opted for wrap sandwiches.  I enjoyed a Gyro that was good, with a nice side of onion strings.  My wife enjoyed a Mediterranean Wrap with Greek-style green beans as her side.  The menu offered dinnervery moderate pricess, wraps, burgers and pizza.  We will most certainly return to try more interesting menu choices at very moderate prices.
Everything about this place is terrific.  The atmosphere, food, service... even the restroom.  The food is incredibly fresh and delicious!!!  Prices are very reasonable too.
We finally got a chance to go out for dinner to try Niko's. This good food . We had hummus and tabouli which was great like homemade. Spinach and artichoke dip was delicious . My parents had the lamb and said it was great. I don't like lamb so I could not try it to tell, but my husband likes and said it was good. My oldest had a burger and he did not care for it. I had the Mediterranean chicken which was delicious . The Greek salad was good. My husband had steak tips that were tasty. The great thing about the restaurant is the service. The service was fabulous. The waitress was at the table at all the right moments. Overall a great day. 
My husband and I would go to Christos when we were in the Brockton area so when it closed we decided to follow the bartenders from there to their new restaurant that they opened close by. They have done a wonderful job with the menu, carrying on the Greek traditions. It is a small place with a small parking lot but it is worth the wait to eat there. I had  very simple meal of lamb meatballs over angel hair pasta with butter and it was amazing!!!  We went back again and I knew I had to have the same meal again. They also have the same delicious Greek salads, Greek lamb, and others delicious meals. Peter and Steve are there to welcome you and make you feel right at home. I only wish we lived closer so we could go more often.
Went to this restaurant after hearing about it from a friend. I ordered the stuffed grape leaves and my husband ordered the lamb with rice. We were a bit disappointed as the  lamb was sort of bland and the grape leaves were tough and lacked flavor. The prices were high considering the atmosphere and the quality of the food.
Niko's has a casual atmosphere with a nice bar and separate dining area. The service was just right. The food was excellent authentic Greek food. The owner makes everyone feel welcome. We will be back.

We went today for a family function, we had an absolutely wonderful time.  Staff was attentive, friendly and food was terrific!  Parking was fine, small private lot, nice area.
Had been looking forward to trying this new restaurant as it was highly recommended!  Met a friend there for dinner and was not disappointed.   Had the baked Greek lamb and it was very flavorful.  The waitstaff was friendly and the place was clean and bright.  By the time we left, it was full of diners.  My friend had the garden pizza and loved it.  
Will definitely go back and try something new.  There was an extensive menu with lots of appetizing entrees.  The owner (who used to work at another local greek restaurant, Christos) stopped by the table to make sure all was  OK.  
Overall, great experience.
I have now visited Niko's 6-7 times and each time I walk away saying this might be the crown jewel of the South Shore.  The menu is extensive and the food quality is excellent.  This restaurant reminds me of something you would find in downtown Boston.  The atmosphere is original and inspiring.  All the staff are experienced and friendly.  My favorite choice on the menu is the Greek style Haddock...delicious.
We had heard about this place, and it was highly recommended by a family member.  So we decided to try it - and we will return!  The food is excellent with great portions and a friendly staff.  We started with the Megalopoli Platter that had generous portions of grilled Lokaniko (Greek Sausage), warm Grape Leaves (delicious with more meat and not a lot of rice), fantastic Spanakopita, outstanding Shrimp Pireas (large shrimp - cooked to perfection), wonderful home made hummas and tabouleh and fantastic tzatziki with warm pita.  We could have eaten the entire plate - but had to stop since we had also ordered The Christo - Lamb Burgers that were HUGE, delicious and juicy and cooked rare - just the way they should be.  Extremely flavorful, with slices of feta, cucumber, tomato, lettuce and some tzatziki on the buns.  It was fantastic - the onion strings were also good, but we were too full to do them justice.  We wish the owners much success and will return again and again!
Went here on a recommendation of a co-worker. Was not impressed with the hostess that sat us or the food that was served. The waitperson was very good and made our visit more pleasant than it actually was. The owner was walking around to people he knew and never asked us how everything was. Food took along time to be served and the Lamb was very,very,very, tough. Not impressed with this new restaurant.
Very busy when it opened with all anticipating a Christo's clone. Folks are very friendly, appreciate your business and do a good job, a little more than good actually. Nice to have more options in town and there is certainly nothing wrong with this one...but I'm still partial to Freda's
Nice and fresh food, BUT check your order as it may not be what you ordered. I asked for a sausage egg and cheese McMuffin with the folded egg and got a bacon egg and cheese with a round egg. They took it back and made the correction. The other 4 days all went really well
Asack's is a local favorite that competes with several other ice cream stops within a ten mile radius. The counter window people are always pleasant and the prices are fair. for the ice cream lover you can choose from the dozens of flavors or the soft serve.

The medium serving was more than enough to quench my ice cream craving!
We get ice cream here often it is good great service good value. The hidden treasure is the sandwich shop side. The turkey pockets are great.The turkey tips on a salad are awesome! My only issue is that the sandwich shop side closes at 5 on the weekends closes at 7Pm during the week which is ok
The best turkey pocket you will find is sold here. Service is always great and the quality of the food is always consistent. This is also a great place to grab an ice cream cone in the Summer. They recently added paninis and they are also delicous. Check it out. 
We've gone by this place at least three times a week for the past two years but never stopped. Finally, we pulled in one hot summer day for an ice cream. Surprise! They serve Richardson's ice cream, which is one of our ice cream stand faves. They also have soft serve in a variety of flavors, but the hard stuff is the way to go in my humble opinion. The scoops are bigger than your head. Well, almost. But they are huge! You can sit at the picnic tables outside and watch the driving range action.Or watch traffic roar by instead. But you didn't come here for the view, now did ya?
Turkey pocket stuffed with fresh turkey (they raise their own) stuffing (they make this also) cranberry sauce and mayo. Yummy, I may have to go out and get one today.
Turkey pockets are the best.
Real sliced turkey at deli meat prices.
Great turkey meatloaf 
Awsome service and nice family.
Asack's Turkey Farm delivers the best and freshest turkey products. You can walk out with a turkey pocket, turkey pot pie or turkey hot dogs. My favorite is the Turkey Pocket!
Dropped in for a few drinks and something to eat... food was darn good...choice of pizza  which is small , but they will make one that you like , and a 9in crispy pizza is awesome...had a few appetizers which were better then some other places....plan on going back to try dinner...place can get busy at times mostly mixed crowd...
I went for breakfast here with my brother-in-law and his dad (98 yrs) and mom (93 yrs) prior to going to the race track for simulcast racing. Anyway, the place was crowded but no one seemed upset. We had little to no wait to get seated. The menu offered great varieties of breakfast specials along with other breakfast items. The quantity and quality of the food was excellent. The waitress was a little slow probably because of how busy the place was. She forgot a few items but it didn't impact anything. 
I recommend this restaurant.
The food was great but there is no changing table for the baby in either restroom which made it very difficult. Also they have no booth seating so that was not an option.
Breakfast is good as is the service. Can get busy on the weekend so be prepared for a short wait. It will be worth it. The usual menu selections.
Not memorable, but was average in waitstaff and food. Not too good. Not too bad. Would go back if I were in the area.
Great menu with lots to pick from. Great combos. Food is great.  Plenty of seating. Clean and good waitstaff. They are also opened for lunch.
Went up to Massachusetts to visit family. A few of us met for breakfast at this Restaurant and was so happy we did. The first time I have been there and there 
was construction out on the main street. Their power went out, they were so nice.
They  kept us happy and when the power came back on (was not out that long) 
we ordered and the waitress was wonderful. She handled everything so nicely and the food was great. Price was great and the chef even came out to see how everything was. there were 8 of us and a baby. I would highly recommend this
Restaurant to everyone. We were all happy with the food which was eggs,pancakes,home fries,bacon, sausages . You name it we ordered it.
Our go to place when in the area. Always great. Food is cooked the way it was ordered. The place is packed on a Sunday morning and still received great food and service. Tried the sweet bread French toast for the first time, it was perfect!
Had breakfast before returning to CT. We've been here many times and the breakfasts are always tasty and fresh. Get here by 9 AM on Sundays otherwise you'll have to wait because the place fills up quickly~
Originally this restaurant was named Anderson's.  It has been sold to a new owner and re-named Sunnyside, but it still delivers the best breakfast in the Bridgewaters.  It is all standard breakfast fare, but it is done right.  One item they do have which is not typical for New England is grits, so if you have a craving for a Southern Style breakfast, Sunnyside can help you out.
Sunnyside is one of those places where you feel at home! The decor is folksy. The breakfast food is excellent! Several times some of my colleagues have mentioned going out for breakfast - Sunnyside is where we always end up.

Staff is extremely friendly. Value-wise, you really can't beat it.

I would, not make that, I have gone back and will continue to do so!
Sunnyside Cafe has great food and amazing service! Ariel is the server we always look forward to seeing!  The omelets are awesome and the home-fries are always good! We eat there once a week, sometimes more, and we've never been disappointed. It gets busy on Saturday and Sunday mornings, so get there early!!
Home cooking, great service, reasonable pricing; what more could you ask? Always a good value, as well.
We have been going to the Sunnyside for a couple of years, nearly on a weekly basis. Great local spot that serves breakfast and lunch. We have only ever had breakfast. Food is always good the staff is very friendly and welcoming. Great early AM specials board that is really inexpensive.
Honey Dew donuts has a huge following, The coffee is fabulous as are the donuts.
Enjoy your visit and be sure to get a dozen to go.
I seldom complain about restaurants. They all will have a bad day but this was a combination plate and everything was bad.
I live near Maui and have gone there at least 50 times a year. The food has become inedible! I ordered General Gau's chicken, fried rice and boneless spare ribs. You couldn't cut into the chicken or the boneless spare ribs. The pork in the rice tasted old. One of the worse meals. Nothing could be eaten.
Reading through the reviews who are these people who rate this restuaraunt 4 and 5 stars?  Its hard not to feel bad for townies. There is this whole world out there of adventure and experiences to be had and instead they spend their time and money at dive bars 5 minutes from their home. A dive bar is exactly what Maui is. Sure if i was hungry i would eat here at midnigght but given a choice and assuming you have a car there is no good reason to eat here. the food is boring and generic. The wait staff is sub par. The drinks are over priced and watered down. The worst part is my late night dinner with crappy food still costed me around 60 bucks. Do yourself a favor go somewhere else.
Always get some good Chinese dishes. I've been coming here for over 20 years when I'm in town. The place is being remodeled; it needs it. Let's see when it's done. 

Food was good but building was gross. Place needs help or a full rehab. Restrooms were disgusting. Half the building was closed because the roof colapsed.
This Chinese restaurant is dated lighting and décor dingy but the menu is there own and u can order items like beef nuggets at the bar or their sticky garlic wings(Saugus wings) that are very good
We made a special trip from Middleboro, to at at the Maui in Brockton today. We shopped at K-mart, then ended up there for lunch. We had a new waitress. We've been customers at Maui since 1990, and have never had a waitress give us a hassle substituting one item for another. Sure, maybe there was an addt'l charge, but not just a plain refusal. When I ordered from the luncheon menu I asked to substitute subgum pork chow mein for chicken chow mein. An easy enough switch. The waitress asked the acting Manager and He refused. I went over to the counter where He sat, doing nothing, and asked Him what the problem was. He refused to budge. I even told Him I could get the same Chinese food at Yangtze China Garden just down Rt 18 from His store. He still would not budge. Then I said, "You realize what I'm going to do, right?" to which He replied, "No." Then I said, "I'm going to give you a bad review on Tripadvisor for your bad service." He said, "I don't care, do whatever you have to do." I ordered my meal as I was forced to by this gentleman. Paid $3.00 more. Tipped the waitress, who was guiltless, and here is the bad review. The Management and place stinks in my opinion.
We always get plenty to eat at the Maui, but the owner is cheap, and the exterior of the building looks run down. In addition it is painted Red, and Red paint fades the worst, so if you don't repaint every so often, you end up with a pink building, ergo the Maui right about now.
He has one little waitress who has been in his employ since creation started, and she does great, but she has to work both sides of that great big building many times, and you can't get her attention, and she is the "only " waitress, because he is so cheap. Yeah, he could loosen up his purse strings, get the place actually noticed, and then he'd have the $$$ to hire a coupla waitresses. Food still is delicious.
If you're looking for the best "American" Chinese food in the south shore, then look no further.  Maui, a long standing staple in the Brockton and surrounding area has been consistent for decades and never disappoints.  This restaurant doesn't try to be a high-end fancy Asian place, they know who they are and they are good at what they do.  No frills American Chinese food. 
The Maui food is very good,their lunch menu is very cheap,always get the #7 spare ribs,pork fried rice and chicken fingers,good size restaurant have brought some of our friend here and they simply love the food.
We had a great experience with the food! Chicken teriyaki is now my favorite. Generous pieces and marinated very well. Rice was really good. We got both shrimp fried and veggie fried rice. Cooking oils were clean everything tasted fresh. Called the order in and it was ready one minute after I got there. 1st time in years that there was no leftovers! Large order and you can see where they check everything off when they put it in the bag. Chicken fingers, crab Rangoon all perfect and tender. We got calls the next days asking again where we got it and how good it was. Take out counter very friendly.
Good Food and good service.  One of a few very good chiness food restaurants
"The Maui" used to be a landmark around here. People would meet "at the Maui" and the food was to die for. Nicks Comedy Stop was there. I have a few great memories of the acts and many more of incredible food.  BUT... now the food has gone down hill.  Honestly it stops me from going to any shows there because I know the food is now so bad. I spent $50 there a few months ago and it was terrible! We could not eat a single thing, never mind even judging the taste. There wasn't any. The food was obviously frozen or something and the chef that was there before has to be gone. 
 What is it lately with Chinese food? All the greats are now awful. Is there a shortage of chefs? I am scared to go back again and try it one more time, although I feel like I owe them that from always being great years ago.  I just do not want to get bad food again.
I just finished eating takeout. I haven't eaten here in years and always dined in. The food used to be pretty good. My boneless ribs were like rubber and the lo mein was dry and tasteless. Everything seemed overcooked except the chicken fingers which weren't bad. You do get what you pay for in this instance because the price was relatively low in comparison. Though there are better choices to be had in Brockton.
They have karaoke on friday nights and the entertainment is hysterical!!!!!!!!! it is one of the funniest things you may ever see! go tonight :)
Everything we had was wonderful, and the service friendly and attentive. I highly recommend the fish cakes!
Great food with attentive staff and wonderful chef creations. Open to the public as well as guests. Casual beginning to your day.
Every entree was beautifully presented. We ate here two mornings in a row, and were not disappointed. A step above your standard breakfast fare.
Ate twice and had the great grilled daily muffin each day with the spectacular oatmeal. Many of the tables offer a view of Bass Rocks. Really good quality food.
This is one of my favorite places to eat breakfast. Everything is made on premises and everything is delicious! My mother is a huge fan of the oatmeal with the fruit toppings and a fresh fruit muffin. My aunt loves the eggs. My husband loves the omelettes. I am a fan of the pumpkin pancakes (in season) and the french toast!
This is a gem! If you are in the area you have to come here and have breakfast. Great for bigger groups as well. Delicious and we will definetely be back. 
They have menu for Gluten Free individuals.  The breads and English muffins were wonderful.  Even gave me the brand name for me to purchase on line.
Went to The Cafe and had a fantastic bacon & cheese omelet.  Muffins and stuffed french toast looked so yummy.  Relaxed and comfortable atmosphere.  Very friendly and knowledgeable staff.  The view of the ocean and the Twin Lighthouses is spectacular.   
Sort of ordinary breakfast in a spectacular setting.  Overlooks the ocean and twin lighthouses. Reasonably priced.  Good service.  Tasty food.
Great little spot for breakfast to enjoy the gorgeous view of the ocean.  We would definitely come back again when traveling to the Gloucester area.
We had breakfast here every morning. My daughter loved the cinnamon raisin toast, and every meal was perfect. No need for lunch when you have a great home cooked breakfast like this every day. I loved the Atlantis sandwich, egg, spinach, tomato and cheese on an English muffin.
Delicious breakfast, beautiful view,friendly and accommodating servers. Home-made muffins big enough to share.
I've been here a few times now and it's still all good. This past weekend I tried the Rustic Breakfast - a somewhat Italian take on eggs benedict with foccacia bread, caramelized onions, eggs any way you want them, bacon, tomatoes, cheese, and hollandaise. The hollandaise was a bit on the greasy side but otherwise, delicious.
We almost passed by this unprepossessing cafe inside Atlantis Cafe as just boring "hotel food". Boy, were we wrong! Their food is innovative, creative, fresh, fantastic and served with an oceanview from almost every table. This place is obviously someone's love project, as there is just no other reason for a from scratch restaurant to be located out in this little motel off the beaten path. The service is friendly, warm and fast. They seemed to handle big parties easily so it is the perfect place for that post wedding family brunch. There was so much lobster in the lobster bennie...sigh. They bake from scratch; the pecan rolls are mountainous. Try the fishcakes, just go there. Notice: it closes down at 11:30 am and the Sunday crowd was pouring in by 8 am.
great place for breakfast-   right on the ocean.  excellent food and lots of choices.   The service was great and it was so nice to eat and look out at the ocean.   We have eaten here for breakfast the last three years we have been in Gloucester.
We stayed at The Atlantis Oceanfront Inn and decided to have breakfast at the hotel café. What a great decision. The service was efficient and friendly, the food was delicious(the homemade muffin: exceptional) and the views awesome. The café is spotlessly clean just like the hotel. We sat right at the window overlooking the Atlantic ocean. I highly recommend having breakfast here.
My wife and I had breakfast here one morning.  We had completely different experiences with the food.  The staff was friendly and quick.  My wife had poached eggs, home fries and toast.  I had scrambled eggs, bacon and sausage.  My wife said the home fries were undercooked and the poached eggs were among the very best she's ever had.  My scrambled eggs were rubbery and the sausage was cold and tasteless.  When we left the restaurant, my wife said she would go back and I didn't see the need to.  I've seen other reviews and this one morning was a slow morning, so this experience may not represent the norm.
Whilst the Cafe at the Atlantis is a bit more expensive than most other places for breakfast in town, it's well worth it.  The view of the Back Shore of Gloucester is unsurpassed and the food is delicious as well. The oatmeal/molasses bread is so good that we ordered an extra side of it. The Backshore Omelet, with beautiful skinny asparagus, portabellas, and tomatoes [the tomatoes could have been riper but added juicy texture nonetheless] and swiss cheese was perfectly cooked and scrumptious. We were seated at a side window but the view of the ocean was good overlooking the hotel's pool. The view from the front windows is spectacular.
The restaurant is larger than I thought it would be and the tables have comfortable space between them. The service was very good.  
Highly recommended!
Had breakfast while staying at the Atlantis.  Great view, good food.  Wait staff was great.  Nice selections for breakfast at reasonable prices.
Delicious french toast!  Nice selection of entrees, fresh baked muffins, comfortable seating, attentive staff.  
Traveling in an RV from California. Stopped by for a beer. What a view from the clubhouse. Menu looks great too?
My wife and I attended a wedding on Saturday, 6/11/2016 at the Elks Lodge #892 in Gloucester, MA. A very nice place, overlooking the Atlantic Ocean with the twin lights of Thatcher Island in the distance. This venue was not what one may expect if going to an Elks lodge. Everyone seemed to have a wonderful time at a very special facility. The event planner was very considerate and made the bride & groom very happy. Food must be catered with an outside food service provider. I think the wedding party used one of the Elks recommended caterers. A top notch evening!
It was a beautiful venue to celebrate our 50th High School Reunion, but the Elks is not open for the public as a restaurant.  We had private caterers.   That night, the Elks also had an event upstairs which meant many people attending our reunion had to park up and down the street, despite the fact the Elks has a large parking lot.  But it was was worth it.  It is a beautiful place to hold a function.
My brother and new sister in law got married on August 1st at the Elks at Bass Rocks, what an gorgeous venue. Everything about the venue was amazing, the view, the staff, the food....everything! One of the best venues I've ever been to for a wedding! 
Have your event here. Period. You will be treated like royalty while looking out at the Atlantic Ocean. Won't be the best kept secret on the north sore for long....2 hotels right next door.
If you are an elks member anywhere you need to stop in here for the food and view. Both are great each day they have a special but everything on the menu is wonderful 
We stopped at the Last Stop and OMG, the owners are the nicest and most genuine people around!  The store has a wonderful mix of practical, fun, and delicious goodies. 

We had the coffee cake, the lemon cake, tuna roll, a latte, and who can forget the GIANT peanut butter chocolate chip cookie!  

I highly recommend this stop for a slice of what is good in America!  
I go here every other day all summer. Fresh sandwiches and drinks for the beach. Owner Samdy is a doll! Closes in the Fall. Situated at the entrance to the Rocky Neck art colony
The fresh made every day muffins are worth the stop! They are very large enuf for 2 ppl and many varieties, I brought some home with me they were that good!
My Grandmother lived across the street since the 70's and I spent a lot of time there over the years. The current and former owners have made The Last Stop a real gem. Always some homemade offerings.
I stopped here every morning while visiting Rocky Neck.

The muffins and coffee are to die for.  Such a lovely little spot!  
Walked down here with a local friend of mine to grab some wicked good "bacon wraps". First of all they are HUGE, worth EVERY penny, and full of good stuff including 4-5 fat strips of real bacon. We also got a side of the red potato salad that was also to die for. Very yummy, and very quick food at a reasonable price. Nice location as well!
Reasonable fare and they'll make a sandwich "your way". If they ask you if you want "hots" that means red pepper flakes. They are not trying to hit on you!
Terrific sandwiches and iced coffee. The chocolate bread is too good. Try the gluten-free macaroons. 
This is a small general store type place, with limited food options, but the service was very friendly, and they accommodated our lunch requests even if it deviated from the listed menu items. I got the impression they were truly interested in providing the customer what they wanted.
Just at the entrance to Rocky Neck, you will find this little convenience store and little deli.

Their eats are terrific!  I had the chicken salad roll.  Almonds and grapes in there...delish.  Grab a sandwich or soup and head around the corner to the Neck (or Niles Beach) to picnic.  :)
Happened upon this little place while walking towards the downtown area from our overnight stay at the Madfish Grill dock several weekends ago. I had the blueberry muffin and my girlfriend an egg/bacon english with cheese. Both were very good and my blueberry muffin seemed like it had a full pint of blueberrys in it! The muffin was also on the xtra large size so I didn't walk away hungry. We both had coffee and sat outside at one of the 2 small tables to watch Gloucester wake up as we had our breakfast. Prices were good for what we got and the other pasteries and breakfast items also looked yummy. I was told by a patron who sat with us that everything is made fresh by the proprieter daily. would not hesitate to go back there again when in the area.
If you're looking to get the best muffins, then this is the place to go! They have the best muffins made fresh every morning. Only thing I woul tell you is get there early cause they go quick!
Whether we are off to Beacon Marine to pick up a boat, or to the Gorton Theater, almost next door, we stop in here for a coffee, a sandwich, or soup and a ready prepared meal. The location used to be more of a convenience store, but is now a small cafe, with comfortable seating (some outside in the summer). If you miss the Chili Choice on Maplewood Ave., you can get their quesadillas and amazing Navajo muffins, stuffed with chili and topped with cheese!
This is a small store that happens to boast freshly made sandwiches, soups, and sweets. It's also a great place to grab a cup of coffee and read. The store does not carry as many of the essentials it used to, but most people go there for a bite to eat. It's in East Gloucester so off the beaten path within walking distance to the beach and Rocky Neck. It's a local favorite for year round and summer residents. 
Food was super yummy- try the cakes- a perfect finale to the sandwiches and soups! The ingredients they use are fresh and high quality , and showed in everything we ate
This is neither a restaurant nor a convenience store or a coffee shop, but more like a private club open to anyone, where you can be sure of a warm welcome, a great cup of coffee, excellent sandwiches, muffins, and other baked goods "to die for," as the saying goes. They also stock the sort of "last minute" merchandise you forgot to bring with you -- pet food, detergent, cereals and pancake syrup. . New management has spiffed up the place without losing the warmth and cheerfulness accumulated over a century of service. Try it, and become a "regular" in a heartbeat.
They have a good sandwich.  They don't carry very many toiletries nor do they carry cigarettes if that is your thing.  Otherwise it is good for a quick snack.
The folks that own this store have it all, friendly, clean wholesome food 
Papa Gino's was very clean aND we'll maintained. The staff were very polite and even served us our meal. Great lunch.
My son and I returned to The North Shore for family business and decided to visit an old haunt of ours...Papa Gino's. Thank goodness it was one of those places you return to and it is just as you left it. Great pizza, superb service.
This is a very good option to eat a decent pizza after or before a whale watch tour.
We ate a largo cheese pizza in 4 for about 25bucks.
Love, love, love Papa Gino's Pizza. They make their pizza sooo cheesy. Always fresh and hot. A great deal on 2 slices and a drink, too. When on vacation and you need a break from the pricey (but excellent) seafood restaurants, this is the place to come for pizza.
Living in Gloucester, MA there are several great pizza places to choose from with Papa Gino's being one of just a couple of "chain" pizzerias. We really love their pizza! It is consistently delicious with a thin, crispy crust and great tasting toppings. Their salads are also always fresh. What's more, the delivery service is outstanding! We call for delivery more than we visit the restaurant and every time the person who takes my phone order is polite and helpful. The delivery staff always bring my order in the promised time frame, they are personable and really friendly. Family & friends visiting us from Germany and Ireland have also commented on how much they liked the pizza we ordered for them. I can definitely recommend Papa Gino's!
I have been going to papa ginos since I was a kid, and loved it!!! But the last half a dozen times that I have gone it has been a complete disappointment. It has been soggy! Falling apart! Just gross, so I decided after the second time of getting it this way I would order it well done, which I wouldn't order a well done pizza usually, but had to do it this way just so it would turn out like a nice and crispy pizza I would want. This last time I ordered I again order it well done, but clearly the don't even listen to you when they take your order because before I took the pizza home I looked and it was not even cooked!!!! The manager then asked if I would like him to through it in for alittle longer I said yes!!!! He literally stuck it in for five minutes maybe not even and sent me on my way, an again as soon as I got home I looked and it was soggy!!! And gross!!! I am extremely disappointed in this papa ginos and probably won't go back.  Sucks! 
Downtown Gloucester, always good pizza. Hot and cheesy, and served fast, fast, fast! Thin crust with loads of cheese always baked perfectly, and just enough pepperoni. Yummy!!! Always nice and clean there too.
I should know better than to go to a chain for pizza.  The cheese was limited and the pizza was over cooked.  We should have gone to a small pizza shop.
I'm not the biggest fan of chain restaurants of any type, but a friend was in town and wanted to grab a quick and cheap slice of pizza before walking back to the train station. Papa Gino's is conveniently located in the Walgreen's Plaza downtown. It's roomy and has plenty of seating. We sat near a giant glass window and watched the passersby as we chatted. They offer pasta, but we shared a gourmet pizza. I think they are trying to pretend to be higher end at an affordable price. The pizza wasn't that memorable. It looked good, tasted fine, but nothing stood out enough about it for me to justify returning just for the pizza. The service was just okay. Not very friendly but you don't expect great service when you're ordering at the counter. Prices were good. Everything is affordable, and the portions are pretty big (if not that good for you..). We had a pleasant time eating and chatting, and I don't have any complaints but I would recommend trying some of the non-chain pizza places scattered around the downtown before Papa Gino's if you're visiting the area.
Service assez lent. Pizzas moyennes (pâte correcte mais garniture pas terrible (macaronis …..). Salle vaste donnant directement sur le parking face au port
My husband & I cannot get enough of Dunkin' Donuts coffee! We live in Michigan, and they are far and few between. We look forward to this coffee every year when we're on vacation!!
Nice people, clean place.
Was happy to find a Dunkin Donuts that made you feel like one of the family.  Great crew and great coffee!!
i  don't eat donuts cause they're fried  i dont' eat fried food it's unhealthyi don't eat fried dontus and they are fried i only eat baked good s for health reasons...
Their coffee really isn't that great, sorry, but their breakfast sandwiches are. Too bad they don't tell people up front that they have an elder discount. You have to ask for it. EMBARASSING!
We were lucky to get in! Reservations are a must but we lucked out as a cancellation came in just as we arrived. It was for two seats at the bar that seats six and it was just fine.
Michelle was our server and was delightful, engaging in nice conversation while busy doing many things. Turned out she was from Dallas where we're from so we had lots to share.
Everything on the menu looked good but decided to go with house signature dishes. My wife had a half order of Seafood Stew which was enough given a house salad was consumed before.
I started with the Mushroom soup that was yummy. The I had the Duck Breast medium rare and it was arguably the best duck I can ever remember having. A glass of Moss Back Pinot Noir pared perfectly with the duck.
No stop here would be complete without the signature Banana Cake. You'll love it.
Don't forget to make a reservation well in advance.
Having read the reviews, we decided to take a chance & see if we could grab a table on the same evening & we were lucky enough to do so - so it's worth trying like we did. This was end of September so end of season of course. 

It's cosy inside with plenty of attentive & friendly & personable staff. 

We chose a shrimp garlic starter (fab), the lamb (excellent) & the Faroe Islands salmon with couscous & zucchini 'spaghetti' (absolute 10 out of 10 from a salmon fanatic!  Loved it loved it!  Didn't realise how well couscous goes with salmon & it was all cooked to perfection.)

Washed down with a red Zinfandel & a craft beer. No room for anymore. 

A nice chat with Ben, who was able to chat & ensure no table was waiting on anything. A true art. 

A lovely place. Seems to be popular venue for a special birthday meal for vacationers. 

Definitely recommended. We would eat here again!  
We made an early (5 pm) reservation for two to allow time to get to the nearby Gloucester Stage for a 7:30 performance. We had their Ubiquitous Bistrot salad to share, a half serving of Faroe Islands Salmon, and a half serving of sliced Leg of Lamb - all super delicious. For desert it was their scrumptious Banana Layer Cake to share.  The waitress could not have been nicer or better informed. A really delightful, enjoyable meal.
Just ate here for the second time and the food,drink and service were excellent.It's a small venue so reservations are a must.We ate at the bar and were very comfortable.Wine selection is excellent with all wine available by the glass.Entrees are full and half plates which allows you to try more items and the half plates  are generously portioned.The prices are reasonable for an upscale Bistro.The food is excellent!
Took us a month to get a reservation but so worth the wait. Place is small and very comfortable with a small bar that seats about 6 people. The food is extraordinary and very different using all freshly sourced foods. Everything is made on the premises except for the bread. The Caesar salad dressing is the best I ever had topped off with duck tenders. YUM. The lamb was also the best ever had served over fresh greens and potato's with some special squash that was so good i could have eaten and entire dish full. You can order most dishes in 1/2 sizes which are usually plenty so try that option. 

You have to try the banana cake. OMG thats all I can say.

Our server Colleen was wonderful and made us so comfortable while making suggestions that were right on. I'll be sure to ask for her when we return.  Try it you'll become a believer.
The food here was fantastic and the flavors to die for! A really cool option is half-plate portions for dinner, which allowed us to sample a variety of Duckworth's wonderful menu. Smaller inside so make a reservation! It will be worth the visit!!
It took us a year to get to dine here.When i knew that we would be going to gloucester on vacation, I made reservations for our 1st nite.The chef is not only talented but is very creative. Staff are  true professionals. I only wish that i made another reservation.
OK, it's moderately pricey, and you absolutely must make a reservation, but I assure you you've never had a foodie experience like this one. Small plates of heaven you can share. Try several!!
Everything about this little gem is worth it! But you need to plan ahead. It is a reservations place that books up. We were lucky a grabbed a table for two late in the evening. Food, wine and service were one of the best on Cape Ann.
This is really the only place for an excellent (nonfried seafood) meal in Gloucester. Everything was really good, most especially the seafood.
This was a very busy little restaurant but we had booked ahead. The waitresses were friendly and helpful. The portion sizes were large and I found that two small orders were enough for me although the men in our party had full sized meals. The scallops, seafood stew, duck and lamb dishes were all very good. The only drawback for us was that one of our party is vegan and the restaurant did not cater for vegans. The chef did not make much of an effort and only produced a plate of vegetables. However, the overall experience of dining here was enjoyable. 
In this very intimate restaurant the chef comes up with some really interesting and exciting dishes.  Many are offered in full or half portions. This is a really big plus, both for smaller appetites or for allowing you to experience more dishes.  Service is excellent.  Must have a reservation.
I like fine dining in good local restaurants where the chefs have to work on signature dishes to attract locals and visitors. Duckworth Bistrot prides itself on very good preparation and presentation of food and the staff knows enough about the wine selection to be helpful. We started with the Bistrot and Heirloom tomato salads. Have to rave a bit about the dressing on the Bistrot. Sea scallops and seafood stew for entrees were both quite tasty, well-spiced, nicely presented. And I can't say enough about the key lime pie...yes, try it if it's available.
I hoped we could get a reservation at Duckworths (where I have eaten once before) and we're able to get an early (5 pm) one on a Tuesday.  We were fortunate.

It's a small beautifully appointed space in the ground floor of an old house.  While atmosphere and food are excellent, the most outstanding feature is the staff.  Dawn was knowledgeable, gracious, and attentive and made this a special dining experience.

Duckworths is unusual in that all items are available in half portions (including wines by the glass).  We had a half dozen oysters, shared a half bistrot salad, and two half entrees.  The seared scallops were excellent, and the seafood stew was the equal to any bouillibase I've had in France.  Even with half portions, we needed doggie bags.  The complexity and intensity of flavors make a little go a long way.  Finally, a peach cobbler with salted camel ice cream along with an espresso was a perfect finale.

When we had questions about wines, we were cheerfully offered tastes.  The list of wines by the glass is impressive and reasonable.  The cava was an excellent start with the oysters.

Duckworths is more than worth a trip to Gloucester.
This is one of the top two or three restaurants in the Cape Anb area no doubt! We booked a reservation a month and advance as it's a small restaurant and highly successful. Once again the food and service did not disappoint. Each dish is a carefully crafted Culinary delight! As you might expect the portions are not large but each bite is a truly delicious one. Book your  reservation early!
We've been hearing people talk about this restaurant for years.  We've tried countless times to get a reservation.  Finally we got in the door!  The restaurant is small only seating about 30 people (guessing).  There is also a bar that seats another 6 - 8 (guessing).  But holy cow the food is out of this world.  
We tried some of everything beginning with a pirates punch!  Terrific cocktail.  Powerful! The house wines were wonderful as well.  Soups delicious.  The best mushroom soup I've ever tasted.  Around the table were salads - fresh and delicious.  Great dressings.  Soups - corn soup fantastic.  The duck breast entree "the best duck I've ever had".  The risotto "amazing".  It goes on and on like that as I asked our friends.  The service was wonderful.  Colleen was knowledgable about the menu, and the chef.  She was attentive without being in the way.  Overall an A+ for the six of us.  Thank you for a great evening!
Recently went on my third visit here taking my mother here for her birthday and it just gets better every time I visit.   Reservations are highly recommended.   This is one of those places that can make a food that you thought you did not like and turn it into one of the best dishes you have ever had.   The asparagus soup is delicious beyond words.   The duck confit dish is outstanding.  Have always ordered 2 or 3 half sized portions to try to get as many flavors as possible.   Got a spiced pickle vodka drink that was also heavenly.  Could not believe that a spiced pickle could taste so good.
Make sure you make a reservation seating is very limited.  Most of the foods used are locally grown and very good.  The atmosphere is loud because of the size.  The service is good despite the lack of space.  There is a full service bar and home made desserts. 
We parked on the street.  Would highly recommend eating here if in the Cape Ann area.
Great meal. Friendly service. Make a reservation, the place was packed on a Tuesday night! Highly recommend. Don't miss while you are in Gloucester. 
My husband and I had a fantastic dinner here on our recent trip to Cape Ann. This is a small place, so reservations are in order. We had the polenta with spinach and mushrooms, the Seafood stew and the hanger steak. It's great that the meals come in half or full portions so you can mix and match. The half size was definitely big enough for me. My husband could have eaten the full size. We had the banana cake for dessert. Yum! Definitely come here on your trip to Glosta!
I had the Irish Benedict and my husband had hash and eggs. The hash was home made. The potatoes were real. The service was good and friendly and the room was interesting. They had outdoor tables. I wish we had enough time to go back for another breakfast on another day. They had a lot of specials.
I would have given it a 4 star if I didn't have to deal with an unpleasant interaction with the kitchen re our daughter's food allergy question. My daughter has severe egg allergy, which is always challenging at breakfast places. I understand and accept that. When I went to the kitchen to check what she could eat or if the kitchen could prepare her food separately, one of the chefs was very impatient. She did not want to deal with me and said "we are a small operation, we cannot stop what we do just because you have a good allergy." When the other chef kindly handed me a bag of bagels for me to check the ingredients, she  rushed the male chef and said keep working. She added that whatever we decide to order for my daughter she would eat at her own risk since they refused to check the ingredients! I was shocked!!! We did stay for the breakfast (ordered plain bagel with cream cheese for my daughter) and the dishes the others had were wonderful (esp the lobster omelet) and the place very quaint, but I would not go there again with my daughter (or anyone with severe food allergies for that matter).  
Went with locals for breakfast while visiting Gloucester - and this place is still good for breakfast - 7 years after my first visit.  The wait staff is usually very friendly.  There are just tables inside and a few on the front patio.  The place is open early for breakfast but closes relatively early for lunch ----- 1:30 or 2 PM.

We were a party of 5 and everyone enjoyed their breakfasts.  Try the lobster omelet.  It's fantastic.
I love the authentically nautical vibe of this little place on Rocky Neck. It's great for a breakfast stop before exploring the shops and galleries. The outdoor seating deck is also fun. The breakfast is very good, nice basic choices, fresh and well prepared. The service was warm and welcoming!
Was excited to go to sailor Stan's with a friend. Learned it was on rocky neck and was even more excited. Could not believe the disappointment that awaited. The Dining room had about 15% of tables occupied. No chatter. No conversations. Sat ourselves no one offered us a menu or asked if we wanted coffee, said good morning, anything. We sat there as the two people working cleared three tables and ignored us. After about ten minutes we got up and left. 
My friend and I were so excited to try out sailor stans for the first time and I had heard great things about it. When we walked in, nobody said hello to us. The entire restaurant acted as if we didn't walk in and we were invisible. We sat ourselves and nobody came over to visit, offer coffee, drop off a menu or even said "I'll be with you in a minute". The place was not busy and we could not believe the lack of service. We waited over ten minutes before we got up and left. While leaving nobody said anything and we felt very unimportant. Very disappointed and not ever going back.
What a cute and colorful place. Couldn't help but take a picture from the outside. The inside was just as cute. Local artists work adorns the walls, with a wacky, cute, colorful atmosphere. You can eat inside or out (under a few umbrellas). Breakfast was tasty; freshly made and hot, coffee was delicious, wait staff (all one of them) was very friendly and helpful. This is a tiny little place with such personality. Pillows and mismatched chairs and tables, but a really friendly and fun atmosphere. Only a stones throw from Rocky Neck Accommodations, if you don't feel like cooking breakfast for yourself.
This is a little place out in Rocky Neck, surrounded by pretty views (though not from the restaurant) and galleries. It was around 12:30 or 1:00 and they had sold their last lobster roll. HMMMMMM. The food they did have was pretty unremarkable... the chowder was chunky with clams but did have a strange aftertaste. The waitstaff were quite nice and helpful, so maybe it was just an off day?
Two dear friends and I revisited Rocky Neck recently, and wanted to go to brunch, and decided on Sailor Stan's.  There was a very nice table waiting for us on the small, sunny deck.  Our server brought us waters and coffees,  and she was pleasant throughout our visit and had a good sense of humor.  Both my friends ordered and enjoyed the anadama bread French toast with maple syrup (on the specials board) with one side of bacon, cooked crisp but not overdone.  I also ordered a specials item: the shrimp, mushroom, spinach, cheddar omelet with home fries and pumpernickel toast: very good.   This was a relaxed, enjoyable meal, and not expensive.   Sailor Stan's has a diner atmosphere.  It is not fancy and we appreciated the lack of snobbery.  We would go back.  
Stopped in for a late breakfast on a Friday morning, and we loved every minute. Located in the artsy Rocky Neck area, Sailor Stan's offers an experience, not just a meal. On this day, the place was not too crowded, though all the outside seats were take. (There are only a handful of outside seats, and the inside is not much bigger.) My wife had eggs and bacon while I ordered the Greek omelet, and both were high quality, diner-style meals. But my favorite part of the place was the eclectic interior and the laid back staff. Here's a story that sums it up: In the corner was a young couple with three children under age 4, and instead of busying the oldest with crayons, etc., the waitress brought her a tambourine and small drum, and she had a blast! Was it a quiet place? Not remotely, and we loved it.
Artsy diner-type atmosphere.  Stools at the counter plus tables inside and out.  Nothing fancy but the food was good.  Not open for dinner.  Will go back.
The real deal.  Funky and local but several cuts above, food-wise.  They'll be open when they feel like it, but Sunday brunch in season is really where it's at.

I feel like they're getting a little tired the last couple of years, but maybe it's just me (a neighborhood but not Neck local.)  xo
We walked here for breakfast almost each morning of our stay and always had a delicious meal and a fun time with the charming staff. 
Solid breakfast in a cute location. Friendly staff. The breakfast menu carries the usual items but includes some more unusual, delicious, specials (fish cakes, beans, eggs and toast). Fair prices. 
I love this place.  The actual restaurant is gorgeous and cute mainly the outside.  
The lady that works there is fun to deal with. 
The food is your typical american diner but there is something great about this place; the ambiance, the locals etc... 
A must when awakening on a boat in Gloucester! 
I had a great experience in this little colorful place @ Rocky Neck. It was nice to have an outside table and listen to a friendly chat between locals and the lady serving breakfast. She worked alone, but had an ability to be in a few places at the same time. Service was quick, very friendly and certainly made me feel welcome. And the food - I decided to be adventurous and try one of the special omelets - shrimps, red pepper and artichoke - imagine that! It was delicious, loaded with large size shrimps. What a great start of the day it was! Thank you, Sailor Stan's lady!
Great service and decent food nut nothing to write home about. If you go you must check out the decor in the restroom.
Only open in the summer, this is a sweet spot for brekky.  They have all the usual options, and a few extras too.  

The ambiance is cute as can be.  Colorful and bright with lots of natural light, and a few outside tables too.
Not only was the food delicious - banana pancakes with chocolate chips for my husband and a Popeye omelet for me the waitress was really friendly and had a great sense of humor.  The art that is on display is fun to look at and all the bright colors made us so happy.  We will definitely be back!
Amazingly yummy homemade hash and big fat shrimp in the a.m. specials. Hokey but cool decor and a fantastic location, literally in the middle of Rocky Neck. You can sit outdoors or in, at a table or at the "bar."
This is a locals place....good portions, but quality is nothing to write home about.  There is a big bar and a good atmosphere.
Service is absolutely terrible.  Sat down, waited 10 mins before we were even noticed. Pizza is the worst. Cardboard frozen dough. This is the third and last time coming here. Such a waste of a nice building. 
I'm so, so disappointed... What happened to Espresso's? When I first moved here 4 years ago we ate there all the time... the service was great and my favorite, the sirloin tips, were to die for. The last time we ate there, a few months ago, the dining room was pretty empty and I noticed the steak tips weren't as good, but we thought maybe they were just having an off night. We went there tonight thinking we'd give it another chance, since it had always been so good. Once again, the dining room was virtually empty. We were told to "just sit anywhere". We sat down and immediately noticed the table was sticky and there were crumbs on it. The waitress was... not quite rude.... but this is definitely not a good line of work for her. On the plus side, the baked potato was good as was the salad. The coleslaw, however, was absolutely inedible. My husband hardly touched his meal, and my steak tips.... well.... they were so salty that I literally cringed with the first bite and they were tough as nails....it went downhill from there. And no.... we didn't complain to the waitress... I felt it would be much better to say what needed to be said here! And no.... we will never eat there again!
Good chowder and fried haddock sandwich. Portions nice size. Menu very varied from lobster to sandwiches and pizza with many other menu items in between.   The atmosphere was fine.  Large bar area. The area near rest rooms seemed dingy and dirty. Could use some sprucing up.  
where are you  girls ( and guys) Yoo hooo! ! !
nothing else to say 
when the food came i can't remember even what i ate, or how it tasted will never go again unlessi'm forced. so sorry
 ilike east gloucester
 the owner needs btter friends / wiaters.
This is where the locals eat so food was plentiful, varied menu and excellent prices. Always daily specials and fish really fresh. We ate there for 3 nights and had something delicious and different each night.Staff friendly, efficient and cheerful.
We didn't expect much based on the reviews, but we were hungry and there wasn't anything else nearby for lunch.  I had the best lobster roll I encountered in Gloucester, and my wife's fish and chips were just right.  The service was good too! 
Well I would rate the food if the I actually waited around for it to come out. Got there at 7:10 waitress didn't take our drink order 7:20 she didn't come back until 7:45 to take out order and the place wasn't even busy. Waitress had no regard for how long she was taking to do simple tasks. We had enough and walked out by 8:10 fed up and never got our food. Horrible service,don't waste your time...literally
We were in town for a training for my husband and after he got out he wanted somewhere he could get something good to eat.  Based on a friend who had been here before, I figured it would be worth a shot.  

Bar and dining area - very nice - looked newly renovated or recently renovated.  Decent menu options - Italian and pizza - good choices.  Husband had their version of a buffalo chicken pizza - thin crust - pretty good stuff.  I had a chicken broccoli alfredo pasta dish - it was good.  The daughter just went for her usual pasta with no sauce.  

Prices were reasonable.  Portions were good.  Would go back if we were there again!
This little shop has a lot of flavors and very hearty helpings. Be warned that even a strapping 10 year old could barely make a dent in a medium. 
We went based on the reviews, and were not disappointed.  My husband got the homemade ice cream with blackberries I believe and I had a moose tracks kind of number--both were amazing.  It was a convenient stop going home from the lighthouse! Give it a try if you're in the neighborhood!
Being just steps away from our room proved detrimental to my waistline! LOL but so yummy... My favorite was the peppermint, it reminded me of my childhood in Mass.
Enjoy the ice cream while sitting in the Hub or Rocky Neck
Great place to meet locals and visitors while enjoying the inner harbor 
Cute little ice cream place in the art colony called Rocky Neck in Gloucester, MA. Delicious and fresh ice cream. Outdoor seating, very casual. Very enjoyable.
A cute, funky ice cream parlor with good pistachio frozen yogurt. Always oldies playing on the loudspeakers outdoors for everyone to hear. 
We had a lobster roll (LR) for lunch and returned for lobster mac & cheese (LM&C) that evening.  Lots of lobster on the LR - the LM&C was huge - enough for 2 - steaming hot with large chunks of lobster through out - the best we had on this trip!!!
We were looking for a place with those 3 criteria and were very pleased with The Studio Restaurant in Gloucester. Located by the water with outdoor and indoor seating, they serve a wide selection of seafood including sushi plus starters, salads and soup. A good wine selection was available. We had the crab cakes, and split the beet salad plus haddock dinner. Service was prompt and courteous. Definitely a place to return to for a mother meal. Parking is a little hard to find.
At the recommendation of a Gloucester store clerk, we tried The Studio for the lobster rolls.  Absolutely great.  I should note that their “twin lobster rolls” are just about all lobster, not the lobster salad (with tons of mayo) you might be used to.  They toss the big chunks of claw meat lobster in a light dressing and then overstuff the toasted buns.  (If you want more dressing or mayo they are glad to provide).  So there we were on a sunny fall afternoon, sitting out on their deck sipping wine and lunching on great lobster rolls.  Doesn’t get much better than this!  One tip, the lobster rolls come with a side of pasta salad (which was very good).  But if you want a little crunch with your lunch, you might want to opt for fries.
Great location. The employees were very nice. The food was great and we got our meals for half price. Also sitting outside is good as we got a nice view of the water and boats passing by.
The view is amazing here! I went alone during lunch time on a weekday and I was pleasantly surprised when they told me the menu was half off! I had sushi which was ok..  I wanted brown rice to keep it a bit healthy but the waitress said they don't have that option. The clam chowder was delicious! I would definitely stop by again if I'm in the Rocky neck area. 
we stop here every year on our vacation. Its a great place to sit on the deck and view smiths cove.Food ,drinks and service dreat.
Another stop along my day out in Gloucester that was part of the boat ride around Gloucester.  Came to the Studio by way of a recommendation of a gal....Tara who was with her mom at the bar at Captain Carlos' so decided to go on the ride and stop at The Studio.  Great outside deck on the water which really was the first sign of goodness.

Sat again at the outside bar/deck to order another Bloody Mary.  Well....it seems that between the "bartender(s) at Captain Carlos and here....there is something truly wrong with them.  They all seem to have a really bad atittude and don't understand that they are working for tips. Now I understand that the summer is waning and soon they will be out of a job....BUT KEEP SMILING.  Don't just give up and make the rest of us suffer your depression!!!!  I came to you for a drink and service....NOT ATTITUDE!!!!!!
My wife and I had lunch here on 24 August overlooking the harbor in the Rocky Neck area of Gloucester.  The day was beautiful and sunny and we were seated outside in the shade.  I had a beer and my wife had a glass of white wine.  I had a lobster roll and she ordered a crab stuffed avocado and a side of corn on the cob.  I love my double lobster roll.  The lobster was abundant and delicious.  She enjoyed her entree but felt that there was not nearly enough crab.  I gave her some of my lobster as I had so much of it.  With that quibble, we would recommend it and return. The bill was $65.
We love the Studio! Great food, friendly staff and you can't beat the view! I ordered the twin lobster rolls and was pleasantly rewarded with buttered buns overflowing with chunky lobster meat! (Thanks for the chunks!!) my husband had the haddock which was plentiful, fresh and very tasty! Our skinny margaritas were perfect and the bar staff is friendly and attentive! Would have been a 5 if we hadn't waited forever for our food. 
We were greeted by a smiling hostess.  We requested outdoor seating and were shown to a hightop corner table facing the harbor.  It felt like a private table with an unobstructed view of a typical New England village.  Awesome!  Our waitress came immediately with water and took our drink order.  When she returned with the drinks, we ordered our appetizers.  She was very knowledgable and answered our questions without hesitation.  We started with the Spicey Tuna Stone with avacado, ginger and tabiko (which was like a tuna tartar, but a lot better); and Art ordered the $1 oysters.  Both were excellent!  We shared  a clam combo which was too crispy and not enough clams. We weren't rushed and had plenty of time to chat and enjoy an after dinner drink.  We enjoyed the harbor view for the next hour.  Next time we will order a different entree. We did see a lobster roll that looked scrumptious and a couple sushi rolls that looked interesting.  All in all it was a wonderful experience and would definitely return when in the area.  Staff was exceptional, friendly and helpful!
We had lunch here with a friend and for the most part, the food was good. I had the Halibut sandwich which was excellent but the pasta salad that came with it was tasteless. My husband had the marinated sirloin tips and they were excellent as well and it was a huge serving. Our friend had the fish tacos and they looked average - not a lot of fish and it was fried. The service was terribly slow but they allowed us to spend all afternoon at the table visiting with this friend whom we hadn't seen in over 30 years, so we really appreciated that. 
Two of us ordered salad and an appetizer which was more than enough.    The fish nuggetss were good - about 6-8 pieces of nicely fried fish.  The tuna tartare also was good, but a couple of pieces of the tuna weren't quite as fresh as I would have liked. One of us ordered the halibut, which was enormous. 

The service was fast.  They serve a variety of different seafood dishes as well as a few meat dishes and pasta.

One major complaint is that there were only two (newly unisex) bathrooms for a large number of people.  

On summer weekends, it helps to get there early.
Wow...they did a nice renovation a few years ago but have not matched that with either service nor good food. The new owner owns both the Rudder and the Studio, and boy have both gone down hill. As locals who love a great place to dine, this is no longer on our list. If you are a visitor, don't be seduced by the location.  You will not like the quality of the food  (how can you destroy a lobster roll or scampi?) and will wait way too long for it. Disappointing. All 6 at our table had terrible meals and the week before we had tiny portions.
After a thrilling whale watch we were ready for lunch where we could sit by the water and chat about our morning's whale sightings. We were also headed out to the light house so chose The Studio on Rocky Neck. The view was quite nice, service excellent and according to my husband, the haddock sandwich delicious. My crab cakes were a bit over fried and had more filler than I would have liked.  I did enjoy the mingling of flavors in the tomato salsa. The scallops at the next table looked delicious as did the sushi.  It's worth a lunch and a walk through the charming streets and galleries. 
I highly recommend going to The Studio in Gloucester MA. The food was sublime especially their sushi selections. We enjoyed whole belly clams(of course) and haddock. We also enjoyed some seared scallops. Now a little bit about the location of this restaurant. In a beautiful little harbor area where everything seems to slow down and the food just seems to taste better. 
Now how about a cocktail while you sit outside watching the boats come and go.
I recommend the "Rogue Wave" which is tasty rum drink that our bartender John made for us and then made us another one. Delicious and strong. If you are in this area of world go to The Studio on Rocky Neck Avenue in Gloucester.
If you want to eat outside on the water this is a great place. The food is average. The Asian calamari was fresh. My husband got the fish tacos. They were good but they put a ton of fish in the taco. It's more like a fish platter 😉. I had the shrimp scampi. It was ok. The dish didn't have any distinguishing flavors. 
Great menu, sushi is the best around.  Service is great and the views are outstanding.  I have been for both lunch and dinner.  No matter when, it's excellent!   The only reason I gave it 4 instead of 5 is because of the difficulty finding parking.  I can't walk great distances, so I have to go in the middle of the week in order to find a spot...  Denis, you ought to consider valet parking for both The Rudder and The Studio.  That would be awesome!
Went with friends to The Studio for lunch.  We opted for a window table - providing the best of being shielded from the direct sun - yet still with a great view of the water.

I started with a specialty cocktail - a "Gin-Tini" which was part Hendricks Gin and part Bombay Sapphire gin.  Very refreshing!

They have a great sushi menu at The Studio - but I opted for the Twin Lobster Roll sandwich and I was not disappointed.
We stopped in on a chilly Friday night and were immediately met by the gracious friendly owner who offered us blankets to fend off the cool air as we took in the beautiful harbor view from the outside bar.  On our return trip Saturday, because we enjoyed ourselves so much on Friday, we again saw the owner circulating and chatting at multiple tables.  Nice to see such hands on mgmt. within a such a large restaurant.  But the highlight was the sushi, beautiful preparation and unbelievably fresh.  Possibly the best I have ever had.  We saw a few different choices being served to other tables as well and they all looked amazing.  The service on both nights, we just ate at the outdoor and indoor bars, was spot on.  Friendly and efficient.  We have already recommended The Studio to others for their food and their beautiful views and we look forward to returning next year.
I have eaten here twice - once with a big group on a work outing and once with my husband. I will make sure to visit The Studio Restaurant whenever I'm in Gloucester. THe service is fast and friendly - they can't do enough for you! We ate out on the deck one evening and the waitress noticed a few people looked chilly so she quickly brought over blankets for us to wrap ourselves in and asked would we like portable heaters brought out! I have also come here simply for dessert and after dinner drinks and was treated with the same friendly service.  The food is typical New ENglnad sea fare but it is delicious and reasonable. It is right on the harbor so you can watch the sailboats go by  .  Some patrons even sail right up to the deck. The restaurant is tucked away in the Rocky Neck Artist's Colony section of Gloucester. Look for it and stop in for what will be a charming and enjoyable experience.
Nice restaurant, good food, amazing view. We were a bit in a hurry and our waiter was very attentive to that. He brought everything very quickly. We sat outside and it was very pleasant. 
I've forgotten a pair of earrings in the restroom and came back to pick it up on the next day. They were wonderful finding and keeping them for me. I'd definitely come back
YUMMY! We sat outside and had a scallop bacon pizza! It was beyond expectations. The olive, garlic, olive oil topping for the warm bread was an unexpected delight. Going back for more tomorrow...
I've been going to The Rudder for a long time as a frequent visitor to Gloucester. I've had a great many meals there but hadn't been back in quite a while. I went with my wife, daughter and family friends (a family of five with three teenage children). To put it bluntly, I was pretty disappointed.

Drinks before the meal: I had a cocktail that was fine. My wife and one of our friends both had a huckleberry lemonade - huckleberry-flavored lemonade with vodka. They both thought it was undrinkable - too medicinal tasting. $24 of alcohol abandoned on the table. One of the kids had a virgin mule that was so sour, he also couldn't drink it. I tried it and he was right. I sent it back for some simple syrup. Did I mention we waited probably 10-15 minutes for those drinks to arrive even though the restaurant was more than half-empty?

The Food: I had the monkfish, which is served over lobster mashed potatoes with asparagus. There was nothing wrong with this dish but nothing particularly right either. Others had the swordfish, chicken Parmesan, the day boat catch and the shrimp and lobster scampi. Of all those people (eight total) and those various dishes (I've left one or two out) the only person who was genuinely happy with his meal was the one who ordered the scampi, so I suppose if you're going to go, skip the cocktails and order the scampi.

It's still lovely to sit out back overlooking the water, but that's not enough to get me back there any time soon. There are a lot of pretty good restaurants in Gloucester and Rockport. Sadly, I don't count The Rudder on this list anymore.
Went out for a very early dinner knowing how fast this place fills up.
Got a table for myself outside.
Lovely view.
Entree was absolutely yummy!
Waitstaff did not bring me a dish for the mussel shells and shrimp ails, which would have been appreciated.
Going solo to restaurants can be not fun, especially when the waitstaff seems to ignore you.
Unfortunately, this was the case this evening.
maybe the waitress was respecting my privacy.
I think she should have asked me if everything was okay before my final 2 bites.
I do recommend this restaurant.
Service, I guess, depends on something.
Not sure what
The Rudder is one of Gloucester's better quality restaurants It is on Rocky Neck a picturesque harbor section of Gloucester. The food is excellent and consistently good. The lobster cake for lunch or diner is the best I have had anywhere.
Seafood is excellent overall and the drinks are substantial .
It's our 2nd time to the Rudder, last year was great so we return this year.
Service not good maybe even bad, took long time to get the drinks and didn't ask if we need 2nd.
The eggplant appetizer that we ordered came under cook and hard, main dish- got the Salmon that came under cooked was sent back and came under cooked in a pile of oil and butter.
Will not recommend try somewhere else.
The only positive mark is the location. 
This is always one of the two go to place's we dine at when we visit the area. Not  a very big place so it fills up fast which is always a good sign !! You can have outside or inside seating as well as the bar. Nice quaint atmosphere that can get a bit loud when packed. Menu has nice raw bar, Sushi station, and daily local catches right off the local docks !!! Located in the Art section of Gloucester this is a local favorite watering hole as well. Food is very good overall but not outstanding but we keep coming back !! It is worth the trip to check it out and if you have never been to this area there are all kinds of local merchants to shop as well. Give it a try you shouldn't be disappointed !!
The atmosphere was really relaxed with an excellent view and the meal was delicious and so were the drinks.  The service at the restaurant was great.  A very interesting town to visit. Loved it!
A small group of us went here for dinner on a beautiful summer's evening.  The restaurant looks out on a small harbor and across to another shore.  There is no parking, but we parked on the street as one of us is a town resident.  Not sure if out of town cars will have luck finding on street parking.

The service was poor and the food was okay.  I had a lobster salad which was nothing special.  There was a fair amount of lobster but no tail meat and very little claw meat.  The lobster was slightly undercooked as well.  We ordered a plate of fried calamari and that was excellent.

Our waitress was inexperienced, I think.  She kept disappearing when we needed her most.  She brought us wine before bringing any water and there was a long wait for the water.  She also brought our dinners before we had finished the appetizer and then never came back to remove the appetizer plates when we finally had finished.  

I hope there are better restaurants in Gloucester because this one was not really up to snuff.
My partner and I did not have reservations on a Friday night and were not too hopeful, but fortunately they had the perfect table for us on the patio looking over the harbour!  Attentive service throughout.  My partner loved the oysters and the swordfish for dinner.  I had the haddock which was pretty good and a delicious Ruby Sipper cocktail,mmm.  A nice mix of locals and travellers, the ambiance is vibrant and the view is coastal charm.  Definitely will return when in the area.  Btw, parking is difficult, we ended up parking in the shipyard!
We arrived in Gloucester late in the day on 4th of July weekend.  Most restaurants on Rocky Neck were fully booked and wouldn't even entertain taking our name.  The Rudder was happy to oblige - and looked to be a quieter venue than their neighbor, "The Studio" restaurant.  After the quoted 55 minute wait, we were seated.  While waiting, the restaurant has a great bar - serves good martinis - and friendly bartenders.

Our table split an order of mussels - which were more than enough for our group of 5 people.  For my entree, I ordered the Shrimp and Lobster Scampi which was fantastic.
We made reservations for dinner. We arrived our name listed was not even close to what was written. Hostess was totally lost and overwhelmed. We waited almost 45 minutes for a table and that was after hounding hostess so she didn't give our table away. While we were pushed in a corner to wait for table we asked bartender for 2 drinks. We were ignored and never received drinks. Finally sat a table and had a very nice waitress who seemed overwhelmed and frustrated. She did a very good job but food took forever and we saw many plates of food being returned. Another thing to take note of is the parking is horrible! Would not go back even though food was good not great. 
This place has maintained quality and excellent service since the days when Evie Parsons ran it (long long time ago) - food is very good for the price, service outstanding and location is very fun.
Had a delicious meal at the Rudder last week.  I'm from Mass but live in Colorado and was in need of a good Seafood dinner.  With my family we split 12 Oysters and the mussels Appetizer.  The Oysters were so fresh, the perfect size and they were perfectly shucked no shell bits and the foot was cleanly separated. The mussels were in a cream based sauce with fennel and lots of mustard. While the sauce and sausage were delicious, I prefer a lighter sauce for mussels in the summer. The mussels were so tender, we ate every last one but were not able to finish the generous sausage. The Entrees ordered were Chicken Piccata which my Sister-in-law reported as very good but huge and a little salty there was about a whole bottle of capers on it so it had to be salty. Brother had the Seafood risotto which was reported as delicious, my Dad had scallops which were perfectly cooked but came out a little cool, same thing with the stuffed sole that my Mom ordered.  I had the crabcake appetizer for my entree which had a great amount of lump crab meat, came with 3 cakes and a small pile of greens.  The crab cakes had a nice spicy flavor to complement the sweet crab and a classic remoulade.  Drinks were strong and pretty reasonably priced.  $10-$12 for a signature cocktail, $6 for craft beer and $7.50 for wine. The price on the food would normally be a bit high but we lucked out and were there on a night when everything was 50% off!  I would return for sure and the location is lovely right on the water. Our waitress was amazing!! Everything was very prompt and she was knowledgeable about the menu.
Unique location. Food was average to average +, Pricing was a bit on the plus side, but the atmosphere was great. s=Smack in the middle of an artist community right on the waterfront, Highly recommended for a nice summer evening dinner,
If you can find your way to Rocky Neck, Rudders is a great stop for dinner.  The menu offers creative twists on standard menu items.  Macaroni and cheese with scallops was a hit with the husband.  My chicken piccata was perfect.  You may find yourself in the cozy bar area or out on the porch where you overlook the harbor.  Other than a slight overcrowding of tables, this was a fantastic dining experience.  Try the olive tapenade when it comes with the bread.  Delicious!
We arrived early pre season and were pleased to find the menu was half price. Our party of five ordered a variety of seafood as well as a vegetarian dish. The mussels were abundant and unique with an Asian fusion twist of fennel sausage and cream sauce. The Monkfish was served over lobster mashed potato. The tuna steak with seaweed was super as was the eggplant parm. The risotto seafood, however was a mushy mess. Shame on letting it get by the pass. View was awesome and service too.
Next to Bistrot the Rudder is our favorite place. My husband swears he ate the best salmon of his life here and that meal has been un paralleled since. We love the view and the wine and just generally how much fun it is. 
Excellent food, great service, very pleasant sitting on deck overlooking harbor.  Fish was super fresh and well prepared; the flavors were delicious and it was beautifully presented.  The Eggplant Napoleon appetizer was excellent too.
lucky we got an outside seating ,overlooking the docks.
great assortment on the menu-something for everyone-salads, tacos, mussels- great drinks- super staff- a must when you go to Gloucester
We stopped by for ice cream almost every night while we were in Gloucester. The list of choices made it hard to pick so we had to keep coming back to try more. Serving portions are very large. We opted for kiddy size since we had already eaten dinner.
This shop has several amazing offers. The ice cream sandwiches are great. The ice cream  is always plentiful and the hot dog deal is great. They are a sister facility with dairy train in Rockport. Also pet friendly giving your dog a ice cream for the asking
Like it's sister location at the train station in Rockport...it isn't summer without a stop there.
Traditional ice cream spot with soft serve and great scoop ice cream with every type of topping.

We had the pleasure of eating ice cream here on a hot summer evening. The staff were really friendly. The service was prompt   The moose tracks was delicious. Thanks!
Ice cream portions good and tasty (supposedly has Richardson ice cream). Near to the Beauport Sleeper-McCann historic house. Has decent parking as compared to rest of Gloucester.
Ro's Harbor Scoop is THE place to go for really delicious soft serve ice cream. I get the chocolate vanilla twist which is incredible! The very popular Richardson's Ice Cream is also sold there. Ro offers a large variety of flavors and the place is spotless!
Delicious ice cream, masses of flavours.  The kids size is big enough portion.  Friendly staff work there too!
Healthy servings well priced.  The Georgia peach was a real hit.  Mix it with the Hawaiian coconut for a real treat.
Enjoyed a tasty ice cream of good size for the price in this area.  They young lady who served us was very pleasant.
Had breakfast here EVERY day on our vacation!!   Loved this place!    Small, cozy, great atmosphere, very popular place for the locals.  Food is awesome and the wait staff is friendly.
Didn't want to go down town and fight the crowd and parking. Stopped into this place, and was glad we did. Fish Chowder was the best a meal by itself
If you're a trendy Trip Advisor fan, this is the place for your parents or grandparents . . . or for you if it is raining, or you want something simple and real, or you have kids in tow, or all of the above.  

Haddock chowder has lots of haddock, a little potato, (and no added thickening) served in a large bowl.  My mommy cooked it that way.  Not fancy but a great pick-me-up.  Cheeks and smelts looked good, too, in addition to usual seafood fare.  Check the daily specials.  

Staff are helpful and concerned.  Other customers seemed friendly to each other.  Good, shallow ramp into the building.  

Charlie's Place is genuine comfort and genuine comfort food.
Great little diner. Portions are large. My husband and I split the fisherman's platter and a bowl of chowder.
went there for lunch take out.Friendly staff. This was our first time there. Ordered clam chowder( to die for) and fried clams. the clams were not overly breaded,came with french fries and coleslaw. It was enough for 2.We'll be back next year
Come to Gloucester twice a year for short stays. Charlie's is a must go to. A local place that never fails. Only place I know that serves Fish Cheeks. Smelts are a go to also. For the money,you can't beat it
My husband & I stopped in here when we were on vacation in the area & were pleasantly surprised by the good food we had for lunch.  We were so happy that we returned the next day.  I had a Charlie's burger both days.  It tasted like a home-cooked burger - melted cheese, crispy bacon, lettuce & tomato, etc.  My husband had fried clams, which I tasted, but wasn't crazy about.  When we returned the second day, my husband ordered the Charlie burger & was also very happy.
Seems like Charlie's has been here since the dawn of time.  It's clean, small, and friendly.  The food won't blow you away, but the prices are definitely reasonable.  Serving sizes are on the larger side.  Waitresses are pleasant, but due to the volume of customers there this past Saturday night, I'd have to say they were severely understaffed, with just two servers.  It took quite a while to be served (as were most tables).  It won't stop us from coming back, because it's more because of tradition that we stop here. 
The restaurant was cute and the waitstaff was friendly. We had fried clams, french fries and onion rings. Everything was very bland and under seasoned. We were not offered ant refills on our drinks. 
Nothing fancy, just good ole' New England seafood.  
This restaurant is very clean, with a very friendly staff and they not only have the standards like fish, scallops and fried clams    (absolutely delicious, by the way) but they have items like "cheeks and smelts" if you're in to that type of seafood:)
Get the cod cheeks, steak tip dinner or clams! Been coming here for a decade and am never disappointed! Quick and friendly service and great for breakfast too. 
The very small fried clams were SO overcooked it was like eating fried batter only. The onions rings were overcooked as well. The head witch gossiped asking the waitress if she could view the returned plate to see how many clams were eaten, then came over following this conversation with waitress to let me know "everyone loves our clams".  " We have to contact the boss to see how to handle this"... Rather than, I am sorry. The waitress felt badly and said they are going to make you pay for the clams or rings even though you returned them. (others had entrees at the table). Wow NEVER again.
We ordered the lobster bisque and it was dull, bland. We each had a different entree and by far the Caesar salad was the best., but none was excellent. The fried seafood was dull. All the seafood tasted fishy. Our waitress had no personality, never smiled and did not check on us for drink refills. We had chocolate cake and it was definitely not home made. Don't stop here. 
Very quaint and well-kept diner with attentive wait staff.  My daughter really enjoyed her lobster roll!
Good fried seafood and fast. Good selection of non-seafood items too.  We always go here.  Not a fancy atmosphere, good for families.
When we stay at the Blue Shutters Inn we walk down to Charlie's for lunch -- their fried seafood is a classic and the lobster salad lasts me two meals.  Great place also for breakfast
They have the best fried clams we have ever eaten. Portions are large and prices are low. Ate their twice while in the area. Staff is very friendly.
Found wire bread tie in omlette all the did was offer to take cost of meal off bill a little better offer might have swayed our thoughts of legal action.  This place needs help with some of the service staff and definitely the owner who was poor customer service ideas about how to treat her customers.  Just a thought these are the people that keep you in business
This is where the locals eat and for good reason. It's just a great little restaurant with good food period. It is the only place I know where you can get fried cod cheeks and tongues. 'Nuf said.
Recommend highly.   Staff pleasant.  Clam chowder and clams very good.   Locals eat here and price is right.   Home made pie    The Apple was excellent. You will not be disappointed
I used to go to Zeke's all the time until the new owner took over. My breakfast was awful, the wait time was long and prices were ridiculous. There are way better places in Gloucester that have reasonable prices. 
We visit Gloucester once a year and hit our favorite places like Two Sisters, Sugar Mags, and Lobsta Land. This year I did a quick Google search, wondering if we had been missing out on anything, and heck yes we were!!! So happy we tried Zeke's. During our trip, we visited three times. It's a wonderful addition to an already bustling breakfast scene in Gloucester. We loved sitting at the counter where you can watch your breakfast, and everyone else's, being made. It's like a chef's table, but better. So basically you're watching one, maybe two people make breakfast for the ENTIRE restaurant. I was stunned and saddened by some selfish uppity customers who left because it was "taking too long." Fine, go to Denny's or something if you can't appreciate that your food is being lovingly made over a hot stove. When you're in Zeke's, you feel like you're in someone's home. Would you treat someone in your home like that? I'll get off my box. 

The food is fantastic. There are many interesting, not run-of-the-mill items on the menu. My absolute favorite was the sourdough toast with avocado mash, poached eggs and salsa. Incredible. The french toast is probably the best we've ever had. The coffee is good too. Lots of fresh bread selections. Pretty much anything you want, they have it, if you're patient enough to wait for it, and you should! Can't wait to go back next year.
Breakfast in Gloucester doesn't get any bigger. Big portions for big appetites. A variety of homage breads for toast or taking home a loaf. Great hash and cornbread. Waffles a bit heavy. Pancakes also very large and think. Although their peach pancakes are the best around. Fresh squeezed orange juice, and daily specials to keep customers coming back.
The service was AMAZING, the food was mostly very tasty, and the wait is long (we arrived at 10:30 and didn't eat until 12pm).  If you love pancakes, omelets, wraps, french toast, and you have a little time to wait, Zeke's Place will deliver fantastic food.  Make sure you feed the kids a snack first, as they don't bring anything for the little ones while you wait and you likely had a pretty long wait before you were seated.  My daughter (9) loved the HUGE chocolate chip pancake, while my husband enjoyed a veggie omelet.  I chose the sauteed veggies and a side of one egg.  The veggies were a bit overdone and not very well seasoned, but hey - it's my fault for choosing boring veggies at a restaurant that focuses on HUGE breakfasts!  Our waitress was incredibly nice and made sure we had refills on all our drinks, however she could not accomodate our desire to have some toast or any other snacks brought over for the hungry kids.  Next time we will feed them a little first or sneak in some snacks.  Otherwise, this was great.
This little coffee shop in East Gloucester is a great choice for breakfast. They offer an astonishing selection of 14 different home baked breads, including delicious Anadama bread, which is a local favorite. The service was very prompt, competent and pleasant. I ordered poached eggs and they were cooked perfectly. The menu offers many different items as well as daily specials. There is something for everyone! I would definitely go there again.
They offer a good value and quality with their food.  It can be a bit crowded and parking difficult but worth the effort.
Zeke's is fantastic for breakfast.  There are lots of items to choose from.  The service can be a little slow.  But the wait is worth it.  I enjoyed scrambled eggs and smashed avocado on sourdough toast - accompanied by tomatoes and roasted potatoes.  Sounds strange?  But it was great
They have a whole bunch of homemade breads, which makes this place great.  It's a great little place with a diner feel, but the food is better!
I entered this very small place which was full at the time... not one of the staff ever  looked at us or any of the people waiting on line to be seated. The waitress ignored the line of people.  She could have at least  said there was a long wait or taken our names. Instead the cook and waitresses just stared  at the line of people. So we and others just left never got served.  Note the home fries on the grill looked like they made them at the beginning of the week...looked like charcoal.
we had good service but the food was awful.   pancakes tasted like cardboard.   eggs and home fries were nasty.     bathroom was right near where all the food was being cooked.   not well placed.  I will not eat breakfast here again.  
A little hard to find, but worth the effort.  Very good menu with a huge selection of homemade breads.  Unfortunately our choice of a local favorite, Anadama, was still in the oven.  Overall, the food was excellent.
We tried every thing ,well most items.
Try the grits,the best north of mason/dixon.Fish cakes in America's home of seafood are the tastiest & best prepared the New England way,seasoned lightly,huge portions and are a good change of pace of typical menu items.They also offer other Paleo items And an extensive homemade selection of breads.Also an eclectic assortment of Gluten-free items.
Poached eggs cooked to perfection.Open everyday till 1:00
We traveled from Oklahoma and went to Zeke's on the recommendation of a friend from Hawaii who had been to Zeke's the week before.  It was great!  We had brunch, which was delicious and a lot of food for the money.  We also bought a loaf of bread to take with us.  It was delicious and stayed fresh until we had eaten every last crumb.  Staff was very pleasant also.
We went to Zeke's  because we had a Groupon .  It was a very good breakfast. The specials on the blackboard all sounded wonderful. We got the French toast with peaches and cream flambé .  The waitress suggested getting a half order. Glad we listened to her--- it was huge and delicious. They make all their own bread and sell loaves. The French toast is made with thick slices of sweet bread. The home fries were seasoned just right and very good. The coffee is strong and very fresh and tasty;They had French roast or regular. We were allowed to include a loaf of bread to supplement the bill to get up to the $28 required by Groupon. Parking is difficult as there are only a few spaces in front. This is a small place with seating for about 40. The owners and waitstaff are friendly.  We will definitely return for another wonderful breakfast. They are open 5:00am-1:00pm. 
Great Breakfast choices. Not the usual, homemade muffins, breads, hash, etc. Local foods to the area. Small and quaint. Very friendly, make you feel right at home. Reasonable prices. Portuguese Sweet Bread yummy!! May have to wait, but worth it. 
Zeke's could use a little more seasoning when the ingredients are not highly seasoned (highly seasoned ingredients would be like bacon and habanero cheese). Thus scrambled eggs, for example, can be in need of salt.
HOWEVER, Zeke's has amazing omelets, such as goat cheese and asparagus, great scramble mix-ups, such as the banana pepper-chourizo option, and the most mouth-watering selection of breads you could imagine. I am not a bread person. I have an English muffin in the morning, and that's the last bread product I encounter in the day. But Zeke's banana-walnut bread, I cannot resist. The selection of breads is always at least eight, with various grains, some studded with fruits (e.g., blueberries) and nuts. Each is simply wonderful.
I've been to this place a few times now and finally felt ready to review it.

The food is good but takes awhile to come out, even when it's slow. The entire restaurant probably holds 40 people and that includes the counter. The specials menu is sporadically updated so when I've tried to order something from it (written on a huge chalkboard), I received a "Oh, yeah, we're out of that. We've been out of that. I don't know why he doesn't take that off." Not sure who "he" is, but I prefer attention to detail and I hate getting my hopes and tastebuds up and ready only to be told that they don't have "it". *Sigh* Such a simple fix!

Parking is very limited and the road it is on is busy. If you have to park in the lot across from it, it's a tough cross, so be careful.

It's fine, really, just not great.
Heard this was a terrific breakfast/lunch place for Gloucester natives. Was not very impressed with my food. Bent two forks trying to cut my Eggs Benedict English Muffin. Will not return.
Really good food, fabulous selection of breads, and a reasonable price. We stopped by after a beach walk and were thoroughly delighted by the experience. They close fairly early in the afternoon and we're disappointed when they aren't open. Service was wonderful, the food great and the price reasonable. Oh, and they had grits, a true treat for a former resident of the Carolinas. And they weren't instant grits, either. Imported, the waitress said. Well worth the stop if you have a hunkering for a real honest, stick-to-your ribs breakfast.
We come to Gloucester every year for a 3 day fishing trip.  Capt. Marciano recommended Zekes for breakfast before boarding at the Cripple Cove public dock.  From year one ... we have started our morning at Zekes, and do not intend to change as long as I am lucky enough to make the trip.  The waitress Dottie is possibly one of the friendliest folks in town and the food... is incredible.  Hint ... don't sit at the large table just inside the door ... thats where the local fishing "legends" sit .. and you know what?  They are just as friendly as Dottie.  Thank you Zekes.
Because it is handy to the Stop & Shop and Shaw's supermarkets, we often stop for lunch while doing errands. There is a good array of sandwiches and always a wide choice of soups. We had tomato and basil soup and fish chowder this time, with half a tuna sandwich each, and finished with sharing the sinful oatmeal raisin cookie (thin and crunchy, due to honey as binder). The fresh-squeezed lemonade is a treat.
This is the "hang out" for the locals.   The have lots of drinks and also baked good, and service breakfast sandwiches, bagels, croissants and also serve soup and sandwiches at lunch.   They are only open until 3 pm
This is probably the only coffee shop in the area and it is better than Starbucks and less expensive.   They have a drive through and also serve breakfast items and sandwiches and soup for lunch.   Well worth your time to drive here
Prefect for what it is. Good coffee, fresh sandwiches and salads, and homemade quiche. Prices are reasonable and staff is friendly. Great place to grab food to bring to the beach or sit and enjoy the A/C. We go here for lunch every day on vacation every year and have never had one thing to complain about. Also clearly a favorite of locals.
I had never been to this coffee shop/restaurant and decided to try it.  I went in the morning and during tourist season, so you would think they would have enough staff.
First of all, the parking lot was hard to navigate.  There is a drive-thru with no room for another car to go around if there is a car at the drive thru window.  

I went inside to check it out and the place was crowded.  That was fine, but I was heading to work and was waiting in line and there was only one cashier and the person in front of me had a huge order.  There were 2 registers.  The manager was there and actually walked right by the registers and kept going.  Needless to say, I left and will not go back.  This place should be closed and a Starbucks put in their space.
I come here everyday before work ! The owners and staff are so wonderful ! The food is always awesome , great bagels and sandwiches ! Good prices and good coffee. This is why I love mom and pop places. I will always come here, must try if you haven't been here !!!!
The main reason I like this place is that they have a small patio with outdoor seating and I can bring my dog. The coffee is also good as are the cinnamon rolls and quiche.  One thing I don't particularly like is that they use melamine plates and reheat your slice of quiche on one in the microwave. Melamine doesn't like to be microwaved and if you do it too long, it melts onto the food. Since the time in the microwave is short, there doesn't appear to be any problem but you can tell that the plates are starting to get a bit wonky.
From the outside the Cape Ann Coffees building does not look like much, but step inside and you will find a really comfortable, attractive European style Cafe. It is so clean, and the staff at the counter is most pleasant. I've had chocolate croissants, the cinnamon sticks and oatmeal cookies there. Hard to say which one is the best as they were all delicious! The Chai Latte and Cafe Latte are wonderful. Fresh quiches for lunch are also available which look inviting. Truly a great place!
 I heard they had very good coffee but I wasn't impressed with the quality or price. Café Sicilia is a real Primo Italian Cafe'
Such delicious homemade soups, fresh sandwiches and pastry.  Of course all of this would mean nothing without great coffee and they have that too.  My husband is a DD guy and I prefer Starbucks and we were both very happy with our coffee and food!  Plan on making this part of your trip to Cape Ann or anywhere in that area!
Good service, stopped for morning coffee.  No line.  Near our hotel and it was earlier than the hotel breakfast so it was great to be able to find coffee nearby earlier.  
short walking distance from where we stayed.  First time visit here.  They have many items to choose from besides the coffee. 
Good service, good coffee. Good blueberry scones and latte. Nice staff, personable, quick, once you get to the window. 
CA Coffees is a true gem. When I want a freshly made salad that actually has veggies in it like red bell peppers, cukes, tomatoes, broccoli, I stop here. Best salads to go in Gloucester, hands down. Not filled with iceberg lettuce, red cabbage and basically something that was poured out of a bag. F.R.E.S.H.
Great to pick up for the beach and you can get chicken (salad or grilled), tuna, whatever on top. Also one of THE best places to get a cappuccino in town! 

Forget the chain places and 7-Eleven for junky beach food. Stop here on your way and have a really good experience with their staff and awesome sandwiches/food. You won't be disappointed!
doing errands, on the way to the beach,  the pharmacy, the super market good place to pop  in with or without friends. eat well relaxing with a great atmosphere. from new york city? or parirs franc,you'll always bump into someone you know.
Freshly baked baguettes, local pickled vegetables, close to Pebble beach.
Great place to have lunch or order pizza.
Not much to look at from the outside, but inside is some terrific home cooking. Juicy meatballs, delicious 18inch pizza with homage sauce, and a variety of hot and cold sandwiches thoughtfully packaged with chips and pickle (to make it a meal).  Good counter service, friendly atmosphere, and some of the best beach fare around. Some great specials like BOGO pizza night. The food is fresh and worth trying on the way to or from the beach.  Ice cream next door.
Pretty standard sub sandwich and panini menu. The hot sausage sub was very good as was the hot eggplant. Phoned in order was ready for pick up in 10 minutes. Very convenient and tasted great for a fair price.
Only one 18" size, so this was our meal for two days.  Pizza is thin crust and is slightly charred, which just adds to the flavor.  We ordered the Vegetarian Pizza - white garlic sauce, tomato, mushroom, peppers, onions, olives and artichoke hearts.  I had asked about substituting a tomato sauce, but they explained that it would make the pizza too heavy with all the toppings.  In any case, I'm glad we stuck with the garlic sauce as it was fantastic.
Surfsides Tuesday special is a ten dollar lobster roll. Fresh well made the toas r ed roll makes the difference 
The subs here are unbeatable!! Located right across from dairy maid this pizza place is a must try!! Sub rolls are to die for!
Small place but good for a quick stop. I wanted to stop to get a cold sub. Price was a little high, but that was expected. I got an Italian sub and was very pleased with the quality of meat. Service was quick and they were very friendly. 
Huge 18 inch pizza loaded with toppings, with fast friendly efficient service. We stayed just up the road so it was convenient for us for a quick meal. Turned out to be absolutely delicious. Will get another soon!
Had the lobster roll. The toasted homemade ciabatta roll was fantastic. Great lobster, all meat, no fillers, and very light on the mayo
My sister and I stopped for ice cream on the way back from Salem. When she asked what was in a flavor, whatever she was told was not the reality. And the chocolate chip cookie dough I ordered? Tasted like mint. The lady that waited on us made sure to let us know she doesn't normally work the ice cream part of the shop, because "who buys ice cream when it's cold outside anyway??" Paying customers, honey, that's who. 
The food is greasy and overpriced. I got a BLT and the bacon was flabby and greasy. The sub itself was $9. Not worth it. Many other options to choose from in the area.
We ate here several nights during our trip because you can walk from Long Beach. This place used to have fried seafood but now it's a sandwich and pizza joint. The subs are enormous. The tuna sub for $9 could have fed a family! It was also fresh and delicious. The pizza is good, too, but one night, at only 7 p.m. (in season) they were out of slices and not making anymore, although you could still order a whole pizza. Kinda weird. Also they don't have any fries or fried food, so no chicken fingers for the short-stuffs, which is too bad because we probably would've frequented even more during our trip. The inside is pretty clean. Staff are friendly. You can order ice cream from inside but strangely they won't wait on you until the line outside is served, so you basically can't order ice cream inside and they should just take the sign down.
On our way up to Rockport from the Bass Rocks Ocean Inn where we were staying for a long weekend, we saw this place on the side of the road and decided to give it a try.  We could tell it has been around for a while and we figured if the food wasn't any good, it would have gone out of business a long time ago.  It is a place the locals frequent, and we now know why.   Our lobster rolls were amazing!  Truly delicious.  We understand that their pizza is also excellent (won best pizza on Cape Ann).  Too bad we were only in the area for a couple of days, would have loved to go back a second time.
great deal.  Lobster Roll are great.  They have amazing deal on Wednesday for a second pizza for 3 $  It was fun to do Pizza night, eat it by the sea and have lots of leftovers
If you took New Haven Pizza and East Boston Pizza threw it in a protein shaker and shook it up you would get Surfside Pizza. Most Amazing slice I have had in the Cape Ann Area. A delicious Italian style thin slice of pizza. Mouth watering. Will definitely be back.
Pretty good pizza.  Nice selection and ingredients.  Very good pizza sauce. Very nice subs, especially the meatball.  And they deliver locally!!
Great local find. Food was good just need better service at counter. A bit more knowledgable and a lot friendlier. Tried the local fave , mudiga steak, really enjoyed it and my friend had your gluten free pizza and said it could b the best one he's had !!! Just get better help at counter !!!!
While on vacation our family(10 people) puchased our food there twice.  The place had been recommened to us by a local person especially the lobster roll.  We ordered the lobster roll, the grilled chicken and the tuna sub which were all enjoyed by the family.  Would go back again...
I ordered four Lobster roll today I had a few friends visiting us for a few hours so that was a treat.
They are very tasty, the bread is just perfect and the butter just enough to be toasted and smothered with fresh lobster and mayo. Great! 
BTW Tuesday special only cost $9.99, great price. I recommend it. The place is clean and fast services. They have a variety of sandwiches and salads.
If you want a quick sub this is a welcome place to visit.  They have an extensive menu of items to take out as well as tables if you want to eat in.  Their Italian sub and lobster roll was not bad.  Service was friendly and prompt.
Great place to visit after a hot day on the beach. Great hot fudge sundaes or ice cream cones with jimmies are a must~

So great the kids will want to come back!
We ordered pizza and took it to the beach for supper. It was great. I have also had the chicken salad sub.  It's big and delicious, the bread is amazing. Good food, good prices
The ice cream is awesome with many, many, many flavors to choose from.  But don't be fooled they call it a kiddie size when it is a normal large and you pay the price for a large.  I would rather they call it what it is and you order a smaller normal size that isn't super sized.  We shouldn't be starting at the large and going up from there.  Ordering according to the number of scoops is better especially for our health.  I would rather not have the sales gimmick of selling everyone a large.  But on there behave I find most places in Glouster serve huge portions.  When we were there it really wasn't busy but the staff still tried to rush us when we were still just part way through their very long list of ice cream choices.  They also were out of several flavors we asked for which is to be expected but we wish they would find some way of marking on the list which flavors they are out of.  I would recommend the great hard ice cream and the soft vanilla or chocolate over the 24 soft ice cream that are really flavor injected.
Wonderful soft serve ice cream.  I should have gotten the kiddie portion because the normal portion was huge.  but oh so delicious!
As you drive around Cape Ann in search of a beach or eatery you will at some point have to take an ice cream break. Stop by this amazing place and select from a gi-normous list of ice creams, frozen yoghurts, sherbets, sorbets, frappes, sundaes and bars. They offer over 50 different kinds of soft serve ice cream. Drop by and sit in the large brightly-coloured Adirondack chairs enjoying each lick!
You won't go hungry here. The medium size hard icecream stopped me, almost. The flavour kept me going. Yyuuummmm
We stopped here on a busy day for ice cream. Waited a bit but was worth it. Kiddie sized cone is huge... I would order my cone in a cup next time. 
Portions extremely large.  Ordered 2 kiddie Soft Serve Cones.  They are so large that they began to fall off the cone as soon as I paid for them. Perhaps one should order it in a dish?  My husband and me had it all over us.  I would not return because of this.   It was delicious but the size was ridiculous!
SO good.  half kiddie is a more normal sized "small".  the perfect amount.  so many kinds.  and frozen yogurt too.  super yum.
Best place on Cape Ann to stop for ice cream.  Huge selection of both hard and soft serve with some unique flavors.  My wife's favorite was the Blueberry Pie.
Great Ice cream both hard and soft types, plus frozen yogurt and many other treats. Service is very good. Sometimes the lines get a little long.
Love Long Beach Dairy Maid. Their portions are huge and there are so many flavors to choose from. They have sundae options as well as frozen drinks. 
HUGE ice cream cones!  Even the kiddie cone was enough for my cravings.  They had a large variety of flavors - hard and soft ice cream.
Last night I had the most delicious chocolate ice cream ever at Long Beach Dairy Maid! I had a combination of chocolate almond frozen yogurt and death by chocolate - incredible! fantastic! amazing! Sitting on the comfortable chairs outside, the cone was even more delicious. My husband and kids loved theirs, too. This is the best ice cream, the most delicious chocolate in the world!!!
This is our favorite ice cream stand in the world. We stay on Long Beach every summer and love walking down to get ice creams. We've been customers for 15 years and just this summer learned you can get a "half kiddie." Believe me when I tell you that you want to. They have the most generous portions and I have never been able to finish a kiddie cone. If you can, great, knock yourself out. But for those of us who feel bad about tossing half of what we bought, now you know you can get it in half the size and finish the whole thing, score!
Ice cream is great and variety is amazing..  One desert was enough for al 3 of us..  Just a nice walk from our hotel.  Great little place ans staff is nice and friendly
Dozens of soft and hard ice cream flavors with any topping you can imagine. German chocolate cake was a new adventure and really good. Roadside shop with some waiting on warm summer nights, but most people walk from nearby Long Beach. Sit in their picnic area, walk or drive home ... but fast. A little more expensive than the old days but what isn't? GO
Great ice cream but over priced.  Portions were too large.
Subs and salads were great. Staff at both places amazingly helpful.  
There is an ice cream flavor for everyone's palette. It is a fun place to stop by after a day at the beach.
This was a great treat after a meal. Sometimes you will have to wait to get served but that's a good sign of their popularity. They are very busy in the summer, day and night.
Great choice for locals, not easy to find for those unfamiliar with the area but well worth the effort. Menu varies but quality of food is terrific. Located of farm property surrounded by wooded hills and open meadows the atmosphere is quiet and relaxing. Open deck dining when the weather is good., Warm wood stove when it is not. Very much country New England dining. If you are traveling far check website for hours. They will close for a while between lunch and dinner. Reasonable prices and friendly staff.
We were visiting several farm stands in the Orange and Gill areas and read about Johnson's here on TA.  I have to say that it's really a delightful place to have breakfast or lunch or even dinner.  The staff is genuinely friendly and the food is great as well as fairly priced.  It's so good that you may want to come up with a reason just to drive to Orange again!
We heard about this restaurant from friends, and as we made our way there we got to enjoy great scenery and felt like we were going to a hidden location. We arrived at Johnson's Farm and found the outside to be beautiful and perfectly built for the location. It felt like we were visiting friends for breakfast....not because of the size of the restaurant...it was not small, but the wooden structure with its front porch were very welcoming. Parking wasn't a problem. We walked in and were seated right away. Chocolate chip pancakes, blueberry pancakes, eggs, bacon, sausage gravy, sausage, on and on! So much to choose from! Best of all....they serve real maple syrup! And they serve it in the syrup container not little packets. Service was great. Coffee was hot and amazingly good! Price point was typical for breakfast. Everyone in our party of 6 had a great breakfast!! Recommend this place highly!!
Great food, homey feel and a very friendly staff.  This place oozes authenticity and you can see it for yourself out of each window.  The best maple syrup is the best we've ever tasted!  We love Johnson's and we'll be back every time we're in the area!
This farmhouse restaurant has the best home made breakfast anywhere.  Fresh eggs, bacon, plenty of good hot food.  We've made it there to eat on several Sunday's.  They stop serving at 11:30am. There is seating on two floors, with home made items for sale hanging and strewn about.  They are a drive up a long country road, a nice relaxing ride that you'll be glad you took.  
I have been hearing everyone rave about this Johnson Farm place. I must admit it's very quaint and set way back on a country side road. I just wish the food tasted good! 

I ordered quiche. I was expecting a mini custard type dish. But, was served a slice. The flavor was okay. But, an after taste of freezer burn on the ready made pie crust that was used. I'm thinking "why not fresh it's a farm". I then look and see pre bagged ready salad. littering my plate. I swear it was a day from being tossed out. 

I really wish I took a photo of it. A nice slice of melon on the side. What would I do over? work on the crust for your quiches. Toss old food from the fridge, is it worth my review? worth possibly getting someone sick? 

Please do not use prepackaged salads. Just gross and (un) farm like.     
Their prime rib special was very good. Nice location and one of the better places to eat in the area.
It's a little off the beaten path but worth the drive to get there! The maple glazed ribs are to die for, no hands needed, seriously they just fall off the bone. Prices are just right, atmosphere is friendly and comfortable, country style. Charming sugar maple farm. Clean and enormous portions. Employees are small town friendly, cheerful and on the ball. My new favorite in the Quabbin Valley. ** I noticed another reviewer stated dinner one day a week but the information is incorrect the serving times are as follows: 

    Monday: Closed
    Tuesday: 7:00am - 2:00pm
    Wednesday - Saturday:
    7:00am - 2:00pm
    Dinner: 4:00pm- 8:00pm

    Sunday: Breakfast Only
    7:00am - 11:00am
Known this little place has been there for a while but had not been in years. Took a chance on a nice day and drove out to the Farm.
It is a busy place but we were treated really well and seated quickly. This inside is very eclectic and rustic. There is tons of noise but in a good way.
We were served very quickly.
The menu is average breakfast and lunch fair but for the size of the place it is pretty extensive. They even do dinner one night a week and I am dying to try it out
Our coffee was hot and very tasty. A very good start
I had the Eggs Irish. A take on Eggs Benedict but instead of ham there is corned beef hash. I had home fries with it. The portions are very large.
The eggs were done perfectly and the sauce was very tasty. The hash was to die for. I enjoyed it immensely. The hash browns were the kind that they keep on the flat top for a long time but these were not over done or dry
My partner had a daily special omelet. She asked that it be done to almost dry and it came out perfectly. She enjoyed it also
During this time the owner ran around and filled coffee cups and chatted and was very pleasant.
Overall got much more than our monies worth and thoroughly enjoyed the place, the people and the atmosphere
You have to take the drive to try it on a nice morning or afternoon
There isn't much to selection in the menu, but the food is pretty good.

We sat on the 2nd lever and look out to the farm. The decoration is very unique and I was told that you can buy them.

Not a bad place to have a simple lunch.
Went with friends for breakfast we were given a warm welcome upon our arrival, our server was so nice and explained the menu and that we should not be hesitant to order specific things to our liking. 3 out of 4 had the bacon cheddar Apple omelet and we shared one banana pancake with Carmel sauce to split as our breakfast appetizer. Lol. Beautiful view, great food and service will definitely be back and will recommend to friends
Our meals are always Exceptional and they Really Wowed our International guests but my fav Memory of the Johnson Family is how they Bless so many people in the Community for Thanksgiving. People from All walks of life attend, all different Income levels too and everyone feels happy, well-fed...maybe I should say More like Kings and Queens...lol..Such a Blessing to the Beautiful Orange community!!! Thank-you...,can't wait to get back!!!
What a nice place out in the middle of no where. The staff was very efficient and friendly. The restaurant is so cozy. If you love country decor, it seems everything on walls are for sale. I could have spent a bundle.  Breakfast was great.
We have never had a bad meal here and have tried a number of different meals.  The service has been prompt and courteous and the atmosphere warm and friendly.
We took our daughter out for breakfast here and she had french toast with real maple syrup. the service was great and you can't beat the price. very nice place to take the whole family anytime.
So grateful for search engines and GPS that could help me and my companion find this restaurant. It is a working farm and off the beaten path and completely gorgeous this time of year! We went on a Sunday and it was busy but we only had to wait about 3 minutes for a table. We were seated upstairs and it was cozy. The restaurant hold quite a few people but the layout makes it feel quaint. I had blueberry pancakes and veggie sausage patties. I was so happy to have a veggie sausage options as that rarely happens. My friend had an omelette and toast and wonderful hot chocolate. The food was wonderful but the service was a bit challenging having the waitstaff deal with climbing stairs. I ordered tea which is rarely done well and the water was not hot enough but I consider that minor. There was a large smoker going and they sold syrup and decorative items as well. The maple syrup was a highlight
A delightful farm restaurant located in the countryside outside of Orange, MA.  The atmosphere is great, the staff very friendly and the food is excellent. 
We tried this place twice and were happy we did.  They had a lobster roll for the lunch special and it was very good. The service was good both times, but better for dinner since they seemed to have an overload for lunch. The baked haddock was very good for dinner. Portions are large. If you are not familiar with the area this can be hard to find but well worth locating especially if they are having the lobster roll.
Wow, great dining experience.  We recently had a meal there with business associates.  The special was pulled BBQ pork.  The pork was very good, although a little sweeter than what I'm used to.  The Chowder was also delicious.  One person in our party had the lobster roll and it looked (and he says) it was superb.  Great job Johnson's farm.
We love Johnson's Farm.  The people are friendly, the food is delicious, and the service is excellent!
The food was exceptional.  Fun atmosphere,  We HIGHLY recommend The Boiler bar and grill.  Plus, the martini was perfect.
The atmosphere is loud in bar area. The food was enjoyable. Pricey. Nice change of pace. Great meeting place.
We ate here last year and the food was the best bbq I've ever had!!!! I had a beef brisket sandwich and was in love😍😍😍so when we stayed in orange again this year they were closed. I was so sad, I guess they shut down for awhile to redo there kitchen. They open again august 17 I was so bummed I will be going back for there opening
Far into the hinter lands of North Central Massachusetts, in the shadow of Tully Mountain you will find a hidden gem of a restaurant. The Boiler Bar and Grille sits in an eclectic mill setting offering their own smoked meats. I have to suggest their smoked sausage and brisket with a layer of Memphis BBQ sauce. They are family friendly and my granddaughter loves their steak. Make it a destination for an afternoon trip and enjoy the countryside as I know you will enjoy the food!
Private out of the way restaurant that feels like home when you get there. The staff were very friendly. The drinks were great (perfect martini) the food was delicious. Perfectly cooked fish. 
Maybe the only suggestion is the string beans were a little too al dente. Perfectly seasoned. 
The walkway by the water outside is beautiful!  
We can't wait to return. 
Women's bathroom had no hand soap. Mac and cheese was on the soupy side. Waitress was good. Not the best, but good. My husband had a Ruben sandwich, fries were good, but hardly enough, upbeat environment.
We come from New Jersey to visit Mom in Orange.  We have found the Boiler Bar and Grille to be a great place for dinner or lunch. Service is excellent, atmosphere is fun with Friday night music, and the food has been very very good...  Definitely a place that we will frequent on our visits to Mom!
The food is good but a little on the pricey side. great place to stop for just a drink. The bartender was great in telling all about the building and grounds. just a nice place to sit and relax
This is the best restaurant I have ever been to. The atmosphere is excellent, near a pond, in the woods, beautiful scenery. The staff are all top notch and know what they are doing! Our meals were served sooner than expected for the amount we ordered, and the portions were generous. With the scenic view, top notch staff, and the most amazing food you've ever tasted, you will have to check this place out!
Perfect amount of Smokey flavor in the ribs, brisket and prime rib.  That says it all for me because we are so close to this place.  We will be back multiple times and will recommend to friends.  Great atmosphere and spectacular food.  Smoked flavor is their specialty, and we loved it in the prime rib as well as the ribs, brisket and sausage, which is also home made.  Portions are huge as we took home plenty of left overs and couldn't try their deserts.  We loved the salad, the bread and the service.  See you there!
Fantastic! Nicely done inside. Nice bar area with great seating, two large TVs behind bar. Very cozy and would be a great place to be on a Fall evening or Winter night.There is another separate dining room which looked very nice and inviting. Was there for lunch but I know this place would be great for night time dining. Now to the food...Delicious! I had the smoked chicken dinner and my wife had a burger. Chicken BBQ'd perfectly with endless home made BBQ sauces...Memphis and Chipotle, both excellent so much that I wish I could have taken both squirt bottles home with me. Wife's burger was cooked to perfection. Now the sides which came with the meals...hand cut fries were tasty and delicious. Mac and cheese creamy and good! And the Shock Top Lemon beer on tap went excellent with the meal. Place was neat and clean as a whistle.. And our server was very professional, kind and informative! We will definitely be back.
My girlfriend and I went for an early Saturday lunch/dinner.  We started with the fried pickles, which were delicious and the only ones I have ever tasted with hint of sweetness to them.  We both ordered the brisket dinner-I have to say with confidence (Born and bred Texan of 29 years) the meat was delicious and cooked near perfection.  MMMM mac n' cheese..........The sides were delicious.

We were pretty excited to try the menu items after reading the reviews.  Because we dined early, the place was not yet busy and sure enough we encountered who I presume was the owner.  He made eye contact and I waited to tell him about the brisket as he made his way around to every table and people at the bar.  However, he passed us by several times.  Not quite what I expected, but I would certainly go back, if only for the food.  Hence, the four stars.  

I do have to add one last side note, which was that our waitress was AMAZING.  She was so very sweet and attentive, so expect courteous staff!
Looking for a restaurant in Orange area and was intrigued by the Boiler Bar and Grill. It was captioned as Basque style. Looked at on-line menu and didn't recognize any Basque dishes but decided to give it a go. Glad I did. Beautifully restored mill,at riverside,offering lots of comfort food specials. Had the meatloaf in green chili gravy with garlic smashed potatoes and a second side of drunken beans. All ample and excellent. A generous pour of Malbec,ending with fried plantains ala mode, guaranteed a return visit when I'm in area. 
Wait staff was wonderful but a tad confused about the Basque thing. Almost forgot, saw a black bear at rear of large parking area. Yogi, no doubt.
This restaurant  has a Nice atmosphere, great food and live entertainment. Great for families or a date nite.
Nice atmosphere, which ever your looking for, pub or more of the dining room atmosphere, they have both.  Great food, try the fish sandwich!!  so so good, with the cranberry/tartar sauce!!  The owner greets everyone and always sociable.  Nice crew !!
Every time I go there the food is always amazing and the service is great !!!  Always sports on the TV'S , and they have Keno if you like to try your luck.  
I have been to the Boiler Room on multiple occasions and I give it a top rating. The food is fantastic-a small caesar salad is one choice as a side with dinner and many fresh local vegetables, garlic mash, and the veggies support local growers. There is a variety of meat, and fish dishes and a way to have the taste of outdoor cooking -many smoked choices and interesting specials. I have many favorites- one pasta dish with spice, tomato, veggies is flavorful and outstanding,- choice of vegetarian or added chicken or steak. It is set by a beautiful pond, and a perfect stop on the way to (or after) a hike on Tully Mountain, and a host of other trails at nearby conservation land, I am living in the area for about a decade. The restaurant is a restored mill on a dam in North Orange with an additional upstairs store and deli. The Boiler Room itself has top service, friendly wait staff and very fine food. As a regular, I see many stopping in as our nature tourism is a secret getting out.
My girlfriend and I have eaten here thee times and every time it's been fantastic.  We love the atmosphere being in the downstairs of an old mill building.  They have a great selection of craft beers on draft as well as your normal bud and budlight. The owner has greeted us at the door every time and makes sure to check how we're doing throughout our meal.  They have a basic menu but everything we've gotten has been delicious and is priced fairly.  I would highly recommend trying this place if you're in the area!
This place was recommended by the proprietor of the Colonial Hill B and B but when I looked it had a few negative reviews.
Things must have changed because we had a fabulous visit. The staff was friendly and professional. We split the onion strings as an app and they were incredible. My daughter had the Cesar salad and the lobster mac and cheese side. The Cesar didn't look like much but she said it was really good. The lobster mac and cheesed looked great and tasted better. I had the BBG Burger, it was done perfectly and simply delicious. As a bonus the guitar player was really good especially with Rob Thomas numbers.

We lived in the area years ago and rode through on Saturday night.  We were surprised to see a new restaurant had opened and decided to give it a try.  We entered into a really nice pub area and the back room has a fireplace and opens to a beautiful river view.

The food was good.  We started with fried spicy pickles with sauce.  They were crisp and hot and absolutely yummy.  I ordered ribs, chicken, and brisket and so did my husband.  My French fries were delicious -- and he loved the drunken beans.  

The owner greeted us when we entered and stopped by our table later in the evening.  He was very personable.  Our waitress was Kim and she was very pleasant and took good care of us.

I was surprised to read the two earlier reviews as this certainly was not the experience we had.  There were plenty of other diners and a few people in the pub area where there was a singer who we enjoyed.
We stopped here for dinner tonight and we looked at the menus and it's supposed to be Fireside Bar and Grill not Pizza and Subs they had burgers that was supposed to be good but as soon as we saw the menu we walked out and went down the street to a really good barbecue place we won't go to this place
Fireside has the yummiest food and best service around.  I had the Chipotle Burger....it was OUTSTANDING!!!  Service was absolutely terrific.  Huge thanks to Casey and George!!  This place is impressive!  Don't bother with other local restaurants come here.  
It has become our regular place - good food, a nice variety.  Some dishes can be heavy on the garlic!
We eat at Fireside every other month or so.  The food is always hot and delicious. There is plenty of parking. Sitting near the fireplace is always pleasant.

We asked were a place to have lunch in Orange and they mentioned this place. It is one of those places where after you walk out you say I can't believe I ate there.  When we sat down I noticed the tables was really sticky, then I noticed the floor under my feet was sticky too.  Well against my better judgement we ordered, kept it simple hamburgers and i ordered lemonade for a drink.  When I got the lemonade I was handed sugar, no sugar in it she said. Not sure what it was but not lemonade made with lemons although there were lemon slices floating on top. The lettuce on the hamburger was wilted and the bun was not toasted. After a couple of sips I noticed a small dead bug in the drink, ugh.  When walking out, I noticed the floor when you come in the front door was dirty, needed a good carpet sweeping. In my opinion, a good place for a health inspection.
We recently were part of a large group (25-30) of relatives and friends who went to the Fireside for a gathering after my cousin's burial.  I spoke to George, the owner prior to our function and he was very accommodating and said he could do whatever type of food, either buffet or order from the menu, that we might like and that we would all fit nicely in the large room to the side.  The food we were served was excellent as was the service.  The side room gave our families plenty of room to socialize and was also private from the rest of the restaurant.  We had a very good experience there and for a small group function, this is one of the nicer facilities in the area.  Thanks George!
After looking for a new place to eat, me and my partner tried fireside and LOVED it! The waitstaff is friendly, and very welcoming. The food is delicious and very reasonably priced. I was also very pleased with their drink menus. Full bar and awesome mixed drinks! Will definitely be going back!
I visit fireside every Friday night for many reasons, whether it's the amazing, beautiful waitresses, the ice cold draft beer, or the delicious food (Chicken, Broccoli, Alfredo is my favorite), I know I will always leave satisfied. If i get a juicy steak cooked to order or just a simple basket of buffalo tenders, either way the owner can definitely chef up some amazing food. The big screen TV's make it easy to catch a game while I eat or watch Man vs. Food while my stomach rumbles and I wait (not long at all) for my order. Thank you Fireside Bar and Grill for being so enjoyable.
My friends and I were looking for a new weekly dinner spot and decided to try here! We were very please with the quality and quantity of our food.  I don't think any of us were able to finish our meals.  Unfortunately we were unaware of the prime rib Fridays,  but we will be going back to try it.  The service was awesome.  The waitress was very friendly and sincere and frequently made sure we had everything we needed and our cups were always full.  The food and drink menu had so much variety.  The desert was delicious and looked almost too good to eat!  We will definitely be returning as often as possible.  Well worth the time and money!
Big sign out front that says prime rib Friday night. Called about 7 PM to see if they still had prime rib and was told yes,  I explained on the phone we had a house fire the previous day and really needed a good meal and was assured it would be excellent. Arrived five minutes later and ordered a rare prime rib dinner and a medium prime rib dinner at 18.99 a plate. What was brought out by the waitress were both well done prime rib dinners, I was taken back by the waitress delivering both well done dinners. When I asked to return them to get dinners we ordered she stated she be right back.Two minutes later our waitress and another waitress came to our table to say those were the last two cuts they had and they were sorry.  Needless to say I was very upset over the lack of consideration to even ask if we would like well done prime rib dinners.  I stated I had called prior to our arrival to check on the prime rib and was told they still had some was very upset they did not share that well done was all that was left, and that they just served it with complete disregard to our ordering request. We walked out!
Food was terrible, place was dirty. Save your money and go somewhere where they don't just slap crap down in front of you...
The food was lacking any taste and the price was high. We had eaten there before their renovation and thought maybe the food and cost had changed. We were very disappointed.
Nothing Tasted Homemade! Everything  Tasted Blan.I Was Very Disappointed In The Food Itself! We Ordered Beef And Mushroom. It Was Very A Disappointment! Although I Will Say We Had WONDERFUL WAITRESS
Stopped by for a late lunch mid week. Snowing outside. Not very busy inside. Service was excellent. Kris was a sweetheart. Fish sandwiches were very good. They had an oatmeal stout which sealed the deal. Would go back again. 
We were in area for a volleyball game, and a family member who worked in the area suggested we grab a late dinner.   We were seated was soon as we walked in.  However, we waited for over twenty minutes for someone to take our drink order.  In this the owner who was also seating people seated two more parties right next to us, was well as took their drink and food orders. Clearly it helps to be a local. Leeann who was not working our section noticed we were not being served quickly took our orders.  The bar got two of our four drinks wrong including serving coke when diet was requested.  The food was excellent.    The other thing was a small group of highly intoxicated locals who very loud in the bar.
1st experience terrible food, we tried it 3 more times over the next 6 months hoping it would improve.  You can get okay burgers and Italian dishes, everything else including the service is horrible.  Last visit had chicken that tasted like fish.
I went here with my friend for dinner and found it a rather odd place.  We were seated in a booth, and there was a bunch of employees a few booths down partying up, having a grand ole time!   One man was stretched out in the booth with his feet up (pity the next person eating frood from there) they were drinking and talking and laughing very loudly.  We felt as if we were interrupting their personal party, not that they were there to serve us. and our "waitress" was one of the partiers.  I ordered shrimp scampi, and it was OK, very lemony recipe though.  My friends dinner was OK as well. However we really felt as though these were not complete dinners in the normal sense of what you get at a restruarant.  There was no bread basket, vegtable side, nothing.  We had to ask twice to get water. My scampi came with a small slice of garlic bread, and thats it.  The dinners were not large either.  We left there feeling less than full, yet we definately paid for a meal that should fill, the place is not cheap. 

Furthermore the help kept up their behavior the entire time we were there;  I kept looking over at them because they were so disruptive, and finally, our waitress came tromping down the aisle and loudly said "Do you NEED SOMETHINg?  I saw you loooking down!"  As if she was annoyed I was disturbing her! 

I won't go back, it wasn't a pleasant dining experience at all.
Arriving here solo is like being in the living room of a friend. George is the most hospitable owner and all the staff welcome you like family.
The new Chef has taken pride and care in paying attention to detail and diversifying the menu options. 
Definitely suggest any seafood option, especially calmari or salmon, accompanied by a Greek salad.
Numerous draft beers available-sitting at the bar solo is peaceful and very social, many regulars who quickly become new friends.
My wife and I have been here before. It's always been so-so, we never expect much. Tonight has left me to leave a negative review. I ordered the spinach and salmon salad, and it was terrible. I could only take two bites.  The salmon was like rubber, the salad drenched in dressing. I explained my displeasure with my server. She apologized. Shortly after she brought the bill, and much to my dismay charged me full price!! Very, very disappointing!!!  What kind of place charges their customers for food that they're not happy with?  This will be my last visit here. 
half full bar,4 tables w/customers thought we'd try it out.waited awhile inside to sit(10-15 mins).sat,had drinks,ordered apps.onion soup(ok but burnt onions),clam chowder(milk bad in it),spinach and artichoke dip(not home made chips,very watery dip).after almost an hour being there was asked what we wanted for a meal,said for get it don't have another hour to wait.we watched two other couples leave after standing at door waiting to sit.as we left another couple heard us complain to our waitress about our experience and they left also.WOULD NEVER GO BACK. my family eats out almost every evening and like most places we go to.we don't mind waiting for good food. live in athol.
Some of our food was undercooked and some overcooked, some had obviously just been warmed up in the microwave. The service was totally unprofessional, not only was the waitress slow to come take our order and bring our food, she initiated a very loud and completely inappropriate conversation while we were trying to eat. If the disgusting topic she was talking about didn't kill my appetite, the food would have. I'll never go there again!
Birthday dinner with my son-in law, daughter, and grandson.  Wonderful food, generous portions, reasonably priced. the staff was very friendly.  Great dinner meal with enough left over for a lunch treat the next day!
We have been going there for many years. The food is always great, so are the Mai Tai's. My favorite dish is Singapore noodles and it's flavored with wonderful spices.
This is a small town Chinese restaurant that offers a wide selection of Chinese dishes. Ample portions, reasonable prices, and quick, friendly service all combine to make this restaurant well worth the visit. We have eaten here several times in the past, and the food has always met our expectations.....
...consistently delicious and always served with very little wait time.  
Love their crab rangoons!  Good value in combo meals or meals for two.  Nice place for families. We always have leftovers.
very nice place to have a drink or two. We also had dinner here the meal was very good with lots of leftover's
I've eaten at tons of great Chinese restaurants, but this one is a gem. The crab rangoons are just the tiniest bit sweet, crabby, crunchy. And 10 to an order!

The General Gao's is just perfect. You can ask for it to be spicier if you like more of a bite. The tempura is great. I make slightly better fried dumplings, but mine are amazing. :)

This is a small, local place. The wait staff rarely changes. They are consistently friendly and attentive.

This is where our family goes to celebrate...anything, It's our special place.

Yum!
We enjoy Chinese food about once a month. The Tea House is near our home and convenient for us to eat in or take out.  The food is always hot and delicious.  We never need to wait long. Service is always excellent.
Located on rt 2a in Orange, this restaurant offers a  ery nice selection and is always clean and bright. There are at least 2 other Chinese restaurants within a 5 mile radius, but this is our one of choice !!
We get take out from here several times a year, and eat in a few times a year.  As far as Chinese goes, it's the best in the area.  Usually I have to be in the mood for Chinese, but I also have to have an appetite as the serving sizes are generally very large, and work great for two meals (one now and one later, or if forced, sharing)!

The staff is mostly Chinese, so language may be a bit tricky sometimes, but you know it's authentic.  It's hard to find a restaurant open in Athol Orange at all some days in the late evenings, so having a go to for takeout is much appreciated.

The menu is so large, you wonder how a small place with variable quantity of clientele can stock the food/combinations freshly, but we've never had any complaints.   Friends who travel often, claim that the food is hard to beat.

The inside area is clean, and large enough to seat a large group of 10-12 if needed, or have a quiet meal in-house.

The staff, especially if you smile/speak with them, are always friendly.

If you are looking for Chinese in this area, I recommend them. The dinner / lunch items, (menu says combos not available on Sunday's, but this is not true and needs updated) combo's are the most popular.
Tea House Always One of My Favorites. Friendly Staff Good Size Portions for the Price. Definitely Worth A Visit to Try There Chinese Food! Reasonable Prices
The food is very good and the price is great. Service was excellent. This was my first time there but it will not be my last. Doe snot look like much from the outside but it is clean and roomy inside.
Great place to dine.  Atmosphere could be a bit better and it is a bit small but overall the food is quite good and they are usually pretty quick for service and also take-out.
We always love going here.......the food is great and you can,t beat the price!!!!
One of the best Chinese places that we will eat at
Numb wait staff and disinterested service.

Food was either big breaded chunks or teaspoon sized vegetables and shrimp.

Left me longing for a Chinese restaurant from San Francisco with quality service and spices.


Food could be better, appetizers arrived after meal served with a quick explanation. Then one was wrong. No attentive service, could have cared less as they talked in the corner. I felt we Iinterupted their afternoon break.
This used to be my favorite place for Chinese food.  The last 3 times that I've been there, the food has been only lukewarm at best.  Today I went there with 6 friends  Four people mentioned that their food wasn't hot enough.  Mine was only hot in the center.  The waitress was borderline rude.  Two people (including my mom) ordered chow mein.  Both plates arrived at the table with the sauce overflowing all around the plate.  What a mess!!  The decor is rather nice,  if the food was hot it would be good, and the prices are reasonable. Except that a cup of coffee is $2.49.   On the few occasions that I've had alcoholic beverages, they have been very potent.  I'm torn between giving this place a 2 or 3, but I won't give a 3 to a place that I won't go back to again.
Food is good, service is ok but the drinks need some help. You get a ton of food for the price. The drinks are watered down and the scorpion bowl has more juice than rum.
Great, tasty ice cream that I enjoy tasting when I visit my friend who has been in the area since meeting her other half in the year 2000 - the ice cream  was so good my friend ended up marrying her newly found man, they are still married today! :D
We've eaten here for years, and it's one of our favorite places to go. The haddock fishwich is fabulous. The onion rings are crunchy and have real rings of onion in them. The fries are crisp and HOT. Try it. You'll love it!
There are tons of choices of ice cream that you can choose from and there is other food you can get so everyone is happy this place was a nice little find
I will start off by saying the staff were lovely.   The burgers were good. And the chicken tenderloins good. The chicken wrap had hardly any chicken in it. Less than half a breast cut up. 5 out of 6 of the ice creams were amazing but the coffee one had virtually no taste.    Oh and the tables were sticky and black, not nice. 
It's good food, but I found it a bit pricey and it is always packed. We've drove by a few times and seriously, no parking spaces. I find the portions a little meager for the prices but it's your typical roadside fare. Tasty fried foods and ice cream. One of the few places left like it in the area. 
Excellent food and ice cream.  The food is prepared upon order, so wait time a little long.  You'll forget all about that once you receive your meal.  The food and ice cream portion size enormous.  Great place for family day out, plenty space for kids to play.  The only sad part is Annie's open seasonal spring to fall
Food and ice cream is usually pretty good but not always. The main complaint is how expensive this place is. For these prices i rather go to a nice sit down somewhere. Also, the service is so slow its ridiculous.
I had a lobster roll and it was absolutely delish! The chicken nuggets are good also.  Family owned business with very friendly staff!
The clam strips are AWESOME.  I will be back weekly this summer to work my way through the fresh seafood and fish on the menu.  Beware though it's cash only.
I rated Anne's last year, but it's a new season, and we are glad to see it in full swing and celebrate summer after a tough New England winter.  Anne's ice cream lines are often "long". The food line is not so daunting, and you can usually get your order within ten minutes.  Mosquitoes are not bad yet, but there is a screened in area.   The local completion very close up the street did not open this year (yet), so Anne's is even busier.  Note they are an ALL CASH business.   The portions are large.  (If you order a large fry as a side dish it can easily feed three)...(The smallest ice cream is actually quite wasteful to serve kits and dieting, (but cheating on their diet adults).

Anne's is known for their chicken nuggets and seafood combos, but the menu is quite extensive for an outdoor eatery with burgers, dogs, salads, lobster rolls, etc.  AS I reminded one friend recently, not the place to go in a suit!

Prices are good for the serving sizes. It may seem high if you order several "dinners" with seafood items that are in the upper range of their seasonal pricing, but you'd find similar elsewhere.  I'd recommend that unless you are big eater that you take some Tupperware with you, or ask for a take home box.  Sometimes to minimize "over eating", it might be best to split your serving into two before you dig in, and have your lunch ready for the next day..and do save room for the ice cream!!!
Nice family owned "outdoor" dairy bar.  It is a local favorite so service can be a little slow during meal time on the "food" line, but everything is cooked to order. The fried seafood is above average. The ice cream selections above average.  Pricing is moderate.
Great place to grab a bite, use the screened in area if the mosquito are active, or the sky dreary.
Be prepared, it's CASH only.  (Rare in this environment).
My favorites include the scallops, "fresh" chicken nuggets, fish, or a combo.
Friendly staff. Great food and large portions.  Highly recommended. We go back every year. Kids love running around out back. 
Annies is a very popular place to eat but I personally find that even though there is adeqate seating available, the meals are a little pricey and with most meals it's more fries than anything else.  If you are just looking for a bite to eat it is okay but prepare to wait quite awhile for your food.
first visit was the year 2000 and myfriend and I ordered a half ham & pineapple / Hawaiian pizza and they just didn't understand why we ordered such an odd thing ... it's so tasty and we got it! :D   Most summers since! 
The food was Awesome but Chefette Heidi wrote the book on Hospitality!!!  Great job girl!!! Also Belchertown, Ma. invites you TOO!!!
Love their delicious pizza! Crust was perfect, with terrific sauce, cheese, & fillings too. We tried two pizzas: pepperoni/onion, & chicken/peppers. Cheesecake for dessert was also very good. Convenient location in center of Orange MA, just a few minutes off Route 2. Everything you want in an easy, fast meal that's delicious & affordable too. Highly recommend! 
Husband and I took an afternoon and went to Tully and spent time kayaking and swimming and just spending time together . We bought some subs at our usual Subway and brought them with us and went to our usual getaway island as we call it ,away from all the hussel and bussel of the noise of the cars and people .It was nice just us and listening to the birds and the water and just the  quietness of the two of us. Plus the not having ot cook and the great subs form subway if you have not tried subway you are surely missing out on soe amazing subs and other things you can get at their restuaurnt.
It is your average Subway. The staff there is always super friendly and we like the big windows to sit by while we eat.  Stop by for a footlong!
Great place for a quick grinder or salad made to your liking.  Usually pretty fast and always has one or more specials running so prices are pretty decent.
You want a smile or someone friendly to talk to. ...this is the place with plenty of warmth....then sit and enjoy a great lunch, homemade.....delicious
This cute little breakfast place is tucked inside the Trailhead General Store. You can grab a coffee and a muffin or a quick sandwich at lunchtime.  There are tables you can sit and read at while you eat.  It wouldn't go as far as saying that its not a family place but i think the atmosphere is better appreciated by more mature patrons.
The cafe is a hidden gem, tucked into the back of Trail Head, the Outdoor and General store in the center of Orange, MA. Jeanie and Kris make up great breakfasts, creative sandwiches and salads at lunch, and big muffins and cookies. Mmmm. They also cater lunches throughout the region. You can't do better!
After a morning canoeing against the wind we were ready for lunch so (of course) we asked our phone for a recommendation and the Miller's River Cafe came up with a great rating. It wasn't hard to see why. Our sandwiches were generous with all fresh ingredients. Even the bread was delicious. Both sandwiches were accompanied by a savory black bean and corn salad. If you don't see a sandwich combination that you want, they will make a combination for you from their list of ingredients. The delightful women who run the cafe are outdoors enthusiasts and very knowledgeable about the area. This is a great little place to stop before or after (or both) enjoying outdoors activities in the North Quabbin area.
Had coffee and muffin here. Enjoyed the atmosphere. There was a pretty extensive menu, but we didn't try any thing else this time. Shares space with Trail Head outdoor store. (A great store)
The food is all home made  with a choice of a homemade side. The items are named after local areas or items. I would recommend the place as a coffee and sandwich shop. The neat thing is that the cafe is located in Trail Head- a local outdoor shop that sells local and New England products. this is a great lunch place. 
We really love the pizza here.  It is hard because really there are so many pizza places around but the crust on their pizza is great and the sauce is just perfect.  They have great grinders too - my favorite is the Italian.  If you have not already, give them a try!
I love their cheese pizza the best in town and they have a deal on them it is a good price could eat there everyday
I had a few friends raving about their Hamburgers so felt I must try....and the price...even More amazing...Next I shall try the Pizza...lol
Hidden gem in the area.  Authentic Greek food.  The pizzas are excellent, try the pasta dishes too.  Arthur the owner will greet you with a smile each and ever visit.  The menu cost is low, so taking a family out for great food won't break the bank. 
Pizza is fair, subs are generous and burgers are great> it's $3 for a very large burger, but the side dishes are really overpriced. Service is quick and friendly. Big fan of their steak bomb sub!
Great baked goodies, fresh bread but limited menu. We had  a little trouble finding it the first time. Hoping for a full bakery, but it is not. You can order things to be made, but don't expect to walk in and fill some bakery boxes with goodies. Prices are fair and the people were friendly. 
I always try and buy my coffee here the service is great all the time. very friendly personal. I tell all my friends about this place. and they have a quick drive thru
Family owned, great pizza, prices and great with kids! Good deals. If you are in Athol visiting and or for the Rat Race, you will enjoy this joint
Eat in or take out, wonderful staff, best pizza, not lacking on toppings, specialty pizzas and subs/wraps. They will go out of their way to make the pizza you want. Greek Salads are fresh, huge portion sizes, great prices. Our go to place for my family and we also order weekly from work, colleges #1 choice. 
This is our go to place for pizza and this type of food. They put a lot of info on their facebook page with their specials which is nice. I think the food is great my favs are the pizza and their stuff shells
This place is a usual  for us when we are in the mood for pizza or their cheese fries.  The food is typical of a pizza place but it has a good flavor and it's not super greasy.  They have a nice area where you can sit and dine in.  
I was poking around to see if any new restaurants sprang up in the Athol area.  Many come and go so fast they are gone before I get a chance to try them. In general, I like to treat a few friends lunch without driving too far.  Village Grill has stood the longevity test in Athol.  There is good parking in the rear, only a few tables inside, and lighting can be dim.  We use them mostly for takeout.  Once you call in, about 20 minutes later you can pick up.  With minor exceptions such as no tarter sauce with the fish, there are never any mistakes.  While a burger from there or the fish and scallops are decent options, they don't seem fresh and I can't give them high ratings, but for takeout they beat the heck out of the other options.   Where they shine in my opinion is PIZZA.  We have ordered from them for years, and the crust is always very good, the toppings thick, and special orders don't upset them.  Their party pizza's are also an excellent value if you're hosting. If I walked into the restaurant for the first time and sat down, I'd probably be hard pressed to give two stars, but for Athol, and especially the take-out, they deserve more.
Ownership nasty to the help.
Skimpy with the toppings on subs... oh and skimpy with the meat too.  I say Make me the sub I want the way I want them charge me what YOU want.  I honestly drive 90 miles for a decent Roast Beef sandwich (See Route 110 Roast Beef Amesbury MA) but I wouldn't cross the street for anything from here.
It doesn't get any better. This Pizza House / Restaurant is the cleanest Restaurant I've ever been in. A family run business that puts out some of the most flavorful food in the area. Great prices and a very varied menu. From their Shepards Pie to their scallops or pizza or maybe just a hamburger. You can never go wrong here.
I love this place. Best pizza around, great family run restaurant. They treat you like family and the food is fresh and fast. I really like that the always double check my order to make sure it is right. The only downfall is the don't deliver and the location isn't my favorite (it's in Hannaford Plaza)  
Since I live local I have tried a lot on the menu,calzone good pizza good and there stuffed shells and manicotti with meatballs are good which comes with garlic bread.you order at the counter and they bring it to your table.They also have subs and burger as well as chicken.It's not fancy but the kitchen is open and they're friendly back there.
great pizza and a nice place to eat in also. very nice people running the restaurant. we only order one fish platter and share it and there is plenty to go around.
Easy to order at the counter, staff is eager to answer questions and be helpful, canned and bottled sodas in the self serve coolers. If I don't get the 2 slices and a drink for $4 I go for the spanakopita or a Greek salad. Pretty good subs too. Enormous kitchen could cook for an army. They say they welcome large orders from groups with advance notice. Plenty of seating in the spacious dinning area.
Flicks WAS a great place but opening right when the Main Street Diner changed hands was nail one in the coffin, followed by absolutely no advertising to let the community know they were open really hurt them.  they just didn't have the staying power needed to become established.  Too bad, clean, tasty, reasonable, they should have made it, now there is nowhere downtown that meets those three criteria.
We brought home a meat lovers pizza as we usually do, but this time we also got a bacon and cheese. It was fantastic. Just thin enough and cooked enough. Loved it.
Seems like they can only make one order at a time and wait till that order is done before they take yours. Went a few months back and then again last week and not much as changed.
I moved to Florida, but before that, me and my best friend of almost 20 years lived right over the bridge. We always had a pizza date and shared a small cheese with 2 diet cokes. We came back a year ago to do it again. It is nice to have that memory! Thanks Tool Town!
Food is good for the price. We usually get take out, however recently dined in. Not a huge fan of the new owners, grumpy, very cheap.  noticed a sign that you can only have so many cups, plates per visit. we usually go with a large group, I wonder if that changes or if you still are only allowed so many.
If you want Pizza or Calzones etc,then htis is hte place for you .Just like their name they are friendly and service is fast also. If you have not been there or had any food from there ten you sure are missing out on good food and friendly service.

this restaurant has had a wonderful revival... used to be old and kind of dirty... now it is clean and has a game room!  The food is good pizza and subs, but well done and not very expensive.  We definitely go to Tool town every time we visit the area!

great pizza buy it here all the time, its close to town, they do delivery and the pizza is not greasy 
This used to be a great spot but it has now changed hands and is terrible. The crust and sauce is gross. Twice i have tried this place and both times there was a fist fight in the place. My family will not even consider going again due to the sketchy atmosphere
When we're in the area visiting family we always make sure we get a pizza at Tool Town.

Not sure what happened this visit but it was awful.  Did they change owners?  Different crust and tasteless sauce.  I'm very disappointed.
Grew up in Athol. As teenagers we hung here a lot. Having lived all over the Northeast and trying countless pizza places, doesn't get much better. People in town take this food for granted. Hard to find a pie or grinder like Tool Town. My teenager said the other day after inhaling half a large pizza,"I wish we had a place like this in CT."
It is a small family owned place.  I like it and that is all that matters.  Give it a try you will not be disappointed.
Best Pizza in Athol.

The photo is incorrect, that building is not in Athol.

Tool town makes a good specialty pizza but I would not order a "Cheese Pizza or a Pepperoni pizza" anywhere. tonight I ordered a tomato feta eggplant olive pineapple mushroom pizza and it WILL be awesome.
We "went into town" from Tully Lake to wait out a thunderstorm while camping one weekend.  This was the only place we could find open in this sleepy town on a Saturday night.  They use the cheapest ingredients they can find and serve on plates that disintegrate before the end of the meal.  Avoid at all costs.
would you lose a customer over extra sauce for fried dumplings?  that's what they did.

i routinely spend $40-50. per trip here and at my last visit i requested an extra dumpling sauce.  they changed the bill and i asked why and was rudely informed that "Hannafords doesn't give extra hamburg for free."  except, who cares?  Hannafords will give me an extra paper bag if i ask nicely - especially if i just spent $50.

i will not only not be back, but i'm inclined to help people find nicer, smarter people to do business with.

how sad.
In a small town with very limited dining options it's nice to have something besides the ubiquitous, (six or seven!) sub & pizza places. That being said this place shoots itself in both feet. The restaurant, if that's what you'ld call it, it's a takeout counter with a few tables, is nearly invisible from the street. I drove by the building for months before I realized they sold food!  The interior is plastered with hand written signs admonishing customers not to take plastic knives and forks or napkins unless you are eating there or going back to work. Huh? That there are no restrooms, and that you can have only one hot mustard, plum sauce cup per order. I tried six dishes on several different occasions before I found one or two I might order again. The Generals Tso's chicken was the worst I ever tasted. The sauce was tasteless with tiny pieces of dry chicken in a soggy wad of breading and mercifully only a few pieces of limp overcooked broccoli. I did enjoy the hot and sour soup. At home I added some more hot (white pepper) and sour (vinegar) and it was fine. The wonton soup was not to my liking, to many soggy vegetables. The pork fried rice was ok even if it was kind of a salt bomb, the red cooked pork was nice. The egg foo young patties were good and had nice whole shrimp in them, but the sauce had a sweet flavor I didn't care for. I will probably go back even though all the pieces of this Chinese restaurant puzzle are not fitting together very well and the menu prices just went up.
the food here is always very good and fresh, they deliver and the price is very good. great food for a few dollars.
In the past, this has been one of my favorite chinese places but things seem to have gone downhill a bit.  2 1/2 stars actually would be more accurate.  First off they now have a sign saying something to the affect  silverware and napkins only given to people who eat in or are going to work.  Do we really need to explain why we need a fork?  Also, no sauce is given out unless you ask for it.  It would be annoying to get home and not have sauce.  The food was still o.k but I can't help wondering what other ways they're cutting corners.  There are a couple of tables here but it's mostly takeout.
If this is the best in town, I will drive to another town.  The pork fried rice had extremely little pork in it, very bland, and was worse than average.  The chicken wings tasted rubbery, as if they were sitting around all day (or two) waiting to be reheated.  The crab rangoon were sloppy, with a little cream cheese and what appeared to be scallions and minimal imitation crab meat in it, and honestly one of the worst I have ever had. .  This is a run down take out place, and the appearance of the building matches the quality of food that you will find here.  Don't get me wrong, the food is edible.   I ordered $25 worth of chinese food, they gave me about an ounce of duck sauce.  Had I known that they gave me so little for a good amount of food, I would have asked for extra.  But then they hit for for another dollar on top of your order.  Pathetic.  I hate giving bad reviews to local places, and I am shocked to see all the other great reviews.  Maybe I caught this place on a very bad night?  I just don't see the appeal of it.  I ordered three different items, and I was less than impressed with each of them.

If you are dying for take out Chinese food, live in Athol, where there is only one other place in town (that I have not tried), and don't feel like driving to Orange, the food is edible, but it would be a last choice.  And I certainly would not drive from anywhere just to eat here.  I am not overly critical of food, and have had my share of very good, and very bad Chinese food places.  This place is close, if not the worst I have encountered.
You'd think with as many five star reviews we are liars. But, yes it's true! This is a small mill town in recession. Yet, everyone goes here for a Chinese food takeout night! The place has the phone ringing off the hook and happy people leaving with heavy brown bags! 

How does a place stay open in a modest building? Have good food they will keep coming back! I agree with the previous review they do have the best crab rangoon. 

Let's nit pick! Not every place is perfect... The small areas of improvement are slight! Here goes... Lots of batter on the chicken fingers, less chicken then I've had other places (but still yummy). You pay for sauces they are not all included. That's it! Hands down the best is here in little Athol! Enjoy! 

Great food.  Fast service.  Would be nicer if they had more seating.  Usually just use it for take-out service or delivery.
Always hot always good always worth every penny.

8 dragon, as the owner once told me...
"Because nine dragon too many and seven dragon not so good."

Crab Rangoons are PERFECT.
Always delicious, always hot, always ready within 15 minutes. The best chinese around for miles and miles. Employees are clean, friendly and considerate. Food is excellent tasting, excellent value. We have ordered just about everything off the menu at one time or another and always, always good. Lo Mien, scrumptious, crab ragoons, melt in your mouth. Shrimp and lobster sauce, better than Boston. Never been disappointed with anything, great prices and huge portions! I've ordered from here for over 15 years and never had one bad experience!
**Note this is TAKEOUT, seating inside is limited, mostly used for takeout food only!
open kitchen blocked from view haphazardly you have to wonder why. Tried them when they opened... gave them two more shots and gave up.
Poor service and greasy food. Arrogant personnel.when order arrived the rice was burnt to a crisp. When I informed them they denied it and said if I didnt like it to go somewhere else. Nice business people.  
The people were nice but the food was quite greasy. Everything was fried and they don't use a lot of veggies.
We must order from here a few times each month. Love the food. Always looks and tastes great. We haven't tried everything yet,but what we have tried we have always like it. Owners are always very nice. 
This is a typical dive bar. There's pool tables and a dart board. Sometimes there's live music. There is no seafood, there's pizza which is pretty damn good & appetizers. There's a Touch Tunes to play what ever you want to listen to. Bartenders are friendly 
This type of Chinese or Cantonese is very different from what is served in the western states. Overall the sauces are sweeter and smokier. 

We love to order delivery from this place when we visit family in the area. We always get pork fried rice, lo mein, and poo poo platters! The sweet duck sauce is the icing on the cake!
If you like American-Chinese food, Lucky corner will not disappoint. Their best items (we found) are the lo mein noodles and beef teriyaki. Prices are a bit high, we don't eat here often.

The odd: The service is hit or miss. There is a young woman who mans the register: she's amazingly good and friendly, but when she's not there the attitude from the men is one of "You're ordering wrong" and "get out."

Also be aware, the dining room area is not used as such. They make their rolled foods out here and use it as a place to baby sit, complete with playpen. They'd be best to keep the business as strictly take out.
Honestly Lucky Corner has gone down since the founders sold it, but it's good as a fast food place. Don't expect a ton of consistency, especially if you're used to the original Lucky Corner in Easton.
Have been ordering take out from Lucky Corner since they opened..... we like to try different meals had most of the menu. Like the dinner selections and they are made fresh. Wish they had cold sesame noodle... but then again most in New England do not. Good food for the price always left overs.
If you like sweat with your food go to this disgusting deplorable poor excuse for a restaurant. Guy taking the order was answering the phone wiping sweat from his forehead and then handling the food literally with the same sweaty hands. Do not eat here. I ate there for the first and last time  I thrwe away the rice he handled and the lo mein was like  cardboard.
This is a small take you Chinese restaurant. The food is good, the individual dinners are great with very good portions.
We always order from here. Prior to living in Raynham we always went to the one in Easton for take out. I have also used them to provide food for large parties (50 ppl.) very reasonably priced. Only have had them mess up one order and they more then made up for it by providing our original request and super sizing it. Food is great! I like their lo mein and general gaus chicken. Always very friendly when we pick up the food too. 
Poor food, poor attitudes, and most importantly poor training. These geniuses cooked my steak and cheese alongside another that had peppers in it, which I did warn them I am allergic to. They assured me up and down that they were separate, when I clearly saw the same spatula on both piles of meat, and there were peppers in my sub. They wouldn't even refund me. I should have sued.

If you have allergies, go somewhere else. These people have no idea what they're doing.
First let me explain that that I was originally from the area. Having relocated many years ago, we soon learned that we missed the local food. Whenever we return to visit family we ALWAYS get the No.9 sub @ D'Angelo's....... shaved steak, onions, green peppers, mushrooms and cheese all cooked together on the grill and loaded into a delicious soft sub roll. Absolutely mouth watering. We stopped for lunch there 3 times during our 10 day visit....need I say more!
Dropped in at lunchtime - plenty of local people were using it.  Very friendly staff, prompt service and good quality lobster roll with big chunks of meat in it.
Nothing like the original CCC in Brockton. 
Still, very consistent and respectable pies that are priced affordably. Recommend the buffalo chicken or bbq chicken pizzas. 
This is a "branch office" of the original Cape Cod Cafe located in Brockton.  It has excellent pizza, salads and sandwiches.  The only negative is that they DO NOT deliver!  The restaurant looks neat and clean, and there are several tables if you wish to eat there.
This is the best bar room style pizza around in my opinion.  They have been so popular that they have pizza in frozen foods sections of local markets too.  More of a take out place by locals but does have a few sit down tables
Friday my family and I went to Cape cod cafe in Raynham . The place was busy and brisk . we ordered off the menu and the cashier said it would be 15 minutes. We sat at a very clean table and drank sodas we purchased from a refrigerated cooler. The restaurant was adorned with Aerial photos of Cape cod and the seating was wooden chairs and marble tables. Basic but Pleasant, but very clean. Bathrooms were immaculate. 15 minutes later we had our food. Fast ,friendly and super hot. We had to wait to start eating but it was worth it. 10" cheese and meatball pizzas with a Greek salad is what we ordered. Delicious and cooked perfect . I will definitely return. I want to compare this to the Original shop in Brockton . They say it's better but this place is Really Good. M
We thought with the line to order, phone orders and general busy  atmosphere we were hitting a pizza home run. Not so much. 

Our Greek Salad was great with really fresh ingredients. However, the BLT sandwich had half uncooked bacon and was basic. The pizza was worse. The dough felt like it had been over handled and was very dry. The sauce was sweet. We didn't even finish our pizza. 
Pizza is good, but this location does not compare to Main Street in Brockton. Large open takeout area. The pizza and salad did not seem the same. Drive 15 minutes to Brockton instead. 
It can be quite a wait if you walk in and order, but calling ahead can save you a ton of time and aggravation. The pizza is worth it if you're into small bar room style pizzas.
I ate here for lunch. Had a large fresh made sandwich that was on fresh bread and very filling. Very nice. 
We tried Cape Cod Cafe in our effort to try all of the area "bar pizzas". Our take out was ready and waiting when we arrived. The hamburger pizza, according to my husband, was a bit dry but in their defense, he asked for just a bit of red sauce. The Greek salad was large and tasty. I ordered a green pepper pizza. One thing that I really liked here more than some of the other area bar pizzas was that it was not just a few strips of pepper on the pizza. The entire top was covered in diced green peppers. The crust is great too!!!
We had seen Cape Cod Cafe on Phantom Gourmet and decided to try it.  The bar pizzas were delicious and the salads tasty and plentiful.  The service was great as well.  It was worth the ride.
Good salads, served with locally baked bread. Delicious and a good deal.When in the area, this is my go-to place for lunch. Casual dining, clean, friendly staff. Good experience.Slices of pizza available until 5pm (or when they run out)....like this option. Go to counter, no waitstaff.
I go out of my way to stop by to take home some really good food from this location.  The ingredients are always so fresh and the service is top notch at their counter.  The pizza is really good, I only wish that you were able to order them in a large size. They only offer small size pizza.  The price of the pizza I believe is a bit high, but I still keep going here.  The place is really clean and they have several tables inside if you want to eat-in.
The Cod has the best bar pizza you will ever have by far! Unlike some bar pizza it is not too greasy and if you like your crust extra crispy just ask them to cook it well done for you.
This place has been around for a long time. The Chinese food is the best around...the chow mein is delicious and so is the pupu platter. They make the best Zombies ever. 
If you are looking for atmosphere....it has none. But if you want great food and drinks..this is the place.
This place used to be nice. The owner clearly knows how to cook good Chinese Food. That's no problem. We always liked that, but......
He also know how to paint a Building, and upkeep the premises. The outside of China
Garden looks terrible. The Lions are peeling, the paint on the building is peeling, the parking lot is
in bad shape and the shrubbery and landscaping is not weeded or mulched, just left to it's own.
No cheery flowers outside to welcome you in, at least during the Summer months! It's clear the owner does not care. The inside is the same. Dirty old seats. Not to malign the man, but the owner never appears to change clothes! One time I saw him seat us, then ring us out, and the next day, I ran into him
in the bank and he had on the same clothes, and his hair wasn't combed. Clearly some problems there. The guy is a cheap slob, and runs his restaurant the same way. Yuck.
Piezoni's restaurant has pizza, salad, and sub. The pizza is barroom size. The pizza is very god as is the buffalo wing. Mainly a takeout pizza restaurant. They also have a large pizza which is a half sheet. Lately the sheet pizza has been getting thinner, that last time we got the sheet pizza it was so thin that the cheese just fell off. We will give it a try one more time to see if they have changed the recipe???
Came here for dinner on a Saturday night.. Called around 5:30pm to make a reservation for 6:30pm..they had a table available.  We arrive about 4 minutes early..and the hostess has us wait a few minutes..she seats us and the room isn't very busy as I had thought..a couple big parties..and a couple smaller ones(which were very loud and making it hard to hear and talk) They bring your oil and bread, which was really good.. Only one waitress for the whole restaurant-she was friendly and attentive ..Salad comes with an entree which is good..they had nice peppercorn dressing. Felt like a while for the salad to come out, which was odd..and after a while our food came out..not sure why it was so slow, as the restaurant wasn't busy at all..but the good was good. I had the chicken, broccoli, ziti in garlic and oil..they gave me 4 very large pieces of chicken,couldn't finish..Overall, it was a good experience and   I would come back again!
Excellent sauce and fresh pasta make Harry's stand head and shoulders above any other Italian fare in the area. Definitely worth the effort. 
We went there for Father's Day. The food was ok. The Veal parm was actually good. However the salad had more croutons then lettuce and all of the entrees came out at different times. All of the sides of pasta came out way after the entrees. The entire restaurant was empty. Our server was nice but the staff in general was quite rude and dismissive .
Definitely do not stop to dine here. Not worth it.
It was our first time at Harry's La Casa Mia but had been recommend by friends. We had made reservations and were seated promptly. Our waitress, Alicia, was pleasant and very knowledgeable about the menu. Her knowledge, excitement and pride in the food was infectious. We were looking forward to our dinners. We were definitely not disappointed .the four of us shared  an appetizer of fried calamari which was excellent with the assorted peppers and lemon. The salads were lovely, consisting of more than chopped iceberg lettuce. I chose the blue cheese dressing which this blue cheese sob, really enjoyed! The salads had   shaved meats and beets as well as your typical ingredients. Our meals were plentiful! Our foursome was pleased with the veal parm, eggplant rolled ricotta , haddock special of the night and even an off menu, fra diablo. We ended our evening with a very well prepared tiramisu
Quite a distance from where we live but that won't stop us from going back...loved the atmosphere...the food was to die for...especially the "Shrimp Exquisto"....made with Marsala and prosciutto....reasonably priced as well...the Chef is the owner and that makes such a difference in the end product....
Went last Sunday  and I realize it was Valentines Day but the restaurant wasn't even half full.  Came in around 6.  Had a reservation. Had calamari app. and I requested my soup to take.  My friend had a salad............have to say the was the best part of the meal.  we had shrimp scampi and veal/chicken parm.  The parms smelt burnt. wanted to get desert the deserts we ordered were out  But the best was I opened the minestrone soup when I go home and it was a tomato/chicken bouillion with frozen peas corn and carrot and a couple strands of pasta.. We both dined at Felicias in the North End years ago and the food was always impeccable.  Would drive to Boston just to have Felicas incredible food.  Please take her picture off the wall it is truly an insult to her.  You have such a lovely appearing restaurant with nothing to back it..I used to go to your restaurant years ago when your restaurant was in the house next door and the food was very good but now.............never back again and will make sure the word will spread..We are always looking for someplace to enjoy with good food............sorry never again please disassociate yourself from Felicas she was a true chef and restauranteur quality of food, culinary skill,prideful  staff.  Not with pub like service
I've definitely become a big fan of Harry's but don't go there too often because my girlfriend is paranoid of getting fat.  The food is very good and as you would expect at any true Italian establishment, the amount of food you get is overwhelming.  One thing to know, if you're looking for a quick in and out dinner, this is not the place.  They take their time making food right so it takes a little longer.  That being said, it's worth the wait.  Arguably the best food in Raynham.
We were disappointed with our visit.  The food was relatively tasteless and although the portions were large, everything seemed way overpriced for what you get.  The service wasn't great, either.  The staff members were polite, but everything took a lot of time, from ordering straight through to having plates cleared and paying the bill.  We won't be going back.
The food is hot and very tasty. One of our favorite places in the area. Drinks are reasonable priced. The only downside is the place is not that spacious, but the service is good.  
For years, Harry's La Casa Mia had been my favorite Italian restaurant.  Not anymore!

The restaurant was doing well for a Wednesday evening.  We both ordered Sangrias which took much too long to arrive, as did the salad and soup (which arrived only about 5 minutes before the meals).  Since the main entrees took a much too long time to serve, there should have been plenty of time to serve the simple drinks and salad/soup beforehand.

As usual, the food was very good.  However, that did not overcome the long delays in the delivery of the the food (not including the bread, which was served by a separate server).  I thought that the minimally attentive waitress had been assigned too many tables until she brought the bill.  I then waited for her to collect my payment, but she did not because she was too busy chatting with the bar customers.  (During the ensuing wait, I commented to my wife that their prices have increased a lot.)  I then brought my bill to the bar register myself.  Only then did the bar server call the waitress over to ring up my tab.

I had not planned to post this online review.  I had first wanted to contact Harry's management.  However, I could not locate an email contact method on their one-page website (I prefer putting my thoughts into an email rather than making a hurried, emotional phone call).  

We had expected much better from Harry's.  We will be dining elsewhere the next time.
The food isnt terrible, but its not good either.  Not sure if the decor or the dirt makes the food worse.  I've been here more than a few times, always pushed into the left side which is really a depressing area.  It just looks neglected.  Again, the food isnt terrible...but given the choice of this "Italian" place or the McDonald's across the street...I would probably choose the McDonalds.   Sorry...it could be so much better.
I have lived up the road from here 26 years and been here a handful of times, I seem to return when some one brags how good they are. Not sure if I'm willing again.
Went there last night arrived at 6:00 seated promptly and server came over for drink order and delivered promptly.  Ordered food at about 6:10.  Broiled Haddock  for wife and Baked ziti for me also one meatball.  Food came 45 min. later.  While waiting I looked around and noticed the place needed a good cleaning.  Windows, ledges, the chimneys on the candles were filthy, spotted and cloudy glasses.  With the haddock you were offered Pasta or soup.  No vegetables served here nor do they offer potato of any type.  My wife got the angel hair as one of her sides and salad for the other sides.  An up-charge of $3.50 for the angel hair even though it was considered one of her sides.  Don't go by their menu prices on line because they are all about $4.00 higher when you get there  Ziti $11.99 on line menu....$15.99 on actual menu.  Haddock $15.99  on line.....$19.99 when you get there.  By  By  Harrys.
A group of us had dinner here on Saturday night. The food was okay, just okay, nothing so memorable that I would go out of my way to eat here again. The service was excellent, no complaints at all. The menu is not extremely large, which is fine, but with so few choices I would have expected excellence. The only soup choice is minestrone. Hmmm...Italian restaurant...how about maybe some Italian Wedding soup? The salad was okay, but again, nothing special. The seafood items offered broiled haddock or a combo of haddock, shrimp, and scallops-broiled. The fettucine dish is not offered with any protein, but they were willing to add chicken when requested by one of the diners in our group. They do not offer bruschetta as an app, but when requested our server said they could make it. It was not good. The mozzarella was not fresh, it was the same processed cheese that was used on the chicken and veal parm dishes. The entrees were again, just okay. The portion sizes were average and the food was not bad, but it felt like they came down a production line, very ordinary. The tiramisu was okay, not memorable, tasted like it needed more coffee/rum, sweet and a bit bland. The area we were seated in is next to a bar and with a Bruins hockey game on, the loud profanity from some of the patrons made it difficult to have a conversation and made my elderly mother a bit uncomfortable. Wouldn't go out of my way to eat here again.
I like their food very much, but I live on the other side of Raynham and don't think to go here very often.  I think you get a decent meal at a fair price.
My wife & I ate here along with two other couples. When we were finally served our meals, they were very appetizing - although not large portions.  Unfortunately, the service was pleasant, but way below par.  First of all, they forgot our bread & butter until prompted.  The meals took much too long to be served and then we needed to wait even longer for the accompanying angel hair/ziti pasta to arrive.  Plates of finished meals were still not bussed from the table as our desserts were being served.  Also, other minor issues like "out of Bloody Mary mix."   Plenty of other better Italian dining options with 10-15 miles before we'd ever try here again.
We were very unimpressed. The staff seemed annoyed to be working. We did not feel our business was appreciated. The food was a small portion of average food but the bill was BIG. Will never go back.
My wife and I have dined here on 10 or so occasions (long before I considered writing a  review). Generally, a pleasant couple of hours spent. Their business hours appear to be a bit erratic, so be advised. The main dining area has 10; 4 to 6 place tables, but the bar is adjacent and you must pass by it to be seated. Not objectionable, but "the regulars" can get a bit loud; hence,  weeknights are more suitable for us.This small area is well kept and cozy on a quiet night. Service is usually attentive without being obtrusive and most entrees come with a very generous basket of warm bread with oil for dipping and a salad. I always mention this because it is my expectation. Bread and salad should not be charged as "sides." Wife had "chicken exquisito" and I the "shrimp exquisito." The portions were more than adequate (we've never gone away hungry) and were carefully prepared. They do a very nice version of a "red" sauce. I'll agree that it is a little pricey, but the value? ... I counted 8 jumbo shrimp in my serving and I still left behind part of the salad and a fair part of the angel hair side. My wife brought home a chicken breast. Harry's is a local haunt. It is not the best Italian south of the North End, but it beats the ride into Boston.
The restaurant is getting a little dated, but the food is good and the restaurant has a local following.  Some of the menu items are pricey for the atmosphere and the servers could smile more often.
Great atmosphere, even better food and excellent service. Small place but on a Friday night, we had no wait time.
The restaurant is very small, but worth waiting for a table. The wait staff was great,friendly and efficient, the food was delivered timely and presented very well. The rain made dining on the patio out of the question, However I will definitely be back !!
I came South to visit my family and ate here twice..  had not eaten here in 10 years and I must say  it is still the best breakfast around
We decided on this little quaint place because of reviews.   Thought why not we are we hungry family of 5!  As soon as you walk up to the restaurant you see outdoor seating, very nice.  Once you walk in it's  small place to wait.  No one acknowledged us all , no signs saying what to do.   Finally went up to someone and asked how to sit.  Once figuring that out was served right away.   I received drinks prompt,  had to ask for cream.  I found odd.  There was nothing on the table.   We ordered our meals.  Twins had mickey pancakes and oldest blueberry pancake.   I had spinach and cheese omelet with potatoes side of linguica.   Wife had western omelet.   Mine was okay.  Egg tasted dry and spinach they use is frozen.   At least it was not watery!  I will give them that.   Potatoes were awesome ..red potatoes seasoned perectly.  Cooked to perfection!   Linguica I've had much better.  Not very strong portuguese sausage taste I'm looking for.  My little girl was so excited about her pancake,  because are Disney fans.  She took one bite and gave the face of disgust!  I said what is the matter?   Tastes very plain Mom the blueberries have no flavor.  The pancakes are gross! I was horrified.  Then went around the table in order of kids.  One by one saying ughhh! Okay says Mommy let me try them you are kids!  Yup there gross!  They kept saying why so yucky.  
Having a 2 & 3 year old is difficult, especially when it's just me wrangling them around from a double doctor appointment. The girls here at the Milk Bottle were all so happy to jump to the rescue if I needed anything. They had the Mickey Mouse Pancakes, one bacon, one sausage, and I had my regular breakfast. The kids had a great time, everything was perfect and affordable as always.

Now you're asking yourself, "Why was it a bad idea?"

Every time we pass by and many times simply randomly because it's morning, I'll hear how much the kids (especially my daughter) want to go back.
Food was just ok in this diner. Very slow on coffee refills..eggs not done correctly...won't be back.
Food  was excellent, a very good value, the service was great and the atmosphere - most welcoming.  We had to wait a little bit (was on a Sunday); but was well worth it.
Big portions, great service, great prices are the highlights of this establishment. Open for breakfast and lunch. Never, in 10 years have we been let down!!!!!!
Overall a real nice place ! Owners and workers take pride in their Jobs ( same familar faces) Food is good and plentiful! a little busy on weekends but all good , only pick apart is that its a bit cool in there in the winter bundle up !
I have been going to the milk bottle for well over 40 years.  It is always busy and for a great reason.  The friendly service ...the fast service and their never ending cups of coffee.  I love the breakfast and their coffee.  It's always done just right and always hot.  Did i mention their never ending coffee!!!
I recommend this place to anyone looking for a hearty breakfast at a reasonable price

Go there often.  You can get breakfast or lunch.  They have great specials; pot roast can't be beat for the price anywhere.
When we visit a new place, we love to eat at local restaurants and that's one of the reasons we love Trip Advisor. It helps us find those great local places and Milk Bottle is a perfect example. It's nestled between a Shell station and strip center and you would drive right by without ever noticing it except for the reviews on Trip Advisor. Well, maybe you would notice the giant white milk bottle in which the restaurant is located but you probably wouldn't stop there and that would be a mistake.
The Milk Bottle serves up terrific breakfasts at friendly prices with even more friendly waitresses. We've already eaten there twice this week and we've enjoyed it very much. Whether it's eggs, omelettes or pancakes, you'll enjoy breakfast here. Beware of one thing....pancakes are listed on the menu by the piece....so much for one, so much for two. We've never seen that before and, when they arrived, we knew why. The pancakes are the size of a dinner plate and you need quite an appetite to eat one much less two. Great coffee, too.
That's what the sign said on the door and I have to agree. This place was mediocre. We gave it a 6 out of 10. The price was great! The service was good and fast. Coffee right away and constant refills. But the food was disappointing, especially considering the amazing reviews. Don't get the pancakes! Probably worst I've ever tasted! My husband said the best part of his omelet was the cheese. Frozen spinach and canned mushrooms aren't really his thing. The home fries looked awesome but had absolutely no flavor. I ordered a BLT with an egg and it was missing the egg. They serve milk, not half and half and margarine, not butter. 
If you're just passing through looking for breakfast I'd suggest keep driving. At least until they hire that new cook. 
WONDERFUL ... ABUNDANT reasonable breakfast . . . UNIQUE and patronized by the locals. HIGH marks there alone !! ENJOY!!
I love going to the Milk Bottle whether it's with family, friends, or solo.  I can't say enough about this place.  The food is delicious, reasonably priced, and the servers are always pleasant and attentive.  This is my go to place when I am craving an amazing breakfast (or lunch) experience.
We've all had those mornings
COFFEE!    Actually pretty much every question or comment you can even understand is answered with - COFFEE!   Then after a cup (or two). It's Breakfast!   
Well, the Milk Bottle is a great place to get either or both. Good coffee with good refills. Good breakfasts -simple or fancy. 
Coffee,eggs,coffee,toast,coffee,home fries and a cup of coffee.  It's a great start on the day!
We have been here many times for breakfast. It comes out fast and hot. They give big portions and the waitstaff is always around with fresh coffee or anything else you may need.
Always crowded so sometimes you have to wait for a seat, but the breakfast is very good with fast service and reasonable prices.
We recently moved to the area and have found a minimal number of really good restaurants in general and breakfast places in specific. Tried the Milk Bottle which I have passed hundreds of times based on the Tripadvisor reviews 

Clean, friendly, fast service, large portions and they do indeed always make sure your coffee cup is filled but unfortunately a restaurant is about the food and it is just average 

My scrambled eggs were on the dry side and chopped to the point where I needed a spoon to eat them, pancakes and bacon were good but nothing special, and the breakfast sausage which is really personal preference were on the spicy side for me. 

Good, not great. We will continue to search the area for a great breakfast place. 
Even when they're busy, the waitstaff here doesn't forget about you, and the cooks keep it coming out fast. I haven't had a negative experience yet, and I've frequented The Milk Bottle for at least 15 years. Consistently quality food, great people, and the bill is always surprisingly low.
Breakfast ~ lunch ~ all good home style cooking with home style service, I like to hook up with my friends here now and then, and there are many local spots in the area. There are busy hours here when you might have to wait for a table. But it does move fast and worth the short wait.
I've worked in the area for about a year, and just found this place.  So far I've had an Italian sub, it was wonderful, I love how they use shredded lettuce. I had a calzone, it was delicious and a great size. My new favorite is the Greek salad wrap. It is so fresh and tasty, and their dressing is amazing.  Their menu is huge and full of great pizza combos that I can't wait to try.
Often would pick up pizza after work. They are in a great location. Their subs and salads are great also. Excellent value.
I used to work next to Brothers Pizza. I remember Paul always hard at work making a consistently good pizza, or filling up a sub with steak and cheese. I recently went back since I was in the area, and it brought back only pleasant memories.
After driving past a few times we took a chance and stopped in on a week night. It was a great decision.  The food was excellent and the waitress was right on the ball. It's a casual place and feels very comfortable.  Prices are very good. We will go back again.
The BBQ sauce on the meat was spice and tangy!  The meat was definitely freshly cooked and the sides were good.   Desserts were all homemade, and the Fried Peeps were amazing! I've been to the the BBQ restaurant in Sturbridge, and 2Jerks BBQ surpasses it in food, seating and wait time.
The barbecue meat tasted stale and pre-made. It was definitely not made fresh that morning like Kinfolks does on route 44 in Raynham. I will never return because I have tasted way better
Fantastic and way closer than Yankee Smokehouse in Ossippee, N.H. Way better quality sides than the Boneyard in Dodgeville. Ribs were excellent. Real cornbread with bits of corn in it. Roasted brussel sprouts are delicious and nutritious (mom would be so proud). Kids chicken fingers were more like the whole arm , hands and fingers (huge portion) but crispy, lightly breaded and juicy. Smokey/Sweet baked beans. Cheesy, gooey mac-n-cheese, And fried green tomatoes that Idgy Threadgoode would wear a dress for. An absolute must!!!!!! Friendly waitstaff and prices were reasonable for the quality & quantity of food. I hate to recommend the place because it will get harder to get a table and fight back the crowds but these two jerks are smokin out the competition. 
The hostess sat us right away. The place had a good amount of people for an 8pm Thursday night. It was a little noisy, I think due, to the echo of the room, but the environment was still nice for a dinner date and the BBQ was delicious. Starters was a corn bread with real corn inside.
Great casual dining. Friendly waitstaff-prompt service.   Most importantly,  amazing brisket sandwich served with crispy brussel sprouts and ham. Fresh corn bread topped off an excellent lunch. 

I'll be back soon.
We were trying to find something close to have lunch as we were driving down 495, and BBQ sounded like a great choice. First you get complimentary cornbread, and this was probably the best cornbread I've ever had. Very moist (even though I hate that word) and flavorful. My husband and I both had the pulled pork sandwich, on a brioche roll (which was perfect), topped with coleslaw. Very, very good! We had a side of potato salad which we also enjoyed. 

Wish I was a bit hungrier to try some brisket, but we were in a hurry and were only having a small lunch. I have a feeling it would have been excellent!
Late afternoon, wife and I set out to satisfy an urge. BBQ. We are locals with ethnic backgrounds and southern BBQ is not a part of our heritage. However, "2 Jerks" is near the top of our short list. We are greeted at the door and seated in a comfy booth. Drinks are ordered and promptly served. Nice selection of draft ales. We go straight for the entrees, as prior info dictates that the portions are filling. Lin has a meal of chicken (boneless, she claims) over waffles. Her endorsement may have sent this review toward 4*s. She rants and raves. My opinion is more tempered. I select a meat dish of brisket, 3 hearty slices full of moist flavor with a touch of char and smoke. Remarkably, the sides were overwhelming. Tasty coleslaw and innovative fried brussels sprouts. I could have made a meal of the sprouts. Very good. No room for dessert. BBQ urge fulfilled.
All in all the experience was pleasant. The decor still smacks of many of the prior occupants. Service was efficient, unobtrusive and our meals appeared to be lovingly prepared. Sometimes "lovingly" doesn't equate to "genuine." The owners prepare BBQ as best they know it. Admirably; hearty and tasteful. Some reviews seem over-the-top. We'll come back when our urge returns.
Recently visited 2jerks bbq with wife and kids. Wife ordered buttermilk fried chicken which we were told would take 25 min due to it being cooked to order. No problem, happy to wait for great food. After just 16 minutes, fried chicken arrived looking golden and crispy. Having arrived almost 10min sooner than we were told, we were nervous. Once my wife cut into the drumstick, a stream of blood shot out and onto the table. DISGUSTING. The waitress arrived and said she would order another express? That was the problem the first time. Let the damn bird COOK before serving it.  
Haven't been back since.
Good BBQ places are few and far between in the Northeast and 2Jerks BBQ is no exception.  I will give them an A for effort, but they fall short and deliver a mediocre product.  Only those in a BBQ desert should seek sanctuary here.  We tried a couple of appetizers, the Candied Bacon and Wings.  The bacon was wet with syrup...not as firm as it should have been and lacked smoke flavor.  The wings were much better and of good size.  The brisket was dry...like it was cooked the day before, like leftovers.  2 Jerks does serve BBQ but not great BBQ.
The atmosphere is comfortable but tables only. Very friendly staff. I had the ribs accompanied by mashed potatoes and macaroni and cheese. All was delicious and I loved that the mac and cheese and potatoes were aserved in cups. The Cornbread was complimentary and so delicious! There are barbacue sauces on the table to choose from as well as extra paper towels. A very nice touch. My husband had the Brisket Sandwich and Baked Beans. I loved the Beans! Great pickles too!
Had the brisket and mac and cheese.  Portions were solid for the price and the brisket was appropriately smokey and exceptionally moist.  Would definitely come back.
I went for lunch with my wife at 1130am and nobody else was dining in there yet. The worst thing was the obnoxious country music they blasted so loudly I couldn't think, let alone have a conversation nor hear the waitress. It is not a night club and personally despise country music so much it annoyed us and we both felt like getting up and leaving! The waitress said "really? You don't like it? I asked her to turn it down a little bit and she said she would but never did. The pulled pork came pre-loaded with way too much mustard on my sandwich for my liking and had to scape it off. I also found it to be overpriced for what they offered. The worst part was the loud music though. We will never return because of that.
Starting with the super server Ashley we are sure to be happy. The fried green tomatoes with their semi spicy dredge as well as baby greens and sweet pepper relish start the meal with the taste buds whetted. Main course 2 meat.platter...pulled pork and sausage with beans and cole slaw....delightful....
The brisket and pulled pork were like anything you would get in the South or Midwest.  We ordered sandwiches which were 10.00.  The cornbread was great.  This was an over all good experience, except they don't serve fried Okra, which left my husband from Oklahoma longing for home.  We will be back. 
From the corn bread to the home-made sausage, everything was great. We all agreed this was so worth the trip. Everything is made fresh each day, so yes they can run out of stuff but it sure is nice to know what you're getting is the freshest food!  Brussels Sprouts are roasted to perfection with huge chunks of ham mixed in.  I would go back just to have them, but ih the dry rubbed ribs are so awesome. Love dry rub!  There is BBQ sauce on the table for folks who like'em wet. 

Highly recommended!  
Place very busy but well organized with friendly workers. We were told about 30 minute wait and it was 15 minutes. Found restaurant to be a nice family place to go. The owners Mom came over to see how everything was and I thought that was a nice touch. The food was plentiful, hot, and excellent tasting. Our server Ali was outstanding!!!!! Highly suggest everyone try this family restaurant. We will be back very soon as this is one of our favorite places to go now.
Was traveling north on I-495, and pulled off to get something to eat.  Nice clean restaurant with a friendly staff.  Not crowded.  Menu was simple, nice selection.  Meat platter was great, and we had plenty to eat between the 2 of us.  If you like BBQ, check it out.
Good BBQ but they run out of food quite quickly so that's the only down side.  The ribs are without sauce - they have 3 kinds on the table.  The fried oreos are freaky but unhealthily good. Super casual as one would expect.
Our first trip to 2Jerks was highly anticipated and for the most part did not disappoint. We ordered the plate of bacon, and sampled most of their meats. The brisket, my favorite, was moist and flavorful. The chicken was great. The sauces they make are some of the best! Only issue was the ribs... dry to the point we didn't eat them, or take them home. Maybe it was just an off batch. We will go back and give them another shot!
Thought we'd stop in and check it out. We had a busy day ahead of us and short time for breakfast. We were genuinely welcomed immediately as we entered.  The young lady came was friendly and brought over coffee right away. We placed our order and was so pleasantly surprised at how fast we had our meals and how great everything tasted, even the coffee! 
We will definitely be back. 
I stopped here on my way to work one morning after driving past it many times.  I judge all breakfast places based on their eggs and homefries. My first time in any breakfast place I always order scrambled eggs, homefries and a grilled English muffin.  It was delicious and hot, and served in about 3 minutes, if that.  I think the waitress brought in the slip, walked back out to the dining area, turned around went back to the kitchen and there was my food.  The homefries were seasoned and cooked to the perfect amount of crispy without being burnt, and soft in the middle.  The grilled English was also grilled perfectly.  

It's definitely the kind of place that has regulars, as I seemed to be the only person there that they didn't know by name.  It didn't matter though, the two waitresses on were both very friendly and efficient.  

$5 and change for the meal and an ice coffee.  

Cash only, no credit cards accepted.
we came with my aunt. she knew of the place. we came on good Friday and 10:am. it was very busy. but we got a table in no time. they ask us right away for our order. coffee was good. and they gave us a second cup. food was good. it was a little loud because it was very busy. but that was ok. hope to come back again.
This diner is certainly still there and popular with the locals - JillG4 who couldn't find it and went to the milk jug missed a nice little place - it's down the road and on the other side of the road.

We enjoyed waffles, two eggs easy over, three egg omelet with ham, cheese, mushroom and green pepper, and toasted English muffins. Fries were good too. The plate sizes were reasonable and not too overwhelmingly big. Coffee and tea was good with refills offered. Top all that with friendly service and you can see why it was so popular with locals.
Mel's Diner is a bit further down than shown on the map - down the 138 towards Taunton. We were served by Jordan who was super friendly and attentive. Good little diner with the usual breakfast selections (eggs etc.) and more unusual options (breakfast burrito). Service was well above average. 
This diner is no longer there. Instead I went to the Milk Jug restaurant and had a nice breakfast. Trip Adviser should remove Mel's Diner or contact the owners to deactivate it from your site.
Great company.. even if you know no one. quick local breakfast.. lunch at a very reasonable price. only open early hours.
We were surprised that the parking lot wasn't full when we pulled in around 8am on a cool January morning...but... it just must have been a lull in the action as the place got busier as soon as we sat down. This restaurant is located in a small strip shopping plaza, perhaps a 1/2 mile or so off of I-495, exit 8, straight thru a light or 2, then on the right.  It's not a traditional "diner" in the true sense of the word, but the food is just as good as a very good diner. Service was excellent and the food came in a reasonably quick timeframe. We all had pretty much the traditional breakfast--eggs, biscuits & gravy, homefries, etc. The loaded type homefries (not sure what they were called on the menu) with cheese and tomato, etc were very good. We will stop again.
This is a self service frozen yogurt place. You get a bowl (one size) put the yogurt then all the topping on. They charge by the once. So watch the kids. It would be great if they had smaller cup for the kids.
We had a party of 6 on a Wednesday night, We where seated quickly and the server came right over to take the drink order. All six meals where good. The buffalo wing came out warm not hot the pizza was very hot and very good!
Had the honey wings and they were excellent. Also had chicken corn chowder which was yum. GF had the mixed grill and couldn't finish it all. Overall very happy and full. 
Had lunch fish sandwich with coleslaw and cheese on it with sauce. I guess they  tried to fill it up with the coleslaw instead of fish for 10.00 fries or onion rings are extra. For 12.00 it should have been a nice big piece of fish on an open roll with tarter and coleslaw and some fries on the side.  Also the chowder had clams pieces so big and chewy I had to take them out of mouth and lots of potatoes as filler.  Dont they know you cant eat chowder that way.  Not good service.The place needs a facelift dark worn booths etc.So I conclude they just don't care. So If we were on that road and happened upon it again would not stop..
Met a few couples for dinner. Server was great, food was average for pub fare. I had the buffalo mac and cheese, it was okay, not spicy at all. I would stick with pizza next time.
Growing up in the area I remember when the Great American Pub was really good.  Over the past several years it has gone downhill in a major way.  The steak tips and boneless wings were always very good but now they are average at best.

However, what is even more disappointing is the service.  I don't think it is too much to ask to have your server or bartender at least check in on occasion to see if you need anything.  On a least a half dozen occasions I have told myself that I was done giving the GAP another chance but I keep holding out hope that they will realize how far they have declined.

The only reason I gave this establishment 2 points instead of 1 is the fact that they have pool tables which not many other bars in the area do.
Went to GAP at approximately 5pm on Saturday, 11/14/15; sat at the rail. Place was packed, seemed to be mostly locals/well-known customers. Service was awful. Two people were tending bar; took quite a while for either of them to even make eye contact. Ordered 2 drinks. Asked for and received two menus; ready to order, placed menus at bar edge; bartenders walked past multiple times without acknowledging us. Finally caught one bartender's attention and ordered a burger. The visit improved at this point because the burger was hot, delicious, and cooked to order. Then things went downhill again. Finished our beers, placed the glasses at the edge of the bar with the coasters over them; took almost ten minutes to be noticed that we wanted the check, and another ten minutes to cash out. This is not a very large bar. Left feeling that our business did not matter, so we will take our business elsewhere.
Stopped by for lunch. Location was filled with locals watching football on a Sunday. Good Food. Good Atmosphere. If you like pub food, this is the place to go. 
Great food and drink selection, something for everyone. Prices are very reasonable, plus they always have specials! The menu always has new options when we come! The service is always quick and friendly. The atmospheres (yes, plural) are great! There is a full dining area in the back, large bar area up front, pub type area, and even a second pub type area with a large projector screen to watch the game, play darts, or play shuffle board! My husband and I have made multiple trips here with various friends and family and no one has ever left disappointed!
Marinated Steak Tips are awesome,,,,,food is very good here. Nice selection of drinks and beers as well. Keno, full dining room in back , front has nice bar area as well. 
Very good prices and full service.
Watched the pats game this past weekend here.  The food was a bargain during the game.  99 cent pizzas and 25 cents wings. The food was fair at best.  The c service was great. The bartenders were friendly and attentive.  
For $10.99 you get a good meal that included a soup or a salad.  I have had the turkey tips and seafood catch.  The prime rib sells out so it is so good.  The meatloaf was just ok so I would pass on that one.  The burgers are really good and the pizza isn't bad either.  The bar is where I prefer to sit and the bartenders are always nice.  They have added Yellow Tail Chardonnay to the wine selection and it is much better than the house wine they had before.  The Pub a great place to have a meal or watch a game.
I've given GAP a number of chances ... But after tonight, they officially sucks. HORRIBLE service. Bar and restaurant and kitchen. Food, okay. Drive a few more miles ... 
We visited the Great American Pub with another family (8 total guest) To start they do not have a kids menu. The sever was great to start but didn't come around as much as the evening went on.
We had burgers, pizza and chicken sandwiches. All food was average at best.
I was driving home from a poker tournament in Taunton, MA, from which I had made an early departure.  I was listening to the Patriots on the radio, planning on a slow trip home up route 138.  I passed an unassuming pub restaurant on my left that I had never noticed before.  It had a sign saying cheap eats while the Patriots game was on.  And it had a full parking lot.  I instantly decided that I should watch the game from there, pulled an illegal U-Turn, and drove in.  
   I felt fortunate to find one of the last spaces in the large back parking lot; and I hustled in.
   Wow.  Wow! Was I impressed.  The place was made for viewing a sporting event on TV -- with three large areas all surrounded by flat screen TVs.  I made my way into the bar area, a rectangular section with a bar on either side, facing toward a center serving area, with four or five very busy servers.  Nearly everyone of the 45 or so seats around the bar was taken.  I slid in to one of the few that wasn't occupied.  I spied a little sign on the counter in front of me announcing $2.50 drafts and $.25 wings.  I order a draft and ten buffalo wings (I could have had them "any way I wanted" -- and this was the spiciest option I was told by my server).  They came promptly.  I devoured them quickly and neatly, grateful for the ten or so napkins I was left.
   Everyone seemed glued on the game and on their food.  There were so many screens that there seemed to be about one for every two patrons.  But as the Patriots blew out the Bears, I decided to explore the restaurant, taking in dozens of wonderful newspaper clippings and oversized photos of Boston sports teams of yore.  Yaz, Williams, Orr, Bill Rodgers the marathoner, Alberto Salazar, Cousy, Russell -- and dozens more.  Overhead was an enormous skull from some 19th century race between Harvard and Yale.  In the back room were all sorts of pictures of cigarette boats (the owner is a champion boat racer I gather).  A great distraction while I digested my wings.
   I might have stopped there, quaffed the rest of my beer, and left to listen to the rest of the game on the radio.  But I noticed a fairly appealing pizza next to me.  When I asked the price I was told that it was only $.99.  I was shocked -- so much so that I overindulged and ordered one for myself.  It was very good, better than I would have expected for a bar pizza.  I couldn't finish it and brought half home for my wife to enjoy.
   Overall, a great place to watch the game and enjoy an hour or so's respite from the real world.  And, afterall, isn't that what you want from a bar?
my husband and I went here for appetizers and drinks after dancing.  The bar is long and has a nice atmosphere...TVs everywhere which is great if you are watching a game.  The service was really not good.  We were here on a non busy night and the two bartenders were just not attentive.  They were just not aware of the empty drink glasses from customers around the bar.  The food was okay but nothing to write home about.  I was pretty annoyed with the service.  I am not sure I would go back here anytime soon.
Best pizza in Raynham....Greek salad huge fresh and delicious!
Reasonably priced and great service...
I consider myself a regular here. I've always had good food here and they recently updated their menu which includes their salads- which are now 10 times better. Their daily dinner special is always a great deal. $10 for a dinner and salad! Can't beat it! Waitresses are great! We always sit on the bar side, but the dinning room is comfortable on the few occasions the bar was too packed. Beers are reasonable and sometimes they have 3.50 drink specials like a lemon martini. Great neighbor bar, good food, nice for families. 
Huge bar area and moderate dining area.
Plenty of TV's for all sporting events including 2 huge HD projection TV's.
Decent variety of beers on TAP and really good pub food/pizza etc.

Bar service is always prompt and pleasant.

Friendly customers as well.

      
Waited an hour for a pizza. Pizza never came out.  Never refilled our drinks.  When we asked for the check so we can pay for what we ate and dank we were told to get the f out.  Ill never go back.  My 73 yo father was so upset.  Save your money folks.
Best food, price, service, etc around. Potato skins equals mouth watering. Always have delicious cheap drinks. 99 cent cheese pizzas are a great way to go.
their website says it best "you may wait a few minutes longer than you'd expect but it's worth it" -- everything looked great but yes, it did take a little longer but we weren't in a rush. I'd rather wait for good food than be served bad food. Appetizers were 1/2 price w an alcoholic beverage - so for an app, drinks and dinner for 2 under $50 - very reasonable.
On our way back from a kids birthday party in No Attleboro we were a little hungry but didn't want to go to one of our likely places in Middleboro we came across your restaurant we sat at bar very attentive girl Evelyn waited on us we had 2 draft beers and picked cheeseburgers with some of the best fries I've had in a while burgers were cooked just right beer was cold prices were very cheap will be back with friends
Slapshotz Gastropub  in Raynham on a Wednesday..Kids eat free. Up to $6.00 yeah you got to read your menu. Deceiving   but true. Pizza was small but well made. Cheese burger pizza was great. Broccoli Alfredo  was nice too. Kids steak tips were 8.99 very nice. Beer was 4.50 for a 12oz Sam adams. Cocktails $7.00. 69 dollars for a  family of four is a little pricey without any leftovers .. The place was squeaky clean and Victoria our waitress was Awesome. The pub atmosphere  didn't bother me, but the loud kids in the table next to ours did. Not feeling the family thing here.
Great bar food! Had the bbq chicken nachos and they were delicious. My husband had the buffalo wings and he ate the whole thing. The pizza is a very good bar pizza nice thin crust. We will definitely be back! Great atmosphere!
The bar area is spacious. Service was prompt and courteous. Very impressed with the food and their reasonable prices. There's entertainment almost every evening, which is a plus. Will definitely go back!
This place has turned completely around from what it was before.  The decor and atmosphere is really great.  The food is really good, and the bar area is pretty sweet...with plenty of televisions.  I like this place and would definitely would go back.  I hope it stays around for a long time. 
We first went to this restaurant last Sept. 2014. and gave it a good review. After being back several times over the last 7 months we find this establishment to have the same friendly and courteous service ( Dawn  this last time) as all the times before. The food is hot and very tasty. The drinks are reasonable and you feel like family in this place. Keep up the good work and see you again very soon!!!!!
Great food , great drinks, and great staff. Definitely keeps us coming back. Love the wings and the fries. Slap shot melt is my favorite!! 
Great food , great drinks , great staff. One of our favorites in the area. Wings are awesome as well as the fries. Slap shot melt is my favorite!!
Pretty slick - list yourselves in Raynham Center. Top Dog; #1 in town. Where exactly is Raynham Center? Wife and I set out for a quick supper. Son recommended the latest rendition of BB Binks. Seriously, not bad. We've frequented this location since the building was erected and still can't figure out how to properly enter the dining area. The arrows on the front door were an insult. We seated ourselves per the sign and were greeted by an engaging, perky young server. The menu is extensive, the selection of draft beers is impressive and the food proved to be well prepared. Wife, a Reuben and I, fish and chips. Both meals carefully done and tasteful. Pub fare meeting our expectations. We enjoyed the food and will return.
Unfortunately, the negatives abound. With all the ventures that have come and gone from this site, the most often mentioned drawback is the configuration on the building. (Ownership ... listen-up). There has always been something disconcerting about walking thru the "wrong door," and right into the bar. Then, once seated, many tables are less than 10 feet from the bar. How do you cater to a "Family Sports Pub" clientele under these circumstances? Wife and I immediately spotted the new "regulars." 30 degrees outdoors and a 50 something, sleeveless, with a leather vest and a younger dame sidle up to the bar and plant themselves for the night. What is the target demo? Surely not my wife and grandkids. All that vacant space to the opposite side of the bar. Dedicated to entertainment?, I presume. Not income producing. Why is the door to the kitchen on that side of the bar? So inefficient. Relocate the bar to the open area. Use the front door as the entrance to the food service and develop a "Family-friendly restaurant." Any wonder why all other mutations of BB Binks have failed. Food is good; but you can't have the best of both worlds.
The did a great job renovating the restaurant. The service was good, we had a party of eight, and she did a good job checking on us. The food was good, I had a Greek salad, but they forgot to put the feta cheese on, also they have a homemade Greek dressing but it taste more like olive oil. Ever other meal was good. FYI you have to remember this is a sports bar that is reasonably priced. They also have a great selection of beer. Will try this place again!
This restaurant has a very good shotz ,shot, get it?, at being a place to go for pub style food and nice atmosphere. The owner himself is on site to make sure everything is okay with the customers. He checks with you 2 or 3 times during your visit to make sure everything is good. The food is tasty and the service is good. A nice place to unwind after a work day.
This location has seen its fair share of bars and restaurants come and go.  Glad to see something else open up here. The owners did a fair amount of renovations and the place looks great.  We ordered take out from here for the game yesterday.  We had the buffalo chicken dip with chips (awesome), wings (awesome) and the steak bomb sub (also awesome!).  Very impressed with the food and reasonable prices.  Can't wait to go here and check out the live bands, bar specials etc that they offer!
Not happy!  The drive through is crazy over there.  It isnt clearly marked and you have to drive around the building behind dunkin donuts to get to the speaker.  I followed the normal flow of the parking lot and wound up the drive through window without even ordering.  The window staff told me they couldn't serve me because I would be cutting the line.  When I asked her "Really! I just want a kiddie coolata, can't you just make it quick?"  "Nope, sorry sir."  I felt like driving away, but didn't want to dissapoint my kids. Get a sign people can see if you have an abnormal drive though route.  Doesn't matter, I will drive by next time.
~Local coffee drinker.
Some of the subways in the area in  around taunton an rayham need re vapping  the staff is  either new or just to lazy to remember simple things its  hard to mess up a sub but some places do  lol   the one in easton is good  an the  one in the walmart in rayham is good if the manager is on 
Was with a group of people riding out to Mt. Greylock and found this place on the way home. The food was surprisingly good and would definitely go back again.
I went to the Mohawk Park Pub expecting it to be awful.  I was surprised everything was wonderful. great menu....very fresh food and well prepared and served. The wait staff is very nice.  Looking forward to going back.
This is not a fancy place but it does not mean you can't get some good food.  It's a very informal place with lots of local action and friendly wait staff.  The food is good basic stuff and lots of it.  You won't go home hungry.
We've been going for 5 years, going on 6. Each year we bring new people with us, and they love it. We mostly get the same tent site, reserving early March. Bathrooms could be more updated, but all in all, we love it.
Nice campground with deerfield river water front smaller sites. The campground also has a pub with food and drinks. Little cottages also available. Radio out at 11 pm fires out at 1 am.
went rock skipping and dipping in the day use area of the Mohawk State park.  Was a lovely picnic area to relax and enjoy nature. Clean bathrooms a plus. 
We camped july 5 - 12. We had the entire riverfront to ourselves all week until the weekend campers rolled in.  How perfect ! Deb and Paul were very accommodating. Such a peaceful campground. The seasonal campers were very friendly. Can't wait to go back !!!!!!!!!!!!!
We loved it here. Both the restaurant/bar and campground are fun. The riverfront camping was fantastic. Sites are a little on the smaller side and not a lot of shade but you cannot beat the location and view. We were close to Ziplining at Berkshire East too. Would have given an excellent rating but the bathrooms were mediocre and there were only two showers for all the campers in tents. Friendly staff and very relaxed atmosphere. Great for a weekend of camping :) 
When we got there they had rented my site to someone else in our group, Paul (the owner with his wife Deb) showed us another site and he could see we weren’t happy, Paul didn’t have to ask.  He is now driving us around the camp with his golf cart and took us down to the river and what a site!  I have a big rig and this was perfect.  He then kept coming back to check on us to make sure we were happy.  Paul let us borrow a hose and just was great.  That same weekend me and the misses got in a motorcycle accident and where pretty banged up.  I cannot have asked to be in a better place to be when such a bad thing happened. I can't thank the friends we were with enough for all their help along with Paul and deb who where truly concerned for our well being.
Just spent the past weekend on campsites 11-15 with a group of 24 ish year old friends. It was an amazing experience that I was not expecting. The sites are RIGHT on the river, very open, but spaced out nicely. There are picnic tables and fire pits. 

You can rent tubes near by and float down for a couple hours right to your campsite, very scenic. The views of the hills and forests are breathtaking. The over all feel of the people camping/ floating is fun and friendly. Groups consist of college aged, to young families, and locals. Everyone departs in waves based on the timing of a dam release. the dam opened at 11 and and everyone left at 1:30 for the high water, but its easy enough to ask around.

The bar is a rock throw from the campsites and the owner/ staff/ regulars are extremely friendly and helpful, as long as you are respectful of course. We arrived later in the night and were still able to buy wood even though the store was closed, also some seasonal campers offered us fire wood and tubes.

bathrooms and showers were clean and reasonable. 

Loud music is frowned upon but we played some country from our car and partied most of the day and night with out any trouble. As long as youre mindful of people around you and the campsite rules.

Will absolutely go again next year!!!
Didn't know what to expect, being it was my first time. Never read a review, so I was going in blind. Made a reservation for 3 and got to choose from so many beautiful spots (Plot 30 is my favorite). I was to leave that Friday due to the max reservations of campers, but my plot happened to open AGAIN! So we stayed until Sunday.  

Deb (one of the owners) was amazing. Welcomed me and my girlfriend with open arms. Not to mention the amazing campers around us. They gave us more wood we could use. Made really good friends with one of the family's that go every year. They made our trip ll the better and now we plan on going annually.
The owner of the Mohawk Campground is by far one of the vilest human beings I have ever had the displeasure of dealing with. Its a shame b/c the location of the campsites is really nice.

We have camped there a few times b/c we couldn't find another campground on the river, but its just not worth the aggravation. The man who owns it is rude, ignorant and just a nasty person.  Apparently they're supposed to give you a list of rules when you check in, but we the person who checked us in didn't supply us with one. That night while we were cooking our dinner and listening to some music (very low from an iphone hooked up to the truck radio - I had asked our nearby neighbors if it was ok, and to please let me know if they music was too loud or they wanted us to turn it off. They replied that it was totally fine). We had put our hibachi grill on the picnic table - not even lit - and all of the sudden the owner drove up in his little golf cart and started yelling at us to take the grill off the table and turn our music off. We'd broken some of the rules in the non-existent hand-out! I was shocked, rather than ask us nicely and explain the rules - offer to get us a copy - he just shouted at us and threatened to make us leave!

Unfortunately they seem to be the only place where you can camp on the river so sadly they'll keep getting business - but I would highly recommend you avoid this awful, poorly run, dirty (bathrooms are disgusting!) place where customer service is basically non-existent (actually non-existent would be an improvement over the current situation.
Fantastic place where you can hit the river then cruise down and pull into your camp site. Great fun, great people, great atmosphere. The only very minor complaint is the bathrooms are a hike to get to. 
So we've been going up here for years and use to be very family friendly. I noticed over the years that wasn't getting busier and the owner was getting ruder and ruder. The owner is the most money hungry person I HAVE EVER MET! Blames guests for his own kids actions. Had issues with stuff being taken from our site. Also owner has favoritism over seasonals. Treats campers as if they are a POS. Doesn't care if he takes your money and kicks you out.  The fire wood is over priced for the amount of wood you get and barely burns. bathrooms are always disgusting as well as showers. Pub is great however i think there food is over priced and the portions are very very very small. DO NOT recommend anyone to stay at this place, wouldn't even recommend my dead animals to stay there thats how horrible this place is. However we found two lovely places around the location that are very friendly and dog friendly.
Nice location on the Deerfield River. the site we had was large but some of the other sites are tiny. Bathroom is a hike away too. Free showers were OK. Bar and restaurant on property, but we didn't go there. I hear they have entertainment on Sat nights but not the weekend we were there.
Heard great things about the food here so stopped in after zip lining at Zoar Outdoor. It was late afternoon on a Sunday. The bar was busy it most of the tables were empty. We waited 45 minutes for our food. While I thought my turkey sandwich was fine, my table mates were not happy with tether the steak tips or burger. The waitress was pleasant but in attentive. Very disappointing. It does look like a fun bar. I think they have live music on Saturday nights.
We frequent this restaurant often as we have a summer place in Heath. So it was a no brainer to take my aunt there for her birthday dinner. BIG MISTAKE!!! We arrived before it got crowded,my aunt ordered coffee,took one sip and that was it. Asked the waitress for another cup,fresh because it was clearly old and the response we got was, "it happens, it sits on the burner all day". We informed her we were waiting for two more people and that was the last we saw of her. The rest of our party arrived and we sat there for 15-20 minutes while our server waited on others that arrived after. Finally I got up and asked the hostess to let our waitress know the rest of our party was here and could we please get them some water. 5 minutes later a different waitress came and she CLEARLY was in a bad mood. Served them water in plastic cups,forgot the lemon. Took our order, was distracted but things around her, got annoyed with us when we asked her to speak up. Never returned to our table, forgot our appetizers. Then, in a very rude tone, asked us if we still wanted them. The food was horrible!!!! I took two bites and was done. And did I mention that the first waitress and the second waitress argued with, what I assume was the manager, about waiting on us. Waitress #1 was upset she was replaced which I did not request. Right there for us to hear and see. Totally unprofessional!! As a customer service manager,with years of experience training people in the automotive industry,and a former waitress myself, I was appalled!!! One of our guests had never been there and assured us she will never return. I can only hope this was a fluke. Nevertheless, our unhappiness was clear and not so much as an apology. Money NOT well spent.
Like others I have ridden by here on my motorcycle on my way to someplace else. Now that we own a motor home I noticed the campers on the property and the location right on the Deerfield River. Sweet!
 The rates for our campsite were reasonable for water and electric. Our site, # 98 was perfect. It was the first site that we ever went to where we didn't have to get level. We were forewarned not to leave food out because they have a bear visitor. I thought that was cool and hoped he would drop by to pay us a visit. BTW, it was a cub so I wasn't too concerned.
 I awoke early in the morning and with the early morning fog upon the river I happened to catch a glance of a fly fisherman on the other side of the river. It was almost surreal and that image helped me make up my mind that I want to return there in the Fall with my fly rod and do some fishing there.
I've ridden past this place countless times in my car and on my motorcycle and just figured it was a dive. Never would've stopped since I'm never staying in the area and am always cruising past at top speed. Camped up the road last weekend and one of my camping pals insisted this place served good food. I was skeptical....and I was SO wrong!

Talk about a hidden gem! And it's like Snoopy's doghouse interior-wise. Lackluster on the outside, cozy and inviting on the inside. The food was really good. Fresh veggies in the big salads, wonderfully prepared seafood (who wudda thunk it?), delicious turkey burgers and remarkably ungreasy fried fish, clams and fries. 

Don't just drive on by if you're hungry. This place is WAY better than any of the roadside tourist traps further west in North Adams. Yum yum!
We live up the road from the Mohawk Pub. It's a place where hearty food is always available. Paul runs a fine kitchen that can feed a couple at the bar or a party of twenty in the dining room. Our after Thanksgiving dinner for our family of nine was served quickly. Full plates soon became empty plates surrounded by wide smiles. From fried clams to steak, portions are ample with tasty sides. Even the grand kids ate their veggies. Don't expect fine dining; just great food.
I've been here a few times. The breakfast during the week is better than on the weekends. Portions are a lot more. The quality is the same ( that's good ) the reason I'm giving it 4 stars is the for the reason that you better not be in a rush, unless you are there early on a week day.
Very nice cafe by the roadside.  Food for the 4 of us was excellent.  Service was exceedingly slow though, waiting at least 20 minutes for our order to be taken then over an hour for the food to be served and this was only sandwiches for lunch.  The server was lovely and very energetic but working alone and explained that they were short handed that day.  Ok.  I would definitely go back and try it again.
Great food! Fast friendly and convenient service. Good menu with a variety of choices. Our waitress rose was super sweet ❤
We happened upon this little restaurant after biking. Sore, we wandered in and were greeted by very friendly people. Before we sat down, they had our drinks coming. Good menu. I had clam chowder and half a curry chicken sandwich. My wife got a custom sandwich with turkey cheese and a bunch of other stuff on a croissant. She had several cups of coffee. A nice low key place that we could relax in without feeling rushed. Felt like a restaurant that local folks would hang out in.
We left just feeling good and relaxed.
We stopped in for coffee while driving the Mohawk Trail--the coffee was very good and as we watched people's orders coming out we wished we had not already eaten breakfast. Service was friendly and the place had a nice feel.
Didn't expect much when we stopped here for lunch before white water rafting. We were very happy with our meals. Other than that they were out of several items, all were pleased with their meals. Keep it simple and you won't be disappointed
Nice little cafe with wonderful food, but couldn't come close to handling business at near maximum capacity. We were a group of 7 adults and two children. We waited about 45 min for our food (which was absolutely delicious). Unfortunately my youngest daughter's pancakes were forgotten. Server informed us they would make them up right away. 15 min later she came back to tell us they had dropped them on the floor but would remake them right away. Offered a fruit cup on the house to hold her over. In the meantime everyone has just about finished eating and are trying to keep my two year old daughter happy while she waits for her pancakes. Another 15 min later the pancakes arrived. She devoured them and when asked about the missing fruitcup we were told the kitchen was unwilling to make it for us. It was a bit of a slap in the face as we were so patient and understanding as each unfortunate circumstance unfolded. If you are willing to sacrifice time and good service for good food, this may be the place for you. Despite the wonderful food, we left with a bit of a bad taste in our mouths.
Stopped in for dinner... home-cooked lasagna and fried clams delicious .. portions were huge.. staff was friendly and layer back.. nice atmosphere 
We are there last year at the Oktoberfest and thought we'd bring some out of town visiting friends to enjoy the ambience.  Our sandwiches were delicious and seven quickly. The waiter was attentive and filled our water glasses frequently after we asked for more just once. It was a hot day in late June and we were thirsty! 

Will go back again soon!
Myself, my wife, my sister-in-law, and two nephews came for a quick lunch before doing the canopy tour at Zoar Outdoors (right next door). Hoping to get a sandwich that wasn't too heavy... oh well.

I got the Barnyard Burger, my wife got the Pulled Pork sandwich, sister-in-law got a Chicken Parmesan sandwich, both nephews got Nachos... and they were uniformly superb. Menu was outstanding (lots of other choices, this restaurant alone would be a reason to come back to Charlemont). Service was not the fastest, but staff was friendly, well-informed, and very pleasant.
3 of us went here for lunch after going to the Lavender Festival in Buckland. Cold River was recommended by two of the vendors who said it beats any of the restaurants in Shelburne Falls. I can't compare but we enjoyed our lunches. They have a large menu with interesting choices. They also had several seafood specials. I had the BLAT: bacon, lettuce, avocado & tomato on wheat. Very tasty. Another had the spicy veggie burger which she said was delicious and spicy as advertised.  All sandwiches come with a choice of 2 sides so we both got fries & broccoli slaw, with about 6 other items we could select from. The slaw was excellent; fries were good. All together, it was too much food but very good. The 3rd person got the chicken quesadilla appetizer and liked it. We got to sit outside, as it was a beautiful day. Service was good. The liquor store was popular but the restaurant was also very busy and with good reason. Stop by if you are in the area.
A very popular place on weekend mornings for all societal and hobbyist backgrounds. Certainly a stop-off spot for many out-of-towners as the Berkshire East outdoor recreation facility is nearby. While things get a little busy at times there is ample indoor and outdoor patio space available and the service is very efficient and friendly. The cafe is well frequented by local customers also, which gives it a neighborly appeal to everyone who visits! 
Waited over 45 minutes for a egg sandwich on a bagel. Ordered 8 sandwiches for my party as we wanted to grab a bite before we went zip lining and we were 20 minutes late to our reservation. We watched at least 5 local customers get there meals and bagels before we did. Not until we went complained did the fire get lit and we got our food shortly after.One good note was the bagel did taste very good but wait was painful.
We stopped here while taking a trip along the Mohawk Trail. The service is excellent and the waitresses were super friendly and extremely nice. The food is delicious and it was great to sit out on the patio and enjoy the view. We stopped for lunch and tried the corn fritters for an appetizer. Just like I make at home, but have never thought of serving them with maple syrup. Delicious. Certainly would stop again if we're ever in the area.
Super friendly staff with an outdoor patio overlooking the countryside and mountains. Loved the breakfast sandwiches!
Whenever we are in the area, we have to stop in at Cold River Cafe. If you like curry, they have a curry chicken salad that is so good. I love it on a croissant. They won't give out the recipe though.
Cold River Cafe was the first place that we saw open for breakfast on a Sunday morning after descending from the Mohawk Trail summit in the direction of Greenfield. It looked popular, based on the myriad vehicles in the parking lot and we were quite hungry at 11 a.m. Some diners sat outside on the cold, drizzly day, but we went inside, where we found one table vacant in the casual L-shaped dining room. 

Though we got seated promptly, it took about 10 minutes for a waitress to appear. While waiting, we got menus off the counter to peruse and were impressed with the large number of offerings, which mostly focused on eggs. When we eventually had the opportunity to order, I learned my first two choices were out. I ended up ordering a blueberry muffin ($2.49). It tasted like corn meal and was extremely dense, an unexpected flavor and consistency, which I disliked. My husband selected a Belgian waffle ($4.99) and a side of corned beef hash ($5.49). He liked the waffle but found the hash to be extremely greasy and lack the flavor of corned beef. I also had a cup of coffee, which was way too weak.

Perhaps we should have chosen one of the cafe's egg dishes, which we saw on most tables. But we did get something to eat to sustain us for a long drive ahead, and that was our main objective.
Got the one egg on an English muffin breakfast.  $3.99 and very good and filling.  Nice little restaurant in a town of not many eating places.
The menu is large, and all choices are excellent. The portions are substantial, and the wait staff are friendly and fun.
I had the Reuben excellent. Others had fish sandwich pulled pork everyone love it. Very friendly and welcoming staff 
Stumbled on this place looking for an early lunch.  The staff accommodated 14 of us quickly and checked on us regularly.  To the surprise of several New Yorker's the pizza was excellent; we really loved the specialty pies.
This place isn't very good. So slow and you can make pizza at home and would be better than there's. very expensive for its location. I've had a grinder there that I would consider eatable.  
Stopped here for lunch; SUPERB !!!  Their pizza was terrific - hot and crispy thin bottom!! The place is clean and fun to eat on deck to view mountain.
My family and I had dinner and breakfast here. We shared a Bershire pizza which was delicious and the crust was perfect. Service was prompt and curtious. Amazing beers on tap and by the bottle. We ate on the covered deck which had a great view of the mountains and the river behind the restaurant. 

Breakfast was a classic american style platter. I had bacon, sunny side eggs, and toast as well as hash browns. All of it was cooked to my request. Great bacon by the way. The coffee was great too.

I would absolutely eat here again for any meal if I could.
We went as a family and ordered as a group. it was quite a wait until my Father and my Grandmother got their food. It was another hour and about a half longer until my Sister, Mother or I saw our food and in addition to that we were asked if we ordered anything. During the time we where waiting my Father and I (we were sitting closest to the counter) heard the cashier say 'its not my fault I'm terrible at my job' a number of times. I had order chicken tenders and got the smallest basket I had ever seen and my chicken was burned and my fries soggy. My Sister and Father agree the tomato sauce was basically ketchup. My Mother had asked for a second coffee before we left and never got it and her first one didn't come out until after my Father and Grandmother's food.     

While we were waiting we saw two other groups come and leave and the two tables next to us had had their orders mixed up.

(we'd had sat in the front of the building) our lunch had be come our dinner.
I really wanted to rate this place higher.  The staff are friendly, the outdoor dining is nice, and we were seated promptly.  But the service is slow and disorganized.  It seems like the kitchen is just too small to keep up with the takeout and dine-in orders.  Total time in the restaurant was about two hours, just for pizza & wings, no dessert or extra drinks.  We got our pizza about an hour after sitting down.  Our one sandwich order was incorrect and the kitchen was too backed up to re-do it.  Overall, the pizza was OK, but nothing special.  All this said, we visited on Saturday, about 6 PM, so it was probably their busiest time of the week.  Prices were a little on the high side, about 10-20% more than expected for pizza and the sandwich, and 50-75% more for the wings.
We sat out on the deck and enjoyed both a wonderful view and an excellent meal.  They have more than pizza so don't hesitate if pizza isn't what you are craving.  Their menu is varied with lots of choices that all sounded good. . Everything we had was top notch.
After being on motorcycles for a few hours. We came upon this wonderful little place. Great back deck! Awesome and most friendly staff. The owners actually had a 'regular' conversation with us. They were most gracious and welcoming. The prices are reasonable and have a variety to taste.  We have to go back soon and I would highly recommend to anyone. 
From the front it looks like just another pizza place, but the beautiful back deck, great food, and friendly owner combined to make this a great place for eating and relaxing after a long day. Try the cheeseburger pizza if you want something unusual and tasty.
The brand new deck is fantastic with uncontaminated views of the countryside and mountains. The food (and beer) is absolutly fantastic. The staff is super friendly and happy to chat. So looking forward to going back!!!
We were visitng the area before relocati and went on the recommendation of someone in the general store. This place was a great find. The cheeseburger pizza was dleicious, the crust a perfect combination of soft with harder edges. And the cobb salad was delicious. We will definietly be back!
The servers heated up the back deck for us to use, and the views were beautiful.
Stopped in after zip lining and we have to say that the boys are still talking about the food!  Wonderful customer service and the pizza was exceptionally good!  Boys also commented on the "awesome" milkshakes!  Will be back!
the potato pizza is our favorite and they have gluten free crusts as well. The place is small but the staff is always friendly.  The menu has enough variety to keep the whole family happy.  In the nice weather they have a nice deck out back.
While waiting for our wraps to get toasted - the review prior is right, the oven must be very small, and the folks are not in a hurry - it was no fun watching the staff bare handed picking up slices of pie and putting on plates or in the oven, then taking result cards and using the cash register. Only when my husband walked over and looked to see if their scores were posted did one person out on gloves but he still had them on while handling the next set of credit cards (ugh). No fun eating lunch after that...
Just a short drive from Berkshire east. After our zip  line adventure we stopped here for lunch at the recommendation of our tour guides. Ordered the turkey  on a spinach wrap and it was delicious. Reasonably priced  , friendly and quick customer service. We enjoyed our meal outdoors at one of the picnic tables. Loved the fall decorations and the great idea of the table artwork displays !!!!
The pizza a really good but the service sucked. It took us forever to get served. We were there as a group but on separate checks. I was the first to order and the last to get my pizza...which was the wrong one. They did finally get it right but did nothing to comp the screw up.
Good value:  very good pizza and huge caesar salad (big enough for 2).  We sat on the new deck in the back which was very comfortable and well lit. Waiter was on his own and very busy but very nice. Only drawback was smokers.
Very good thin crust pizza. Good size slices, fair price. They let the children choose a prize from a small prize box...very nice touch to help keep the kids quiet while waiting for the pizza.
We all agreed that the 'Berkshire' was the best pizza we've had. And we are old...and we are city people! There's lots of pizza in our pasts.
My daughter, son in law and I happened upon Berkshire Pizzeria after our zip lining adventure.  The food was wonderful and the owner is so friendly.  We were adventuring in the area again today and just had to stop in again.  Great grinders and pizza again.  I highly recommend this place if you are in the area.  He is expanding to include outdoor tables.
When we stay at our summer retreat in Hawley this is where we usually get our morning coffee and breakfast sandwiches. It's a cute little place with friendly people and exceptionally good coffee.
A simple breakfast had turned into HOURS worth of waiting for food.  When food arrived it barely edible.
Adorable place with yummy coffee and pastries! The chia tea and flavored coffee are excellent. We had a pumpkin pastry just in time to say hello to fall, delish! 
Drove by on my way to my rental cabin. Nice, friendly staff. Latte was very good as well as a nice selection of baked goods. Cute building and interior.
This was a complete surprise.  The coffee was good and the muffins were excellent.  The service was fantastic.  Add to that, the price was beyond reasonable.
If your looking for some homemade simple food this is the place. Like a grilled cheese and tomato soup.. good stuff. Great ice coffee.
We were taking a fall drive, enjoying the leaves and felt like having a snack.  What a treat we found here at the Coffee Bean!  Friendly staff served us huge pieces of home made pumpkin pie and pumpkin ice cream.  Good food at good prices.
breakfast food and muffins were so good, not super speedy or any fancy coffee, but very solid place with great food and service.
Stopped in the late morning on the way to a nearly ziplining tour.  Coffee was quite good but the bked good selection was a little thin at this time (post morning rush perhaps?).  They grilled up a nice ham & egg sandwich for my son which he gobbled without complaint. Staff were friendly and the prices were very good, recommended.
4 of us took a day to drive the Mohawk Trail in October 2013 and needed a casual coffee shop/rest house to take a break from driving.  The location, setting, coffee, and service were all great and the individual working at The Coffee Bean gave us great information regarding the location.  Highly recommended for a nice resting point on the Mohawk Trail to enjoy the surroundings and have a great cup of coffee.  Will definitely stop by next time we have the opportunity to drive through this beautiful area!
My husband and I stopped here for lunch Memorial Day Weekend. We ordered 2 Chef Salads and 2 waters for $17. The salads were iceberg only, peeled off in large pieces and laid on the plate with large pieces of lunch meat laid on top of that and about 1/2 a tomato.  No cheese or egg. The lettuce was brown and speckled...the pieces one would normally throw out, not serve to someone.  We did ask for half out money back. The young waitress was very nice and we felt so bad for her, we just didn't have the heart to ask for the whole amount back. She's the only reason for the one star rating. We have traveled quite a bit and this was, by far, the worst food ever served to us. 
Really friendly staff, and such great great tasty food, for value prices. We'll definitely stop by next time we're in the area
You can get a decent sandwich here fast and it's the only place in town where you do that, plus coffee and donut, so this is an essential for the town.  Otherwise you have to go to Shelburne Falls.  Unless you want to stop at the gas station.
Stopped here after zip lining.  Ice cream was good, place was clean and guys were fun & friendly.  That is all I have to say about that.
Excellent for Breakfast and lunch! Great food & Nice people. Definitely give it a try if you are at Zoar Outdoor!
The food here was really good for both breakfast and lunch. My only complaint was that I ordered the hashbrowns and was told they didn't have any more. Disappointing, but the omelet was tasty and my sandwich I ordered at lunch was very good. Good place to go for a quick, no-frills bite. 
After spending the night camping we went out in search of a local place that served coffee and breakfast and stumbled across Coffee Bean - it was perfect! Good coffee and breakfast sandwiches. No complaints.
We stopped at the Coffee Bean a few times and were very impressed! The service there is great and the food is excellent. When we stopped in this time, they were serving ice cream. A meal and dessert all in the same place. We will definitely stop back again when we are on the Mohawk Trail.
Just a small shop with very reasonable prices, and a few tables. We stopped by for breakfast two days in a row (did notice they serve ice cream as well).  We were very happy with the service and the food.  Customers order at the register and the food is brought over to you when it is ready.  One day we tried the Zipper Special: French Toast with 2 sausage for around $5 and another day we tried the breakfast sandwiches under $5.  The coffee was delicious and generous as well.  Happy to support this local business, close to Hawk Mountain Lodge and Berkshire East Canopy Tours if you are looking for a close cheap-eat.  They serve lunch as well and just extended their hours for the Summer from 7:30 a.m. to 9 p.m.
I was driving thru town, on a business trip, and i decided to stop in and get some lunch. This was a   quaint little restaurant that served breakfast all day, i had probably one of if not the best omelettes i have ever had. it was wonderful. after lunch i decided to have a scoop of ice cream. I was informed they get their ice cream locally. Very delicious ice cream and at a great price. I hope i have business in the area again just so i can stop by.
Our friends and us stopped here during a sunny day leaf watching expedition. It was almost 4pm so we stopped for something light before continuing on. We sat on the second floor balcony taking in the view. My wife and our friends had the soup of the day which as the Wisconsin cheddar cheese with bacon and I had the fried appetizer sampler which includes chicken nuggets, veggies and more. I also had a glass of wine while they had water.
They indicated the soup was excellent and they were glad they ordered it. My food was lightly fried and it did not suffer from being oily.
We are tempted to return for lunch or dinner.
From the outside, the restaurant looks like a nice place.  However, the food was a disappointment, although perhaps it was what we chose.  I had a salad and crabcakes, while my partner had the steak marinated in red wine.  Service was cordial, but tables had plastic (!) tablecloths and plastic flowers.  Not really worth the visit.
We went here to watch the sunset. We made a reservation, but that wasn't necessary as the place was fairly empty. I ordered a bowl if the chowder. It was overly salty and had few clams and potatoes.  Just so so. Your meal comes with a kidney bean relish. It was actually quite good, but the crackers were all stale. John had the chicken stuffed with apples. He thought the crust was too done and didn't really like the meal. I had the Jacked Up Scallops. It was decent, looked good. I warmed up the leftovers the next day and wasn't impressed. I would say go here for the view and order something simple. Nothing worse than a restaurant trying to doll up their menu, but not foot the bill as far as quality and taste. Maybe just go for dessert. We had the chocolate fudge cake. It was fine, but taste a bit stale. Probably better in the midst of the summer.
We stayed at Whitcomb Summit Retreat and, with your key, you get a discount at the Golden Eagle, the closest restaurant. We got there early and had a table with a view across to Mt Greylock. We had a tasty meal as the very large dining room slowly filled with families and groups. We learned that several previous buildings had been destroyed by out-of-control vehicles coming down the steep hill and not making it around the switchback; the current building is safely tucked behind a wall of bedrock!
Make sure you get a seat outside on the front porch. The view is spectacular. The food is average, but good. The service was excellent.
It's a nice little restaurant on a hairpin turn overlooking the valley. The surrounding roads are scenic and typical crowds consist of motorcycles and automotive enthusiasts.

Food and service are good, so it's definitely worth a stop if you're out and about for a scenic drive.
The food here is some of the best. The black diamond steak is always cooked perfect as is the prime rib. There is also a deck that overlooks North Adams that you can eat out on.
I would drive here just for the burgers. Definently a place to go if you want to get the all American cuisine taste right here in Massachusetts. Wonderful staff and of course the view is amazing.
There is a spectacular view of North Adams. The restaurant, as the name implies, is perched above the hairpin turn on the Mohawk Trail. The roast beef is terrific and the menu overalll is terrific both for travelers and locals looking for a special occasion.
The siting of this restaurant, at the famous hairpin turn on MA Rte 2 offers stunning views of the landscape and wonderful sun sets from its upstairs balcony.  And nobody was sitting inside.   But don't let the sunset on your meal lest you miss out on very nicely prepared offering of fresh salads, and tasty meats and fish.  The trout is superb.  Decent wine and very good beer are on hand to compliment your meal.  And it won't empty your wallet either.  .
With horrible accommodations in Williamstown, MA we headed to Golden Eagle for a planned dinner. Looked a little iffy when we entered(having such a bad hotel experience) What a surprise. Beautiful dinner, excellent service. amazing prices for the food. The scenery cannot be beat. We ate, drank, laughed alot. can not wait to go back. (Not to the hotel though) !!! Met local folks who were so great. can say enough.
The views from the deck of the second floor restaurant are jaw dropping -- perhaps second only to the views from the top of Mt. Greylock.   Of course, you can see the view without eating at the Golden Eagle, but you would be making a big mistake.   This is one of the quintessential "summer in the Berkshires" experiences -- dining outside at the Golden Eagle.   Don't let the exterior fool you, this is not just a place to go for a burger; they have a full menu and the meals are excellent.   Some of our favorites are the Veal Marsala, the Chicken Almandine and the Fish and Chips.   

The Golden Eagle is just a short drive from North Adams, or you could stop for lunch or dinner on your way to the Berkshires from Boston via the Mohawk Trail.   Pick a beautiful day so you can sit outside and enjoy the view!   Try to catch the sunset from the Eagle's eye!
The Golden Eagle Restaurant is located at the Hairpin Turn on the Mohawk Trail.  This landmark restaurant has commanding views of North Adams and the Berkshires beyond from the parking lot and the deck and upstairs dining room.  In the fall, the foliage makes the views even more dramatic. 

I’d been here as a child on a trip via the Mohawk Trail and again later with an aunt.  Today, the building is much the same as I remembered it; however, the observation tower that was once at the far end of the building is now gone as is the gift shop which has been replaced by a bar.  

On this visit, I ate lunch in the upstairs dining room at a table near a window.  

I was greeted and seated immediately.  My beverage order was taken promptly.  

I ordered the Turkey Gobbler Sandwich at $12.00 + 84 cents Mass. Meals Tax for a total of $12.84.  It featured real turkey sliced from the bone, stuffing, cranberry sauce, and melted provolone cheese.  It was baked on a hoagie roll.  Turkey gravy was served on the side as a dipping sauce.  French fries came with the meal. 

It was about a 15-minute wait for my order.  The sandwich was well prepared.  It was delicious.  The turkey slices were slightly thick just like Thanksgiving turkey.  I really enjoyed it.  The fries were good. 
 
Service was good.

I recommend The Golden Eagle Restaurant.  I’d eat here again. 
 
If you found this review helpful, please click THANK below.
It is located next to the famous "Hair Pin" Curve.  The food is excellent.  The staff was extremely helpful, and provided great service.  There is a more formal dining area upstairs, and a bar with tables downstairs.  We really want to go back when the weather is better, and dine on the balcony.
Upstairs dining area overlooks No. Adams from airplane height.  Downstairs has nice bar.  Great food.  Amazing scenic spot.
As Joan and others have said, the view is spectacular, but our meal was a disaster.  I took my mother on Easter, just the two of us, as the rest of the family was traveling.  If you want water, order bottled water.  The tap water had an odd smell.  My filet mignon was decently tender, but it was not medium rare as I ordered: closer to medium well.  The sauce added nothing to the flavor.  I was glad it was served on the side.
My mother ordered the swordfish.  Since it was the special, you would think it would be fresh.  She needed a knife to cut it.  And when she got into it, she found it was not cooked.  Swordfish is not a sushi type of fish: it needs to be cooked.

Our server, however, was excellent.  When we showed her the fish, she agreed that it was not done.  She got another piece that was at least cooked right, but it was still not very tender.  

Our server was overall extremely helpful and pleasant.  But the food in a restaurant is the most important item.
Come here for a drink on the deck when it is warm. Skip the food.
I have mixed reviews for the golden eagle.. Here is why.. The view is absolutely breathtaking, picturesque and undoubtedly beautiful on the outside..patio seating is a must during the warm weather. The inside, upstairs dining room is a bit outdated and the bar area downstairs reminds me of the movie, the shining..red room lol.. Now about the food, I have eaten here numerous times throughout the years and I can only describe it as hit or miss... I like the wait staff, they are very friendly
We ate here one evening with friends, while traveling in the Berkshires and along the Mohawk trail. The location is amazing as it's right on the famous Hairpin Bend, and overlooks a valley and wooded hills beyond. The restaurant is upstairs, so the view in the day must be great (we wee there at night).
The food was very good, and well presented, and our waitress very friendly and helpful. The menu is not extensive, but  does have a number of local specialities.  Prices were also pretty reasonable. I wouldn't mind returning to have a meal during the day sometime.
This used to be the highlight of our annual leaf-peeping drive but I am sad to say that, while the view is as spectacular as always, the food this year was barely edible. I ordered a bacon cheeseburger, medium.  I got a char-broiled hockey puck. When my husband tasted it, he immediately chased it down with some of his tartar sauce to kill the aftertaste. He had ordered clam chowder and the fried seafood platter. Everything was over-cooked, bordering on burnt. Scallops were literally the color of meatballs. Even the chowder was beige and tasted scalded. 
I've lived here my whole life. This is only my second time here. Last year went food was ok. Decided to give another shot. Main reason for going was for the most absolute perfect view in the Berkshires. Went last night with family for my boyfriends birthday. Family members have said horrible things about this place but we still wanted to give it a shot. They only had downstairs open on Sundays. It was full. Our waitress was nice enough but service alone sucked. There was 8 of us but the wait and everything about our experience was not necessary. She only had us and maybe 2 other tables. Took 20 minutes to get drinks. DO NOT drink the water. It tastes like a pond. Smelled like it too. We all got salads literally an hour for those. Not one of our salads was right. I have celiac and no crotons and they were on it. Trying to get the waitress attention was a joke though. French onion soup not horrible but had one clump of cheese at the bottom. Not my idea of French onion soup. The special was rib eye. All fat couldn't even cut it.  Comes with mashed potatoes and broccoli.. An hour and a half our meals come out.. 10 min later the potatoes. Tastes like instant gone bad.. Didn't touch them. Oh and the broccoli another 10 min. A cup smaller than a tea cup with 2 tiny pieces of broccoli and a bite of squash. 2 hours for all this food. Not one of us enjoyed anything we had. Waste of money and time. If you come to NORTH ADAMS go see the view at the road. Eat elsewhere. This place is horrible. If it wasn't for the gorgeous sunset would have got a 1 star. Gross
Unfortunately for me, dominoes is one of the few places around here that actually have gluten free crust. I usually get the chicken bacon ranch specialty pizza on gluten free crust and it is smaller than a regular small pizza, if you have it delivered.. It costs over $17.. I can only have it every once in awhile. My family gets pizza here and doesn't say much other than its average but the wings are the worst all of us has ever had..mushy and fatty and just awful
The Spinach artisan pizza (thin crust) was a great surprise. The crust is thin and crispy, the topping delicious.
Hey, you can order online and almost avoid talking to a human altogether! What's not great about that? Delivery service, basic menu, nothing fancy...but pizza is, well, Domino's pizza. Gets the job done.
Basic lakeside fare, good and convenient if you're not a BBQ-er. Everything tastes good outside with a beautiful New England view!
We stay for a week in Whitingham and when we go out for breakfast we have always gone into Wilmimgton but this place is awesome. The breakfasts are from the usual fair to the unusual and excellent. The Cafe has such a personal touch of antiquities and a great local charm super friendly. A must visit. 
This is your MUST-STOP-to-EAT restaurant.  

Cute, cozy, and beyond amazing, delicious!  Their Bronx Omelet is... well, I have no words.  It's too incredible to use 'mere words' to describe.

Truly, this is THE place to eat!
We go to Emma's often for weekend breakfasts.  We love the old timey décor, traditional American food, nice people, everything about it.  Just remember to bring cash, they don't take cards.
**Trip Advisor Sticker on door but not listed on Trip Advisor website**

Burger was good. To make it a combo is an additional $3.00... really? For a side of fries and a small pop? Really? Not worth it. About lost my mind when the unattentive waitresses if that's what you want to call them did nothing but talk and laugh between themselves. Not once asking us about our meal. At one point the girl with the short hair in back and curly on top was laughing and fell to the floor... THE FLOOR. She got up and kept talking and laughing. Not once after she got up off the floor did she wash her hands. DISGUSTING. Should I go into the amount if flies inside the restaurant? Or the decor that had no rhyme or reason? No, I will leave that alone. Recommend this to anyone? NO. The food yes was good. Nothing was worth going back.
My husband and I visited on July 13, 2014. You walk up to the counter to order, and they have a pretty limited a la carte menu. I ordered the classic hamburger and my husband ordered the Chubby, one of their specialty burgers. My husband also ordered a large chocolate shake. We decided to add combos to our orders because we were particularly hungry, so they added fries and a soda for $3. All of our food came to $25.

We chose where to sit. There is pretty limited seating because it is a small place, but it was comfortable, clean and well decorated for a small burger place. The only downside we saw was that there was only seating for 4 people. We were thinking of bringing family back if the food was good, but there was no place for all of us to sit. In fact, the larger groups that came in split up across a couple tables across the restaurant.

The girl at the counter said that she would bring my husband's shake to him, but when it was ready, they just yelled "Large Shake!" No name with it or anything. So all of the people who ordered the large shake went up to the counter and finally figured out who it was for then. One name yelled with it and it would have made all the difference.

The person who brought our food out must not have had much of a voice that day because he would come out and say in almost a whisper who the food was for and just stand in the middle of the room. I was sitting next to him and I couldn't hear the names he was saying. He finally ended up walking to each table asking if "Name" was at the table. A new system for finding customers should be put in place (numbers, perhaps?). 

When our food came out, my meal was made wrong. I had asked for the classic burger and received a cheeseburger instead. When I brought my meal up to the counter, someone at a table near the counter said, "See, she received a cheeseburger too when she was supposed to receive a hamburger." A few minutes later, they brought a hamburger out for me (with twice as many thick-cut steak fries as before, so that was a plus). The food was amazing. The burgers were grilled perfectly, fresh toppings, great bun, and the fries. Oh, the fries. The fries were delicious. My husband loved his burger as well.

As we were eating, a young guy (I'd say in his teens), was working. By working, I mean using his hat to kill flies that were buzzing around the restaurant. At one point, he killed one on the table, swiped it off with his hand into his other hand, and then carried it somewhere. He never came back to clean the table, and for all I know, never cleaned his hands. My husband joked that the flies must be what make the hamburgers taste so good (glad I was done with my burger at that point).

If you go, keep your group to four people. If you don't want cheese on your hamburger (and they do have a separate cheeseburger option), specifically tell them that under no circumstances do you want cheese. Also, sit close to the counter so that you can hear when they bring out your food, and don't eat anything off of the tables.
I have only been there for breakfast, but of all the times I've been there (and it's been a lot), I have NEVER been disappointed. You get plenty of food for your money and will definitely leave with a full belly. I love their Corned beef hash, yum, yum!
Lindas Cafe serves hearty servings of your favorite breakfasts - eggs, omelets, pancakes, etc. The staff is very friendly, the service was quick, the food was very good (and plenty of it) and the prices were very inexpensive. We enjoyed eggs and french toast and would go back again for a filling breakfast before a long day of hiking.
This is a hearty breakfast and lunch spot for North Adams locals. They serve a great breakfast with blueberry pancakes. We like to come with friends for the rubens on Tursdays. There are daily specials and great soups by cup or bowl. The atmosphere is seedy but homey. The staff, where everybody knows your name, is a hoot. 
I have been going there for years, and never have had a bad breakfast. Local owners with a huge amount of food to eat. Great prices too!
I love Lindas Cafe! Its the go to spot for Breakfast in North Adams. You get a home cooked meal at a fabulous price. The place is very small and it does tend to get packed. One needs to be patient when coming here because food orders could take a while due to the grill being so small and their pancakes so huge! Its well worth the wait! I suggest coming here for Breakfast when in town. The best breakfast spot there is!
Dirty Place and Owner. Food was runny and I feel the Health Dept should be called. Noisy and Nasty. so Yuck
We stopped in to try their breakfast a little before 10:30 on a Sunday.  We barely made it through the door when a female employee behind the counter called out "We're closed."  It was such an uncomfortable way to be greeted, made worse by the fact that it was called out in front of the entire dining room.  We felt confused, uncomfortable and very unwelcome.  Surely someone could have approached us near the door, thanked us for coming, told us their hours and invited us to come back another day.  As we left we checked the door and the window and didn't see the hours posted anywhere, although we did notice the closed sign at that point.  Halfway to our car I decided to double back and ask what their hours were, in the event we wanted to give them a second chance another day.  As I walked in alone this time, I was greeted by two staffers, in unison, saying "We're closed" .... again.  As if it was necessary to double team me ... what?  Did they think I came back hoping to be seated alone as my partner stood by the car outside?  Bizarre.  I told them I understood that they were closed and just had a question.  As I waited in a quieter spot where we could talk privately after they finished delivering food to their tables ... I saw the original woman scratch her nose using her middle finger as she walked toward me. Seriously?  Have never logged on to write a bad review of a business before.  I'm a local resident and am embarrassed to think that people passing through my town might think this is our version of hospitality.
Quaint place to have breakfast and lunch. I had the corn beef hash and eggs and it was delicious. Great and friendly service would go there again..
Early morning breakfast or mid day lunch , this place is the best home cooking in the area . All meals are home made and cooked fresh right before you . It's like sitting in your grandma's kitchen and having breakfast or lunch . Home style food in a home style setting .
Good diner with everyday foods .. nothing really stands out but it is good food and healthy portions .
Only open until 11AM, so get there early!  We arrived at 10:30 on Sunday and had our choice of tables.  Kitchen was a bit slow but food was fine (poached eggs, home fries, egg sandwich).
It's cash only, so be aware!
Standard breakfast food. But no pancakes. Coffee was ok and service fair. The whole place could maybe do with a clean and certainly the rest rooms need work. Cheap and filling, but there are better places
Having breakfast at Linda's is like walking into a place that time forgot. Wonderful staff, good food and the friendly atmosphere makes this a must every time we come to the Berkshires. Don't expect fancy, or hi-end. This is where you go for dependability and hospitality- plus great food at a fair price. If you come during the Christmas, the decorations are a HOWL! We have enjoyed pancakes, omlets and corned beef hash. Its all good.
It's small, it's packed, and it's a breakfast must. The food was delicious and all 3 of us cleaned our plates. My eggs were cooked perfectly. The service was good, and parking was plenty. Not the greatest looking neighborhood, but worth the vist. FYI - cash only. 
Great lil' breakfast spot. Standard fare. As long as they can cook a decent poached egg AND serve good homemade hash, I'm a happy camper! Lots of locals eating here, too. Always a good sign!
We like Linda's for breakfast.  You walk in the door & the coffee is set down in front of you.  You greet all the people you know then start on a old fashion country breakfast.    Nothing fancy just plain good diner food.   Lunch is good too.  Portions are hearty.  The homemade chicken soup has large pieces of chicken.   

lunch is good too.  Portions are hearty
This is a local place and always good.My only complaint is that there is only one cook and it is SO popular that the wait for good hot food is sometimes a bit long when it is crowded.
Linda's is a small, but homey-feeling breakfast nook. The service is very good and the actual, "Linda" is present.
My husband and I were driving through North Adams and it was pretty early in the morning on a Tuesday in October.  We were looking for a place to eat for breakfast and as we drove by, we saw that Linda's was open so we stopped.  It felt like we stepped back into time a bit.  Such a warm, homey place, with just a handful of tables and one waitress and one cook.  The menu was a typical breakfast menu with the usual offerings.  I believe we ordered an omelet and french toast and shared with each other.  The food was very good, but the atmosphere was just what we had hoped for when we stopped...a bit of a small town, home town feel.  Some "regulars" came in while we were there and before they even sat down, their favorites drinks were brought to the table, including a yummy hot chocolate for the junior guest :)
Linda's Cafe attracts locals who want plentiful old-fashioned food, friendly service local color. All decked out for Hallow'en, but always colorful, especially if people-watching is your thing: One sign says "Will Trade Coffee for Gossip."
Got the pulled pork and onion rings.  Good stuff.

This is an old school drive in with window service, picnic tables, and condiments in ice outside.  

Kids working the window, large menu on the board above the window.  Wide variety of people waiting for their food.  This is a popular local spot with kids, grandparents, workers, etc.
Fish is really good and it's a fun place, you can sit at the many picnic tables scattered about or sit in your car.  All different foods and ice cream also
Great fish fry, a local favorite spot so you know its good. Plenty of picnic tables or dine in your car! Beautiful scenery 
While visiting North Adams I got to eat at Pedrin's Dairy Bar, an old favorite from my teenage years. The seafood is still as plentiful and at a good price as I remember. The seating is outside under the trees, but beware the hungry birds who want to share your meal.
The food here is fairly good but the price for food that you have to wait in your car or on a bench for is way to much and the wait time is very long
I love Pedrin's.... I have been coming every year since I had my license. This place is great old school window ordering and then they give you a wooden ticket with a number and call you when it's ready. Soon enough they call your number and you go to the window and pay and pick up your tray. Only thing missing is carhop service.. you can either chill out at one on their many picnic tables in the back or in your vehicle to partake in your food choices. 
Personal favorites: bacon cheeseburger, friend clams, sweet potatoe fries, onion rings, chocolate frost, and the hotdogs are good too. The ladies who have worked there awhile are swift and quick all business. Nice lunch area. Roadside food is pretty good.. try it out if you are passing through the area.
Seriously why do people recommend this place. I ordered fried fish with onion rings instead of fries. The fish smelled spoiled and had a rubber texture indicating frozen fish that was thawed too quickly. The onion rings tasted better but very greasy. My husband had the sausage sub which he said wasn't good either. I can name at least 5 other places with better fish. Just had great fish the other day at Boston Seafood Restaurant. Will take my business there. 
This is a pupular destination during the summer. There is a range of mostly fried food. You order at the shack and dine on an array of picnic benches. Kids love this place.
The place reminds me of stands you would find near the beach when I was growing up.  You stand on line at a window, order your food, sit at a picnic table outside and wait for someone to call your number.  They're known for their fried clams and milk shakes. Both met expectations.
First of all, although it should be obvious, I'll write it down anyway. My 4 stars represent my opinion of Pedrin's as compared to other places of its kind, not to fine dining establishments. With that out of the way...

My family and I have been coming regularly to Pedrin's for at least 15 years, which should say something right there. Although it's called Pedrin's *Dairy Bar* and there is in fact an ice cream window, it's what it is beyond ice cream that makes it exceptional. Pedrin's also has burgers, dogs, wraps, grinders, sandwiches, wings, rings, seafood dinners, rolls, or baskets, and more. The food is all fresh and the deep fried items are light and won't bog you down. My favorite is the clam strip meal, which comes with toasted bread, fries, and coleslaw. Although prices have gone up a bit over the years, they're still a good value. Portions are above average... you won't leave hungry. Service is quick and efficient.

There are plentiful picnic tables to sit at on their grassy lawn, where you can enjoy the views as well as your meal, or if it's raining there are more tables under cover to the rear of the building. The outside tables are well-spaced so you don't feel like you're sitting right next to anyone. 

The old-school vibe of Pedrin's is cool, so whether you're visiting MassMoca or hiking Mt Greylock, stop in and check the joint out. You'll be glad you did. They're located on Route 8 between Adams and North Adams.
This is one of a kind dairy bar. Great selection . Food to please every one. Hot, fresh and served very quickly. Nice seating arrangements outdoors. One can avoid the rain or hot sun by sitting under the canopy. Birds are singing and the air is indeed fresh.
Pedrins is the go to place as soon as it opens in the spring. You can't beat the Fish Fry and onion rings and I have to have at least one Hot Sausage grinder during the season. You can't go wrong always great fresh food to sit at the picnic tables or in your car.  
I know I shouldn't, but I forgo dietary concerns once or twice a year to indulge in their fish fry served on a roll. It's doubtless not healthy, but remains a guilty pleasure. I can't comment on any of the other food. Tables are available for outdoor dining under the willow trees. A piece of local history.
True "dairy bars" are fading away with other vintage things, but Pedrin's keeps this iconic roadside stop alive!  Huge menu (yup, mostly fried things, but some grilled and healthier choices added - check out the signs on the wall and not just the menu board on the façade), onion rings not to be missed.  Still open well into October, so take advantage of the fall weather and sit at one of the brightly colored picnic tables and enjoy the classic fish fry, the chicken grilla, and don't forget the chocolate malted frost....hey, drink dessert!
Great summertime food Known for there seafood also has burgers and sandwiches and other foods .. I love the onion rings ..
We went here on the recommendation of a friend.  I was not impressed with the food or that fact that it took longer for me to get an uncooked sandwich than it did for all my friends to get their cooked food.  I got a tuna sub and asked for pickles on it.  They wouldn't put them on the sandwich they gave me a container on the side.  Not sure why they wouldn't do it.  
Since our daughters were babies we've visited Pedrins and now we take our grandchildren. Pedrins continues to please us all. Really you cannot find better onion rings anywhere around. The fish fry is certainly the longest piece of fish served on a roll. I've never begun to finish it. Delicious. Yes it's fried. No it's not greasy. It's all worth it once in a while. The place looks better than it did 25 years ago and the good is just as good. It's a fun place to visit. Sit in your car or out on a picnic table but go. Just remember to eat really healthy the day of and the day after. It will be worth it. 
As resident of the area, we have frequented Pedrin's over the years and have also received decent food.  Our last trip, and definitely our last, was when we placed an order for two meals, one being a sandwich.  The girl checked off the wrong box (wrong sandwich).  No one realized this until we went to get it and pay.  We could clearly hear the cooks in the back complaining on and on about it.  Get over it, she made a mistake and misunderstood what we said, it happens.  It gets better...they redo the sandwich and I begin eating my meal so it doesn't get cold, and they charge me the $4 more difference for the correct sandwich, after all the hassle and waiting!  My point is if they made the mistake, I had to eat my meal so it didn't get cold, and get barked at by the cooks, you should zip it and eat the $4.00 as part of the mistake.  I'll give my money to other great businesses in the area who know what customer service is.  Look it up Pedrin's!
A summer staple, family run business that has been serving the community for as long as I can remember.  Fresh food cooked to order the best onion rings!  Enjoy eating outside on picnic tables
Our first visit of the season to Pedrin's. The day was low 70's with lots of sunshine! Two had a dinner and two shared some great munchies. Fish and fries was great. Fish batter was a little on the soft side but flavor was great. Fries all around were super! Chicken strips looked a little dark but flavor was spot on! The munchies were an order of onion rings, an order of fries and a mocha milk-shake. The onion rings were the best we've had in years! The fries were great and the mocha was just a drop of coffee from being perfect. Great food! Great atmosphere outside!
I'm a local and most times when ordering out we almost always choose here.  There pizza is one of the best around.  There is always a ton of toppings and great deals on pizza.  Another favorite of mine through them is their Steak and Cheese.  It is AMAZING!  There Calzone's are super big and definitely worth the price.  If your looking for good food, big portions, and great price...then choose here.  Only reason I gave 4 for a rating is at times the wait can be very long.  Especially when ordering during dinner rush or big events.  One time it took well over and hour to get just a pizza.  But I will say, that doesn't stop me!  I always make sure to order a little ahead of when I want it.
The food is terrible.  Everything we ordered was frozen processed food, even the pizza.  The chicken parm dinner was processed chicken patties cut into weird shapes served with hardly any sauce and some of the mushiest, bland pasta I've ever had. They packaged it so hot that the plastic lid actually melted into the top of my meal.  The seafood dinner was gross and the fries were soggy.  Save your money, go elsewhere.
The pizza is always the best. There delivery is always on time. And when you order a dinner you always get s free small pizza.
We've been ordering from Pizza Works for several years, often in bad weather, when we find ourselves with an understocked fridge or feel too tired to cook. Their counter staff are polite and efficient, even when they put you on hold. Their system stores our address, which saves time. Their delivery people are always prompt, gracious and helpful. We enjoy their grinders and other sandwiches, as well as many of the ala carte items, such as meatball and sausage side orders, potato skins, clam strips, onion rings, fries, mozzarella sticks and fried mushrooms and calamari. We only had the pizza once, but it was tasty. We also enjoyed their fried seafood platter, which has enough food to feed two people.
This place has the best pizza and subs in the area. I have never had any issues when i get delivery, pick up or eat there. I love the reuben the best. And it arrives always warm to. Give them a try u will be glad u did.
Their food is good but pizza was a little over cooked. Not much sause on the pizza (I don't like a lot) but it was not even enough for me. The wings were really good (very crunchy) Hope this helped!!!! :-) 
Die Pizza war gut, groß und trotz der langen Anfahrt warm und cross. Der Lieferservice kam direkt aufs Zimmer im abgelegenen Hotel, Lieferzeit war angemessen, die Preise auch.
I love going to the Parlor! Grab a tea, coffee, adult beverage and some great food. They also have homemade goodies too! Love how they have local music and comedy shows! Great place to check out if you are in the area!
Went there in the morning looking for some good strong coffee and a bagel.  Great dead eye, - café mochas and yummy egg bagel sandwiches.  The place is out of the way located close to MCLA campus.  Funky cool little dive with live music at night.
I have been here several times.  Each time, the different women behind the counter are as nice as can be, however there is one man who works there who gives off a really negative vibe.  He never smiles or makes eye contact, why would I want to ask him for a glass of wine or to make my drink? The food is very healthy and tastes great, although the portions are on the small side for the cost, especially if you are a gluten-free bread goer.  The atmosphere is cozy, unless "The Scowler" is behind the counter.  
The Parlor is tucked away off the Main Street in North Adams and near MCLA. It offers a good selection of beverages, salads and sandwiches. The servings are large and the prices are reasonable.
I find that good coffee is hard to find in the U.S. but the Parlor delivers good coffees that use espresso as their base.  The atmosphere is cozy often with many students from the local liberal arts college making use of their wi fi service.  I have not tried any of their food offerings but noted that they do serve a waffle breakfast on Saturday mornings which I plan to try soon. They have a varied menu of sandwiches and salads.  Currently they are showing work of a local photographer on their walls and will rotate art shows.  Live performance can also be enjoyed weekend nights. 
I like the Pitchers Mound although its definitely a local watering hole with many college students who go there. MCLA is very close to the Pitchers Mound so many weekends they are packed with students. DJs are there a lot. Prices are cheap, staff is friendly but they lack cleanliness in all areas. I think they even serve food here and there but I wouldn't trust eating it myself. No offense to them. I do have a lot of friends that go there that are regulars so you will end up seeing me there once in a while but its not my favorite place to go to. If you are a local its a hot spot for sure on the weekends but if you are traveling here looking for something a bit cleaner and classier I wouldn't go there.
It's a bar that has food in a bad part of town. Owner / cook is a grump and treats people poorly so Yuck
Don't try to sugar coat it... it is a local hang out/ college dive bar with cheap drinks and a fun staff. Food is cheap but solid. Drinks are strong and cheap. Beer is cheap. You can get a beer in the place for 3 bucks... a Guinness (can) for 4 bucks. Juke box is usually playing fairly loud unless there is a game on TV- pool table, pinball machine- no KENO thank god! You get the idea, right?
This is a hang out for young locals and college students.  If you are looking for a quiet conversation.... not the place to go. The prices are very reasonable and the TV's usually have sports on.. if you care what the sports commentators are saying... again... not th eplace to go.
Popular with local college night crowd. Mostly a drinking establishment with pub style menu. Wouldn't recommend for families with young children.
A local sports bar that is located right next to the mcla campus. Djs and bands on the weekends and trivia on Thursday nights.
Every Thursday this fall and hopefully longer, Dave has put on a throwback Mexican night.. I had the Chimichanga  with cheese covered rice. Fantastic. Even had leftovers, because I was full after eating only half the plate. Well done Dave!
On Thursday night there is an all you can eat barbecue buffet. There are always a number of cars as this is a venue that features banquets and large gatherings. The main dining room if a good candidate for an extreme Gordon Ramsey visit and makeover. The decor is old and shabby to go with so so food. 
excellent food and super staff food was served at the right temperature staff was fast and friendly and very attentive .
Salad bar is tops in the area. Food has always been first rate. Prices not bad. Sunday brunch is also fantastic. we have held many gatherings here on Sunday  mornings. 
Service has been great and fast delivery of food. Well prepared on plates with ample portions.
If you like ordinary and predictable food, then this place is ok. Nothing creative but simple and home style. Service is a bit slow and prices are a bit high for the quality. Just not my favorite kind of restaurant. 
Whenever my wife and I go there with coworkers, Dave always goes out of his way with great food and big portions. His menu has something for everyone, pizza, burgers or Mexican with great local beer on tap... it's always good.
Very family friendly or a night out with friends. They have entertainment every week, with a great variety of entertainment. Hosts fundraisers all the time. Great staff. Excellent food.....Every time !  
Went here for my sister-in-law's birthday. None of us have been before. We had made reservations. The place is old, but comfy. I had the baked stuffed shrimp and it was very good. My husband had prime rib and said it was delish...he loved the au jus..said it reminded him of his mom's. My sister -in -law and brother-in-law both enjoyed their meals as well. Even said they would definetly return. My only complaint was the creme brulee. It wasn't creme brulee, it was egg custard, which i also like so it was a win win for me, but having made creme brulee myself and have had it elsewhere, this was definetly lacking the creaminess and the crunch of the sugared top. Coffee was very good too. Will visit again.
Have been visiting for 10 years when in Adams. Can't beat the dedication of staff, owner, and lovely preparation as well as presentation of all meals. Wonderful Sunday Brunch. Fantastic for a group, large family, or just a night out. A Must-Visit when you are in Adams or North Adams.Bring your appetite!
Love the salad bar offered with every entrée.  The portion sizes are good with 3 sizes on the prime rib.  Their pastas are good and the staff is attentive
I can't understand why this restaurant exists, except to offer a lot of cheap food to indiscriminating patrons whose main object to to store fat for the upcoming winter. The atmosphere is a step back in time, and not in a good way. Don't be fooled into going here for Thanksgiving. The only thing this Bounty can inspire is a mutiny. And you will tempt scurvy.
Nice Place to bring a date. prices are a bit higher, but food is good and the building is nice. I manage to go there a lot as its location is good and has weekly specials
We went on a Sunday morning for the brunch.  We were told to be there for a 10:00 am seating. We drove right by it. There was only one car there at 9:40am.  It looked like a very tiny place. We after we went to a store to buy a card, we went back and met a friend. To our surprise we walked into a room with wall to wall food. They also had a carving station with delicious meats.  We walked into another room that was probably used for a function room.  Everything was delicious. I liked the desserts, cheese cake, chocolate cake, fabulous crème brulee and many other treats.
Soooooooooooooooooo Good!
We love coming here for a filling meal.  They have an all you can eat salad bar with peel and eat shrimp.  The wait staff is attentive.  The portions you get are good for what you pay for.  They also have a room in the back for additional party space with plenty of parking for those large parties.
If you like scallops, you had better go there. Best seafood Bisque I have ever had! (award winning). I look forward to the weekly specials.
We've eaten here twice and both times have left satisfied. The food though simple is well prepared and the portions are ample. The wait help is friendly and efficient. If you're hungry and are looking for some good food this is the place to go. The prices are very reasonable too.
As I must admit, this place was a tad overlooked by me but has become one of my favorites. I got the Gorgonzola bistro steak cooked at a perfect medium rare.. My all time new favorite meal accompanied by the all you can eat salad bar.. My husband and I have never been disappointed.. Amazing, friendly staff, great drinks and prices.. I never leave hungry
I have never been disappointed at the Bounty-Fare. My husband and I usually pick one one their entrees from the early bird menu which you can get up until 5:30pm on any day except holidays. 
Their are quite of few choices and the portions are excellent. Best Fish & Chips. Great service.
We went there as a family on Mother's Day for brunch.  There were no complaints about the food selection, the seating or the service.
This restaurant has a long history in Adams, and generally a very good one.  Over the years though, the outside and inside have paid the price.  Part of the restaurant is too dark, while another area is just way too outdated.  It looks like a room where your great grandmother hung out.  This business needs to be updated, repaired, and maintained better.  The side of the restaurant has an open deck area, but from a distance, it looks like a picnic area in a trailer park.  Okay, now for the positive.  The food is very good-excellent for their pricing. The portions are good, and they have an all-you-can-eat salad bar which comes with some meals.  The salad bar is kind of small, but it worked for me.  The warm bread rolls are great.  
The service was very good.  The two people working in this room were very busy, but they were attentive and friendly.  This place needs to be made more interesting and attractive to people under 70 if they want to survive once the older regulars can't make their anymore.  It looks like it was once a decent looking restaurant some time ago, but not now.
Everything being said, I would go here again just because of the food and service
Sometimes one simply gets a craving for a soft serve cone. Unfortunately, i developed one in in the vicinity of this place. The chocolate ice cream tasted like NOTHING. I threw it away. I see that the place, once a delight in my youth, is for sale. No surprise.
They have a very good selection of soft serve ice cream. They have excellent customer service. But the price is a little steep for a cone.
Nothing better than Dairy Queen. They put all others behind. 100% better than Carvel on Long Island.
The food is just like every other McDonald's but almost every time I order they either forget something, it takes way to long or my food is burnt.
Nothing different or exceptional here. It's McDonald's food, so you get what you are after.  The location can make it a little challenging to get in and out of the parking lot. Drive-thru is fairly efficient.
For Here.  The fries were hot, the Coke was Coke and the ice cream had the consistency and taste of ice cream.  Our McOrderTaker clearly didn't want to be there, but service was adequate.  Only about 6 screaming kids running about. 
   There are few McItems that for me qualify as decent food.  The McWings are nicely spiced and fun (when they can be had), the McChicken sandwich is simple enough to succeed, and a dinner salad with a chicken breast atop can be mighty satisfying.  Notice that all my choices involve chicken.   
   The other night the words "Artisan Chicken" slipped through my firewall before sensibility could grab it... What was I thinking?  Upon opening the box I was reminded immediately that this sort of chicken waits for you in a tub of hot water like a hot dog from a NY streetcart. (That's not "juicy") The soggy mess should have been squeezed and patted dry before assembly, but of course there's no available time. 
   I talked myself out of believing that the few specks of pink in the center had the potential to kill me, but if the movie had been 15 mins longer and if my wife hadn't offered me some Pepto from the amazing first-aid section of her pocketbook, I'd surely be dead now.
   .
I was on lunch break while teaching a class at MCLA and only had a few minutes to get my food and get back. I pulled up and the place was packed with a long drive-in line. To my surprise, the service was friendly and fast - I was through the line in about 7 minutes. This McDonald's also appeared to be very well maintained. Great for those looking for true fast food.
Fast ACCURATE drive thru service.  Food is always hot.  Staff very friendly.  Remember what Joe Pesci says about drive thru's?  Well it doesn't happen here.
OK a McDonald's is a McDonald's.  This is a very typical one.  The service was friendly and fast.  The place was very well maintained.  Easy in easy out.
The pizza was delivered at the time promised. The crust was not fully cooked and the sauce was a bit bitter (spoiled??)
We were in town on business and this was our annual trip to Desperados.  We love it every time.  My burrito was perfect.  So were the draft beer and warm chips and salsa.
Food was delicious, atmosphere was crowded /tight..  The first server was awful from seating us to the end, like she'd started recently, wanted to go home and was honoring us with her attention but the other servers were spectacular! They were attentive, nice and professional. So it was a crap shoot. The drinks are generous and delicious. 2 out of 3 of us got the wrong meal but the did was great. Mentioned our trip to a local and they call it desperate measures... 
We are frequent visitor to this establishment; as it is within 30 minute drive from the house, typically we have to drive 10 miles just to get the basics at the grocery.  We have never been disappointed in our meal and our 8 year olds loves the food too!  She also loves that there are trivia boxes at each table, therefore it is so "ON" before the meal comes.  As this is a local go to for adult beverages, it can get quite busy Friday and Saturday nights, but the service is quite quick and delicious.  Well worth the wait.  Very family friendly.  If stopping by on your birthday, show them your ID, you'll get a free meal of your choice......Extra Bonus!
We like to go out for nachos and drinks every now and then .. when we had the Homemade guacamole we were hooked ..
I didn't find this to be a very interesting Mexican Restaurant. I got a taco salad which was adequate. 
I had the Chimichangas...3" wide and about a foot long.  I had one seasoned ground beef and one chicken.  Add Sour Cream and you have enough food for a couple of days.  My wife had the Fiesta Bowl.  There is some confusion about what we saw on the online menu and what we actually received.  I was charged an extra $6 for the 2nd Chimichanga while the menu clearly states that the meal is 2 Large Flour tortillas .  My wife's dish was supposed to have cheese, sour cream & guacamole.  She didn't have any of them and had to ask for some sour cream. I probably should have asked for an adjustment to the check but just wasn't in the mood.  We will probably never go back since we live in West Virginia.  I caution diners to clarify what they are ordering when talking to staff.  Food was very good.
The rough location belies a pleasant little eatery, that features welcoming staff and very good Mexican fare. I had one of the better Quesadillas that I have had in a while...I even had to save some of it for later, it was such a generous portion! The service could have been faster, but then again, its not a fast food place. You wont be disappointed.
Not bad for a quick bite, Mexican food is ok nothing special although the staff is great when we have gone. 
I guess try it and see what you think.
We arrived on Tuesday which was all you can eat tacos, burritos or enchillados.  When they said that they weren't kidding.  at first we were served the usual chips and salsa which were home made.  Soon our meal was served.  We both had the burritos.  There were three on the plate which reached from one side of the plate to the other and covered with a good amount of melted cheese.  They had just enough room for the tasty black beans and Mexican rice.  The shocker was the amount of meat that was in the burrito.  There must have been at least a half pound of shredded chicken in my burrito.  We were asked if we were ready for the next plate.  Are you kidding??  I'd love to see the guy who could eat more. 
My wife wanted a Mexican last night so we decided to pay Desperados a visit. The prevalence of sombreros, ponchos and cacti in the decor should have warned us that this was not a sophisticated south of the border eatery. Cliché overload! We really should have turned around at the door and left but boldly & recklessly we ventured in. Bad idea. My shrimp fajitas were a real letdown. Although the portions were large, the food - which was presented in slapdash manner and served up by a charmless waitress - was bland & lacking in any real flavour. They also had the worst range of beers of anywhere I have been during my two weeks in New England; it's like the microbrew revolution of the 1990s had never happened. Very poor all round!
My wife and I stopped by for a Margarita and a bite to eat. We are vegans so Tex-Mex food generally leaves few options that don't have cheese. Desperados was no different, but they made the Veggie 'Desparito' (I think it was called) vegan by making it with no cheese. The burritos were different, more like a warm wrap than a burrito, but they were very good and quite filling. The'top shelf' Margarita was also good. Service was a bit lacking.
We took a break from wandering North Adams and Williamstown and, at the suggestion of a local, stopped here.  We shared a meal and a side of guacamole with chips.  Our entree featured shrimp, beef, chicken, veggies and more in a large burrito...it was delicious!
You don't get a second chance at a first impression. When we need to wipe the table and chairs of crumbs from the previous customer...that's bad.  We have been to the restaurant for a couple meals prior....has always been good.  We did enjoy our dinner meal this last visit.  We are not likely to return.  The menu has not changed in 2 years.  Because we do not go out often for Mexican food we look for meals with a variety of items to try, not a meal of one type of entree.
We go to Desperados a couple of times a month and always enjoy it.  The food, drinks and service is very good.  We enjoy the Buffalo Wings, Taco Salads and the Chimichangas among other things.  We've never been disappointed.  Highly recommend.  However, it is located on Eagle Street, not Ashland.  It's usually not hard to park out front but there is ample parking behind the building.
I really enjoy good Mexican food and Desperados is very good, but its somehow different from any other Mexican restaurant I have tried. Different in a good way :>)
We have eaten there maybe 3 or 4 times now. In our latest visit we had the shrimp and crab enchiladas, enchilada verde, desperido and a fundido. The service was good and with the exception of some too spicy rice, everything we ordered was excellent. I like spicy food, but this side of rice was just too spicy for my wife to eat and even too spicy for me. Not sure why the rice was so spicy. Anyhow, despite the hot rice we had a great time and will return again before long.
We had been wanting to try this restaurant since it first opened. Well maybe I wanted to try it. Anyway, we finally got the chance to stop in and check out the fare. We should not have bothered. I ordered a burrito, nothing can go wrong with that right. Well instead of finding refried beans like I would in most burritos (having ordered a bean burrito) instead I found black beans. Which would not have been bad except, the side dish that comes with it, you guessed it black beans. My wife ordered a chimichunga with bean soup. The chimi came but the soup was missing in action. When she had finished eating, the waitress strolled up with the soup and asked if she still wanted it. She did. But apparently the to go portions are not as big as the stay in portions because there was very little soup in the to go container. The service was nothing to write home about either. This was not an experience I am looking to repeat anytime soon. Or ever.
Food was great tasting and a great value for the price. The bar service was great, a good drink served.
After reading the reviews, I thought my husband and I would give it a try on our last night of vacation here....boy was that a mistake! The food was anything but fresh or tasteful... my husband had the worst fish tacos of his life, and I had a very bland bean and poblano chimichanga. We ended up paying way more than I would have expected for the food we received. This was just not good food...we should have gone back to Public!
Casual Mexican in arts building downtown. Menu is rather typical, but the rice and salsa (both made by the restaurant) are far above average. Pork fundido was good but not earth-shattering. Service (my server and all others observed) was excellent - friendly though not overbearing, attentive but not hovering. Seats in front window not recommended as the window tends to shake a wee bit at times. I would definitely recommend.

Note: As of this writing the address TripAdvisor gave was incorrect (though there are other restaurants there). The North Adams location is at 23 Eagle Street; there is a second location in nearby Williamstown.
Was really looking forward to this place, but was very disappointed.  After waiting some time to be seated, I contemplated walking out and trying some place else.  From what I saw and heard, the waitress is all by herself on Saturday afternoons, waiting on tables and is behind the bar.  That just doesn't work. 

After looking at the menu, there wasn't anything different from average Mex restaurants, so declined ordering a margarita which I look forward to especially if really good (and that is not too common).

Just ordered a beef enchilada which was a lunch special.  It was good, but it was ground beef and I would typically order shredded if available, otherwise, chicken.  My fault.....

Service was lacking because there was only one person to do everything that dealt with the public.  Took about 50% more time for everything.
This sorry excuse for an Italian restaurant is only surpassed in ineptitude in this area by NoCo Pasteria! Do not waste your time or money here. The food is worse than what one might find in the frozen food section of a supermarket. The wait person was friendly, but clueless. And the smell of cigarette smoke, coming from outside, does nothing to aid the digestion. 
This restaurant did not last long here in North Adams.. It has been closed for quite awhile. Poor management I guess.. It really was sad to see it go, I think it had potential.. If you are looking for good Italian food in North Adams, try noco pastaria or grazie opening soon
We had planned to visit this restaurant from the time it moved from Main St. However, every time we went by, it was closed. Finally we traveled on a Saturday evening the 25 miles to give it a try. Imagine our surprise when we discovered not only was the restaurant permanently closed, but the Taco restaurant that had obviously taken its place had also gone belly up. We ended up at Public wqhere we h ad another delightful meal if a little pricier than we had planned. I'll never leaRN; CALL FIRST!
Finally visited this newly opened restaurant.  I had heard mixed reviews on it, however wanted to check it out myself.
The menu is basic and 'reasonably' priced - but I wasn't impressed.
I ordered a special - it was chicken, mushroom in a vodka sauce over linguini.  The portion size was fine, but it was lacking in flavor.  Not a lot chicken & mushrooms found either in the dish.  
That was it.  You didn't get any vegetables, no salad, not even bread.  
The name fits it well ~ Bistro: a small restaurant, serving moderately priced simple meals in a modest setting.  
I'm not sure if I will visit it again.
Pleasant staff and decent food but being of normal height the booth seating is uncomfortable as my arms do not rest on the table - they are elevated. My wife who is 5'2' would have a real issue...
The food was tasty, service was fast and friendly even I got a feeling that the waitor was told to try to sell us more than what we wanted. Clean and not too noisy restaurant even it was nearly full.
Slow service, food not great.  Not our server's fault.  They were clearly understaffed during the lunch hour for a Sunday; still, took forever to get our food. I ordered their new Triple Hog Dare Ya sandwich and their new house chips.  Will never order again. The sandwich had an odd flavor; I'd give it a 1 on a scale of 5. The house chips were not good at all. Tasted like straight out of a packaged bag from a grocery store. If you ordered fries, it was extra. 

We hadn't been to Applebee's in a while. The menu may be bigger, but not as appetizing, and the prices have gone up and unjustifiably. Very disappointed. Won't be going back. 
Place was quiet waited for server who was pleasant enough but very slow. Food took way too long and place was not that busy and if anything they were over staffed but when food arrived both meals were over cooked luckily you can pay at the table so at least we did not have to wait any longer for our check we won't return and if if value you time you won't go
Everytime I go into Applebees. They make you feel welcomed. I usually get a appetizer and a appletini. While with friends as we watch sports on their multi televisions to catch your favorite sport.
We ordered the 2 for $25 lunch(sirloin steak and Fiesta lime chicken).  The chicken was okay, but the steak was some kind of rubbery flavorless mystery meat.  What was the country of origin for this?  It reminded me of the "beef" we had in Costa Rica or the "whatever" we had at a Chinese restaurant in Sidney MT.  (I can't eat Chinese food any more after that meal.). You'd think in MT the restaurant would have more respect for their customers than to serve such questionable quality meat!  Lost us as customers and we eat out about 3-4 times a week because we are traveling sales reps.
Chain food for sure. Drinks were good food average. Still don't know why folks like this place for food.  All chain frozen food. Good service good for budget and kids.

Rather go across the street. But compared to other Applebee's it is the same old same old
So whatever floats your boat. Not for foodies not for upscale.food.

Good for happy hour.
You kind of know what you'
re going to get when you go through the doors, and the Sturbridge location held its own with very friendly wait staff, family value food and good if on a budget.
I am here at the milledgeville applebees. Tables are dirty and the floors are dirty. I hate eating in dirty places. 
We visited on a Saturday night about 5:30. The place was doing a good business but we were seated right away. The staff was very good.  We took advantage of their $10.00 specials, which are a very good deal. My wife had the sirloin steak that had some flavor but had the bite of a sponge. If I had it, I would not have eaten it. I started with the chili which was one of the best ever. It had large chunks of hamburg and onion so I really got the full flavor of it, and was covered with a thick layer of good cheese. I would definitely order it again. I had the quesadia (sp) and it was very cheesy with a lot of meat inside. It had good taste but was not extrodinary in any way.  All in all the experience was just ordinary, as it has been before which is why I limit my visits there.
We went in for a late lunch around 2pm.  It's a typical Applebee's, nothing special.  The waitress was not great, but not offal.  She could have been a little more attentive.  I got the Texan burger.  It was fine.  The BBQ on it tasted like it came out a plastic tub.  This place is ok in a pinch.  I recommend trying something else, maybe Cracker Barrel or a  non-chain restaurant. 
its the corporation that is at fault. needed better quality shrimp, not these burned offerings the shrimp is cut in h alf, and poorly breaded.Also check and see if patron wants tarter sauce or cocktail sauce that is not very good.  Baked potatoes need, the butter and sour cream put in it, not served ice cold and do not charge for the sour cream.Cold slaw in a tiny little bowl. Have waitress put the take home boxes in the bag for  you especially when dealing with old old people.I like the atmosphere, friendly , nice waitress who was doing her best, and we liked her. Great onion rings.
Not sure who checks here for local restaurants.  I'm not aware of much in this stretch of Sturbridge to choose from.  The reduced menu prices on some specials is better.  We ended up there on a Monday Night, (Labor Day), so the burger special was on and I was on a "cheat day"...I cheated big time with the all day brunch burger.....not something I would normally do, but it was tasty.  Endless fries, no offer to bring more, but I'm sure they would have if I'd asked.  Did find the beer menu above average with a few local beers. (Recommend the Berkshire Steel Rail.   Bar area was quite. I'm generally not a fan of the type of restaurants where the bar is half the space and it can get noisy.   So we had a rather peaceful average meal. Server was good. 
The place "hides" out in a rather new mall area with an anchor Wal-Mart down on the end.  A decent theatre further down.  The Applebee's is a little hard to get into when entering the mall road, easier to go down and turn around.

All in all, average, good pricing on the Monday night....
Pasta's are also good.
Applebees has improved tremendously.   They have a two for  $20,00 menu, which is quite good.  On Monday nights, they serve $9.99 hamburgers for $5.99, after 4 pm.   Try their cowboy burger........whoa, its huge!!
Been here a few times; Usually late at night after a hard days work. Usually order a couple of apps between us and never had a bad experience; Service is friendly; Food comes out pretty quickly, drinks are fast.
Ate here with my husband a couple days ago. We ordered from the two for $25 menu and had the 7 oz steak dinner for both of us. Included in the price you have a choice of appetizer. We chose the boneless chicken wings. It was very good and the service was very good as well. Only complaint usually is on the cold side with the air conditioner so advise to bring a light sweater or jacket. All staff very friendly and inviting.
Wow, I can't believe all the negative reviews about this place. I've been to a few Applebee's and they're basically all the same. My experience at this location was great. My family had a great meal and the server did an overall good job. I had a new menu item and I was very satisfied with it.
Cold food. We came in late and our server was not happy. We got our food and it was cold like it was not cooked enough. We have never went since.
Pretty much your average Applebee's, we stopped for dinner while in town overnight. No issues, food good, server was Brittaney &  she did a fine job.  
 
It was my first time going after my sons middle school graduation.At first we waited to get a table for about 30 minutes and nobody was telling us the estimated wait time.we sat down at a table and had to wait another 15 minutes to order(keep in mind i havent ate all day and neither did my children.i rated the resturaunt terrible for bad customer service
On our way home and saw the chain that is well known for its consistency.  Our server, Erica was courteous and friendly. Our meal was delivered fairly quick.  Thanks for the good experience.
Every time my wife and  i go to Sturbridge we make it a point to go here. The meals are very well prepared and the service is great. Its a wonderful place to have your meal surrounded  by all the things that hang on the walls. Prices are average , and the shopping area has something for young and old. Its worth the stop , can be very busy at times.
This Cracker Barrel was right next to our Comfort Inn Hotel.  We were able to walk to it.  The food was plentiful, hot and very good.
Stopped in for breakfast with my husband while traveling back from trip up in Bar Harbor ME. Hostess station was a little backed up for amount of people dinning, but once in was greeted by our waitress fast and food out even faster but was good and hot what you expect from this restaurant chain.
Fast services. Waitress was friendly and accurate with our order. Food was good and average priced. Nice items in shop area.
Good food, reasonably priced. My favorite part of the Cracker Barrel experience is the choosing of your own sides from quite a variety, the games on the tables and of course the country store attached to it. Love the large checkers set !
Was feeling healthy and looking for a salad. Great Kale salad that is on their special menu. This together with a friendly waitress made the difference and an enjoyable experience 
Country Fried Steak.....with white gravy....mashed potatoes and green beans......yummilicious....
Cheap money for great comfort food....
As with most Cracker Barrel locations, they cater to the mass market and bus traffic. As a result the food is not gourmet or really home-cooked, but rather is a standard sit-down and have a meal without too much hassle type of location.   
I have always wanted to try Cracker Barrel and have finally had the chance. For what it was meant to be, comfort food while away from home, it's 100% on the mark. The employees were helpful, service was quick and they had better coffee than I expected. The food was inexpensive, hot and tasty with the wife having French toast while I thoroughly enjoyed grandpa's country fried breakfast (with chicken fried steak).  Neither would ever be considered  diet plates (or portions) in any universe but hey we were on vacation.  
Stopped by after a long day on the road, the food was really good as usual and best thing about Cracker Barrel is you can order just the sides and make a meal of it.  Still the best value to take your family.
So glad I got to do this! It wasn't a planned stop on our route but going to a Cracker Barrel has been on my list of things to do all year! When I saw this on a road sign for upcoming places to stop for food of course I jumped at the chance to stop there! Fun place with lots to do while waiting... sitting in the rocking chairs on the front porch, playing oversized Checkers, going over the menu they hand you and of course shopping in the general store. When you go into the shop make sure to look up at all the neat things hanging everywhere. Food is so good, people are nice, atmosphere is fun!
The food we ordered was correct and it was delicious! The service on the other hand was pretty bad, we never received any refills we were there for an hour and it wasn't super busy, our waitress did ask us if we wanted refills but not until after she brought our check, we waited almost 20 minutes to recieve our drinks in the first place. I would probably eat here again I just wouldn't make it my first choice.
Awesome good today with awesome service...but even better buys on clothes and stuff..gotta love it...
Great place to sit back and unwind a bit. The food is good and staff was nice as well. Food came out in a timely fashion, which is always a plus when your on the road. 
I've been to numerous locations of this chain but this one is my absolute favorite. There is great service and the food is excellent as well! I definitely recommend for a family outings! 
Had the meatloaf dinners. The baked potato was old, hubbies fries were cold, the dumplings did not resemble dumplings, broccoli was hot. Dustin was attentive to refills, brought butter for the veggies and extra napkins right away. He did not come back to see if we wanted dessert. 
We had a tasty lunch. Very crowded. I had a campfire meat and Donna had the campfire chicken. Both very tasty
Wide variety and home cooked style foods served in giant quantities makes this a very family friendly place to eat, no matter the time of day.
My husband and I stopped by Cracker Barrel on the way to the movies. I had never been there and was excited to try it. The decor was neat--lots of country style antique looking things on the wall (my husband says it was "too much to look at" but I thought it was fun). The food was okay, nothing special: my ham was a bit dry but my mashed potatoes were good and the biscuits were amazing. They had a blackberry tea that was really good. It's a seasonal drink, so if you can get it I highly recommend it. We also snacked on some fried apples that were really good. Our waiter was nice and helpful. Our meals were both under $10 each (breakfast plate for $9 and a country plate for $8) We stopped at the Cracker Barrel store on the way out. It was a bit pricey but had some super cute items. Overall I'd stop in again, particularly if we wanted a meal out on a budget. 
This Wendy's is shockingly bad. We stopped in for a quick lunch. The place is so inefficient that we were in line for 20 minutes before waiting for our food. My potato was overlooked - actually gray in color. There were no clean tables, trash cans were overflowing, and bathrooms were filthy!  Yikes!!!
Every thing is the opposite at this Wendy's.  Fast food is slow. Cold food is warm.  Hot food is cold.  
Normally I would not write a review for a fast food restaurant. The food was classic Wendy's nothing out of the ordinary BUT the service was fantastic. I was looking to be as healthily as possible with my order and replaced my fries with apple slices, they were out of the normal little baggies they put in kids meals so the kitchen staff put the apples they use to top the salads in a large drink cup. I thought that was very innovative, when they could have just said no apples because they are out. 
Nothing earth shattering about this meal. Did notice furnishings were damaged, especially bench seating that was very torn up. Owner needs to pay for repairs.
I stopped here late one night on my way to Worcester and just the drive through window was open. It's nice that there is a place to stop to get something hot late night, but clearly health code is not that important to whoever was managing the restaurant. When I pulled up to the window the smell of lots of second hand smoke came reeking out. This is a violation, that someone in charge allowed figuring that it was okay because the dining room was closed. This increases the chance of foreign objects in your food and food borne illness when someone's hand is repetitively touching their mouth and then potentially your food. The big thing that bothers me however, is if this behavior is considered okay here, what other sanitary precautions are being ignored? This may not bother everyone, but it was enough to reinforce my aversion to chain fast food, and certainly this specific Wendy's.
Stopped At Wendy's in Sturbridge for lunch.Very disappointed and disgusted with the sanitation of the food severed .The girl who took my order was wearing plastic gloves to take the money. They were shot of help so she also put out the Chilly which I wanted still wearing the plastic gloves she wore from handling the money.I had ordered cheese on top.She took her gloved hand and took out the cheese and placed it in my Chilly.Totally disgusted called for the manager .I told him about food and handling money and dirty gloves.I also left a comment on line with Wendy's in which the manager from the store emailed me back saying he would go over  sanitation with his crew.Do not plan on going back.
We had good service, and good food, very tasty, very clean place, Counter people were very friendly and helpful.
It's just what you'd expect from a Wendys - nothing to complain about or write home about. We've only had one bad experience, with an undercooked burger when we asked for it to be well done; They try to keep up with cleaning, but like other similar establishments, there's always a few fries laying around here and there.....
At Southwestern BLVD Orchard Park NY location- constantly put broccoli on cheese and bacon potatoes. Once I ordered it without broccoli they told me it doesn't come with that. They added broccoli anyway!!! Being probably slightly more offended than I should have been, I spoke to a manger. She must have cleared the problem right away, since then I have had no issues.
Since Wendy's of Sturbridge, MA was remodeled last year,  their food items are fresh and tasty.  Try their wonderful salads, you will be impressed.  I see many local having their lunch at this Wendy's, along with out of state travelers.  Great value.......and congratulations, Wendy's.  Burger King and McDonalds of Sturbridge need an awakening.  Wendy's tops both of them in food and service.
We were there for the lunch hour rush. The staff handled orders quickly and efficiently. We got our food correctly, Not the friendliest one I have been to.
Always friendly, and the food is exactly what you'd expect from this chain. Parking can be hit & miss, depending on what other local places are doing.
It was very good, but for some reason someone left a mop and bucket in the middle of the line. You could get around it, but it was odd that they left it there. Didn't bother to ask why. The bagels were good and they will toast them and put the cream cheese on them for you.
We stopped at this DD to get coffee (& hot chocolate for the kids) before getting on 84 for the long drive home. I asked for cream in my coffee, and whipped cream on the 2 hot chocolates. Unfortunately, we didn't taste anything until we were in the car pulling away... The kids' hot chocolate not only contained no whipped cream, it tasted like water. They both complained immediately, so I tasted it myself- completely undrinkable. They were crushed. My husband's regular black coffee was ok, but mine tasted like someone splashed skim milk in it. In fact, it tastes a lot like the brown water in the kids' "hot chocolate" cups. Unfortunately, complaining would take more time than we have right now (between turning around the car and waiting in line- it's not worth it). It's my own fault really - should've tasted everything before stepping out of line. But as I have never experienced such lack of attention to product detail at a DD, it never occurred to me. Buyer definitely beware!!
The coffee was delicious and the server was a lovely young lady who was very meticulous with our order.  
It's dunkin donuts, but it's close to the comfort inn and it's clean and it's convenient.  You can walk out of your room in your pajamas, grab a coffee and go back to the hotel with little fanfare
I love love love Dunkin Donuts, but I always try to avoid this particular branch; Coffee is regularly stale, and my orders have been wrong on multiple occasions. There's another just a couple minutes away by car, which is 5*
Dunkin Doughnuts has done a great job expanding their menu.  We found their breakfast sandwiches to be very good.  And as per usual their Doughnuts were great.  We've had some bad experiences at some Dunkin Doughnut locations but this one is a keeper!
Visited after 9pm and they didn't have a lot of selection of product but to be expected. At breakfast it might be better.
I was at a Convention last week and was short on time to eat.  Someone made a run to a local Subway Shop and it was the Italian BMT.  Very tasty, quick and hit the spot!
Friendly staff and as always a quality product.  Walking distance from the Comfort Inn
good place for a sub sandwich when shopping at walmart. The grinders are good and well prepared. 
Had great service. We ordered chicken broccoli alfredo and mac and cheese along with a pizza all packed to go. Food was very good...and just what we needed after a long day on the road..
We were spending the night in Sturbridge on the way back home from New Jersey. We called Uno and made a take out order. Ordered chicken/broccoli Alfredo, Macaroni and Cheese and a pizza. Food was delicious.
I was visiting here and decided to get something to eat at this chain. I ordered a house salad which the presentation was horrible and it was warm and looked old and tired. nothing too it. then the waitress recommended one of their house favorites, A chicken dish, it was so so bad, uneatable. I couldn't wait to leave the place. food quality was disgusting.  maybe I should have ordered their pizza which they are known for. I was just not in the mood for pizza. Apple-bees which i am not a fan of, would have been better than this place. they need new line cooks!! and maybe a new manager.  service was ok, nothing grand.
I went to dinner with my family after a long day at OSV.  It was a table of eight and my niece has a severe allergy to peanuts and tree nuts.  My sister was offered to review the menu in a computer which noted allergens in each item.  After feeling comfortable, she returned to the table after the waitress had already come to the table introduced herself and inquired about the 'young lady' with the allergy.  She explained the process of food preparation.  My niece ordered the 'make your own' pizza and her items came marked with a wooden stick noting the table number and allergen.  When she asked for something in addition, the waitress offered to bring it out or add it in the back.  Grace was a wonderful waitress and made what is often a tense situation to be a pleasant experience.  The food was wonderful and I am a bit embarrassed to say, my sister and I came back the next day without the entire crew.  My message here is... go as much as you can - great time each time!
Uno's has been in Sturbridge for a few years.  I will try to get their deep dish pizza for its pie crust style base. Really good steaks as well!
We always enjoy eating at UNOs and the Sturbridge location is fast and friendly, with good eats at value price.
We ate off the $10.00  menu and I have to say it was excellent.  My steak was tender, cooked perfectly, served hot, and yummy. The mashed potatoes were real, seasoned perfectly, and also piping hot. The roasted vegetables also an excellent choice.  My wife had the baked scrod and was equally pleased. The hostess was friendly and our waitress/server was attentive,  friendly, and accommodating. We will be definitely going back. 
Love to retun for numero uno deep dish. A real chicago style served in piping hot pan. Salad with house italian is great and we enwmjoy the baked haddock.  Also kids can bake / make their own pizza. How fun is that. Coupons,are always available and happy hour apetizers in the bar
 Open late too in this rural town!!!!
Stopped in for lunch and found they had a really great lunch special on the back of the menu, lots of choices.  Lunch was delicious and came out quickly.  We really enjoyed out stop here.  I don't think you can beat the individual pizza lunch special.
Very thankful that UNO delivers to local hotels.  Got a pizza and a salad which was good.  The delivery took just a bit longer than what was told, but it was a holiday so that's understandable.  Lady on phone was friendly.  Didn't meet the delivery person as someone else in my group went to the front desk to pick up food.  Overall a good experience.
Stopped in here for early dinner on our way up to Boston. The resturant is very clean. We were seated quickly. Large drink selection is nice. family freindly. Children can make there own pizza.
Appetizer of pretzels is over-priced, tasted like frozen soft pretzels reheated in a microwave. $5 for a large stein of Sam Adams is a pretty good value.
My wife got a flat-bread  mediterranean pizza that she said was OK. 
My son and I split a large classic deep dish pie with sausage. It tasted good, but I think they brush some type of basting butter or oil all over it. It felt heavy in the stomach. Don't think I would order again. 
Our server was polite and quick. All in All a good experience. We were in and out of the resturant in less than an hour.
On the advice of a woman at the hotel, we went here for dinner. It was great! The kids got to make their own pizza! I had cheese encrusted chicken Parmesan. It was really good and the portions were big. Cool place. Good food. Worth the visit. 
We went to Uno after our day at Old Sturbridge Village for an early dinner before heading home to NY.  The service was very good and the food all extremely fresh and delicious.  We all had salads and individual pizzas.  Each one was distinctive with layered textures and flavors.  It was a lovely end to a wonderful day.  We highly recommend it.
We haven't been to a Uno in years and were pleasantly surprised of the quality of the food and service here. We ordered the $10 special not expecting too much but it turned out to be a good amount of food. The service was quick and friendly. Good place to eat.
We ate here on our last night in Sturbridge, MA. The service was good, food was good, place was clean & easily accessed in a shopping plaza.  
I wasn't really impressed. Service was slow and the food was okay. I wasn't very busy. It was later in the night around 11 and just to get a coke took 10min. Appetizers took at least 30 and the food was good not great. Went only because it was close to my hotel wouldn't be on my list of favorites. Very forgettable.
Good location although google maps has you going in circles...
Just turn into the Marshall's plaza!
Staff was friendly and very accommodation! Place was clean and well kept. We went later afternoon on a Saturday and it was nice and quiet. 
I got a raspberry iced tea (delish!)
We ordered the shrimp and crab dip which was very good. 
Main course: I had the goat cheese salad and the Italiano (?) deep dish pizza
My husband got the fisherman's platter. 
My food was delicious!
His,however was very disappointing. 
The fish and shrimp were just the average cheap battered stuff you can by at market basket. For $25 ish dollars you want at least some sort of quality so it was just a let down. He said the lobster roll was good though. 
Overall it was a nice meal. Just step up with the "summer special" quality. 
I just saw a bad review for the salad. I had a salad there just last night and it was fantastic. Never had a bad meal here and the service is always superb. 
Stopped here on 4/30 after a movie at the theater next door. Arrived around 10:15pm, decided to eat here because it was right there and open late. We like deep dish, so we decided in addition to dinner, we'd order a pizza to go and re-heat the next day (Unos pizza is just as good reheated). 

My friend ordered a small pizza for himself, I ordered a cheeseburger, medium. Our waitress brought our drinks and then disappeared for 20 minutes, until she brought out the food. Came back 1 minute later to see how things were, before I'd bitten into the burger, then left. I tried the burger but it was burnt black and inedible. Waited forever for the waitress to come back. Sent it back, but didn't get a new one because at this point it was close to 11:30pm, and my friend had finished his entire pizza. The place was pretty much empty when we got there and was empty when we left, there's no excuse for making people wait that long or not checking on tables. 

To her credit, the waitress did apologize for disappearing. Manager never came out to speak to us. In fact, he (quite rudely) waved us off when we arrived and asked for a table, saying he was busy taking a catering order (at the hostess station/entrance?). He sent the waitress out with a business card that had "$15 off next visit" scribbled on the back. Not sure how useful that's going to be, since he's assuming other managers will honor something like that.

Thankfully, the one thing Unos never seems to screw up is the pizza, and we had ordered that pizza to go. I ended up eating a piece of that during the ride home because I was starving.
If I wanted week old bag salad I could go to the grocery and buy a cheap $1 bag.  But twice I have paid over $10 for a salad and was hugely disappointed. So much for family take out.  Who would think a restaurant would not use fresh real lettuce.  Had to pull out wilted black lettuce just to eat what I could. 
First dinner of our vacation and it was fantastic! The food was really good.  The Bread basket had everything from dinner rolls to cinnamon rolls in it. Crazy good!  The staff was great and the atmosphere was perfect.
We booked to have dinner here on a one night stay in Sturbridge, during a leaf peeping trip. We weren't expecting to be bowled over but neither were we expecting to wait nearly an hour for very average food.

The best choice was the freshly cooked potato chips!
We wanted so much to enjoy this experience. It was planned for 2 weeks as a birthday retreat. Let me say first, the place was packed with special events, 2 weddings and 3 anniversary dinners. Maybe that was over-reaching for them. Although that alone would not explain the tough cuts of beef. Sirloin ordered by 2 of us was chewy. Prime rib was not great, again, somewhat tough. Even turkey was sliced thick and hard to cut and chew. 

Mysteriously, and very disappointing, was that side dishes were luke warm and unappetizing. 

Service was very good. Atmosphere was lovely but we won't be going back, sorry to say.
The Publick House has plenty of Colonial charm and lovely grounds. However, the food is very mediocre. We were there for lunch on a Monday in the upstairs dining room. I had a crab salad which sounded tempting but the crab had no flavor. My husband had a crabcake sandwich and he said the same was true of his crabcake. We've lived in Baltimore so we know how crab tastes. My coffee was tasteless. The wait staff was attentive, although we waited too long for her to take our order. Won't be going back.
What a wonderful dining experience.   We both selected the meat loaf, it was delicious,  along with the squash side and the best fresh baked bread basket of sweet breads and dinner rolls. The restaurant is quaint and beautiful,  don't miss eating here.
The restaurant has a great menu but the food an service was a great disappointment.  I ordered a soup and a dinner salad and my husband ordered meatloaf with mashed potatoes .  Service was slow.  The meatloaf was cold and the waitress forgot about serving my salad.  After my husband finished his meal, I told the server to omit the salad from the order.  We paid the bill and left disappointed.
I had Yankee pot roast with mashed potatoes and squash.  It was very good.  The dinner rolls were good, especially the mini cinnamon roll. Nice atmosphere.  We took home several items from the bakery-more mini cinnamon rolls, flourless chocolate cake, which was out of this world, and cannoli.  I highly recommend Publick House.
Nice atmosphere with good comfort food.  The pot roast and chicken pot pie were very good.  The bread selections included sweet rolls and specialty breads.   Our server was very attentive 
I had lunch at the Publick House Restaurant  on 9/26. Everything was PERFECT!  
We were greeted warmly by the hostess.  The waitress was incredibly efficient and kind without being servile.   The menu was extensive; the choices were both traditional and vegetarian. The food was absolutely delicious!  The portions were extremely generous.  My nephew ordered a scoop of ice cream for dessert and was served  a three to four scoop dish.   In addition to the pleasant internal atmosphere, the Inn is situated on extensive grounds with beautifully kept gardens, and yet only about  a 5 minute drive from I-90/84.   There is a Bake Shop  so that you can buy a cup of coffee and souvenir pastries to take home.   BRAVO, PUBLICK HOUSE!!   I am so glad that I have found you!
Had an excellent meal from a comprehensive menu in this low beamed restaurant which has its own well stocked bar which, from my point of view has a good selection of Scottish malt whiskies.   Staff are friendly and helpful without being overbearing. 
Had dinner in the Tavern Section, set in early American Décor, of the restaurant since the main restaurant was booked. There was also a Wedding Reception which added to the crowd. Service was excellent. There is an expansive menu however base on the recommendation of our server we ordered the Turkey Dinner, which was delicious.
Visited tonight for dinner. We had a coupon for buy one get one.  The meals were great. Big portion. Brought some of my meal home. Would go back anytime and highly recommend. 
Very nice historic setting, food was slightly above average. I had the panko crusted pan fried pork loin which was a bit over done to my liking. 
Yankee pot roast was cooked to perfection, no knife needed,fork tender. 
Portions are more than adequate.
Would definitely recommend this place in the future.

We were a party of 5 and everyone loved their food! Turkey dinner was very good, as was the fish and chips, and the baked scrod. Highly recommend eating there. Afterwards we sat outside at their lovely patio under an awning. Very nice place all around.
i stayed here because it is close to Brimfield flea market and had a good rating. The room i stayed in were dated from the 1960's-70's, weird wall paper in the rooms. the room i stayed in was ok, nothing special . It was spacious, if your traveling and need a place to stay for a night or 2, then it is ok. my building was far from the hotel itself, you like have to drive to it, so that wasn't so good. 
It was average, lots of selections - bacon, sausage, eggs, SOS, omelets cooked to order (these were good), but overall quality not overly impressive for the price. Service was acceptable and there were only about 4 tables occupied when we were there. I heard the staff talking about how they were short-handed due to the wedding breakfast they were hosting in the conference center. 
We invited family and friends to brunch at the Publick House. The buffet was very good and there were lots of choices including an omelet station and Belgian waffles. My husband commented that it was more "breakfast" than "brunch" but I totally prefer that.
Everyone was satisfied with their meal. The atmosphere was pleasant considering it was raining very, very hard outside! I was recommend this as a lovely way to start a Sunday.
We had dinner here while staying at inn and attending Brimfield Antique Show. 
We had the crab appetizer of crab salad and greens with pita chips. It was very good and a light app. 
We ordered a bottle of red wine and Italian blend that was good. 
I had lobster Newburgh which was outstanding and loaded with lobster. Served with excellent mashed potatoes and squash. All great. 
My guest had the chicken pot pie. It was very good. 
Both are very large entrees easily split between 2 adults. 
When talking with our server about dessert she truly didn't seem to recommend any but we chances it and ordered peanut butter pie which was excellent however I could do without the hardened chocolate on top. 

I would love to return here. We totally enjoyed. 
Odessa made our group of 4 adults and 3 children welcome in this fine dining room. The clam chowder was as great as its reputation. Three of us had good crab cakes, and spinach salad. The frittata of the day was ordinary. The child's burger was demolished and the fish and chips appreciated. The toddler shared ours and gobbled all she had. The room being so dark was a bit negative, but on a hot day, it was cool. The parking is down a tight drive to behind the restaurant.
I sat in an upholstered chair instead of a hard dining chair, near the fireplace. It felt like being in the game of "CLUE". the Staff was attentive and gracious. There is an on site bakery so the sticky buns were warm and gooey and the dinner rolls divine. It was my birthday and I received a cupcake with a candle in it - still warm from the oven and the frosting was melting a little on the cupcake as it arrived. It doesn't get any more fresh than that !!! Parking was a little far as it was a busy night, but it would not deter me from coming back.
Popped in for a couple of ice creams. Staff very friendly and efficient. Clean and not too busy on a Tuesday afternoon. Main problem is that it is accessible from the road in only one direction.
Good people doing the best they can preparing standard McDonald's fare hardly merits 5*. But on Saturday mornings the Southbridge McDonald's allows a group of locals to come, but breakfast, and bring their instruments. [ Guitar / banjo / ukulele/drums/concertina]. These are mostly older folks who are really good! I commend the McDonald's staff for allowing this to happen and recommend that you find your way there on a Saturday morning to get the opportunity to experience this treasure.
The meal was McDonald's  quality. It was very understaffed. Went at lunchtime and there was only one staff manning the counter it was a long wait.
Not a lot of value eateries in over-priced Sturbridge, but Mikey D's is one of them.  This one was about as clean as you could expect, and the service was good.
We have never been in a McDonalds that was so filthy from the parking lot to the rest rooms - I can understand if a restaurant gets slammed with customers but this place had very few customers the staff were just standing around chatting.
inconsistent service; poorly constructed burgers; always some kind of problem; last week they had no milkshakes, yesterday no soda - I asked if I could have chicken nuggets instead of the 2 sodas (ordered 2 meals), she said yes - got home to find out I was charged for the nuggets - so paid for a full meal AND nuggets, but got no drinks as the machine was broken.
We stopped for a quick coffee and breakfast. Service was super fast and counter help was extremely polite and helpful. Restaurant and rest rooms were very clean.  Restaurant has easy access to turnpike and major routes. 
I stopped with my husband at 6:30 in the morning we were in a rush so wanted something fast. 
I ordered a sausage egg and cheese biscuit with 2 hash browns and 2 small orange juice. I repeated my order ***3***times to the boy over the speaker in which he had typed it in wrong twice and came across with a "aaaahhh ummmm" sound as if I caught him napping. 
We got to the window, no greeting,it took him a few minutes to get our food and then didn't even say have a nice day or anything. As I said before we were in a bit of a rush so I didn't look in the bag until we were back on the road. 
He gave me sausage biscuit, no egg or cheese and the OJ tasted old and sour. 
I get it some people aren't morning people but seriously get a night job if you can't at least pay attention and greet with a smile. He was the first person I saw that day and left a bad impression. 

this is by far the dirtiest McDonalds I have ever been to.  From the restrooms to the tables to the floors everything is a mess.  If we had noticed before hand I would not have ordered food here.
Even the food was not standard for McDonalds.
Wow what is there to say..... McDonald's is WAYYYY better than Burger King!!  Burger are gross but breakfast and fries, chicken is great... Most of the time
Since when is it ok for employees to be rude, snotty and talk back to customers .because we went there tonight and that's what we got we from one of the young female employee that was there.   Trying tio figure out how she's had that job as as long as she had with her behavior.
Pulling away from the drive-thru, my fries were cold (dislike).  On the like side, open 24*7.  Hamburger was so-so.
Came through the drive thru and got the minimal - a small diet coke and a McDouble. How can one screw that up? Well, they did NOT. Appreciated that it was close by, along with a Burger King too. Both at this hotel's property edge. Easily can walk to
We were staying at a nearby hotel and wanted something quick and easy. This was a great place to have a quick breakfast before hitting the road again.
I was staying in a local hotel and needed a quick bite to eat, i found this McDonalds easily within walking distance so I thought i would give it a go....i found the staff to be very friendly and the food was very good and fresh...thanks
Same server ,Same order ,3 days in a row. Three different results . Coffee large creme two sugars. Day one Coffee 
Carmel xxtra creme little sugar. Day two Coffee moca little creme two sugars.Day three Dark burnt nasty no sugar..next time you go to Mc Donalds for Coffee bring your Keurig and ask the server if you can use an outlet...Somebody bulldoze this chain....
We've gone for ice cream twice. Both times they said, "Sorry, the ice cream machine is down." We've had drive through orders come out wrong three times.
Service quick & efficient Drive-Thru. Pleasant employees. Always smiling and helpful. Each time I have used this establishment they have gone above the duty. Accommodated my slowly awaking niece in her car seat to a orange drink that i had not placed an order for because she was out cold ( or so i thought lol)
We just pulled into th drive through to grab a bite before going to Old Sturbridge Village.  Very quick and easy.  We ate in our car in the parking lot which had lots of shady spots due to large trees.  They even got our order right!
The service here is horrible. More than a few people in front of me demanded refunds. The manager was rude to the customers and had I not already paid, I would have walked out. I have started timing my wait at fast food restaurants because of this.
6 of us went in early Saturday evening. The restaurant was only 1/2 full after 25 mins. sitting there we finally asked a busy boy if there was a waitress for us. He seemed very surprised we hadn't seen one yet and went over to the front desk and mentioned it to the hostess. One person had a food allergy which didn't seem to register with her. Getting an order I took forever though again they were not busy but our waitress seemed to just want to disappear into the kitchen. She brought salads which we didn't even know came with the dinner as she never asked about dressings. Just gave everyone Italian. When asked if the dressing had garlic due to allergies her reply was I don't know it's just that Kens stuff in a bottle. Luckily we knew and asked if there was something else then got options. Had to ask 3 or 4 times for rolls. Getting water was impossible. The Turkey dinner and the pasta were rated good, The Salmon was raw~ couldn't be eaten and the baked potato could barely be cut with a knife as it was so hard. What should have been a 1 hr dinner turned into 2.5 hrs...some of our group had to leave to get ready for a function while some of us stayed for the bill which we had an awful time getting from the waitress. One in our group finally had to go looking for her and again the restaurant was still only 1/2 full. We are all in Sturbridge twice a year on business but never this restaurant again.
We sta outside on the patio-this restaurant is very busy and it took awhile to get seated.  The food was good and the prices were very reasonable
I'm only giving it a 2 because of the outdoor/waterfront seating. The food was average at best. Ordered a mango martini. They were out of mango flavoring. Ordered stuffed clam shells. They were out of them. At least we were told this when we ordered them. Later ordered coconut shrimp and after asking about our order about 20 minutes after we placed it. I think they forgot about it because it didn't come out until 10 minutes later without the pine dipping sauce. Guess what.... Out of that too!! I will give the bartender credit. After we commented he did comp us the coconut shrimp. Another reason I'm giving it 2 and not 1. Also the drinks were VERY small and pricey for the size. 
Just got out of here...the staff was great! The service was poor, my turkey dinner was rubbery and my buddies hamburger looked like a raw soybean burger....Nice setting though...it has lots of potential...
Had the pleasure of visiting the Oxhead Tavern after a long day at a nearby flea market. It was nice to wind down and enjoy a couple of cocktails on their beautiful patio overlooking the lake. The young man at the host stand was very pleasant and welcoming. Our server was nice as well. We ordered popcorn chicken as an appetizer and it was quite good. We also tried the chicken pot pie and a chicken wrap, both nicely executed. The only reason I give it four stars instead of five is the fact that the bartender outside yelled across the patio at an older gentleman for seating himself at one of the tables. Working in the service industry myself, I do know it's an annoyance when a guest seats themselves but I found it very unprofessional to embarrass the poor old man in front of all the guests dining outside. That aside, I would definitely visit this restaurant again for the quality of food and the beautiful and relaxing atmosphere.
Found this by accident traveling from NYS to Wakefield, Mass.  Surprised to find beautiful deck w bar overlooking a lovly lake. On top of that, food was awesome!! Can't wait to go again for dinner this time. Lovely spot.
This place seems to be in constant chaos and drama, between inconsistent food derived from constant bantering of staff.
It is a shame because the place has so much potential, but always falls flat.
Clean nice place - better than the usual tourist attractions. Good value for your money.
Short staffed, but they were very nice.
My husband and I went for dinner, early on a Saturday since we heard there would be live music at 7 and it would be difficult to get a table.  The deck was already crowded but we had a table in the screened in area which is where we preferred.  I had broiled seafood (haddock, scallops and shrimp) which was delicious.  I asked for mashed potato but got baked, which turned out to be a good thing.  My husband had steak tips which were cooked as he liked them but one piece was a little tough but he said the others were delicious and cooked just how he likes them (rare).  The best part was the desserts!  He had the Blueberry Crumble and I had the Sea salt and Carmel cheesecake!  Both were melt in your mouth delicious!  We didn't stay long for the music because there was no where to sit after dinner to enjoy it without dealing with bugs.  Too bad the band sounded good during warm ups. 
This restaurant is located very nicely between the hotel and the lake. They have big terrace, in sunny days a great palce. The food is medium, a bit too heavy (oil!) and could be better seasoned. Friendly service.
We had been here many years ago.  Went in for a drink and late lunch. Decided on outside seating with nice view of a small beach on lake. Drinks were reasonably priced for a high tourist area. We split a salad which was large and split a turkey panini with stuffing, cranberry and gravy on the side. Excellent food and service!!!  They were setting up entertainment to begin at 7pm but we did not stay. Definitely will return on a Friday or Saturday to enjoy the entertainment.  
Close to where we stayed, nice clean atmosphere and what was available was good. About 1/2 the menu was not available. Nice live music on Saturday evening.
Sturbridge is dependent on tourism and as such, I expected this elegant looking tavern, at the height of the tourist season to be so much more. The indoor dining was dimly lit so we decided to eat outdoors overlooking the water. We waited to be seated . And waited . And waited. The host forgot to bring the menus. So we waited . And waited. Again. When other guests arrived, they had menus and still we did not. The waitress , who only had two tables and an empty porch, forgot our drinks, and even after bringing one, forgot the other. They were out of more menu items than they had. The bread was stale, the potatoes cold.....It was not a dining pleasure.
Excellent Reuben and great fries. Others had salads and burgers.nice dinner menu and good beer and cocktail selection
I went there last spring and enjoyed an amazing lunch. Today I went and ordered the same exact meal and it was terrible. The scallops were off somehow and I could only eat one. about an hour later I was violently ill. Coincidence, maybe. Maybe not, but I will not eat there again.
The food at oxhead tavern is amazing! The server we had was super friendly and attentive, she was quick to refill our drinks and get us anything else we needed,this place was clean and friendly! The inside is very well maintained and has a true tavern feel to it, I would defiantly eat here again! Oh and they also have a beach out back! How cool is that?!
I love the decor wood beam very 1700th. The grandchildren ate all there food this does not happen often. The food is simple nothing high end or fancy. Good old home cooking.
Both my friend and myself have eaten at the Oxhead Tavern on several occasions. My favorite dish is the Yankee Pot Roast. Everything is so yummy!!! Even the vegetables are delicious. I tried a special made with Pork Medallions on one occasion. That meal was so memorable that I would most definitely order it again if it was offered. My friend and I really enjoy the Italian Lemon Cake as well. It is so creamy and delicious that we always end our meal sharing a piece of it. This is one of my favorite places to eat.
Took some friends out to eat ,and told them about the beautiful porch overlooking the lake. We were given a table and requested to be seated on they're porch. I was told that the porch was closed ,even though I could see the overhead fans running. This was not the atmosphere I had enjoyed on my first visit. One other menu problem,that upset me was my meal. The menu stated that the bacon covered meatloaf was served with a meat flavored brown gravy,it was served with barbeque sauce,I definetly would not have ordered it. One of our party enjoyed the Mac and Cheese,the other 2 had the chicken which they said the pasta was somewhat dry with the chicken served over it.
Waitress was out to lunch during dinner.  My wine glass had another person's lipstick on it!  Tried to get another glass and had to flag her down.  She put the new glass of wine e on our tab!  I had the steak which was passe the scallops wHicham my hubby ordered were great!  Tried to get Waitress several times but she was busy speaking to the outside bartender.
Great food and service. I took my 3vgrands for lunch. Wonderful, wonderful service. I will return if I ever come back to this area.
The hostess was lackluster; the waitress asked if I wanted fries or onion rings, but neglected to mention the extra charge for the onion rings. Really, $40 plus tip for freezer food? We went to Friendly's because we thought it was a known entity, but will not be back.
We had a very tasty dinner the service was very good with lovely staff . we went for breakfast another morning and it was half price and again it was very good
Seniors get 1 breakfast free when another is purchasted. Good breakfasts. B/L/D menu is large for this food franchies.
Haven't been to a Friendly's in years.  One of our friends on this trip had a hankering for a fishamajig sandwich which she hadn't had in a long while.  We stopped here after visiting old Sturbridge Village.  Names were being taken for table seating, and times given, even though multiple open tables could be seen.  Many other guests walked out and others complained as to why people were not being seated when tables were obviously available.  Not sure of the reason but we finally got a table after about a 15-20min wait.  The food was just OK and gave me gastro intestinal problems later in the day.  Most likely due to the fried foods I ordered which I don't normally eat.  The only bright spot in our visit was our waitress who went out of her way to try to keep things moving, even though she was waiting tables, cleaning tables, running register, and making ice creams.  All while the place was packed with rather unhappy guests.  I overheard many complaints about the waiting and the quality of the food, as well as many parties leaving the restaurant without even being seated.  The hostess was asked by one patron if he could borrow a pen.  Her curt answer was "I don't have one" as she went on her merry way.  Not the most efficient or hospitable place I've been to in a long while.
Great service, good selection to choose from and great pricing. And since we were staying at the Inn, we were able to walk to restaurant.  So convenient. 
We were in Sturbridge to visit OSV and decided to make a breakfast stop first.  Very close to the entrance of the Village.  Large dining rooms.  Friendly staff.  Good service. Excellent food.  Very clean restrooms.  Who could ask for more?  Oh.....Monday through Friday until 11 AM breakfasts are 50% off.  Definitely a great value.
Nothing special. Breakfast menu was good and the servers were very friendly. The location is right on Route 20 just down from the Old Sturbridge Inn and Old Sturbridge Village.
We went for breakfast one morning because it was supposed to be cheaper and better than the hotel. It was busy and our seat was in front of the entrance to the kitchen.  We ordered and waited a long time. We got our meal got half way through eating we watched the toast slip off a plate a waitress was picking up to bring to a customer. She picked it up and put it back on the plate while the other staff laughed. We saw and heard this. We hesitated trying to decide what to do. We got up left our food behind told the person with the plate in front of them what happened. I left the person seating customers $10.00 buck to cover the cost of the food and left. Every other restaurant i visited in my week in Sturbridge was fine but this place. yuk
Very nice simple fare. The menu was fine salads burgers etc your typical american diner. No alcohol though not even beer.
Lovely ice creams
The food was OK.  Over priced.  The service was very bad.  Not friendly at all and slow.  Looked like they were going out of business.
We went to there for breakfast. I was great value of they where running a summer special. Half off your breakfast. My grand son loved the special drinks they have for children.

Typical Friendly's restaurant.  Went here at night late snack and for ice cream.  Average amount of customers. It took forever to get our food. We're not from the area so I don't know if this is typical for this restaurant but we were getting annoyed.
Arrived shortly after 7:00 am opening on Friday, so we were the only ones there. Half price breakfast was amazing and under $20 for the four of us. My ham, mushroom and onion omelette has an enormous amount of stuff and was tasty. Came with hash browns and toast. Others had eggs and pancakes. 
If you are traveling on I84 either to or from I90, this is a fairly quickly on-and-off place for a (usually) quick bite and, of course, ice cream.  The waitress was friendly and fairly attentive, but our order (turkey bacon swiss burger and turkey sandwich value meal) took longer than expected with no explanation for a delay- a delay we can live with if we are told why.  The food itself was fine and the sundaes afterwards came out fairly quickly.

We did not take advantage of the little table kiosks they had there for ordering or reviewing meal options, although payment was made at the table.  The calculated tip amounts were correct (i.e., based on the price of meal and drinks, NOT on the price of meal, drinks, and tax), which is one of my pet peeves.

You will find kids here, so this is not the place necessarily for a quiet meal.  There are nearby fast food locations, and a fairly nice restaurant all nearby, so there are other options, but this "is what is is" and is good at it.
we enjoyed the food, the staff was friendly, the ice cream sundaes were good and silly for the kids, we enjoyed it
Breakfast was 1/2 price, so we gambled it.  Very slow service.  Did not know how to make a decent omelet, and worst was the sneaky trivia game on the iPad, which we were unexpectedly charged for in such a way to hide the cost to look like a food item - add a tip!
We stopped at Friendly's for lunch after visiting the Brimfield Antique Show. We were seated fairly quickly. Our waitress, Andrea, was very friendly and let us know that if we needed anything to yell! :)  She brought our drinks over quickly and also took our food order. The food came out quickly. I ordered the four cheese pasta with a side salad and my husband ordered a cheeseburger with fries. The food was tasty, hot and a good portion size. We paid and were on our way.
I have reviewed this Friendly's before, and really enjoyed their food.  UNTIL TODAY!!  We arrived for breakfast at about 9:45 AM, were seated, we didn't like where we were seated, too close to the kitchen, so asked to move.  We were told "no problem".   We sat for about 5-10 minutes before being offered coffee.  The waitress took our order........and we waited.........and waited.........and waited.   Finally she brought my husband's breakfast and a plate of their home-fries for me, even though I had asked for fruit.  Okay, she won't charge us for them.   THEN, now, my husband was eating, she asked what kind of cheese I wanted on my super melt.  Excuse me?  That should have come out and been served when my husband got his breakfast.  "Oh, it'll be out in just a minute"   Then she went back to busily talking with friends in another booth.  No extra coffee.  No "how is your food?"  NONE of the amenities usual in a restaurant.   When I did get my super melt, no egg, which I had told them, I opened the sandwich, one slice of cheese, and some crumbled bacon..................still no offer of more coffee.  My husband asked for more syrup for his pancakes, and was giving a HALF  portion in one of those little ramikins...............She gave my husband the senior discount, but not me.   We paid the bill, and left no tip for the young lady.  On the way out my husband took the time to remind the waitress that her job was to take care of her customers, NOT to chat with her friends.  Probably won't ever be back.  VERY disappointed.
On our way to Worcester, MA and stopped for supper. I didn't know it took so long to prepare salads for my wife and I. And when they were brought out, they got my wife's salad incorrectly made. She chose not to say anything because we didn't want to wait any longer. If you're looking to make good time traveling, do not consider this place. 
Service here was great! The person who took our order was friendly and personable, our food was cooked
Right and was the right temperature! My only complaint would be the soda area was really sticky, but that's to be expected in most places with soda!
Clean, well kept with clean rest rooms. We've stopped there many times to save time 
and money. Not as greasy as other chains and right on the main drag. Good pit stop
on a busy day.
Food was as expected from Burger King, the staff was friendly and food was served fresh and served quickly.
The restaurant seemed very unkept. No direct supervision of a young staff. Not too concerned about seating people promptly and with courtesy. Will not return.
As always quick and delicious! This BK was waling distance from Super8 and is my favorite fast food venue.
We stopped here after leaving the Sturbridge Host Hotel . We arrived at the end of breakfast hours . Our order was not out of the ordinary , 3 breakfast sandwiches , 2 hashbrowns and beverages . We waitied 40 minutes for our breakfast while we watched at least 5 cars get their orders from drive thru , and we were the only customers in the lobby , literally. 
This is just your average Burger King restaurant.  Nothing new or special here.  I am not fond of fast food.
Never had a problem with any of the food or service. Always good and fresh. Inside East Aurora NY location is very clean. Interesting (questionable) side business by 1 employee out of their parking lot....
Nothing out of this world; Used to be fantastic; Don't get me wrong, it's NOT bad - but $1.50 for a soda!? The hotdogs are just hotdogs - they used to be awesome. 
Hot dogs rate a C-minus.  Overpriced. The dogs I had we're cold. 3 customers or more and they are overwhelmed.  Don't know how they stay open.
This is really just an indoor hotdog stand, not a full blown restaurant. They don't make any pretensions and what they serve is good quality, fairly priced, friendly and prompt. In other words if you like hotdogs, want a quick bite and don't want to wait a long time, this is just fine.
We were disappointed with our meal. Our first course was the clam chowder, which came in a huge portion. My advice would be to have this as a meal rather than as a starter. My husband had the seafood paella which is served in a pan large enough to feed a family of four. He thought his food was too salty as well. I had the Bass which was so salty I couldn't eat it. It was even saltier than the homemade potato chips that come with the meal. I told the server who was very nice about changing it. The new piece of fish was almost as salty as the first, and I ate two bites. The service was good and it is a nice atmosphere but we did not enjoy our food as much as we should have.
I didn't have hig hopes for a seafood restaurant in land locked sturbridge but it was great! The portions are HUGE, even off the kids menu. It was comfortable and casual and the service was good.
I am not sure why this place doesn't get higher reviews -- based on our experience the staff was professional, friendly, and efficient, despite it being an unusually busy Wednesday night. The food was excellent, nicely prepared and presented. The arugula and beet salad in particular was a delicious surprise.
Headlines may read, "Midwestern Couple Overdose on Seafood First Night of Vacation". We made reservations a couple weeks ago per recommendations from this site. Atmosphere was very lively albeit a bit noisy, but we were able to converse. Service was impeccable. Everyone on staff we encountered were friendly, knowledgeable, and prompt. Great beer list, fun drink of the night (Spiked Tee-yes spelt that way). The starters of chowder and Apple Gorgonzola salad were fabulous. We were warned the Paella was spicy, but found it not to be. However, it was delicious and enough for two! The Seared Scallops, served with a barley risotto, butternut squash, sun-dried tomatoes, and topped with bacon jam was...transformational! Bacon jam! Amazing stuff. So, if you're in this neck of the northeast woods, go here. You won't be disappointed!
I love fish and chips in England and have been searching for a place in the US that matches.  This was outstanding and worth a trip back to Sturbridge.
My husband & I really enjoyed our meals here.  My husband had a bowl of clam chowder as well - he said the chowder here was one of the best he's tasted - and we've eaten at seafood restaurants along both the US East coast and the Gulf of Mexico so he's had quite a few to compare with.  

The meals themselves were very good and generous portions as well. They did not have grilled seafood on the menu.
Excellent fish and chips, great Salmon and wonderful service. They have a great menue.the location is right on Main St and easy commute on 84 from Stafford.
My wife and I ate dinner here after spending an afternoon at Sturbridge Historic Village.  We both agreed that this one gets our highest rating, something that doesn't happen all that often.  The seafood is wonderfully fresh, carefully prepared and well-presented.  Service is attentive and professional.  Prices are moderate. I love it when we find a restaurant of this caliber!
Who would have thought land-locked Sturbridge would have some of the best seafood I've ever had. This restaurant was our destination when our first choice ad no reservations but we were delighted. My salmon was glazed with a horseradish and delightful. It was accompanied by ample portions of smashed potatoes and green beans. My gluten-free friend loved her paella. Another friend described his scallops as the best ever And the 4th person liked her strip sirloin which came with au gratin white and sweet potatoes. Interesting by typical salads are on the menu and one of my dining companions inhaled her large one. Nobody had room for dessert but there were a number of choices. Waitress was warm and friendly and attentive. Reception desk staff seemed busy and off-putting but it was worth the cool  welcome.
Went for lunch.  Very cute and bright, nicely decorated.  Nice atmosphere.  Food was good. Prices seemed reasonable.  My sis and I both had fish tacos, big portion to much to finish but they were yummy.  Mom had chowder in a bread bowl also was goog.  Mom must have enjoyed it she wanted to go back the next day.
My husband and I stopped by just to see what the menu offerings were.  What we found was they also do take out!  The clam chowder was nothing less than fabulous and service was friendly and prices fair and reasonable.
It's one of those places where the menu has lots of adjectives--and I think you pay by the word--and other affectations like prices with no decimals ($28-). But the food is good, if a bit expensive. If you're into the kind or restaurants with lots of adjectives on the menu, then you'll enjoy it. I had the paella and it was quite tasty.
We were able to make a reservation and were seated quickly.  The seafood was just wonderful and so glad that we ate here.  The staff was so prompt with food and made sure the evening was perfect.  Different choices from chain restaurants made this so special.
Gluten free choices, my favorite is the paella.  Wonderful meal.  Feel guilty ordering anything else bc it would mean missing the paella
I read the reviews on Trip Adviser and decided to give it a try. We were not disappointed! We made reservations on Open Table and I'm glad we did because the wait last night was over an hour! Locals and travelers filled the restaurant. Our server, Jenna, was knowledgeable about wines and questions we had about some dishes. The presentation of our dishes was beautiful...and they were delicious! We'd definitely go back on our next trip to the Sturbridge area!
MAKE A RESERVATION & Go here!!! The lobster and the baked cod is so good we went back!  I had the bacon wrapped baked cod twice-as good as I have ever eaten & the price is great
How can this joint have better seafood than the coast? Well it does. It's small. It's always packed. Once you get seated it's very quant and the food is out of this world. 
Walked here from our hotel across the street.  Good vibe; informal, not loud at all.  We shared a harvest salad (the hot polenta croutons were the best!) and seafood paella.  Plenty of food!  Key lime pie was fabulous!!  Good, friendly service; reasonable prices.  
This is a very good place to stop for seafood. Lots of seating. The wait staff is great. Friendly, helpful and knowledgeable. 
The calamari is special. Great flavor with a light batter. The lobster was a good choice for me. My wife had the sea bass that was a little over cooked. 
Ate here several times, not inexpensive but good and fresh seafood! Service a bit slow and our servicer took drink order , we waited and asked about it and he said he is not the bartender. Ok. We ordered a second round and bartender brought drinks, so I guess they switched jobs for a bit! Wait staff has a bit of an attitude, like they really don't like their jobs, all that said, food is worth it!
My veggie spicy noodles were great! I'd definitely recommend them, though my husband's regular spicy noodles were twice as spicy as mine. My friend's veggie pad thai was not good, and also not pad thai. Spring rolls were good.
Many wedding guests ate at The Thai Place during their weekend stay and loved the food.  It was easily accessible from the Reeder Family Lodges and provided quick service and good food.
My sisters and I eat here almost every Thursday when we are in Putnam to knit at Woolworks just up the street from here. We usually get take out and a glass of wine while they prepare our food. They know what we want as we walk in the door as we usually order the same thing every week. 
Every now and then we branch out and try something different and have been happy with all of it! Once I ordered something I didn't care for, but that was my fault and just wasn't something I liked - nothing wrong with the way it was prepared, just not my taste. Everything else has been delicious!
I use the pad thai as a metric to rank any Thai restaurant. In brief - this place fails. Seasoning was very bland and had none of the complex and subtle blend of flavors that charcterizes Thai food. This tasted like it was prepared with a sauce that came out of a can. Hardly enough to flavor the rice noodles. In my opinion this restaurant fails the Thai taste test. 

My wife is a harsher critic than I about the food she got.   She ordered the Thai squash curry with tofu. She couldn't finish it. Spices blended very poorly. No hint of the richness and subtle combination of good Thai food. I tasted her dish and it was definitely out of a pre-prepared can. No fresh spices at all.

We decided to finish with the sticky rice and mango dessert. After all how can you screw up this Thai classic?  They did! Mango was tart with the crunch of a cucumber. And it is July when really good mangoes are available! Sticky rice was chewy and the flavor bland. We didn't finish it between us.

I've been to many great Thai restaurants and some not so great. The food here was the worst ever. Still we tipped the waitress well because it wasn't her fault. However you would be better off going to the nearby Friendly's or maybe even the MacDonald's. Sorry to have to give this review. 
We were just passing through Sturbridge and ordered take-out from The Thai Place. The food was very good and reasonably priced.  I'd recommend the "Crazy Noodles" which was a dish of wide rice noodles with pieces of chicken and egg mixed with several different vegetables in a spicy sauce.
I've had 100s of meals in Thailand.  Realizing that authentic vegetables and spice levels (gets hotter in the countryside) this is one of the better Thai meals I've had stateside in some time.  We shared chicken laarb (needed some/more chili) squash curry (solid) two noodle dishes (egg noodles could have been homemade) with sticky rice (authentic and hard to find).  Great service and reasonable prices.  Easy on/off the interstate.  There are few good choices along the drive between Hartford and Boston - this is now our go-to place.
Some of the best Thai food I have had, but the service is awful.  I almost had to beg to get a glass of beer and a glass of wine.  The appetizer came before the drinks, then the dinner came before we were through with the appetizer.  We ended up piling empty dishes because the server wasn't taking anything away.  This happens often and saying something does nothing.   It's the food that keeps bringing us back, not the service. So expect inattentiveness to get a great meal.
This was not our  first  time at Thai Place. We  have gone there before while staying nearby for the Brinmfield flea markets in  May, July and September.  This was  was even better than previous visits, which too were  very very good. You  can taste the freshness in everything.
We shared  the  mini spring rolls, crisp and not greasy.  The special duck was  outstanding  as was the Bangkok Beef.  Large portions  but we managed to clean our plates, all  washed down with Thai beer.  
Service is excellent too.
There.. I said it.  Get the Pad Thai.  I know that sounds boring, but I've had it almost 15-20x here and never gets old.  Also, their soups are really good!!!
We've been coming here for years and always get great service and Fresh and delicious meals and appetizers (Thai Place Platter is great)
Whether you get take out or eat in Thai Place offers consistent quality and delectable meals.
Much better than the usual Chinese food.
We get food from the Thai Place at least once a week.  Everything is fresh and delicious. The staff is friendly.  You can have a drink at the bar while you wait for your food to go, or dine in.  Romantic for couples, fine for families.
The menu is large. No surprises or unusual dishes, but the food is very good. Even more surprising, since this place is one of several in the chain.
My boys and i are always in search of a different thai experience. Well this one is only 35 minutes from our home so we gave it a shot. VERY GOOD. That being said we all got pad Thai so i cannot speak to the rest of the menu...
I'm a local and regular customer. It's standard Americanized-Thai fare, simple but consistently well-prepared. The surroundings are nothing fancy but I've always had attentive service. The veggie handrolls are tasty and pho on the menu is a welcome addition. When you can, try the stir-fried lobster -- my favorite with sticky rice on the side.
Even though they have the only Thai place and others like it it is not good if you know real Thai food. Lots of choices on menu for sure soup was fair all the noodle dishes and curry items we tried were bad. Tasted like reheated frozen food.
Nothing home made. I will say i eat the real deal in LA CALIFORNIA so I am spoiled.
We will not go again. Place was very dirty also which i should have known from the get go it would be bad.

Not sure how this ranks above 1 star
Overall the food was just so bland no flavor at all. I had to get hoisin sauce to put on my meal just so I could eat it. The service was horrible!! three girls all on their phones while my drink was empty. I'll never go back
Reasonable prices and great food.  Quiet atmosphere and good service. Little tricky to find.  Can't wait to go back this year.
Disgusting! My boyfriend, his mother and I all became ill after eating here, she vomiting and us unable to eat for days following, which is no surprise after seeing one of our entrees littered with GREY vegetables, for which we received no compensation or even apology. Everything was mediocre at best, disgusting at worst, and nothing matched their menu descriptions. 

Just a few offenses: Thai dipping sauces were randomly replaced with Italian salad dressing, their iced coffee was for some reason orange, and they seem to think duck fat alone is an acceptable cut of meat. Everything we ordered, appetizers and three different entrees, were greasy and tasted off, not due to inauthenticity, but poor storage, handling, and food preparation. 

We only stopped here because we were tired travelers who had nothing to go on but reviews. We should have known better. Obviously the only Thai restaurant in a city with few dining options has a higher probability of having an inflated rating from locals.

Another really weird thing is their bathroom situation. The lights aren't by the door, but rather, unlabeled, and right next to the kitchen entrance. I only found them after accidentally flicking the wrong one and covering the dining area in darkness. The staff said nothing. The bathroom itself has a shower area where a hodgepodge of dirty cleaning devices are messily stored, behind a strange and too small curtain, making what's behind entirely visible to anyone entering. A great symbol for the food which was to follow.
Picked this on TripAdvisor. Wasn't disappointed. Excellent extensive menu that catered for all tastes. Friendly service and large portions. All 4 of us agreed the food was great. Thorough recommended. 
I always go for the classic comfort dishes in Thai and Indian places. If they can do those well then I am all over the menu next time I visit. I. am only marking this restaurant down as the chicken was over cooked in my green Thai curry and bland. The curry sauce was tasty but the meat had no favour. My friend had the Pas Thai which was always average. The Tom Yum soup was tasty. The portion are large. Worth a good if you are in the mood for Thai food 
It's a pizza place. Nothing more, nothing less. Totally fine. Very firendly staff. We had the margherita pizza. Lots of cheese! I also had a salad which was very basic.
We had pizza to go and ice cream both very tasty and another night we had a calzonie and grinders again very good
Stopped by for lunch and ordered in - great pizza place. Quick service and they will make your pizza to order. Good prices.
Very good pizza! We had a margherita version. The crust was fabulous!!!!!!!!!!  Seating area is typical pizza parlor decor. Its okay. Staff was very friendly. Its co-located with a gas station/conv. Store.
Visited while on vacation Looking for area restaurants, not chains.  Ordered a shrimp salad. I asked the man what size the shrimp were and he seemed to indicate they were medium shrimp. We got the food for take out.  When I opened my salad, which I paid almost $13.00 for the shrimp were small and the salad was just iceberg lettuce.  There was no mixed greens or carrot. It did have nice chunks of tomatoes but that was it.  I should have gone to fast food there salads are much better and alot cheaper.
OK, so you have to know we have had a lot of pizza in our life. We are grandparents. This was the best. They also had stuff kids love - like chicken fingers. We even took leftovers back to the hotel for later. It was good cold, too!
reasonably priced and tasted GREAT! Service was timely and very good. we were staying close by, so really liked that it was not far away
Have been going here for a while and have never had any complaints. The staff is always friendly and they have a pretty good sized menu to choose from. Food is pretty good, nothing over the top but meets expectations of what you'd get from local pizza shop.
We ordered a party size pizza for carry out while staying overnight in Sturbridge, and it was just, well...pizza. Nothing to write home about, which surprised me, considering the glowing reviews. We had a salad as well, and it was the same - functional but not anything I would rave about. There are other pizza places in town, so we probably wouldn't go to this one again.
I stay in Sturbridge about once a month. This is where I eat dinner every time I'm in town. I have taken many different people here, everyone always enjoys the pizza. Try the house special!
If you are in the mood for a fresh simple salad, with homemade house dressing, this is the place for you. In a world of kale and mizuna ,good old iceberg lettuce with onions, tomatoes and cucumbers can be an unlikely comfort food. Pizza, subs and Italian specialities are also very good. Friendly staff in a cozy, clean atmosphere adds to the appeal for a quick bite.I have a friend who eats at a different pizza place in town most every night and this place is his favorite!
I've only tried Old Sturbridge Pizza once... can't hardly believe it!!  We were holed up in a hotel room on a rainy day... and just didn't feel like going out.  We made a great choice!!  Thin Crust... Pepperoni, Italian Sausage, Onions, Green Peppers, Mushrooms, Black Olives... and extra cheese.   Quite simply, one of the best pizzas I can remember eating in a long time!!  Highly recommended!!
I eat pizza and salad here about twice a month. It is a family thing where we meet on occasion. We have tried Greek salad or antipasto and various kinds of pizza and have never been disappointed. It is a very busy place, especially with take out. We eat in and get very good service. You can BYOB if you drink also.
This establishment is probably a pub/pizza joint.  Order at the counter and food is brought to you when ready.  Nothing wrong with that..  I tried a house special and my wife had a more conventional two or three topping pizza.  My was good but her's was better.  Crust was to our liking.
OK pizza but nothing special. We got caught up and ordered one of the "Specialty Pizza" but there was nothing really special about it. One of them was the Mexican Pizza...was thinking more of a Taco Pizza but they didn't have that. All in all, OK...but, nothing special. Not sure I'd order pizza there as it was pricey too.
We ordered this pizza from hotel. We planned to leave for some time and weren't sure what time we get back so asked when is the latest delivery. The lady told 9:30pm and we placed an order ahead of time for last delivery. The delivery arrived at 9:30 prompt and pizza was delicious! All vegetables were fresh. Highly recommended. 
we ordered delivery from this amazing pizza place. this was one of the best pizzas we have had! ingredients were all awesome!! 
We stayed one night in Sturbridge in our trek to view Nee England Fall Foliage and found this little gem.  The food was hot and very good... Service was even better... We shared a yummy piping hot pizza and large fresh salad.... I believe the owners were the ones behind the counter and they even though it's very informal where you order at the counter and seat yourself they checked in with us several times to be sure all was good and see if we needed anything.... We strongl
I wanted to try this place out. It is under new management. We ordered a Greek salad to start off with, then had a buffalo chicken grinder and a BLT grinder and a frozen pumpkin pie custard for desert. Everything was magnificent.  The prices are very good, and you do get your money's worth. I will most definitely return again!
Pizza was excellent! All fresh vegetables used, Italian sausage very good, pizza crust light and very tasty! Give it 👍🏻
I was just here for a Baby Shower Tea and I can't say enough good about the food and the venue. The Victorian Parlor is elegant; the selection of tea foods offered ( tea sandwiches, scones, elegant desserts ) delicious; the staff attentive yet nearly invisible. This event had 40 people in the same room and it was a relaxing, serene, tasteful, and totally delightful afternoon.  The " fine dining" is checked and the "value " left blank because the experience was 5* but I have no clue as to the cost. Old Sturbridge Village's website to Wight Tavern does not list menus or prices but provides a phone number for event planners to call. If I were planning an event, this is the first number I'd dial.
We had lunch here. Great salad and sandwiches. Loved the inside of this place. Service was friendly and fast. 
The Oliver Wight Tavern is amazing!  We had my daughter's rehearsal dinner there as well as treating our guests to their Sunday brunch.  The food is fantastic.  The brunch is incredible and the guests were so pleased.  The staff is so friendly and helpful.  The prices are quite reasonable for such wonderful food and service.
After walking thru the village for several hours, it was a pleasure to come out of the heat and sit for a lovely lunch.
I will write this review and concentrate on one specific time and on the dining portion of the tavern and not the pub version. My wife, our older son, and my four-year-old granddaughter. This was a Friday afternoon and they were offering a buffet for $12.95 and $7.95 for children. Here are the offerings they had: A mixed green salad, one pasta dish, mac and cheese, potato salad and roasted chicken.  That was it.

My granddaughter simply had some mac and cheese and pasta.  I passed since this was a disgraceful value option that is quite possibly on the very bottom rung of any buffet I have ever seen. The food itself was quite ordinary as reported by the others in our party. The dessert tray offered was what can best be described as commercial leftovers. To charge such a price is just visitor robbery.

The service was no problem, but the wait time was excessive – we were told 30 minutes and it became 50 minutes. Just looking at the dining area with half the tables empty while people waited is a management staffing issue. 

There are other dining options at Sturbridge Village, but my suggestion would be to go about one mile to the Publik House.
We always wanted to experience Thanksgiving as a family at Sturbridge Village and finally managed to do it several years ago.  It isn't cheap, and there were 10 of us, but we were really excited about the experience.  The main thing that stays with me is the word "salt".  Everything was so salty as to be almost inedible.  To me there is nothing less enjoyable than a heavily salted turkey!  I decided to call Sturbridge after that to see if anything could be done to insure that perhaps at least some of their turkeys could be prepared without all of that added salt.  I was informed that unfortunately "they come that way" and so there was nothing that could be done.  I certainly understand not being able to put aside a turkey or two when you are feeding hundreds and hundreds of people - but how about letting the patrons use the salt shaker on the table and preparing ALL of the turkeys so that the natural flavor can be tasted?  In this day and age when people are avoiding salt because of high blood pressure and other ailments, you'd think that Sturbridge would care enough to prepare food that is both tasty and healthful.   We're all big boys and girls and know how to add salt to our food!  For that reason, we won't be going back there, alas.  I read another review that said Sturbridge does not use a food service.  Well then there doesn't seem to be any good reason that they couldn't purchase and prepare turkeys that aren't drowning in salt.

By the way,  Trip Advisor forced me to use November 2015 as a date (I had to choose a date, and they didn't have anything prior to 2015) but I was there prior to that.
The food selection is incredible for the price charged. Everything is always being re-filled and the staff is exceptional. Great coffee as well.
The Bullard Tavern used to have a period buffet daily and it was wonderful.  It went away not long after Oliver Wight opened - very poor substitute.  They do have a Thanksgiving buffet.  We went in 2014 and it was just terrific - so many choices, well-prepared and presented.  But the 2015 dinner was scant in comparison with cheap desserts, pasty breads, and nothing in the way of fresh vegetables,  The seafood pie from 2014, delicious was nowhere to be seen.  Would not risk this dinner again.
The kids took mom & dad out to Sunday brunch .  Everyone lives in different NE States now & Sturbridge is about an hour for each of us .  This was a very good choice ,  as there is something for everyone .  You can have the usual breakfast foods ,  omelet's made to order and a nice carving station w/ Beef or ham ,   Salads and desserts , coffee 
juices fruit .
Good price and you can return as many times as you like ,  it was easy to find and the restaurant is very roomy your not sitting on top of the other diners .  We will definitely
go again .  Everyone enjoyed the brunch
We had a wonderful Sunday Brunch here. The variety was great and the cost was really reasonable. I was very impressed.
Highly recommend the sunday brunch!  We have a picky 6 year old, and he always walks away full so that's a bonus for us.  Choices range from carbs to eggs, veggies, and a carving station.  Price is reasonable for all you can eat.
I always love to eat at historically preserved inns and restaurants. I was not disappointed. The menu seemed very authentic for the period. It had good beers to choose from. You need not fear as everything that we had was excellent and I would recommend it to anyone.
Best to dine early to avoid the crowds. Excellent chicken pot pie and other traditional New England comfort foods. Kids menu. Historic atmosphere. Great drink selection. Fabulous baked goods. Plan to take some time to enjoy your meal.
Basically high priced average to bad food. Run by a food service. Think hospitals. Too bad associated with Old Sturbridge Village. Went on a special events night at the Village.
Now under the supervision of a new chef, OSV's Sunday Brunch at the Oliver Wight Tavern is fantastic.  Carving station, omelets to order, breakfast and dinner offerings, Belgian waffle station, kids' selections, fruits, salads, pastries, desserts - there are plenty of choices to satisfy every diner.  Inexpensive Mimosas and Bloody Mary's.  Charming atmosphere, attentive servers.  10% discount for OSV members.  Nothing less than 5 stars.
We had a great dinner buffet here on Thanksgiving Day. Food was more than plentiful and was constantly being refilled. Turkey and ham was great, my mouth is watering now thinking about it, I wish I had a HUGE doggie bag
Same review as Christmas by Candlelight OSV. Please see combined review included with the Christmas By Candlelight Tour 2014.  We ate at the Christmas buffet at Oliver Wight Tavern before the Candlelight tour in the village, which we highly recommend doing.
We weren't sure what to expect based upon other reviews. Went with family for Sunday brunch. Well organized staff, great service, excellent food, and great atmosphere within the dining room. Have never been to this brunch before and was quite impressed and would return again.
We ate Sunday Brunch here and there was so much to offer.  The choices were fantastic.  Children's buffet and adult buffet with lots of healthy salads and omelets.  Carving stations and hot dishes too.  Delicious desserts to end the meal.  Excellent service too.  
What can I say.......if you are in Sturbridge on a Sunday........do not miss their Sunday morning breakfast buffet.  It will be memorable and you will come back again. The buffet is huge and is set up in one room with 6 or 7 seven food stations......eggs, bacon, roast beef, salads, there is so much to chose from that I cannot put it all on paper. 
don't miss this!
The chicken pot pie is very large and tasty. My husband chose the clam chowder and pulled pork sandwich. He thought both were very good. It was a pleasant fall day and we found a picnic table outside open; there are more tables and restrooms inside the tavern.
There were hot foods and prepackaged sandwiches. We had the packaged sandwiches. Mine must have been leftover from yesterday. Hers was reportedly tasty. But if I came back, I would get something from the hot food area.
Although it was a cafeteria, the food was quite good, almost homemade quality.  A little pricey, but that was not unexpected.  We were there at a slower time of year, so we did not have to deal with crowds.  The food selection was good.  I would eat here again
All the food here is great. They thought of food for the entire family as well. From hot dogs and baked beans to a full turkey dinner. Tried just about everything over the past year and nothing I found to be dissatisfied about. When it gets crowded, the line moves fast, do it's nothing to get discouraged about.
this place looks much more expensive then it is the portons are very good they serve beer they are family friendly and the waiter named rick was very profesional and frienly it is definantly worth checking out
The gate attendant said this was the place for period dining. Um, no. Not unless folks in the 1800s ate chicken fingers, fries and pizza. 
Food was lousy and overpriced. 
Food was hot ... I had a hot dog and beans ... nothing special but certainly nothing wrong either. My husband had the chicken fingers and fries. Prices reasonable. Lots of families with kids. Servers were VERY friendly and helpful.
This was a great place to have lunch as we spent an entire day exploring Old Sturbridge Village.  Service was good and we all found choices to make us happy.  Generous portions; I think we had take home boxes, too.
Located within Old Sturbridge Village (admission required) this cafeteria restaurant, offers delicious affordable meals that depict food in the 1830s. I enjoy the roast turkey and mashed potatoes -- where the turkey is sliced thick, not the thin slices of processed turkey many restaurants offer. For my sides I got creamy mashed potatoes and sauteed carrots and squash -- again nicely sized chucks, not frozen, processed food. My wife always gets the chicken pot pie with real pie crust, baked golden brown. She raves about it. 

For those interested in modern fare, they also offer hot dogs, hamburgers and fries....as well as mac n cheese, popular in the 1830s and today. 

There is indoor or outdoor (picnic table) seating. 

Discount offered for members of Old Sturbridge Village
We ate with friends one night very good, byob.  Inexpensive. Limited parking,however. Not open late.
Bison burger was great, so were the fries.
Busy place and for a good reason. BBQ selection, price and taste absolutely awesome. Ribs and pulled pork were delicious. Enjoyed cole slaw and baked beans as our side selections. The sweet tea, free refills, so very good. Will be returning to try other items such as the brisket.
North Carolina and Kansas BBQ people... pfftt... they have nothing on this place. I remember being in NC and all the bragging and I though, meh, it's ok. Well, BT's knocks everything out of the park I have ever had. Any restaurant that still has nearly a 5 rating after hundreds and hundreds of reviews on many sites is doing something right and the food and flavor do not disappoint. Be sure to try it if you're in the area!
Best BBQ in the area. The brisket is fantastic. Portions are very Generous. Reasonable prices. Well worth going to.
Excellent BBQ and generous portions.  This is just a small place and very popular - for a good reason.  Reasonable prices too.
We stopped in Sturbridge on our way back from Maine.  Our hotel recommended this place.  It was very busy on a Friday night and you place your order either to take out or eat in.  We decided to eat in since the cashier said there would be a table available by the time our food came out.  We both had ribs and they were excellent!  Sides were very good too!  I would definitely go back to this place if in the area again.  Sauces were excellent too!  It’s also BYOB!  Wish we had places like that in NY!
The best BBQ spot within 100 miles! The brisket and ribs have an amazing smoke flavor with unbelievable bark! The mac and cheese could complete in competitions! It's a perfect mix of cheese to noodle ratio... the only thing I would change is the beans. They might be the worst beans I've ever had. I don't know why I wasted a side on them for the second time because I just through them out. I would highly recommend they get rid of those and if not at least add a real baked bean!
Growing up down south and also priding myself on the BBQ I smoke at home, I wasn't really expecting much from this joint. But the food was perfect!
I was driving home from NY to Maine and at a rest stop on I-84, I looked for a place I could call ahead and order. Sturbridge was about 20 minutes away so I took a chance on this place. It's only a mile off the interstate.
What a gem in Sturbridge, Massachusetts. You locals should be thrilled and not at all take for granted what great BBQ you have in town.
I wanted to try a bit of everything so I ordered a 1/4 rack of St. Louis ribs, the andouille sausage bites, two smoked chicken wings; and for sides, cucumber salad and collard greens.
The ribs were perfect. They were smoked with a dry rub that had a hint of sweetness but not too sweet. They were also smoked at the right temperature which was evidenced by the even amount of bark and no black or burned places.
Some of the best ribs I've had and this is coming from a guy who is told many times that my ribs are the best people have ever had.
Smoked wings were good. They sell them for $1 each and you can get several flavors. I got the dry rub. It's hard to smoke wings and not make them into shoe leather. Well done.
The Andouille sausage bites are chunks of spicy andouille sausage dipped in what I think must be a hush puppy batter. the sweetness of the batter was a perfect balance to the spicy sausage.
Now a simple side dish like cucumber salad isn't normally something a reviewer would rave about but they really elevated a simple dish. I wish I had ordered an x-large helping.
I was trying to figure out the herb and I think it's oregano. Basically this salad was thinly sliced cukes, some red onion, salt, vinegar, and a decent amount of black pepper that gave it a nice kick, plus oregano. I could eat this all day.
The collard green were just ok in my opinion. too much meat in them and I prefer to let people sprinkly the vinegar on themselves instead of cooking the greens in them.
One of the best BBQ meals I've had in a long time.
Since my dining companion and I were in Sturbridge today for a very brief morning wedding ceremony anyway (there was no reception), we thought we’d try B.T.’s for lunch.  I’m so glad we did because this stuff  is the real deal.  Quite honestly, I really never thought about going to B.T.’s (although we both are lovers of barbecued food) until I recently read an article on MSN about it ranking 20th of the best barbecue restaurants in America (amazing since it was up against such barbecue-saturated cities such as Memphis, Kansas City and Austin).  

As we arrived shortly after their opening time of 11 a.m., we did not have to deal with crowds and had no problem finding a place to park ourselves.  Upon entering this rather small establishment, I noticed that it was very clean (probably due to the fact that they had just opened).  After reading many online reviews and recommendations, it being our first time here and wanting to sample as much as possible, we decided to split a three-meat platter consisting of our choices of pulled pork, pulled chicken, a large beef rib,  two tiny sides (potato salad and collards), and a small loaf of cornbread.  Well, let me tell you that this platter was more than enough for the two of us and probably could have fed three adults (we fell short of finishing some of the pulled pork and part of the beef rib).  Our thoughts on the food, for the most part, are very good:  we found the pulled pork to be moist and succulent with little to no fat, the pulled chicken was delightfully tender and perfectly smoky; unfortunately, the beef rib had a really thick “bark” which was a little off-putting.  There was, however, tender and juicy meat beneath that heavy burnt layer.  Both side dishes were delicious, and we probably could have used larger sizes to share as we devoured them quickly.  The three sauces they had available today (self-serve at a center bar) are varied:  the “house”, which is vinegar-based with a slight kick (our favorite of the three), sweet (tomato-based and quite mild), and a fiery hot one which is a bit thin.  The cornbread was cornbread---pretty unremarkable but it went well with our meal. 

The service we received at the ordering counter was quick, efficient and friendly. We’ll most likely return to B.T.’s when in the mood again for this type of food.  We will gladly recommend B.T.’s Smokehouse to anyone who enjoys good barbecue.
I live in upstate NY, and we made our way back here twice on our way to and from Maine. So affordable, so delicious, and it's BYOB!!
Stopped on our way to Boston because of online reviews. This place is fantastic! Got the combo of ribs, puked pork, brisket and beef rib. The meat was absolutely AMAZING!! It was fall off the bone,  juicy, succulent, smoky goodness. There were multiple sauces for any taste. The sides if mac and cheese, slaw and corn bread were great to. I will drive out of my way from now on to stop here whenever I cone to Massachusetts it is that good! 
Melt in your mouth brisket, smoky pulled chicken, excellent potato salad, and vinegary cole slaw (tastes more like sauerkraut).  Regular sandwiches so big you can't pick them up. No complaints. But don't expect ambience in this no frills restaurant - order at the counter, listen for your name, put on your sauces, pick up the plasticware, and dig in!! Definite return visit in our future!
We recently spent some time in Memphis and had BBQ every night, some great, some ok, some not so good.

BT's smokehouse was easily better than all but the best, if you're in the mood for decent BBQ in an very informal environment. We both had beef brisket, a bit of a hard crust on it, but inside the meat was tender and flavorful.

It's quite informal, byob, and a good value.

My wife had a sandwich, which was oddly overpacked with meat to the point that she couldn't eat it without taking the meat out and using a fork and knife.

I managed to get BBQ sauce all over my shirt (a faded sign admittedly said press lightly), and no one who worked there seemed to care or even think it was unusual. I'm glad I was in a dark tshirt and not a white dress shirt.

I'd probably go back if I'm ever in town again, hoping the next time to remember to press lightly on the sauce container.
If you love BBQ, you will love this.  Full size Beef ribs seem to be the biggest favorite of my guests.
The food here is always fantastic.  The service is always great.  It is very popular and there may be a wait for a walk in.  There is a way to bypass the line.  The best way to enjoy is to order online and pick up when you arrive.  The tables and counter are very clean.  You can watch them prepare your food.  The sauces and sides are excellent.  Parking has been expanded.  It smells so good outside, it makes my mouth water.  I had the 1/4 rack of St. Louis style ribs.  I could not finish them last night.  I will have the last one for lunch today.  
I was amazed by this place. first, there is a constant line of people waiting to order  at this smokehouse . it is one of the most popular and best BBQ places in the state. everything is made to order and very fresh! outdoor and indoor seating , plus takeout which many people were there for. I highly recommend this place!  
Judging by the constant line out the door and all the positive reviews, I know my review is somewhat of an anomaly, but this is the honest experience I had. My wife and I took my mother to the Brimfield antique show and had our eye on getting some good BBQ on our way back. Let's just get straight to the point here. This place is cramped, crowded, chaotic, and disorganized. Be prepared to be reaching around, over, and under people just to get napkins, utensils, and any of their sauces. This is primarily a takeout place and has limited seating inside, so getting a table inside is a matter of good luck and good timing. There are picnic tables outside so we ordered our food to go and it took an hour to get it. I ordered the 3 meat platter with pork ribs, brisket, and pulled pork. The ribs tasted good, but were a little dry and far from being fall off the bone tender. The brisket was just flat out gross. I've never in my life seen so much gelatinous fat on a plate. My wife agreed that It shouldn't have been served. The pulled pork............I don't know because they forgot to give it to me. It was so chaotic inside I didn't even bother going back in and just cut my losses. The sides were cucumber salad (literally just sliced cucumbers in dressing) and cole slaw that had way too much vinegar and no sweetness at all. My wife and my mother both   got St. Louis ribs with sides of mac and cheese. They said the ribs tasted good but were dry and, once again, far from being tender. They both loved their mac and cheese. By the way, this is the first BBQ place I've ever been to that doesn't have wet naps available. Just an observation.
I've been wanting to try B.T.'s Smokehouse for a while now after reading all the good reviews. Finally went there tonight and my boyfriend and myself were very disappointed. I had pulled pork plate and my boyfriend had the brisket plate. Pulled pork meal took about 15 minutes but my boyfriend had to wait an hour for his brisket plate! I was done my meal when he got his so he got his to go.
Now about the food... the pulled pork was very fatty and salty. Ended up eating about 1/2 of it because the rest was all fat. Had potato salad and cole slaw for my sides. Potato salad was very salty and cole slaw was okay, nothing special. The brisket was way too salty for my boyfriend to eat and this is coming from a person who loves salt. If he says it's too salty it had to have been. 
The restaurant itself was loud, crowded and cramped. We won't be going back again.
The place was busy, but it didn't take too long to get my  meal. It was tender, tasty and reasonably priced. Definitely worth a return trip
In Sturbridge for a wedding, just in time for lunch I followed a recommendation from a co-worker to visit this BBQ establishment. My two friends and I ordered 3 "mini" sandwiches, with a potato salad, and a mac and cheese to share. Well sharing wasn't a good idea! I wanted it all to myself. The potato salad is amazing, not sure what makes it deliciously different but I just know it was. The mac and cheese-decadently creamy. The sandwiches were perfect size and pulled pork perfection. Now don't bother me I am napping...
This place is excellent the decor was nice the staff was very friendly the food was outstanding I recommend this to anybody
Nice, tight menu with good seasonal selections; a bar with craft liquors and friendly service. Not to be missed!
Stopped by for a drink and decided to stay for dinner. Fantastic menu with a classy atmosphere and a staff that will keep me coming back. Manager talked me into some things I wouldn't normally try and I fell in love! Great vibe and great menu - my new stop when I'm in town.
After a long drive we checked on Trip Advisor and picked this place for dinner.  As the information on the site stated it was open until 10 PM, we decided not to rush and arrived at 9 to a very unpleasant reception.  After being seated by a surly waitress who made no mention that they were no longer serving, we were informed by the manager that the kitchen was closed and we were to leave.  Now I realize that once the stoves are turned off they don't restart them, but the resturant was half full and we would have been happy with a salad.  They really could have been nicer about "throwing us out!"
Chef inspired small plates include an interesting array of salads soups small plates and regular entrees.  The three of us chose cheese platter, fried goat cheese, two different and delicious salads, shrimp and scallops.  Tasting all around we left feeling satisfied by the quality, service, freshness and special touches.  Would definitely recommend.
Came here for dinner with friends.  The 4 of us had a lovely corner booth, and didn't wait to be seated because we arrived fairly early (this place gets crowded).  We all ordered a different cocktail -mine was the Hemingway.  Very unique.  We really enjoyed sampling the small plates: fried pickles, flatbread, pork tacos, lobster sliders.  All was very tasty, and service was swift and friendly.  

Definitely recommend coming to Cedar Street!
  My family has been coming to the Sturbridge area for years and the restaurant scene has never been amazing. We went to the Cedar Street Grill and were totally amazed by the quality of the food. We can't wait to go back again. 
We enjoy this restaurant each time we're in the area, and it didn't disappoint us.  Because it's so popular plus it's near a Playhouse, it's important to make reservations a month or two in advance, unless you don't mind eating at the bar. 
We were visiting the area and someone recommended The Cedar Street Grille and am I glad they did. The decor and architecture are wonderful. Very relaxing atmosphere. Our waitress Roberta was wonderful. The wine I chose as so good that I asked Roberta to write the name down for me and my husbands IPA beer was delicious. We ordered 3 small plates to share along with salads for each of us. The food was amazing. So fresh, colorful and the plating was lovely. We topped it off with Toasted Coconut ice cream. Soooo good! I just wish I lived closer, I would be a regular.
This is one of the exceptional restaurants located in town. The menu options change seasonally. The service and food are always terrific! Great place to dine!
on our way back to NJ from our Maine visit we stopped here for lunch. The restaurant was very nice inside and my husband had the pulled pork tacos which he really liked and I had the last of my lobster rolls. It was very good. My side salad was also very crisp and fresh.
I went here with my family after visiting Old Sturbridge Village and I couldn't have been happier about the choice.  The menu was great and everything we ordered (the pork chop, the goat cheese, the dates, the fried pickles, the mac & cheese, the salmon and the salad), was delicious and beautifully plated.  I understand this restaurant re-opened this year after a huge re-do.  It paid off.  I'd go here again in a heartbeat.
We enjoyed lunch here today.  Lovely restaurant with great presentation at a very reasonable price. Coffee and iced tea nice and strong with wonderful flavor. 
We had never been here before.   In preparation for  our trip to Old Sturbridge Village I had checked reviews for restaurants in the area.  I saw all the glowing reviews for this restaurant, so we ate dinner here on Friday.  The food was incredible.  It far exceeded my expectations from the reviews I had read.  I got the sea scallops sautéed.  They were so tender I cut them in half with my fork.  My husband got the lobster macaroni and cheese.  All I'll say is he cleaned his plate thoroughly.  We both got sweet potatoe fries which were to die for!  We all got desserts and were extremely happy with our choices:  creme brûlée cheesecake and rocky road chocolate ice cream.  The place was crowded but our service was outstanding!  If you happen to be in Sturbridge and are looking for a lunch or dinner the Cedar Grill Restaurant is worth checking out!  We enjoyed our relaxing dinner.  One small complaint:  the room was a bit noisy.  So if you want a nice, quiet, romantic dinner, this would not be a good place.  But if you're looking for a reasonable delicious dinner, I would highly recommend Cedar Street Grill.
Drinks and small plates served up by Michelle have never been better. Sliders, Macaroni and cheese, Tomato relish were the perfect pairings with our manhattans and martinis. Great way to spend a tornado impending afternoon
We were meeting a friend for dinner and had to pick a place "blind" from online reviews, not being familiar with Sturbridge at all. This was quite a nice find- an interesting menu (well thought out choices- not a huge menu), great drinks, good service and, best of all, quiet enough to have a conversation. We would definitely return.
We meet friends periodically in the Sturbridge area -- a more-or-less central meeting spot between Connecticut and Boston.  We have brunched and dined at Cedar Street Grille over the years and have truly enjoyed each time.

Service is quite good -- knowledgeable and eager to please.  Good variety of menu items, well-prepared and presented. The restaurant is smart casual.  Another good choice in the area is Rovezzi's, but Cedar Street Grille has a broader menu with something for everyone.  So glad to have finally found some good choices in this neck of the woods.
My wife and I shared 3 small plates.  We're not big eaters and this was sufficient.  Each was interesting and great quality in terms of taste and presentation.  My only complaint was the noise level which made it difficult to have a conversation.  This could have been just a Friday night situation.
The locals apparently like this restaurant - very busy on a Thursday evening. The hostess was less than pleasant but service improved once greeted by our server.  Lamb meat balls were great.  Oysters on the half shell were poor - slightly warm and dry, obviously pre-schucked and sitting, waiting to be served. Finally, the Blueberry Ice Cream - save room for this excellent dessert.
Had dinner at Cedar Street Grill last night with my daughter. Was a bit dressier than other restaurants in the Sturbridge area...business casual. I was "Friendly's" casual so felt a little out of place.  Food was great however and the wait staff was outstanding. Menu favored Tappas and focused primarily on seafood. However, I had the filet which was wonderful. We don't have many restaurants that serve a really good steak in this area, so this was a great find. 
This is a very casual, local place that has great breakfasts and lunches. As a local myself, its my go-to place on a Saturday morning.  Waitstaff is always friendly and welcoming.
My girlfriend and I have been here several times, and love it! It has been fairly busy when we have gone and the quilts of the food has been great. We will be back again
It is more of a light snack place. Nothing special. But the temp worker/cashier she was really polite and friendly. 
Call here every year when in the area. Eat here every day open.
Excellent food. Excellent service.
Specials are great. This time had the California Eggs Benedict - fantastic with perfectly cooked eggs, beautiful presentation and taste. Partner had the Confederate Eggs Benedict also perfect.
My husband and I stopped here on a Sunday morning, on the way to Umass in Amherst. Cute place, clean, nice music, attentive staff, good coffee and the best eggs benedict I've ever had! I had the special- eggs benedict on a toasted bagget with Boars Head Bacon, grilled asparagus and potatoes. My husband got the oatmeal special- vanilla, raisons, brown sugar and walnuts. Good selection on the menu. We will make a point to stop here the next time we pass through.
Excellent fresh breakfast made with products by local merchants. Food is always delicious. Even aimple things like their egg sandwhiches are a cut abive the rest. Coffee is good. Will feel like amongst friends in a very homey atmosphere. 
My family will only eat at the Apple Barn Cafe when we are out in that area.  My kids say the delicious, freshly made-to-order food makes them not want to eat anywhere else.  I have to agree.  I always choose a different dish on our visits and have enjoyed all of them!   Each dish is made with fresh ingredients. The family friendly environment only adds to the visit. Friendly waiters and waitresses, clean place, makes us feel right at home very visit. By far the best restaurant we have ever had.
Wish they were open more frequently. Might make for less of a cluster on the weekends! I had the best breakfast item EVER there - it was a baked potato with bacon, a poached egg, salsa, guacamole and sour cream. It was every bite of heavenly! It also took almost an hour and the service was pretty lousy on that specific occasion. But it was worth the wait and we've had excellent service a couple other times. So for the most part, it's decent service. 

Some of the regular menu items are beyond delicious (the apple waffle/pancake whose name escapes me, their signature cocktails, etc.) but I almost always order a special if it looks good, given I may never see it again. 

Don't miss this stop if you're local Friday through Sunday. 
We have visited Apple Barn many times, and always enjoy our meal.   It is a shame that this Breakfast/Lunch stop is only open Friday - Sunday.  I highly recommend the Vermont Omelette, it is very well done, featuring green apples and Vermont cheddar.  Eggs Benedict is also one of their best, which my wife often orders.  Sunday is all-day breakfast and features creative specials.  The only thing that we've had that we don't recommend are the pancakes.

Note: You can also order a "real" drink, including bloody marys and momosas.  For me the coffee is just fine, though.

The service is friendly.  We have a small child and the servers are always more than willing to accommodate, quick to bring the high chair (which by the way is the best restaurant high chair we've ever had), and super-friendly to our daughter.

This restaurant may be located in a small town, but the quality is high enough to compete even in a town with multiple breakfast options.
Fantastic food at a very fair price. The Eggs Benedict were ti kill for. Service was quick and friendly.
Always delicious and thoughtfully prepared, the food and friendly, attentive service make this a place we visit often.
We've been going to the Apple Barn for breakfast for a few years now and we're never disappointed. The people that work there are always very friendly and the service is great.We've never had to wait for a server and our coffee and tea is brought to us almost right away. And the food is so good! I usually get the Nana's french toast which is my favorite. I've never had a breakfast that wasn't really good. I highly recommend the Apple Barn!
While visiting for the Brimfield Antique Fair I had a quick breakfast sandwich and it was delicious!  Piping hot and the bread was really soft and fresh!  YUM!
I like coming here for breakfast on Sunday mornings often. Even when there is no customers they certainly don't rush to serve you. This past Sunday we walked in and the front room was completely empty. We were told by the 3 waitresses and 1 hostess to sit anywhere and also were told " we are busy doing some PR right now, it will be a minute." Not sure what they were actually doing so we sat. I the mean time a young woman and child came in and they were very well known by the workers because the hostess went right over to her and made a fuss about her child. We still did not get menus yet. She finally came over with menus and asked if we wanted coffee, which we did. She brought that and left. We knew what we wanted and put our menus down. The waitresses were still behind the counter doing their PR work. The hostess went over to the woman and child and took her order. One of the waitresses went and delivered food. Finally another one stopped what she was doing, wondered into the back room and then came over to see if we were ready. By this time the woman and child who came in after us was getting their food. Just can't understand why those waitresses didn't stop what they were doing when we came in. Poor training. Poor customer service. Food was very good.
We had the clam chowder and it was very good and hot.  In the past we have had the sandwiches and they were also .good
We ate breakfast here on a Sunday, we did have to wait for a bit for a seat, but the wait staff made sure we had fresh coffee while we waited for our table....which was totally worth the wait! Our food was delicious. I had the Kentucky, which is similar to an eggs Benedict, but with their own twist. Others at the table had Apple Cider Pancakes, and Omelets that they also raved about. The staff was friendly and even helped with directions to a local hardware store. This will be on the top of our list the next visit we make to see our daughter! You won't be disappointed.
I truly enjoy going to the Apple Barn. The food is all homemade and fresh. You can tell the owner takes pride in what she prepares and has served. The staff is very friendly and it is nice to see the owners family working in the business. Family owned restaurants are not heard of anymore, with so many chain restaurants. I would recommend the Apple Barn to anyone and we always have a great experience. We bring our friends and family when visiting us too! Thank you all for a great place to come and enjoy.
Hands down the best breakfast in the area.

Great food, service, and atmosphere.  Did I say GREAT food!

Highly recommend!
Seems like it was either closed or we were not ready to eat when passing by(closed Mon&Tues). We were pleasantly surprised today for a late breakfast. Buttermilk pancakes and eggs&hash were great. Staff(the Collins family) couldn't have been friendlier! Will be back to try lunch soon! Hope to see you there!
we use trip adviser when traveling to find good restaurants. trip adviser came through with the apple barn cafe,we enjoyed our breakfast.
Ordered a pizza on our way home from a rainy day in Salem. Pizza was fresh when we got there & very yummy when we got home! Will be back!
All we have tried here is the pizza.  I love combo pizzas and they are a pretty good pie with lots of stuff.
Ordered Ceasars salad wrap which took 15 mins and I was the only person in the place. ..first bad sign. I think I order a wrap but instead I get a salad. I tell the owner I'm driving and can eat a salad and ask him if he could put it in a wrap. They don't wrap it so it falls apart. I go back and he accuses me of not wanting food at all but just wanting to use their bathroom which was filthy,  like the rest of the restaurant.
Great. Greek pizza and other foods...best for take out...but can eat inside...I have only done take out...but the food is consistently good.
We went here for a evening snack...it was okay we had the chicken tenders and brocoli bites.  No one was eating at the restaurant but several people came for take out.  
Boring, terribly cooked food, the people are rude, screwed up orders and well, go somewhere else if u dont want cheap junk  !!!
Brimfield House has great seafood.  Every grinder I have tried has been very good.  They have a good variety of grinders so there is a nice selection for everyone.  However its pizza is poor.  Barely above a generic frozen pizza bought from a store
Visit Brimfield often to go Antiquing throughout the year and this House of Pizza has always been a favorite stop. Prices are reasonable, service is great (both delivery and in house) and most importantly, the food is GREAT!! From Salads to Dinners or Pizza this is a stop you won't regret...the Baklava is a great after dinner treat too! :)

A small old style town with great hospitality!!  
I was at this restaurant during the Antique Show and decided on the Greek Omelet!!!  It was terrific and service was great.  I had no problem letting them know.  I tried posting from the restaurant, but it didn't go through.  Thank you again and good luck!!
I have both picked up food here and had delivery.  Everything I have had, pizzas, salads and sandwiches have always been good.  If you go there, never, ever, park in back of the restaurant, you may run into the creepy guy I met the first time I went there who told me I was not supposed to park in the back.  I had already picked up my food and was on my way out, he told me I should not park there.  I said okay and proceeded to leave.  As I was backing out, he said to me, "leaving so soon?"  Really?   Did he expect me to stay?  As long as you don't encounter him, you will have a good experience.
This restaurant is a typical Greek-style pizza place in a small town.  We gave it a shot and tried their Gyro, which I would rate as average.  It was forgettable.  What we very vividly remember was the extremely dirty fish tank, which in fact turned out to be a frog tank.  Odd.  Very odd.  The restaurant was not the definition of clean.  The carpets were very dirty and the bathroom were not much better.
I'm sorry I can't say more about the food, but the other aspects of our visit will keep us away.
Visited twice during Brimfield antiques week, the busiest time of year. The staff was obviously under duress, but they handled it professionally. The food is very good! I love that they serve Greek salad, gyros and baklava! And I saw several pasta dinners that looked very good also. The dining room is utilitarian. Don't expect much in the way of ambiance.
Excellent pizza!  great grinders and the meals are wonderful!

Whether eating in or taking out the food has been just great.
have been here a few time and food i always excellent--best veal parm anywhere---just do not go when the antique show is on
We always eat here at least once every time they have the Antique Show. This week we went twice service was great food was delicious served hot and way more then we could eat. Leftovers were great. Service was super one waitress knew what my wife was going to have without asking. Highly recommended.
My wife and I stopped in on July 6th for diner after returning from Boston because one of our friends who eat their quite often said we should try it !
I ordered the veal parm and my wife had the chicken parm. First off the portions were small, nothing about the food that stood out  to want you to come back. 
It is a glorified pizza parlor, it can be noisy, but the food is good and the prices are very fair. I love the Chicken Parmesan and go there specifically for it. My wife goes for the Eggplant Parmesan. I haven't found either better and have tried it in many places. I go for this dinner not the experience. They also make a very good combo pizza. Be sure to ask how many slices are in the pizza you order because a small is really easily for tw0.
I have been here several times.....and overall it is just passable. I am not thrilled with the food, but the atmosphere is nice considering I go during Brimfield and there are tons of interesting folks/friends. The food is just ok....really not that great, and I do not believe hand made. Seems to me it is all canned and package/prepared.....nothing is inspired. It gets busy do to traffic and not many other eateries at night where you can sit and eat with friends. The service is at best so so, but I have had good service although usually not.....as I dont think they are used to being so busy. there is a bar and very often a 15 minute wait during the busiest Monday - Thurs nights during the rush. Ive learned to eat there with some friends for one night, but try to drive past for the rest.......no offense.
We have dined here during the Brimfield Antique Fair in May 2016.
First, 20 Palmer Road “Francesco Restaurant Inc” and this 45 Palmer road “Francesco's Restaurant” are the same. There is no other Francesco's in the vicinity serving the same Italian foods. And, the red brick columns with the glove lighting on Palmer Road is definitely 45 Palmer Road. 

We had Fried Calamari (Small portion, bland batter), Meatballs (good, but bland sauce), Veal Scallopini (oily, with eggplant marinara sauce), Zuppa De Pesce (our choice of Ziti, with White Olive oil, Garlic sauce, bland, huge for even 2 persons/ changed spaghetti to Broccoli on our 2nd visit, still huge)

They have a separate bar with full alcohol menu, too.

(pros)
It is right at the center of the fair site, where we find it the only one visible for the first time visitors.
They have their own parking lot, where you can always find the parking spot, although the restaurant is full. Most of the vendors seem to walk up to this place. 

Although their usual opening hours are till 9pm, we were allowed to enter and eat even till later than 10pm. We thanked the staff for accommodating us at the late hours. 
Also, although we had to wait, the waiting was less than 15minutes on 1nd night of the fair. 
They have a bar if the patron wants to wait inside, but it is quite crowded during the fair.
The food portion was HUGE and they seem to have their own “house recipe” as their sauces taste different from the other typical Italian restaurant (for example, North End Boston)
The price range of main dishes are $15~26  and most of the dinner orders come with either a small salad or a cup of today's soup. The portion is big and some people end up taking the doggy bags. Our seafood pasta could fill the sink bowl and I could not finish even the half.
Our server, Sydney was very attentive, although it was a crazy busy dinner hours, into the late night. I really hope she gets recognized by the owner.

(cons)
It attracts the very casual diners, and, the taste of the dishes are slightly bland and sauces too oily or watery(can be good with less salty) although the food was served quick and somewhat fresher than expected. 

No waiting area for the waiting guests. It is just the parking lot spaces right outside the doors.
Some young visitors to the fair can be a little bothersome, arriving drunk and waiting together outside,  but the restaurant has no control of them, understandably.

Importantly, the waiting servers are quite crude and dictated our rating. Unlike the first server, Sydney, the owner lady and the others are curt and definitely don't handle the arriving customers professionally. 
While we were eating our meal, another server remove the grated cheese from our table without asking.
Later, another waitresses come and remove the empty plates and the table without asking us first, and set the table with new silverware,  as if she didn't see we were still sitting there. She wiped the table for the next day, while we were sipping our beer.
Maybe we cannot expect such professional hospitality on the countryside. But, better training will definitely benefit their business. 
Sydney from the first visit stands out as a great server. She even remembered us and greeted us from a distance, while others don't show the initial welcoming gesture. So, look for Sydney to have a great experience. 
_______________________
Altogether. It is quite a 3-star experience, but, you will realized that there is no other dinner choice during the fair week, unless you head to Sturbridge or Springfield. Probably write down the restaurant list and their address before your trip starts. There was no GPS signal to get anywhere until we drove away from the fair site. 
For us, we had to deal with slight crude manners. But, if you decided to visit this place, you will still enjoy the vibrant atmosphere during the fair weeks, the vendors/diners are pleasant. 

I guess it wasn't too bad after all.
Just a glorified pizza parlor!  Loud noisy screaming kids! Oh god what a hellish experience!  To make it worse food was awful!
Have always referred to Francesco's as our favorite Italian restaurant. Haven't visited Mass in 10+ years, finally got back there and Francesco's was still awesome! Chicken Francaise was delicious, garlic bread, YUM!! Service was also excellent, great family restaurant atmosphere.
I went to Francesco's in February 2016, very family friendly restaurant to eat, and also friends, and business.
Horrible meal canned sauce and boxed pasta. Chicken parm bad, veal parm not edible. Salad was wilted and some brown.
Appetizers bad. Service horrible could not even bring plates or bread u till after appetizers served. I KNOW its  small town but not worth it.

Skip this place poor food poor service .
The restaurant is very nice, the service was very good.  My party was well cared for; however, I had the pan-fried veal, and it was terrible--like a piece of show leather.  Two other ladies also had the same as I did, and they , too, left most of it.  It tasted nothing, and it was just not good.  It should be taken off the menu.  The meals of the other 5 people were very, very good, and I would return to the restaurant some time and order some of the other selections.  Sorry, but I felt you should know about this particular meal.
Based upon reviews, targeted this place for a late lunch. Nice place, good service, friendly staff, food only so-so. My wife had the Baked Stuffed Lasagna and said it was just OK, My Chicken Parmigiana was far from he best I've had. The sauce was very watery without much taste and the chicken portion under the cheese was so hot I couldn't taste it but the rest was OK. Portions were plentiful and reasonably priced. Don't think we'll be back.
The server was really nice and the service was fast. My friend and I ordered the chicken franchese to share and it was huge! The bread was really warm and tasted great. The only thing that we didnt like were the salads. They were watery and had little no no flavor.
Consistently good.  Love the scallops...if you want them in a spicy sauce just ask they will make it for you
We have had several family dinners at Francescos over the past few years.  They have provided consistent but not outstanding fare.  We have noticed that the restaurant is often very busy on weekends.  Service has been adequate but also not outstanding.
Looks like a family business.  Smells like home cooking when you walk in the door.  Overall the food was very good and the portions were large.   When looking around it looked like there were a lot of locals, which usually means good food.
Been to Francesco's on several occasions and have always been satisfied. The food is very good and the service is too. I have never had a bad experience or left hungry. I have been to too many restaurants and didn't get enough to eat. I'd rather take some home to enjoy again then leave not having enough. Below for some reason whenever I selected excellent for service food and  value it wouldn't allow it but auto entered very good average and very good. Those are not my selections.
Please see the reviews under Francesco's Italian Restaurant, Brimfield. These are one and the same. We're repeat customers whenever we can afford the trip. I can only vouch for lunch but then, it's quiet, unhurried and fabulous. No senior specials so be prepared for $15.00 pp for lunch but the red sauce is superb. 
This Italian restaurant is also listed on Trip Advisor as Francesco's Restaurant, Inc. I'm finding it difficult to understand the low-rated reviews that are in place. We found this eatery when a friend requested it as a birthday celebration location and we're hooked! I can't seem to get beyond the chicken parmesian ; their red sauce is FABULOUS! Fresh hot bread, with refills on request and delicious salad ( ask for the house Italian dressing) only serve to cement Francesco's on my list of favorites. The scallops are HUGE, but tender. This is not a fast food restaurant but the waitstaff is pleasant and attentive. We like to go for a late lunch when it's quiet. There's a TV and bar - so the atmosphere may change if this gets filled but when we've been, it has been a lovely family destination. Francesco's calls my name about once a month and we travel 1/2 hr to get our favorite Italian meal. Lunch runs under $15.00 / person.
Want to hang with locals, stop here. Get opinions, facts, folklore, and plain old lies over a cold killians.  fun place just to see everyone.
The "Country Lounge" name and photo don't match the pub that is at the location shown in Wales Massachusetts.  Terry O'Keefe's pub is a very friendly small town pub that has live music on Friday evenings all year 'round and on Sunday afternoons in the summer.  The decor isn't fancy but there are darts and a pool table for fun.  The food is very good. We like the appetizers. The Irish nachos are fresh and quite popular.

In the warmer months, the pub is quite popular with motorcyclists, particularly on Sundays.
Friday nights are the best. Good music and very friendly place. 
Out for a drive on our anniversary our GPS suggested this place nearby for a drink. Pulling up we figured this was a place for locals and wondered if we would feel out of place. We were greeted instantly by the bartender Angel and were made to feel very welcome. Got our drinks and menus. Could hear the live band outside and if it wasn't so hot out we would have been out there, seemed like a great atmosphere. Ordered a Grande Quesadilla which was excellent. I ordered a buffalo wrap, my husband ordered a reuben. Both were excellent and came out piping hot. Angel was very attentive and we will definitely be back. If you're in the area, definitely give this place a try!
Stopped by with a friend on our motorcycles, was surprised they had a live band under a pavilion with a bar and waitresses. 
We had a appetizer and a beer while listening to the music. Food was hot, and tasty.
 Looks like a really nice stop on a warm sunny afternoon while riding the motorcycle. Service was excellent by Lauri !!!
Brenda our Waitress was friendly and laid back.  everything came out quickly and with a smile. Amazing fish and chips
 Huge portion great value. Big enough to share.  Baked Haddock Was Tender And moist..Salad And Baked Potato Were Right on.. Out of the way but worth the trip from sturbridge . It's not fancy. Just good and comfortable. 
Stumbled upon this place while driving through the area geocaching. Warm and inviting inside and we just had the best Irish nachos on the planet. Love that they have Wormtown on tap. Highly recommend.  
The Pub continues to be our favorite gathering place for this area.  The loss of the owners, Terry and Sheila, has not altered the quality of the great food and friendly service.  Gathering by the stove for Thursday tacos and Friday fish and chips are two of our favorites.  The Irish nachos are always great. Live entertainment is also a big plus.  
The beer and dinner was very cheap and GOOD! Sat at the bar and had great service. Was there for a birthday party but will be coming back soon.
We stumbled upon the Wales Irish Pub after we moved.  We were in search of playoff hockey before we had our cable hooked up.  We sat at the bar the first time we went, and again the second time.  The service is good, the bar is fully stocked and the bar tenders do a good job.  The menu is simple fare (burgers, subs, bar food), however, I successfully ordered a reuben without bread and a side salad without a second glance from the waitress.  Overall the place is clean and welcoming.
Great place to go with a group of friends and enjoy good food, good drinks and great entertainment. Love the summer nights there, out on the patio.
This is the busiest restaurant in town..OK... the only restaurant in town. The locals love it!  It's always packed. Owned by a family with deep roots in Holland. Serves great food and better company. Highly recommend it!
Holland Pizza no longer exists.  Instead is a fantastic restaurant called Dianne's Villa Nova.  Dianne's is very clean, has been totally redone since Holland Pizza days.  If you remember the pizza place don't let it stop you from visiting Dianne's!
The new owner is doing good here and added delivery! Huge plus! They are offering some good pizza and sandwiches. 
Stopped into the restaurant after eating at their mobile trailer at an antique fair. The food off of the trailer was great. Awesome chicken salad. They made us feel very welcome. Told us about their restaurant nearby and we decided to find it after looking at their menu. Diane, the owner,  made us feel like family upon entering. The menu has choices for everyone including those with food allergies. Must haves include fried mozzarella, WOW!! fresh made with passed down 3rd generation sauce for dipping.  Everything on the menu is fresh made. I can go on and on. Pizza was great,  parm was excellent,  calzones were huge. Head chef and son A.J. let me in his kitchen.  All in all, everything GREAT, no complaints. Go hungry, you will leave satisfied!!  Thanks to the whole family for making us feel so welcome.  

I enjoyed the meal we had today and so did my family. The food was top notch and the service was like being at my Nana's table. We had 4 kids under 3 and they were so good to them. Great to see a place that cares about families! Big shout out to the team over there! Thanks from your new annual visitors from the Call Street Cafe in Starke, Fl!
Look for them at the Brimfield Flea Market with the red food truck/trailer. They will be the ones with gobs of people in line!

Last night was the first time I was ever in this restaurant and I am so happy we had dinner there. Diane herself took our order. Everyone is friendly from the staff to the patrons. I ordered the linguine with clams. The pasta was perfectly al dente and the sauce was a very flavorful white sauce. I get aggravated when the sauce is either too brothy or too thick. This was a perfect consistently with proper seasoning. 

My husband had the special which was chicken marsala. We normally don't get that because places just use a heavy brown sauce. This was a nice light sauce with fresh mushrooms. Total party foul when a restaurant uses canned mushrooms for pizza or pasta. These mushrooms are fresh, yay!

My favorite part of the meal was the Cesar salad. They make their own dressing! It was a nicely balanced Cesar dressing and if I had to guess, they make their own croutons too.

My husband liked the coffee and he got a soft serve chocolate ice cream cone. He was very happy he got the cone. I was all sad-faced because he forgot to get me one and I was busy flapping my yap with everyone else, I lost track of time and they were closing. :( 

So I need to come back for ice cream. But before I get dessert, I will need to try one of the sandwiches. I saw a table getting served their sandwiches and they looked great! The bread was toasted and they hand cut their potatoes to make the fries. Completely casual atmosphere right across from the lake. The owners are incredibly charming and we simply need more places like Diane's.

Oh, and they have picnic tables out back with beautiful landscaping. These guys really work hard!
Two of us, Sunday at noon. Very casual. Cribbage games in adjoining room. Employees spread out over two tables going through cardboard boxes of receipts (taxes? bills?). Friendly and clean enough, but atmosphere could use a little "warming up" in decor. Decent menu choices and prices. One side garden salad, one ceasar. Good size, but "Ceasar" dressing tasted like watered down mayo. (Good thing I like mayo, but definitely not regular dressing). Husband ordered Chicken Cacciatore. Ample but not over sized; however was supposed to come with bread. None offered. (Good thing that he decided he didn't need it; yet where was it?) Poor Boy fish sandwich delicious, the other fish items must be as good. Lightly battered. Good portion. Limited deserts, vanilla soft serve more like frozen yogurt. Better Than Anything Cake moist and richly sweet. Good coffee. In summation, Holland lucky to have Diane's. But maybe time to bring it up a notch to where the home cooking deserves to be; "family run casual" is nice, but deserves at least "Business Casual".
My wife and I just finished one of the most memorable dinners of our trip to New England. A short little drive away from all the main stream establishments to have a meal worth writing home about. We had food that we thought was pretty much off limits for someone needing a gluten free diet, like mac and cheese, fish and chips....REALLY!! All that along with a fall off the bone pork shank and parmesan encrusted asparagus...yummy!! The family run business is one of the friendliest places we have been to. We highly recommend everyone to take a little drive and enjoy the cuisine at Diane's Villa Nova.
I have eaten here several times with friends. I am Italian and this is not good Italian food. The sauce was bland and certainly doesn't taste homemade. The pasta was way over cooked. My husbands order was wrong and they made no attempt to correct it. The place is loud, and none to clean to my eye. I can't really understand the reviews. This is in my opinion a really mediocre place to eat that I would never recommend to anyone.
Food was fresh and delicious. The mozzarella sticks were amazing!  My daughter is gluten intolerant and this restaurant had an incredible selection of menu items for her to choose from.  We were beyond happy.
We visited during flea  market week 9 of us. Service was fantastic, the owner was so welcoming and nice, food was superb. I do not eat starch, so Italian food is not an easy choice, so I ordered a burger with no bun, & was offered  broccoli or spinach as a side, I had the spinach which was wilted with garlic & soòo good. Highly recommended 
Almost barfed from the Yucky Pizza sauce !
The place was empty, and the pizza was not that good.
Had a funny taste I did not like.
The guy in the back was scratching hit but in the kitchen, I did not see him wash his hands
afterword's..
Diane's Villa Nova is a fantastic restaurant and have an amazing atmosphere!!!! Recently they added a new addition to their menu that is to die for. I had the taco burger which was exquisite. I can honestly say that Diane's Villa Nova is the best place I have ever eaten and I would highly recommend it to anyone!!! 
We visited Diane's in December and were warmly welcomed when we entered with our young children in tow.  The place is cozy and unpretentious.  The staff kindly offered to rearrange tables to accommodate our group.  The menu was varied, including gluten-free beer, and yummy homemade chowder.  The owner explained how much of what they serve is truly homemade, which was impressive.  The food was very good, and you could see that the family owners poured their heart into making this restaurant a success.  Simply to support them I would return, but also, to taste some more of the delicious home cooking.  If you like a slice of real life when you travel, served with a smile, I would recommend Diane's.
We are never disappointed in the food. Always Amazing! The people are so caring and welcoming, you really feel like family. Our favorite place to eat. 
Imagine going into your kitchen and your favorite home-cooked comfort food appears in a few minutes.....delicious, relaxing, unpretentious--well, go to Diane's OR order take-out, delivered to your door....sigh....memories of that baked haddock-best fish I have ever eaten in my longish life--I remember few meals afterwards, but that was perfection--not to mention the "down-home" atmosphere and friendly, helpful conversations with staff/guests...give it a try....we are delighted we did--
I really enjoy Diane's.  She is an honest, good, hard-working woman who has done her best to create an atmosphere that you could really consider home.  Food is great.  I often get shepherds pie, which comes with gravy-a unique twist.  One of the things I love about Diane is that if she does not have a food on her menu, if she has the ingredients, she will make it.  For example, my son likes applesauce.  She didn't have this as a side, but went out and bought some, now it is available.  She will create things specifically to your liking.  Besides shepherds pie, my other favorite is a specific salad- which she makes just for me.  But, honestly, you. An get good food anywhere.  For me, it is the people that keep me coming back.  How often do you get a hug from the owner if a restaurant when you walk in the door?   Well, at Dianne's you do.  
This restaurant is in the same building that Holland Pizza used to be.  Don't worry, Dianne did a lot of cleaning.  Don't let any past bad experience with Holland Pizza influence your decision to try Diane's.  It is good stuff, just go.
The pizza was good but not outstanding.  The decor is quite rustic.  The service was fair.  Watch out for the beer price.  Ours was way more than it should have been.  We probably won't order beer there again if we go.

This hidden gem of a restaurant has the best spagetti sauce that I have ever tasted outside of Rome, Italy itself!  Diane tells me it comes from her grandfather and has passed through the generations.
Diane's is a family owned business and one certainly gets a wonderful meal for a reasonable price.  Her two sons help her and are equally personable and efficient.
I always make it a point to stop in at least once a month.  My husband enjoys it too.

Do yourself a favor - stop by and try her food - Especially the sauce!! :o)
Excellent Chicken Cacciatore. Very good eggplant parm. 
Very reasonable prices. Good value.
Great service.
The Balderelli family bend over backwards to accommodate the customer! Covering gluten free diets, altering veggies for starches, you ask for it, if it can be done - they will do it. And even better, they won't gouge you for a menu change!
Sometimes you want a little less family environment when it feels like you are in the middle of the owner's living room. Food is okay, good value for what you get. But atmosphere is sorta like you stopped by someone's house. That can be good, and not so good. Family debates, attitudes, yelling, etc. all displayed for the diners to see. Just sayin' sometimes a little uncomfortable.
The best food and the best people!!! I would recommend this place (and have) to everyone!!! 
The chicken parm is the BEST!!!! I have never been able to finish it all!! They give you so much food. Her home cooked desserts are to die for!!!!
This place should be listed under things to do, not as a restaurant. Great home made ice cream, wonderful location, and the best place around to pick your own pumpkins. Small play area and you can feed the goats. This is a great place to take Young children.
The ice cream is creamy and there are wide varieties to suit anyone's taste.  The special thing here is the view.  Try to time it for sunset and you will be rewarded with a spectacular vista.  For the little people there is a playground and a bunch of friendly hungry goats for petting and viewing.  Worth a trip out here to see the sunset and get great ice cream.
My husband and I went for a quick supper and had been told that Westview had sandwiches and burgers. The menu was extremely limited and the food was just ok. I had a chicken wrap and forgot to mention no onions. Normally not a problem to pull out the onions however there were numerous onion rings and they were extremely thick. They could have been used for making onion rings.  The side salad I had was very nice however. It was what appeared to be romaine with tomato, cucumber, green pepper, croutons and once again those very thick red onions. The prices however were VERY reasonable. I remember taking my children there for ice cream at least 25 years ago and am not sure that they even had food but i remember the ice cream being very good. Next trip I will go for ice cream and hopefully it will get a 5 spot rating!
A little out of the way but really nice and a great value for ice cream. I haven't been to this place for several years. It's not exactly around the corner. And the last time I was here it was fly city so I don't really remember the ice cream. But, it's greatly improved with a clean, spacious area with picnic tables and a nice scenic view.

The ice cream is probably the best value around. Much larger portions and quality than any other ice cream shop that I know of. But unless I plan on moving to the boonies you won't be seeing me there too often.
We visited Westview Farms while waiting for our beer at Tree House Brewing (just down the street). This place was recommended by others waiting at Tree House. We were not disappointed. The portions are huge and the food was good. We had the BLT hot dog and the blue cheese burger (both specials). We both had leftovers. Feeding the goats outside was a lot of fun and they love their own nibble cones. We were too full for ice cream but it would be worth a trip back.
Westview Farms in Monson MA is a bit out of the way.   The ice cream here is FANTASTIC!   This is a must-visit when you are in the area.   There are goats, picnic tables and kids play equipment to keep the little ones busy.   They have seasonal events in the fall including hay rides and pumpkin picking.   Best of all, however is the ice cream.    Good flavors, good price!

Took the kids and they loved feeding and petting the goats.... Great ICECREAM and very reasonable prices for the area. A nice trip with a great view of the local mountain range :) 
We went to the Westview farms and creamery for a quick bite and ice cream. We ordered a hot dog and cheese and steak sandwich. Almost 1 hour later they called our number. The drinks had been sitting on the counter and the ice had melted. The hot dog was burnt and the roll soggy from sitting too long. The steak sandwich was like leather. We have never returned food before but tonight we did. On the way out we stopped for ice cream because we were hungry. The ice cream was like ice milk. Crystallized and not creamy at all. Don't bother going! The view was great though!
I don't know anything about the food service inside, they are not known for that. However, the outdoor ice cream window serves up good amounts of ice cream at reasonable prices. They were accommodating with peanut allergy requests. Relaxed family atmosphere with picnic tables on grassy area with a long view to the west. Enclosed goat area is a source of entertainment for all ages. Area for youngsters consisting of a bunch of large plastic playscape is a plus.
Our party of three have been searching for this creamery for the past three years and could not seem to locate it. Then it happened and we are all very pleased that we never gave up.  They have at least 30 to 40 flavors of ice cream and combinations.  Portions are Ample and I suggest you start off with a small dip.  They also serve lunch,  There is a small kiddie zoo on the grounds,  The view is awesome and enough of picnic tables to sit outside and the kids have room to let off steam.  A must if you are near Sturbridge or Brimfield. The ice cream is one of the best
The ice cream is probably the best in the area. The property has mountain views and a petting zoo. In the fall they have hay rides which are very popular along with picking pumpkins 
If you enjoy a pleasant ride in the country and want to watch the sunset this is the place to go. The ice cream  and many flavors are delicious and you can sit outside and look at the view or feed the animals. I would highly recommend going.
The ice cream is excellent and so is the view.  Nice to sit at one of the picnic tables and enjoy the great outdoors.  Small kids (& even not so small kids ;-) enjoy petting and feeding the goats.
The ice cream is fabulous. Too many flavors to choose from and some very distinctive. The restaurant? Meh. But the ice cream experience is worth a trip even if you have to drive a distance. The best part for my wife and I is to be there at sunset. The view is incredible. And the goats. The goats are just so much fun. Not just for the kids but the adults as well. My daughter is now 28 and she and her husband love coming when they visit. We stay long after the ice cream is devoured.
Bring the kids and go for the ice cream.  Westview Farms makes their own ice cream and it is wonderful, very rich and tasty....with lots of flavors! Outside there is a small area fenced in with baby goats and food available to fed the goats for sale.  The restaurant is only fair at best, and inconvenient because you have to go inside to order food and outside (at the window) to order ice cream. I brought my kids for the ice cream and spending time outside.  Westview has picnic tables set up so you can sit to eat and enjoy the absolutely gorgeous view!  The setting sun in the summer is beautiful! The Fall is a great time to go because they sell pumpkins and you can pick-your-own in the field or buy what has been picked at very reasonable prices! My kids loved to pick out their own pumpkins! They also offer wagon rides! Lots of fun!
Great little gift shop with pictures, furniture, stuffed animals, jewelry, pottery; a little of everything.  In summer months they serve up their delicious corn and fresh tomatoes, sell planting flowers, mums, and tomato plants.  A few steps to the right of the gift shop you can pick yourself up fresh growlers of their homeade select beer at the Treehouse Brewery.  Love, love this place!
Awesome locally made ice cream, feeding the goats, hayrides, picking your own pumpkins from the field. Good time for the whole family. 
      
Westview Farms is a wonderful place to take the family! They have meals but the ice cream is what makes the trip going for. Many flavors and great quality! There is a small zoo for everyone to enjoy and indoor as well as outdoor seating with a pretty view of the mountains and sunset.
While it has a beautiful view and good ice cream, the kitchen is very unreliable for consistency. On two recent visits, the fish and chips were prepared very differently, the second time not well at all. A dining companion had the whole-clam role which had badly overcooked clams and an untoasted hot-dog roll with lettuce. The very chewy clams left their grease all over the lettuce and there weren't many clams anyway. Big disappointment.
Go for the ice cream and breathtaking views.There are animals that you can feed as well.I highly recommend this place!!
Ate inside. Server nice enough. Only one soup left out of three on menu. Ordered Clam fritters special, jalapeno poppers, grilled cheese, corn chowder, chicken tender app, burger, fries,House sub. Seemed to take a long time for food. When she came with food, she accidentally knocked over lemonade. Got two orders of clam fritters instead of one & one jalapeno poppers. Chicken tenders app, although obviously generic frozen was more substantial than the grilled cheese,or hamburger. Finally got poppers. Mostly take out, ice cream. Lots of Maine related memorabilia, but otherwise not much personality conveyed by service or food. Not cheap, $50 plus for 4.
I won a gift card for The Maine Attraction at a golf tournament. We live about 15 miles away so we took a quick drive for lunch today. We split the clam fritters and lobster roll special ( w lettuce, tomato, cole slaw and home made chips). 
There were 8 golf ball size clam fritters and they were excellent - crisp and very tasty (wait, aren't we 50 miles from the nearest shore?). The lobster roll was also excellent - all real lobster. With drinks it came to $23.
Also, they serve home made ice cream but we didn't indulge. Very interesting flavors.
I wrote a review on this place over a year ago and was very happy with it however this year we tried it 3 different times and we were disappointed each time   It's a seasonal Drive In Restaurant open from May thru October.  We had a large group of people and we ordered ahead for take out.  When we got there to pick up the pick up line was also the ice cream line.  So our food sat and got cold while people ordered their ice cream.  We asked the lady behind the counter several times if she could just give us our order and she would nod and just disappear.  Needless to say no one was happy with our cold food including a seafood platter and several expensive items.  We decided to try it again and again we ordered take out 3 people ordered the special which was lobster rolls and they were expensive and terrible. We had another large order we were 8 people and no one was happy with their order.  We always believe in giving second chances this place we gave extra because it used to be so good...Don't know what happened the help is one of the problems for sure.  You can't charge those kind of prices without giving the quality we are used to getting at this place. We will not be back for sure...
First of all, the young man at the service window was super nice, courteous and friendly. Although the Maine was very busy he made sure our order was complete, accurate and added items such as table ware when we needed it. Our orders of Lobster rolls, Seafood and Clam Chowder and Hot Dog were great. The only down side was the buns of the lobster rolls were a little flattened inside the wrapping. The lobster itself was delicious, as were the chowders. The Italian sandwich was 'okay' maybe it's the cuts of the meat? The Giffords ice cream was delicious. A bonus was the ski club performing while we were eating. I would come back as it is a great little place for a great lobster roll.
Stopped at the Maine Attraction on the way back from the Brimfield Antique Show.  It's situated across from the Holland Reservoir which is very pretty.  Opened for lunch and dinner and they have an ice cream stand.  Stopped for lunch and had the Maine lobster salad.  My husband had the  fried clam cake sandwich.  Everything is fresh and the staff is friendly.
These folks do such a fine job, Cute, casual, lobster / sea-life themed feel to the full serve dining room. We went mid afternoon on a Flea Market day. The cool, calm, quiet was great after a hot crowded foray into the Brimfield Market. Seafood is realistically priced. We shared a Fisherman's Platter that was more than enough for 2. The coleslaw has a light ( if any) dressing. The scallops, whole belly clams, fish, and shrimp were top shelf with a delicate coating and cooked perfectly. A generous serving of nice fries came with the platter. They serve Giffords ice cream. We had milkshakes ( locals will know them as frappes) made with real ice cream - perfection.Staff is a real asset - attentive without hovering. We'll be back.
Employees friendly n nice. Best chowder around. Would suggest this place to all new comers around. Must try it out.
Your typical summer time road side eatery with great food. i can not stress enough how good the food is. They have a great menu and If you are looking for great sea food and ice cream this is the place.  My wife and I go more than we should.
Love their homemade soups!  Clam and the Chicken corn chowder are thick, creamy and delicious.  Meals in themselves!  Delicious Ice Cream with lots of choices and Great view of Hamilton Reservoir too.
Love eating outside or inside.
Since the first year they opened my wife and I have been there for dinner many times.  Even more for ice cream.  It has always been excellent. Good food, great portions and priced fairly. Jen and her staff are always friendly and make sure everything is satisfactory.  Wishing them a great winter as they deserve the time off.  Can't wait until they reopen in April.
My friend and I decided to try the Maine Attraction that has been advertised in our local paper. It's a small lakeside restaurant in Holland, Massachusetts with takeout and picnic benches. You can get a lobster roll stuffed with lobster with a side of their restaurant made chips which are very crispy for under $10. We had to ask for mayo since the roll was a bit dry, though nicely grilled. For dessert we got Gifford's chocolate rainforest crunch ice cream,which was very good. The food was very good and we would definitely go back. However the service was slow. Our order was taken right away, but we waited for over 20 minutes at the takeout window for two sandwiches and chips. Overall I would recommend it, if you have time to wait.
I had fish & chips (haddock). Tasted okay but all I smelled was ammonia. It was a Wednesday lunch. They must have been using-up all their 'old' fish.   Fish that smells of ammonia is not acceptable.
we had the opportunity recently to eat dinner at the Maine Attraction. The seafood chowder was thick and overflowing with good pieces seafood. We also ordered the Lobster clubs which were out of this world. they were so large and filling we had to take half home. The ice cream is delicious I agree the Maple Walnut is such that you can actually taste the real Maple syrup flavors yet not overwhelmingly sweet. My husband is crazy about the Maine blueberry with real blueberries in it. He's from Maine so He knows good Maine cooking! A nice little gem hidden away in Holland, Mass. dining room can accommodate over 20 folks but must call ahead to be assured of the seating.
Giffords ice cream from Maine, best tasting maple walnut I have ever had. A little pricey,$3.95 for 2 scoops, but worth it I guess. Will go back and try their clamcakes soon.
It's 3:30 in the morning and the Clam platter that I ate @ 7pm has had me up 3 times from indigestion. 
My wife and I are Holland residents and I talked her into giving it a 3rd try (the first 2 were not good experiences either). 
We ordered our food @ the window-but due to it being a little chilly we decided to go inside. 
We were greatest by an angry waitress that told us we were supposed to order our food inside-Not bring it in. And proceeded to be little us by our choice of seating-Stating that we shouldn't sit @ a table for 4 when there were only 2 of us-it was her last big table (which was untrue). 
The food tasted good going in-but I'm in agony now. I will never spend another dime in this terrible establishment.
Live in town can't wait for them to open and hate to see them close for winter seafood hamburgers lots of terrific offerings. Never have been disappointed 
We stopped in after taking a drive around the local area. We got the seafood platter. It was enough food for both of us, plus enough to take home for lunch! Seafood was very fresh and fried perfectly. Also loved how they put the fries on a separate platters from the seafood. Service was friendly and quick.
Found this place by accident on our way to the Brimfield Antique show, it was the best treasure find of our trip!  The staff was unbelievably friendly, the food delicious, and the location just wonderful.  This will definitely be a stop on our future trips to the market.
Love the lobster roll (mine with lettuce and mayo, but you can do butter instead). Great homemade potato chips come with it. Owner is always there and kids give great service. Eat in, eat outside or take home options make flexible.
Read all the reviews. Decided to check for ourselves. Had Clam fritters(6), Clam Cake Platter and large chocolate shake. Clam Fritters and Clam Cakes were among the best we ever had(and we've had many). Good friendly service. We were driving away to have a picnic on the the lake when our server ran after us with our shake. Did I say Great Service? Oh yea! 
We checked on TripAdvisor, looking for a good restaurant, in the Brimfield area, and Lola's came up with 5 stars average rating, so figured we should check it out. When we got there, it looked very tiny and unassuming, from the outside...thought "How good could this be, being such a tiny hole in the wall kinda place?" Well, let's just say it was GREAT! The food was excellent, the atmosphere was simple, but adequate, and the service was fantastic...very friendly and helpful. We would highly recommend this restaurant, and definitely would go back. Oh, and great prices for huge portions!
1st time stopping and very impressed! The food was great my eggplant rotini was delish! My husband loved his fried scallops. We will definitely be back.
Awesome good , very tasted , friendly family like atmosphere . Owner and waitress very friendly and just great people . I suggest this to anyone looking for excellent food ! 
Ordered a couple pizzas on Sunday (father's day night) and took a while to get there but both employees were very kind and the pizza was still hot, fresh and delicious! 
Just passing through but had to stop at Lolas for a bite, had a great chicken cheese steak and wife had a very plentiful chicken breast in salad , best meal place we know of and officially best pizza in sturbridgre
If you are looking for a great meal at at fair price.  You have to try Lola's.  We get it to go at least once or twice a week.  This is better than some meals you get in the city.  Everything is fresh.  Good portions, fair price.  George makes everything a work of art.  Try the pizza, subs, and meals.  Your taste buds will thank you.
Old Sturbridge Village is a magnet for tourists, but what brought two college roommates for lunch in Sturbridge is a chance to renew acquaintances. Our game plan is to try different restaurants and today we discovered a gem. 
    Lola's is a small restaurant that features home style cooking and large portions for the right price.  
    As we entered  Lola's, we saw a table of six gentleman and we could imagine it was a business luncheon.
   Highlights: 
* Waitress was pleasant and attentive.
* Food was plentiful. Recall, saying to my friend, "Wow, that is what you call a bowl of            soup!"
* Price was right. Our bill was in the 20's; of course, Lola's no liquor license policy helped our cause.
   As a believer in always finishing on a happy note - mission accomplished: our waitress surprised us with a just out of the oven banana cobbler. We exchanged pleasantries with our waitress, left with a hefty "doggy bag", a smile on our face, and while outside vowed to meet up again at  Lola's Place Pizza and Restaurant.
Lola's has the best food in the Sturbridge area and the best atmosphere for a great meal. The  hosts George and Lola are great!  always a Hello or a  "How are you doing Today Buddy" from George cooking up his masterpieces in the Kitchen and always great service and a friendly smile from Nadine.
The Food is always freshly made and has the little extra garnishes that put it over the top.
Blackboard specials change regularly and offer a good selection.
I can't miss when I get take out from Lolas as the family loves the Food. (Kids say its the best pizza anywhere) asked My wife where she'd like to go for valentines day.    it was Lolas
A must visit if you're ever in the Sturbridge area.
I have been to Lola's numerous times and keep coming back!  Their food and service is simply outstanding!   There are two boards on the walls with the daily specials in addition to their menu.   When you are seated, you are served your drinks along with warm, right out of the oven garlic bread.  My favorite is the honey crusted salmon which comes on a bed of rice pilaf, with homemade cole slaw and grilled vegetables.  I chose to eliminate the rice and had a double order of vegetables instead.   I also had a bowl of the manhattan fish chowder (red)- very tasty and will not disappoint!   My boyfriend had the chowder as well (and said it was the best he ever had) along with the spinach stuffed chicken breast.   That was excellent as well and we had plenty to bring home.  A petite size complimentary dessert comes with your meal and is different every time.   This particular night was banana bread pudding with chocolate sauce and was spectacular.   Excellent food, excellent service, excellent everything!  Don't let the size of the restaurant fool you- there is plenty of parking in the back.  If you're in the Sturbridge area, check this place out- I promise you that you will not be disappointed!
We shared a large pizza for lunch on our way back to New York.  It was beautifully prepared, and provided us with leftovers.  Although we just stopped in for pizza, we regretted not ordering the huge fried fish sandwich, or the fish chowder that others were raving about.  Next time!
I had read the reviews here, and wanted to give Lola's a try, at the end of a long trip.  My husband and I both loved it!   It is Lola's Diner, by the way.  My husband had the manicotti dish, which was huge(!), hot and delicious--light but filling. I had the haddock sandwich, which was also large and very crispy--excellent.  I intended to save half for lunch, but couldn't resist eating it all. The fries with it also were special, and brought home by my husband--not his usual practice.

The decor is basic, but the food is really excellent, and reasonably priced.  Service is friendly, attentive and swift.

Look around carefully--there are two boards of specials posted. The soups looked intriguing, and other diners were commenting that they were good.

We look forward to more visits.
Everything is delishious!  Almost tooooo much food for the price.. I .always take some home! A family run business  and the wait staff are so nice.  free cheese toasted bread and a free dessert with every meal!
Place has a lot of specials all reasonable. We were looking for a place that had good food but didn't want to travel far had a long ride during day. Waitress was very good. Would go back again before heading back home. 
Well pleased.I had the baked haddock and my wife had the baked tilapia.Both were excellent but the best was the Manhattan fish chowder we had for an appetizer. Dessert was peach cobbler and total bill was 26.11.try to beat that for an excellent meal!!
I'd read some reviews of Lola's online and had put it on the top of the list for our group to try out during a recent weekend stay in Sturbridge.  At first, my group did not want to go there because there was not website & they couldn't look at the menu online.  They searched online and found a picture of Lola's and were a bit concerned cuz it seemed so small.  I encouraged everybody to give it a try cuz it seemed, from reviews, that it might be a real hidden gem.  Initially the group decided to pass and go to Enrico's instead (able to 'look at it' online) but when we got there they did not want to hang around for the 45 minute wait so we called Lola's, asked if there would be a wait for our group of 7 and were enthusiastically told "Nope!  come on over & we'll have a table set up for you!").

The place WAS tiny but the waitress was terrific!  And there were two blackboards full of specials.  Everybody ordered a different special...my stuffed eggplant was delicious, stuffed with spinach & cheese with a delicious sauce and served with meatballs.  Others ordered & enjoyed stuffed manicotti, lasagna, fried haddock (recommended by our waitress) and honey mustard salmon (also recommended by our waitress).  Everything was homemade, delicious and most of us took some home for lunch the next day.

This place is just another 1/2 mile or so down the "strip" that is route 20 in sturbridge...it's much less busy down there.  Next time you're driving down the mass pike...stop at Lola's!
My husband and I were passing through Sturbridge and looked at Trip Advisor for a good place to stop for dinner. We stopped here, which from the outside looks a bit intimidating. Upon entering Lola (I assume) was welcoming and came over to give us menus and ask for drinks. She then brought over the most delicious home made garlic bread. The food was just as good! In the end she brought us 2 little slices of cake with our check. It was a lovely and inexpensive dinner, we would def go back if we pass through again. Give this place a try!
Fantastic food every time! Charming owners and a lovely waitress with excellent service! Simply the best! We travel from Connecticut every two weeks just to eat at Lola's. It's our Saturday night date night favorite !
We went for lunch because it was within walking distance from where we were.  We were pleasantly surprised that the food was very good for such a small out of the way place.  We will definitely be going back.
Three of us just happened on this place for lunch while attending an event in Sturbridge.  The specials offered were extensive, and the items we chose were quite good.  Portions were large (two of us got two meals out of ours); the value was very good. Highly recommended if you're anywhere nearby. 
Stopped at Lola's after a full day of driving and really enjoyed the experience.  Food was pretty exceptional (had salmon and pasta specials), the atmosphere was "rustic" and it seemed to be more of a local place which was to our liking.  No alcohol served but we had called and we were told to bring our own which worked out well. We happily drank our bottle of wine from the coffee cups provided, enjoyed the great food and relaxed.  Thanks!  We will be back!
I'm so glad we looked at the reviews and came here from I90 for breakfast.  The place isn't much from the outside but cozy once you get in. Our waitress greeted us immediately and gave us coffee very quickly. Now for the food...The menu is large for a small place but we chose the village omelette and are very glad we did. We asked the waitress to split our omelette for us because we did not want a large breakfast. She informed us that there was a two dollar charge for splitting but the cook will split it nicely for us and we would be pleased with it. Let me tell you, there was so much food we could not possibly eat it all. We were going to order a muffin as well but decided to wait to order it.  There is no way we could have eaten it because we were so full. Our omelette had meat vegetables and cheese so I know we will be satisfied for hours.  It was great!  The home fries are large pieces of perfectly roasted potatoes and were delicious. For a Thursday morning at 9:15 the place was very busy. I heard the waitress speaking to people so I'm guessing most of them were locals and they know where to go for a good breakfast. I will be sure to stop here next time I am on 90. It is worth the couple minute drive.
We stopped in here by chance passing through town on a road trip and were not disappointed. Breakfast was amazing with huge portions. I would definately recommend trying a benny while here. 
The food is always delicious, the quantity huge, and the service is incredibly fast. I have had many many things off of their menu and I have enjoyed everything. The prices are typical of most breakfast places but the quantity and speed of service is second to none. Their menu is very varied, and I particularly love all of the eggs Benedict choices. This breakfast place cannot be beaten. I also hear they have a great lunch but I have yet to try it!  I do know the cook is the same and he is absolutely fantastic. I cannot wait to go here for lunch!  

A coworker and I were talking about trying this place for lunch.  We usually go to another local favorite.  I ordered one of their many Eggs Benedict breakfasts for lunch.  I was very impressed and surprised at the portion size.  It was a wonderful meal.  I would certainly recommend this place.  Price was great, food awesome and service with a smile.  You can always tell when someone takes pride in their job.  Thank you very much!!!
After going to the Brimfield Fair last month, a local gentleman suggested that my friends and I stop by the "Old Village Grille" for a guaranteed solid meal.  How right he was.  Let me start by saying that the service was impeccable. Our waitress could not have been nicer or more efficient. The portions were huge, but more importantly, everything we orders was delicious, from the BLT to the french fries!! Everyone at our table loved what they got.......and to top the meal off, the owner gave all of us (five people ) free Ice cream sandwiches!!!( because it was a hot day)  
H
best breakfast place i have seen--real homefries that a big deal if you live in the south and can only get hashbrowns
Usually we stop for breakfast but it was a little later so we decided to have lunch. I ordered the chicken quesadilla and it was out of this world. Usually when you order one of these, it is very thin and you just pick it up and eat it. Not this time! it was stuffed with big chunks of chicken and lots of hot salsa inside. You need a knife and fork to eat this baby! Excellent flavor at an excellent price. My husband ordered one of the specials which was a turkey bacon and cheddar melt. You have a choice of a number of breads to have it on and he chose the sourdough. The sandwich was huge and he loved it. He opted for the sweet potato fries which are also fantastic. The only issue was the quesadilla being so thick wasn't heat ed through quite as hot as I wanted but it went back for a little more time on the grill and I was munching away in no time! No hassles at Old Village Grille!!!!
Very local, very cozy, and very generous portions. Coffee is on the weak side, but easily forgiven as the breakfasts are strong. Can't miss.
My wife and I traveled 41 miles from our home to have lunch here again. It turned out to be a mistake. The place was busy upon our arrival and service was inadequate. Our waitress forgot us twice. We came here for their lobster roll as they're known for these and we had enjoyed them on our prior visit. We were very disappointed this time. The lobster was tasteless and my suspicion says it was left over from the previous day. I had macaroni salad with with it and it had a sour taste and I didn't eat much. My wife had steak fries which were hot and delicious. The bread & butter pickles were good too. Based on this experience we will not return.
This small, locally owned and operated restaurant is a gem. Open Wednesday thru Sunday, they serve breakfast and lunch.  Everything made from scratch and cooked to order will be delivered to your table in a flash.  Anything you crave for breakfast they have. From eggs to omelettes, pancakes to French toast, even a variety of eggs Benedict dishes. The homefries are the best and are even offered minus onions.  The staff make you feel like your family.  They have become our go to breakfast place.
We visited here on the advice of my Son in Law.  Having come from Massachusetts Diners have always been my go to place.  Though not a diner, the breakfast will put to shame ANY restaurant in the entire state.  Now that is a rather hugh statement but the food is the best I have had in Massachusetts and Georgia both put together.  The restaurant is small but very cozy, clean and welcoming.  We were greeted by the server before the door was completely closed.  We were directed to sit in any place available and found a both next to the widow.  Service was EXCELLENT and FAST.  We had no sooner been seated and our server took our drink order as we looked over the the menu.  In a flash we haad our coffee and diet coke in front of us.  The server let us have a few extra minutes to look over the breakfast menu.  I have never seen so many variations of "Eggs Benedict" offered in any restaurant.  I believe there were over ten variations.  My wife decided on the Canadian Bacon Eggs Benedict and I opted for the Two Eggs Scrambled, Bacon and Home Fries.  We placed our order and in a short period of time they were brought to the table.  I cannot tell you how big these dish's are.  After spend a week eating breakfast here I still could not finish it all.  The eggs were prepared well, not runny, and not over cooked.  The Bacon was excellent, cooked the way you like and smoked very nicely.  The Home Fries were just plain delicious with onions and crusted to a wonderful brown.  I've had Home Fries in a whole lot of places but these are the Best.
Sturbridge is a small town and very busy with people visiting Sturbridge Village dduring the summer.  Make sure you visit The Old Village Grille you will not regret it and will return when you have a chance.  Say hello to Steve, the Chef and Owner.  A wonderful place to have breakfast or lunch.
I almost drove by this small place.  It doesn't look like anything special, but inside we found a cozy, friendly breakfast spot.  The reuben omelet was excellent, next time I will try one of the bennys.  Although the food was good and the service was very good, the coffee was lackluster.
We loved this place.  Big fat prime rib melt. More than you can eat fish and clam strip platter. Great, fast service.  Waitress chased us out to the parking lot with our doggie bag. Wonderful local dining experience. 
Split a serving and still had leftovers. They are advertised as huge and the are - light and fluffy. Also very good was the French toast special and egg sandwich. Staff is very friendly. It's not a huge place and fills up quickly. Lots of locals which is always a good sign. Reasonably priced. Would go back again. 
Old Village Grille has a friendly, neighborhood feel.  Early on a Sunday afternoon, this no frills place was packed. Our waitress was attentive and patient when we we're quite ready to order. I made the mistake of not going with her recommendation of  'eggs benedict' and regretted it. The plain scrambled eggs were yellow and fluffy; the scrambled with veggies had little egg taste or color and were pretty bland, but had lots of broccoli, tomatoes and onions. Toast and home fries were decent and the portions were large. If in the area again and in the mood for a hearty breakfast, I would definitely return.
One of those places all the locals or regular visitors stop in.  The food is good.  Prices are reasonable. The place Has a lot of character & there is good "people-watching" to be had as well.  I don't think you will regret it.  We go at least once (usually twice) every time we're in the Sturbridge area.
Every time I go for breakfast here I get the apple pancakes. I can only eat one of three so I bring the rest home for lunch. They are absolutely massive! Thick and home made too!
So far so good!!!!!    Waitress is so sweet!!!     Food sounds great!!!     Haven't ate yet.... But there is a lot of happy people in here so..........     5 star!!!     Thanks trip adviser!!!!!

We had strong recommendations from my friends husband and he was right.This is a place located on the way to Sturbridge and can be missed if you don't know the area. It's a great find with breakfast served all day and a varied extensive menu for lunch to satisfy even the finicky eater! !
We decided on the  poached eggs with lobster for one, spinach and onions on the other, bacon and Hollandaise sauce .Wow, impressive breakfast, enough to last all day! !!Attractively served and a very welcoming atmosphere with smiling staff. We loved it and plan to return. Prices are very reasonable for portion size , everything is fresh. Several fish specials on Friday. A place to put on any Sturbridge itinerary, family friendly too!
I had the spinach, bacon and cheddar omelet which was fluffy and good, though I would probably choose something else next time.  My companion had the ham & cheese omelet and said it was the best he’s ever had, fluffy, full of chunks of ham and cheese.   Home fries offered with or without onions, a welcome offering as my companion does not like onions and frequently has to pick them out of home fries.  Appears to be a local breakfast hangout for regulars and the place where “everybody knows your name.” One waitress, one cook but they did a great job taking care of the orders.  Would definitely try again.
I was driving through Palmer and I spotted this place. I just ordered plain cheese pizza but I loved it. Staff is awesome food is delicious and price is reasonable.
I got a  Caesar salad which had cheese, croutons and tomatoes on it.  Lettuce wasn't cut into bite size pieces and it didn't seem to be washed; definitely a few bites were sour. The lettuce was mostly white and was just cut up from the head and thrown in.  Also ordered a buffalo chicken wrap. Was not impressed at all,  hardly any chicken.  The wrap had been cut in half; one side was open on both ends so it was difficult to eat.  The wrap wasn't spicy at all,  I ordered it mild and it was most tangy than anytime.  The sauce was also dripping out of the wrap; extremely messy.  Won't be ordering from them again.  
I tried turkey grinder and it was really impressive. All the ingredients were fresh and I really liked the service!
Pizza and grinders are better than the average around Palmer.  Staff is always friendly, fast delivery, and you can order and pay online (at mypizza.com)
Our service was exceptional and our food was delicious. We had the fantastic gnocchi & meatballs spinach salad and perfectly grilled salmon. This was our first time eating here in this beautiful quaint community and we would love to come back again.
This place was about what I expected based on prior reviews and the price point.

The servers did a good job and the food was good. 
My mom and I come to the Brimfield antique show for a week in May and September each year. We stay in West Springfield, but had taken to eating dinner at a popular  restaurant in Palmer each night when we left the show.  This last trip we had a couple recommendations to "try the Italian restaurant in Sturbridge!"   Not really knowing what we were looking for, I did a Google and Yelp! search, and found Rovezzi's --  and were we ever thrilled that we decided to give it a try! We went there for dinner on Wednesday  and did not have to think twice about coming back again on Thursday: this will now be our go-to dinner destination when we are in the area!    Everything about the meal, from appetizers through to dessert, was delicious. Our waitress on the first night, Ibby, was also excellent!
The special house salad, Brussel Cesar, was recommended by Ibby  and it was fantastic! We had this both nights for an appetizer. The first night for dinner we shared the lobster tortelloni, which was delicious and highly recommended. The second night for dinner we shared a pasta dish off the nightly special menu, that consisted of rigatoni, giant prawns and a vodka sauce - excellent!   All of the pasta is made in house and the texture and the color definitely show this to be true. 
For dessert I had the crème brûlée, which I will be the first to admit I am very picky about. I want a cold, smooth, rich custard with a very hard sugar crust on top.  Rovezzi's came out perfect!   My mom had the skillet chocolate chip sundae, which she loved.  
Highly recommended!   We will most definitely be back!
I have given this place 3 different chances and they have failed drastically each time.
The first time was with my sister I sent the veal back twice and refused to try it a third time. Was like shoe leather and the table was shaking while I was trying to cut it. The manager or cook never came out to my table.
I wrote a review on FB and the owner Chris R messaged me asking for me to give them another chance, but never offered a gift card or anything to make up for last time. He also bragged about their homemade pasta.....
The second time I went with my daughters one being a vegan. She ordered a roasted vegetable plate that they charged almost $20.00 for and I got the gnocchi which was so disgustingly chewy dense was like eating play dough.
The third time I could at least eat the food, but was ver par for course.

If you're going to claim your classic or signature Italian you better back it up!!
This place can't and I wouldn't even call it American Italian.
This is my very favorite restaurant in town. The food is terrific and the wait staff is the best. They are very attentive and conduct themselves in a very refined, professional manner. For a small town we do have some very good dining options available on or near Route 20, but this restaurant is my favorite for special events.
Went for a Saturday night dinner. Was seated right away. Set in an older building which had lots of character. Even had a small patio for seating. The waitress explained all items on menu. The appetizers of mussells in a spicy red gravy and the fried risotto balls were a tasty way to start meal. Complimentary foccacia bread was served. Entrees were lobster ricotta hand made tortolini and shrimp in a cream sauce with a hint of Grand Marnier. It was sweet, fresh and absolutely delicious. Dessert of Tiramisu was heavenly.  In the background Frank Sinatra music was playing. This restaurant could certainly give an Italian restaraunt in Brooklyn a run for its money.
We went as a family for a goodbye celebration. This is my 4th visit here and I was very very disappointed. We were sat upstairs which was not an issue until we realized the noise level was so high that our waiter had to yell to be heard. It was impossible to have a conversation. There were 3 large loud and I mean obnoxiously loud parties. Only 1 of the four dinners was hot, the other three were below room temperature. I normally love the food and I don't mind the price if it is palatable, it wasn't. It may have been a fluke and it was busy for a Tuesday.  My daughter chose the restaurant as she loves Italian food, but was disappointed in her meal. The positive was their Hot & Dirty Martini was excellent and the Creme dessert was excellent.
Picked this restaurant on the recommendation of a friend for a special dinner celebration. Should have picked another Italian Restaurant.  They were out of several menu items that we wanted to order.  Settled on the chicken pam that was mediocre at best. The wine list was limited as well and they were out of several selections.  Not a good choice!
We went for dinner for our anniversary. We had reservations. We were seated in a nice spot and they even had an anniversary card for us! Very nice touch. Everything was great, from the service to the drinks to the apps to dinner. I highly recommend and we will be back! 
Rovezzi's restaurant in Sturbridge generally has good Italian food, but our last trip there was very disappointing. I ordered the cavatelli with shrimp. While the sauce was very good and well-spiced, the pasta was dough-y and terrible. They pride themselves on hand made pasta, but maybe they should stick to store-bought if this is the best they can do.

We got there early so had no trouble finding a parking space. Their parking lot is very small, and parking can be a problem.

They tried to seat us in the very noisy bar area, but we asked to be seated in the upstairs dining room instead, which they accommodated. The dining room was fine at first, but when it started filling up, also became very noisy, so much so that we had difficulty carrying on a conversation.

The waitress was very good.

The bread was very good. The tiramisu made in-house was also very good.

An Italian restaurant is judged by its pasta, so I have to give this one a "poor" rating.
This  is a keeper!  The food is quite good and prices reasonable for the quality.   Much better food than almost any other Italian restaurant in the area.  Go and enjoy.
My wife and I were headed to another restaurant when we passed and notice outdoor seating. After looking at the menu online, we decided to give it a shot. 
We sat outside and enjoyed the beautiful evening. Our waiter, Joey, was excellent and had a great attention to detail. 
To start the focaccia bread was excellent. For appetizers we had the brussel sprout salad and mussels. I thought the salad was going to be okay but it blew me away. Try it, it's amazing. The mussels were good but not great.  Needed more tomatoes to mix in. I had the lobster tortellini with shrimp. Very very good.  I don't usually get pasta but was convinced by Joey and the fresh made pasta.  My wife had the scallops with risotto that was excellent. We didn't get dessert since we were too full. 
All in all a wonderful meal with attentive and knowledgable staff. A can't miss. 
Good food, good service, love the atmosphere. Overall a pleasant experience. 
    For our party of 4, celebrating a milestone, I called for reservations and asked for a table that was "not in the middle" and mentioned the occasion. This is a popular place and as a repeat customer I new it can be very busy weekend nights. When making reservations be aware that there is also dining upstairs and no elevator. Also, call a day ahead for gluten free pasta. When driving up to the place Saturday night, I was glad I had made reservations. Off the hilly side street parking can be tight but is free, and there is a valet option. This is an old house with a what I consider a welcoming upscale, antique yet polished decor. The bar is just inside the door and set the tone. Eating at the bar is a very good additional option. We were immediately seated upstairs near the window. Tables were comfortably spaced. It was a bit warm, but forgiven as this is an old place, crowded, on a hot summer evening. On our table was a card signed by the entire staff congratulating us on our milestone. What a nice touch! Our server, Isabel,  carried herself with an air of professionalism. Her posture, eye contact, efficiency all together had a way of making us feel truly welcomed without being rushed. Well done! I noticed the same in other staff too. All our meals were delicious with good portions. For two parmesan dinners with homemade pasta and a signature sauce, 3 alcoholic drinks...$75 before tip. Considering the quality of the food, the service and the atmosphere, its worth the extra cost. If you aren't on a strict budget, it really isn't that much more.....a satisfying night out.
The best Italian food in town.  From the appetizers to desserts, everything is delicious with great presentation.  If you plan to visit on a weekend you might want to think about making a reservation especially during holidays and Brimfield Antique Week.
We had not been here in a few years, but food is good as always. Helpful staff and comfortable ambiance.
While I feel that this is a little higher priced of the restaurants in the area, it is a fantastic quality of food.  I didn't realize I hadn't had properly cooked pasta until I came here.  Wait staff is good and the venue is decorated well.  Parking can be a pain, though valet is offered (and while people park next door at the dancing studio, I don't think it's encouraged).  There is also live music periodically (Friday's and Saturday's, I believe).  The music can be loud for my taste, but I usually feel that way with music in venues.  I've only gone with my wife, but this would be great for any gathering (formal and informal, family or friends).
Based on online reviews, we took the 40-minute drive to have dinner here and were immediately seated.  The focaccia & rustic breads were fresh, tasty and delicious when dipped in the olive oil (not extra virgin but very good).  Unfortunately, the bread was best part of meal.  Our server recommended the brussel sprout salad, which we ordered.  it was bland & lacking flavor but we forced it down the hatch.  Next we had the papardelle...sauce had too much sugar, and pasta had too much sugar & too thick (should be thin).  Sauce was too strong & overwhelmed the meat in the dish.  Next we had another dish recommended by server, tortelloni stuffed with ricotta & lobster.  We couldn't find any lobster.  Again, the pasta was much too thick, but the shrimp was very good.  Next we split a Sirloin steak, which OK but nothing special.  For dessert we had apple frittata...dough was too thick (again) & there was hardly any apple.  Cocktails were fine, service was good except server disappeared after dessert and never reappeared to give us our bill.  We eventually chased down maître de for the bill.  Prices are high, particularly considering the average-slightly below average food quality.  We were expecting elegant, top-quality Italian dining but were disappointed.
We had reservations at a couple of other restaurants in Sturbridge that decided to close for renovations.  So we started checking on line for alternatives.  Rovezzi's Restorante turned out to be a gem.  The glasses of wine were poured to the glass rim.  Mixed cocktails were HUGE!  All of the pasta is made by hand on site.  Everything was delicious, and the service was friendly and considerate.  We would return here again!
We travel to Italy every year and are always disappointed with Italian restaurants in America.  This place is great, the chef was inspired by a recent trip there and makes his own pasta. This is also not your typical red sauce restaurant. If your favorite Italian meal is chicken Parmesan you'll be disappointed because they don't serve it here, it also doesn't exist in Italy. Real Italian food is not smothered in cheese and garlic. 
Rovezzi's provided us with the perfect dining experience. The wait staff, the atmosphere and the food was absolutely perfect. We were never rushed and considering we spent just shy of three hours enjoying the food and company and yet we were never made to feel uncomfortable in staying for so long. Our waitress Erin was absolutely awesome. From personality to concern that our dining experience is to be nothing less than perfect she was the best!  I look forward to our next visit and completely recommend Rovezzi's without any hesitation. 
I go to Mickknucks several times a week!  Their produce is always better than the grocery store and cheaper. They have an incredible selection of most things that you need, of course the prices for convenience items are higher but it is worth not driving across town when you just need one can of evaporated milk, for example. Deli sandwiches are unbelievable!  Since I discovered that lunch option it brings me back again and again. 
This is a small grocery store on the main street in Sturbridge. Their meat section offers selections that are a bit more expensive than the big grocery store chains but there is absolutely no comparison! These meats are out of this world!
Always fresh veggies at a good price.  Their deli and meats are pricey, but they are quality products, so you  are getting value for the high price.
Great place to stop on the way home from work.
They have a wide variety of grocery, dairy items and Beer and Wine..
Full service deli and meats available with prepared meals and soups and sandwiches.
If you ever need a grocery staple and don't want to cross town to get it, Micknuck's is a life saver. The produce is fresh, the deli well-stocked, and the service is always friendly. 
They have a little bit of everything to pick up on your way home. We got cupcakes at the bakery, potato salad at
the deli, picked up some apples, veggie chips, green beans, honeydew melon and a bottle of wine. Good one stop store. A little bit higher on prices but better than getting stuck in the super market.
Love this this shopping spot they have all my needs from produce to the great choices of Boars head deli meats!! They also sell wine and beer so it's a one stop shopping experince..
Good prices , clean surroundings fresh food and an excellent deli with sandwiches that are to die for . a must stop location
Micknucks's is a gem for good deli (sandwiches and by the pound), as well as for a good wine selection (reasonable prices), produce, and some groceries.  All meats are top quality and NOT prepackaged!
I pop into Micknuck's at least once a week for lunch, and sometimes grab dinner as well.

For $5 you get any sandwich on the menu, on any bread, with any toppings!  They use Boar's Head meats and make their own egg, ham, potato, macaroni, etc. Salads.

For $2 more you can add a can of soda, chips and a massive pickle.   

The produce is always fresh, and the people behind the counter are almost always courteous.  We all have bad days, right ;)

They're usually very quick and efficient.

They also have a small selection of pre-made sandwiches and meals if you're really in a rush, or need to grab something to take home for dinner.

At least once a month I grab $10 shepherds pie to bake at home on a night I don't want to prep.  It easily feeds four adults.

For my money, the best inexpensive eats around.
It is ok, convenient when doing errands. The staff is always friendly, but I prefer fresh sandwiches. 
not a great deal of tables. staff friendly. usual ubway no better or worse than others
I have had several of the soups offered, seafood chowder is out of this world !  I have a booth at the antique mall this restaurant is in, and i always get soup to go.  love love love it
Eaten there for many years now and always enjoy our meals. The soups are delicious, as are the quiches and sandwiches. Friendly service and excellent value!
Stopped here for an early lunch, although they were not quite open yet, we were greeted warmly, offered a menu and drink. We did have to wait a while in the beginning, as I don't think the waitress had arrived for her shift yet. I had a chicken salad with cranberries and nuts sandwich that was delicious and my friend ordered a salad and requested tuna fish be added, which they did.
We were really just thirsty, but when we came in (it's located within an old factory building that houses Sturbridge Marketplace), we decided to have an early lunch.  The clam chowder had just finished, so I had a cup with homemade bread, and a little side of fruit.  Chowder was not at all salty - really full of clams!  The bread was soft and lovely to dip into the chowder.  My husband had a toasted cheese sandwich (3 halves!) and the water in a bottle was icey cold.  I suggest, though, the unsweet iced tea which is brewed just right - no sugar needed.  I wish we had gotten dessert because that looked and smelled amazing too.  Stop there and eat - you will LOVE it.
It was delicious corn chowder on my first visit about 3 weeks ago. And the quiche was good, too. I have a friend that I knew would enjoy the chowder, so I went again with her a few days later. She did enjoy the chowder.
I , however, was very disappointed with my corned beef sandwich. The menu stated corned beef brisket, but the meat did not look or taste like brisket. My mistake was eating the sandwich. I should have sent it back. I asked our server about the meat and she had no answer. Only to ask the chef. Upon leaving and paying my bill I did and he said it was not brisket, it was corned top round like you get in a market deli. His meat supplier had only the top round so he bought that. He offered no bill adjustment for me 
or something to make up for this for a future visit. So for misrepresenting a customer with no compensation, I will not return.
We stopped for lunch the last time we visited Sturbridge and was quite pleased so couldn't wait to go there again on this trip!  While the food was OK (we both had quiche), the waitress must have been having a bad day.  She came to our table and asked what we wanted and I said, "We haven't looked at the menu.  What do you have to offer?"  She told me that when we came through the front room we should have picked up a menu and looked at the "Specials" board.  Well, forgive me - we are not locals and do not know the "rules."  She went to get our menu and I apologized again for not knowing the rules to eat here.  She said "Oh, that's OK" and then took our order but I was a little annoyed at her attitude.  My husband ordered unsweetened ice tea and I ordered Sweetened ice tea.  He got a nice tall glass of iced tea, loaded with ice cubes and a lemon slice.  I got a CAN of Arizona Ice Tea!  Something just didn't sit right with me.  The quiche was good and the gentleman who served us was very pleasant.  It didn't make up for the poor hospitality shown by our waitress.  I was annoyed my husband left a $5.00 tip!
My husband and I have frequented this great place a couple times in the past month.  Everything is so amazing and fresh!!  We drive 40 minutes just to go here! Everything from the soups, salad,quiche and sandwiches are amazing!  You can't go wrong!
The owner, John and the server, Val are so friendly and welcoming!  
The desserts are amazing too!  The pie is amazing!  I finally found a pie crust that is just like the way my grandmother made it!  

You really can't go wrong at this restaurant!  Everything is fresh and made with heart!
Great little cafe, made on the premises soups, quiches, desserts, great coffee too. Had quiche, soup, salad for lunch all excellent. Soups here are exceptional, corn chowder, beef barley and seafood chowder all sampled!
It took this party of 5 adults a few tries to actually find the restaurant within the old mill building. We were really glad we did. The food was excellent and service was too! I had the chicken, walnut and cranberry salad. For dessert homemade peach pie. The waitress was awesome- when I complimented the bread served on the side of my salad she brought a plateful of it warmed and buttered! She offered us take out cups for our coffees with refills. A thoughtful touch! The room we sat in was fun- decorated with many Kennedy family photos. 
Cute place, friendly, relaxing. Ordered a the spinach salad which was very good but kind of small. Peach pie for dessert was good. It would have been nice to have been able to go outside with the food. Location is sad - it's the Mill Building in Sturbridge, which used to be a bustling place but there's hardly anything there any more.
We passed this restaurant when shopping in an old mill in Sturbridge.  We always meant to stop by for lunch but never had time.  Today we went there just for lunch and we were pleasantly surprised.  I had the Chicken Walnut Cranberry Salad and it was excellent.  My husband had the soup of the day and quiche.  Both of us were happy with our meals and would definitely eat here again.
We stopped at Soup to Nuts for lunch on our way visiting family. We had the Chicken Walnut Cranberry Salad and a Crab Salad pita. Both were absolutely delicious... So fresh and tasty! I wish I lived in the area!
OMG. First off, this is the cutest little café I've ever seen. 
Also, the food was amazing. My boyfriend got a salad and I a sandwich. I couldn't even finish, I was stuffed. Phenomenal! The chicken walnut sandwich is a keeper! 
Unfortunately (ha!) it was the first 70 degree day we have had in over 6 months so we did not try any soup. 
This has been the best lunch I have had in a very long time! This place is very cozy and I felt like I was being served in someone's home. The clam chowder was amazing along with the snow crab wrap. The beer from California was recommended and it was great! To end I had homemade blueberry pie which was to die for! Great menu for kids and the service was amazing! I truly felt welcome and appreciated. We will definitely be back. Thank you
Stopped in for a sandwich on my way to the flea market.  The staff were friendly and not pushy.  Cafe itself is very country-homey and very small, but cute and clean.  

About the food:  expensive.  I got the cranberry walnut chicken salad which was delicious.  I wasn't even mad that it was $10 for a sandwich.  Mom got corn chowder (which she loved but I thought was bland) and half a plain chicken salad sandwich (which was also super plain, but she was very pleased).

Would go again, if I'm hungry next time I get to the flea market.  I won't be making a special trip though.
located in an old mill soup to nuts makes great fish chowder and salads .the chowder arrived piping hot with plenty of fish and the salad was freshly made.there are many interesting shops in the building.it was a relaxing experience.
With all their positive reviews I was sure I was going to find a sure fire winner in Soup to Nuts, but was VERY disappointed.  It is very small and cramped ( I didn't find it cozy), the service was just so-so, and my food took a long time to come out.  Once my food arrived, it appeared thrown together and of grocery store quality.  Finally, I thought the portions were small and the prices expensive.
A wonderful, small but very tasty, selection of freshly made soups & sandwiches, etc.  Changes each day! I have eaten here several times and have NEVER been disappointed!  It has so much charm and homemade goodness that I usually eat here when I am in Sturbridge around lunchtime.  I have taken my mother here and a few friends. Very reasonable prices and absolutely delicious food...what more can you ask for!  
Don't be fooled by the size of this cozy, small eatery! Their soups deliver amazing taste...unique, delicious and varied! Loved our lunch stop!
It has been years since I've been here. I met my sister from out of state yesterday with my two daughters for lunch yesterday on a Sunday. I had grown tired of the same old usual places we go to, as we are locals. I was so impressed by the coziness of the set up, the decor of artwork the friendliness, service, the menu and FOOD! The man & woman cooking & serving were so nice & accommodating. (I think owners) They didn't mind when we lingered at our table past closing. We had the specials, including the soups, bread, quiches, salad & brownies a la mode. Everything was homemade & delicious. I offered our compliments on the way out mentioning they had great reviews on Tripadvisor, and that I would be adding mine! Will remember to visit more often!
Since the current owners took over about a year or so ago, the place has gone downhill fast. The only reason we have tried this place was because Jim's Pizza down the street is closed on Sundays, it's just two blocks over and sometimes, we just want someone else to cook dinner. Because of the town's very limited dining options, we had pizza from here no more than 3 times before we decided to stock up on emergency frozen pizzas instead. The crust is ALWAYS under cooked (almost raw in fact and even after requesting "well done" the second time around) as are the terrible quality toppings. I'm not sure how they've managed to stay in business but please do yourself and your belly a favor and walk/drive over to Jim's instead.
Second time stopped here for Pizza.Was better with the former owner.Pizza crust was terrible and toppings no better. Family also thought the same.Not planning on going back...
The staff is great the food is fresh great price
Saturday they have prime rib for 10.99 my favorite is the house pizza
I ordered "Chicken Ceasar Salad Wrap". Fifteen minutes. I get there, theyre still working on it. No other orders, three people, 15 minutes. Ok, so I stand and watch. The girl making it puts about 4 pieces of lettuce on the wrap with her bare hands and squishes it down. Where have those hands been? EWWWW. The other girl asks me if I'd like the dressing on it or on the side. On it, please. Ok. Never tells the girl making it. The girl making it then puts on a little chicken, dumps half a container of parmesan cheese on top, and NO LIE, 4" of croutons on top of that and tries to wrap it. (unsuccessful) So about four pieces of lettuce, a scrap of chicken, bare hands, no dressing crouton "roll" is what I got. GROSS!
We phoned in an order for a take-out pizza with three different topping combinations for one pizza.  They made it correctly and every combination was delightfully good.  They had it ready on time.
Went there with family and enjoyed some fish and chips. Actually all of us had the fish and chip special. The fish was cooked just right. They did give us too many fries (I'm not complaining just stating a fact). The price was fair. Since I don't have much to go on at this point which is why I gave it the rating I did. The ladies who run the place were very friendly. The business does quite the business based on the number of people observed coming into pick up their orders. 

This place has great pizza and subs. The owners are great
and great you with a smile. 
They have a great hamburger pizza. I like it with green peppers.
Any pizza I have gotten there has been good. They have great
subs and their steak sub is awesome. 
There are not many good pizza places around this area and 
this is really the only place I go to because of their steak sub
and great hamburger pizza. 
I've been here a few times over the past couple years. Always get pizza, never tried their subs or other plates. They do not skimp on toppings, I ordered a pizza with extra cheese once that must have weighed 3 pounds! One thing I hate is greasy crusts, and their pizza crusts are not greasy at all. Overall, better than average pizza joint with good food and friendly staff.
One of the few places around that offers a baked fish dinner. Great for that Thursday or Friday take-out.
Subway is Subway. Like most franchises, you get what you expect. It's a small location and there's only a couple of tables. Plan a to-go visit.
Just a quick run to order a grinder to go. It looked very clean . The girl who took my order was very pleasant. My grinder was yummy ! 
Great customer service, very clean. Fresh meets and veggies. Love the breads and dressing choices. They make wonderful salads too.
Good pizza, and good service. It's on the main drag with limited street parking but that's not usually a problem. The staff is friendly and the pizza is good.
Jim and his wife are very hard workers in my hometown. It is a newly built pizza house relocated from down the street.
If your in the area then stop in and enjoy the food at Jim's Pizza. Family owned and the food is very good.  I have tried many different items on the menu and have never been disappointed. From pizza, grinders, salads to appetizers you won't be disappointed. 
The best pizza around this area. Nicest customer service, clean, very welcoming. Fresh veggies in great salads. Calzones are wonderful.
Family gathering.Ordered pizza from Jim's .Good service  the pizza was very good.Family was very pleased .Would go back again
Went twice right after they moved (VERY LOCAL FOR ME) and vowed I'd never go again - nothing tasted good and lots was over or under cooked and were trying to make up for it by salting the heck out of it..
that said, decided they might have it together now and they do!
been 3 times lately - all very good. crust good, cooked well, nothing too salty, all just as it should be. I gave it a very good but that's for a neighborhood pizza joint - it's not the ritz and it ain't the best i've ever had but it's darn good now and if you had a bad experience after they moved do try it again.
btw - they made me a pizza with ranch dressing (many pizza places have these now, but they haven't caught up and put it on the menu) and it was very good - so they will do whatever you want - just ask.
Good servings, good pizza's. Real good sausage grinder. Soon moving a few doors up to a larger building.
Yeah, they are the best in North Brookfield by far. The other is okay, just okay, worth pursuing if Jim's is closed. What p's me off about Jim's is when they take the phone off the hook, which they do.
Hubby and i like totally different pizzas - he likes lots of sauce, i like just a touch - he likes it piled high, i like it so i can taste the crust. they always make it just how we say - tell them exactly how you want it and they'll make it that way - they never mind special orders - some places can act put out if you want stuff not as it is on the menu. i am very picky about my crust and i like theirs. also try their hot wings - hot is the word! eggplant grinders are awesome also.
I used to work at Jim's Pizza for roughly 2 years. The owner Diane is so sweet and kind, as well as her husband Jimmy. I loved working with them both. They will help you in any way if you ever have a problem (not sure why you would though... we never had many complaints), and they show a lot of care for their customers. Every day I worked, the customers always came in happy and left the same way. We always seemed very busy as well... especially on Fridays. I noticed that we had the same customers very frequently (North Brookfield is a very small town so it is understandable) and Diane and Jimmy always came out to give a friendly hello. 

Now... for the food. Love it! I must give props to the subs... everything is precut the morning of buisness and is prepared everyday before opening. All the veggies and meat are fresh. The owners make sure that the freezers are swept, mopped, and cleaned frequently (I remember doing it often :P). I will admit though... the fried food IS pre-frozen. It is not homemade... nor are the meatballs for the spaghetti and subs... BUT... none-the-less very good. I love the fries... mozarella sticks... jalapeno poppers... very good. The Pizza... awesome! The sauce is homemade. Jimmy makes the sauce every morning... he also shreds the cheese every morning. 

The only downfalls are that it's a very small place to dine-in (there are only 2 tables) and they do not deliver. 

But yeah... this place is great. I don't work there anymore because I joined the Navy, but I love this place. The owners are wonderful. I'm not just speaking highly of this place because I worked there. I really did enjoy it. :)
Good food, good prices, great service beware they don't take debit. Had to run to the ATM but was totally worth it!
Went to diner for dinner on a Friday in lent. Dinner offers counter service and also has several dining booths. went in around 6pm. Myself and my wife ordered baked haddock with fries and coleslaw.  My daughter ordered baked scallops. The haddock was cooked just right with crumbs on it. The fries were hand cut and cooked well. The coleslaw was good.  The scallops were also well cooked. All items were flavorful and the portions hearty. Service was excellent.  All this for under $50 (without tip included). How good  is that for a local deal.
Neighborhood diner with freshly baked muffins.  Great breakfast and coffee- nothing fancy, just good food.  Staff are very friendly.  Prices are reasonable
OK, the title of my review might be a little scary, but don't worry.  The Rise N'shine Diner is not a fancy place.  It just has good hearty food at a great price.  It's a common stop for my brother-in-law and myself on a Saturday morning.  I absolutely love the biscuits and gravy.  The portions are big and I never leave hungry.  The clients seem to know each other, so it has a hometown feel you don't get in most places.  I have only been there for breakfast, so I can't comment on lunch or dinner.  Did I mention the biscuits and gravy?
If you are a local in the area or just a passerby on Route 9 in East Brookfield, the Rise & Shine Diner is the stop for you. This quaint little restaurant is more than just a hole in the wall. Husband and wife as well as co-owners Lisa and Herman Reider have phenomenal talent and a love for cooking that truly shines with every dish. Don't let appearances fool you, from the outside it doesn't look like much, but come on in and you will be welcomed by friendly staff, locals, and a few new faces. 

The decor is a mix of Steelers memorablia, inspired from where Herman grew up, and roosters.  

I am personally an Eggs Benedict type of person and let me tell you they have this dish perfected, just the right hollindaise sauce and the eggs are poached to perfection, I find the Irish Benefict to die for, instead of succulent Candian Bacon, there is Herman's homemade, tantalizing, mouth watering corned-beef-hash, yes I did say IT'S HOMEMADE!

Maybe muffins are your thing, well Rise and Shine has you covered there too, Lisa whips up these jumbo homemade muffins that are so moist and mouth watering, with a different flavor to meet your desire, you can truly see the love Lisa has for baking just pouring out of these scrumptious treats. 

There are so many options to choose from on the menu! The Rise and Shine also offers both home-fries and hash-browns to truly accommodate every guests unique preference. 

Just keep in mind when visiting that this is a cash only establishment. 

I drive some distance to eat at this diner because I have yet to find another that even comes close. Next time you are in the area give this diner a try, you won't regret it!
This quaint little "cheers" like diner quickly became our home away from home. We breakfast here several times a week and try not to miss the Friday fish lunch. Baked or fried it can't be beat. Herm always has something new to offer and we have never been disappointed.  Also check out Lisa' s homemade muffins. Yum! Seeing so many of the same faces here says that once discovered, people keep coming back. Thanks ,guys, for your hard work and dedication. 
Awesome family business and the food is amazing.  I love going here for there big breakfasts and variety of food.
this place is a down home out of the way small diner with good comfort meals ..from breakfast to lunch to supper.  Staff is always friendly.  Go there mostly for breakfast but have been there for supper and just as good.
Very good breakfast at a more than reasonable choice.  Ever have a really fresh egg - as in from chicken to flat top to plate?  You get them here.  Not a glamour joint - but a great place for breakfast with homemade muffins too!  
Great food, hearty portions, great service. Homemade muffins are delicious. Ordered the "Lisa's Surprise" muffin; if you can guess the 4 mystery ingredients, you get the muffin for free. I failed, but the muffin was delicious! Will be back! :)
We are very happy with the Rise N Shine diner. Great food. Pleasant atmosphere. We loved the biscuits and gravy. It is cash only FYI. 
Best breakfast in Central Ma. Homemade hash! Try the Irish Benny. You won't be disappointed. 
Friendly staff willing to please. Steve 
Rise N'shine is definitely one of our favorite family diners.    Great value, wait staff is fun, service is quick and the meals quite tasty.      We are regulars there-always enjoy our time.      One nice touch is the candy jar for the kids-my son loves picking out his treat.      

My personal recommendations are the omlettes-lot of choices, all of them good!
This is simply the best breakfast I have ever eaten.  The portions are huge, and the food is amazing.  Herm makes the best pancakes I have ever eaten, and their specials are always great.  The service is impeccable.  This is a true family restaurant, as it is impossible to not feel like you're family when you eat there.
My family had breakfast there on Sunday, Father's Day, and it was awesome.  Very large portions of  to die for food.  All fathers were even given a scratch ticket as a little gift from their excellent waitress.  The waitress suggested the home fries with melted cheese and oh my god it was sooo good.  There were five of us eating breakfast and it was hands down, the best breakfast we have eaten in a restaurant.  We will definitely be back again!  We were also told that they are open now for dinners on Friday.  Might even try them for dinner!
The spouse and I go there about once every couple of months and it is predicable in the best sense of the word. Friendly and quick service, trivia game cards at each table, cozy atmosphere and both the many breakfast and lunch options are delicious. Our personal favorites include the reuben and the waffles & gravy. Convenient location right on Route 9 and plenty of parking. Can't wait to come back!
We had a soccer game early on a Saturday morning in East Brookfield so I looked for breakfast places and this one did not disappoint! There were four families at the table and we all said we would make the trip back on another day!  The atmosphere was great and the food was very good!  And, we noticed they served cocktails...next time!
Great place, the food is always good, from burgers to their specials. Wait staff is always nice and attentive. Never had a bad meal there.

I go here with family and friends. It is a new A-Frame construction with a Cho-Cho Train lofted above. I like EB Flatts on the EB Flats@!
My wife and I have eaten here a few times now. The food has been good in the past but I couldn't tell you about this time because after not being waited on for 15 minutes and watching two other parties come in, sit behind us, get their drinks and order, we left. I don't understand how you can be in this business and forget that you have customers seated and waiting. This was for lunch so it's not like the servers were really busy. We stop by this restaurant whenever we are in the area but we will not be back.
Was working and needed a good lunch. EB came through with flying colors.  Thanks!  We will be back for sure.  :)
We heard about E.B. Flatts on the brochure of the campground we were staying at (Pine Acres.) We wanted to try it out since we were going to a store in the area. 
We were greeted promptly and shown to our seats. The atmosphere was fun and my boys loved the train that kept going around above us. They had fun items in the rafters. 
The waitress was very nice. I had a turkey club with onion rings (hand breaded and oh so good onion rings!), hubby had the Duke Sandwich which he said was good and our boys had good ole mac n cheese & chicken tenders. Would like to try their breakfast sometime. We were happy with the lunch and will be back when in the area.
First time here; were visiting friends.  Sandwiches were excellent!!  Four of us had Classic Reuben, French Dip, Steak Bomb, & Upside Down Chicken Pot Pie---all delicious!  The sandwiches come with fries, with an up charge of $1.99 for onion rings---well worth it!  Delicious New England style onion rings!!!  My only complaint was waitress mixed up two orders & gave me the onion rings.  I thought she would let me keep them as it was their mistake, but they took the two plates back into the kitchen & switched the sides on our plates!  My friend was very nice & gave me half of hers!  We will be back, & I will order those onion rings!
We have been here a few times, and have never been especially impressed - but what happened yesterday (3/26/2015) takes the cake.  My wife and I were led to a table, whereupon the waitress promptly took our order for beverages and a meal of breakfast.  Then waited.  And waited.  And waited.  We observed 2 other parties of 2 who arrived long after us also shown to their tables.  Then in their each turn, they received their meals - whereupon my wife were still sitting waiting for our meals.  I observed the late arrival diners next to us delivered and eating what appeared to be similar meals as to what we ordered.  We then asked for our bill, and left.  To the credit of the establishment, we were told that we didn't need to pay.  As we left, the same clueless waitress suggested we come back in the future.  - Now why would I want to do that?
pleasantly surprised by the food...good chowda and fish was good...service was very slow...I guess the local hicks like to hang there so the pace was slow
My husband and I just got home from our first ever visit at E.B. Flatts. 

I have heard lots of great things about the restaurant, and a colleague of my husband just recently recommended it as well. It is only about 7 minutes away from our house, so I was very excited to try it out. 

Unfortunately, our experience was not the positive, happy one we had hoped for. 

Upon arriving, we were promptly seated by a smiling hostess. The ambiance was pleasant. Warm, well-lit, clean, and eclectically decorated. We were given menus and our drink order was taken - water for me and lemonade for my husband. 

A few minutes after ordering them, our drinks were delivered. My husband, who prefers tart lemonade rather than sweeter, discovered his was SO tart that he had to add sweetener to make it somewhat palatable. He didn’t even get a refill of it, switching to water after drinking only part of the first glass.

Our food arrived fairly quickly. My husband ordered steak tips with mashed potatoes & gravy. I ordered a half-rack of ribs, which came with baked beans, coleslaw, fries, and corn fritters.  

My husband’s steak tips, which he had ordered medium-rare, were cooked between medium-well and well-done . Despite being cooked more than he requested, they were somewhat tender. Unfortunately, they were very bland. Likewise, the mashed potatoes and gravy had no taste whatsoever. They were warm, but that’s about as positive as can be said about them. 

My rib meal was quite large. The half-rack was about 8-ribs, and they had a nice flavor. They were fairly dry and tough, however, and certainly not fall-off-the-bone. The fries were slightly crisp – but almost white. They could have stood another minute or two in the fryer. The coleslaw, while not “southern” coleslaw (I am FROM the South, by the way), was not bad. Slightly sweet, slightly crunchy, but dry and devoid of sauce.

The baked beans and corn fritters were both horrible. The beans were a hodgepodge of different types of beans (kidney, pinto, and a few others) in a sauce that reminded me of ketchup, cumin, and loads of vinegar. It was so acidic that it burnt my throat, and the spices were very one-note. These were not Boston Baked Beans.  They were not Southern Baked Beans. They were somewhere between baked beans and chili, but were lacking to be a tasty version of either. 

The corn fritters – which were boasted on the menu to get a “thumbs-up by Southern visitors” were an abomination. Southern corn fritters are typically one of three things: either they are hush-puppies, made with corn meal and flour, slightly sweetened, with corn inside them. Or, they are nuggets of creamed corn, frozen and battered or breaded, and then deep-fried. They can also be like fried, chunky, corn pancakes, made with flour, eggs, and creamed corn. These were almost like beignets, but with corn, too much baking powder, and – of all the sacrilegious things – cinnamon. They were bitter because of the excess of baking powder (if I had to make a guess), with an overpowering floral, cinnamon (possibly allspice) punch in the mouth. Plus, they were slightly under-cooked, making them very doughy.  

The waitress must have forgotten about us, because she never came to check on us during our meal, either to see how our food was, or to refill our drinks. She finally came by to check on us AFTER my husband had completely finished eating, and I had lost interest in eating mine.  I told her I couldn’t eat the beans or the fritters because they tasted so badly. She removed them from the table but didn’t apologize for them or offer me anything as a replacement. 

She disappeared again, and when she finally reappeared about 10 minutes later, we were able to flag her down and get the check.  We paid the ticket – which was for the full price of the entire meal, despite 1/3 of my meal being sent back uneaten – and when we left, we were not thanked, asked to come back, or even spoken to. 

I called the restaurant shortly after leaving – when my husband told me they had charged full price for everything – and asked to speak with the manager. The woman who answered told me the manager wouldn’t be back in until “maybe Monday”, and from what I understood her to say, they (managers) don’t work the weekends. Perhaps she misspoke, or I misunderstood her, because I would be shocked if a restaurant didn’t have a manager working at all over the weekends. However, if that is true, perhaps that would explain the horrendous service, both in terms of food and staff service, we experienced this evening. 

It is such a shame to have had such a negative dining experience at a local restaurant that we had such high hopes for. Obviously, other people really enjoy it at E.B. Flatts, but from what we just went through, I’m struggling to see why. Sadly, with the experience we’ve had, I can’t see us making a return visit.
We decided to try EB flatts for our lunch today. It was the first time we have gone there and found it to be very enjoyable.  It is lent so my husband tried the fish & chips.  I decided to try the Nantucket baked haddock.  The food was very good , nice and hot and a decent amount that did not have us leaving hungry. I will definatley go back again.
Interesting post and beam construction, lots of mementoes all around to keep the fussiest kids mesmerized (including an overhead running train).Four adults and one child: good food fast, seafood, and pretty decent pulled pork on tater tots. Come early and avoid the crowds.
I had lunch last week at EB Flatts.  It was my first time having lunch at this restaurant.  My family & I have enjoyed breakfast many times, but this was a first for lunch for myself and a friend.  I had the best meatloaf dinner I have ever had.  The meatloaf was not spicy and it was very soft, not hard at all like some that I have had at different restaurants. My friend had a roast beef dip sandwich w/the roast beef juice, along w/French fries and a pickle spear.  She said it was very good, however, it was so large of a sandwich that she could not finish all of it... The building is mostly wooden walls, etc inside..had a train running on the wooden beams up at the ceiling.  A short counter w/about 5 comfortable looking stools for enjoying meals is also in the room.  It's a place that I and my family will definitely try for lunch, instead of always going for their breakfast.  They also advertise the best reuben sandwich around... It's a very clean place; pleasant wait staff, decent menu. Give it a try...you won't be disappointed..
We always go there for St. Patrick's Day corned beef and cabbage - all you can eat! It is delicious. Many other "special" days are celebrated there with a special dish. They do their own baking and have various desserts and rolls you can buy to take home. The staff is always friendly and very cordial, and the prices are reasonable also. The restaurant is a timber framed building that is beautiful inside and out. They have a great collection of antique and period pieces displayed overhead on the timber beams, including a large model train that runs around on the beams - nice touch.
This is just a great place to visit and eat, whether for a burger or a complete meal!
We really like this restaurant, and can think of no dislikes about it.
We stopped for lunch on a day trip but probably won't again. It's clean and nicely
decorated but our cheeseburgers were dripping grease, the lettuce was sticking out an inch or so with dripping grease onto our hands and the fries were way undercooked. 
Everything was slipping out of the soggy, greasy rolls and all the waitress did was tell us
"they're hamburgers" and give us an eye roll as she walked away. There weren't even
any paper towels in the men's room to clean up with. $25 with tax and tip for a mess.
Enjoy eating here. Friendly service.Good food..Enjoyed  breakfast and lunches at this place...Good for the whole family..
Great locals place. Clean, good service staff. Very nice atmosphere. Unique decor, look UP!
Great breakfast specials. Go often.
The food is just ok and my friends and I meet here out of convenience. My friends and I ate lunch with our one year olds today on 9/9/15 (three women and three children). Obviously one year olds make noise. This is a family restaurant. There were only two waitresses working. Of the two waitresses in the building, the older woman (who was not our waitress) was rolling her eyes and audibly saying "ugh" right in front of our table. She even said to our waitress, "I'm glad you have the kids" and they both laughed. I understand children are not everyone's cup of tea, but lady you chose to work at a family restaurant. Her level of unprofessionalism was unacceptable. I tried calling after we left to speak to the manager, but I believe they close right after lunch. Hire people who can be professional, especially if their job is based on being nice to people. This whole experience left a bad taste in my mouth. My friends and I will not be returning. 
Have had multiple disappointments in the food presentation and quality.  The waitstaff are amazing.  The owner is not the nicest person.
I have been stopping here almost all summer on bike rides and would say that anyone traveling Rte 9 has done themselves a great error in not trying out this food stand. The food is excellent and the menu(daily specials) is creative. The price for such fare cannot be matched anywhere. A true gem on the Old Post Road.
A very eclectic place with chili dogs to burgers to Asian slaw!  To be honest the first time I went I thought it was okay because the fries tasted sort of weird and my son said the same thing too. Come to find out they were serving a sweet apple fritter or something so they must have been using the same fryolater for both things. Next time I went I ordered the same dish and totally different taste as fries tasted like fries. --- homemade fries too! I special order fries with pulled pork, onions and cheese all loaded together and it is heaven on a plate. When I go now I order extra Asian slaw as it addictive. If your driving on by slam on the breaks and make a u-turn . 
I couldn't believe the great variety included in their menu. I asked for healthy and got the most DELICIOUS turkey burger I have ever eaten. As I read the menu, I saw at least 3 other items I just have to try. I will definitely be going back with my wife as soon as I can. Great people and great smiles with the service too.
Just came back from Brookies and brought my friend who had never been there. Their ribs were outstanding. She had a burger with onions and bacon and was so big she couldn't finish it. Fresh burgers, not frozen. Their menu is so extensive, you don't know what to pick, Great food, great prices and excellent service. He even brought me a wet facecloth to clean myself up after the ribs. Can't wait to go back. Try them, you won't be disappointed.
Brookies is back this season with a bang. Their porky cheese is what brought me back but their chili & gouda burger are to die for!!!! Delicious!
Steve and I love to eat here so glad they're  open again .the food is so good. Their  hand cut chips are really great. Their big grilled cheese is something to love . I missed this place all winter. 
I went because it is a friends mothers place and will be returning because it's delicious... I had burger which was very large and made with very good meat. I highly recommend eating here.
Stopped there with friends after a Sunday motorcycle ride.  The food is excellent.
I really enjoyed it .. chili dogs are great.
Wow!  You won't beat the food here at any price. And it's got great prices. Don't leave without picking up an order of handcut and fried here potato chips. Yum! Thank you Debbie and Shane for a real culinary delight. Been here several times and am determined to try everything on the menu . 

The food is great, fresh, and well presented. The service was good and the people are nice and helpful. I will deffinately go there again as well as refer a few friends. debi. Great job I knew you can do it 
Recently stopped by Brookies and had their Chicago and Chili dogs respectively. The ingredients were all fresh and tasty and the fresh slaw was also very good. They also had a cool table layout and also a long table in the shade with magazines plus a few games to play. The staff are all friendly and you can tell they take pride in what they are presenting. The next I had to go back to try the firecracker burger which did not disappoint. I was pretty full from the huge burger and only had room for a taste of great slaw, Will be making Brookies a habitual stop in the future.
Tucked away in the flats of EB is a FABULOUS little mini restaurant on wheels!  I had Brookie's "special" recently, which was a roast beef wrap - it not only had lots of roast beef (I couldn't even finish the whole sandwich!), but it had cream cheese, olives, lettuce tomato onions and I think feta cheese  - I am probably missing something but i didn't take it apart-I am going by taste memory.   At any rate, it was ABSOLUTELY DELICIOUS, and came with a side of cole slaw that had broccoli in it and had the best taste (sweet and salty). The meal was so filling, I could only eat half the sandwich.  And it only cost $6. Good, old fashioned homemade food that's made fresh.  What more can you ask for?
I've been there a number of times now and today I tried the Maple bacon turkey burger. OH MY GOD delicious!! Cooked perfectly, right amount of sweetness/saltiness. Broccoli slaw on the side was yummy, and I also got the Ceasar salad. PERFECT!!!!
We live in West Brookfield...went for a ride looking for someplace to eat and made a huge circle through Barre and back through North Brookfield and down Rt. 9 past Brookie's and we said "let's try it"... it was amazing...the food was excellent and the burgers came out with little surprises.  We enjoyed a quiet outdoor lunch and played checkers...in a relaxed atmosphere.  I think all of us can gain something from visiting Brookie's.  Give it a try..you won't be sorry and you will be back.
After driving around looking for a place to eat with my wife, we "settled" on Brookies.  Am I glad we settled!  Our food was fresh and tasty. Our sandwiches came with tasty sides (not advertised)  It is right next to route 9, but is unbelievably quiet. I can not believe this is less than 5 miles from  my house.  We will be back!  Nice job!
Closed Mondays and Tuesdays, but check the pictures at their website. Locals should love this place especially those looking for lunch..  Freshly made food.  I had the Porky Grilled cheese:  pulled pork, light touch of bbq sauce (so not messy), cheese, grilled on sour dough bread.  All I needed for lunch.  Too bad, their brownies looked delicious.  One big picnic table to eat at and 4 seat umbrella table.  Hey, it's a roadside stand, I was thrilled to have a place to eat and run.  I heard people order chili dogs and burgers.  Quality food and preparation so value is excellent.
amazing food......
food: the pulled pork sandwich taste great and juicy
service: very friendly but professional
area: great to eat and go...
THE MOST AMAZING turkey burger!!! Juicy and meaty, delicious! Caesar salad was huge, and the firefighter/EMT/Police discount made it even better!!! I LOVE this place, its a hidden gem in East Brookfield!
Great little Place to Grab a Great Lunch With Home Made Food. The Stuffed Cabbage is Great. Should you be Driving down Rte 9 heading to E.Brookfield stop by. 
The Burgers are so delicious! Very friendly & very filling! The Southwest Burger is just amazing & I love Brookies homemade spicy ketchup! Definitely will be back in the spring when they're open again! :)
Love this place... the local town eats place.  The prices are amazing and the food is fantastic  It is my favorite place to go for a great breakfast.  They do serve lunch and dinner some evenings.
Quick turnaround, plenty of seating. Small place overlooking the water. Diner in front. The breakfast casserole is AWESOME. 
Have had breakfast here many times, never disappointed. A very 'locals' place, which are typically the best. Older building with lots of charm. Back room with windows overlooking lake. They let you linger over coffee. Only issue for some may be the parking. Usually across the street, fairly heavily traveled main road; best to find the crosswalk!
Will continue to visit the Trolley Stop. 
 Tasty food, very good breakfast food fun atmosphere, polite staff If you like places with a water view.this is a lovey place
First time here for lunch. We sat at a window overlooking Lake Lashaway. Very old building, low ceilling but comfortable.  Seating somewhere around 65 patrons including a counter area.  The stuffed pepper soup is a must.  I don’t know what a bowl looks like, but a cup reminds me of a small bowl.  The tuna melt sandwich was excellent with choice of bread grilled.  Great menu, excellent food and service.  Menu prices were very reasonable.
While passing through East Brookfield, my brother and I came across this quaint restaurant and were seated at a window overlooking Lake Lashaway...just beautiful scenery in the fall.  The chef made stuffed pepper soup consisting of tomato, green and red pepper, lots of hamburger and onions and flavoring.  I thought the cup was a bowl since it was so large. It was simply delicious.  We also had a huge tuna melt sandwich nicely grilled with marble rye and sour dough bread.  It brought back memories when I use to work in a small restaurant some 50 years ago.  Do yourself a favor and sample the food yourself.  I know I will be back again for some more homemade soup...clam chowder and corn chowder too.
Went the other week with my boyfriend after taking a ten year break! I was met with the same great food, service and smiles that I remember. Love the omelettes and hash browns!! My only complaint is that it was somewhat watery die to the veggies. 
French Toast from their fresh-baked breads. The best slice of ham I've had in a while. Sit in the back, with the lakeside view. Perfect.
We stopped here at the recommendation of a local. Lunch (burger and a BLT) was good, fast, and reasonably priced. The lunch menu has just the right number of choices and there were 5 or 6 specials for the day.
Love this place, there's always people there for breakfast& lunch. They open at 5:30 am and there are regular customers there that early. Pretty much every day. It can get busy and service may get a little slow at times but the food is worth it   You get ore than you pay for. The portions are huge. And cooked fresh. If you order a ham & Cheese omelet its real ham cut from a cooked ham.  The only thing that I have to say is on weekends the cook needs more time. Not the same as the week cook Dave and the waitress Shannon. They are the best !!   The food is plenty and the price is cheap.   Best place around for the money. Imop. 
Reed D
Been there several times for Breakfast, & Lunch. Haven't had a bad meal yet. Good size portions. They are always busy from 5:30 am to 1:00 pm and have a number of regulars every day. I wouldn't hesitate to send anybody. And the waitress Shannon has a great sense of humour. Always has a smile. And if you sit in the back you have a great view of the lake. And it's  quieter when busy.   
Everybody feels comfortable at Trolley Stop. This restaurant's front windows have a commanding view of East Brookfield's Main Street and it's the sort of place where you can sit in the window and the cook might ask from the counter whether you want coffee to start. The eggs, pancakes, and omelettes are good and the portions are fine. The burgers are good and so are the soups, sandwiches, and other lunch fare.

The back dining room has a nice view of Lake Lashaway. I sometimes like to come here in winter and grab one of the tables in the front window.  I read my paper in the sunshine, have my eggs and toast, and maybe even expect the trolley to stop. Well, there hasn't been a trolley since the early twentieth century, but this place has that old-fashioned kind of quality that brings you back again and again.
My husband and I did the fall Brimsfield event and stayed in East Brookfield, which is not a large place but has a beautiful lake. 308 is on the main road thru town, so it's easy to get to, but we ate outside each time and never noticed the traffic noise. Yes, we had dinner all 3 nights we stayed in the area. My husband was particularly fond of the fried oyster appetizer, which was big enough to be a meal in itself. They had different specials each night; I thoroughly enjoyed the chicken diablo. And then there was the salted caramel  cheesecake: yum. Waitstaff was helpful and efficient, prices were reasonable, and the view, especially from the upper deck, is fantastic. If you get there before 5:30 you'll beat the crowd.
Our family enjoyed the ambience as much as the meal We were seated lakeside at 308 Lakeside., Lake Lashaway, and  were early for lunch and enjoyed Chase Robert and Savannah grandchildren. A speedboat towed a water-skier in the traditions of the lake. We dined alone outside and underneath

This is a spanking new restaurant worthy of your  every culinary and gastronome consideration. Portions were big and I splurged with baked scallops from the sea, summer squash and zucchini Everybody was happy. Chase Robert had a huge hot dog and The Baby Girl feasted on macaroni and cheese Ben and Allison had specialties..including a huge hamburger and a salad to talk about.
This was our first visit back to this reincarnated former Lakeside. The canopied patio seating overlooking the lake couldn't be beat. Great battered fries and half sour pickles accompany the sandwiches.
       I'm being spoiled by all the locally grown beef that is showing up in central MA restaurants. These folks do not appear to be part of this initiative . The burgers are around $10.00, the lack in flavor of the meat is made up for by a selection of ingenious toppings ( pineapple & teriyaki sauce / onion rings and BBQ sauce.
      There's a menu of yummy looking desserts that we passed on - partially because if it doesn't have a price, we've got to assume we can't afford it, but mostly because we were already full. 
      Our server was pleasant and attentive. I get the feeling the wait staff is instructed to "push these dishes today", because dishes from each area of the menu were suggested ( strongly suggested ) by more than just our server when the menus were presented but without us asking for suggestions.
       Lots of interesting items listed on the menu. We'll definitely be back.
My daughter asked me where I wanted to go for lunch for my birthday.  I had been by this restaurant many times before and after the renovation.  Before I always wondered why there were so few cars after it was I need to try it out, it was always so busy  I'm so glad we did!!  We decided to sit out one of the outside decks overlooking the lake.  It was a beautiful out there we had a perfect day. We all ordered fish of some type and were very satisfied with our choices.  It was amazing to have more than we could eat, the servings were good size.  It will be our favorite go to place now, good food at a good price and a terrific atmosphere.  Did I forget to say the service was also very good.
Waitress really could not have cared less about us. Had no suggestions about vegetarian meals. Never came around to check drinks? Not at all pleasant. Food was good but over priced for portion size. Sorry but we will not be back soon.
Stopped here for a late lunch on a beautiful Sunday afternoon. There obviously has been a great deal of money put into this restaurant. Very impressive decor. We were seated at a wonderful table on the upper deck. The breeze was delightful. The view of Lake Lashaway was outstanding. Service was very good. Food was just so-so. I had ordered a special for the day: a chicken pesto sandwich on a cranberry ciabatta bread with sweet potato fries. To sum up the dish in three words-cold and dry. We will likely return for a drink but not planning to eat here anytime soon.
The Location is fantastic, the food, is average at best. More like chain restaurant food. Seems like things are re heated and not made fresh to order. Drinks are o.k., service is o.k..........overall just average with an above average location.
We stopped in this past weekend with great expectations. We left with mixed feelings. The location on the water was exceptional. The sun was setting across the lake, the breeze kept the night very comfortable. I started with the chowder as an appetizer. It wasn't the way I love my chowder but that's just a personal taste. This is not a knock on the chowder. It was very good in it's own right. Tasty and full of ingredients. I prefer a creamy thick broth. I realize that not everyone else does. We both shared the 308 salad and it was very good. Large enough to share and full of great ingredients. The peppercorn dressing was also very good. As I often do when I'm eating on the water I tried the fish and chips. They offer a batter dipped and dry version which I thought was a very nice touch. I ordered the batter dipped and it was just the way I like it. Full of flavor but not too bulky. But I have to say I was very disappointed that the fries came soggy and not very hot. When it comes to fish and chips it only fish AND chips. Ya gotta get the chips right too. That is a knock. The service was good not exceptional. Everyone was polite and attentive but all seemed preoccupied. It was busy but not packed busy.There was just something missing. Like when cooking a recipe at home and when it's done it's good but there just seems to be something missing. We're definitely going to try them again. I've been to enough restaurants to know dining out can be very subjective and a different day can be a very different experience. There are enough very good things here to  give them another try. And like I said the location is exceptional.
The restaurant sits on picturesque Lake Layaway.  There is indoor and outdoor seating.  Either way you will always have a great Lakeside view.  They offer seating at the bar  a television.  Weekends offer light entertainment and valet parking.  All that being said, the food is wonderful with a menu that changes often enough.  Never been disappointed.  One thing, though.  The items  on the menu are priced but if you make changes it can really add to the price.  The mall is kind of a la carte.  Be cautious of that if you  budget conscience.

Wonderful view over the lake, great food and service, moderate pricing.  We had reservations and were taken right to our table, a full bar is available, daily specials and a great menu. We vacation in the area often and this will be on our list to come back to each time we do.
Had been meaning to visit this lace for over a year.  We sat outside overlooking the lake.  Calamari was quite good.  The service was very good.  It was both prompt and attentive.  This was a late lunch so we had sandwiches and no entrees.  The French Dip was very good.  Overall it was a pleasant dining experience and reasonably priced.
A great stop on the main room that offers American classics and new age food. An experienced staff with unique personalities and wonderful stories, make this restaurant stop you won't forget. 
This is a pleasant location with friendly staff, and the food was good, but beware of several things. We made a reservation for the Sunday brunch described on their website to discover that brunch isn't served in the summer. Quite a disappointment. We tried again for a dinner special advertised in our local paper, but when we arrived, we found that the advertised specials had changed. My finally warning is about dessert. We were presented with a double sided laminated dessert menu that looked attractive but did not have any prices.  We ordered 2 different pieces of cake. They were ok, but definitely nothing special and definitely not worth $8 each.
If you're looking for a spot to sit by the water and have cocktails in a nice atmosphere; this is it. I found 308 in Open Table and the reviews and the fact I could make a reservation and it was on a lake, made me decide to give it a try. When we arrived it was busy but we got lucky and they had an open spot on the deck. There is also a large patio area down below and plenty of seating inside. It also has a large and active bar area. The drinks are very generous and the calamari appetizer was so tender it just melted in our mouths. My wife enjoyed her baked haddock and my turkey club was excellent. They also had many other dinner entrees, burgers, sandwiches and pizza. This was a great find and we will return soon!
Traveling from N Brookfield back to our home on the cape, we passed this place overlooking large and beautiful Lake Lashaway.  Service was “meh” - not the best we’ve ever had, but not the worst either, though I’m never happy when we have to sit and watch for a server in order to flag them down for a drink refill, or for our check, especially when the place isn’t even busy.  The menu was fairly comprehensive and we thought reasonably priced, but the food was merely mediocre.  I got one of the specials: Chicken Florentine Marsala.  It came with your choice of two sides, but as most of the sides were potatoes in some form (and they wanted an extra $3 just for a side salad), I made a special request to just have a small portion of pasta on the side with some of the Marsala sauce on top of that.  To my delight, my request was accommodated at no extra charge; in fact, my “side” was served separately in a pasta bowl - so large that I commented to the waitress “This isn’t a side, it’s a meal!”  She agreed.  The downside was that the alleged Marsala sauce was really more of just a beef stock sauce.  You couldn’t taste the Marsala in it, and there weren’t even any mushrooms in it.  (I hate it when I go to a restaurant and taste something thinking I could’ve done better myself - and I’m not a trained cook or have ever been employed as one; I’m just a homemaker.)  My Chicken Florentine Marsala was breaded and fried (which I hadn’t expected), and yet rather bland.  When I asked my husband about his fish and chips, his comment was “I’ve had better.”  The battered fish looked to me to be overcooked, as I thought my stuffed chicken was - but not enough to make either dish inedible.  On the plus side, they do have house wines (Coastal Vines - I inquired) for “only” $6.50 a glass.  My house merlot wasn’t bad, and it was a generous pour.  (If you want to pick your wine by brand, however, you’re going to be paying $8 and up.)  The other thing this place has going for it is the view.  Pretty much no matter where you sit from either inside or outside (we would’ve sat outside had the day not been so hot and muggy), you have an expansive view of the lake.  Honestly, if it wasn’t for that, I can’t imagine that the place would be successful for very long given the merely average quality of the food and service that we experienced.  To be fair, though, maybe we just caught a lousy cook, or a good one on a bad night - who knows?  We would give it another shot if we were in the area again - mostly because of that view.
Good food (including some decent vegetarian choices), nice service, good views of lake, outdoor food seating in a covered porch, clean modern restrooms and a very nice bar are the hallmarks of 308 Lakeside.
For baseball buffs, the restaurant is a stone's  throw from the birth home of Connie Mack.
We would definitely be interested in returning to 308 Lakeside.
We were looking for a place on the water to have lunch on the 4th of July, this place was one of the places that came up. It's a little off the beaten path, but well worth it !! We had the maple bacon wrapped scallops for an app. and it was amazing ! She had the whole belly clams for her entrée and I had the fish taco's, both were very good ! The drinks were a little pricey but they were made well so I didn't mind paying a little extra. The waitress we had was excellent, Michelle, she did a great job and always kept a smile on her face even though the place was very busy. We even stuck around after our lunch to play a few games of Keno at the bar. I would recommend this place, and my compliments to the Chef on doing a great job with the food !!
My friend and I went to 308 Lakeside for lunch and had a very pleasant experience. The view of the lake is lovely, whether you're inside or outside on the deck. My friend had the turkey club, which he said was delicious. I had the buffalo wings and a Caesar salad, which were very good. I opted out of the lobster roll, which was $18. The waitress was friendly. The only drawback I see is parking. Their lot is very small, so many cars have to park on busy Route 9. It was our first time to this restaurant, and we'll most likely go there again.
Met friends there. Its right on the lake. Very nice view. Sat on the deck over looking the lake.They just did the place over, its very relaxing.
Went here for first time with 2 other couples.  Lots of seafood on the menu.  We both got fish & chips, & I was happy they let me substitute baked potato for the fries.  The fried haddock was excellent & not a bad price for $12.95.  Other seafood entrees were at least three dollars higher.  Onion soup was salty & not enough cheese.  Surprised they do not serve bread or rolls while you are waiting for your meal.
Beautiful setting with big windows facing the lake.  May try lunch next time.
Great Soups & Sandwiches, There Daily Soup & Half Sandwich is Great. There half sandwich is more like a Full Sandwich. And you cant beat the Price. Give them a try. 
The Depot Deli serves as a small town (and I mean small) deli and liquor store. They offer home-made baked breads and a small selection of quality chicken, ham, turkey, roast beef or corned beef slicings, salad selections and made on-premisis sandwiches. 

They even have a bologna sandwich, and gosh, I haven't had one of those since I was a kid. Lobster sandwiches are offered a few days a week, in season. (No pastrami, however; got to ask about that.) Several egg, potatoes and other salads are offered, too.

Family run, and everyone says Hello to you if they come out to the front for whatever they are doing.

The liquor selection is a modest selection of beers and a few imports, but mostly wine, with several local wineries featured, and enough of a selection of hard spirits if you need some.

There is a window table and seats available, but if you're more than a party of 4, you're taking home! Take-out is available if you call ahead, or want to wait and step outside to the little town common while you're there. 

My wife and I had several suggestions from friends to go get a menu for pick-up, so we stopped on our way home from a trip for a late lunch meal. Red-skin potato salad, a loaf of home-made bread, a Rachel (a Rueben but cole slaw instead of sauerkraut), and a Podunk Pleaser (marinated and grilled chicken with fresh onions, roasted peppers, etc)

Sandwiches are offered on 6 or 7 types or breads or wrap, and a quarter-sliced half-sour pickle (not bad, not bad at all). They each come in a bento-style take-home box, a nice feature.

Both sandwiches were fantastic. The Chicken had good chunks of meat and slightly overflowed the big roll. The greens, onions and roasted peppers were fresh and the basil sauce quite an added flavor.

The Rachel was fresh mild corned beef, with home made cole slaw and french-tasting dressing. On a marble rye, it hit the spot.

On a busy afternoon, some selections run-out we were told, as the pickles were getting low for available sale, so if you try them out, the earlier the better, just to be sure.

Also for sale is a variety of chicken dinners, all house prepared. We did not try any, but we will to be sure (my wife is a chicken fanatic).

Prices are reasonable, if not great, for the quality. I'd rather pay for a sandwich at the Depot than a chain establishment just a few miles up the road. Pricing is not exactly "cheap eats" but definitely not up to the traditional mid-range, since it is a deli-style environment. 

Their website lists their bill-of-fare, so check it out (Disclaimer: no relationship, I'm just a very satisfied customer)

As long as you're local to the Depot and not looking for a sit-down meal on site, and are willing to stop and pick-up, this place is a hidden-jewel for a sandwich lover in the area.
This is a very nice place to eat especially if you have a group. The inside is clean and modern with a nice bar area. The outside dining is great. It is all covered and you can relax while you enjoy your meal overlooking the lake.
Lake lashaway closed ..it was run down and needed a lot of renovations.  It was completely redone and is now called 308 lake side..fabulous place and great view.
We have had dinner here three times in the the past two years and every time is amazing. Started with fresh spring rolls and chicken satay for an appetizer. Perfectly cooked - chicken tender. Entrees this time were pad Thai and red curry. Waitstaff friendly, knowledgable and professional. Will always stop here when in the Brookfield area!
Really enjoyed this Thai restaurant the crab rangoons were out of this world fresh crispy the restaurant was clean the food was good and the service was excellent

Everytime I go here, its a great meal.  I really enjoy the Duck. Hot fresh and friendy staff.  Will return.  :)
My husband and I are locals and are very happy there is a high-quality Thai restaurant within 15 minutes of our house. The restaurant is always clean and beautifully decorated and the service is very good as well. I regularly get chicken with broccoli,  chicken with cashews, or sweet and sour chicken and am never disappointed. I also recommend the ice cream - coconut, green tea, or ginger. All are delicious. Finally, on a hot day nothing beats some Thai iced tea!
Had the hankering for some spicy Thai after a long hike at Quabbin Park. Fortunately TripAdvisor had this little gem listed and it was on our ride home. Small parking lot, but we easily found a spot. Small crowd inside for a Saturday night. We were seated quickly. Drinks and appetizers served promptly. The daily specials caught our eyes and we settled for those. Food was well flavored, not over done, hot and served with a reasonable short wait. The staff were all attentive and cheerful. We must return here soon with some Thai friends as we loved the food and hope it meets their acclaims as well.
I call the Thai House invisible because there never seems to be anyone there, and its so non-descript you could drive right by it.  But that would be a mistake.  The food here is amazing.  Always hot and delicious.  We very seldom eat in at the Thai House, so I'm rating them on their takeout.  I think many locals must takeout, because like I said, there are never many people inside the place.  It's not because of the food, that's for sure.  Love the noodle dishes, crab rangoon, and everything else they serve.  Our takeout orders are alway correct and the staff is friendly and welcoming.  Try them out next time you want some Thai.  I also hear they serve a killer Mai Tai.  I'll get back to you on that.
If you like a light touch, come to the Thai House. Pad thai, mango chicken, duck and chicken choo......each one especially fresh ingredients and gently flavored. We had one member of our party of four who was new to Thai cooking and found something to like in each dish. White rice was a little dry, but went well with the sauces in the dishes. Wait staff was delightful.
This place rocks. I never see it busy and it's a shame because people are missing something special here. We've tried a little bit of everything and it's always perfect.
I stopped in here on a Monday evening and was greeted by a very nice staff member, Anne I think her name was.  She seated us and was very friendly and overall pleasant.  We ordered the Thai Wontons to start.  They were absolutely delicious!  I recommend them if you go.  I ordered the spicy chicken entree and was pleasantly surprised.  It wasn't unbearably spicy.  It was the perfect amount of spicy.  The combination of flavors was amazing and they blended perfectly together.  This is another dish I recommend trying.  
    Our waitress Anne, was very nice.  She had a friendly and genuine attitude that made us feel very comfortable and like she appreciated our business.  
    If you're in the Sturbridge area I highly recommend taking the short trip to East Brookfield to give it a try.
No parking!! Not a busy place, not sure how it stays in business, however it has really good and very fresh food. Nice little bar with a TV, attentive wait staff. 
We visit the Thai House Restaurant every once in a while for great quality thai food, and are never disappointed. The teas offered here are great and the food constantly tastes delicious! I also love the decor, and the parking situation isn't too horrible. Definitely worth visiting!
Our first visit was a Sunday at lunch.  We as a party of three had our choice of tables, as absolutely no one else was there. No one else except the young hostess / bartender / server...and a young man sitting at the bar who appeared to be her boyfriend.
We sat ourselves, and a few minutes later she came for drink orders, then food orders. Food was very good, portions just right, fresh looking and tasting. Atmosphere pleasant. 
I can only give an average rating because part of a dining experience depends not only on how great the food is, but by how welcomed the staff makes you feel. Sadly, our server did not present herself as wanting to be there at all. She sat at the bar with her boyfriend in between her obligatory delivery of drinks & meals. She had a "just the facts, M'am" attitude, never a smile or a warm comment.   
Would visit again, hopefully when a more "people person" is on duty.
Excellent Thai food, Best kept secrete in Central ma! the crispy mango chicken is delicious! service was prompt and friendly!
The food is very good. For the area it is a different food, and a nice change from Chinese food or pizza. Thai is naturally spicey so if you like spicey you will love this palce
We visit at least on a month, so enjoy the crab rangoons, won ton soup, & the lemon chicken or shrimp. We have traveled to Hawaii, & many other areas & none can compare to our little gem in EB. Ann the part owner is wonderful, with a great personality. She just makes you want to stay.
The food is amazing, I order take out once a week. It is over priced though.. The Crab Rangoons are $6 and it's 5 tiny pieces. They should give more for the price or reduce the prices. I would order way more if it was more reasonable.. Amazing Thai food though!
The mai tai's were delicious, food was great and everything came out very quickly!!! Service was very good, except one waitress had no personality. We will for sure be returning!!!
Always great food, very well prepared. The Thai House Duck is my favorite. 
Prices are very good and portion sizes generous and great for sharing. 
A little noisy because it is so small.
Had some issues the last trip but this trip was back to being excellent.There with a bunch of gals for a lunch after a meeting. The gal serving us was awesome. I mentioned to everyone to be careful ordering the tea as it was per cup and she said it was a one time fee - like a refillable coke - and when i told her i had been charged for each cup she apologized and gave us all free tea all day. Thai tea isn't cheap to make so I didn't have an issue in paying for it but PER CUP was ridiculous. 
The food was great this visit - I got one of the soups - it was great. I was also trying to eat clean (just after NY's!) so I also had the seaweed salad and steamed veggies. The seaweed salad was a nice portion (I only ate half!) and was tasty. THe steamed veggies were just heavenly - hard to say for plain veggies. Done perfectly, very tasty, nice assortment - really was a great choice - hard to be as happy as i was with such a plain dish. She gave me some sweet and sour sauce (that had a nice bite) and i lightly dipped my veggies in it. REALLY good. 
The waitress w
I was very pleased with the entire experience, especially after it seeming to be going down hill a little  - and i WILL be back.
Spencer/East Brookfield hasn't historically been a gourmet eating area, so I didn't expect a lot from the new Thai restaurant.  What a pleasant surprise it turned out to be!  Good food, very well prepared.  We usually get carry out, but eating there is nice too.  The Spicy Noodles is delicious, as are the curries, Spring Rolls, and so on.
A local bar with great pizza. When we travel we like to visit some local establishments. Great people and bar staff.
Great place.  Bringing my family from out of town there this week.  They love the fried scallops and the fish and chips.  Small place but friendly people.  Worth the stop.
Great menu, not all typical bar food and nice choices. Outdoor deck for smokers or to enjoy a nice day. HUGE breakfasts, yummy lunches. Havent been there for dinner
I went there with a couple of friends a few weeks back for drinks and hamburgers.  My friend asked the bartender for a manhattan.  The bartender asked my friend if that was with vodka.  Obviously, she did not know how to make a manhatten.  The burgers were just o.k.   That's not the end of the story, I went there again last night with my husband and another couple.  I asked for a cape codder (crandberry juice and vodka), she said they were out of cranberry juice.  The other woman asked for diet sprite and the waitress said no diet sprite.  Ok, so bring me a sprite.  No sprite.  Ok, so what do you have?  Just seltzer water, diet coke and coke.  For a bar is this the only carbonated beverage?  The guys ordered beer.  We all ordered nachos.  The worst nachos EVER!  with disgusting shredded chicken, a few olives, a few tomotoes, and a sprinkling of cheese all on the top.  Nothing the topping but stale chips.  Then we asked if they had ice cream and the waitress said yes.  The other couple ordered a chocolate sundae and a dish of coffee ice cream. Then the waitress came back and said they were all out of chocolate and there was only one scoop of coffee ice cream left.  They said forget the whole thing and we left.
I will never go back there again.  We spent $30.  What a waste!
We stopped in on Mother's Day on our way back from the Cape to VT. The exterior is kind of plain, as is the interior, BUT we were greeted by the owner upon sitting, he went out of his way to wish my wife a happy Mother's Day and engage us in conversion. His dealings with other customers and employees seemed equally as friendly.

The food was excellent! The fries were great and not greasy as were the onion rings, Chipotle Burger and Ranch Chicken wrap!

I would definitely go back and recommend it to friends and family
I am a connoisseur of fried clams! Recently I enjoyed a clam roll twice. The clams were scrumptious!
I am a squid/clam belly girl.  Because squid has been more affordable for me over the years, I chose something I knew...there is squid and there is squid!  So, I forked over close to $14.00 thinking I would be eating the rest of the suckers for breakfast there would be so many of them!  When I got them, the bag felt like there was nothing in it.  In truth, there was nothing in it other than a pile of nasty pickled peppers which made the tiny handful of minuscule cephlipods soggy.  No tenticules, the batter was insipid the pickles hard and got you in the back of the throat in a bad way.  My Brother and sister-in-law went there went there recently and watched rats racing around the outside of the building.  Avoid this place!
Stopped in for lunch and was pleasantly surprised to find reasonable prices and good fried seafood. Haddock, shrimp and scallops were all cooked just right,not too little or too much. Fries sadly weren't as good. Full bar, inside and outside seating available. Bathrooms are a bit funky but pretty clean.  I'll be back. 
The Clam Box in Brookfield was always a great place to enjoy terrific fried seafood at a very reasonable price until they lost their head chef about a year or two back through a tragic accident. 
After his loss the food was never quite as good and the portions much smaller than usual so we had not returned until I recently saw "New Chef" posted on their outdoor billboard.
I am so glad that I decided to give them a second chance and am happy to report that the food we had tonight was excellent in flavor, quality and quantity. 
If you had given up on the Clam Box I urge you to give them a second chance because the new management has made a wonderful difference and you won't be disappointed.  
The sign says "mini seafood platter, $8.99". Great deal right? Once you go inside to order you find out that platter is only available until 3:30 pm.  Nevertheless, we ordered.  The food was fresh and tasted good.
New management makes this a better place to eat. Food is great in flavor and portions but service wasn't great. Seemed understaffed and slow. Hoping this will get better once the new management gets the hang of it
We used to go here all the time for the seafood, hotdogs and ice cream. Lately there has been much to be desired. The prices went up and the quality and quantity of the food went down.
We received horrible service from the female manager on duty on April 15, 2016 regarding a mistake that a waitress had made the previous week.  The prior week I had phoned in an order and the waitress ringing in the order had accidentally pressed the wrong buttons. My husband picked up the food that night and wasn't aware of what I had ordered, so he didn't think to question the order. When we got the food home, the order was incorrect and not what we wanted, so there were family members that went without a meal that night. I immediately phoned back the restaurant, and the waitress told me to call another time when the manager was there.  I was told that I would receive the item that was made in error, but when I spoke with the manager on duty on April 15th, she rudely told me that she doesn't owe me anything.

Anyway, not the end of the world, but going forward we will only be giving our business to Howard's and Ronnie's.
They have great fish dinners. Plenty of food that is enough to share especially as elderly people  can't eat how much they  serve.
The seafood is good and tasty. The atmosphere is very casual and low key. You place your order at a window when you walk in and get your own beverage. They then bring the food out to you.
We have gone here several times and will continue to go back.
We've eaten there several times and never had a complaint.
It's a place to eat that serves OK seafood and that's about it.

We have been to the clambox many times and had great food. This time not so much. Ordered the large platter to share. Very few  clams, small shrimp, teeny tiny scallops, thin little piece of fish. Tons and tons of fries to make it look big. Could have gotten a better meal anywhere. Tables were dirty and tippy. Don't use the bathroom either. They have a cleaning checklist but it has not been used. Used to be one of my favorite places to go on a Sunday ride but not any more. Very expensive as well.
Its ok. The ice cream is better than the food. Prices are steep, reminiscent of clam shops along the shore, but not quite as good.  
The clam box has been in my town forever.  Great seafood ...elaborate menu to pick from.  The ice cream is the best around.  I have family coming from NY and they can't wait to go with me again.
We have been saying this for a year.  SO sad...we use to make this a frequent stop.  in the last 6 months  it has been old scallops, brown soup (because it was in the crock pot all day).  The haddock has gotten thinner and more $$$.  Just not worth the time or money.   Even the ice cream is way over priced and skimpy.  Save your money and skip this one.
This is the first and last time we will go to the Clam Box.We waited 50 minutes for our food to come out.Several other tables were complaining about the wait too.The food was not worth the wait, my daughter and husband had a hamburger, both said they were dry, my son had the fish and chips (his favorite) and couldn't eat the fish. I had the clam fritters and chowder. The clam fritters were great, the chowder was just o.k. the potatoes were hard. There was a sign out front advertising free soft serve on Fri & Sat. After 8:00. 3 young men were at the window ordering soft serve, they were told that the size they ordered wasn't free ( the sign didn't specify a size) they had to pay for it. When we got to the window they said they were all out of soft serve(strange coincidence...) we refused to give them any more of our money, we left and went to Dairy Queen. Absolutely disappointing experience.
My husband and I go here at least once a month.  We always get the seafood platter (the large one) and it's heaping!  We always have enough left over to bring some home.  Price is good for the amount of seafood you get and it tastes great!  Cooked just right.  

I really do wish they would bring back the breakfast buffet though.
The restaurant is just casual, but the food is the best we had in East Brookfield.  We were there five days, and we ate at the Clambox 3 times.

You can always tell when a restaurant is good by the number of cars in the parking lot.  The more cars, the better the food.  The Clam Box parking lot was full, so we stopped there for lunch.  If you are looking for a place where a server will come to your table, this isn't it.  (You order your meal at the window, then waitstaff will bring it to your table.)  If you are looking for a place where the food is good, reasonably priced, and the atmosphere is different, go there.  This is the only place I have ever found fried lobster.  Yummmmm!
Prices of seafood have gone WAY up.  My companion wanted the 2-way combo, any 2 fried items for $18.99, but fortunately was told when ordering there would be a surcharge of $4 for the clams and $1 for the scallops, skyrocketing the price to $23.99 so he opted out.  He then asked the price for a whole belly clam dinner and was told $28.  What??! He again opted out and settled for a baked dish that had no surcharge.  I ordered Athens baked haddock and they both came out in aluminum tins, which was not a problem because after all this is a drive-in.  Be aware everything you eat off of is disposable: plastic plates, plastic utensils, paper cups.  The baked dishes were only lukewarm and cold by the time we finished.  The Athens haddock has spinach and feta cheese and I’ve had it at another of their restaurants and it’s very good.  At the Clam Box there was not a speck of feta cheese to be found in the dish.  Fish was tough around the edges, as though it was microwaved.  As mentioned before, there were all teenagers/young adults working there.
The floors were sticky. There were flies everywhere which was really gross. The place is dirty and dated. The food was ok and the service was average. We bought the fisherman's platter and split it. This was enough for two. The whole belly clams were lacking bellies, the haddock was good and the scallops were blah.. little bay scallops. The clam chowder had little to NO clams.  I can't say enough that this place was dated, dirty (mops, brooms, behind the bar in plain sight) and not up to par. This place has really gone down hill.
If your looking for fried clam plate either with bellies or strips, this is the place to go.............my husband and I went there on Sat, 8/20, and I knew the plate was going to be to big for me so I ordered the boat (which is smaller)...........the fried clam strips were heaping over a bed of fries.  I only touched a few fries but devoured the clam strips.....I did order a side of cole slaw but found it to be too much mayonaise.  I think next time I'll try a side order of clams, that would be a perfect size.  My husband ordered fish and chips and found alot on his plate.....good meal for the price...
My friend Jimmy took me out for a meal. I was amazed how great the fried clams are...twice! On Route 9 and convenient
Picnic style and beach feel but not at the beach. Used outside dining was a bit small and building provided some shade. Drinks are inside self serve. Alcohol available. Appears to be mainly beer. 
I got a luncheon special of fried seafood platter for $9.  It came with 2 fried clam strips, 1 shrimp, a few mini scallops, and 2 small fish chunks with some fries. The batter had no flavor and the service not great. We were 1 of 3 people there and they messed up our order and didn't give us our chowder.  My husband's sandwich was a rueban and didn't have much flavor and was fatty. There are definately better places to go for seafood than here.  Portions used to be much larger. Quality still about the same.
I love fried clams and The Clam Box did not disappoint. Large serving of hot and tasty clams with delicious fried onion rings and slaw on the side.
My last visit there was very disappointing.  Food presentation and quality was awful and over priced.  Not going back,
Its ok, mostly fried. Relaxing atmosphere. Offers great ice cream!! Lobster rolls are ok, but small. Its worth driving up the road to Howards for their lobster rolls instead. 
You have to try the seafood chowda! Fish sandwiches, clams, excellent. The chowda is great! I never thought the food would be this good from a small place. Don't look for atmosphere, it's a casual family restaurant. Oh, if you want a beer, there is a bar.
I used to look forward to visiting the Clam Box whenever I would visit my family in the area, but this last time the food was nearly inedible. I ordered fried clams and scallops and they were greasy, cold and tough with the breading totally falling off. The coleslaw was DRENCHED in mayo to the point of being sickening. Not sure I would ever go back, which is a shame because it used to be so good.
Stopped at this quirky little drive in hoping to catch some decent seafood. Lobster roll was way overdone and pricey. Hotdog was ok. Not sure how fried stuff is as this is not my style 
This is the best Dunkin' Donuts around.  They are so quick and efficient on a daily basis it is amazing.  In addition to that fact, they are consistently pleasant. Sometimes
it just coffee but getting it right is important, and they do!
The service is good, the drive through is very odd and seems to cross into driving lanes in the parking lot depending on what time you  go. the service is excellent though
I go to this location almost daily for my coffee, always fresh, rarely has grounds in it.
The girls are generally pleasant, but don't always move too quickly.
Regular subway menu, with those low calorie options as well. 
Fast service, in and out.
Courteous staff. 
Sandwiches are fresh with lots of ingredients to pick from, service is good and friendly, & the place is clean.  We eat here about once a week.  I especially like the flat bread for sandwiches.
I don't think much needs to be said about the food, most people have eaten Subway before, offering subs of all kinds at a reasonable price.

The staff here is super nice and friendly and this location has a wonderful owner that I have had the privilege to meet on several occasions. So if you want Subway and you are in the neighborhood and have a choice between this location and the Leicester ones, choose this one! 
Their presentation is gorgeous but their sushi is average. Anything else, don't bother. Order only sushi and thei other item are not good. We didn't eat anything we ordered but the sushi, a lot of money wasted.  
Most sushi lovers in the area frequent Kaizen in Sturbridge and it was difficult to not compare Yamato to Kaizen.  

Both places create extensive variations around more traditional sushi servings.  However, Yamato has a much more extensive Chinese menu than Kaizen and in that regard rivals Jasmin in Auburn.

One thing I don't like is when the main course is served immediately on top off the appetizer. You could argue that since the main meal was all room temperature sushi, that it shouldn't matter, but I felt rushed.

The crab Rangoon filling was good, but the large shell was chewy. 

The iceland volcano was flavorful, but oversized, as were the Dragon Balls (yep, that's what they're called).

Drinks were reasonably priced and well made.

Decor is warm and inviting and service was good and everyone was pleasant.

I will probably try them again.
Went to Yamato for the first time just last week.  Wow...What a change in decor from the last place that was here.  The decor is stylish and tasteful.  Tried the sushi and it was very good!  I love sushi, and I'm picky about it.  It needs to be fresh,  and it was.  Also tried the fried rice, and crab ran goons.  Everything was done just right and delicious.  I'm happy to have a place for good sushi right in my hometown.  I will be back.
First I'll start by saying my wife and I frequently visit this place. It WAS our favorite place since it opened. We always went to Kiazen until this opened since we live in town. We have raved and brought many guests with us, but tonight was a total turn off. I understand that it is busy but we were sat and no one approached us for 25min. The tables on each side of us got their order and drinks immediately.  We got up and left and no one seemed concerned. A simple "sorry we're busy" would have kept us sitting but we didn't even get acknowledged. 

My wife and I have spent thousands eating here and are typically recognized by staff. I guess we will drive the extra 15 and go Kiazen were we have never waited more than a few minutes for service.

My wife and I went here with another couple.  The place is nice and modern.  Everyone liked their dinner.  I have dined at many Japanese restaurants around the world and it is my favorite cuisine.  I will go back. 
Went there recently for a Saturday afternoon lunch - was able to order off the lunch special menu at 3pm which was great.   Party of two - unfortunately I forget exactly what we each had but it was a great entrée with a side of crab ragoons and fried rice.   The ragoons didn't have much crab in them but they were crispy and good - and if you think about it - not many crab ragoons have much crab in them !     The two entrees were very good - although they both had the red pepper indicator on the menu to indicate they were hot and spicy and they were not so much that we were pounding down water to quench our mouths.   More on the mild side.    

This is a redone Chinese food buffet place that has been completely remodeled to the more current upscale Japanese style with the dark wood - large nice bar etc.   Sort of reminded me of Feng Cuisine but less hectic !

We were one of only a few tables that afternoon but I think that goes to more the town of Spencer not supporting the Japanese restaurant in the middle of a hot June Saturday rather than the food and service.    We'll be back !
What a surprise and a treat to have such an AMAZING culinary experience in Spencer!!! The food is incredible, especially the Peace Roll...to DIE FOR!! Wait staff (Jenna with the brightly colored hair) is attentive, sweet and quick. I have started making this a once-a-week adventure, sooo much better than going over to Sturbridge or Worcester. Better prices, not to mention the Happy Hour specials from 3-6pm!!! GREAT prices on select sushi!!
After reading several positive reviews we decided to try this very attractive new place.  The young waiter was certainly trying hard to sell how great everything was.  That actually should have tipped me off that things were not to go too well.  We had gyoza which were exactly like the ones I get frozen at Trader Joe's.  The other appetizer we ordered was the spring roll - there were two of them - a very stingy portion.  They were good but also very reminiscent of the frozen food aisle.  My husband had a medley of spicy rolls.  One type was spicy the others were not. I ordered the Fuji roll which was described as salmon and yellowtail with tempura shrimp.  It was a mess.  A pate of some sort and a non tempura shrimp were rolled in dry tough "sushi rice".  Disgusting.   I have never had a special sushi roll that I didn't like.  I have now!  We will never return to this place.  It was really a disgrace.
Do not try the soup, tasted like dish water and gave me awful stomach issues next day. The dumplings were okay, rice okay. The place seems very clean, although the water glasses looked like they bought them from the dollar store next store.
Went for dinner with our daughter around 7 on a week night, not expecting it to be too busy. The extensive bar took up the left side wall, followed by a row of tables, a double row of booths where we sat, followed by booths along right side wall.
It took a good 15 minutes to get a soda & 2 teas. We never got requested water, & regular forks (chopsticks only at table). We ordered Beef & Broccoli, Beef & Pea Pods, & a Chicken & Broccoli. Simple. We got the 2 Beef meals about 20 minutes later, waitress telling us she'd be right back with the chicken for our daughter. Another 20 minutes later, my husband went to the Hostess stand, asking about our order. Several apologies & finally she got her meal, as we were finishing ours. They offered 10% off bill; think they would have done better since they had opened recently & should be trying really hard to make good impressions.
Quality of food & price was good. Now the matter of the atmosphere:
The large bar, so close to the tables had a group of women who were obnoxiously loud. Just when we thought they were leaving for good, they'd come back from apparent cig breaks! One woman was constantly making comments to people sitting at nearby tables, who obviously did not know her. They continued to order drinks & shots, while they were obviously over intoxicated & disturbing customers who were trying to eat. One woman clearly announced that they'd been there since noon---(by now it was at least 9pm) & said they were going to be "regulars!"  
Hopefully the service kinks will be worked out. But unless they handle their bar patrons more judiciously, we won't go back. We recommend if you do go, request a booth or table on the opposite side of the room, away from the bar.
This bistro is a new restaurant to the area that looks like it is straight out of Boston. The staff is excellent and attentive. If you like shrimp tempura you are going to love theirs! The sushi is absolutely delicious. The hibachi is top notch and their Dinner Bento box is delicious! I highly recommend trying this restaurant.
I have known the Spadea family for decades. This fast food servs the region well. My Mother used to compliment Joe on his 'clean restrooms!"
One of the best McD's in area. drive thru open 24 hrs. Very clean, large building. Play area, party room. Staff always friendly. Lots of locals go & sit to visit & have coffee. 
 
First of all McDonalds is my favorite fast I have had. Also has a big play area for kids. Very nice staff. I love the fries I don't why but their always good.
They are doing it right and also expanding to handle the crowd. Good breakfast, fast friendly service and super special offerings weekly. Worth checking it out!
I travel a lot and I always pass by Charlie's Diner. The parking lot is always full of customers. Today along with my sister, we stopped. What a wonderful atmosphere. Waitress was very friendly. The service was excellent and the experience was terrific  to want to go back again. We placed out order. I had the Fried coconut shrimp with a spicy plum sauce and a cup of chowder.delicious. My sister had a omelet made to her liking and she loved it. I can't say enough about this place. But I would highly recommend stopping in. You won't be disappointed.  And by the way. Coffee was hot and worth a second cup.
Good food in the original breakfast diner side, or the dinner & supper dining room side. 
Great service & prices are good.
First let me qualify, the above title. Charlie's Diner really is a diner, I think, hauled in from Worcester and a wonderful piece of history. it's complete with diner style food, all day breakfast and very reasonable prices. Because of its popularity, the large nondescript addition has been added with a bar. As of this writing Charlie's is also building a function room. So the historic diner is nearly lost with the new construction. the good news is, that you get the same down home cooking and reasonable prices where ever you decide to sit. If you're looking for history sit in the diner. If you're looking for simple food at reasonable prices sit anywhere. If you're looking for a fancy night out go elsewhere. I'm sticking with Charlie's. though.
My husband and I go here at least once a week. The food is homemade, they always have specials, the prices are great and so is the service.  We have never had a bad meal here.  There is a full bar if you choose to have a drink with your meal.  They also offer 5 or so meals called "Manageable Mouthfuls" for people who can't quite eat a full meal and these are at a lower price.  We never have room for dessert but I am sure that dessert is as good as the rest of the food.  We highly recommend this restaurant.
They have just expanded because there are so many great meals and service in 
this restaurant .
Parking is easy and not far from the front door.
If your on the Mass Pike or live in the central MA area you would do yourself a BIG favor visiting this classic dinner. Truly authentic, original diner. Ask to sit in the original diner section. It's a great step back in time. The food is your classic diner fare but of extremely high quality. The chicken soup is a rich chicken broth with real vegetables and plenty of chicken. My main course was the 'Worlds Best Meatloaf'. Have yo honestly say it really IS the worlds best. Not to bready not to dry. A light tangy tomatoes spread on top. Accompanied with outstanding homemade gravy. Super efficient servers and always with a smile. Bonus...inexpensive for such a high quality meal. A true value. Well worth a visit if only 15 minutes from the Mass Pike!
I like Charlie's for breakfast Old Charlie makes it interesting for all. Few restaurant enterprises have the ambience Charley offers.
Unbelievable Menu, huge portions, very quick service and always a full house but worth the wait! Lunch is also very good and wait staff very friendly .
If you are ever in Spencer, MA you have to go to Charlie's Diner.  The food is fabulous, reasonably priced, the restaurant is cute and clean, and the service was great.

My daughter had the meatloaf with a choice of two sides.  A few of the sides were mashed, fries, rice, broccoli...there were several other choices as well.  She said it was very good. 

Hubby and I each had the roast beef sandwich with fries.  We were offered a choice of bread (about 5 choices) and we each chose a bulky roll.  There was also a choice of cheese.  The sandwich also came with lettuce and tomato.  So...this sandwich was not the typical roast beef sandwich.  Normally when we order a roast beef sandwich it's sliced deli style meat.  This was real roast beef that didn't see a deli slicer.  It was delish! The fries were fresh, hand-cut fries....yummy!!

The bill came out to about $35, including tax, for the food, a soda, and an iced tea.  I wish Charlie's were closer...it would become our go-to as it is for the locals.  

Do yourself a favor if you are in the area and stop in.  You will not be disappointed!!
Went with friends. Everything was very good. Mashed potatoes were red potatoes. Sirloin tips were cooked just as I ordered them. For a diner this isn't that bad. I would go another time.
I've given this place a few chances, especially when other places are closed and my friends came to my town to visit and get breakfast.  Terrible service, dry food but a decent atmosphere.  Kind of a shame really. 

I did visit last summer so maybe it's improved.  So much potential.  Learn from Kenwood.  Or get Gordon Ramsey to give you tips.  Sorry for the bad review.  I wish things were different.
Tried Charlie's for the first time with my partner with both of us ordering the haddock and chips. The fish and chip were done perfectly. The coleslaw was different from the usual creamy dressing but that was great also. Service was quick and efficient. We will certainly visit again.
They are getting too big. They used to serve the best breakfast. We loved it but it seems as they extended, they go too large. They wait staff was lacking and food was poor. We won't go back. 
Charlies is a family friendly place to eat. They have a nice menu to choose from. Food is delicious and cooked to perfection. We love to eat here. They are price friendly.
Cozy, fun restaurant featuring a top notch menu, excellent atmosphere,  friendly down home staff and some of the best prices in the area.  Highly recommended.
On a recent visit to Spenser, MA to check out a wedding venue nearby, we stopped into Charlie's Diner to grab breakfast. We were not disappointed. Everyone reported that their meals were cooked perfectly. 

Our waitress was attentive, filling up coffee cups before we needed to ask. 

Reasonably priced, we will definitely need to stop in again to try lunch next time.
Made another visit to Charlie's this past Friday , April 29,2016 and were greeted warmly by Holly (one of our favorite servers). Ordered a martini (made perfectly) and draft which was delivered promptly and decided to sit for a moment before ordering. The specials board was appealing with Prime Rib, Baked scallops with haddock , ect for specials . The menu has many choices from sandwiches, salads, burgers as well as home made in house entrees as turkey dinner , pasta's , meatloaf, soups and daily weekly specials. We chose the queen cut prime rib and English battered fish and chip . Both were excellent . Prime rib cooked perfectly as ordered and quite generous for a reasonable price of $15.95 . The fresh haddock and chips, $9.95. Both delish . They offer smaller portions for the fish and chips for $6.95 . Both options a steal . Entrees come with choice of two sides that range from fresh vegetables to salad, hand cut in house french fries , baked potato , coleslaw, onions rings. You get the idea. All and all , two dinner entrees, two draft beers and one excellent Stoli martini , Bill totaled $46.00 . A great meal for a great value. These people care as do their staff which with out them , could not do it all . So if your looking for a local , consistent , friendly and comfortable place to go , give Charlie's a shot . I however have been for breakfast and was not so impressed with that and probably would not return for that. Dinner however is my favorite.
Great little diner in Spencer. This was our first visit. We were a party of six on a Tuesday evening. It was quite busy but we were able to be seated within 15 minutes. The waitress, though busy, was great, we were pleased with both service and the food. Great atmosphere!
service was horrible ..food was not good...owner was an jerk...thought it would be like Worcester location but very disappointed
The coffee is outrageous. There breakfast was amazing. Fresh ingredients and original recipes.  Will return if we come back to the area.
Great country store, with really nice bakery, fruits and vegetables. also have apple orchard, pick your own. They have artist loft with a nice collection of things for sale. Pork products, especially the bacon and the pulled pork, are awesome.
We love Outlook Farm! Whether you are looking for a delicious sandwich (Try the Happy Hog or John Wayne) or a tasty breakfast, Outlook Farm is a great place to go. It has a cute shop attached with lots of fresh and local produce and goodies from MA. The meals are very reasonably priced as well. Definitely worth a stop!
Homemade baked goods,the best meat,fresh veggies,and breakfast and sandwiches. Delicious! All locally grown and home bakesd.
you order food at counter and then pick it up.  restaurant in middle of a country store.  quaint rural atmosphere.  food was good.
Outlook Farm is the only 'game in town' so it is a go to for many locals. The sandwiches are basic, baked goods do not deliver (except for the pumpkin whoppee pie with a cream cheese filling), but their pork products are fresh. The market seems to be experimenting with more local gourmet items which is offering hope. In general their priced are high and eatery service slow.
Outlook Farm has something for everyone: farm stand, grocery, restaurant, and local gathering place. The employees are friendly and helpful. A true taste of the Pioneer Valley.
Went for breakfast with a gent who uses a walker.  The people were friendly.  Had to order at the counter, but they did bring it to the table.  The scrambled eggs were runny, the sausage was hard, dry and fairly tasteless. On the other hand, the potatoes and toast were good and the coffee was excellent.
Straw Bale Cafe at Hanging Mountain Farm serves really good breakfast. I haven't been there for lunch sobcan't say how lunch is. But I've had breakfast there probably a dozen or more timed and I've only had one meal that was just so so. (And I think it was just an off day because I've eaten the same thing (baked oatmeal) many other times without complaint. 

In addition to the usual breakfast fare they serve some creative and delicious treats. The aforementioned baked oatmeal, baked eggs (a concoction that includes cottage cheese as well as other ingredients) and us just plain yummy. For those who can't decide among the many options they allow you to pick three as a combo plate. 

They make their own maple syrup on the premises and don't charge more for it (any restaurant in new emgland that does is just plain nuts).

My only demerit is for value. Breakfast can be costly. Today's pancake breakfast for four with coffee set us back $70 with tip. That's a little rich but I think they jacked  the prices for the maple sugaring tourist season and expect when the regular menu returns next week that the prices will moderate a little. 

If you are visiting Northampton MA a trip to Hanging Mountain Farm's straw bale cafe (constructed from genuine straw bales) is well worth the trip off the beaten path. It's a quick detour from downtown 'Hamp. The owners couldn't be nicer or more proud of their great restaurant. 
We had an order of the pumpkin bread French toast that came with toasted coconut and maple butter and and order of the blueberry pancakes and both were delicious.  So many blueberries! And the pumpkin bread French toast was really yummy. We had an order of the hash which was tasty. Excellent decaf coffee.  Great service and reasonable prices.
This was a quaint little cafe on a farm. Nothing real fancy but the food was great! The service was great well. You could eat in or out, weather permitting. The prices were very reasonable for the quality of the food that was served! Everything was nice and fresh! I will return again! 
How to eat a stack of delicious pancakes with all the trimmings, including maple syrup fresh from the sugar shack in the yard and not feel guilty? we walked there and back from the outskirts of nearby Florence, a long trudge through the woods for our brunch. but definitely worth every blister.  wonderful building, great story, super people, excellent meal and we even got interviewed for the local paper!  would i do it again?  you bet!
First, this is an interesting strawbale building with family history & devotion. Interesting reasonable breakfast options with gluten free options or egg free choices. Great people.
Eat outside in season.
Breakfast for two.   We decided to take a drive to the country to break the normal routine of the usual breakfasts we normally enjoy.

The Strawbale cafe, is a labor of family love, rich with history nestled in the hills of Westhampton on a farm.   The decor is quaint and warm.   The dining room reminds me of a huge family kitchen.   Real maple syrup is made on site as with other kitchen provisions.

The food is farm fresh, but they are missing on a few things and this is why they are getting a three.   When you have everything in place, the atmosphere, history, ambiance, character and a real maple syrup shack...why, would you skimp on bacon?!  It was razor thin, tasted awful and reminded me of something from a fast food joint.   

Everything else is fresh.   Kale, eggs, pancakes, toast....

Although staff is friendly, the lack of waitressing experience is apparent.   Not listening to our order, I had to correct and repeat several times, only for the order to come out wrong.  I'm all for high school kids to have a job, but make sure they are qualified, or at least have the drive.

Meals were priced appropriately.

I like this place, it has potential but it needs to have problems corrected.

Last visit for some time.
Great location and interesting history. Hidden in Westhampton, Strawbale Cafe a great place to relax and enjoy a weekend breakfast! Service and atmosphere was friendly and welcoming. It was our first visit, but we are sure to become regulars. Highly recommend a visit!
subway is a good restaurant for grinders but same at all subways. i don't order from them much. i'd rather get my grinder from Paisano's.
Great service,,,good value...very clean restaurant...  This is the cleanest Subway that we have been in...the staff care about their service and it shows!
I was visiting my friend and she had a coupon for foot-longs at the Subway.  So, we went out in the rain and were surprised to see that we weren't the only ones at this small Subway.  We got three foot-longs, and even though there were multiple substitutions on one sub, they took it all in stride.  The counter people were particularly friendly.  They were also one of the few Subways that I've seen that have swiss cheese as a selection.
  If I'm ever in the area again, I'd gladly go back there again.
ate there several times food is good. good selection on menu, mainly italian and greek food, good portions.
Sounded good  and we were on our way home from a lovely day on the water
A wide menu to choose from  but  it all seemed the same thing just rearranged on the plate with a different sah of parsley
The steak was so so       okay  it is an Italian restaurant    the wedding soup had a tomato base and no spinach      a different part of Italy ?   the  veal portion was large but just average    the sausage and chicken combo   unappetizing and my  chicken florentine  inedible     the chicken pieces so rubbery that the knife couldn't handle them   ( dinner had definitely been nuked  ) when I explained this to the waitress she said  it was an ongoing problem and she could have them remake it with grilled chicken  The waitress was the best part of dinner       the restaurant was not  busy so the kitchen was not backed up      with so many  places to eat in the area I think they should lighten up and the decor and cook dinner   not reheat the food in a microwave
Oh  when my second dinner came out the food  the plate  everything was so hot steam was coming off the course    ire of the chef or the microwave again ??
We have eaten here before and the food had that reheated leftover taste  then too   hoping for the best  this time   but 2 strikes and you are out  !!
This was our first time visiting.  We decided to try lunch and were very pleased with our meals--chicken parmigiana, pasta with a delicious sauce, salad and bread sticks.  You know that moment when you take your first bite of something new --a mix of anticipation and trepidation--what if I don't like it? What if it isn't prepared well?  What if...?

I needn't have worried. One bite and we were in chicken parmigiana heaven!  Everything was perfectly seasoned--the sauce in particular had a wonderful depth of flavor.  Portions were generous.  Service was prompt, courteous and friendly.

My only complaint is that the dining room lighting was too low--it was difficult to read the extensive menu. But don't let that stop you.  Go. Now. Enjoy!  

Excuse me while I go eat my leftovers.
Went here for lunch with two friends and had a great Italian meal. It's a casual place, but the food is excellent. I had more than enough ziti and enjoyed it again the next night at home!
A couple of things have happened at Paisano's during our last visits.  Last September, we had reserved the back room for a celebration of my Grandson's baptism.   When we arrived, the room was dirty, not set up for our event, we waited a very long time for the pizza that had been pre-ordered for a specific time.  They sent back a single server who tried his best but was clearly in over his head.  WE cleared the dirty stuff out, went out and got pitchers of soda, had to request napkins and more silverwear --- sharing out an inadequate amount of pizza until they could make more --- all around disappointing.  (and no, the facility was not particularly busy).
Then, in December my husband and I went in to have dinner with a gift certificate we had been given.  Within a five minute period, they brought out our salad, appetizer and meal -- in that order.  The waitress was trying to make room on the table for three sets of dishes.  Our appetizer was hot so we felt the need to put our salads aside (which should have come after the appetizer) in order to eat it first.  Before we had even eaten half our appetizer, our meals arrived.  When we said something, our waitress said, "I know, this is kind of quick" but didn't take them back to keep warm or anything.  To make matters worse, I had ordered a clam strip dinner (something I had ordered many times there in the past).  They were so over cooked that I couldn't break them up chewing and I choked twice.  It was like eating rubber bands.  They were dark in color and simply overdone.  By the time I was able to get the waitress's attention and say something, my husband was just about done with his dinner.  The waitress heard me out and ten minutes later came back with an older woman who tried to get me to have "the shrimp, it's really good tonight".  By that time, I had finally finished my salad and most of my appetizer and said no, just the check is fine.  She (older lady) stood there arguing with me, trying to get me to order something else.  She finally walked away.  Our waitress returned with the check and apologized, saying that she took the clams off our bill but was told to charge me for the salad I had eaten.  Whaaaa?  Poor customer service, all the way around.
Every meal is consistent. The prime rib is thin and often chewy however. Stick with the pasta dishes.
We dropped into Paisan's for lunch last week and were given a surprise when reminded by our waitress that their by one lunch from a selected menu and any other lunch item was half price. Along with that surprise reminder the lunch items we had were great. Waitress was very friendly and helpful and atmosphere was enjoyable. It was a great stop after a morning of running errands.
We enjoy eating at Paisano's. We usually are there at lunch time. The prices are fair and the servings plentiful.We recently stopped in for lunch with a family member from out of town. My sister in law stated the burger she ordered with fries was the the best. We usually have left overs that we get to enjoy at home.The salads that come with meals are large and fresh.Pizza pick ups are another way to enjoy their tasty food.
I have been going to this restaurant for 15 years or more.  Each year it goes down hill a little more. I have always enjoyed their salads because the are fresh, not something out of a bag that is fruity.  However, in the last few months I have been more disappointed than usual. First there is the cost of everything which has climbed substantially over the years. Still, we were going there several times per week because it was convenient.  The staff is a mixed bag. Some of the servers are good but some are terrible.  One night I ordered a steak medium rare.  It arrived very well done.  I was starving so I ate some of it while I waited for our server to come and check on us 20 minutes later. I politely told her that it was quite over cooked. I told her I was going to eat it anyway but I wanted her to provide feedback to the kitchen so the next person would not have the same problem. She was fine with that but returned a few minuted later with Chris (owner).  He said he was told my steak was over cooked but because I ate half of it he wasn't able to do anything about it and if it was that bad then I should have told my server about it right away. As I said, I didn't want him to do anything but his response made me angry.  I told the waitress the very moment she came to check on us (my husband had already finished his meal.). Also food quality has declined.  Twice baked potatoes are sometimes almost frozen in the middle, Scrod tastes like ammonia often. I just learned that this is a sign that the fish is old - no more fish for me at Paisano's!  As another reviewer indicated, I too get sick frequently after eating here but when I eat here at least twice a week for a few weeks in a row I don't get sick again until I cut back on the frequency of visits.  I have to say though the things that get me most upset lately are the following. My father and I go here for lunch occasionally. He typically orders off the lunch specials menu but because I have dietary restrictions I do not. Because the specials are buy one get one half off, I order the second special to go and take it back to work with me for my husband's lunch. I was told that I can't do this any longer as specials are dine-in only.  Additionally the servings at dinner are large so my husband and I would ask our server to just package our salad course to go because we couldn't eat both that and our meal in one sitting but now, get this, there is a $2.00 charge to get your salad to go.  Seriously?  They charge $18 for our entree plus our overpriced soft drink which would come with refills if you get one of the good servers and they want to charge me $2 for a box that probably costs 25 cents.  It seems as though they are adding a charge for everything now, even sour cream to go with my fries.  If baked potatoes come with sour cream, why doesn't a $5 order of French fries?  I guess I should just let go of my hope that it would go back to being the restaurant we enjoyed so much years ago. I was delusional to think that my customer feedback, no matter how pleasant I was about it, was ever going to wake them up.  Oh I almost forgot, the girl sitting up by the kitchen at the register spends most if her time flipping her long blonde hair or pulling at the ends to remove all of the loose ones.  Bon appetite!
I love this place! I've been here many times and usually opt for the chicken parm. I never even finish half of it at the restaurant! You also get free bread and salad with the dinners. The last time I was there, I got one of the day's specials- salmon salad. When I got my meal, I was shocked to see a huge piece of salmon sitting on my salad. Again- leftovers! Hope to be back soon.
Planned a party in the back room. The owners were very considerate. Everything could not have been better.....food was great and the waitress was exceptional!
My family gets take out pizza here every few weeks for the last 15 YEARS. It is consistently great. 
We drive 80 min round trip for this pizza. Have tried closer, but always disappointed. The sauce can't be beat! Try the Greek pizza w red sauce. Yum! 
This family restaurant is always super busy and they are probably overworked. Be nice. 
We were in search of pizza and found Paisano's. Lucky for us, we hit it on the Monday special, which was a buy one large pizza get the second one free offer. We ordered a meat lovers, a pepperoni, a hamburger, and a pepperoni/black olive/mushroom. They were all excellent and had plenty of toppings - no scrimping here. The iced tea was good too.
I stopped going to Paisano's over a year ago because of the food but my wife still liked the chicken ceasar salad so she kept going there.  Today she stopped in and took home a salad for lunch she has been very sick ever since.  She learned her lesson and will never be back. To bad years ago Paisano's hade great food. 
Eaten here a number of times and the last time was about a year ago, sorry to say it hasn't gotten any better as fare as their dinner meals are concerned. No wonder on Tuesday night it's buy one dinner and you get  half off the other diner.
I guess that says it all, when you need to have specials like that to get customers in it says a lot about the food.
Had the Veal saltonboco and it was just fair.
Think it will probably be another year before I'll be back, maybe !
Had read that the service was bad,  and orders were often wrong,  but decided to give them a try anyhow.  Ordered the chicken marsala to go,  drove the 20 minutes to get there,  paid the rather expensive price of $18. For the meal,  got home. ..no salad which was supposed to come with the meal,  no bread. .. just $18. And 20 minutes on the road for mediocre at best chicken marsala.
They did offer to give me my salad if i wanted to make the trip back there,  but that wasn't happening. .. nor will we be back ever!   AVOID THIS PLACE, the fact that they don't even have a menu on line to look at should have been enough of a clue,  and combined with the poor reviews i had read, I shouldn't have given them a chance.  Hope this helps the next person not to get ripped off and disappointed.
Paisano's doesn't look like much from the outside, but was very nice inside. Service was great and they offer a large menu of Italian and Greek dishes. Portions were large and reasonably priced. Would definately go back to Paisano's if I ever find myself in the area again.
Honestly I don't get what the big deal is. Mediocre Italian food in an old fashioned style dining room. Pizza is heavy on cheese, thick on crust and the sauce is sweet for my taste, but the buy one large get one deal is pretty good. Just nothing special.
Long overdue review for our New Year's Eve experience @ Paisano's. We stopped for a small bite to eat and found a set menu for the holiday. We split the steamed mussels in garlic white wine sauce, split the twin seafood stuffed lobster tails, baked potato and ordered an extra salad. What an amazing meal. So delicious!!! Rest assured we'll be at Paisano's next year as well. Our new "go to" place for the holiday.
Paisano's is a mixed bag. Some things, like the vodka rigatoni with chicken or the alfredo, are very good. The chicken gyro is also pretty decent. But the pizza and calzones are just so-so, and some of the grinders are just plain boring.

The food is usually cooked well, although the hamburgs or hamburg grinders for take-out often are done pretty rare.

The place itself is kind of dark, and although we get takeout a couple of times a month (not much choice; Southampton is a small town), we haven't actually eaten in the place itself in years.
Unfortunately, not 5 stars. More typical of the basic strip mall Chinese one finds all over America. 

Beige, boring General Tsao (who'd a thought?) even. Fried appetizers with thick boring crusts...again, really?

Sadly, really.
Wife was having lunch with a friend an I decided to have Chinese so I went to West Lake Gourmet. I was not disappointed with my curry chicken with onions on brown rice. They brought out hot green tea along with duck sauce and Chinese chips while my lunch was being prepared.
We order takeout regularly.  Other reviewers are accurate regarding  recent changes.  There is new ownership; very friendly, no complaints there.  The food is still delicious but when we ordered about a week and half ago there was a noticeable change with the chicken fingers ( different batter & smaller).  We also noticed the egg rolls aren't the same either.  We had tried ordering on Memorial Day and thought they were closed for the holiday then learned they're not open on Mondays at all anymore.  That meant we had to order from another local Chinese restaurant that day, which was very good, too, but we still prefer Westlake.  The other restaurant was more reasonably priced but  we're still willing to pay the extra cost for Westlake, though time will tell.  It would be nice if coupons were available.  (Love that they offer brown rice; hope that doesn't change).
Excellent food.  Family owned. Very disappointed they decided to close on Mondays. Luncheon specials served til 3.
GOOD Chinese food,  great deals on luncheon specials. Owner operated,  friendly,  best we have found in the area. .. we take out often,  our order is always correct and ready fast.... and good.
Westlake used to be a favorite stop. It has gone through some ownership changes and what I see is less food portions, higher prices and food not being piping hot.
Good sized portions for what you pay. I live in Northampton and this is one of my favorites for Chinese food.
Really love the dumplings and orange chicken. Great, funny staff that keep the night full of laughs and excitement! Awesome food but they should deliver more! Would definitely return. 
LOVE THIS PLACE!! Love the people running it, the women behnd the counter, and the waiters and waitresses. The food was sooooo yummy! One of my favs!!!
My favorite Chinese restaurant around!! Great value, especially the luncheon menu! West Lake looks like the average Chinese food restaurant from the outside, but with no msg, generous portions, and kind owners. The worst thing I could say about West Lake is the atmosphere is average, except for the chandeliers; they add a unique energy to the room.
Great food and the owners are incredibly nice. Have never had a bad meal there and the prices are great. Get the lunch specials and eat 2 full meals from them. Yummy!
My husband and I really enjoy this restaurant. My favorite is the string beans and beef. I do not care for their fried things such as the chicken fingers. However, I do think they have very tasty crab rangoons. For some reason, we find that the food always tastes better when we eat at the restaurant than getting take out. The atmosphere is average. The people/service is always very good.
Visited last week, Feb 2016, and was greatly disappointed. The meals came to the table at different times. I ordered the baked fish. The fish was good, but the peas and corn were disgusting. The baked potato came to the table well after all the other food, had clearly been cooked in a microwave, and was still underdone. The only reason I gave this 2 stars instead of 1 is because my mom's fish and chips were very good and the mac n cheese my kids ordered looked good. So I will hesitate to go back. On the plus side, our server was quite pleasant. Perhaps next time we'll just stick to their pizza. Below I said poor value because poor food is never a good value.
The husband and I have been here for luncheon at least once a month over the past year.  We've never had a bad lunch or poor service.  

There is a special dish for each day of the week in addition to the usual pizza, subs and sandwiches (including good gyros).  One of my favorites is the Chicken Alfredo with Broccoli.   A standard offering is a $.99 small cheese pizza with any entree.  Since I normally can't finish my dish I get the pizza and a "to go" dish for my lunch - voila! We have dinner for the night too.

The owner occasionally comes out to see how things are and is a nice guy to chat with.  
It's not anything fancy but I have got take out quite a few times and our family has been happy... My favorite is the squash ravioli.
I called to order pizza and lady didn't even ask me pickup or deliver so I asked if they deliver and she said yes but to pickup would take 15 mins. deliver would take 45 mins. and I was very hungry so I said I will pick up. I was there in 15-20 mins. and there seemed to be some confusion about my order and lo and behold my pizza never made it to the oven! The "owner"? came out and said he would bring to my house in very heavy accent. He was very insistent about it. Lady walks away to take care of dining-in customers and leaves me standing there waiting to pay for my order. Finally comes back and I pay for my order. Let me just say the "owner" did apologize and the lady sort of apologizes but is not very professional in handling this situation. I drive home with no pizza. Half hour later doorbell rings Different man delivers my pizza (he gets no tip). The pizza toppings were good but the pizza dough was NOT cooked all the way through. I feel like they should've offered me a free meal next time or discount or maybe a free apetizer for wasting my gas and making me wait even longer! I will not be going there again.
Not a week goes by that we don't make it there at least twice.  Love the owners, staff, great food, huge portions and we have met so many amazing people there.  It's a place where "everybody knows your name."
New owners have made this a regular on our dining out options. The menu isn't fancy, but the dishes are well prepared. Kids love the pizza, can't beat the 99 cent deal. Service is always friendly. Decor is dated mauve, but comfortable enough. This is where we come when we don't feel like cooking, but don't want eating out to be a big deal. Come eat here and spread the good word so they stay open!
Daily specials are quite the value!  For $5.99, it's a full course meal - and believe me, you'll have plenty of leftovers.  Sunday's special is Chicken Parm...which I ate for left overs twice.  Staff is very friendly.  Great family restaurant.
There is a bar section of the restaurant.  If you go after 7pm on the weekends, expect it to be a little louder than usual.  
They do have delivery and is within 40 minutes.  Their wide range of menu items will satisfy all.  I would have rated higher, but the restaurant is older and could use updated decor - but all in all is clean.
Daily specials are an excellent value ($5.99) Quick service. Keno and a separate bar area.
 Plenty of parking. All the meals are very good. Large party specials (10-60 people) 
 Catering available.
Our server was soooooo sllllooooowwww last time we were there, we both said if was ever that bad again, it would probably be our last visit. It was that bad again tonight.
I've managed a restaurant on Cape Cod, so service is very important to me.
We are heavy tippers when service is good.
While the kitchen at Glendale Grill never fails to send us GREAT meals, our servers always seem to have had more important things to do than occasionally checking in on their tables.
Tonight, we finished our meals at 7:00 and wished to pay our check and head out. We waited for a waitress to come into the dining room until 7:15. When one did, I flagged her down and asked for the check.
She never returned.
At 7:30, I had to ask the Hostess for our check.
It took until 7:40 to pay our check.
I left the "server" a ONE dollar tip.
A friend of a friend recommended it, and on an evening when my wife was away, I popped in solo for dinner.  I sat at the bar on a quiet evening and enjoyed good service and delicious food.

All right down the middle.  A local draft Fort Hill IPA and meat loaf.  The entrée was a generous slab of tasty and moist meat, delicious whipped potatoes, and very flavorful in-season yellow squash.  

I skipped all the before and after stuff, but will be back before you know it, with my wife, for the full treatment.  Cocktails, a starter, an entrée, and coffee and dessert.  I saw many, many interesting things on this menu.  Right down the middle small town good food, nice friendly staff, and a clean inviting atmosphere.  What's not to like?
Second visit for another satisfying meal - great flavor, price, service and super clean environment! Service staff are on point.  The option of lounge or dining is so helpful. Tonight the lounge was buzzing with friendly conversation from high top tables and the bar. The dining room is more mellow, has booths and tables. The decoration is minimal but suits the environment with wall colors setting a soothing backdrop. It's really all about the food and good company. 

My friend had the Sunday night $10 special - two boneless park chops with buttermilk mashed potatoes and the day's seasonal veg- zucchini & yellow squash with onions and accents of red bell peppers. She has become a regular and attests to consistently high quality and flavorful dishes.  The bar provided her cocktail in a generous glass and with a fresh garnish. 
My meal was the Surf and Turf special, easily modified for my food restrictions.  
Everything was done to perfection! 
Cheryl bakes all desserts in house, perfect to top off your dinner or lunch. 

Check out the website for specials and the day's $10 entree.  It's a terrific neighborhood place with fresh, quality food at a great price. Relaxed and casual, with an elevated menu.  Check it out!

After reading all the glowing reviews for the Glendale Grill my boyfriend and I decided to give it a shot as we've tried most restaurants in Easthampton and were on the lookout for something new.   We were not disappointed and will definitely be returning!  We sat in the large lounge area (there's also a dining section) and were impressed by how how friendly and attentive the staff was (Kelly, our waitress, was fantastic!).   I loved the cozy and relaxed atmosphere and the cleanliness of the entire place.  The food was great - I ordered the muscles and got a heaping pile along with french toast/garlic bread that was really tasty.  My boyfriend chose the soup of the day (bean and bacon) and after the first scoop (slurp?) he was ready to order a pot of it to go!   Although he just got a basic burger he said it was quite good.   While I didn't try the cheesecake or stuffed mushrooms I can't wait to give them a shot - the cheesecake looked very light and fluffy (Kelly told us that most desserts were homemade by a staff member) and the mushrooms were huge and covered with gooey cheese.   They looked perfect and I'm getting hungry just thinking about them!   All and all a nice restaurant that's off the beaten path but well worth checking out.   I have a feeling we are going to be regulars!
We heard that the chef(s) from The Hazard Grill had opened a place of their own when the Hazard closed. We finally found it ! They do such a great business despite the location. It's out in the country on a residential neighborhood. The service was good (we sat at the bar). Fried oysters as an appetizer were outstanding and I followed them up with fried clams that were equally as good. I liked the atmosphere for the most part. They could have done without the one man band who was trying his best to entertain.
I go the Glendale Grill when I want a good meal in a short amount of time. I prefer the atmosphere in the bar to that of the dining room. The service is always very good on the bar-side and you can  have a cocktail and play Keno! Their salads are excellent. I love the homemade blue cheese dressing. There's quite a few different items on the menu and there are usually a couple of specials as well.  A fun place to hang out and watch sports and get something good to eat.
My husband and I recently went out for dinner at the Glendale Grill. We started with a superb jambalaya and a beautifully presented goat cheese salad.  I had the coconut crusted cod with amaretto sauce with a three cheese risotto. It was out of this world. My husband ordered the blackened catfish and he too was thoroughly impressed. Our server took the time to chat with us and was attentive as well as knowledgeable about the entrees. A wonderful dining experience.
Our group of 4 couples ate here at the recommendation of a friend. My meal (one of the specials) of coconut crusted cod with amaretto sauce and three onion risotto and asparagus was an unusual but pleasant combination. It was one of the best meals i have had this year. Also, ordered the house-made cheesecake which was light and fluffy, not dense and delicious. All in our group were happy with their meals. Our server was attentive and offered to replace the sangria two of us ordered, expecting red, not their summer sangria. Both of us kept it. We were not rushed and enjoyed our time at the Glendale Grill!

The Glendale Grill is a locals place with decent food and a good bar to hang out. 

The food is good but not haute cuisine.  Full size portions will take care of the heartier eaters.  

Its located away from the center in a neighborhood and that's what it is.  A neighborhood place with local food and drink, a hangout without being a dive.  


Good service, nice atmosphere, great TV's for sport watching. Food is good, I had cheese burger, my husband had a tuna melt. They both were very tasty. We come here mainly for lunch and enjoy ourselves.
Not sure why we have not tried this local spot before.  I guess maybe because it is not on a main road.  It is nestled in the middle of a neighborhood and we almost drove right past it. 

We ate here on a Monday night and it was quite crowded.  (Note:  Most of the other Easthampton eateries are closed on Mondays.)  I got a Caesar salad and a side order of fried clams.  I was happy because I wanted clams but I didn't want to get french fries and coleslaw.  It was pleasant to have the option to get them as a side dish.  My husband and his friend liked their food, too.
Went for dinner on a Sunday night with my wife and 26 year-old daughter. I would describe Glendale Grill as a family restaurant with friendly wait staff. Our food was delicious - as good or better than any high-end restaurant in a big city - but without the high prices and pretentious attitude. 
Stopped after a hike at Arcadia Audobon site. Very slow day, only a few people. Great patty melt, fries were perfect. Small selection of draft beer but nice mix. Had a few BeHoppy's. Delicious. Bartender was very nice and attentive. Price was very reasonable 
My wife and I dined at The Glendale Grill last night and we were both pleased. We split a fried oyster appetizer and it along with the dipping sauce were delicious. We both opted for the Chicken Parmesan special at $10 and well worth the $. 2 pieces of tasty garlic bread accompanied our entrees and they were excellent as well.
The server, whose name was Jonathan, was very attentive and accommodating. We will return to this venue in the near future
I had the pleasure of having lunch with my husband recently. The service was friendly, helpful and prompt. I had a fresh fried haddock ( w/ 2 thick pieces of haddock) sandwich served with cheese, lettuce & coleslaw, and fries. Food was hot & delicious as well as reasonably priced. Wonderful experience!!!! Highly recommend
My wife,Grand Daughter and myself ate diner here on Wednesday March 2nd. Our waiter was friendly and as fast as the kitchen allowed him to be with the food, it was served with everything hot !
The food was very good, I know we'll be back for their specials again.
Had lunch with my wife at the Glendale Grill today and was literally astonished with the unbelievably great tasting food, as well as the superb service and comfortable atmosphere in which to enjoy a great meal.  Bring your family, friends or just go solo.  Their daily special are fantastic and competitively priced.  We'll be back there soon.
We visited Grlendale Grill again and had another great meal!! I had the fish and chips and I can actually say it was one of the best fish and chips I've had. It was very light and crispy. The fries are coated and crispy. My husband had the catfish jambalaya and he enjoyed it as well. The house wines are very inexpensive and they are good pours. We will definitely be back again!
We like to go on Friday nights when there is always someone playing music there. The atmosphere is good and the menu is diverse.  The specials are really good as well.
We were on our way to our daughter's basketball game and decided to stop for dinner. The service and the food was wonderful!! Very nice pours of house wine for $5.00/glass. We will definitely be back - no question!! Mary Kate waited on us and she was so friendly and knowledgeable about everything on the menu.
Hubby and I went here for Date Night. Delicious Oktoberfest, Bloomin' Onion, steak & stuffed shrimp, fried scallops. Everything tastes good here! Hint: 1/2 price apps at the bar, I believe most nights!
I went there recently with 4 other ladies for lunch.  I chose the lunch special Ribs which were juicy and well seasoned.  They came with the vegetable of the day, mixed zucchini and summer squash, and mashed potatoes.  The veggies were totally fresh, well seasoned and not overdone!  The mashed were good but the veggies were better.

The other ladies had scrod and the rib eye and there were no complaints about the food.  Service was quick and efficient.

I had mentioned that I would probably need an extra napkin to serve as a bib and the server brought me one.  Can't complain about that.
Opa Opa is my all time favorite restaurant. The Rib eye steak is fantastic. The service is excellent as well. In the winter, the atmosphere is cozy with the big brick fireplace. Highly recommend the restaurant if you are in the area.
So we have avoided this place for while, but decided to try it with a groupon (which didn't work on the day we visited). I feel like we wasted our money on the groupon because we definitely won't come back. The salad was the best part. It was fresh, but small and boring. My husband ordered a ribeye and said it was no seasoning at all and was the toughest piece of meat he has ever had. I had the mistake meatloaf. It was weird tasting and had a strange texture. The mashed potatoes tasted like instant made with sour milk. The gravy tasted like a Marsala sauce. And our server was relatively slow. Just bad experience. 
Steak you can cut  with your fork   Opa Opa  is a casual fun steak house
Not fancy but that is not what we came for    we wanted   steak   and steak we got with delicious soups salads and  potatoes
The menu has lots of choices and maybe someday I will try something other than the steak        the people I go with often get the prime rib and the seafood  platter or the  shrimp     but the steak is so tender and tasty that I stick with that
Wait staff accommodating and friendly
The place gets busy   so if you are going for the 1/2 price on Tuesdays go early
Nice brunch on Sundays also
i've eaten at Opa-Opa many times food is excellent, good service and good portions a little pricey but you have a great restaurant in cowboy and indian decor. enjoyable experience always had good meals and large selection on menu. 
From the time we walked in through the shabby door with knew this was not going to be what we expected.  A mutual friend recommended that we stop at Opa Opa for an early Sunday dinner on our way back from a wonderful theater performance at the Chesterfield Miniature Theater but wait, that's another review. 
Given the name, we were not sure if this was a German grandfather's place (one of us studied in Germany) or a dish smashing, line dancing Greek place (one of us was of Greek descent), we were all taken back that Opa was a steakhouse.  
The steak was good,  if not great. The salad was fresh,  great gorganzola dressing. The waitress was very young,  a bit unsure but pleasant.  
But the bathroom...the hall to the bathrooms smelled of urine. They bathrooms were littered with paper, the sink hadn't been cleaned for a week or so,  and the stench of urine was pervasive on the hot and humid day we were there. 
In summary, decent food, not well maintained.  I think the owners must come from Western part of Greece because the decor is not "white stucco with light blue trim" Greek but "dark, old wood" western.   There were cowboy images everywhere and a bar seat with a saddle. No Opa dancing here,  cowboy. 
Had read reviews and was so pleasantly surprised. Food was good (burger and salad) and the beer was delightful. We ate at the bar and met the owner(manager). So friendly as were all the workers. My family really enjoyed it.  Loved the blueberry and strawberry beer!
So so, nothing great the food was not bad just had little issues (steak was good roll was hard) had about 5 small steak fries with my sandwich. I would definitely keep driving if it were me and I would not return here again unless the locals say it's improved. 
Our family decided to try the restaurant today and we're pleased!  The Southwestern Salad was delicious, as was the Camelot burger.  The kids enjoyed the Chicken Parmigiana (lunch portion was definitely plenty of food) and the chicken wrap.  The fries are quite good too.  We will be back!
Definitely do not recommend this odd place.  The food is not good and the beer is nothing special at all.  Not sure what the cowboy / Greek theme is all about, but it really doesn't work.  Worth skipping.
Service was great but the food was not.  We had lamb dishes and the meat was well cooked but could have been warmer.  The vegetables were soggy and cold and the fries were the same.  We had a blooming onion as an appetizer and it was all batter and little onion.  Cocktails were weak.

The bright spot was the desert.  I took home a chocolate mouse which was delicious.

What happened here?  Opa Opa used to be an extremely pleasant place to eat where the food was good and hot and the venue was somewhere special to go to.  Not so much any more.
Our family of 4 went for dinner. This was our first trip back in awhile but I remembered how much we loved the great meals we had there in the past. The pros: Our server was friendly and attentive and the place has a fun, western theme going for it. We had bacon wrapped scallops as an appetizer that were really great! The cons: the steak fries that were a past highlight and still on the menu have been replaced by typical fries you might find at Friendly's (and they were undercooked). Mind you Friendly fries are fine but when the menu advertises one thing and you get served something sub par it's a let down. We didn't enjoy the change to the burger presentation either. They used to be served on something like Texas toast; thick, buttery,grilled pieces of bread. This time a typical bun. Again ok, but what used to be a go-to place for a unique great burger and fries meal was like anyplace else. Also, the kids meal didn't come with a side or a drink. Seemed a bit pricey to not include something other than a bowl of mac and cheese.
The Staff is was friendly, once busy the staff was working many tables and you did not see them until the check was given.  Drinks were very good, the 4 dinners were just average if that!  Two orders of Roast Beef, if you want on fish dishes they did not off broiled only fried, the beef was not what we expected, cooked correctly but the beef had no taste.  Prices were fair, they do a very good bar business.
I live nearby and stop by Opa Opa every now and then with my wife or one of my boys.  The food is always very good.  However, I have to say that the brand new burger specials they came out with since I've last been there are fantastic.  If you stop in, try the "Juicy Lucy" Burger.  Amazing!  My son got the "Roadhouse" burger (again...off the special burger menu) and he loved it too.  They're huge and delicious.

While we were there, the manager stopped by and chatted with us and asked us what we thought of the new burgers.  Fantastic!  

I encourage you to stop by, sit at the bar, and grab a draft beer and burger.  They have a big selection and make the majority of the beer themselves.  I recommend the Red Rock Ale.
The place is a down home restaurant that offers good food and beer at fair prices.  Whether you want a simple salad or a great ribeye this is the place.  Great specials and great staff
I don't know how Opa-Opa wins accolades for best steakhouse in the Valley. In the past I have gone here maybe once a year because someone I was dining with wanted steak and to eat locally, but I will never go back again.
Salads were basic but inedible as it was drowning in the gorgonzola vinegrette. The 12 Oz prime rib was cold, dry (I ordered it medium  rare), tough and almost flavorless. Two of us ordered baked potatoes as sides and both came out hard. The sautéed vegetables, a mixture of zucchini and summer (yellow) squash was overdone. 
The worst part of the meal was watching one of the waiters sneezing into his hands multiple times and then going ahead to set tables in his entire station and carrying oil and vinegar bottles right back to the prep station ALL WITHOUT WASHING HIS HANDS. The next time we saw him he continued to work on his tables all while he was eating a loaf of bread and putting it on down on the table between bites.

We stopped to try out the restaurant because of the brewery. We were seated quickly and our waitress was very pleasant. They have a wide selection of beer and we had a few questions that were quickly answered and a sample was brought to make sure we would be satisfied.
We chose their fish special. The scrod was broiled in a dish with a lot of butter. Small portion but enough for what we wanted. Rice pilaf and summer squash were served as the sides. Everything was served hot but was not seasoned at all - very bland. The price of the meal was reasonable.
Went with a friend. (1st time there) He ordered us a round of their IPAs which were pretty darn good. Our goal was to stay for a few drinks and get an early dinner. I hadsome questions about the beer, and the bartender was really nice and let me taste a few before I decided on another beer, I believe it was the Imperial IPA, which was also good. So when it was time to order I started out by getting some sweet potato fries, and just before I could order the meal he suggested the hog wings. I told him that I was pretty hungry, and the wings were considered an appetizer. He just said "trust me". So the food came and he was right. We got way too much food. You actually get 3 wings, but these are fall off the bone pork butt looking ribs. They were truly amazing. I don't know if it was the beer or the fries, but I could only eat 2 wings. I took the other one home and ate it later that evening. These were some of the best wings (pork) that I ever had. I highly recommend this to anyone.
Had a very good meal at the Opa Opa Steakhouse-not steak, but chicken parm. My dish arrived hot and piled high with spaghetti and 2 good sized pieces of chicken. I couldn't finish it. My brother had the rib eye and said it was also very good. Our waitress, Heidi, was friendly and knowledgeable. I have 2 negatives on an otherwise great visit-it was hot in the restaurant and meal was served too quickly. I would have liked a little more time between courses.
This ice cream stand is extremely overpriced with average soft serve at best. If you are going to spend this much money on ice cream, do yourself a favor and go to Mt. Tom's for the real deal!! 
A great summer stop for soft serve or regular ice cream. Our favorite is raspberry soft serve. Even when there is line, it seems to move quickly and the service is always friendly with the young staff, who greet you with a smile.
Know for years and years. I am 51 and this place was here when I was a kid in the 1970's. Too bad that eventually it will be gone because of Stop and Shop. This place gets very busy. Its really the only place for soft serve around. 
Tasty Top has the best Hot Fudge Sundae I've ever had.  I'll miss them during the winter and  hate to see them go over the long hall..
not the best place in town to grab an ice cream.but will do if you want some soft serve and a place to hit some golf balls this works.
This little restaurant is easy to get to, and has plenty of parking. Mostly a take-out place, there is simple inside seating for about 20 people, too.

Combination lunch and dinner specials are a terrific deal, and the food is nicely prepared, and tasty. Plenty of options for the vegans, too. FAST, friendly service. 
Have been here many times and the food is always fanrastic. If you order the lunch specials and you get a large amount of food for what you pay for. You will never be disappointed. 
This is our family's favorite Chinese Restaurant, much better than any of the pricier downtown Northampton choices for Asian food.  Good fresh food prepared to your liking, family run with excellent service, always with a smile.
It becomes obvious fairly quickly that Tong Sing is a family-run restaurant.  There is a warmth and friendliness here that can be lacking in retail strip establishments.  All of the food is prepared within sight of the diners and the results are very, very good.
While much of the business is take-out, there are five or six booths and a few tables for those who wish to dine on the premises.  The decor is fairly standard, but the space is tidy and clean with any extras one might wish to add to the dishes readily available.
Check the clock for specials which are offered at specific times of day.  Lunches, for example, are put together with a main dish, fried rice and a choice of sides, all very reasonably priced.
You may miss Tong Sing from the road, as it sits behind a busy Dunkin Donuts drive-thru, but if you make the effort, you will be well rewarded.
We had reservations for four and were seated right away. The food was absolutely exceptional with top notch wait staff. There was nothing missing from this dining experience!
This is a fantastic place. The food is simply amazing and never disappoints. This is a favorite of ours. Yes--the menu is small. However, every dish they make, they make to perfection. 
I visited The Cellar Bar in Easthampton for the first time on August 6th, with a group of friends. We had a 7 pm reservation at another restaurant in town but got to Easthampton about an hour earlier specifically to try out The Cellar Bar. As we entered the bar, the hostess welcomed us and told us we would sit anywhere we liked. Although Cellar Bar is on the small side there is plenty of seating at the bar and at tables too. Its a trendy, dimly lit bar but not intimidating at all and I felt very comfortable there. When we got there most of the patrons were seated at tables and since there wasn't anyone at the bar our group of five was able to sit together at the bar. 

The bartender was very friendly and gave us plenty of time to browse the cocktail/beer menu, and poured us each glasses of water before we ordered our drinks. Four of us ordered the "Peach Palmer" (including myself) and one of us had the Mezcal Michelada. The cocktails were great! Definitely try the Peach Palmer, but for those who are not fans of cocktails rest assured there is a good selection of Draught as well. We also had a mushroom tart which was too die for! 

I highly recommend The Cellar Bar! 

I intend to return not only to the bar but I also really want to try out Coco upstairs. 

I hope this review was helpful!
Went for a birthday dinner for one of our sons.  Every one enjoyed their dinners from salads,mains and desserts.  Small place with an excellent chef.  Not afraid to use herbs and spices to their best advantage.
Pre dinner cocktails were special too.
Would have given 5 stars but they forgot ice cream on the cobblers and had to be reminded to bring it.
Fried chicken and Boston crime pie were both outstanding.
We will be back!
The food here is high-end and very good.  The restaurant is small with a nice view of the open kitchen.  Staff are friendly and attentive.  There is a very nice bar downstairs.  Recommend a drink downstairs followed by a nice dinner.
We had not been here for a few months. We brought a friend from out of town and told her she would love it. A Piemonte red by the glass was good... water plentiful. I had forgotten that there was no bread, nor was there any way to order any. There's no salt and pepper on the table. When my husband ordered, he asked to substitute their house vinaigrette for the ranch dressing described on the gem lettuce salad. "They are too busy in the kitchen to allow any substitutions." Really?????? A salad dressing switch was too much? OMG.  Then there's the matter of the overall menu. It's really limited. Good fried chicken, yes. Some nice veggie options, like a mushroom tart. But our friend doesn't eat onions and didn't feel like jalapeno anything... so she was mostly out of luck. When we tried to flag down our server, she was unavailable. No-one is scanning the room. No server helped another server. It's like the line from the movie "Blood Simple": "But what I know about is Texas, an' down here... you're on your own."
We stopped in to Coco's Cellar Bar for drinks for the first time. We were delighted with the ambiance.  Had no idea such a cool place existed in Easthampton.  The drink options were unique and fun.  We each ordered something different and shared.  They use fresh herbs and have infused cocktails that are really tasty.  I highly recommend stopping in for a cocktail.  You will be pleasantly surprised.
My girlfriend and I decided on a whim to stop in The Cellar Bar for drinks after the Übeer festival at Eastworks. As a snack, we got their patatas bravas appetizer which was pretty good and which is the only reason why I'm giving them two stars.

Unfortunately, the staff at The Cellar Bar made us feel very unwelcome. After we ordered our cocktails (which from the menu looked pretty interesting), my girlfriend, coming off a severe cold from the previous week, rested her head on the table. In a few minutes, our server came over and awkwardly asked "Maybe she should just stick with water for now...?" A little off put, I agreed, not knowing what else to say. After a few more minutes, we got our potatoes, and then the server came back, check in hand, and asked if we were all set. In this moment it was very clear that they intended to deny us service. I can understand waiting to bring out my girlfriend's drink, as the server had suggested. But I was feeling and acting normally, and was offended by the implication that I should not have had a cocktail. After an awkward pause, I indicated that we were ready for our check. Now, I could have and should have been more forward about asking for our drinks again, but I was flustered and embarrassed as this was the first time I had ever been denied service at a bar. In the end, I was glad that we ended up spending less than $10 at The Cellar Bar. We left to enjoy the rest of our night at one of the many fine alternatives in Easthampton.

After returning home and looking at some of the other reviews for Coco and The Cellar Bar, I can't help but wonder if my girlfriend was denied service by the same sexist bartender mentioned in Elizabeth Reinhalter's Google review. After the poor treatment we received, we will certainly not return and will not recommend The Cellar Bar to any friends, family, or colleagues.
Although limited, a very creative menu.  Usually something for everyone and all dishes are excellent.  Cannot beat the quality food or creativeness of the food.  Drink menu is also quite excellent
We needed an early dinner place as we were headed to Holyoke for a play. While Coco's was completely booked up ( no surprise to those in the know) we were able to get a table downstairs in the "Cellar Bar" which had a cool vibe. Excellent food! Great service from AL and rest of Cellar staff. Food CE quickly. Surprisingly delicious and beautiful. My pork was melt- in-your-mouth exquisite. Definitely will return!
Every time I have eaten there it is awesome, the service is excellent and the dinners are works of art! It is a small and chic place, so make a reservation, it fills up fast.  I have enjoyed every meal, and even though I am a vegetarian, I can always find something amazing. I highly recommend the Arugula and goat cheese salad, the appetizers are a must!  I recommend this more than any of the other restaurant that I have ever eaten in, and I am not exaggerating!!!
Service- Had a group of 7 of us, we reserved ahead of time because one member of our party knew how busy it gets. Our reservation was for 5:45pm on Thursday,March 10th but I was the only one there at that time. I actually arrived at 5:35pm and they seated me, I was asked if wanted anything to drink or to order or anything like that. I politely declined and the waitress was really nice & kept checking on me while waiting for our party to show up. We slowly triggered in due to the traffic on the way there. Every time a new person would walk into our party, the waitress came right over to greet and ask about beverages. Finally all our party arrived by 6:30pm, 45 minutes later than we reserved.  The service was above average.

I ordered the Fennel Sausage Ragu, before this my group had shared starters - Wings, Frisbee Truffle Salad and the Arugula Salad.  I tried the Frisbee Truffle Salad and the Arugula Salad. Both were very scrumptious! When it was entree time, I ate half and took the other half home (was full), the fennel sausage ragu was soo good and filling. 

The atmosphere was beautiful, I loved looking at the brick wall, and the pictures/ animal themed items on the wall and floor. 

The only thing that I didn't like is I think the menu is too small, not many choices especially if you have allergies like myself or have reasons why you can't eat a certain ingredient. 

Overall, I would come again but before I went, I'd have to check the menu to see if it's the same thing, or whats different about it and check to see if I'm not allergic.
This was my second time at Coco's and it was just as great as the first time! The staff did a great job of accommodating my large party, even though most of us arrived very late (close to 45 min!). We did not feel cramped at all in the small dining room nor did we feel rushed. It was a great experience.

We started with 2 salads the Truffle Frisee Salad and the Arugula Salad. The Arugula was my favorite with caramelized onions and goat cheese. We also had the Spicy Korean Wings which was coated in a fantastic spicy sauce. 

For my entree I had the Mac and Cheese with Jalapeno Slaw. I was a cold and rainy night so a warm baked mac and cheese was exactly what I needed. The slaw was surprisingly not spicy, but was still and excellent crunch in comparision to the mac. I also got a cocktail called the Bee's Elbows which was fantastic and refreshing. 

We ended the meal with a Peanut Butter Pie which was a great sweet bite to end the meal on. We were all so full after our entrees that the small dessert was perfect to share with the group. 

I will definitely be returning to check out the Cellar Bar below.
I've only been twice, but both times the cocktails have been delicious, and reasonably priced. The food is a Thai-American Comfort food fusion, which sounds as tasty as it is. I've had the macaroni and the southern chicken sandwich and both times I've been craving more, cause I can be quite the piggy, not because the portions are too small.
Went with husband and 3 daughters on college tour based on reviews. Fantastic drinks and food. Highly recommend the Brussel sprouts, mushroom tart, fried chicken, and the cod in saffron tomato broth. (Tip: If you get the cod, ask for extra bread to sop up the yummy goodness of the broth.)
This is my second review of Coco. Last review was 5 stars even though waiter got our order mixed up. That time the server fessed up to her mistake and made everything right. This time not so much. 
My wife and I couldn't get reservations because we called  too late so we chose to go downstairs and eat in the cellar/bar. We arrived at 530 and found the cellar to be surprisingly busy. After taking a seat at the bar we were able to order drinks quickly. The ginger Margarita was different and enjoyable. 
We placed our food order. Had a glass of wine and were promptly served  the appetizers we ordered. So far so good. 
We placed our appetizer and entree order at the same time so we didn't expect to spend a long time waiting for the entree after finishing our appetizer. The people seated next to us on both sides were seated 15-20 minutes after us. Like us they order drinks and food. After our second glass of wine we noticed that the couples on either side of us had already been served their appetizers and entrees. 
After waiting another 15 minutes are so we asked the bar maid that took our order about our entree. She agreed to check on them. She came back to report they were on their way. After another 15 minutes of waiting our entrees finally arrived. (note the couples on either side of us had finished and paid their tabs). The bar maid made no apologies and when I pointed out to her that we had ordered before the other couples were even seated she replied (some dishes take longer). Interesting, because the people seated next to us had the same entrees. GO FIGURE?
Our entrees were excellent but the spell had been broken by poor service. At our last visit the waitress apologized and tried to make things right and did. No effort was made t his time. 
Suggestions for Coco:
Have your staff wear name tags or at least introduce themselves so  a customer who wants to complain can attach their complaint to an employee. 
Instruct the staff to admit to mistakes and offer some type of remedy to the issue. 
Bar staff in the Cellar appear too busy to keep track of customers. Our barmaid poured my wife a glass of wine and then forgot to serve it. My wife had to remind her that she had poured the wine and forgot about it. 

If I were the chef at Coco's,  I would be quite upset about the wait staff creating situations that leave customers wanting better service. 
To the Chef's credit, the food was excellent.
this place is near us but is also a destination restaurant/bar for many. we like to eat downstairs in the bar -- same menu, more casual. this is an old storefront/basement with exposed brick decor and an open kitchen where husband/wife team are busy cooking. we love the fried chicken, Brussels sprout w/aioli appetizer and pretty much everything else. last time we ate here they had a lovely pot pie with puff pastry "biscuit" crust. you need a reservation most of the time upstairs. I don't give it five stars because of the small menu and they didn't have hard cider which is the only alcoholic beverage I can drink these days.
Fried chicken  not what you think. Fabulous. Salmon  always  good  as well. Each  dish flavorful.Ginger cake very nice.Always good  service and a nice  experience. Upstairs  or downstairs ..both very  nice. 
The wait staff in the cellar is insolent, not knowledgeable and rude.  It really does not help with the experience.  The food is nothing special.  Fried brussel sprouts are mostly thin skins with no substance.  I love Unmi, so I want this place to work.  It seems popular despite my disappointment over and over again.  Would love more creative food and a truly helpful and kind staff.
A wonderful local farm to table restaurant with great food, service and drinks. My only criticism is that the menu, although it tends to change often is very small.
This place just continues to serve the best breakfast in the area and is a local favorite.  The available selections should make everone happy - it always does for us.
It took me about 10 years to return to the Silver Spoon after my first visit. First time the place was dirty, the service was slow (probably because for every egg the cook managed to crack onto the grill he cracked 2 on the floor) and the boy making the toast touched every piece on all sides as he stacked them in an ever-growing pile waiting for an egg to survive long enough to make it onto a plate. 

Fast forward to the present and a renovated local diner with great, friendly service and good quality food. Nothing fancy but the food is fresh and well prepared and there is a lot of variety. My party of four had cheese omelets with hash browns, a bowl of fresh fruit, toast made with their homemade bread, some other egg dish and coffee. All delicious. We had to wait about 1/2 an hour for a table but once we were seated the service was pretty swift without being rushed. 

Easy to find in the center of easthampton and only a ten minute drive from Northampton. So if you're in Northampton and want a really good diner experience I recommend the Silver Spoon. Locals (of which I am one) love it for good reason. Glad I gave it another try. 
Their HOME-MADE items are second to NONE!
Be Warned: They close at 2:00 pm.
Service: 5 stars.
Food: 5 stars.
Family Friendly: 5 stars
Prices: 5 stars.
Don't be a knucklehead. Take you friends and family to The Silver Spoon today!
First of all the picture posted is before renovations. Now the interior is updated, brighter and a great atmosphere. Now add in great meal selections, great service and a caring and friendly staff and you will be back.
I avoided the Silver Spoons for years because it was kind of dirty. There was usually flies flitting around all year long. I heard that a new owner bought the place so I gave it a shot. It's much, much cleaner and the food is good for breakfast.
Best breakfast in Easthampton- friendly staff - Fast - Hot - Delicious.   Lots of choices.   No rush, read the paper atmosphere.  Sit at table, booth or bar.  

Parking can be a hassle grab first spit you see.  May have to use lights to cross the street.
We have been having breakfast at Silver Spoon for more than twenty years and two ownership changes. The current owners have been a disappointment. We have returned three (3) times in hopes that the service and food would improve. First time - our orders were mixed with other customers and we did not get what we had ordered. The second time our blueberry pancakes had no blueberries. When they fixed the order, we got blueberry pancakes that were served raw. Our third time, I ordered a grilled  muffin and was served crumbs on a plate and the main order was not what we had requested, again. It is a travesty to a small city to have a landmark breakfast restaurant fall below standards. Luckily there are other restaurants for breakfast in the area.
My wife and I recently had breakfast at the Silver Spoon, and had an excellent experience. We sat at the front counter, and all of the staff were very friendly and welcoming. They had great teamwork, as they all shared responsibilities including service, cooking, and processing the bill. Staff would always check in with us throughout the meal, and always asked if they could get us anything else (more coffee, etc).

Much of the food is prepared on the flat top grill behind the counter, adding to the overall experience by seeing your food made in front of you. My wife had a breakfast sandwich, and I had a corned beef brisket with 2 eggs and toast. Both of our meals were made in front of us, and served as soon as they were ready. The food and hash brown sides were very tasty, and had good portions as well. Great experience and value, will definitely go back!
Breakfast for everyone...menu selection is robust and cooked to order.  Part of the fun is sitting at the counter watching everything getting cooked...amazing!!  I had the works omelette which was LOADED with peppers onions mushrooms and ham.  Just enough of everything.  The house made white bread was very good, not huge slices but definitely tasty.  The second breakfast had nice crispy home fries and a healthy portion😉  the restaurant was super busy so don't expect your food in 5 minutes but expect it hot and fresh.
They are currently going through a renovation so the look isn't there yet but definetly coming along.
This place is about a mile from my home. I come here often for breakfast meetings, or just for breakfast. The food is reliably good and the service is always warm and friendly and prompt.
I'm a local and manage to stop in once every few weeks.  My weakness is breakfast for lunch and while I'll sometimes have a "normal" lunch why should I when breakfast here is always good.  Short stack?  Coming right up!  Eggs?  Oh boy - eggs!  They know how to do over-easy perfectly.  And they come with REAL home fries, nothing from a plastic bag. Orange juice is nice and rich, not orange flavored water.  And the toast; I could sing praises to the toast.  There's always raisin toast available if that's your weakness.  The staff is friendly and quick.  The prices are reasonable.  There's a great recounting of the long history of this place on back of the menu - by the time you're done reading, you'll probably have coffee in front of you with food along soon.  

My companions get lunch and are happy with the service, the quality and the price.  There are daily specials.

What's not to like about non-franchise fresh local pretty-darn-quick food cooked to order?  
Super crowded....service was kind and sweet but reeeaaaallllllyyyyy slow...almost to the point that we left which we NEVER do......Food was fine....average.
This is a great old, traditional diner. Mainly we have breakfast here. They offer all the usual, AND they always do perfect poached eggs, which is a litmus test for short order cooks. Great place!
Moved away from the area a decade ago to area that has nothing but commercial, fast food places.  Mom & Pop places can't compete so are non-existent!
So when we came back to visit, we wanted a good breakfast!  
The Silver Spoon is a small, well established restaurant with a large following of "regulars" so when you walk in as a stranger, it's like hearing pin drop!
But the attentive staff and great food are worth the strange greeting!  
Fresh, robust coffee, hot food, all homemade, served and remaining hot throughout the meal!
A great value for the buck.  Something you can't get at "Breakfast Are Us In the Box, Jr's."
Very solid food and service.  Great classic breakfast fare with fantastic customer service.  Definitely the go to place for a full quick breakfast without spending a fortune
A small diner in "downtown" Easthampton, with traditional old-time booths, tables and counter. Open for breakfast only, with great food at low prices, especially the breakfast special. Heavily patronized by locals, the staff if friendly to everyone.
You'll see a diverse cross-section of town residents, receive recommendations as to what is great today, however, the simple menu of everyday choices is good with really great prices.
I went for lunch after my son had told me about the wonderful breakfast he had there the previous week. Apparently the portions are great and the price is right. However, lunch was very disappointing. I opted for soup & salad. The soup tasted like it was the bulk bagged soup that a lot of places carry even thought the menu says "home made". The salad was fresh but I was given little take out cups with oil in one and vinegar in the other. The atmosphere was dismal. The menu had the history written out, apparently it was remodeled in 1989 and trust me it hadn't been touched since. The staff seemed pleasant and eager to please except for the girl on the grill who seemed to be having a bad day. The owner (he mentioned that he was the owner when complaining about something to the kitchen guy) would be ripped apart by Chef Ramsey. He was unengaged, sitting at the counter as if he was a customer. Then he was showing pictures from his phone to the staff. When I left he was sitting at the last booth with his feet on the seat playing with his phone. He should spend more time managing his restaurant and improving things.
Nice family atmosphere where the locals gather for breakfast and lunch. We mainly go there for breakfast. The food is good, as the service.  Don't forget to check out the specials board!
I live in Florida but every time I visit friends back in Western Mass we always go here at least once a trip. It's awesome breakfast with huge portions. The last time I got a cheese omelette with sausage and home fries and it was phenomenal. I love sitting at the bar and shooting the breeze with friends here. 
Pizza that has a great variety of options. Try the Potato & Bacon Pizza or the Melazana - eggplant, roasted red peppers and garlic. They make great pizza and the staff are excellent and fast.
There are always lots of choices of flavors for single slice pizzas, but also plenty of interesting combos for full pizzas and wings and more. They deliver and are always friendly. A great stop when you're craving pizza.
Antonio's sells pizza by the pie as well as slice.  They do have specials but if you call they won't describe them all - it's best if you go and look at them as they're on a huge blackboard behind the register.  The pizza is ok but with so many other options in the general area (5 colleges = tons of pizza joints) there's better.  One thing I wasn't fond of was that they're not flexible at all with their deals.  They had a 2 for 1 special (it's normal for the pizza places in this area to run this special, so it's not SO special) and wouldn't let me add one more item to a pizza, no matter that I offered to pay more for it.  They wouldn't hear of it.  I found that really odd, but ok.  
I love this place!!  I have two sons with autism and they are picky eaters, I get pizza there every week, the staff are incredibly nice, and the pizza is awesome!
Great pizza, by the slice, by the pie or delivered. They also have calzones and wings. Without a doubt, the best pizza in the areas.
Antonio's has delicious and unique flavors of pizza.  The only reason they don't get an "excellent" from me is that the place is just too small.  Not really conducive to eating in with about three tables.  But if you like delivery, or going in to choose your slices - they are top notch.  All the food is good, but the slices are great and there are usually specials that make it easy on your pocketbook too!
This is our go-to pizza. We were thrilled when they opened up, being familiar with the Amherst shop.
Friends and I ordered take-out from here during a recent visit with them to the area.  They recommended the pizza, which was certainly good,  but not close to the best I've ever had.   Four of us shared 2 large pizzas on a thinner type crust: one w/sliced red bliss potato, rosemary, provolone & cheddar,  which was fairly bland.  The other was better (more flavor) and consisted of pesto, spinach, bleu cheese and portobello mushroom.  

I would order here again,  but wouldn't race back.  At $39.00 for 2 pizzas, these seemed a bit on the expensive side for what we got.  
Single slices at the counter of varying specialty pizza. Large variety of veg and meat pizzas at great prices; takeout, delivery or eat-in. Downtown Easthampton, open late (for this town) 11pm.  VERY popular.
This is one of Easthampton's top 3 Pizza places. A little pricy but very good Pizza. They sell wings too. People have said they are good. I can not comment on them as I have yet to have them from there.
What used to be a great place to get your hands on some amazing slices of pizza, has taken a nosedive, ever since they switched management a few months ago. Prices went up, and food quality went way down. It's obvious they are now skimping. Well,too bad,because they lost a loyal customer.
This is a little hole in the wall pizza joint. Sits maybe 14 and has a few outside tables. There is a good selection of ready to eat pizza that they heat & serve and a limited Italian Entree menu. My son eats there frequently. I had the "Precious" pizza which was basically a Margherita Pizza but with a garlic butter sauce on the crust before they add the toppings. It was delicious. I tried my sons potato pizza, not as good as Bar in New Haven. Alot of great pizza to choose from, atmosphere is basic but clean. Staff is friendly. No need to schlep into Northampton if you want pizza save the chaos and stop at Antonios.
I could go on and on about our amazing lunches at Antonio's, but I'll try and keep this short. First of all, the variety is some of the largest I've ever seen in a pizza place. Anything you're in the mood for, they've got. Even though I'm not a huge fan of thin crusts, I must admit they are delicious. The only trouble is finding a place to sit, though there's more seating here than the one in Amherst. 
I go here a lot before work to grab a slice or two. The pizza and wings are mouth watering. I definitely recommend Antonio's!
Where do I begin? Good for a meal or a late-night snack. Buy a slice (or two), and try the daily specials. Or the old reliable bacon-chicken-ranch. Yes, it sounds good. it tastes even better. Yum. Go try it. Now. I'll wait.

Told ya. The crust is good, the sauce has a nice tang. Anything with basil doesn't use that powdered stuff, but fresh green leaves. The pesto base is very good. Try one of the slices with tortellini on it. No, really. Yes, the pasta. I know! Seriously.

For the purists, the pepperoni pizza is good too. As is the tomato-basil-fresh mozzarella.

My favorite, I think, are the quesadilla slices. Especially with avocado. Or chicken. Or steak.

This is the kind of place you can eat at every week, and not get tired of. I know that too. :)
Awesome pizza selection, by the piece or whole.  Good meals and salads and home delivery..  Can sit outside and watch the traffic and people.
i ordered 4 take-out a bacon bbq cheeseburger, a steak & cheese,& a nuggets & fries. I told them 2 make sure the cheeseburger sandwich was hot. the sandwich was luke-warm at best.when I went 2 return it & I was told I had 2 take it. when I refused, I was told by some moron never 2 return  again.the steak & cheese was so over-cooked with no cheese melted in,dry & tasteless. the nuggets were so over-cooked,tasteless, & hard.what a bunch of total crap.i will never go back there again. is this any way 2 run a restaurant?i guess so if ur an IDIOT!!!
We've eaten here before it changed hands, and it was just a so-so restaurant.  Last night we ran in just to get some take out grinders.  We learned that the restaurant was under new ownership.  The new owners acted excited and eager to please. They even offered me a sample of a new pizza they were trying out, which unfortunately I had to decline because it had chicken on it and I don't eat meat.  It looked delicious, however. 

Our grinders were perfect.  I got a large size eggplant grinder and it was so huge I could hardly eat even half of it.  I saved the other half for lunch and I am enjoying it right now. 

Keep up the good work, Adamo's!
Why hasn't anyone but me reviewed this restaurant ? 
Ate here yesterday and there clam chowder was excellent, the ruban sandwich is great, the cold slaw isn't as sweet as I like but still good.
Our Waiter was great very attentive.
If you want a good lunch then stop by. Don't let the lack of reviews stop you from having a good lunch.
My daughter and I had lunch here today. I hadn't eaten h r e in probably 2 years, and I bought a pizza. 
My daughter said they have the best meatball sandwiches. That's what she ordered, I ordered the Rubin on rye with ff and a dill pickle spear.
Well to my surprise my Rubin was simply wounderful and my daughter's meatball sandwich was just as good.
I would recommend this restaurant to anyone in the area at lunch time.

Wow! Who knew? This place is so good. Everything is home made I think. The food is very good. There were 10 of us, we had no problem with seating  or the orders. They have real mashed. The butternut squash was like you get on Thanksgiving. Lots of food on the plate also. Go,,, you will be surprised.
The food here is so tasty.  I can't say in words how wonderful  the food is. I have not got any thing I didn't like. I love it all that tried I eat here every Saturday.  Today I had lobster benni.  Realy great. I drove around till I could get a place to park well worth it. I live far away to get here . Well worth the drive. The wait staff is so nice. Come here you will find  out  for your selfs. 
I love the food here. It is delicious, very well price and the wait staff is excellent. Did I mention the food here is amazing!  The Mason Grill has an excellent menu with many on the board specials, some of which are very creative and delicious. Try this restaurant you will not be disappointed, but leave some beer battered chicken left for me!! 
Very accommodating and friendly. The specials are very creative, you will want to try them. Very affordable.
A great local breakfast/lunch restaurant with a surprising selection of daily specials as well as everyday menu offerings. Breakfast served all day. Staff is always friendly and offers great service. Fish and Chips and other great seafood available on Fridays.
Steve and I took a group of us out to Warren .we all loved what we ate the home fries were so good my friend order more of them. We try eat here alot. Making good times and fun . Ray is a very good cook. Becky does great job with service.  I love this restaurant.  Lots of room for everyone. 
i am  addicted to their pancakes! they are so good. very good place to eat. family oriented. wonderful and polite people there.
The owner is a long-time professional chef throughout the area. Mason's Grill is open for breakfast and lunch (being new). Standard fair, plus daily specials that you may never have thought you'd see in a small town. 

Not a fancy or new construction (its in an older building) but clean, open and roomy for the tables and a small counter for patrons. 

Service is very good, but it can get busy at times, so keep that in mind with the modest staff and if the room is full.

Breakfast pricing is a great value for the offerings. Last week 5 of us were there for a get-together and the bill came to 48 and change! I have not stopped for lunch so no opinion on that at the moment.

Well worth the stop if your traveling through the sleepy little town of Warren.

FYI: not related to the Grill, but the town is situated in a hollow, so expect NO cell-phone service on some carriers when your within a quarter to half mile of the actual downtown.
Mason's Grill is new to Warren, open now for only a few weeks and currently open for breakfast and lunch.  The place is large with good lighting and excellent spacing between tables.  Service is friendly and helpful.

Food is consistently good - typical diner fare - with upscale additions.  The big breakfast at $6.95 for three eggs any style, toast, home fries, sausage or bacon is the best deal around.  And the Eggs Benedict are perfectly prepared.

A variety of sandwiches, burgers, and entrees are served at lunch with specials on the board every day.  Try this place.  You'll like it.
We went to order a birthday cake. She was rude, irritable, just not at all welcoming. She was yelling at her staff. I cannot speak about her cakes as we walked out.
I contacted Karen to make our daughter's baby shower cake. The entire experience went very smoothly. She was very accommodating and the cake was beautiful. The shower was today and everyone loved the cake. And it was delicious! Thanks Karen for making the shower shine with the cake you made!
I went to pick up my son's birthday cake only she forgot to make it! She ruined his special day and all she could say was sorry! Imagine if that was for your wedding!!!!!
Over the years, our family has ordered dozens of cakes - Wedding, Baby Shower, Birthday (Adult & Child) Graduation.  Cakes are not only beautiful, they are delicious.  Never been disappointed.
The locals call this place 'The Eagles' and it's been around forever.  On most days the bar/restaurant/social club is private and open only to members.  However, when the club is hosting a dinner to raise funds for charity, the public is welcome.  

Friday night fish fry is popular.  Chef Patti LeBoeuf makes about the best fish and chips around at a cost of only $9.  You can also get fried clams, or shrimp, or scallops, or a fisherman's combination platter.  She likes her fries a bit pale, so if you want them well-done, ask for them that way.

The atmosphere here is pleasant and not at all fancy.  It's a place for locals to enjoy a plate of fried seafood and the company of their fellow townspeople.
Small town café / restaurant. No frills ambience,chalkboard specials,  really tasty lunches .... and now they're serving supper on Tuesday night. Limited dinner menu under $20.00. Well worth a try. These folks would be successful even if they were not the only show in town.
They serve a delicious and cheap breakfast at Palmer Motorsports. It's so nice to not have to pay an arm and a leg for a track meal.

I've been to the restaurant as well. Great burgers and they have a super friendly staff.
The best track vendor ever! Great breakfast burritos and awesome sandwiches/wraps for lunch. It's nice to get a fairly healthy and fresh meal at the race track for a fair price!
I eat out all the time.  I can't tell you how many times I've gone to a restaurant that was supposed to be open but was closed.  That's never happened at Maw's.  Great hours & that's why I make it my daily routine.
Excellent food great atmosphere great staff reasonable prices great portions a must stop if you are near or far from Warren
I eat here every day except closed on Mondays.  Great food, hours 6am til 2pm.  Prices good, coffee and newspaper.  Good atmosphere and staff always eager to please.  Can bring a family or just stop in for food to go if you call ahead.  Very accommodating :)
I don’t live in the area anymore, but make a point to make it to Howards at least once every summer on the way through the area for an ice cream. They have a bunch of different flavors, toppings, etc. Their servings are huge – I always get a small and it is almost too much for me to finish, especially if you get food beforehand. The food is always good. Service could use some major work. Last time I went, I waited a number of minutes before someone came over to take my order.  She had quite the attitude as well, but it’s a little place on the side of a road that’s only open seasonally. I go for the ice cream and food, not the service.
Don't love the food.  The burger I got was dry and way over cooked.  The onion rings were pretty good.  Disappointed in the fried clams.  abundant outdoor seating in back.  crowded parking.  large sized ice creams but large size price too
Howards is a popular place in the area and the lines can be long on a summer night! If you like eating outside at a picnic table or in your car give it a whirl! I have had the Burgers, Fish, Ice Cream and all were good and plentiful!
This local drive-in has been a popular summer stop since 1947 when it opened. Have eaten here many times over the years, and the food is always good - especially the seafood. The way everything is prepared is the one thing that stays the same over time, and is the draw for many folks to return again and again. I have a friend who lives close to 30 miles away, but returns about every two weeks mainly for the french fries - he says they don't make 'em like this anywhere else! Good food, great ice cream, jumbo servings at  reasonable prices. No wonder they continue to do such a huge business all summer.
Howard's Ice Cream is excellent quality and served in very generous portions.  Before you order the LARGE, try the SMALL cone or cup of Ice Cream--It is NOT SMALL!  Good fried chicken, Seafood, Hot Dogs and Burgers.  This is eat outdoors, but there is an abundance of picnic tables on the side and in the rear of the building. 
WOW! My friends in Worcester have been raving about Howard's for years. On a recent trip to visit them we drove to Howard's and it was worth the effort!  The food was excellent and portions generous. 4 adults ordered the Captain and side of extra scallops. We took food home. My only complaint was that I was too full to try the ice cream!
Seafood dinners always served quickly from ordering, hot, and fresh. We had fried whole clams but it's always a difficult decision on whether to have the1/2 lb lobster roll. Good sized portions. Plenty of seating at many picnic tables. Great country destination ride.
I live across the street and when I pay more than $5.00 for a cheeseburger and lemonade..GONG and Gone.
Greasy but delicious food that also offers a savory selection of ice cream for dessert. Often busy but the food comes quick. I'll always remember going here as a kid and still travel here as an adult. 
When visiting my family nearby, I make it a point to stop in. Great take out with huge amounts of food. Watch out for the "small" ice cream-it's huge, as is the fisherman's platter. Great batter and flavor. Many choices and outdoor seating. 
This drive-in serves the usual fast food 1950s style. We stopped in yesterday for the first time in many years. We were on a quest because -  
a. fast food chains' frappe' s, frappachinos, and milkshakes weren't cutting it.             b. I was weary of brain freeze because my tiny, expensive cupful of drink was made mostly of ice.                                                                                                                                    .c I was disenchanted with milkeshakes so thick they wouldn't suck through a straw and frappes made of softserve and ice. 
We were looking for the taste of childhood frappes to see if anyone still made them and if they were as good as I remembered. 
Howard's is the place!!!!!! Big frappe cup full serving, real ice cream, real syrup, a vigorous frappe making machine - and all for $4.95. Even batter than I remembered.
This is a great drive in for CLAMS and ice cream. The also have good burgers and hot dogs. No a fan of their fries. The serving sizes are huge! Four of us shared a large order of clams and a small order of fries. Clams are always perfect. One kid had a hotdog another the hamburger. Both finished and said it was good. 

The ice-cream sizes are ridiculous. The baby size(2.75) was two huge scopes. All their ice cream is good. On kid had a flurry and couldn't finish. Two had huge (baby size) cups. They ate every last drop. My wife opted for the chocolate frappe (milkshake) and I went for vanilla. Thick but drinkable with straw, perfect in my opinion. A fun place to stop every now and again.  
I've been to Howard's MANY times and have never been disappointed. The fish is always fresh and perfectly fried, the ribeye sandwiches are delicious and the service is always courteous and efficient. 
I do think that $22 for a lobster roll and medium soda is a bit much, but heck..... It's LOBSTER!!
Great place for ice cream and great place to stop before or after a concert on the common, during the hot summer.
Steve and I got a small ice cream .the small is huge over rhe top of the cone realy good ice cream .the food here is the best my favorite  summer place .nice there open again for the season.  A nice small town feel. 
Come hungry! The cones were so huge, we'll probably skip dinner tonight. Very generously sized -- the "small" was about 6 inches above the cone, at least three scoops of ice cream!
Howard's has the best fried and grilled food I've ever had.  I've been going to Howard's for a number of years.  A co-worker, who grew up in that area, suggested that I give them a try.  They have been consistently good!!  Great ice cream as well. Even if the parking lot is packed the wait for your food won't be very long.  I've never experienced a mistake with my order and the smiles there are abundant, employees and patrons alike.
A great local place to drive in and get a burger or some seafood.  Great ice cream too~!!!  A one of a kind place to go.
We just had to have ONE MORE of those delicious 1/2 lb. lobster rolls (and yummy onion rings) before Howard's closes at the end of this week.  Sadly, they were out of ice cream for the season.  Hopefully, the rolls will tied us over until they re-open next Spring.  See you then!
I live near Howards and we order the side order piece of fish almost every week they are open in the summer. The portion size is huge and very reasonable price but the main reason we go there weekly is it is just very good, fresh fried fish and not greasy. They also have excellent homemade tartar sauce. Don't bother ordering the fries - they are not the best and the fish is so good and such a large portion you don't need the fries anyhow. Also, service is excellent, we call ahead for take-out then leave the house immediately and the order is always ready and we only live 5 minutes away.
A quality place with good food, great ice cream and fair prices.  If you just come for ice cream you get very generous servings.  You can't go wrong
We've been to Wok Inn many times. Don't know if management changed at some point, but staff not as friendly over the last year.  Typical chinese menu, standard quality and prices. Just have not felt welcomed over last year, and now tend to go elsewhere. For me, the food can be fantastic, but "NICE does matter" and will make or break where I spend my time and money.
This is a quiet property within the West Brookfield Village. It has a "restaurant" location on Route 9. The Rotary also meets at The Wok Inn.
My husband and I as well as my brother love dining in this restaurant for lunch. They have a large menu of chicken, beef, pork and shrimp menu with lots of vegetables. We've sampled the Chicken and Vegetables with a light sauce and General Tso's and also the Ginger Chicken with Fresh String Beans in a light sauce.  You have a choice of soup also.  We prefer the won ton soup served in a lightly salted broth with Chinese lettuce.  You can have a choice of white, brown or fried rice.  We like our food lightly salted and they do accommodate you.  The lunches are large servings and very filling.  A large pot of Chinese tea is served with some fried Chinese dough and duck sauce.  At the end of the meal the traditional cookies with some fortune saying are included.  Where can you have all this for less than $5.50 on their lunch menu.  The service is great and we will definitely be coming again.  We noticed lots of take outs too....opened for dinner and parties also.
Having visited the Wok on many occasions I continue to be very pleased with both there commitment  to fresh tasteful cuisine and cleanliness of their restaurant. Love the Crab Rangoons and Sesame Chicken. Highly recommend
Stopped mainly to use the restroom but saw the lunch menus and decided to eat.

Had soup and crispy beef with fried rice and my wife had soup and lo mein.

Very tasty and great value. It got the seal of approval from my Chinese wife so must be ok.
Poor quality food; over priced and tasteless.  Fried rice has got to be the very worst that I have had anywhere.  Other dishes are skimpy on ingredients and bland.  Condiments are provided but they are not generous.  Not recommended.
Typical Chinese food, wings were horrible. Not a lot of good places in the area to choose from, so this is probably the best around. Very clean compared to others in the area (Panda Garden)
you won't want to drop a single bite.  always fresh, and robust flavor.  Whether you are flying solo or in a group the service is top notch and everything, I have ever had there is top notch.
The restaurant was spacious, clean, and quiet, but that's as good as it got.  The food was just not good.  Locals may like it because it is the only choice for Chinese around. The vegetable fried rice had no vegetables.  The scallops were so spicy they were inedible. When they say your pu pu platter comes with 4 wings, it means 2 wings cut in half. The scorpion bowl lacked any punch (hardly any alcohol). The price for two was reasonable at $55, but the quality was lacking. Sorry, I'll pass next time!
Food is awful, staff unwilling of any substitutions, skimpy portions. Asked twice for a beverage refill and never got it. Asked for more duct sauce and never got that either. Chicken fingers were burnt and impossible to cut through with just a fork. Too much pepper on the steak teriyaki. Will NEVER return. Wok inn, run out. Muahah. 
First off, the restaurant is always very clean and bright. We have been here many times and the food is always fresh and very tasty. I also like how they will tweak your favorite dish for you. 
The portions are big and they prices are very reasonable.
Clean, bright and spacious, the Wok Inn is a great place for Chinese cuisine.  Food is quickly brought out hot and tasty.  Generous portions and a wide array of choices.  Love it.
This was our third time at the WOK INN, West Brookfield, MA for lunch.  The service and greeting is friendly.   The restaurant is clean.  The bathrooms are clean.  The atmosphere is very comfortable.    The lunch menu is priced from $5.10 to $5.65.  You can’t go wrong with the chicken or pork entrees.  I would not recommend the egg roll or boneless ribs.  Lunch includes entrée, tea, soup and rice, a bargain.
My husband and I have eaaten here many times.This time we ordered take-out and it was delicious. The portions were generous. The pupu platter is excellen; crab rangoons, especially tasty. Their house fried rice is nicely prepared, not clumpy or greasy as at some other restaurants. All in all, eat-in or takeout, you will get a very good meal at a good price.
This restaurant has been in my hometown for several years and it is apparent that it is still popular.  While the dining room was mostly empty there was a steady stream of take out customers.  Not as busy as many similar Chinese restaurants that I have frequented on a Friday night but a fair amount of business.

We ordered the steamed dumplings (obviously made there and pretty good), General Tso's Chicken (also OK), and the Gourmet Hot Pot (not so good).  The hot pot had scallops and shrimp in it and the scallops were obviously dried then reconstituted (typical Chinese) but there is no excuse for serving  shrimp that isn't fresh.  They had a very strong taste and odd texture.  The flavor permeated through the rest of the vegetables, pork and chicken.  Definitely wouldn't order that again.

If you come here, avoid anything with seafood in it.  The other dishes are fine, the portions tonight were very large and the tea was pretty good.

I only eat here when I don't feel like driving a long distance.  Not a regular place I order from.

Suggestions to the owner: power wash the outside of your restaurant!  It is filthy with algae and mold growth.  Not a way to appeal to your guests as they enter.
I go here all the time and it is, indeed, not as good as it was. The chicken and broccoli is our go-to meal and it was fine. the rice was light, the broccoli a good texture, the chicken was good and there was not an overabundance of sauce - sometimes they give you so much the food is a mess.
The crab rangoon was give or take - nothing wrong with it, nothing special.
I was VERY disappointed with the egg roll - I did not eat more than a few bites. Hubby finished it, so it wasn't awfull, but there was something that didn't taste like it should be there.
it was OK. nothing horrible, nothing great, OK.
I don't know why I keep ordering here. The food is awful, they chince out on everything, give you pathetic portions and it is overpriced. At least this is how the takeout is, it's never bad when you dine in. Seriously, drive a little further to Ware and go to the Asian Garden, the quality and portions and price will blow your mind, the take out is just as good. Crab rangoons are huge, chix fingers are huge. The Wok straight up sucks!
A little shocked at the recent reviews on this restaurant. Have always found the food to be outstanding. Fresh, great presentation, good value and fast service. Not a big fan of run of the mill Chinese restaurants. Find this place very close to gourmet dinning. Recommend it. STEVE
the women's group at my church have our annual dinner here and the food is always delicious. It is family owned and the portions are unbelievable. It's nice place for lunch or dinner and very reasonably priced.
This is NOT gourmet Chinese/American, but we go here regularly because they always cook it well. it's never greasy, they don't use MSG, it's never too salty, it's always fresh and well cooked and well presented. This is our go-to Chinese. 
My only real complaint is I am a REAL steamed dumpling fan and theirs are not the best. Their specials are a great value - and they even make them look nice. Take out is always prompt (unless it's New Years or something)
Typical Subway shop.  Quality varies somewhat with the staff du jour which seems to change all too frequently.  Good for a quick sub on the way home.
Convenient for local folks or travelers. Dine or dash. Good menu.. reasonable in price...beer license.
Processed frozen garbage! Pizza is ok but don't try anything else! No effort by management to offer quality food! It's all previously frozen garbage! I know I live in the neighborhood. Got a bunch of goofy kids working there that couldn't care less! It sucks unless you just want a pizza then it's a typical Greek pizza nothing more
I have always been treated with a smile and respect.  There pizzas are always  very good and the fact that every month they have something different on special is great.
Ownership has changed and they are cheap cheap cheap....had more issues with their food and I am DONE with them now.
We frequently order takeout from NorthEast. We here for a quick dinner or entertaining family and friends it is our go to pizza place.
Decent pizza and the place is a pizza shop thats it. Delivery takes forever 

For more and better pizza and service I went to Ye old Tavern down the road. 
I normally get a Greek salad with extra chicken and it is good. I would have given 4 stars but I got chicken wings once and asked if they had breading on them and they said no, but when I got home they had breading.
We got the special pizza.  It was hot and yummy. We could even finish it all. The buffalo tenders were a bit of let down more soggy the crunchy. But the prices can't be beat.
Overall I like Northeast food wise.  My biggest "thumb's down" would be that I have come home on more than one occasion with food that wasn't mine or an order that was not as I asked.  They were not very helpful when I called and actually made me come back and show them the order.  I order from them quite a bit and I would think that if I tell them they made a mistake they would be a little nicer about it.
After a long day it's great to have Northeast Pizza nearby. A quick call, and supper is taken care of. Excellent pizzas, calzones, grinders, and salads.Their monthly specials are great. As a matter of fact, I'm about to pick up the phone and place an order right now......
I go to this pizza house about three times a month. The prices are very good, especially for the food you receive. The problem is, on a regular basis, they give you the wrong size pizza or don't put something on your order like you requested or even worse...just give you the wrong order. The good tastes good and the menu is vast, but they need to work on getting your order correct.
HORRIBLE SERVICE, CRAPPY FOOD. This place CONSTANTLY SCREWS UP orders. This last time broke the camels back. The last delivery I got was missing items, STONE COLD, and two items were WRONG. When I called, I was told a manager would call back. Never did. I waited until the next day. She said we tried to call you...yeah, and hour and a half later, after I had gone to bed. They refuse to reverse the charge; so now I have to dispute it. STEER CLEAR! Go a few miles into Warren, and try TOWN PIZZA. Their pizza is actually GOOD. Northeast pizza doesn't even cook their french fries all the way through. 3 times out of 4, they will be raw. The pizza tastes like cardboard. The service SUCKS. AVOID THIS PLACE!
They make really good pizzas and the grinders are overflowing with meat.  I believe they also make their own bread for the grinders and it’s usually always fresh.  They have a small dine-in area but do predominantly takeout.  My complaint would be the majority of the employees are teens, early 20s and they need better instruction in food handling.  On a recent visit I picked up a takeout and the employee had turned from the counter where she was making a pizza, left her plastic gloves on her hands, took my money, pressed the required buttons on the register, made change and then went back to the pizza, all without changing the gloves.
specials are awesome!!!! most food is of a greek or italian descent.
delivery is quick and prices reasonable.
Northeast occupies a spot on Route 9 in West Brookfield that was formerly occupied by a real favorite of local pizza lovers - Submarina.  Submarina is gone and people still remember it fondly.  But the new owners of Northeast Pizza do a decent job.  They serve tasty pizzas, submarine sandwiches (which are called grinders in this part of the world), specialty items like appetizers and calzones, beer, wine, and snacks.  

The place is popular for take-out or for its delivery service, but lacks atmosphere for those wishing to dine in.  The six or so tables are tightly spaced and people waiting for take-out orders are almost in your lap.  It's not a pleasant dining experience.  The noise level is too much for relaxed dining as well.

However, the place is handy to route 9 for those who are on the road.  It's just down the highway from Rock House Reservation.  You could easily pick up sandwiches to go and eat them on the trail.
My husband and I have been coming here for years for lunch, dinner, and many events. The food is great, the old Colonial atmosphere is lovely in all seasons, and the staff members are cheerful and friendly. We were there today and enjoyed freshly-baked muffins and rolls, delicious baked haddock, and homemade strawberry rhubarb pie. This is a ride in the country well worth taking!
second trip to this inn.  it is in a very old wayside inn, so the ambiance is that of 200 years ago.  at times, they still prepare joints in the fireplace, so it has a level of authenticity and charm.  food is delicious:  I had liver, she had rack of lamb.  both prepared exactly as expected.  they have an appetizer to be shared with multiple small items, such as cheese, duck, fruits that is worthwhile.  breads are very nice, a pumpkin roll and pecan rolls.  her martini was a bit small, but well-prepared.  wine and beer list is good  service was a bit slow, but OK overall.  

if you are shun-piking around central MA, heading from Worcester to the Quabbin, this is an excellent place to stop for a meal.
My husband and I visited recently and had such a wonderful relaxing meal in the Tavern.  Everything was perfect.  Our waitress was Dawn and she could not have been sweeter.  The food was awesome but I have to rave about the French Onion Soup.  This is not something I usually order but I did this time and I am so glad I did.  It had so much flavor!  I will definitely be ordering it again next time.
The prime rib was great; that's their specialty. The salmon was less than impressive. The restaurant is really quaint and has a very interesting history. The wait staff was unable to keep up with our large party. The apple pie is also one of their specialties, but the quality of the pies depends on the quality of the apples. When we visited, the apple pies were unsweet. (They encouraged us to use lots of whipped cream. That's not a good way to show off your apple pie.)
I prefer to write positive reviews but I wish someone had warned us before we wasted the time and money. My husband and I decided to try this restaurant to celebrate our 4th wedding anniversary. The location is beautiful, the venue looked historically authentic and it was relatively close by for a Thursday night out. The place was in fact, virtually empty with only one other occupied table in the entire dining room. Probably should have seen that as a red flag. We sat down, ordered our drinks and I left for about 10 minutes to step outside. I returned to discover our drinks still had not been delivered (as one of the only two tables occupied), no bread had been offered and none of the food order had been taken. Finally, the drinks arrived (15 minutes for a draft beer and a cup of generic hot tea) and we order both the appetizers and entrees. The appetizers were accompanied by a "break basket" - a stale danish, a stale muffin and a stale single roll - full of what I can only assume were uncovered leftovers from that morning or the day before. The entrees, a salmon and a steak, were terribly mediocre and VERY overpriced for the quality. The dessert was completely forgettable. Service was average but certainly not the worst feature of the evening. I'm not sure if it was an off-night for the "chef" or maybe the venue should simply stick to hosting weddings (as the location is quite pretty and charming) but we will definitely not be back and the ambivalence of the owners/management to quality and atmosphere made an evening we had been looking forward to disappointing and cringe-worthy at times. Simply piling in period furniture does not make for a memorable dining experience.
Awhile back my boyfriend and I were looking for wedding venues and had a wonderful lunch at Salem Cross.

We had our wedding as Salem Cross on September 17, 2016. We were aiming for a casual afternoon reception for around 100 people and Salem Cross was perfect! The weather was beautiful for an outside cocktail hour. The food was delicious. And I wish I had a regular supply of the cupcakes. :)  And best of all it seemed effortless!  Donna was wonderful to work with on the planning.

I know where we'll be heading for our anniversaries in the future!
Dad was celebrating his 83rd birthday and this is where he wanted to go. We were a family party of 6 and this was Dads third time here and my first. There was a wedding going on here so the parking lot was full but surprisingly the restaurant was only about half full at 6 PM on a fall Saturday. We had reservations and were seated immediately. Our waitress was prompt, friendly and helpful but did not hover or intrude on the evening.  The menu had something for most every taste but was not so long that a choice was difficult. This is definitely a family friendly restaurant and the dining areas are mostly open space not lending to intimate conversation. 

The food was delicious. We had the French onion soup, baked stuffed shrimp, lobster special, lemon shrimp and chicken for dinner. The servings were generous but not so large that we took anything home. We had dessert as well and would recommend the key lime pie, strawberry rhubarb crisp and the cream puff with ice cream.  There wasn't a single item that we would not recommend or eat again if given the chance.  This is not close to where we live but I would consider driving the hour to go again. 

This is a very old farmhouse type building with wide pine floors and all exposed wood beam interior.  
Came here to celebrate my birthday with my hubby since we read good reviews about the food and ambiance. Unfortunately I didn't feel like it was a celebratory occasion at all! First of all, the dining area was drab and acoustic terrible as you could literally hear the conversations of other guests even as far as 15 feet. Worst was the food and service which was unexpected for a highly rated restaurant. I ordered their lobster special which was tasty and fresh, but the vegetables were dry like it had been previously sliced many hours ahead before serving. I wasn't given a bib, no drawn butter, no shell cracker, no lobster pick, no bone or shell dish, and no wipes!  When we asked for a cracker, our waitress didn't seem to know what it was, and they didn't have a pick! Unbelievable! My husband ordered steak medium rare, but it was served over cooked. When we had it replaced, Our waitress seemed indifferent about the whole thing and offered no apology.  There was even no visit from the manager to apologize and check on us. And when the second one came, it was bland, texture unusually smooth almost like tofu, and barely edible. At that point, we just wanted to leave right away. Very disappointing experience!
We can't say enough about how amazing our wedding was at the Salem Cross Inn. The view alone sold us but when we tried the food at one of their fire place feasts we were sold! It's only been a couple days but our guests can't stop talking about how great everything was! We worked with Donna and she was so responsive to all my questions. If you're looking for a venue with a great ambiance both inside and out and fantastic food this is the place!
This whole property is phenomenal.  Gorgeous building and grounds, staff in appropriate attire.  The food unfortunately is sub-par but priced pretty high.  I have seen the manager be extremely rude to staff and stand-offish to customers.  Went there for an appointment with a family member to look at site for reception but the woman seemed to have better things to do and barely gave us the time of day even though we had wanted to book the place we didn't just because of her.  I have found the wait staff to be friendly though.
     I really loved this place. We went for the fireside feast. It's quite an experience & offers hands on activities throughout the event. You can help put together the evening soup in a cauldron hanging in a large fireplace; get a demo on making a homemade pie; there's a reception with wine, mead, beer & other offerings as well as cheese & crackers & other appetizers. If there's snow, they offer a horse drawn sleigh ride in the winter months. Seating is communal. It felt very uplifting, unique & the food was phenomenal. You definitely leave feeling full. 
My husband and I recently celebrated our anniversary at the Salem Cross Inn.  Having lunched there several times over the years, we were happy to find things hadn't changed much. We were promptly seated and our server went over the specials after taking our drink order. The bread basket was filled with freshly baked biscuits and zucchini muffins.  For the appetizer, I opted for the chilled gazpacho, refreshing and brimming with fresh garden vegetables. My husband had the tomato tart, an individual puff pastry baked with tomatoes from the restaurant's garden.  My lobster roll, served with French fries ( other options were available), was absolutely delicious with just the right amount of mayonnaise and celery and ample amount of sweet lobster.  The best lobster roll I have had all summer. My husband's entree, grilled swordfish with pineapple salsa, proved to be delicious as well. It was served with fingerling potatoes and a plate of sliced fresh tomatoes.  My dessert, a cheesecake shooter, was just the right ending to the meal--just enough cheesecake bliss without feeling stuffed. My husband's individual blueberry pie was served piping hot in a ramekin, topped with whipped cream.  Both desserts were presented with a candle and a waitstaff singing "happy anniversary..."  Throughout the meal, our server and the hostess came by to fill the water glasses and ask if we were enjoying the meal.  
After the meal, we meandered on the grounds a bit, admiring the views. A perfect way to end a relaxing lunch. 
 
We have been there several  times over the years and have always had great meals and appetizers and very good deserts. If you enjoy a nice ride and a really nice place to eat this is the Inn to go to.
I have frequented Salem Cross inn for 50 years! The Salem Family are my antique auction customers. I like everything about this restaurant including the 2 miles from my home. Enjoy the ride!
We go here somewhat regularly and usually eat in the tavern downstairs. It is very comfortable and has a nice atmosphere. The tavern uses it's own beef from the farm and they serve one of the best burgers I've ever eaten. Service is top notch there also. Highly recommend.
Ceremony location outside was beautiful! Really cool place for a wedding. Food was great! Very cool place.
Delicious lunch with something for all appetites. Try the crispy brussel sprouts...you won't be sorry!
best most generous portions of food I have ever had.    all cooked over wood fire.    great service from staff    live band was amazing and played variety of oldies and newbies.     nice restaurant that's sits on many many acres of land.    most events you prepay for tickets so look on website.    can't wait to go again 
Loved the 1700's colonial atmosphere set on a picturesque farm! The food was delicious! I had the lavender duck, and I highly recommend it! Can't wait to go back for the "farmer's dinner" this summer. What a hidden gem, you won't be sorry you dined here! 
I had lunch here on Tuesday of this week with two friends. There was only one table occupied when we arrived at noon, but we soon had a lot more company in the large, comfortable, dining room. The menu had something for everyone, and we made our selections easily. Both of my friends enjoyed their entrees. One had the Monterey Jack Chicken and the other Atlantic Haddock. My grilled chicken breast sandwich was tasty and too much to finish. Maybe I ate too many of the french fries, even though they were nothing special. We divided a large slice of chocolate mousse cake between us. A delicious ending to our lunch. Our server was a lovely young lady, who was pleasant and efficient.
Dining room had a clean look with some old touches...heard it had been recently renovated. Server was friendly, she brought a basket of popcorn while we were looking at the menu. Bar was busy but not overly loud. Lots of traditional dishes on the menu. Had the meatloaf...two big slices, homestyle mashed potatoes and perfectly cooked green beans. Dessert was cheesecake, smooth and creamy. Good place for a casual dinner of comfort food.
I was visiting some old friends in Sturbridge and they decided to take me out to some old haunts...the Tavern was one of them.  I haven't been there in more than 10 years.  It was Saturday night, it was quiet, no music/band/dj & there weren't many people there.  That was the deadest bar I've ever seen on a Saturday night (even for a small town like West Brookfield)!  They've made some improvements, but some of them aren't for the better.  I like the old bar area better, it looked much more comfortable & inviting.  We were only here for drinks.  I heard the food was good, so maybe I'll come back for lunch or dinner...but I definitely won't go back for drinks, fun, & dancing with my friends!  There wasn't any fun or dancing...
I ordered chili and onion rings for dinner.  The chili was meaty, spicy and fresh.  The onion rings were also fresh.  But the star of the meal was dessert.  Cheesecake with blueberries!  The blueberries were fresh, not frozen.  The cheesecake was fresh and creamy.  I would come back just for the dessert.

This is a local place and one I like to visit often.... great food, good service and family business worth supporting
Stopped in for lunch as we have been wanting to try Ye Old Tavern for some time.  Not a lot of options for vegetarians so we tried the Veggie Burgers, one of us had fries the other onion rings.  The meal was good but nothing special.   Server was fine.  We were disappointed in the atmosphere, the restaurant has been redone fairly recently and a lot of money must have been spent on it, it is fine for what it is but the feel of the old New England tavern is now completely gone.
Family visit after a local wake. Our server was very friendly and helpful - a happy person on a sad evening. Food was average pub like food. A little disappointing that the nachos had cheese wiz cheese and not real cheddar. Pizza was good -thin crispy crust and fresh steamed veggies. The Shepard's Pie was a generous serving, but a little bland. Steak tips were cooked to perfection -  medium well and another generous serving. Plenty for another meal. 
October 2 we got married here it was absolutely beautiful. It is very rustic historic and tons of ambiance. We can't thank the staff and amazing owners for making our special day go as well as it did.
It was Beautiful inside .My daughter likes country. The rooms have been done over nicely and the wide pine floors are beautiful. We loved the fireplaces, Staying with  country , she choose Ham and turkey dinner with all the trimmings .The food kept coming out .There was so much food that some went up for seconds. My grandchildren loved the fruit and cheese trays  and again plenty ! Cindy the owner was wonderful ! All of the staff were great! I gave them only four stars because they  are working on the outside of the building and front of the building was not done for photo's/ But I know when I go back in the Spring time it will and then I will give them a five star.
Been the the tavern multiple times and they just completed yet another renovation. Its a nice family establishment that also has a town bar. Its well lit (almost too much at night) and they have lots of booths and flat screen TVs, pool table and nice decor. 

They have a extensive menu from burgers to pizzas and lots of local brews on tap. The service is excellent with many waitresses. The food take a while to make (but its fresh) and tasty. 

Make a trip for lunch on dinner and you will leave happy.
Had a light dinner on a Friday evening, and the place was bustling.  Enjoyed a salad and generous appetizer.  Staff was great and prices reasonable.  Will return next time I have an event at nearby Whiskey Hill!   
The Tavern is a historic building (a B n' B), extensively modernized in 2014. Local and family owned and operated. Menu is limited, but that's good as they can stick to doing standard fare well and without a fuss. I wish more places did that. 

The building is split into the Tavern or Pub side, and a front-dining or banquet room side. It can get a bit loud and distracting especially with any PA system or TV (that's an issue with me for another day for many dining places), but the dining room is used mostly for banquets and busy day dinner crowds, and generally the TV's are not on "high volume" in the pub side (yeah!)

Their brick-oven pizza's are fantastic and the best meal on the menu, bar none. Any take-home slices heat up well (you know regular shop pizza can get soggy and lose flavor on a re-heat). The pizza topping options are enough to make you try one and pick-out another or two for a home meal.

The burgers are standard offerings, fresh and filling. I'm good to go with their Tavern Burger with cheese (several types offered). The french fries are good, but I'll be honest and say I don't know if they are made and sliced in-house or bagged-in from a supplier, but a bit of a dusting of a Tavern-designed spice or something to make them stand out would be a topper.

Plenty of parking in the back and on the Main street. Depending on the time of day, its also a hangout for a few locals at the bar, or for like me, stopping to grab a bite or pizzas on the way home after a long day.

Pricing for food is very good, but maybe a buck higher than they should be for the drink's especially if at lunch time (just my opinion). A bowl of good popcorn is offered when you seat, a nice plus.  It's not quite cheap eats, but also not into the high mid-range; they are in between.

Modest beer selection, but I'd like to see them have some of the local winery and regional brewery offerings. Central Mass does have a few breweries they could highlight and utilize. I would pay that extra buck for a local brew bottle or local gem (again, just my opinion).

Young bartenders are good at mixed drinks (i.e. takes years to make a great martini), they do listen and seem to take a tip or trick to memory to step up their skill level.. 

I'm giving "very good" across the board as they have been consistent with their food offerings, the service and attention.

My wife and I are always happy and satisfied when we leave after a meal, and we stop at least once month as we live the next town over. I hope the owners and staffs effort and hard work continues.
This local establishment has been in West Brookfield for many years. Recent renovations have improved the atmosphere considerably. Food is good at a reasonable price. I had the baked haddock and my husband ordered the chicken pot pie. We were both happy with our meals. We have also attended parties in the larger banquet room where everyone had a great time.
We frequently go the Tavern. Whether for dinner or just drinks we are always pleased with service, taste and value!! Renovations are made a great place even better!
Ye olde tavern is a great place. Newly renovated and clean. The waitresses, bartenders, and cooks all do a superior job. The pizza is especially outstanding. Great place to grab some drinks and play pool or have a family meal. Great experiences there!!! 
There were doing renovations at time but waitress / bartender / keno girl did everything and was pleasant nice and on point would suggest to others 
Very busy all the time here - a local hang out. Bar and pool table combined with a small restaurant seating area - guess everyone knows your name.
I had the steak tip salad that was so good I got it again as a take out a couple nights later. Hubby had a steak sandwich, which he liked. A friend with us had the Mac & Cheese, which he gets often - said it is very good. 
When I got the take out, Hubby got the house special pizza. I had one piece - thought it was good - and he liked it - but he is not used to all the oil they used and he visited the john quite a bit the next day.
Went there a couple days later for a function - they had wings - which were good - not great, not bad - but good.
All in all, I will be back - no complaints. But you can be sure I'll be considering the steak tips.
Waitresses were harried it was so busy so weren't as attentive as I would have liked but they did nothing WRONG.
I was very surprised to see the negative comments listed about this restaurant. Not to say those people did not have those experiences, but only that my husband and I have only ever had WONDERFUL experiences at Ye Olde Tavern. 

We moved to New England about 7 months ago and struggled to find a place with good food that didn't cost a fortune. We tried YOT on a whim, and have since gone back multiple times, and even taken our out-of-town guests to eat there. 

YOT is not a "fancy" or "upscale" restaurant. It's a pub; it has a pool table, a bar, a jukebox, and the decor is eclectic. However, it is clean, cozy, and seems to be where the town congregates during the evening. It reminds me of the old sitcom Cheers - a place where everyone knows your name. People come to drink (but I have NEVER seen anyone who was "drunk" or behaved in any loud, obnoxious, or obscene manner), to eat with their family, including their kids (who have always been well-behaved while we were there), and to pick up to-go orders. 

We have had several different waitresses over the times we have gone - all of them have been very pleasant and attentive. Even when we have had less experienced "new" waitresses, they have been very nice and gone out of their way to take care of us. 

The food has always been good. Word of advice, however - do not go here if you are in a hurry. They cook everything to order, so it takes longer than it would at other restaurants. While some may find this an inconvenience, I actually like it - I can customize things to my liking. And, the food is worth the wait. 

Let me just say - the quesadilla appetizer will ruin all other quesadillas for you! They come out piping hot, perfectly crisp, stuffed to the brim with cheesy, meaty deliciousness! Just typing about them is making my mouth water. I have also had their fried pickles. To be honest, I usually hate fried pickles (gasp, the horror, I know) but I actually really enjoyed the ones here. 

YOT is also one of the only places I have found that I can order my burger LESS than well-done. They will cook your hamburger TO YOUR LIKING, which is such a refreshing change of pace from most restaurants. Between my husband, our friends, family and I, we have tried lots of menu items: Potato Skins, Salads, Chowder, BBQ Burger, Chicken Sandwich, Fish & Chips, Chicken & Broccoli Alfredo, Chicken Pot Pie, Meat Loaf, Steak Tips, Delmonico Steak, Pork Chops, American Chop Suey, and some of their non-menu daily specials. 

Overall, it is wonderful food. Personally, the Chop Suey (kind of like a sweet, non-spicy version of Hungarian Goulash) was way too sweet for my taste, and the Pork Chops were cooked a little too dry, but on the whole, this restaurant has become a staple for us. We keep going back - not just for the food, but for the atmosphere and the service. We get the package deal here. I am sorry that others who posted on here did not have the same experience we routinely receive. I can only speak from my own experiences and urge people to at least give this place a try. I think you will find that it is a little gem in West Brookfield!
The name and actual building make you think it is a nicer establishment than what it is.This is basically a noisy dirty old bar trying to do dinner. I rarely give a bad review but this one justifies one! I don't know where to begin so I wont   just trust me spend your money elsewhere anywhere just not here. For a few dollars more go to the Salem Cross Inn, far superior in all aspects.
We had contacted the restaurant months prior to our visit to confirm separate checks would not be a problem since we were a big group of couples and friends dining together. Our contact had indicated it would not be a problem, however on our arrival we were met with nothing but attitude from our waitress. Her response was "I don't thinks so!!" insert attitude here. Even when asked to consult with her superior we got "I don't thinks so, its NOT happening" Since many of us had just brought credit cards because we had been informed separate checks would not be a problem , we were going to go elsewhere when the manger came out and said she would "just get it done".  The food took quite some time over 1 hr for salads and pizza, the restaurant was not sufficiently air conditioned with the two ancient window a/cs . It was  probably about 80 degrees in the restaurant.  The food however was delicious and plentiful and the price was reasonable. Which is the only reason this place got two stars. The attitude was unbearable and will NOT be going back unless I am in the mood for a plate of attitude served by a waitress dripping sweat all over everything.
We dropped in on our way home from Sturbridge, an historic town in Western MA.  We knew of the Tavern because of informal "reviews" by our grown sons and their friends, who frequently praised the pizza and beer.

They were right.  We prefer our pizza crust thin and our ingredients fresh.  The fresh basil/tomato with white sauce was far from disappointing!  With the draft beer accompaniment, this was perfect for yet another day of our heat wave.

If you find your self in this historic area and in the mood for something really local, not touristy, check this out.
YES!!!!!!
Finally a new place in the 585 to get Pizza and George's Nails it. We started simple for a first order 2 pizza's and French Fries and we'll be back for more. Pizza is as good as any around here and the fries are a come back for more item. Fast courteous service 30 second walk from the Common for a quiet setting to eat.
We've ordered take-out pizza - the house special - on several occasions, and it has been delicious every time. No soggy crust. No excess grease. Also, the Italian grinder on the sidewalk under an umbrella is delightful. George's is a definite plus on the local scene.
I adore the Steak Tip dinner at George's.  I had them deliver the food to me, and I got my food very quickly and the driver was friendly.  With the dinner I got a small garden salad (dressing on the side), a garlic breadstick, tender marinated steak tips -- the meat was so flavorful and soft, cooked just right -- sauteed onions & peppers.  Before delivery, this was only $10.95!  This usually comes either fries or rice pilaf but I substituted in onion rings instead for a small extra charge.  FANTASTIC.  I have so far recommended this meal to everyone on my Facebook friend list, and to several of my company's customers in person when they want to know where to eat in town.
I can only review 1 dish here as every time I go here I order the same thing! Eggs Benedict but made with tomatoes and spinach. My husband recently had a meatloaf omelette and he said it was his new favorite, I couldnt talk as my mouth was full of hashbrowns and bacon.
Visited at noon-ish on a Wednesday. Not too busy. Great coffee, of refills. Serve breakfast all day,Three of us had breakfast, three lunch. Eggs, bacon cooked perfectly, Ham delicious.  Variety of toasts, Home fries were the best !! Large French fries good. Clean pleasant atmosphere, good prices. We closed the place at 2. We were well tolerated for a large group.
I absolutely love this place for breakfast and lunch. The owner/cook brings locally grown, fresh produce to the table and you can tell with every bite, how fresh everything is. My all time favorite breakfast is the Fresh Spinach Eggs Benedick. I have tried it at other places and Haymakers, so far, is the only place that services it with the fresh spinach and homemade home-fries. Amazingly delicious.
Now for lunch, you must try the locally grown beef used to make her hamburgs. What a difference in flavor and texture. I always order it with fresh mushrooms and Swiss cheese on toasted pumpernickel or marble rye. You must, must order her freshly made-to-order potato salad as well to go with it, instead of fries. I sometimes just ask her to make me a batch so I can have it later that night to compliment my dinner at home. 
The decor is your typical old dinner with counter stools and a few tables, but I tell ya what, belly up to the table, grab the newspaper and enjoy the local flavor.
My boyfriend and I both work in the food industry, working long hours. So when Sunday rolls around on our day off, we know exactly where we can go to get fantastic, fresh, made-to order food, the way we would want to cook it. It's one of our favorite secret place's to go. Well, not so secret anymore :)
A great dinner that gets dinner food right, a friendly staff with personality. Quick service with great portions with plenty of local flavor.
3 pancakes were over 5 inches high!  And light and airy as well - my kind of breakfast.  My husband had them with blueberries - next time that's what I'll have.  Coffee was hot and tasty as well.  Great local spot, with excellent service.  Try it - no worries here!
Excellent breakfast. Had the meat lovers omellette. Great cup of coffee. Very friendly staff.Reasonable prices. Plenty to eat. Clean bathrooms.
Steve and I  stopped  after chruch on sundays.  The food is really  good. The staff is fun to talk to. Every thing I eat here is good they   had alot of the specials on the board. Stop by you won't be disappointed. 
A local place with hardworking creative folks...a place you want to stop in and give it a shake.  Never disappointed.
Food was excellent, they make the eggs the way you want them. Bacon cooked perfect. Home fries are very yummy. Waitress friendly, Nice you can see the owner/cooking your breakfast with a happy smile, thru the opening to back kitchen area. Will visit again when back in area visiting family. Highly recommended!!!
Great variety ,good service,,,food was great would definetly go again,,,For a holiday service was great
I have eaten breakfast at Haymakers Grill many times. Every time I have gone I have not
been  disappointed. They give you large portions and the meal is always hot. One thing 
I do not like about being served breakfast is that it comes out cold or some of it is 
cold. This place always has a few specials for breakfast on their board. They have 
great bacon and bacon is number one with me. The cook is great and she is very fast. 
You order and it is there in a few minutes.
Excellent pizza!  great grinders and the meals are wonderful!

Whether eating in or taking out the food has been just great.
have been here a few time and food i always excellent--best veal parm anywhere---just do not go when the antique show is on
We always eat here at least once every time they have the Antique Show. This week we went twice service was great food was delicious served hot and way more then we could eat. Leftovers were great. Service was super one waitress knew what my wife was going to have without asking. Highly recommended.
My wife and I stopped in on July 6th for diner after returning from Boston because one of our friends who eat their quite often said we should try it !
I ordered the veal parm and my wife had the chicken parm. First off the portions were small, nothing about the food that stood out  to want you to come back. 
It is a glorified pizza parlor, it can be noisy, but the food is good and the prices are very fair. I love the Chicken Parmesan and go there specifically for it. My wife goes for the Eggplant Parmesan. I haven't found either better and have tried it in many places. I go for this dinner not the experience. They also make a very good combo pizza. Be sure to ask how many slices are in the pizza you order because a small is really easily for tw0.
I have been here several times.....and overall it is just passable. I am not thrilled with the food, but the atmosphere is nice considering I go during Brimfield and there are tons of interesting folks/friends. The food is just ok....really not that great, and I do not believe hand made. Seems to me it is all canned and package/prepared.....nothing is inspired. It gets busy do to traffic and not many other eateries at night where you can sit and eat with friends. The service is at best so so, but I have had good service although usually not.....as I dont think they are used to being so busy. there is a bar and very often a 15 minute wait during the busiest Monday - Thurs nights during the rush. Ive learned to eat there with some friends for one night, but try to drive past for the rest.......no offense.
We have dined here during the Brimfield Antique Fair in May 2016.
First, 20 Palmer Road “Francesco Restaurant Inc” and this 45 Palmer road “Francesco's Restaurant” are the same. There is no other Francesco's in the vicinity serving the same Italian foods. And, the red brick columns with the glove lighting on Palmer Road is definitely 45 Palmer Road. 

We had Fried Calamari (Small portion, bland batter), Meatballs (good, but bland sauce), Veal Scallopini (oily, with eggplant marinara sauce), Zuppa De Pesce (our choice of Ziti, with White Olive oil, Garlic sauce, bland, huge for even 2 persons/ changed spaghetti to Broccoli on our 2nd visit, still huge)

They have a separate bar with full alcohol menu, too.

(pros)
It is right at the center of the fair site, where we find it the only one visible for the first time visitors.
They have their own parking lot, where you can always find the parking spot, although the restaurant is full. Most of the vendors seem to walk up to this place. 

Although their usual opening hours are till 9pm, we were allowed to enter and eat even till later than 10pm. We thanked the staff for accommodating us at the late hours. 
Also, although we had to wait, the waiting was less than 15minutes on 1nd night of the fair. 
They have a bar if the patron wants to wait inside, but it is quite crowded during the fair.
The food portion was HUGE and they seem to have their own “house recipe” as their sauces taste different from the other typical Italian restaurant (for example, North End Boston)
The price range of main dishes are $15~26  and most of the dinner orders come with either a small salad or a cup of today's soup. The portion is big and some people end up taking the doggy bags. Our seafood pasta could fill the sink bowl and I could not finish even the half.
Our server, Sydney was very attentive, although it was a crazy busy dinner hours, into the late night. I really hope she gets recognized by the owner.

(cons)
It attracts the very casual diners, and, the taste of the dishes are slightly bland and sauces too oily or watery(can be good with less salty) although the food was served quick and somewhat fresher than expected. 

No waiting area for the waiting guests. It is just the parking lot spaces right outside the doors.
Some young visitors to the fair can be a little bothersome, arriving drunk and waiting together outside,  but the restaurant has no control of them, understandably.

Importantly, the waiting servers are quite crude and dictated our rating. Unlike the first server, Sydney, the owner lady and the others are curt and definitely don't handle the arriving customers professionally. 
While we were eating our meal, another server remove the grated cheese from our table without asking.
Later, another waitresses come and remove the empty plates and the table without asking us first, and set the table with new silverware,  as if she didn't see we were still sitting there. She wiped the table for the next day, while we were sipping our beer.
Maybe we cannot expect such professional hospitality on the countryside. But, better training will definitely benefit their business. 
Sydney from the first visit stands out as a great server. She even remembered us and greeted us from a distance, while others don't show the initial welcoming gesture. So, look for Sydney to have a great experience. 
_______________________
Altogether. It is quite a 3-star experience, but, you will realized that there is no other dinner choice during the fair week, unless you head to Sturbridge or Springfield. Probably write down the restaurant list and their address before your trip starts. There was no GPS signal to get anywhere until we drove away from the fair site. 
For us, we had to deal with slight crude manners. But, if you decided to visit this place, you will still enjoy the vibrant atmosphere during the fair weeks, the vendors/diners are pleasant. 

I guess it wasn't too bad after all.
Just a glorified pizza parlor!  Loud noisy screaming kids! Oh god what a hellish experience!  To make it worse food was awful!
Have always referred to Francesco's as our favorite Italian restaurant. Haven't visited Mass in 10+ years, finally got back there and Francesco's was still awesome! Chicken Francaise was delicious, garlic bread, YUM!! Service was also excellent, great family restaurant atmosphere.
I went to Francesco's in February 2016, very family friendly restaurant to eat, and also friends, and business.
Horrible meal canned sauce and boxed pasta. Chicken parm bad, veal parm not edible. Salad was wilted and some brown.
Appetizers bad. Service horrible could not even bring plates or bread u till after appetizers served. I KNOW its  small town but not worth it.

Skip this place poor food poor service .
The restaurant is very nice, the service was very good.  My party was well cared for; however, I had the pan-fried veal, and it was terrible--like a piece of show leather.  Two other ladies also had the same as I did, and they , too, left most of it.  It tasted nothing, and it was just not good.  It should be taken off the menu.  The meals of the other 5 people were very, very good, and I would return to the restaurant some time and order some of the other selections.  Sorry, but I felt you should know about this particular meal.
Based upon reviews, targeted this place for a late lunch. Nice place, good service, friendly staff, food only so-so. My wife had the Baked Stuffed Lasagna and said it was just OK, My Chicken Parmigiana was far from he best I've had. The sauce was very watery without much taste and the chicken portion under the cheese was so hot I couldn't taste it but the rest was OK. Portions were plentiful and reasonably priced. Don't think we'll be back.
The server was really nice and the service was fast. My friend and I ordered the chicken franchese to share and it was huge! The bread was really warm and tasted great. The only thing that we didnt like were the salads. They were watery and had little no no flavor.
Consistently good.  Love the scallops...if you want them in a spicy sauce just ask they will make it for you
We have had several family dinners at Francescos over the past few years.  They have provided consistent but not outstanding fare.  We have noticed that the restaurant is often very busy on weekends.  Service has been adequate but also not outstanding.
Looks like a family business.  Smells like home cooking when you walk in the door.  Overall the food was very good and the portions were large.   When looking around it looked like there were a lot of locals, which usually means good food.
Been to Francesco's on several occasions and have always been satisfied. The food is very good and the service is too. I have never had a bad experience or left hungry. I have been to too many restaurants and didn't get enough to eat. I'd rather take some home to enjoy again then leave not having enough. Below for some reason whenever I selected excellent for service food and  value it wouldn't allow it but auto entered very good average and very good. Those are not my selections.
Please see the reviews under Francesco's Italian Restaurant, Brimfield. These are one and the same. We're repeat customers whenever we can afford the trip. I can only vouch for lunch but then, it's quiet, unhurried and fabulous. No senior specials so be prepared for $15.00 pp for lunch but the red sauce is superb. 
This Italian restaurant is also listed on Trip Advisor as Francesco's Restaurant, Inc. I'm finding it difficult to understand the low-rated reviews that are in place. We found this eatery when a friend requested it as a birthday celebration location and we're hooked! I can't seem to get beyond the chicken parmesian ; their red sauce is FABULOUS! Fresh hot bread, with refills on request and delicious salad ( ask for the house Italian dressing) only serve to cement Francesco's on my list of favorites. The scallops are HUGE, but tender. This is not a fast food restaurant but the waitstaff is pleasant and attentive. We like to go for a late lunch when it's quiet. There's a TV and bar - so the atmosphere may change if this gets filled but when we've been, it has been a lovely family destination. Francesco's calls my name about once a month and we travel 1/2 hr to get our favorite Italian meal. Lunch runs under $15.00 / person.
Boring, terribly cooked food, the people are rude, screwed up orders and well, go somewhere else if u dont want cheap junk  !!!
Brimfield House has great seafood.  Every grinder I have tried has been very good.  They have a good variety of grinders so there is a nice selection for everyone.  However its pizza is poor.  Barely above a generic frozen pizza bought from a store
Visit Brimfield often to go Antiquing throughout the year and this House of Pizza has always been a favorite stop. Prices are reasonable, service is great (both delivery and in house) and most importantly, the food is GREAT!! From Salads to Dinners or Pizza this is a stop you won't regret...the Baklava is a great after dinner treat too! :)

A small old style town with great hospitality!!  
I was at this restaurant during the Antique Show and decided on the Greek Omelet!!!  It was terrific and service was great.  I had no problem letting them know.  I tried posting from the restaurant, but it didn't go through.  Thank you again and good luck!!
I have both picked up food here and had delivery.  Everything I have had, pizzas, salads and sandwiches have always been good.  If you go there, never, ever, park in back of the restaurant, you may run into the creepy guy I met the first time I went there who told me I was not supposed to park in the back.  I had already picked up my food and was on my way out, he told me I should not park there.  I said okay and proceeded to leave.  As I was backing out, he said to me, "leaving so soon?"  Really?   Did he expect me to stay?  As long as you don't encounter him, you will have a good experience.
This restaurant is a typical Greek-style pizza place in a small town.  We gave it a shot and tried their Gyro, which I would rate as average.  It was forgettable.  What we very vividly remember was the extremely dirty fish tank, which in fact turned out to be a frog tank.  Odd.  Very odd.  The restaurant was not the definition of clean.  The carpets were very dirty and the bathroom were not much better.
I'm sorry I can't say more about the food, but the other aspects of our visit will keep us away.
Visited twice during Brimfield antiques week, the busiest time of year. The staff was obviously under duress, but they handled it professionally. The food is very good! I love that they serve Greek salad, gyros and baklava! And I saw several pasta dinners that looked very good also. The dining room is utilitarian. Don't expect much in the way of ambiance.
Ordered a pizza on our way home from a rainy day in Salem. Pizza was fresh when we got there & very yummy when we got home! Will be back!
All we have tried here is the pizza.  I love combo pizzas and they are a pretty good pie with lots of stuff.
Ordered Ceasars salad wrap which took 15 mins and I was the only person in the place. ..first bad sign. I think I order a wrap but instead I get a salad. I tell the owner I'm driving and can eat a salad and ask him if he could put it in a wrap. They don't wrap it so it falls apart. I go back and he accuses me of not wanting food at all but just wanting to use their bathroom which was filthy,  like the rest of the restaurant.
Great. Greek pizza and other foods...best for take out...but can eat inside...I have only done take out...but the food is consistently good.
We went here for a evening snack...it was okay we had the chicken tenders and brocoli bites.  No one was eating at the restaurant but several people came for take out.  
This is a roadside BBQ with a smoker truck under a big yellow umbrella!
We had Pig Park BBQ cater our dinner for our Family Reunion barbecue.  We were very pleased with it.  The meal was prepared and brought to our location.  It was delivered professionally and was very well prepared and delicious.  We had pulled pork with two sauces, barbecue chicken, very flavorful baked beans, coleslaw and buttered corn muffins.  Everyone remarked about how good the food was.

They also can bring their smoker to your barbecue and cook the meal on site - at additional cost.
Love love love the pig bowl! It is a smoker truck on side of toad. Open generally Thursday Friday and Saturday.  Big yellow umbrella. Stop by if you catch it open!
If your in the mood for barbque this is the place to stop ! The food is great and the bbq beans were awesome , variety of entre s and sides were plentyful all with very good flavor ! I would definitely stop there again !
This is a very casual, local place that has great breakfasts and lunches. As a local myself, its my go-to place on a Saturday morning.  Waitstaff is always friendly and welcoming.
My girlfriend and I have been here several times, and love it! It has been fairly busy when we have gone and the quilts of the food has been great. We will be back again
It is more of a light snack place. Nothing special. But the temp worker/cashier she was really polite and friendly. 
Call here every year when in the area. Eat here every day open.
Excellent food. Excellent service.
Specials are great. This time had the California Eggs Benedict - fantastic with perfectly cooked eggs, beautiful presentation and taste. Partner had the Confederate Eggs Benedict also perfect.
My husband and I stopped here on a Sunday morning, on the way to Umass in Amherst. Cute place, clean, nice music, attentive staff, good coffee and the best eggs benedict I've ever had! I had the special- eggs benedict on a toasted bagget with Boars Head Bacon, grilled asparagus and potatoes. My husband got the oatmeal special- vanilla, raisons, brown sugar and walnuts. Good selection on the menu. We will make a point to stop here the next time we pass through.
Excellent fresh breakfast made with products by local merchants. Food is always delicious. Even aimple things like their egg sandwhiches are a cut abive the rest. Coffee is good. Will feel like amongst friends in a very homey atmosphere. 
My family will only eat at the Apple Barn Cafe when we are out in that area.  My kids say the delicious, freshly made-to-order food makes them not want to eat anywhere else.  I have to agree.  I always choose a different dish on our visits and have enjoyed all of them!   Each dish is made with fresh ingredients. The family friendly environment only adds to the visit. Friendly waiters and waitresses, clean place, makes us feel right at home very visit. By far the best restaurant we have ever had.
Wish they were open more frequently. Might make for less of a cluster on the weekends! I had the best breakfast item EVER there - it was a baked potato with bacon, a poached egg, salsa, guacamole and sour cream. It was every bite of heavenly! It also took almost an hour and the service was pretty lousy on that specific occasion. But it was worth the wait and we've had excellent service a couple other times. So for the most part, it's decent service. 

Some of the regular menu items are beyond delicious (the apple waffle/pancake whose name escapes me, their signature cocktails, etc.) but I almost always order a special if it looks good, given I may never see it again. 

Don't miss this stop if you're local Friday through Sunday. 
We have visited Apple Barn many times, and always enjoy our meal.   It is a shame that this Breakfast/Lunch stop is only open Friday - Sunday.  I highly recommend the Vermont Omelette, it is very well done, featuring green apples and Vermont cheddar.  Eggs Benedict is also one of their best, which my wife often orders.  Sunday is all-day breakfast and features creative specials.  The only thing that we've had that we don't recommend are the pancakes.

Note: You can also order a "real" drink, including bloody marys and momosas.  For me the coffee is just fine, though.

The service is friendly.  We have a small child and the servers are always more than willing to accommodate, quick to bring the high chair (which by the way is the best restaurant high chair we've ever had), and super-friendly to our daughter.

This restaurant may be located in a small town, but the quality is high enough to compete even in a town with multiple breakfast options.
Fantastic food at a very fair price. The Eggs Benedict were ti kill for. Service was quick and friendly.
Always delicious and thoughtfully prepared, the food and friendly, attentive service make this a place we visit often.
We've been going to the Apple Barn for breakfast for a few years now and we're never disappointed. The people that work there are always very friendly and the service is great.We've never had to wait for a server and our coffee and tea is brought to us almost right away. And the food is so good! I usually get the Nana's french toast which is my favorite. I've never had a breakfast that wasn't really good. I highly recommend the Apple Barn!
While visiting for the Brimfield Antique Fair I had a quick breakfast sandwich and it was delicious!  Piping hot and the bread was really soft and fresh!  YUM!
I like coming here for breakfast on Sunday mornings often. Even when there is no customers they certainly don't rush to serve you. This past Sunday we walked in and the front room was completely empty. We were told by the 3 waitresses and 1 hostess to sit anywhere and also were told " we are busy doing some PR right now, it will be a minute." Not sure what they were actually doing so we sat. I the mean time a young woman and child came in and they were very well known by the workers because the hostess went right over to her and made a fuss about her child. We still did not get menus yet. She finally came over with menus and asked if we wanted coffee, which we did. She brought that and left. We knew what we wanted and put our menus down. The waitresses were still behind the counter doing their PR work. The hostess went over to the woman and child and took her order. One of the waitresses went and delivered food. Finally another one stopped what she was doing, wondered into the back room and then came over to see if we were ready. By this time the woman and child who came in after us was getting their food. Just can't understand why those waitresses didn't stop what they were doing when we came in. Poor training. Poor customer service. Food was very good.
We had the clam chowder and it was very good and hot.  In the past we have had the sandwiches and they were also .good
We ate breakfast here on a Sunday, we did have to wait for a bit for a seat, but the wait staff made sure we had fresh coffee while we waited for our table....which was totally worth the wait! Our food was delicious. I had the Kentucky, which is similar to an eggs Benedict, but with their own twist. Others at the table had Apple Cider Pancakes, and Omelets that they also raved about. The staff was friendly and even helped with directions to a local hardware store. This will be on the top of our list the next visit we make to see our daughter! You won't be disappointed.
I truly enjoy going to the Apple Barn. The food is all homemade and fresh. You can tell the owner takes pride in what she prepares and has served. The staff is very friendly and it is nice to see the owners family working in the business. Family owned restaurants are not heard of anymore, with so many chain restaurants. I would recommend the Apple Barn to anyone and we always have a great experience. We bring our friends and family when visiting us too! Thank you all for a great place to come and enjoy.
Hands down the best breakfast in the area.

Great food, service, and atmosphere.  Did I say GREAT food!

Highly recommend!
Seems like it was either closed or we were not ready to eat when passing by(closed Mon&Tues). We were pleasantly surprised today for a late breakfast. Buttermilk pancakes and eggs&hash were great. Staff(the Collins family) couldn't have been friendlier! Will be back to try lunch soon! Hope to see you there!
we use trip adviser when traveling to find good restaurants. trip adviser came through with the apple barn cafe,we enjoyed our breakfast.
This was originally just a simple soft serve ice cream place, but over the years has grown into a full restaurant (in season with outdoor seating). An expansive and varied menu with burgers, fried foods, specialty menu items and of course, both soft and hard serve ice cream. there was even live entertainment, which it appears is a regular thing though not every day. Low cost, large portions, quick service and great food - with ice cream for dessert. We will be back, even though it's about 100 miles away from home; we'll detour here next summer when the general area; can't wait!
Janine's is a great stop for a quick bite. We spent the day at the Quabbin and stopped for lunch.  Great selection, large portions and delicious too. The picnic area was immaculate and the staff very pleasant.  They offer lots of flavors of ice cream and speciality ice cream treats with soft serve also. If you are in the area it is definitely worth a stop!  I know we plan to go again! Enjoy!
they have the most expensive grinders in town and the grinders aren't even the average size.  the food is so-so, the prices pretty high and the ice cream can be gotten anywhere
This, our first time at Janine’s, wasn’t a total bust, although it wasn’t a completely euphoric experience either.  We are devotees of Howard’s Drive-In in West Brookfield (we adore Howard’s half-pound lobster rolls) but after reading some really good online reviews of Janine’s Frostee, we thought we might as well check it out and make the drive a little further west on Route 9 on this Saturday evening.

We found the building setup/grounds and food options/prices at Janine’s very similar to those at Howard’s but Janine’s has a bit more seating under canopies.  I checked out the ladies’ bathroom and found it to be impeccably clean as were the grounds in general.   Being smokers, we also found their total non-smoking policy in the open air disappointing (we feel free to smoke at the picnic tables not under a canopy at Howard’s).

As we came specifically for Janine’s lobster rolls, we both ordered one.  While the quarter-pound rolls had all claw meat (perfectly cooked), we found the rolls missing any hint of mayonnaise or other dressing/condiment (how odd since the meat was not served warm with butter), rife with unevenly cut chunks of celery and way too much iceberg lettuce for the size of the rolls.  In fact, we found the rolls difficult to eat with such big chunks/whole claws and nothing to bind them together and after our first bites, I high-tailed it back to the food window to grab some mayo from the counter girl.  That done, I’m sorry to say that I was the unlucky one to find a small piece of shell and some cartilage within my roll.  No big deal, but that has never happened to either of us at Howard’s Drive-In.  The onion rings we shared were hot, crispy and quite tasty.  After consuming our rolls and rings, we headed to our vehicle to partake of our after-dinner smoke, after which we found it necessary to sample Janine’s ice cream (more than half the customers at the time we were there were ordering ice cream only).  Although Janine’s offers a plethora of Gifford’s of Maine ice cream flavors (hard), my companion and I both opted for small vanilla and chocolate “twists” of soft serve---very much enjoyed and almost too much to eat.

All in all, we thought the drive out from our home in Leicester a bit far considering the quality of their lobster rolls (definitely not THE BEST LOBSTER ROLLS EVER, as touted by a few online reviewers and Janine's website) and the smoking restriction.  We are pretty sure we will give a return visit to Janine’s a miss unless, for some unknown reason, we happen to find ourselves in Ware (highly unlikely).  But if so, why not just make the drive 10 minutes further to Howard’s for truly outstanding lobster rolls and equally delicious ice cream?
Located on Route 9, Ware, Janine's sparkles.  Seafood disappoints me a bit.It is not the biggest but it is the best overall.
As always, the picnic benches were spotless and the area clean. Food delicious, including those fries that I should not be eating. Both my sin and grandson enjoyed their meals as they disappeared in no time.
Very surprised by the quality and quantity of food and ice cream.  First time we stopped there and everything was super 
A great stop. Drive up and order,stay in your car, set under the awning or take home.  A large selection of sandwiches, soups, and plate dinners. Save room for dessert as they have big selection of ice cream including soft serve. Don't miss this place when in the area
A great drive in with delicious food; i.e. lobster rolls, soft service ice cream, soft drinks, and whatever your appetite desires.  People from surrounding towns continually drop in for their dining out experience.  Craft Fairs, antique car shows, etc. are sponsored by Janine's which are well attended.
A seasonal hot spot that won't let you down! Car shows, live music and good food and great frozen goddess are sure to make some summer memories. Inquire about their events so you don't miss out.
Excellent food especially the fried shrimp.  Pleasant dining out doors with plenty of room for all.  Attended a    n antique car show and was a lot of fun
This is a typical New England Clam Shack with an extensive menu of good food.  Dining outdoors is really nice.
This place speaks for itself! Been here a longggg time, gets busy in summer. They serve morre than just ice cream too! Fast food , cheerful servers. An oasis on a hot summer day.Local folks keep coming back....that tells you something!
Janine's is my favorite drive in when in the area. The food is just what you want at a drive in with excellent lobster rolls. 
Very good burgers and the ice cream was just right.  Nice atmosphere plenty of seating.  Portions were good sized.  
Mom and I both had the fish nugget dinners. They came with French fries and coleslaw. There were about 10 delicious chunks of fried haddock and a pile of fries on each of our plates! My Dad had their New England clam chowder and the lobster roll. He wolfed them both down! Then we topped it off by having kiddie size ice cream cones for dessert. Yummy! 
Janine's has grown from a little roadside stand to an outstanding stop or destination for an ice cream or a whole meal.  The food is always great and service is friendly. 
Their fresh seafood (esp fried shrimp) is fantastic!  East in your car or under canopied picnic tables.
This is a very popular stop along Route 9 outside of Ware. Lots of folks weather the winter waiting for the opening. There is both soft and hard ice cream, plus other frozen treats. They have a full menu of what you would expect at roadside - hamburgers, hot dogs, other. There is ample parking and ample seating. Be warned this place gets very busy on the weekends!
Janine's Frostee is an oasis of ice cream, hot dogs, burgers, seafood, and more! Live entertainment will often accompany your visit at this relaxing gathering place. There is plenty of outdoor seating (no indoor) with cover in case of a summer rain. They are closed during the winter months and usually open around mid-March. The staff is very energetic and friendly!
Janine's has been in Ware, MA for many years. It has expanded again and again to  be better able to serve it's customers one generation after another. They have fantastic ice cream, and fried seafood that you wait all year for. Their menu is extensive and will satisfy almost any customer. They also have "Polish Nights" where they serve all of our favorite Polish foods and feature local bands every weekend for those looking for some entertainment. Just a great place!
I am a connoisseur of fried clams! Recently I enjoyed a clam roll twice. The clams were scrumptious!
I am a squid/clam belly girl.  Because squid has been more affordable for me over the years, I chose something I knew...there is squid and there is squid!  So, I forked over close to $14.00 thinking I would be eating the rest of the suckers for breakfast there would be so many of them!  When I got them, the bag felt like there was nothing in it.  In truth, there was nothing in it other than a pile of nasty pickled peppers which made the tiny handful of minuscule cephlipods soggy.  No tenticules, the batter was insipid the pickles hard and got you in the back of the throat in a bad way.  My Brother and sister-in-law went there went there recently and watched rats racing around the outside of the building.  Avoid this place!
Stopped in for lunch and was pleasantly surprised to find reasonable prices and good fried seafood. Haddock, shrimp and scallops were all cooked just right,not too little or too much. Fries sadly weren't as good. Full bar, inside and outside seating available. Bathrooms are a bit funky but pretty clean.  I'll be back. 
The Clam Box in Brookfield was always a great place to enjoy terrific fried seafood at a very reasonable price until they lost their head chef about a year or two back through a tragic accident. 
After his loss the food was never quite as good and the portions much smaller than usual so we had not returned until I recently saw "New Chef" posted on their outdoor billboard.
I am so glad that I decided to give them a second chance and am happy to report that the food we had tonight was excellent in flavor, quality and quantity. 
If you had given up on the Clam Box I urge you to give them a second chance because the new management has made a wonderful difference and you won't be disappointed.  
The sign says "mini seafood platter, $8.99". Great deal right? Once you go inside to order you find out that platter is only available until 3:30 pm.  Nevertheless, we ordered.  The food was fresh and tasted good.
New management makes this a better place to eat. Food is great in flavor and portions but service wasn't great. Seemed understaffed and slow. Hoping this will get better once the new management gets the hang of it
We used to go here all the time for the seafood, hotdogs and ice cream. Lately there has been much to be desired. The prices went up and the quality and quantity of the food went down.
We received horrible service from the female manager on duty on April 15, 2016 regarding a mistake that a waitress had made the previous week.  The prior week I had phoned in an order and the waitress ringing in the order had accidentally pressed the wrong buttons. My husband picked up the food that night and wasn't aware of what I had ordered, so he didn't think to question the order. When we got the food home, the order was incorrect and not what we wanted, so there were family members that went without a meal that night. I immediately phoned back the restaurant, and the waitress told me to call another time when the manager was there.  I was told that I would receive the item that was made in error, but when I spoke with the manager on duty on April 15th, she rudely told me that she doesn't owe me anything.

Anyway, not the end of the world, but going forward we will only be giving our business to Howard's and Ronnie's.
They have great fish dinners. Plenty of food that is enough to share especially as elderly people  can't eat how much they  serve.
The seafood is good and tasty. The atmosphere is very casual and low key. You place your order at a window when you walk in and get your own beverage. They then bring the food out to you.
We have gone here several times and will continue to go back.
We've eaten there several times and never had a complaint.
It's a place to eat that serves OK seafood and that's about it.

We have been to the clambox many times and had great food. This time not so much. Ordered the large platter to share. Very few  clams, small shrimp, teeny tiny scallops, thin little piece of fish. Tons and tons of fries to make it look big. Could have gotten a better meal anywhere. Tables were dirty and tippy. Don't use the bathroom either. They have a cleaning checklist but it has not been used. Used to be one of my favorite places to go on a Sunday ride but not any more. Very expensive as well.
Its ok. The ice cream is better than the food. Prices are steep, reminiscent of clam shops along the shore, but not quite as good.  
The clam box has been in my town forever.  Great seafood ...elaborate menu to pick from.  The ice cream is the best around.  I have family coming from NY and they can't wait to go with me again.
We have been saying this for a year.  SO sad...we use to make this a frequent stop.  in the last 6 months  it has been old scallops, brown soup (because it was in the crock pot all day).  The haddock has gotten thinner and more $$$.  Just not worth the time or money.   Even the ice cream is way over priced and skimpy.  Save your money and skip this one.
This is the first and last time we will go to the Clam Box.We waited 50 minutes for our food to come out.Several other tables were complaining about the wait too.The food was not worth the wait, my daughter and husband had a hamburger, both said they were dry, my son had the fish and chips (his favorite) and couldn't eat the fish. I had the clam fritters and chowder. The clam fritters were great, the chowder was just o.k. the potatoes were hard. There was a sign out front advertising free soft serve on Fri & Sat. After 8:00. 3 young men were at the window ordering soft serve, they were told that the size they ordered wasn't free ( the sign didn't specify a size) they had to pay for it. When we got to the window they said they were all out of soft serve(strange coincidence...) we refused to give them any more of our money, we left and went to Dairy Queen. Absolutely disappointing experience.
My husband and I go here at least once a month.  We always get the seafood platter (the large one) and it's heaping!  We always have enough left over to bring some home.  Price is good for the amount of seafood you get and it tastes great!  Cooked just right.  

I really do wish they would bring back the breakfast buffet though.
The restaurant is just casual, but the food is the best we had in East Brookfield.  We were there five days, and we ate at the Clambox 3 times.

You can always tell when a restaurant is good by the number of cars in the parking lot.  The more cars, the better the food.  The Clam Box parking lot was full, so we stopped there for lunch.  If you are looking for a place where a server will come to your table, this isn't it.  (You order your meal at the window, then waitstaff will bring it to your table.)  If you are looking for a place where the food is good, reasonably priced, and the atmosphere is different, go there.  This is the only place I have ever found fried lobster.  Yummmmm!
Prices of seafood have gone WAY up.  My companion wanted the 2-way combo, any 2 fried items for $18.99, but fortunately was told when ordering there would be a surcharge of $4 for the clams and $1 for the scallops, skyrocketing the price to $23.99 so he opted out.  He then asked the price for a whole belly clam dinner and was told $28.  What??! He again opted out and settled for a baked dish that had no surcharge.  I ordered Athens baked haddock and they both came out in aluminum tins, which was not a problem because after all this is a drive-in.  Be aware everything you eat off of is disposable: plastic plates, plastic utensils, paper cups.  The baked dishes were only lukewarm and cold by the time we finished.  The Athens haddock has spinach and feta cheese and I’ve had it at another of their restaurants and it’s very good.  At the Clam Box there was not a speck of feta cheese to be found in the dish.  Fish was tough around the edges, as though it was microwaved.  As mentioned before, there were all teenagers/young adults working there.
This Restaurant is seasonal , but when they are open the breakfast is awesome.   I always get the Eggs Irish, and I can never finish it..
The breakfasts are really good and very reasonably priced. Lunches are good as well. Nice relaxed casual dining. The sea food on Friday nights is very good. Other than Friday nights, the restaurant is only open for breakfast and lunch
A few of us retired paper workers go out on Wednesdays together for some breakfast. The Kozy Kabin is one of our favorite restaurants! The quality of the food is excellent. The variety of breakfast options is over the top! You want it they have it. Quick service with a wonderful staff. Very friendly and helpful. Nice clean restaurant. We go on Wednesdays  and they offer a 10% discount for seniors on Wednesdays on top of their very reasonable prices. Stop in and try them out...you won't be disappointed.
Clean restaurant, cute atmosphere. Felt bad for the only waitress working. Several food items not for sale.  Scrambled eggs looks like they were cooked on a grill top not cleaned in weeks.  Hamburger was slimy.
Went in for a quick lunch. Very good fresh food - I had the fish sandwich, my husband had the turkey club. The place was very busy, but the food and service was quick and friendly. Will definitely stop in more often. 
We have been going to the Kozy Kabin once or twice a month for some time now.  The freshness of the fish is always consistent.  The friendliness of the wait staff makes every visit entertaining.  
Over about a year I tried to like this place...and failed.  Service was abysmal, waitresses only care about "regulars" and serve new customers as if they are crashing a private party.  

And, worse than the service is the food.  Had eggs Benedict that tasted like the sauce was actually canned chicken gravy on hand from 1960.  I wiped it off with my napkins that were then in a big pile on my plate.  The home fries were tasteless and cold so those were left.  The eggs were ok, but I didn't feel like eating them.  The waitress came by and asked if I were "all set".  I couldn't BELIEVE she looked at the food that was left and the "hollandaise" sauce sopped up with napkins and didn't ask, "WHAT WENT WRONG?"  I just wanted to get out of there so I said yes, paid the bill, and left.

That wasn't my first bad experience, and it was the last try for me.
I've been going to the Kozy Kabin for years and with different owners and I have never been disappointed with the food.  The breakfast menu is large and a good variety.  Eggs benedict, french toast, pancakes, omelets, and much more.  We regularly go there on Friday nights for fish and chips which is very good and a large portion.  You can even get a half portion of fish and chips.  The atmosphere is ok, but its the food that's really good.  They also serve beer, wine and mixed drinks.
We arrived on a Saturday and the place was not even half full so we expected breakfast would not take too long. WRONG! After several other customers arrived after us and were waited on before us we finally had a waitress arrive at our table. She was pleasant and took our order. After waiting for 30 minutes (no food yet) and observing several customers that arrived way after us get their food, eat it, pay their bill and leave we inquired about our food. We asked to speak to the owner. He made all kind of excuses why our order was taking so long. He said that pancakes and French toast take longer to cook but we saw several people around us(that arrived after us) get orders that included French toast and pancakes. I told him that I was a short order cook and he changed his story. 5 minutes later our food arrived and my French toast was barely cooked, flavorless home fries and a poor excuse of over easy eggs. The owner informed us that he would not charge us for our meals. I left 3/4s of my breakfast on my plate. Stay away!
Nice family restaurant. Very friendly staff. Menu is basic, but they have a very good fish and chips on Fridays. The pancakes for breakfast are HUGE !!
We stopped in for dinner and the place was half full.  The place was clean and inviting.  My husband and I both had the fish special and were very pleased.  The kids ordered chicken nuggets, hotdog and beans or hamburger.  The hamburger was the only item that did not go over well.  It was extremely dry and no flavor.  The service was not the best, there were only 2 waitresses on and we had to ask two and three times for items.  

We attempted to go back for breakfast a few days letter before leaving the area but there was a long line to get in.   Over all we would be willing to try again.
We visited after a recommendation from a family member and found that the service was very friendly, food tasted great, and the restaurant is small but clean and inviting. Our group of five found something for everyone- from salads, to burgers, to comfort food like turkey and meatloaf. Prices are reasonable and portions are generous. We will definitely return!
While the food is okay, it is not of the “outstanding” quality.  The chowder was very bland.  Baked haddock was good and not “fishy” tasting, a big plus for me.  My companion had the fisherman’s platter and there was an ample supply of seafood.  French fries good but not crispy.  Peas & carrots tasted watered down.   As of the time we went they did not have a liquor license.  Waitress was attentive and friendly.
We came here with a group after a Spartan race down the street.  We were all hungry (and dirty) and the staff here accommodated us, gave us individual checks, and provided fast and very friendly service.  Food was similar to diner food and very good!  This is a great family restaurant and we'd recommend anyone in the area looking for a bite to visit.
We were visiting this small town in Massachusetts for my wife's 50th high school reunion. This restaurant was recommended by my wife's sister. We went for dinner on a.Wednesday evening. My wife ordered the whole belly clams with a side dish of butternut squash. The clams were plump and perfectly cooked and the squash was wonderfulI. I ordered a cup of butternut squash soup. To say the soup was delicious is an understatement..it was heavenly. It was the best squash soup that I have ever eaten. For my entree I ordered the daily special which was New England Pot Roast. The beef was so tender and flavorful.  The meal was so good we decided to have lunch there today.   Lunch was a cup of corn chowder and a clam strip boat. The chowder was delicious and the clam strip boat was a New England split roll full of tender lightly breaded clam strips...absolutely wonderful.  The prices are very reasonable. Special kudos to Julie for her great service and Janet for preparing this wonderful meal.  I work as a Concierge in Columbus Ohio and this is the type of restaurant I enjoy on our travels. A real gem in Barre.
It is a clean place but like other Dunkin Donuts.. You need to check your order before you leave the drive through, often out of what I want (like iced tea). I think this one is a bit slower than most. Seems a bit expensive for what you get. There is a gourmet shop across the street that serves better coffee for less $$
When you are out on the road, need a coffee and a sandwich, or donut, and not in the mood to be adventurous, this is the trusted and predictable Dunkin /Donuts in this area.  Nothing I can say unusually good or bad about this one.    Like most Dunkins, its popular and can seem a bit crowded, but you can always find a table and seat.
It's a typical DD, in a typical place but a good stopping spot for those of us who ride motorcycles.  Not much else around it.
Good coffee, nice staff, every town needs a DD for a quick cup of Joe and a donut ! Parking is a pain though....
The can screw up something as simple as in ice tea....the whole staff are nothing but idiots! They have never got an order right!
I have ordered the Party Size Antipastos here several times they are very good for the price.  The only issue i had is that there is not enough lettuce in the salad
The place is nothing special. It is clean, the food is average for a pizza place. The people behind the counter are polite and if you order take out it is usually ready when they tell you it will be. Prices are average for the area.
Grandson's dinner choice, cheese pizza, very good.  Caesar Salad w/chicken very good also.  Price is in line with today, fair.  
We have gotten many meals here and they have all been good. We really enjoy their steak and onions stromboli...yum!
The pizza is pretty good, we had an issue that deserves a 3. We ordered a pizza for delivery and it arrived in a timely manner. We decided to order another one, after we realized we didn't have enough. The order was placed at 630 for another delivery. We saw nothing by 745 so we called. Person on the phone said there was a pizza sitting there with just a number and no address. After a some discussion, the person said they would put a fresh one in the oven for us for delivery. No pizza by 915pm so we called again. Automated message said they we closed! They stop taking calls after 9pm!
I enjoyed the pizza.  Fast service friendly staff.  Portions were ok.  They put chairs up an hour before closing so we did not feel welcome to sit though. 
I love the crust of their pizza and it's not greasy. When I don't order that I mostly get their crispy chicken Caesar salad. I like it better than Panera!
This is a very popular local place that generally serves take out. The chairs are limited. The steak tip salad is a big winner and their pizza is pretty good.
We take a lot of motorcycle rides and tend to stop for lunch in various places. We were hungry and decided to stop here. I ordered a small steak and cheese with mayo, boy was it small, hardly any steak in the sub and no mayo that I asked for and it was cold, it shouldn't of been cold since we were dining in unless they cooked mine separately from my husbands?
For a Tiny Town like Barre the Chinese food is actually above average. Everything is fresh made delicious and comes in generous portions. They have lunch specials which are an excellent value. When in Barre or driving through and you want some Chinese stop by and try them out worth the stop
What a treat today!  Great drinks, fresh food and a happy place.  Don't be fooled by the lack of patrons in the  dinging room.  The locals are take our people, which is the bulk of their business.  Family run, my sister's family has watched the children grow up.  
Food - hot and sour soup nice and  hearty,  egg roll - my vegetarian friend, no fried foods please, ordered an egg roll and said it was very good (must be I never even got a crumb!),  Lo mein had a nice taste, although a little more chicken would have been nice.  Other thought for them, I only had 3 or 4 sips of soup when the entrees came out  So you might want to request a time for them to bring out the main meal.  Small issue, more to take home.
Fried vegetarian rice, generous and good variety of veggies, including steamed broccoli.  The biggest surprise was the green beans.  Not my favorite veggie, but I couldn't stop eating them.  Garlicky, sauteed, and just the right crispness.  Trust me don't pass this up.  I knew they were fresh by the taste, but when we caught the family receiving a big bag of fresh beans and inspecting EACH ONE for blemishes, I knew this is  place that takes pride in their food!  treat yourself and enjoy,
Our favorite take out and dine in Chinese restaurant. The food is always fresh and fantastic. My favorite is the Steamed Shrimp and Veggies. My sons like the steamed dumplings and sweet and sour pork. Always friendly service. 
This is a wonderful family restaurant.  The food and staff are great!  Do yourself a favor and visit here.
Well...As stated in my title it is convenient...the only Chinese restaurant in town.  We order here for that reason only. The food does not have much taste. When listed on the menu spicy, it is not spicy. Hubby really does not like the food there at all. 
They have also messed up our order several times...not getting what you ordered and such.
We would rather drive to the next town for Chinese food but in a pinch settle for here.
This is how the answer the phone. Hello Yummy! Lol it has changed hands many times but the food is ok. It's. Nice to have it close by in such a small town. We do take out from there often. The lounge is small and not many eat in the restaurant.
The food here is your average Chinese.  Many times the family of little ones are running around the restaurant which is highly annoying if you want a little peace and quiet.  The drinks however are awesome!  At least they are generous with alcohol, which is difficult to find in restaurants today.
All the classics, all well executed and served in a timely manner.  Also, a decent array of healthier, lower calorie options.  But, honestly, when I want Chinese I want the greasy fried stuff which is excellent here.  It even heats up well in the toaster oven so I always over-order.

Lost one star for no delivery service and horrid decor.  I'd never want to actually eat in there so always do pickup.
Basic Chinese menu. Restaurant inside and out could use a facelift, ( very dark and dingy inside) but the food is generally good. The Crystal shrimp is very good with large shrimp not overally battered and is always lightly crispy, just right. Very friendly staff and very accommodating. I would rate this restaurant a bit higher if it remodeled inside and out,, AND had a delivery service. Most people in greater Barre would appreciate delivery service since the restaurant is located in "South" Barre and is not convenient for pick up.....
I would have given it 4 stars however I've eaten there twice and once I was not as happy. The first time I went I believe I had a fish dish and it was yummy well prepared fresh and rated 4 stars. The second time my wife and I went we went to the all you can eat buffet and I was disappointed. The food was kind of blase and reminded me of cafeteria food as a child. Regardless of the all you can eat  so so  Buffet  the salad bar is exceptional  and that does come with your Buffet . So my suggestion is to not go for the buffet and go for a sit-down ordered me off which will be well worth the visit.
The quality of the food here is not predictable at all. Sometimes it's good, sometimes not so much. We don't really go here very often any more because you never know what you are going to get. It's to bad really, it has a nice atmosphere in the dining room and the servers are very nice.
Parking great, staff great, our friends great but the food was not so great. Like so many small places it may depend on what you order. We elected to use the buffet so we could spend more time talking with old friends. The salad bar was sparse with slightly wilted greens and the buffet items were cool to warm and not very good. Again timing and selection from the menu might have improved the experience. We will not go there again.
Foid was middle of the road at best, didn't eat at the buffet but looked at it, very basic, salad bar was ok, we ordered off the menu, i had french onion soup which has about a half inch of soup and 3 inches of bread abd cheese, told the waitress but she seemed not to care, nothing was said or done, my girlfriend had like an itialian sampler plate not bad but floating in sauce, place was very clean but need to up their game in the food area for us to ever go back, to many better places to choose from
After giving Barre mill a second chance after my husband had a piece of steel wool in his food, we figured they could do salad right? WRONG! Not only did he have hair in his but they weren't even Caesar as we ordered but soggy iceberg goop. I threw mine away and could not eat it. Luckily it cost the owner 40$ for 3 of these salads but he ruined my husbands birthday dinner.
Endless fantastic salad bar, wonderful warm loaf of bread, and remarkable prime rib. We all enjoyed our meals equally and the staff were extremely friendly. The homemade blueberry cobbler was also top notch. I recommend the Barre Mill Tavern to anyone who is looking for a great meal.  
I did not enjoy the buffet it was just ok.  I have been there twice and both times I was dissapointed in the quality of the food. 
We always have a decent meal here. The menu selection is rather small, wish they would offer different dishes or unique specials. 
I went there with my husband and I cannot get him to go back due to a piece of steel wool in his food. They apologized and brought him a new meal after I had already eaten. They did not offer to pay for the inconvenience (free meal?) They offered nothing but whoops. Then I had to sit and wait for him to eat his new meal. He was pretty upset to have had that in his mouth.
My wife and i went to the barre mill for our anniversary and we enjoyed the food plus our waitress was great also , our huge complaint is that my wife ordered a margarita , when it arrived it was a 8oz water glass filled with ice and the rest was to be the cocktail , really , one swig from the straw and it is all over . We complained and they were good enough to take the 7 or 8 dollars off the bill but the manager never showed her face and our waitress was told by the manager that is how we do it and that is that , BE WARE the mixed drinks are not the way to go unless you don't mind paying for a two finger drink at full glass prices , just have a beer is what i say to it , they can't alter that . Go and enjoy the food though because that is worth the trip , great Italian gravy made there also .
One of the few places that have a salad bar.Three of us ordered steak all differently and each came out as ordered.Home made bread.Vegetable of the day family style.Our meal not only included the vegetables but potato choices and salad bar.It draws a mixed crowd young and old.The wait staff friendly.We wanted cake and they were only offering chocolate mint but the waitress thought another just had been baked. After checking we had chocolate cake no mint and the best I have had!
Also there is a dairy bar I have never tried.
Went there for the first time Saturday night and loved it, I live in Newport RI and had their chowder when they were in the Great Newport Chowder Cook Off.  We have been meaning to take a ride there ever since and were so happy that we did.  The food was great and the staff was friendly and attentive.
Been there several times always had  a great meal and service,the prime rib is very good and i love the Italian dishes. The last time i went there  i noticed they re decorated the whole restaurant and lounge. It looks so fresh and new. I personally like to eat in the lounge next to the fireplace  and play keno. I saw someone commented about  the salad bar i think its great  they offer it with all meals,  plus potato vegetable and their home made bread.
When I first walked in I noticed the new up to date interior, especially the bar. My favorite part was the salad bar, you just can't find a good salad bar around these days! Definitely a must see in you're in the area.
Nice family atmosphere. Could use a bit of a face lift as far as the decor inside and out, but still a nice friendly small "home town" restaurant. Basic menu, but always very good with a very friendly staff !! Try the baked stuffed scallops, always cooked just right. And the pizza is the best in this area, like home made !!
The restaurant has been recently painted and is much brighter inside.  There is a salad bar and the ingredients are usually fresh and cold.  My only complaint about it are the bowls are too small so when you’re attempting to toss your salad some inevitably spills on the table.  Entrees are served with thin slices of homemade bread.   I had the baked stuffed haddock with lobster newburg sauce and it was very good.  The fish was done perfectly.  My companion had a lobster casserole with shrimp and scallops that was on the specials menu and he said it was very good as well.  Soup of the day was a chicken soup which he said was bland.  The seafood chowder is very good.  This is not “fine dining” but it a family restaurant and the food is fairly good.
The salad bar is below average. The croutons are the small square ones that you use for stuffing.   The bacon bits are the cheaper kind. But, none of this bothers me if my main dish is excellent. I ordered clams. They were not cooked and had the consistency of rubber bands with bellies that were luke warm at best. I tried my best to eat a couple. Then finally when it was apparent my meal was uneaten. They asked if everything was "okay". Long story short I was given an opportunity to have a NEW batch made. I THINK that I was given the same batch cooked a bit longer. I hope they did not do this. That is a health code violation to do so. But, you know what you had on your plate before and you know what it would look like cooked again. enough said.
Decent prices, good food, casual atmosphere. They have a nice salad bar and the prime rib is great.
This place is old. It needs updating it is VERY outdated. The ceiling has water damnage all over it, it smells like mold, the carpets are old and stained. When we got int he parking lot there seemed to be quite a few cars then when we went in it was all older people. I wouldn't recommend this for children, there menue for kids was VERY limited. The prices were average, but I wouldn't spend anything higher than $12.00 here because of the type of place it is.
The staff were very friendly.
Food is good for a pizza parlor. It has been around for a looong time. People are very nice. A bit run down but clean.
Ordered a cheese pizza and buffalo chicken pizza. Close to the worst I've ever had. This is probably the third time I have ordered food here and I'm always disappointed. Won't return.
It's not the cleanest place.  They could seriously do some major douching. Co webs every where!  The bathrooms are worst than a Porta potty.  Mold on the sinks! Toilet absolutely nasty! Broken chairs. 
Pizza was edible.  Staff was dry and really had no personality. They also have duct tape covered outlets.  Which kinda was frustrating we couldn't charge our phones or the kids tablets after traveling so far.  I don't believe we will return 
I like the pizza at this place. They do it right. No complaints at all really. Just maybe the cooks and staff could be friendlier to people. I'm not a Barre local. But, my Grandfathers name is on the war monument in view of this place. Be polite to everyone you'd be surprised how connected we are to Barre even if you haven't met us.
the menu is basic "pizza joint" fair. Delivery is always on time. The staff is always very friendly ! 
I order takeout frequently, and the people that own it are very friendly and the food is always good!
Very impolite. Will not say you're welcome or any other common courtesy mannerisms when thanked. Despite the food being tastey it is over cooked and drenched in grease. Troubled youth, mothers with children, and older, working-class, beer-thirsty men like to eat here. Don't come unless you have a lot of patience and all you care about is the taste of the food. It appears to be a family-owned business. The women are usually more friendly than the men, who've just carelessly dropped our pizza on the table when serving us like it was some kind of lower-class, busy city bar.
They have awsome food, and are very nice people.  They make you feel welcome and they'll make your food quick and it'll be very tasty.
Quabbin Pizza makes pizza fast and they make it good. They make a greek-style pizza and it is light and fluffy the sauce is excellent and toppings are generous. Their service is quick and they are friendly. They have a good selection to choose from including seafood and dinners.
Quabbin Pizza House was a great spot for a slice of pizza. Thank you very much. Everyone was very pleasent. Right at the very beginning of Rt. 62.
This place has a basic dining area, but I usually order take out when visiting friends in the area.  The choices of food are, I believe, larger than average, and the food quality is a cut above what you usually get in a place like this.    I especially like the fish and chips take out, which features generous portions and is quite tasty.   I would only eat in if I were out on a road trip and just passing through.

I like the owner.   He calls me "young man", even though I am obviously of AARP age.
It's not the cleanest place.  They could seriously do some major douching. Co webs every where!  The bathrooms are worst than a Porta potty.  Mold on the sinks! Toilet absolutely nasty! Broken chairs. 
Pizza was edible.  Staff was dry and really had no personality. They also have duct tape covered outlets.  Which kinda was frustrating we couldn't charge our phones or the kids tablets after traveling so far.  I don't believe we will return 
Out of the five pizza places in Barre, Quabbin Pizza is my favorite. Run by a Greek family the food is usually yummy and the people are always friendly!
the menu is basic "pizza joint" fair. Delivery is always on time. The staff is always very friendly ! 
Thank goodness for word-of-mouth recommendations. My husband's colleague mentioned this as a good place to eat for breakfast and lunch and very reasonable prices. My expectations were low. Boy was I surprised...and pleasantly so! The place was smallish, the décor was quaint and historic, the owners and staff were absolutely charming. When it came to the menu, it was as if they somehow knew all of our favorites and put them there - a nice variety, but not so much as to overwhelm.  Every thing that we ordered was top notch...sausage biscuit and gravy - the best we've ever had...falafel wrap - excellent!....fresh fruit bowl was actually freshly cut strawberries, blueberries, melon and pineapple and was delicious...burgers were hand formed, fresh and fabulous and the fries were so good that everyone kept grabbing them. The BLT with avocado was as wonderful as it sounds - absolute perfection. The pancakes with bananas and bacon were yummy and beautifully presented, and the home made hash was so good that it is still beyond words and beyond description except that it is everything that good hash should be, and it is the hash to which all other hashes should aspire.  Truly!  The final surprise for me was the coffee which was so good and so smooth I was able to drink it black, and love it.  I never drink black coffee. Never. Ever. But this was good. As for prices, they were also a pleasant surprise. Between five of us we ordered everything above, plus two coffees and three sodas and three home made muffins to go, and the bill came to $78 which to us was sooooo much less than what we anticipated.  Hands down our favorite new place for breakfast and lunch and we can't wait to get back there!
We were driving through Barre, needed breakfast and found this cute diner in the center of town.  It was incredibly clean, comfortable and nicely decorated.  The coffee was hot and served in mugs with cream in its own little pitcher.  The home fries, eggs and toast were actually hot when they came to our table, and it was the best breakfast we have had in a long time.  There was even a slide show of Barre on the tv screen, which was interesting to watch while we sipped our coffee.  We will definitely return to this gem of a place.
Most good places are out of the way and hard to find. Barre isn't the most accessible place, but for anyone who can make it to this iconic representation of small town America you should make your way to the homey warmth of Becki's Bistro. Located in the central hub of this town, you can be assured the same locals ritualistically attend this owner run eatery every morning, a testament to its quality and service indeed. Besides the care taken in preparing the food, many dishes are also prepared in house including freshly baked muffins and (my favorite) falafel veggie burgers. You can't buy happiness but here,at Becki's Bistro, you can taste it!
By far the rudest staff and worst experience I have had in a long time. I cannot WAIT for the other restaurant to open in town. Will NEVER go to them again. Rude staff, horrible food, and worst of all, it took 45 minutes for an EGG SANDWICH. stay far far far away.
We travel through Barre Mass every Labor Day on our way to and from camping. We have stopped in years past at this diner and been fairly pleased. This year, sadly, our experience was less than acceptable. We waited fifty-five minutes for three orders to arrive at our table. during that time, our waitress only visited our table once to refill anything. After we were done eating (it only took ten minutes to eat our food) we waited another 15 minutes for the check. This is disappointing because there is so much potential for this little place to excel at doing it right... Unfortunately, during this visit, they missed the mark.
I have had a few treats from this bakery and they are always good. Recently had them make cupcakes and cookies for my daughters shower and everyone really enjoyed them.
Every time I am in town I go here for breakfast, so yummy and great service. The pistachio muffins and fruit are so good. 5 stars!
Huge, very fresh muffins, as good as home made. Good coffee, too. The others in our group were very pleased with the omelets and breakfast sandwiches they ordered.
Great for breakfast!  Delicious pancakes and omelettes!  Try the raisin bread it's thick and tasty.  OJ not fresh squeezed, comes in Minute Maid bottle...handy to take with you if you don't finish. 
Becki's Bistro is well-named, an exension of Becki - she's driven by love, and it shows in the atmosphere and the food!  Bright, cheerful, clean...the space itself invites you in and lifts your spirit.  The service is warm, friendly, and responsive.  And, the FOOD!  Becki is constantly pushing herself to present new and healthful dishes that have no compromise in flavor and quality while staying true to the staples and favorites.  When I go out to lunch, I go to Becki's and I'm always blessed!
I went with 3 kids and the kids got burgers and enjoyed them.  It would've been nice if they were served with homemade fries and not chips but the kids really didn't care.   I ordered the grilled cheese with turkey chili.  The grilled cheese was with Muenster cheese which is filled with flavor.  I had my grilled cheese with sourdough bread. The sandwich was absolutely delicious.  The turkey chili wasn't anything fancy.  It was just ok.  It's a small town and there really isn't alot of choices to even eat so all in all I will be back to try some other items on the menu when in the area.  
Stopped in here for lunch as we were passing through and only other restaurant on common had a private group filling them up. Only about seven tables and a small counter area but there were three empty tables when we arrived so we were OK. Only open for lunch and breakfast. My wife had a cup (really a small bowl) of homemade butternut squash soul with real chopped up bacon bits. It was very good and my wife enjoyed. I had two hot dogs with sauerkraut and mustard. They could have been grilled more and could have used more kraut. Came with chips but not the pickle slice as stated on menu. My bad, I didn't ask for it after dogs served. Overall just an average place but suitable for a lunch.
We loved the food at the Exchange Street Kitchen in Barre...service was a wee bit slow and folksie but we didn't mind. We went there last weekend and found that it is now under new ownership/management with a new name Becki's Bistro. The decor was similar but they had added a bathroom - awesome!  Previously one had to go behind the counter to get to the restroom.

Kitchen staff (including the owner Becki) was professional, chill, and focused on the food. We ordered our usual favorites from before which we'd loved...somehow they managed to exceed our expectations and make hands down the best ever sausage biscuits and gravy ever. Ever. Really. Ever.  The service was fantastic - prompt, friendly, yet still professional.  For us Becki's Bistro is our favorite breakfast/lunch anywhere and we can't wait to get back there. Even the toast was great...we had a few different types and each seemed fresh/home made. Prices are still reasonable as before, food even better, and the plates that came out of the kitchen looked amazing...every diner at every table seemed to be loving their food, sharing bites with their table mates. The place also has outside picnic tables and a walk up window for ice cream, sorbet, frozen yogurt, and some pretty great looking and imaginative sundaes...we'll try that next time.  For now we just couldn't wait to let people know that Becki's Bistro is a "must try" if you're anywhere near Barre (and even if you're not, it's worth a drive). It's also important to note that it had been open under new ownership/management for only about 2 weeks, and the food, staff and service were stellar.  Nicely done!
Have been there twice and both fantastic.  The first time I had the pork and it was better than better.  Service was great and while meals were a little slow, they were worth the wait.  I then hosted my boyfriend's birthday party and everything was awesome.  Food, service, wine and the setting.  Going back at the end of September and can't wait!
I hate to submit a poor review for Picasso. My at the time girlfriend her daughter and myself ate at Picasso's a few months ago and the food was fantastic and the service was excellent. The waiter really knew his stuff it was extremely attentive.  The service may have been excellent because we were one of the first customers there. Tonight my wife and I went there we had a gift certificate given to us for our wedding which was August 21st. When we arrived at Picasso's there were a couple of people  sitting outside, and only two open tables in the dining area. We were seated back in the corner and the busboy immediately gave us water. We proceeded to wait 20 minutes and neither of the two waitresses approached our table. One waitress walked by us five times without even acknowledging us. The next time we go there to use our gift certificate I'll go when it opens so I know I'll get service. Depending on how the next visit goes will depend on whether I ever return there again. The way I feel right now if I did not have a gift certificate I would never go back there. I went over to the Quabbin Pizza & Seafood and we ordered food and were served within 15 minutes. The food at Quabbin Pizza & Seafood is excellent for a pizza place. Sorry forgiving Picasso such a poor rating but the service was horrendous because we got done after 20 minutes.
We went there for dinner. The appetizer, tuna, was delightful and raised our expectations. We got a bottle of the "Merlot" which turned out to be a blend but was ok. One hour after getting our appetizer we finally got our dinner. The manager [owner] who brought it to our table was unapologetic and shrugged off my complaint. The waitress - only one for the whole restaurant - came to the table about 5 minutes before the meal arrived to tell us we were #2 to get our meal. My wife had the scallops which she reports were very good. I had the Thai Curry which was bland and not that great. The table next to us had to send one of the meals back to the kitchen since it was not cooked properly. The other person at the table had finished her meal when his finally arrived. Needless to say, we won't be going back
My wife and I had our anniversary dinner last night at Picasso's. We had heard good things about their food and were not disappointed. I had the Salmon Verde and my wife the Grilled marinated chicken dinner presented with wonderful fresh vegetables. The wait staff was friendly, efficient and accommodating. We would highly recommend this restaurant for an evening out.
Good food, great atmosphere, servers are very nice. A bit pricey but overall a nice place for a meal, especially on a nice summer evening on the patio.
Four in our party were seduced in ordering the 'Bistro Fillet' @ $25 each.  I had the Caesar Salad plus $9.00 shrimp.  Caesar dressing was tasteless and the few shrimp were cooked to death  and tasted of charcoal.

The 'Bistro Fillets' in fact had nothing to do with any fillet we had ever encountered.  Despite having been marinated it was still tough and a quite peculiar cut of meat. We later learned that the 'Bistro Cut' comes from the front quarter (think chuck steak)

To add insult to injury we waited almost an hour after ordering before the food arrived.  This was on a Thursday evening and only a few other couples were in the place.
We were one of the first tables seated after they opened.  The decor is interesting.  Not a fine dining establishment, but they are trying.

We ordered the Tuna appetizer which was excellent. 

As everyone else mentioned, even though we were one of the first tables that ordered, our meal took almost twice the time you would expect.  But not quite that long.  When a chef is making everything to order, you can understand the extended wait time.  The curry and the chicken Picasso very excellent.

As everyone else has said, the restaurant gets very loud.  Especially in a place that doesn't just seem to attract couples. Tables with older friends, 5 or 6 of them sitting at a table always seem to talk 20 decibels louder than necessary.  I wouldn't blame the restaurant owners. What should they do? Ask guests to be quiet?

The wait for tables is certainly going to be long because of the extended time customers wait for their meals.  If the chef could streamline the process a bit, I'm sure they'd turn a good bit more tables.

Service was good. Friendly but probably one person understaffed.  

Overall, we'd come back and try it again.
Went there for the first time recently. The food was great and the setting charming. Interestingly, one member of our party was consistently served quite later than the others even though they ordered the same thing as others in the party. This happened for each course of the meal.
A bit of a wait but the food is excellent, best we have had in a very long time. Spinach salad was amazing. Salmon dish was fresh with amazing flavor.  Sides and main course was amazing. Will definitely return. Sangria was excellent  very flavorful. Reservations preferred. 
Although it's a little out of the way we are never disappointed, the food is fresh, creative, and the Tuna is superb. The host is always pleasant, gives you that feeling that you're more of a friend than just a customer and the waitstaff is attentive but not overbearing. Might be a little pricey, have been there at least 6 or 7 times and never disappointed.
Picasso truly lives up to its name ... the chef prepares dishes that are creative and unique with an ecclectic twist that makes them truly delightul. The Ahi Tuna appetizer was seared just briefly and served with a wonderfully dressed bed of arugula and delicious home made crostini. I had the special Artic Char, which was seared and seasoned perfectly and served with a delicious quinoa salad. My son had the lamb chops, which came atop a goat cheese sauce and was served with a kale, chick pea and bacon salad that beautifully complimented the lamb. We had the flourless chocolate cake with raspberry sauce for desert and it is not to be missed. We enjoyed every bite! If you love fresh and truly well prepared, creative and delicious food, this is the place to go. There are so many wonderful things on the menu that everyone will find something that suits them. The staff was lovely and made our dinner out an exceptionally wonderful evening. I cannot wait to go back again!!!
This restaurant is probably slightly overrated, not bad, but pricey. We had some good appetizers, but the main courses were not as good. A few totally overcooked mussels and  two scallops in the seafood diavolo, $28. Have had better diavolo before.   Vegetables on the raw side rather than al dente. Not really a fine dining atmosphere.
I will say that this restaurant is amazing. I had the most amazing meal that I ever had. Our waiter Edward was incredible. Food is cooked to perfection and they are not rushing you out the door. I will return again. It's a must. 
We have eaten at Picasso's many times since we moved to the area. When we first started they had an interesting menu. That has gotten less diverse. But the worst is the quality of the food. It has gone from OK to nearly inedible. Steak tips burned. Fingerling potatoes served lukewarm and full of grease/oil. Hamburger buns dry. Hambuger overcookef. Really sorry to see this. Servers are great. Atmosphere is pleasant. But if they keep their current cook/chef and lack of quality control on what they serve, they are doomed. Add to this their overpricing and hard to imagine we will be going back anytime soon. 
Been there 1/2 doz times , mostly sitting at the bar . Love the conversation with locals and a bartender who knows the right balance of conversation and service . The owner/chef has created some great food combos and adds new thing regularly . Never disappointed with anything we have eaten here and have tried some new tastes for us .
I used to love going to Picasso's. BUT, after a while the atmosphere and noise level really got to me. No matter how good the food was it was hard to enjoy because you practically had to shout to carry on a conversation. This is especially bothersome when entertaining friends from out of town. On one occasion some friends made it known they would have a hard time going there if the restaurant was where they lived in PA. I felt bad as I was treating them. That did it for me. Have never been back.
Hard to believe we had to make reservations, but this restaurant was well worth it. Excellent service, lovely ambience, great food, wine. 
My wife and I decided to stop in on an average Wednesday to relax for a good dinner. We got exactly that as the food was excellent. But the wait time between drinks, food service, and just general follow up was horrific. I saw a review that talked about an hour and a half, and I thought that was probably an exaggeration. Nope it was pretty spot on. I've eaten in fine restaurants all over the world, and not had this kind of service issue. As an example, when we were initially seated she was pretty prompt in coming over and taking a drink order. 20 minutes later we got it! #WOW! We only got it because I made eye contact with her as she was waiting on another table, and I saw in her reaction she had forgotten about the drinks. She apologized which was nice. She took our food order when she remembered to bring our drinks. Then from there we didn't see her for another 20 minutes. I kept asking my wife, "Is it me or do I not even see her in the dining room?" I asked in order that because if you saw her you could at least flag her down....I enjoy casual dining, having good conversation, and taking my time at a nice restaurant, but this was painful. She wasn't attentive AT ALL. Never asked how our drinks were, if we were ok, every time we wanted another drink or ANY kind of service we had to look for her for 20 minutes. 
I'd like to say that the meal was the saving grace, and it was close. I had the Statler chicken with Quinoa and Kale, and my wife had the Seafood Fra Diavolo. My meal was piping hot and delicious! My wife's meal had only mussels, no other seafood as advertised on the menu. No scallops, shrimp, or calmari. Her's was flavourful as well. Another example of the bad service was when she brought us the meal my wife asked her for Parmesan for the linguine. Think we got that? That'd be a no, as she "disappeared" again right after serving us. I was fuming and I usually always give the benefit of the doubt to the establishment and/or server. Not in this case. She was just not present, and did not service us in ANY competent way. Just so you know I gave her the minimum 10%. I'm not a jerk that way, but boy, it was not close to enjoyable. Two things I've never done in my 56 years dining out, or reviewing a place I did, and will do here. First, on our bill I wrote that her service was awful. Secondly, I would not advise dining here. The food was great, but the service and overall wait times for drinks, apps, entrees, etc. were unacceptable. This works in Vegas or New Your or Boston, but it doesn't work in Barre. Stop by you're guests once in awhile to see how their dining experience is going. Ask ANY question about how the drinks are, the apps, the meal....anything. Just don't abandon the diners.   BTW, one other thing I saw in the reviews was about the prices of the meals. I had no objection to that. Both our meals were 20.00. Inline with prices in the area for good food/meals.
The locally sourced and wonderfully made dishes are always a treat, the service is excellent.  Always a wind for us!
We have been here several times. The food is just ok for our taste and is very pricey.  Wish they would keep their web site up to date so you could know what is going to be on the menu.
The Inn and grounds were lovely.  Intimate dining room (albeit a bit dated).  Considering we were the first couple there, service was a little slow.  Excellent cheese and crackers and entrees were good.
Excellent food, wonderful grounds around the Inn and great staff.  Menu has something for everyone. Food is presented beautifully. Will not hesitate to add this to our favorites list!  
I wish I had been hungrier or that I was close to home to take home a doggy bag!  I started with the Lobster Bisque which was very tasty.  A bit too creamy for me but still good.  Then the biscuits are to die for!!!  Salad was salad - but at least it comes with the meal and you don't have to pay extra. 

I ordered the Rack of Lamb.  IT was an entire rack - way too much food for me.  IT was very good.  Not sure about the other things on the plate since there was so much lamb and I love lamb.  

Unfortunately no one had room for dessert.  

The others at the table had escargot(they said was delicious), half duck - they liked it very much and swordfish which was appreciated.  

I had read some reviews where people said it was expensive.  I didn't think it was - 4 of us had apps, entrees and a bottle of wine for $180.

I would go again - maybe split the entree....
Have been here a few times. It is worth the trip (we live 30 minutes away). The food is unfailingly good, the hosts are friendly and informative, and the ambience is very pleasant. One of those few restaurants that I don't have anything negative to report.
The Jenkins Inn is for me my all time favorite place to eat in the area. I have never had a bad or mediocre or even just a good meal. Each and every meal was flawless. The menu offers something for everyone and there are always nightly specials. Presentation of food a feast for the eyes alone. Desserts are baked and made on the premises. The  Creme Brulee is hands down the best I've ever had. Couldn' t ask for better service. Hosts Dave and Joe strike the perfect balance between friendliness, attentiveness without hovering over you. The ambiance is warm, cozy, always impeccable. I almost always celebrate all big occasions here as well as just going when I don't want to cook but want an exceptional dining experience. Think I like this place? Love it!!!
If you don't know how to get to Barre please find out! This charming inn and restaurant is wonderful. Food is delicious and prepared to order. It is so cozy that you fell as if you are in someone's home. The owners who service you are experts!

We hope to stay there, overnight, soon.
The only flaw at Jenkin's Inn, is if you go to stay, or to dine, you will compare every other Inn and every other restaurant to them, and very, very few will measure up.  Joe and David are the best.  Last night, we dined there again, and they made room for us at the last minute, and again, it was the right choice.
This time around my meals were breakfast. There's something for everyone to eat, whether it's eggs, oatmeal or gluten free. After our dinner function, I invited a group back for wine in the library. It's very quaint and relaxing.
We visit this B and B for dinner frequently. David is an excellent cook and their are always new items on the menu. Do not forget to have a dessert that Joe has whipped up - it will be made of something fresh and in season. Romantic.
A small New England town has a great restaurant that is worth the drive! In Barre Massachusetts, the Jenkin's Inn is a cozy place with some delicious dishes featuring seasonal favorites like Pumkin Tomato soup and Pumpkin Ravioli with Spicy Italian Sausage.
There are several other creative combinations on the menu too! David and Joe make you feel right at home in their comfortable Inn! We will certainly return!
I loved everything. The town, the restaurants, the antique shops - everything!  The scenic back roads...everything!
David & Joe run a 1st class establishment in this small Central MA town.  They make you feel as though they have known you for years & cooking dinner for you to-night,  your choice, the way you want it prepared.  David is an excellent chef, he prepares, the meat, fish, duck, kangraoo & ostrich perfectly.  The variety of appetizers are all good, order different ones & share.  Joe is an excellent host, who makes a fantastic martini & makes sure your needs are met throughout your dining experience.  You won't be disappointed in finding & enjoying this establishment.
The Jenkins Inn and Restaurant of Barre, MA is billed as a Bed & Breakfast. As such one finds here a perfectly inviting nook in which to hide away if, in fact, one lives nearby and means to do just that, hide away, or if one has returned to the neighborhood to visit friends and relatives and cherishes a bit of extracurricular peace set apart from the fray. 

Now, why would I say this? Because Barre, MA, though perfectly fine as a residential village, hardly sports the scenic wonders found say two hours further North, Northwest or West. Considering the concomitant opportunities for lodging offered in these points of national and world renown, Barre tends, rather, toward the homespun. Barre, to be plain, is that little outpost that’s just close enough for a quick departure from the daily trammels and vicissitudes imposed upon those citizens located in the direction of a much more frenetic East and South.

 Yet for many of the Jenkens Inn’s neighbors, that is to say folk who live within an easy half hour’s drive from any direction, and who have no intention of getting-away for a couple of days, to them the Jenkens Inn is also viewed as a treasure performing a slightly different function. In this instance, the B & B is known for providing small through middle-sized, INTIMATE diner parties.

You see, in a region where nicer restaurants are something of a challenge to find, the Jenkens Inn’s dining room comports itself with a soft-spoken joviality. The menu, though small, is intentionally upscale and divergent, seasonably variable and backed by the skills of an in-house chief who modestly prides himself on a cuisine worthy of anyone’s honorable mention. Moreover, the dining room’s service, while somewhat old school, is not quite as poignantly so as Downton Abbey. [Note: The Jenkins Inn’s waiter, though truly an august footman, abjectly refuses to wear Edwardian livery.]

As such, a quiet evening spent “downstairs” in Barre’s most distinguished Inn can be every bit as meaningful as if one were availing oneself of this institution’s full complement of appurtenances. Simply stated, the Jenkins Inn and Restaurant’s dining experience is discreet, lovely and restorative for those of us who are in the know and are centrally located close enough to avail ourselves of its polish and charms.

And, of yes, one more thing. An occasional tryst at the Jenkins Inn honestly falls far short of breaking the bank or, for that matter, instigating another run on Wall Street. This occasional gourmand, at any rate, feels that time spent here is good both for the mind and soul, and certainly for the aggregate economy. Cheers then!

Doug Engstrom
Orange, MA
Went with my BFF for a long evening of chit chat. quiet thursday night so we were as leisurely as possible - and as always, Jenkins seemed like we were the only ones there.
There were other patrons - but not a lot - but they treated us like we were the only ones in the place.
The appetizer special was the crab cake and the soup was a lovely squash-apple - we couldn't decide so we shared both - both heavenly.
One of the specials was KANGAROO - who can pass up trying something so unique? it's a lot like beef but very mild - they cooked it slow but medium rare - hard to do for grass-fed ANYTHING - and I know - I raise 100% grass fed beef - and they did it just perfect - i loved every bite. you have to know what you are doing to get something this low in solid fat to taste yummy and it was sublime.
BFF had the stuffed fish, which she loved.
the bread was perfect, the salad was lovely and perfectly crisp with a nice cool but not too cold temperature. the side risotto for BFF was great and my side veggies were a winter concoction that was perfect in temperature and texture.
We had drinks - I started with a great lime cosmo, but switched to the gin/tonic he whipped up for BFF with a cucumber gin - to die for - very refreshing.
desserts were awesome - she had a great winter pastry with homemade cinnamon apple pie topping - heavenly. I had a double chocolate cake that was like eating velvet.
we were there over 2 hours and they never blinked an eye.....................
this is NOT a cheap night out - we ate many courses and had a few drinks and dessert each and I left well over a 20% tip - so the total was $150 all included. BUT the Kangaroo was in the low steak price and each thing was really reasonable for the quality - it just added up when you put it all together.
and i'd do it again in a heartbeat today - just an awesome meal.............
No disrespect to the town of Barre, but this restaurant is a hidden gem. Small place but all the details are attended to. The decor is great for either special occasion or "just because." This place is no longer a secret so make reservations in advance. The meal opens with lemon hot towels and crackers with to-die-for spread with orange zest. I got the duck; hubby got the kangaroo (which tastes like a good steak.) The lobster bisque was fabulous. We were too full for dessert, but the menu looked delicious as well. Will definitely go back.
Ok - so Barre is near nothing! Friends brought us here for dinner and we loved it.  Great gardens.  Great decor.  Great food.  The menu is both traditional and exotic (kangaroo anyone? Maybe next time if it's still on the specials).  This is small and intimate dining.  Start off with a warm lemon towel to clean your hands and sit back and enjoy.  Jasmine flower tea?  Well worth the trip.  Not pub prices so check the online menu first.  Reservations advised as seating is limited.
We live just 10 minutes from the Jenkins inn but had never eaten here; we were able to get a discount through Restaurant.com. The restaurant is one room with perhaps 10 tables. It is beautiful; the ambiance could not be better. Fresh flowers on the table, soft music, romantic decor. They have an extensive wine list and specialty drinks.  We had a delicious coconut and shrimp egg-roll on seaweed as an appetizer, I had a trout fillet and my wife had chicken cordon bleu. We agreed that the food was good to very good.  The service was excellent- unrushed with just the right amount of attention. We both agree that we will begin coming here more often.
Dave & Joe were great comfortable hosts.  The Inn was beautifully decorated for the holidays.  Their hospitality was like being in their home (we were).  We dined with a party of 8.  The food was fabulous, from the pork to the salmon to the trout and chicken.  The salads were fresh and others said the desserts and lobster bisque were outstanding.  We had a wonderful time and will defintely go back.
A dinning experience not to be missed !! The proprietors Dave and Joe are the owners of this wonderful restaurant/ Inn.  They are professional and excellent at what they do. From the diverse menu items, drinks, decor and lodging - you will not be disappointed !The menu items are personally selected, fresh and the variety is wonderful.  The Chef (Dave) pays special attention to each and every dinners dietary needs.  He is very careful in his preparation and display of each dish !  The menu items (duck, filet of beef, salmon, escargot, pate .. to name a few) are beyond reproach !!!  There are specialty items to tempt the most discerning dinner. Joe, who is a wine connoisseur ... can recommend a wine that compliments each of the dishes without hesitation.   He also specializes in deserts and makes several of the desert items for all to enjoy !!! The atmosphere is quiet, romantic and comfortable. My husband and I have enjoyed many a romantic dinner at the Jenkins Inn !  I recommend this wonderful establishment to everyone I know.  Reservations are recommended.
Had Dinner with 5 friends here Saturday night June 11, 2011. What a wonderful evening. The hosts of the Inn David and Joe know what they are doing. From the great dinner cocktails to the delicious appetizers to the main entrees and desserts, it was all just perfect. This is my 3rd visit to the Jenkins Inn in the last 6 months and eac h time I have been completely satisfied!  I can't say enough! You've got to put the Jenkin's Inn in Barre MA on your list of places to stay at or just to go to for a wonderful meal.
I visited this restaurant for the first time this year and have been back a few times.  They have a great menu and the fried seafood is wonderful, the batter doesn't take over the food. Beer and wine is available and an  awesome ice cream menu.  There is outdoor seating on a large deck and seating in a screened in portion of deck. Pricing is reasonable.
It is a good place to eat or just have ice cream on a warm night. The burgers are very good and the outside dining is clean and comfortable. The servers, (especially Kelly) are very polite.
This is a country quick food restaurant in the hinterland. (country) Fried seafood, salads, hot dogs and ice cream that cannot be beaten. Eat in or out, there or at home.
This is really a hidden gem. You can easily miss the place it's so well hidden. Watch out for the sign. 
We were told at the campground that this place had the best ice cream around. They were so right. The ice cream was so good and creamy. If we are ever in the area again, we will be back.
This family restaurant is a fun place to visit several times during the summer months. The food is delicious simple fare, but people flock to this location.  Each night that we have gone was packed with families enjoying the casual atmosphere.  They employ many young people and many come year after year to join this family in serving the local community.  It is tucked away besides the Mobil station, but once you find it, you'll return time and time again.
The fried clam plate was cheaper than Ronnie's in Auburn and just as good.  There is a wide porch to dine on if you prefer not to sit inside.  Very pleasant atmosphere and excellent food.  Highly recommended.
The food here is always excellent and the prices are more than reasonable.  The employees are super friendly and it is a great place to go anytime you are hungry and want a quick meal that tastes great.  This is truly my favorite go-to place when I don't feel like cooking! Kudos to the owners Mark and Linda for working so hard to make their restaurant a top notch place where patrons can relax and enjoy a wonderful meal!
One of our summer time favorites. Variety of seating options, indoor, outdoor and screened in porch.  Varied menu, your standard fried food fare to expect from a window order; but they also have salads, wraps, grilled chicken.  Always need to finish your meal with their yummy ice cream.  
This is a great family place to eat fresh cooked fish & chips, chili dogs, and healthy wraps. Their stuffed mushrooms and poppers are great. Long list of ice cream favorites. I love to people watch here, because there are locals, camping families, and people who drive out from the country to enjoy the fresh air open dining. 
If you like the old style ice cream stands, then Still Four Corners is for you. The place can be very busy depending on what time of the day you go. The meal sizes are adequate and quite tasty. Once done with you meal, ice cream is a must. They have a wide selection of ice cream and a few surprises to boot.
Because it sits behind a small strip of protected brush along the road deemed to be 
"wetlands" the place can't be seen from the road and that's a real pity because it's a
real nice family friendly and family run place to have a relaxed meal and chat for a while.
The food is basic but well prepared and reasonably priced. Three dining areas to choose
from: a large open covered deck, a very nice screened in covered deck and a fully
enclosed room with tables and booths. It's a great place to go for a couple of 
cheeseburgers and the best hot fudge sundae.
Fun ,Fast service and delicious food cooked right before your eyes! Family friendly and very affordable!
Friends took me to this place for the first time. I gotta say, their food is delicious, especially the onion rings. Love the burgers. I l also like how they both have an indoor and outdoor seating, and both provide a nice atmosphere.
A fun stop that's on our "must do" list each summer. The onion rings are excellent, seafood and wraps are tasty, and my family loves the burgers. Staff is always friendly and we love sitting outside on the deck or on the porch. Ice cream, if we have room, rounds out the perfect summer treat.
We both had Haddock and Fires.  The fish was cookednicely and had very good flavor. You order at the counter and pick up your order when your number is called.  The time between ordering and pick up was reasonable.
Love this place! It's the best for seafood or just a burger you can sit outside or in. It's like eating in a log cabin. My favorite is the fried clams. Mm mm this is making me hungry.
Good service and good food.  The wait time seems longer than it should some days which is hard with little ones...but worth it for the onion rings!!
good food good service good pricing, in or take out open every day except mondays ....great fish menu.....or hot dog and burgers
My family has been going here for years, we look forward to the season opening every May! In all of the years that we've been coming here, we have never had a bad meal. The prices are very reasonable for the quality of the food and we are always met with pleasant staff members.We did have to wait about 40 minutes for our food during dinner time of the opening week, but knowing how busy this restaurant gets, we were expecting that, so it was no problem for us.
Great spot for my daughter & I after a softball game in Rutland. We had Hand breaded onion rings, burger & whole fried clams. Delicious.
We needed a quick lunch as we were on our way to Barre for a funeral and saw
this and pulled in. we had the chicken salad sandwich was good considering it came out of can/box.  our drinks were nice and fresh.  The poor gal that was there by herself was running back and forth to fill orders and never lost her patience with anyone.
Don't know why she was all alone but she was real nice employee to deal with.
This is a pleasant Dunkin' Donuts. They offer a drivethrough. The staff are helpful.  The only problem I've had is that they tend to regularly run out of food quite early.  They seem to have a problem with this.  The food has been fine, the prices seem reasonable for Dunkin' (apparently prices vary at different Dunkins).  I suggest going at a time other than the morning rush.  Our most recent visit here was fine, other than that they had basically run out of food and our selection was therefore extremely limited. They only had a few type of bagels left. I also do not care for their coffee unless I order it with extra cream, extra sugar. Otherwise to me it tastes bitter.
The coffee is so hot that I recommend asking for about four or five ice cubes in it (they will not charge for that).  This is a nice Dunkin Donuts, nice atmosphere, good for families.  Dunkins offer skim milk and other low fat options. Prices vary quite a bit. Sadly they have discontinued their "combos" so we may not be going often. For frugals, you don't have to tip. This one has English speaking staff (many have staff you cannot understand).  Nice Dunkins if they have the food available that you want.
For a place that calls itself Dunkin Donuts, I was surprised at the small amount of choices for doughnuts.  I think I had about 4 types to choose from.  Other than this, it was a typical Dunkin Donuts.
Great coffee ..free wifi, during your trip you can stop , take a minute to re-organize before moving on !! Stop and smell the coffee !!! :-)
Can never get a coffee at this dunkin that doesn't taste burnt or is made correctly. On top of it I have watched them many times charge some people but not others, I'll be going to another dunkin 
It's the typical Dunkin's, but the service is quick. If you have a large order you will get it in a timely fashion.
Face it, it doesn't matter which Dunkin' Donuts shop you visit because are going to get a great cup of coffee and a great assortment of yummy donuts.  
No matter when you go there you NEVER get the correct order, that is unless the Manager waits on you.
My wife and I have an ice cream CSA through Carter and Stevens. All their flavors are delicious creamy full of flavor and I would recommend this place to anybody. They have a small store on site where you can buy a few locally produced goods and their own beef. They have been continuously producing milk for over 100 years. Have an excellent barbecue however it is seasonal and is over at the end of this month. They have a brewery however I have not visited it and do not know the hours. But if you are in the area and want the best ice cream in central Massachusetts give them a try.
Many aspects to this place. From the BBQ to ice cream. The country store carries hard to find items and top cut meats that are grass fed and free from hormones and antibiotics. The farm is fun for the kids and the ice cream is the best in town.
Carter Stevens not only offers ice cream and fresh produce, they also have  weekend grill nights.  Outdoor barbeques, music friendly customers and staff.    The new addition the Stone Cow Brewery tops it all off.
We decided to check out the new Stone Cow Brewery that is part of the farm. The beers were fantastic!  I got a flight of 6 beers so I was able to taste all but one of their beers. The best IPA I've ever had (and I hate IPA s). We then got in line for the BBQ--that was a mistake! You need to get there early, around 4:30, get your beer (or 2) and wait in line for the food. They ran out of all meats except for the grass fed all beef hotdogs which were really good. The collards were super fresh and yummy! Deliscious handcut fries and cornbread rounded out our meal. We will definitely be back! Support your local farms!!
We found Carter and Stevens Farm last year and we love going here as often as we can. The FRiday and Saturday night BBQ menu is tremendous, ranging from hot dogs to grass-fed burgers to ribs to pulled pork. There is a wide selection of sides as well as soda made on site (they also just opened a brewery as well). There are farm animals, slides, wings, and other activities for the kids, ice cream, and a farm store. It feels like the middle of Vermont with great views and a relaxed atmsophere.
Although many young families roamed the gorgeous farmlands my husband and I enjoyed the sunset, amazing beer and soda made on site and delicious BBQ
Stopped by here on Columbus Day weekend. Ordered a soft serve. The mess that came out of the machine looked worse than what the dog left on the rug. It was runny, separated and curdled. I wonder what that plate count would have been. I asked the girl, "seriously" and she just shrugged it off. Poor training at best, poor attitude at worse. At least the hard packed ice cream had a better visual and flavor. 
We also loved the ice cream and the wide and interesting variety of local and organic foods and household items.  The service behind the counter was fast and friendly. The kids completely loved seeing the animals...goats, rabbits, cows, chickens, and of course Mrs. Truffles the pig. We missed the pumpkin chunkin with the trebuchet but we could see all of the broken pumpkins that had been chunked from the hilltop down into a field. Awesome!  We didn't dine at the deli but the variety looked good and prices reasonable. We'll try it next time. We also missed out on the outdoor BBQ...the set up looks really inviting and we'll definitely visit and review next trip. Carter and Stevens Farm is definitely worth a visit and we look forward to returning.
They have an excellent selection of ice cream with Generous scoops. They have a deli with fresh grass fed beef and other assortments of meat. Best of all they have an old playground with a metal slide.
Great food and wonderful homemade ice cream.
The deli sandwiches are fantastic and in the summer they have a BB Que which I have not tried yet...will get there this year!
They also sell fresh produce from their farm.
As far as seating they have picnic tables outside. that is why I checked off seating.
We have been there for icecream today: awesome!
But even all local and delicious products in shop looked very good. 
This is a place to meet friends and enjoy good BBQ with a view( they only BBQ on Friday and Saturday evenings in July and August). The store has a great selection of craft beers, local produce in season, wine, cheeses and the best ice cream in Massachusetts.
Excellent ice cream and a fantastic country store.  Nice little farmyard with a few very friendly cows, goats, pigs and other animals to pet.  My grand daughter loves this place!
Stopped in for ice cream, return over and over for an amazing collection of healthful food from carefully selected vendors, local farms, and their own elegant meat and certified raw milk.  If you think pasteurized milk "does a body good" google the benefits of raw and head immediately to Carter and Stevens!  (They also sell pasteurized.)  The sandwiches are ok, nothing to rave about, but the store is awesome enough that it still gets 5 stars and tons of business from me!
First of all this is a store with a ice cream shop and a deli counter.  But the ice cream and yogurt are great. and the Deli menu was surprisingly excellent. I have several friends and relatives that can be know-it-all Mass curmudgeons who usually do not  like anything new ...but I surprised the tarrtarrr sauce out of them by bringing a couple of sandwiches and some ice cream...and you would have thought that Big Papi made the sandwich's . They loved everything !  So when I travel back east, I love this place. Homemade breads with Boars head meats and cheeses may sound  boring  but there take is simple and fresh using local produce, and their dressings and sauces, which makes the sandwiches  tasty and filling.
But back to the ice cream, whatever the Carter Stevens are doing to their cows  must be working.
Maybe it is the quiet hilly Central mass farm meadows, ... maybe  it is the reggae -ska music. Whatever it is these cows are happy. Great little store and helpful employees.
We enjoyed some wonderful ice cream here and our family had fun checking out the adorable animals (cows, chickens, ducks, rabbits and goats) and playing on the small playground. 
This farm also sells its own milk and lots of local products inside. The young ladies working there were helpful and friendly. Definitely worth a visit!
If you visit here and dont get an ice cream you are truly missing out! Some of the richest, creamiest homeade ice cream around!

The Carter and Stevens store has a lot to offer. Especially if you like local fresh products. They have everything from in season produce to natural grain fed beef packages. Durring weekend nights in the summer they open their outdoor bbq pit and serve up some of the best cheesburgers one could ever ask for. 

A must stop for anyone traveling through town!
Their ice cream is the best around.  Fresh, grass fed milk, beef.  There are locally grown/made products as well.  Worth the drive.
We go here often for pre-made garden salads for an easy dinner. They also have fresh boars head meats.  Basically everything you need in one location.  They do not have gluten free bread, so we stick with sliced meats and salads.  They also have a counter filled with fresh beef for the grill- all sorts of cuts that always look delicious. But we go here for a healthy easy dinner to take home. 
Has all the small market staples plus a generous supply of wines and beers. They have a great deli and make the best grinders in the greater Wachusett region.
They also have a variety of ice cream flavors to choose from. A favorite cold treat during the hot summer months.
A local gem worth visiting. 
Great local market!  We love the  whoppie pies. I would like them to bring back  the BIG refrigerated wine bottles
This is such a handy place to have in town. It's not the biggest store but they have so much good food in there with their fresh meat and fish selection, produce and assorted grocery products. They have a great beer and wine selection! This store has saved me from many trips out of town to get what I needed. My wife always gets a whoopee pie when we stop there!!! 
This is a great neighborhood market with lots of choices and fresh meat, especially for barbeque grilling.  Good quality items.
This convenience store offers all that a small town could need and more.  Fresh deli and meat selections, dairy, produce, beer, wine and other extras.  I can't forget about the seasonal ice cream counter!!  Service with a smile.
Excellent market.  Good selection of beer and wine.  Milk in returnable glass bottles.  Boars head meats.  And excellent sub style sandwiches made to order.
Excellent sandwiches and meats I eat here a lot because you just want more, however the people that work there could be much friendlier... I don't get the small town marketplace feeling. They always seem so mad and not very welcoming. 
The Market offers a wide variety of items from milk to ice cream
and cold cuts. What you expect from a market just a bit smaller than your average store
Came in yesterday after calling ahead for takeout sandwiches. We received four sandwiches for my family - 3 BLTs and one Montesano (like an Italian sandwich) the sandwiches were served on Spucky roles which I have decided is my new favorite bread. The service was spectacular and the sandwich so filling that we could all only eat half. We will be back!

Also... They serve ice cream too and are one of the only local places that serve Purple Cow frozen yogurt which is my all time favorite! Soooo good. I feel the ice cream prices are a little high but worth it for the quality.
We always work in at least one visit at KP's. They are closed on Mondays, open for breakfast and lunch, closing at 2:00 p.m. Parking is limited due to the popularity of the restaurant, you can park in the next lot down the hill and walk around the building end or part across the street.  We like down south so we always order Haddock, baked or fried. I am told that folks travel far for their breakfast offerings. This in to the kind of place that draws tourist traffic, most everyone there are locals or friends of friends that recommend the food.
Friendly waitstaff, with consistent, basic breakfast choices. Reasonable prices.  Sunny, open dining room.
This restaurant  moved from Holden to Rutland a while back.  You should call them to check their hours as I believe their hours are a bit limited.  This is a good place to have breakfast.
They are in a nice newer building.
There is a parking lot but it is very small; I don't think it would normally pose a problem.
You can take the whole family here; children are OK and they do have a children's menu.
My family and I often go out for Breakfast on Sundays. We go to many different locations in and around Worcester. Time and time again, we find ourselves saying..the food is not as good as KP's
KP's is a fairly large place but it fills up on Sundays soo there is often a wait of up to 20-30 minutes. The menu is extensive and offers your traditional breakfast fare along with specials. Their benedicts are great and their omletes are always satisfying. One bad thing about KP is the wait time to receive the food. The longest we have ever waited was at least an hour. It is not always this bad and we are a larger group so that may attribute to the wait. I would say on average wait time is 20-30. The food is worth the extra wait time though and the coffee is good and fresh and they keep it coming! The wait staff has always been friendly to us and some have been there for a long time so they are good at what they do. I would highly recommend this for Breakfast but leave yourself some extra time to account for the possile waits. My sister and her family have gone for lunch/dinne and have said good things. I have seen that menu and it does look very appetizing.
I am a Starbucks lover and travel to many when I am out of town. The baristas were friendly and our drinks were on point.
This Starbucks stays busy everyday.  The wait can get a little long.  but the staff works the line hard and fast.   Step outside, and you're in the premier shopping district of boston, which is fun, like NYC used to be before all the creativity got priced out.
This is the place I think of when I think of Starbucks in Boston.  Right in the heart of Boylston street... I've spent a lot of time here over the years.  Hadn't been in a while and still the same... very busy and gave up on finding a seat.  Students love to camp out here... laptops on every table.  Typical SBUX stuff, good for grab and go.  Other, smaller Starbucks in the area, oddly, are better if you want to linger.
I actually used to work this location and it gets super busy!
They have pretty big seating space so you can find table if you avoid rush hour.

Perfect Iced Tea made just how I like and ordered it.  Everyone was very nice and provided quick and friendly service.
newbury street starbucks , how many times have I walked out due to a line to the door, not waiting 10 mins to get a  drink, please expand or get more help
What is not to like?  Great coffee, strong ... and great service too.  So conveniently located right next to the Westin.  Love it.
this starbucks is perfectly located (well I guess that's personal) but in general the space is big and it's usually easy to find a place to sit and work in there. The drinks are the usual (which is good) and everyone is very polite. The bathroom could be a little cleaner for those of us that spend some time there. 
ニューベリーストリート沿いにあるスターバックスです。お買いもの途中の一息で訪れました。店員の方も親切で、くつろげる雰囲気です。通りのショップにはカスタマー用のトイレがない為か、こちらのお店はトイレを使用するだけも了承していました。
Starbucks é Starbucks, não importa onde. Dou nota máxima não so para este, mais sim para todas as sua lojas mundialmente. Parabens
Nada de diferente, a praticidade e comidinha legal, sempre vou lá, sabe aquele lugar que você sempre repete?
Bien placé par rapport à l'hôtel , plutôt grand et spacieux (ce qui n'est souvent pas le cas de cette chaîne) , c'est le bon endroit pour apprécier un vrai expresso dès le matin 
Called in here after reading reviews and was not disappointed. Casual, relaxed atmosphere, Basic decor, friendly helpful staff. Opted for the original trident bowl, as I wanted a break from meat. The combination of roasted veg, quinoa and chick peas was truly delicious and a revelation. Would highly recommend. Good value too.
We stayed in a local hotel and went her for breakfast each day. Much cheaper than the hotel and lots of variety, from huge bowls of granola and fruit to stuffed pancakes and omelettes. Staff are friendly and helpful.
My daughters a student at BC and wanted to take us to lunch here since she loves their Monte Cristo sandwich.  While she still loves the sandwich, the rest of our food was mediocre at best.  The menu is largely breakfast/brunch food which may have been better, but the French dip was lacking flavor and the bread was stale.  Although it's in a bookstore, the noise level is very high and the space is extremely tight. 
Nice atmosphere for students. Lots of cool books and trinkets.
Lots of food options (though mediocre in quality)
The food is great, the eggs benedict is a fave and my daughter ordered a bowl of yogurt and fruit and it was enormous.  The book shop is a great spot too.  Have a cup of coffee and enjoy!
After a recommendation and good reviews we headed to the trident cafe. After waiting at the sign to be served we were told to go take a seat wherever. .. once we did they quickly took our orders. After less than 5 minutes our meals arrived stone cold.  I ordered eggs benedict which was served with cold over spiced potatoes, cold eggs and a crummy overly citrusy holindase sauce.  The waitress who served us was dull and unfriendly. Maybe my standards are too high but if you are looking for a fresh tasty brunch don't bother going here.  
Loved this place! Staff is friendly, cool vibes and food is awesome. You can go book shopping after! And they have milk substitute for your coffee, love when places have options! And unsweetened ones! Make sure you try the lemon ricotta French toast: it's DEVINE! So fluffy and tasty!  
Just enjoyed a delicious Sunday lunch here! Service was great, food tasty and fresh and served with great diner speed!we will be back many more times!!
A great find, thanks to TA. Super busy on weekends. Grab a book while you wait. Food tastes great. Good coffee. Enjoyed the visit.
Visiting friends early morning, we decided to get a bite to eat.  Breakfast, walking up to this book store slash cafe was just what the doctor ordered.  When u walk in it is truly a book store, they have seating on the first level and a bar and seating on the second level also.  We went upstairs to the second level and found a seat right away, the place seats about 50+ people so I can imagine it gets crowded at times.  The menu is very simple and small but the food was good, they also have lunch for those who don't do breakfast.  The prices we reasonable and didn't think I was being robbed but the best part of this cafe slash book store is they have a few good beers on tap.   The location of this place is in walking distance of tons of shops and hotels making this a nice place to dine.   I would go back to this location any day, good service good food and a great ambiance.   
We ate breakfast here on our first day in Boston.  We loved it so much that we ate there the next two days as well.  Unfortunately, after that, we had to come home.  We never eat anywhere more than once while on vacation - this was a rare occasion.  I love having a coffee in a book shop, but having breakfast was a whole new experience.  The food and the service were really good.  My husband had the huevos rancheros with plantains.  I also really enjoyed the book selection that they had.
As a solo traveller (for the first time) I loved that this is a book shop (with other things too) and open 'til midnight with a range of food and drink.  You can arrive and suss out the place whilst browsing the books and go sit and read or just be without being the only solo in the place.  Just fantastic.  (For non-solo travellers there are also group tables!)
Trident is just a really cool breakfast place nestled in a bookstore. The food is equally delicious every time I visit. The Eggs Benedict and Breakfast Burrito (either normal or Southwest) are excellent. They also have real juices made from various fruits and vegetables. You can sit outside, at a table, at a booth or slide on up to the bar. Service is friendly and fast! A Boston gem!
Reminiscent of my fav breakfast spot in Hanover,NH,Lou's....nice kids running the place, great breakfast choices, endless coffee, books all over,cozy, cheap, right on Newbury str.....what else would you want

Feeling like a healthy meal and an early night in, I popped into the Trident Booksellers and Cafe to order a take away salad. The salad was substantial and full of variety with things like kale, pumpkin and broccoli, just what my holiday body needed. The staff were super friendly and while waiting for my salad I was lost in the books, trinkets and atmosphere of the place. It felt welcoming. I loved this place. 
Saturday morning stroll along Newbury Street. Folks are shopping and dining al fresco. Great to peruse the books in a real bookstore and then have breakfast or lunch with a friend or alone (with one of the books). So few independent bookstores left. This one is a gem.
They serve wonderful breakfasts--eggs, waffles, superb french toast--all day, and great soups and sandwiches, too. Plus, it's possibly the best bookstore in Boston, with unusual cards and gifts thrown in.
Decent, original menu options beyond the standard breakfast fare. Service on Sat morning around 9:15 wasn't fast but wasn't slow- good pace. Tried the apple Brie omelette- was really good when you got to the center, so start there and then work to the outside. 

Trident has been my friend and I's favorite café on Newbury for years! Great food for picky eaters and awesome staff!
Worst service I've ever experienced. Four of us walk in @ 8:30a to an empty cafe. By 9:00a we were walking out -- without ever receiving so much as a cup of coffee. This wasn't the worst of it, though. The staff were probably the rudest people I've ever encountered. Thinking about catching breakfast here, I say definitely *DON'T* "go for it."
I always get the same thing. Black french vanilla coffee and a wake up wrap. The cashier was quick to take my order and it was out in less than a minute. 
I'm not sure this is the correct address or if this location has been closed.  I know there is one nearby on Boylston Street.  In any event, it's a Dunkin Donuts - a pretty branded experience.
Boston probably has more dunkin donut's than they have pigeons.  I fell in love with their cream donuts and are glad that we were only there for a week as it would not have been good for my weight
Had dinner here in early October on a Saturday night. As expected it was very busy. For starters I had the butternut squash soup which was homemade and very good. For he main course I had the strip loin with sides of spinach & mashed potatoes. It was also very good, but not over the top good. The steak was slightly over cooked from my order of medium rare, but the sides were all top notch.

For dessert I had the chocolate cake with cherries. Again very good but not the wow factor I was looking for. Service was good, and the atmosphere was excellent as this is an elegant space.
This place has the best calamari. Was very spicy and also crunchy but not to spicy. We did not have to wait to get sat. 
Arrived early for a 7.30 reservation on a busy Saturday. They were packed but we were seated at exactly 7.30. Table was nicely decorated for our anniversary. Service was outstanding, we didn't feel rushed even though we advised them of a time constraint, and our food came out right when we were ready for it at the perfect temperature. We had crab and lobster cake and clam chowder appetizers (both of which they split for us to share), filet and lobster tails, dry-aged NY strip, and a creme brulee dessert, and I can't think of a negative word to say about any of them. Sides are enough for two people but they will do a half-serving of most sides if you want to try more things. My only negative comment - they are using ipads for the wine list which in itself is great as it helps you choose exactly what you want but the brightness is turned up to the highest and you see then glaring all over the dining room as people choose their wine.
what an outstanding meal from the appetizers to dessert. the service is wonderful and many have been working there for a long period of time. the steak was cooked to perfection. if you have the extra funds well worth making reservations and eating here.
Arrived on an extremely busy Sunday night around 7PM.  The bar was packed but since we were going to just get a couple of items, we decided to wait.  Our wait was brief & we were seated at a high top table by the window.  The bar was very noisy, full of patrons & the wait staff was extremely busy.  We ordered drinks & our appetizers.  Hot bread arrived - all was delicious.  We shared a bowl of clam chowder that was also extremely good, rich & filling.  The next item was supposed to have been lobster mac n cheese but there was little to no lobster.  We stopped here because we have The Capital Grille in our hometown & know how much lobster they add in the Midwest.  Since lobster is everywhere here in the Boston area, we would have expected at least as much.  Chowder was $12.  Mac n cheese was $18 1 very small portion of a glass of wine was $10  Iced tea was $3.75.  We were offered no refills on the tea.  Extremely high prices for the small portion of wine, no refills on tea & very little lobster in mac n cheese.  Evidently it is popular enough a location so that those items may not matter to all those who were present.  We enjoyed it too, but would not go back while we visit the Boston area.
Our group picked this for a dinner spot randomly because it was close to our function.  I had a very wonderful experience here.  The steak and lobster was delicious.  Steak was cooked perfectly to order and the menu was also cooked well.  But the brussel sprouts were so amazingly delicious.  It was crispy, sweet with a good dose of delicious bacon mixed in.  YUM!! All my dinner companions enjoyed their meals as well.
We were in the mood for steaks in downtown Boston. The Capital Grille came up #! on a TA search. I have eaten in their estrablishments in Washington, DC and New York. This did not disappoint. My fried calimari appetizer was done to perfection, followed by a New York strip steak no less so. My companions had the sliced filet and the steak tartare and were equally satisfied. Accompanied by a South Australian Shiraz it was a very memorable meal. In our opinions the #1 rating is well deserved.
Senior year birthday celebration for triplet coed granddaughters was all that could be hoped for. Best lamb chops ever; great steak and tuna (and mojitos). Special birthday tray was exceptional
Coming inside it is a nice place. The food tasted well, but misses the details you expectatief for the prices they ask for.
The quantity is too much, the quality less then expected.
Personel is willing but also lack the feeling for details. 
While many restaurants enjoy a relatively short time of providing excellent food, the CG continues to deliver.  We love this place for social and business meals.  the steaks/chops are always terrific.  We prefer the bar area as it feels more comfortable to us however for a larger group of high end business you probably want to be in the main restaurant.  Service is wonderful, prompt, and friendly.  Steak Tartare is unbelievable as an app!  The porcini rubbed in ribeye is the best.  Enjoy and then step out into one of Boston's beautiful window shopping areas.  Not cheap...however worth every penny!
Always a safe choice for a really good meal. I prefer the casual bar area to the more formal restaurant. The wine list and cocktails are great starters. Meats are stellar, of course, especially the lamb chops. There's a dizzying array of sides, but the creamy smashed potatoes and the brussel sprouts are at the the top of the list. It's not a place for a surprising meal, but it is always executed very well by a highly competent and friendly staff. It's too heavy for everyday eating out, but a nice treat once in a while.
We visited as a large group of co workers. Staff all extremely pleasant. Great selection of beer and wines.

Menu is expensive, since I wasnt paying that didnt bother me. Lobster Bisque special starter was delicious and contained two full lobster claws, the bisque was creamy and excellent but why such a small portion of the bisque?!

My New York strip steak was enormous but tender and cooked exactly as requested.

Expensive though really excellent.
Excellent place and service. I came with my husband, and we were looking for a nice place to eat a great steak, this is a good one. Both plates delicious. My husband didnt like the tuna entree with mango but the steaks were really really nice.
Have not been here since the move from Newbury to Boylston so we made a reservation for our anniversary after much debate. We wanted to try someplace new but, in the end, our curiosity about the new location got the best of us.

The atmosphere, service, and food were all outstanding. I like busy, dark dining rooms and this was exactly what I was hoping for. Waiter was spot on, steaks were perfectly cooked, and they reserved us a booth as requested.

The only little hiccup was that I had to ask for a steak knife as the runner forgot to bring us one with our entrée. I probably didn't even need one. 


I had a business dinner here recently and enjoyed it immensely.  We found a bottle of Viu Manent Chilean malbec for $47, which was excellent.  I had the crab appetizer, which was full of sweet lumps of crabmeat.  The ahi was great as well.  My dessert was the flourless chocolate cake; delicious.  A bit pricey for entrees, but a great place for business meetings.
My friend is a kosher eater and the kitchen made an effort to feed her.
Salads, eggs on toast with vegetables. I was a bit surprised as in the whole world today , restaurants are prepared to feed vegetarians and vegans. But she was happy. 
I had clam chowder soup , excellent and lobster roll( no bread...). 
The restaurant has a lunch menu for $20
Starter and main dish. 
Which wS very satisfying.
Our server was so galant. Tried to really help her.
The bar looks fabulous.
On our way out we saw a big cabinet with small doors. Each cel had a few wine bottles and names. I guess people bring their wines and these are kept here for the next meal.
I feel that these lunches are a real deal. 
The restaurant is elegant, not full over lunch time. I truly recommend it  .
The food, the location, the service - all TOP NOTCH.  We had a wonderful dinner at Capital Grille celebrating our recent wedding.  The server(s) were attentive and courteous.  We had a wonderful card of congratulations waiting for us at our table when we were seated.  The meal was phenomenal and everything was cooked perfectly.  I would highly recommend reserving a table the next time you are able.
I stopped in pre game for drinks and appetizers.  Everything was as delicious as it always is when visiting a Capital Grille and the service was spot on.  Even though we just had beverages and apps, the bartenders were happy to serve us and make sure we had everything we needed. I love the Prosciutto wrapped Mozzarella and the Crab and Lobster cakes were flavorful as well.   I am looking forward to visiting again soon.
The onion soup was delicious, the caesar sald was spot on, we enjoyed baked mushrooms and truffle fries as sides. service was efficient and attentive. our porterhouse steak was decent, but below our expectations for a restaurant at this level. the crust was not charred as crispy as we requested, and the meat inside was not as juicy as i've come to demand from top steakhouses.
An amazing steakhouse which also serves some of the best fish you can ever eat. The service is 5 star. We usually go in Aug due to the "Generous Pour" which is 7 glasses of wine for $28.. They showcase different and unique wineries every year. You can check out their website to view which winery's they will be hosting. We eat here a few times of year and I look forward to each and every time.  They have unique breads they place on the table which are always great. We love sitting in the booths....The restaurant has an aristocratic feel and we love the ambience both of the bar and the restaurant. Can't wait to go back.
Just delicious, good food, good portions and lovely staff- what more could you want. I will highly recommend.
I've been to Kings several times with friends after work over the years. My most recent visit included planning a billiard event for about 12 people.  Kristina, my event coordinator was a pleasure to work with and the planning was a breeze.  The day of the event, we were warmly welcomed upon our arrival. The space was all set up for us and the server was very attentive and fast.  The food was hot and delish as well. 

I can't wait to return and certainly recommend Kings for a fun night out with friends!
We recently hosted a work event at Kings for a group of 60 staff. Kings was incredibly easy to work with. They made everything easy from start to finish. The activities were great. We bowled for the first two hours and had food and drinks brought out at rapid speed by an incredibly amazing and friendly staff. The food was very good and plentiful. Everyone was stuffed. The last hour we rented out the game room which was a nice change of scenery and had an ice cream sundae bar brought in. Everyone loved it. Thanks again Kings for making our work offsite a great success!
Excellent food and very kind professional employees. As a girl from the south their Cajun remoulade sauce and Cajun fries are delish😋
Thanks Geisha and Casey for the hospitality and great spirits😉

Sherry Terri Gary
Don't let the bowling alley detour you from trying Kings.  All homemade food and It was great.  Mead and Garrett provided excellent service.  We'll be sure to visit again before we head home.
This was my first trip to Kings and it was great! I got the Fat Elvis which is a burger with bacon, spicy peanut butter, and deep fried banana. It was delicious (as strange as it sounds) I also got the "Dude" to drink. It was like an adult chocolate shake! I sat at the bar and Kae took great care of me! She was so kind and made me feel right at home. I will be going back for sure.
The place is kind of dark and you can easily be put off by the bawling alley, however, don't! The food is delicious, bartender very knowledgeable and attentive. It was a great time! 
amazing time bowling!  the staff was soo polite and i won my bowling game!! thank you very much  great time  
I had to plan a team building activity for our staff and finally settle on going to Kings.  Samantha, the event manager was very helpful.  She was always available via phone or email, she worked with our budget.  The staff who were assigned to our group, was very helpful and pleasant.  Our staff had the best time, getting to know each other, playing games and bowling and eating non-stop delicious food.  It was a great way to start off our school year.
I'd had a look on TripAdvisor for Boston's best eats, keen to tackle a personal hurdle and sit down in public for a meal alone. As I walked into Kings Bowling Bar I felt overwhelmed by the dim lighting, energetic crowd and blaring NFL game. Not one to shy away from a challenge (or turn around and walk back out of a room while everyone is looking) I climbed up onto a bar stool (really, it was quite a climb) and smiled at the cute bar attendant. He introduced himself, to which I replied,
"I don't even know what you just said."
He repeated himself explaining that his name was Polish, as I stared blankly at him... abruptly saying,
"Nope, I still have no idea."
He gave up, handed me a menu outlining the specials with such enthusiasm you'd think he made a commission on them. I let him talk me into the Nacho's and Bud Light special and was handed a beer as big as my head. It was a great authentic american experience that I would definitely repeat. 
Our company has had our summer party at Kings 2 years in a row and each year has been a blast! The food is great, the staff is superb, the games (bowling, skee-ball, pool) are super fun, and everyone has a great time. Thank you to the staff for making our experience so excellent!
King's is a classic, and overall a fun place if you want to play pool, bowl, etc. The place feels a bit dark and grimy, especially when compared to competitor Lucky Strike in Fenway. Didn't try the food. Waitress was super friendly. Was surprised by the beer selection - many more craft beers than I was expecting.
We had a company activity there and the food and staff were Awesome.  The atmosphere was very fun and relaxed. Plenty of space for those who wanted to bowl and space for those we wanted to mingle among colleagues and friends.  Would definitely go again if in the Boston area.
This is mostly a place for bowling down in a basement - but the food was great. We shared a pitcher of sangria made with white wine which was very good. I had the taco shrimps which were wonderful - really spicy with mango salsa and cooked just right. 
Don't be put off by the fact that this restaurant is in a bowling alley. The service was great (thanks to Nick) and the food (ribs, shrimp tacos and turkey/brie/cranberry sandwich) were all delicious.
Bowling here is so much fun! Our kids love it. The music is infectious & you can't help but dance and sing along. You'll know all the songs!! The food is good too. Although a bit pricy. If you plan to go & spend a couple hours and grab lunch with a family of (5) -example- tile end us costing...anywhere around $200. That's a couple games & lunch. So much fun though. They have a kids menu. Chicken fingers, pizza, grilled cheese. The adult menu is varied. The nacho plate (sm) is huge. Yummy. Our oldest son got chicken & waffles ($18) & it was two big chicken fingers with waffle fries with a honey mustard maple sauce. That was deceiving. But everything else we ordered was just fine. 
All in all, we love it.
We recently had a corporate event for 60 people. Everyone had a wonderful time bowling and playing the various games offered, and even with all of the allergen accommodations the food was excellent! Samantha was an absolute pleasure to work with and the staff were absolute gems - also very patient with us! Fab time, would do it again!
Went to Kings for a party with a large group. Food consisted of hor d'oeuvres at first, then main dishes. The steak tips were excellent. They clearly know food as well as bowling!
I put my card in and won!  It was actually my birthday the day we went.  All of my friends, family and coworkers joined me in a night of free bowling, appetizers and sodas.

We had a great time.  Service and food was excellent!  I would definitely host future events here.
With a limited budget for a company outing, Kings Boston was a great choice. They accommodated the group's dietary restrictions and everyone had fun bowling. It was a great team building exercise. The staff at Kings was really helpful and responsive. 
The restaurant should note that customers were using flashlights to read the menu. That means the lighting is too dark. Hard floors meant it was noisy too. Food was average. 
Read in a Boston newspaper that Sonsie served the best chowder in Boston 2016. I found this surprising and it left me wondering how bad the others then might be.... It was an OK chowder but not more than that. Luckily we tried the cheese cake made of butternut pumpkin and  that sort of tilted over the pendulum to a more positive side.
This restaurant was within walking distance of our hotel and turned out to be a great neighborhood spot. It was raining when we went, but on a nice evening it'd be lovely to sit by the windows and enjoy some prime people watching. We had the mussels and pizza and the food, while not outstanding, was very tasty and the service was great as well.
I've been meaning to review this restaurant after we were there while on vacation in Boston in August. Our family of four, which includes two teenagers, came here for brunch followed by shopping on Newbury Street. My son has a severe nut allergy, which can be even more challenging at brunch because many restaurants offer some sort of nuts on pancakes or French toast. That was no problem at Sonsie. I can't recall if my son had crepes or French toast, but they checked and double checked the safety of all food that came to him.  That goes a long way to making the meal more enjoyable for him and our family, so we really appreciate it!  Thanks to the caring staff at Sonsie! Btw, we all enjoyed our food, which included my son's sweet breakfast, as well as quiche and clam chowder. 
Great food. Wonderful service. Girls night out. Couldn't have started at a better place. Chocolate Creme Brulee worth every calorie.
The food was very good.
The setting is a bit dark may do better with a bit more light.
Very busy on Friday.
Very very noisy and loud
The service was a bit slow
We went to the restaurant around noontime on a warm, cloudy weekend day for a family brunch. This section of Newbury St is active, vibrant and fun. The front of the restaurant was wide open to take advantage of the unseasonably warm weather. The ambience was young and lively.
Unfortunately, some of the food we had was only ok. Some of us had variations of the eggs Benedict. Reviews were mixed. Some of us had the tuna melt, which was heavy and greasy with an emphasis on mayo and not on tuna. It was served with chips which were also greasy. The coffee, on the other hand, was excellent.
I see that many feel that the food here is quite good. Maybe we caught them at a bad time...
We had a nice Thursday lunch at Sonsie. We sat at the open dining area with a summery feeling. Salads were tasty (cesar salad with chicken and salad with strawberries and beets), and the gluten-free menu was exceptionally large.
Well worth the visit.  I can think of nothing to improve.
Our group started with oysters on the 1/2 shell--they tasted like the ocean...fresh, heady, and just the right amount of saltiness. I had the bluefish with crab cake on the side--perfectly cooked and full of flavor.  I was with a large group-and I heard nothing but delighted exclamations all around.
We were planning to have brunch, but arrived to find that their brunch does not start until 11. We had breakfast instead (smaller menu, but still good). Coffee was slow to come out, but the food was good with large portions. The view out the open front is very nice. Tables are small.
Four of us ate there on Saturday night. We like different things, but there was something for everyone. I had the chicken bolognase and it had so much flavor, loved it. Others had fish or pizza. Desserts were unigue and decadent. Cocktails were great too, and service was very attentive. 
Traveling to Boston work work. One of our local colleagues recommended this. spot.
Great service, great food. Nice wine list. Cant go wrong!
Visited with 2 girlfriends and we all loved our food. They bring out these amazing pastries that could be a meal all by themselves. The maple donut is amazing! Order one and share it.
Came for brunch on Labor Day. Lucked out with good weather and were able to sit near the open windows to the street. Food was very good. We had a pizza and the sirloin steak and eggs bene. Server was helpful and attentive. Only complaint was the disorganized and somewhat rude greeting by the two person team hosting. We had made a reservation on open table, arrived a few minutes early, and were mostly dismissed and they attempted to seat us in the back without asking out our preference for the patio section. Would come back for the food and ambiance and simply hope for better service at the hosting stand.
My husband and I were in town to drop off our son for this third year at Northeastern University.  We decided to meet up on Newbury Street and seek out a dinner venue which was something we'd never tried before.  Since it was the Sunday of Labor Day week-end, many restaurants were packed and we had no reservation.  Our son perused a few online possibilities and for whatever reason chose Sonsie.  I think he liked the sound of a French/American fusion.  We arrived to a lovely open front restaurant, and were quickly ushered to a table overlooking the street.  Tables in this area are quite close together and--while they are beautiful, oval shaped marble top tables--it's a squeeze for two people and was small for three people.  However, the ambiance was delightful and we figured if it worked for others, we could make it work.  Our server, Nia, greeted us with a smile and lots of input regarding the menu.  Our water glasses were always full (a personal peeve of mine so I was quite happy).  We decided to share the waffle/shrimp appetizer (yum-o!).  My husband had lobster ravioli (he liked it so much, there was none to share with his beloved wife), our son devoured a lovely looking chicken bolognese, and I was quite happy with my chipotle chicken pizza (and yes, I shared with them).  While the table was small, we all managed to make it work.  I highly recommend a trip to Sonsie and am sure our first trip will not be our last.  Thank you for a delightful evening!
We made a reservation for Brunch. We hadn't looked at the menu beforehand, so I wasn't sure what to expect. We were seated just after it started, and the menu wasn't very large, but had enough to choose from. I went with the French Toast with Rum Sauce and Bananas (tasked almost like a Bananas Foster). I had a great Mimosa, and my boyfriend had an Espresso Martini (although the second one had much more espresso in it). He had eggs benedict for breakfast. I found it a bit pricey for a breakfast, although they called it brunch, but we were on Newbury Street in Boston.
After cycling 23 miles round Boston including over the Charles River to Harvard and round Fenway Park, we needed a nice place for a refreshing lunch.  What better than sitting at the street enjoying beers and a fine lunch with salad.
Great ambience for cocktails and a snack. Superb service. Good pizzas. I recommend the eggplant dip and the corn pizza. 
When in Boston, when younger, i would always go there.....now as a late 50's guy, i went with my daughters and wife and enjoyed it as much... a little dark, a little noisy but good food and good value...a Boston classic
This is the place for lunch when you want to have a leisurely chat with a friend or impress a job candidate. The service is superb, atmosphere lovely, and food excellent.
It's good that I live half an hour away, otherwise I would be here far too often. This is the best burger I've been able to find in the area. Much of what they serve is locally sourced and they have a sign on the wall showing from where many of the ingredients came. Even the sodas sold are not from a national company. The fries are great too.
Went for lunch with business colleagues. Being a Vegan, it wasn't very easy to find a place downtown, however once finding this place, all my worries were left behind. The Vegan burger is really good. Go try it out! 
My wife were looking for a good light meal following a tiring day of travel.  We found B. Good right next to our hotel, the Charlesmark.

My wife had a spinach salad chocked full of blueberries, strawberries and nuts.  She said it was perfect.  I needed something a little more substantial and went with a burger and fries.  The burger was very good but the fries a little disappointing in that they were not as crispy as I prefer.

All in all, this place served our need for something light and healthy.
Really Good 🍴👌 you have to go there. We had a veggie Burger as El Guapo and a chicken Sandwich. 
Service +5 and a nice location
Located right in the heart of Longwood Medical Area, this restaurant was a very convenient place to grab a meal for lunch! I ordered the spicy avocado and lime quinoa bowl with an add-on of chicken for around 3 dollars extra, and was in for a pleasant surprise. The quantity was large (though appropriate considering that I paid over 10 dollars for it) and the ingredients were all nutritious and fresh! The sauce used is quite flavorful; perhaps a little too salty for me, though. I particularly enjoyed the avocado slices and kale. It was essentially a unique salad, and I would recommend it to anyone who is looking to try something healthy but interesting.
It was $22 for 2 burgers 1 fry and 2 drinks. But everything was gluten free, fair trade, vegan, union, locally sourced, and served by a melting pot of equally treated staff. 

Really it was a pretty decent meal at an ok price, but probably the most politically correct meal I have ever consumed. 
They do go to lengths to make sure that the food is of good quality.  That said, they did mess up my take away order (which affected the cost, and it happened right before they closed).  They close at 9 PM, so make sure you get there with plenty of time to spare in case this happens to you.
We visited the B.Good branch on Longwood and Brookline while visiting family in the local hospitals.  Can't say enough good things about it.  Food was amazing, staff was fast and courteous, ingredients were impeccably fresh and delicious!
My meal was great and the restaurant had very good service. The atmosphere was cute and I liked the message of why the restaurant was created.
One of the few places I could find in boston with many healthy options. Price was decent and the food was good. I had the southwest chicken sandwich and my wife had the cousin turkey burger. Both were pretty good.
The cleanliness of the place and the signs "natural ingredients" were what enticed me to go in. Loved the fact that kitchen wasn't hidden as it showed that they have confidence in the product they prepare and the staff who prepare it. The food was on the pricier side but not especially tasty but the sweet potato fries are nice However, the selection of drinks from the drinking fountains were great! Strawberry lemonade, beet lemonade and my favourite, rosemary lemonade. It is a welcome change from all the unhealthy fast food on offer at every corner in Boston, but there is still work to do to make it taste better.
OK, I was persuaded to visit because of the 'local' healthy food recommendations. Forget it.  Very dry burger that tastes more of cardboard than anything you would get at McDonalds (which are not that bad) and fries that were cooked and burnt in an oven.  Come on, you may be able to extract money from gullible young students, but trying it on with the rest of us, more fool me.
2 of us, first time visit. I ordered the Cousin Oliver, my companion was served & I was still waiting, as was another customer who had ordered ahead of us. My name was called & I got my order & noticed the fries were NOT sweet potato, they were grabbed off the tray & thrown away.   I put ketchup on my burger (lower sugar ketchup) only then noticed I had asparagus on my burger & realized I hadn't gotten a burger at all, but a chicken sandwich. This caused the 2 women at the counter to argue over who had made the mistake. The cook came over to intervene & he suggested I could just eat the chicken sandwich?! But I wanted & PAID for a burger. Eventually I got my burger, the chicken sandwich,I guess joined the fries in the bin. It was an OK burger, & to compensate me for the length of time I was given an additional order of sweet potato fries, which I didn't need, but I appreciated the gesture, I'm guessing food costs for this place are through the roof! My companion raved about the Rosemary lemonade, I had the strawberry lemonade. It was good. not sure I'd make a return trip.
The burgers here are very good with fresh ingrediants and served up in a timeley manner and very affordable.The sweet potato fries are awsome.
We recently had lunch at the B. Good on Longwood while in Boston visiting a friend at Beth Israel. Orders are taken at the front counter and food carried back to your table. We had turkey burgers and salads and smoothies, all were very good. We had an order of sweet potato fries that were limp and not that good. The restaurant, including the restroom was clean and well maintained. The staff seemed friendly and helpful. We loved that we could order healthy food that is mostly sourced locally. Overall, we all had a very enjoyable lunch and would recommend B. Good. Thank you. 
Was hoping for a great salad, but it was eh.  Too much dressing, not enough stuff in it to give me a full feeling.  Needed some crunch.  Burgers were OK - but didn't stand out.  Husband wasn't impressed either.  Not good for a dinner meal.
Ate lunch here a couple days ago and it was good. The chicken for my sandwich was very dry but the flavor of the ingredients they put on top were very good. My girlfriend had the toasted almond and ginger bowl and she loved it, very big for the price, so she was able to take half home for later.
B. Good is a small restaurant chain that you will desperately want to like. It advertises "real food" but I'm afraid it just comes down to a slow fast-food restaurant. It may be real food locally sourced but it isn't better food. I had the cheeseburger, fries and a drink. The unfortunate fact is that lean beef ground up and cooked without any additives is pretty much just a dry hamburger. The fries, locally sourced are okay and not deep fat fried. Seasoning on the fries was okay, but again, they were not better tasting than what is sold two doors down by Wendys.

B. Good says fresh food, nothing is pre-prepared. So, be prepared for a long, long wait for your food. I waited almost 15 minutes for my burger and fries and the place wasn't even busy when I went in. 

Two doors down is a Wendys restaurant. I paid $11.81 for burger and fries at B. Good. I waited 15 minutes to get my meal. How long will they be in business when I could have gone the franchise route and gotten a similar meal for $2-3 less?
Ordered a salad for a quick lunch and it was delicious.  All its ingredients were very fresh. Service was nice and attentive.  Returned next day for a chocolate shake and it was very good as well.
we had their seasonal special burger, with roasted corn on the cob and rosemary lemonade. fresh, local ingredients, cooked well, lot of flavor. will keep coming back!
First, id like to say that ive been coming to zest every week for the past 2 years and I just had one of the worst customer service experiences in boston. I went there today 23rd september at 7:45 pm and the employee treated me like absolute garbage. I had the sides mistaken so i apologised and asked if i could get hummus instead of rice he looks at me and rudely says "well what is it that you want" gives me the dirtiest look and in a highly disrepectful manner that no customer should have to endure. When i paid i asked for the receipt the employee looks at me smiles in a mocking way and mumbles "puss" while giving the receipt to me. Didnt give me the pita which i am entitled to either. Never coming back. This place has been going down hill 
Zest Mediterranean Grille - sounds attractive, right? I thought so too, so I stopped there for a quick lunch. They have falafel and different meat options. The chicken shawarma looked dry, so I ordered kebab sandwich (should be beef and lamb meat). Found out that no matter which meat you order - you get chicken shawarma (just pay more for ordering kebab). Ok, maybe it will be tasting (as the name Zest is promising)? I found in the pita bread 4-5 burnt cubes of something white. BTW - they bring the shawarma meat in their hands to put in the pita... Lucky enough they wear gloves, but that's not an attractive process. Tasty? the only taste was burnt something, no hint of meat taste. I asked for hummus, tomoatos and make it spicy. Maybe I'm wrong, but lettuce is not even close to be a tomato. Spicy? maybe, I didn't notice. Hummus - yes, there was a white tasteless sauce in the pita. I've been eating shawarma since I was a teenager, I had bad shawarma in my life, but this one was the worst by far.Only good point: the Snapple lemonade (in bottle) was nice.
Why did I give Zest one star? Because I didn't find an option to give 0 stars.
BTW: I never understood the idea of asking for tip in a self-service restaurant. Isn't it the basic idea of self-service that there in no real "service"? In Zest they put the tip glass in front of you, and if you pay by a credit card - the "recommended" calculated tips start at 15%.
Summary: if you care about the taste of you food, don't even consider this one. Don't repeat my mistake. I just wonder how come this place is not ranked as the worst in Boston, Are there really 2,000 Boston restaurants worse than this one? That's impossible. You would have been out of business long time ago.
It's not often you find healthy food that is fast and cheap but Zest fits the bill! Very large portions and many options for a moderate price. A surprising find- would recommend.
We stumbled across this place when we were out sight seeing/shopping needed something to eat.

The food was excellent! Fresh, tasty, good portions and reasonably priced.  Service was speedy and staff were friendly. 
Was looking for Thai food and ended up here.  Very good food. Go with the large plate.  Much better deal than regular. Very nice employees. 
We had the chicken swarma wrap, shared it as it's quite big. It has the yummiest fresh chicken kebab and you can top it up with lots of salads (lettuce, tomato, pickles, cucumber, etc...) the pread is hummus or garlic mayo. It's around $9:00 per wrap. We came twice cause we loved it! Can sit outside watching people. It serves soft drinks.
We just happened upon this place when visiting Boston and needed some lunch.  We went in hoping it would be healthier fare, since we were eating out a lot on vacation.  The food was excellent and reasonably priced.  It's set up like Chipotle, with all the ingredients on display and you can direct the production of your plate or wrap.
I have to say that Zest is perhaps he best and freshest Mediterranean restaurant I've visited.  

I picked it figuring it would be a perfect spot to stop for a quick note as we walked from the Pru to Fenway for a concert AND because it would appease vegetarians, health eaters and "regular eaters" alike.

I have to say  I was very impressed.  The restaurant is very clean, the staff is helpful and friendly, the food is terrific and I think there is a great value -- a 'plate' of chicken kebab or shwarma (sp?) is about $10-12 but comes with 4 sides!   

I opted for the sandwich version of the chicken kebab and had some spicy tahini added to the mix.  

Very good.  And everyone in the family loved it.  

This will be out go to spot for future games and events at Fenway (for those who know to sneak in the back alley way).
Fun place with very good Lebanese food. The platters are huge with 4 sides. I got the chicken shawarma sandwich with garlic (delicious) and spicy tahini. Great for  a quick lunch or snack. Eat there or take away. 
I found this place just taking a walk on Boylston Street. Got a Falafal rollup and a bottle water for around $8.50 or so. Lots of topping options and all looked fresh. Will def come back!
Zest is absolutely delicious and the people who work there are so friendly. I couldn't decide on the falafel or chicken so they gave me a free falafel to try with hummus and it was great! Second time I had the chicken shawarma Rollup and that was equally good!
Really enjoyed this food.  Great portions and fresh food.  They had a great selection of side dishes.  Staff was very friendly,
Nice variety of Med. food.
-huge portions
-great falafel...moist and creamy, unlike a lot of falafel which is dry and crumbly
-cheap!

I'd pad a little more if the dining area was clean. All the tables we looked to sit at had food from past diners. It is a fast food restaurant, but I expect more.
The food is fresh and I had the Falafel and what is great about this place is that you can whatever you want in any of the dishes or the rolls ups.  I had the Falafel and added the tomato cucumber, humus, salad, beets and the mild white sauce.  It was all very good.  You order from the bar, they make it right in front of you and there are a bunch of seats. They have free water with lemons in them which is also a nice touch. Quick and easy lunch for under $8.
My son dragged me to this place as soon as i arrived in Boston. I must say i was hesitant at first, but ended up being nicely surprised by its menu, and food quality. I can see why it attracts a student crowd. It is not expensive and you get your money's worth. They have different sizes for their burritos (which i loved) and you have plenty of ingredients to choose from to fill them. Nice, friendly and quick service. Great juices and milkshakes.
I come here for lunch regulatory as its a less than 10 minute walk from my office. I like their buffalo chicken but really like their teriyaki chicken.  If you get this one though war or on site. It's juicy and can cause the wrap to fall apart if you wait too long, especially the flour. It is the most flavorful in my option. 
I went to boston and hanged out with locals, boloco is an usual place for them, so apparently they have a good affordable menu, I went and tasted the nutella milkshake and it is DIVINE. Get it. A boston must <3
Great breakfast here. A medium bowl with eggs and bacon plus a coffee for just over $5 has got to be a bargain. Staff who serve with a grin and a joke help enormously too.
I went to Northeastern. I would grab lunch between classes. Great menu items from burritos to desserts to smoothies. Delicious chocolate chip cookies. Definitely a college feel to it. Yummy, semi-health, fast food option. Their service was always great too. If something wasn't right, they would correct it. Not that I've moved away, I really miss eating at Boloco. 
Love this place and they are locally run and offer a much better option than the unhealthy fast food most people eat.
I like BOLOCO's commitment to local economy, sustainability etc.  I also like their ordering procedure.  I had the "Mexican" burrito, and I have to say, it measured up to what I consider to be the gold standard, another local chain's burrito, whose name I won't mention here.  So overall, it's a win, and I'd return.

Here's the thing though...that's the only one on the menu I would ever order.  If you you want serious variety within what you'd think of as Mexican flavors, you may not find it here. If you want new twists, then it's an awesome place.  But for me, if I wanted chutney I wouldn't be ordering a burrito.
This is average burrito place.
Portion is pretty good.
But if you know real burrito this is not where you can bring your expectation for it.
Just think fast food burrito place.
Some boloco's are better than others. This particular one is subpar. I get the same one all the time. Mini w black beans, cheese & corn salsa. Beans were hard!!!!  Cheese didn't melt. Yucky. My son got a buffalo chicken. He didn't like it. So there's a plus if you usually get a lot of protein but his was filled with a lot of chicken. Too much. It just fell apart. Inedible.
Boloco is delicious! I love traditional mexican food, but when I'm here, I always go for something untraditional (Bangkok Thai burrito is my favorite).  If you're hanging around the Copley area and looking for something good, fresh, and quick, go here.

Note: Their smoothies are pretty tasty too
We took our family here for a quick dinner before going to see the Boston fireworks.  It was quite tasty!  They had fun, unexpected flavor combinations and the food was served quickly.  We really enjoyed this place and recommend it for families looking to eat out on a budget!
Loved that this isn't a carbon copy of other burrito joints. Fun flavor combos and very nice, patient staff. The only ding is they don't have quest for the chips!
Boloco is one of my favorite fast food restaurants. I get my meal quckly and I always know they have the freshest ingredients. I love this place and they are on the cutting edge of what is new in food. Yesterday I tried the Jaffa Falafel Burrito.  It had falafel, roasted jalepeno hummus, romaine cukes ,  tomato and GREEN garbanzo beans. .  I had never heard of green garbanzo beans and so I asked the the person waiting on me what they were. Apparently they ware a new vitaman packed garbanzo bean quickly becoming one of the new superfoods.  The sales person was very knowledgable about them . Well I am all for that! Anyway this sandwich(burrito) did not disapoint. It was delicious. I had not had Falafel or green garbanzos before but I am now a convert.I loved the crunch and color they added to my meal.   I love all the food at this place and it remains my go to whenever I need a quick lunch in the city.Friendly knowledgable waitstaff, cutting edge food choices (please do not think this is some sea grass and carrot juice type restaurant it's not) and quick service.   I love the guac too!
Boloco is almost a second home. It was the one thing I missed (aside from cheesesteaks in general) when I go abroad. Boloco often inspires a sense of person to burrito loyalty. For instance, I will never order anything other than a buffalo chicken burrito. I think it is perfect and have never branched out.

This particular location is very open and has ample space to sit and eat. They've got that awesome soda machine that lets you mix and match flavors.

Boloco is also green and involved in their community. They do a good job at keeping in touch with customers and staying current.
Ordered online then walked a few blocks to pick it up. Got everything right. My husband had the chicken masala burrito and I made my own. Tried his, sauce was okay, but not my favorite. Mine was good - but something tasted a bit off - couldn't figure out what it was. Guac was fantastic as usual but you don't get much, tiny container for a side, not a lot of chips either - maybe an ounce or two.
The expression "pick two: good, fast, or cheap" certainly applies here.  We were running late, starving, and saw burritos! It took a while to figure out how this places worked: tons of choices, not very clear menus.  Eventually we got it together, ordered and ate our food.  We had black bean burritos with some veggies, rice, and the guacamole was rather stingily applied.  It is student food for sure, gets the job done, but nothing to write home about.
Staff are friendly enough and patient while you choose your menu items. Can be a bit frustrating because there's so many ways to put together a burrito. Several options (brown rice or white, different wraps, different veggies, etc.) Love their guac and chips - burrito was good, but go for a smaller one, they're huge!
Lugar agradavel, comemos burritos deliciosos (cuidado: apimentados) adorei e vale muito a pena conhecer. Atendimento rapido e eficiente.
色々な具材をトルティーヤにくるんでくれます。好みでどれが美味しいかマズいか意見の食い違いはありますが、自分好みを見つければ通うかもしれませんよ。
Si tratta di un fast food che prepara cibo messicano; veloci nelle ordinazioni e nella preparazione, non male i burritos (che possono essere "composti" con ampia varietà di ingredienti e diversi livelli di "piccante").
Wanted a restaurant near the Concert we were attending.  Summer Shack had a fun atmosphere and a good selection on their menu.  I had a special which had a really nice salad mixture and beautifully sautéed Cape Cod Scallops which were very sweet and tasty.  Salad had too much vinegar which is too bad because it was wonderful but couldn't eat too much of it.  The seafood was great except I was Crunching on most of the pieces.  Not good.  I didn't say anything because I was with 4 other people 2 of whom I did not know well.  Otherwise, I would have spoken up!!!
For good fish dishes then make your way to this Back Bay eatery which serves fresh tasty dishes without fuss. We ate there on the recommendation of our hotel concierge and enjoyed our meals so much that we went back again. The menu is extensive & offers meat as well as fish. There was a good specials board too. The staff were very attentive & friendly and helpful when diners were having their first experience of lobster. There was a lovely atmosphere & there were single female diners present both times. 
Curb appeal is a big plus in real estate.  This is a short walk from our hotel, so I asked the front desk and was told "it's a hole in the wall but our guests liked it.."  We were pleased with our dinners.  The service was prompt on a busy Sunday evening.
Good food.  Selection was exactly what you would want from a casual seafood restaurant.  Reservations recommended as it is popular.  
We turned up without a reservation and they were so friendly. Sat at the bar and had a great meal. Large potions, friendly atmosphere, interesting and delicious food.
As noted by many reviewers, this place was recommended by the conference hotel we were staying at. My husband and I love seafood and wanted a place that had good/fresh seafood but without a super-stuffy/upscale feel and this was right across the street. First trip I had the lobster roll and it was full of lobster and very tasty; my husband had the mussels appetizer, clam chowder and fish and chips. Excellent! We liked our first trip so much we went again for dinner the next night along with some other conference buddies. I had the crab legs and was surprised at the large portions on not just my plate but everyone else's plates. Some in our party had lobster, fried oysters, and some other fish dishes. No complaints from anyone. I would have given a "5" rating but we did have a little mishap with our bill (we all used company credit cards and our waiter mixed up everyone's checks and then tried to tell us there was nothing he could do about it). A request to see the  manager solved that and the manager quickly fixed everything (thanks!). Be warned this place can get very busy. We were told it would be at least a 1 hour wait the first night we went, but we managed to find a place at the bar sooner and were able to order our meal there. We tried other seafood places during our Boston conference and this by far had the largest portions and freshest seafood - way better than a couple of better-known seafood establishments in the area.
We stayed at the Sheraton and thought this would be a decent place to go for dinner due to its close location and the good reviews we'd read.  Walking up to it,  we were kinda iffy....walked in and immediately felt better.  Got the menu,  and things really felt right, the waiter highly recommended the Pan Seared Lobster, on the menu...at the dreaded "market price". I'm always leery of market price,  because that's my first indication of,  you don't want it,  keep looking.  But, that night I was feeling a little crazy and I went for it.  O-M-G, it was life changing!  The most tantalizing, lobster delicacy to ever touch my taste buds!  I PROMISE you,  if you visit this place,  and do not go for this whole lobster that is cut into six pieces and pan seared in glorious herbs and sauces...you are denying yourself heaven on earth!  It is totally worth the market price and then some! 😊
Tired from our flight from coast to coast we asked the concierge for a recommendation, he recommended this place across the street.  A casual but excellent seafood place, almost like being at the beach.  Marcos was our waiter and had excellent advice about the menu.  The first night we had oysters, Blonde & Dennis...like the Blonde.  Fried calamari was spicy and a perfect start.  We shared bowls of the creamy clam chowder and the Bermuda fish & crab chowder with dark rum and of course, a Dark & Stormy to drink.  Both were excellent.  Then we had the crab cobb salad.  We were full and satisfied.  As we were leaving, my husband saw some information on the pan roasted lobster that Marcos had recommended and realized this was Jasper White's place and we had seem him fix this years before on a food show.  Needless to say, we had to come back and have it, which we did on Saturday.  Marcos waited on us again and recommended the Cotuit and Spearpoint oysters, which we enjoyed.  We shared the crab cake appetizer followed by a 3 lb. lobster with corn and onion straws.   And, a smoky cornbread that was really good.  Finally, I was in a meeting on Monday and when we broke for lunch, several of us went across the street for lunch.  I had the crab cake BLT with house made chips, while others chose the Almost crab cake with sweet potato fries...all of which were great.  Tony waited on us and got us in and out quickly and unrushed.  Needless to say, this is definitely a place to eat for a true taste of Boston.
Was Greeted and made to feel right at home Ashley, wa Uber Ausome, the coconut cream pie was to die!!
Delicious and fresh and always full... (maybe that's why it is so fresh). Less than a 15 min walk from Fenway, very close to Copley Place. It's super casual, noisy and fun, full of locals. Anything on the chalkboard is delicious. Or better, lobstah. It ain't cheap 'cause it's prime seafood, but its worth it, and the anticipation and the wait.
Their clam chowder was delicious and beautifully presented. We also had the lobster corn fritters which were pretty good, especially when you got a good sized piece of lobster. The staff seemed a little overwhelmed.
Referred here by Sheraton concierge for casual seafood dinner closeby on a Sunday night. Skeptical at first because concierge referring EVERYONE here, but food was very good albeit pricy for "casual" and service good as well.  Waitress gave excellent suggestions on sampling fresh oysters.  Ambiance is a limitation - no windows so very dark - and entrance is a dark hallway to get in right into bar with TVs.  Otherwise good convenient place with good food.
Great place to eat!  Excellent food and service!  Cannot say enough good things about this place! We dined here several times during our visit to Boston!  The lobster is to die for!  
The first time my wife had the pan fried lobster. It was different and very tasty although a little chewy. I had the lobster roll. Although it was good I wasn't expecting cucumber in the dressing. Not a fan of cucumber! I ate it anyway and it was good. But beware cucumber haters! I went by myself the next night and had clam chowder and crab cakes. Chowder was good and full of clams but a little runny. Cheers has great thick clam chowder. Go there for it! Crab cakes were tasty and full of crab. Overall a nice place with good good close by the hotel.
Loved how big the portions were! Food was delicious and service was amazing and great. Staff were friendly and recommended alot of choices and spent lots of time explaining and recommending for us. I am planning to visit again this week. 
It was a bit pricey at the market price of $24 for a sandwich!  It did come with good homemade chips. I had a watermelon margarita which was a special and was pretty good bit with a price tag of $12. All in all it was a good first stop for lunch upon arriving in Boston however $85 for two for lunch was a bit crazy I thought considering my husband got a salad that wasn't huge but was very good he said. 
Right across the street from our Hotel, and the first recommendation by the Concierge was the Summer Shack.  A fun, inviting casual environment.
Clam bake w Lobster was phenomenal! Husband had the oysters and was impressed. Eastern Halibut was a little dry but still good. Wait staff was awesome a most visit where the locals go without a stuff shirt atmosphere. 
I visited Summer Shack last weekend while staying at the Boston Sheraton next door. Although the exterior leaves a bit to be desired, the inside is quite spacious with a large bar and plenty of seating for couples and groups.

The bartender was very helpful with selecting an assortment of oysters. I selected four and each was distinctly different, but all were quite fresh. 

I also ordered the clam chowder, which was okay, but certainly not the best I've had. It's a bit more brothy (not thick) than I prefer and some of the clams were quite chewy (par for the course, I know).

Overall, Summer Shack is worth the visit and, although it doesn't have a harbor view like other seafood restaurants in the area, it's convenient, cozy, and satisfying.
the staff were very friendly and knowledgeable about the menu.  our waiter suggested the pan seared lobster in butter sauce - I love lobster but I have never had it pan fried in the shell before - yum, yum, yum.  and the clam chowder was awesome - which you would expect in Boston - but this was outstanding.
Give this place a visit - it won't disappoint.
It's a chain, they deliver what's expected. If you want the tried and true that's the place to go. Great building, used to be an old bank.
Siamo stati a cena, sapendo che era un locale mediamente caro, Le note negative sono la rumorosità interna e l'eccessiva aria condizionata, per il resto, un buon posto
Fast, great, decent price, and cold.  Smack and Bolio should be worried.  Smoothie King rocks, my teen daughters love it!
I stopped in for a smoothie with a friend on the first hot day of the summer and got a strawberry mango refresher smoothie. It had great flavor and came in a styrofoam cup, which kept it insulated better on the hot day. The prices were very comparable and the small was a plentiful size.
Here you will find every type of smoothie at an affordable price. also they can make customize smoothie for you. try to visit first floor also
Лучший смузи в городе готовят здесь! Спуститесь на первый этаж здания и перед Вами откроется рай спортивного и витаминного фаст-фуда!
Верный восстановитель сил на протяжении трех дней. Самые разнообразные смузи - от духоподъемного пеп-апа до сверхпитательного Халка.
Располагается неподалеку от Prudential и Apple Store
If you're hoping for a quick cup, don't expect it here. It's crowded with students and staff from Berklee College of Music. The service here is great though, they always try to keep up with orders, speed and quality where they can.
This is where all Berklee students and staff goes. Along with other colleges around the area.
This gets really busy during school year and sometimes hard to find table. 
Tired food. Décor needs a lot of work. Staff disinterested 
Maybe it fits into this area of Boston or the permanent beggar lodged on the street outside
If you want good coffee and a snack best go elsewhere
Tired food Bored staff
Looks run down. The regular beggar outside doesn't help
What are Boston PD doing ?
Maybe it was the grotty area
Amo los cafe de Starbucks y el roll de cinamon, excelente, para caminar las frias calles de Boston acompañada de un cafecito
All well if it ends well. Not in my case. Falooda did not hit my taste bud that good. Did ask the chef to do better next time. Dosa was great. The appetizers were sumptuous.
This is definitely worth a try when on Newbury Street particularly if you haven't tried Indian Food. The buffet has a great range of food to try. They bring you piping hot naan bread too. It is great for a quick meal that is pretty cheap. If you are a big eater, you won't complain. The service is very good too. I like little places that are cozy so I will be back.
We arrive for a late lunch to Dosa and we choose from the menu instead the buffet... All we ate was delicious, the curry, samosas, dosa, etc. The service excellent.... We were four and all liked the food!
I'm speaking as an Indian, and this place serves horrible Indian food. The owners are really sweet and welcoming, and this place has really good service but I wish I could say the same about the food
I have been going to the dosa factory ever since it opened. 
Food is not exceptional but satisfactory !
The chicken tandoori is dry and could be more moist. 
Service is good and very polite people. 
Atmosphere is nice. 
People are friendly. 
Food is quite a large variety of types !
The ochra dosa is very good if you like ochra. 
Cost is good not expensive. 
They are slow in getting the tandoori bread you should order it as soon as u arrive. 
It would help if the bread was toasting in a pot and some ready available. 
All told it is a place for a visit for sure if you want a quick meal. 
Spice is controlled well and it is enjoyable.
It has reasonable food at good prices, but if you want really good Indian food I would go somewhere else. Also the place is not very clean. I would only take someone there if they are really craving Indian food.
We love Indian food and Dosa's does a good job at a an amazing value considering the high-rent district where they reside.  My chicken korma with salad, rice and relishes was more than I could eat and a mere $14.  My wife's tandoori chicken was similar in quality and value.  This place is the best deal on Newbury if you like Indian.
This is one of the very strategic place in Boston to have Indian food. Nice ambience, food is good but could have been better. Service is bit slow so one should have sufficient time in hand.
If you're not looking for anything fancy and good Indian food, you may want to check this place out.  Your meal is served on a metal serving dish.  I've never experienced this before.  After doing some research, it's called a Thali.

My Thali had my main course, vegetable bryanni.  I was served a nice portion with three sauces to mix in based on my desired spice level.  It's a little overpriced but definitely worth a try.  For those who are Vegan, there are many options!
Two of us had the weekend brunch buffet at $15.95.  Not worth it. We went because their menu talks about the influence of Chinese cuisine on Indian food. Certainly peaked our curiosity. No evidence whatsoever on the buffet. Just the usual dishes, some of which including the vegetable and chicken pakora were lukewarm. Nothing unusual and nothing very good except for the chicken tandoori. Among the best we have had. Juicer than usual and more flavorful.
My girlfriend and I ordered take out here because our quick Indian takeout place, Boston Indian Kitchen on Mass. Ave. recently closed. 

I ordered the butter chicken and although menu says the chicken is cooked on the bone, there was hardly any chicken on the actual bone. Not good. We also both felt sick the next day, so clearly got a bad batch. 

Save yourself the time and take your money down towards Kenmore Square to India Quality. WAY better.
This restaurant is owned by Hyderabadi guys, they served good dosas along with variety of north indian food. Also they have bar

You can have multiple layering of dosas here.
Had chicken biryani - good quantity and mediocre taste. Priced appropriately at about $11.

My friend had masala dosa - $9. Thats expensive for basically crepes with potatoes in it.
Cleanliness seems a little questionable

We stopped in for a late lunch and ordered the chaat (street food) and a masala dosa. Having grown up in Mumbai I knew what to expect and the Dammi puri was fresh, plentiful and delicious. The chili level was authentic. Bhel puri (not on the menu) was the right mixture of sweet, sour and hot, the masala dosa was good but the stuffing very mild.
I do not eat Indian food that often and am not an expert in the regional cuisines of that very large country, but the food seemed fresh and well prepared to me. There were four of us and we sampled several dishes, all of which were fine. For the area the food is reasonably priced and the eating area is pleasant. The service was very good on a quiet night. While I would not necessarily rush back, I would not avoid the place either.
Went with my friend for lunch. Restaurant is very costly. Not such a good in taste. I will avoid it next time.
This funky, bright South Indian establishment on Newbury is somewhat of a counterpoint to the trendy gastropubs in the neighborhood, but is probably one of the best bets anywhere in the center of the city for reliable quality Tamil food, dosas to be specific. And the list of dosas offered is quite long in fact, never mind utterly delectable, with the requisite cocktail of flavours and crispy dough. A variety of traditional south Indian snacks are thrown into the mix as are standard Indian curries.
I went there because they promoted their restaurant in the coupon book and offered 50% discount. Good seating but food is not that great. Would rather go to other places on town.
If you love Indian food, you will enjoy the dosas offered here. There is an extensive menu with many different fillings. Our garlic and cheese dosa was served with a hearty lentil soup and two dipping sauces. The vegetable samosas were crisp and satisfying. We ordered raita and chutney both flavorful and great go-withs.
I was there in Boston for a week for business,the food in dosa factory was awesome and the personalized service by their staff make you feel at home. The food is value for money and the taste is authentic Indian.Its Location is also Nice .
Good pub with live music and concerts, if you are in boston then its a must go.

Also the rates are quite reasonable, the only problem is to find the parking near by.

Kindly reserve your parking in the lots before going here
NOT A RESTAURANT.  Nice intimate venue for hearing musical performances.  Great sound system and lighting. Only holds about 200 people, BUT there are no seats or tables - it's standing room only.  So be prepared to stare at the heads of the people in front of you, because unless you are well over 6' tall, that's probably all you'll see.  Still, a nice venue in a convenient location.
Absolutely loved this place I had the 420 burger and a Nutella shake both were amazing I couldn't recommend this place enough just wish they would open somewhere in England ! 
My wife and ate there tonight and everything was perfect.  The burgers were big and juicy, the chips just great and the service excellent.  Of special note, I asked for a very rare burger and actually got it.  Many times the request is treated as if I had asked them to poison me.  This time I just got what I asked for.
Location was great, service and staff were very friendly and welcoming, they treid their best to fit us all (12 persons) on one table which we really appreciate, however burgers didnt taste as amazing as people described or recommended.
The food was okay...just an average burger, definitely nothing to rave about.  Both of our orders came out wrong and we had to ask twice for a side of the habanero salsa (which was lacking habaneros or anything remotely hot).  We left feeling full, but will not go back.
If you like burgers and variety this is your spot. They offer everything from your basic hamburger or cheeseburger to much crazier concoctions, like the 420 burger my husband had, complete with onion rings, mozzarella sticks, fried mac n cheese, BBQ sauce, and the burger patty....I had one bite, and while it was delicious, that was about as much as I could handle. I had the conch burger, which was delicious and unique. 

Decent selection of draft and canned/bottled beers. Everything from $5 pitchers of PBR to local brews like Harpoon and Downeast cider. Didn't look it over but they also have a wine list and cocktails. 

It was crowded but not super noisy, and outdoor seating is available as well. Service was quick and friendly, attentive but not overbearing. We'll definitely be back to try more of their creations!
We all had different burgers and each one was awesome! I had the Vermonster and loved it. The onion rings were the best I have ever had and we also had a five dollar pitcher of beer. The service was fast and our waitress was very friendly. We will return!
The burger I chose was great. The meat was tasty the ingredients fresh and the bun was appropriate. If your looking for a good burger this place is it  
Smallish place, but seated immediately at 6:30pm on a Friday evening. Had outdoor seating available, too.  Husband loved the Mac Attack (mac-n-cheese) burger (as seen on Diners, Drive-ins and Dives); I loved the Vermonster w/o bun.  Hard to decide what to try - so many good lookig choices. Both kids enjoyed their meals as well (build-your-own burger and chicken). Burgers cooked just as ordered.  Service was very efficient and polite. Burgers come with chips AND slaw or beans, which were all ok, but the burger is the main attraction.  Left too full to try shakes or other dessert.
A great burger, great fries, great potato chips, great service. Left with a doggie bag. Go early before lunch as it fills up quick. Hamburgers are fresh, tasty and ample. Order anything you want it will be good.
The burgers are good but the shakes are mind blowing to say the least!! The space is small and we waited about 20 mins to be seated but would definitely visit again. Bar service was somewhat slow but she was alone table service was prompt and attentive.
Finally got a chance to visit BBC. Growing up here we never had a burger place like this. When I'm back in town visiting family, I  usually I decide I want to go there when I'm hungry and want a short wait time. Honestly, if you're looking for a short wait, odds are it's not here. Tucked away on Boylston St, there's not a lot of room. Great menu, food and inexpensive drinks + small dining room= extended wait time for a seat. 
However, after having the Artery Clogger (a beer battered deep fried burger with bacon and BBQ sauce) 
I will say this WORTH THE WAIT! 
there was easily 4 burgers that could have been my first time pick.  
   I would guess there were close to 20 burger choices plus sandwiches, salads and starters. But, if you're not here for a burger why come?? 
The wife said her pilgrim (thanksgiving style turkey burger with cranberry mayo) 
Was fantastic as well. 
  The fries we saw coming out were in huge bowls and there's no way I could have added that to the meal and finished it. 
   I can't believe I waited this long, but I can't wait to get back 
GET READY MAC AND CHEESE BURGER ! 
I'M COMING FOR YOU NEXT! 

Unfortunately, it won't let me add a photo of the burger - but trust me if you could see it, you'd definitely want it! 
I went as I had an impression that the burgers here would be gourmet style and high quality. I had a regular cheese burger for 10 USD which came with some odd chips and coleslaw. They probably wanted to do something different with the chips instead of just serving the usual fries, but what a fail. Chips seemed overly burned and were not delicious and did not look inviting at all.

The burger was not that bad, but far from the gourmet expectation I came in with. The bun was soft enough, but extremely greasy. Patty was thicker than usual, but I don't think the meat was anything out of the ordinary.

All in all a little bit of a dissapointing experience that made me wish I had gone to Shake Shack instead to get a burger for half the price.
We came to Boston Burger Company after seeing it on Diners Drive ins and Dives. We had fried pickles, The Waikiki Beach Burger, The Mac Attack Burger, and The King Burger. Nothing at all to complain about here. Service was great, we sat out on the patio. We all loved the burgers we got. It was everything I wanted and more! Can't wait to visit again!
Great food and atmosphere. Lively and helpful staff. Burger was brilliant.  French fries amazing.  Place was buzzing. 

I was at my daughter's dance performance around the corner and came here around 10 PM for a late dinner before I went to the airport.  I thought it would be nice to get a burger, but the taste of the burger was really amazing.  I had the 420 burger, which has bbq sauce, bacon, onion rings, mozzarella sticks and mac and cheese.  I don't normally get that much on my burgers, but I was on vacation, so why not try something unique.  The flavor of the sauce and all the toppings mixed really well, better than I'd expected.  I knew I probably wouldn't finish it all, but I ate more than I should have because it was so good.  The chips were pretty good, but quite honestly it was about the burger.  Service was good and friendly.  My daughter ordered a milkshake from there earlier in the week and it was massive.
A great, good priced burger. They have tons of options. I had the Vermonster, which had fried apples, bacon, and a maple mayonnaise on it. It has a fun atmosphere and unless you're drinking, you shouldn't spend more than $15.
We loved this place. Such a huge menu of unique burger options. I got the mac attack which had grilled mac and cheese and bacon on the burger. SO. GOOD. 
Great burgers and garlic Parm fries delicious. Do not get the Louisiana gumbo, however. People in Boston must never have had gumbo. Bland and not spicy at all. We did get it for free however. 
Stopped in for a bite in the middle of a long road trip up I-95. Great road food, very filling, and reasonably priced with excellent service. The only downside were the sizes of the drinks - waters came in airplane-sized bottles but were priced as if they were 24 oz! Overall decent.
I adore Boston Burger Co., and have never had a bad burger, bad beer, or bad service. I'm obsessed with the Hot Mess burger, but the selection is vast so there's loads to choose from. The burger was cooked to perfection, was juicy, flavourful, and not overwhelmed by the toppings, which a lesser burger easily could have been. My other half loved his as well, and this was his first visit. 

The portions are generous and the prices are reasonable. The beer selection is good, the staff were friendly and efficient, and the atmosphere was nice and buzzy. 

Love this place, I make a point of going every time I'm in Boston and have never been disappointed. Well worth a visit. 
The most creamy and best toppings. The homemade granola is to die for and the mochi is fresh and delicious. The Oreo and Coconut are the best flavors! 
Their frozen yogurt tastes like sour milk, they have a very limited selection, and their baked goods are stale and flavorless.  Go anywhere else.
こちらのフローズンヨーグルトは　温度低め。シャーベットのようなシャリシャリ感が味わえるのが特徴でした。カップのサイズを選んで　フレーバーを選んでから　トッピングをえらべます。シャリシャリにあうのは　フルーツのトッピング。ベリーやキウイの酸味が　さわやかヨーグルトにピッタリでした。
I would highly recommend. Walked out of a Starbucks because of a long line and lack of service. Low key but it is all about the people and coffee that was served. Server was help to understand the different types of coffee. 
I'm coffee enthousiast and hobbyist and could say that this place is ok. I have visited it twice and were satisfied. It serve modern type of espresso with lot of acidity (but I'm not saying that coffee is sour, but is only lightly roasted -that is actually good) and fruity tones. The staff is friendly. I will recomend to every european traveller used to good espresso coffee. If you preffer the american style, you probably better go to starbucks.
I'm a coffee nut and made a beeline to Barrington's when I visited Boston. The staff is extremely knowledgable and the coffee I tried was wonderful, almost like a fine wine. I left with a shopping bag of coffee beans to take home.
Great service!! Love their coffee, hot chocolate and chai tea as well as their pastries! Nice and welcoming location in Newbury St.
The coffee is superb and the ambiance is amazing. A little off the beaten path but it's a great location and I always stop in when I'm in Boston 
Great coffee, great service, great outdoor seating area! I ordered an espresso with milk (basically a macchiato but for some reason they don't call it like that!) and had to go back and get another one for the way -- it was that good!
This small café on Newbury was crowded when I visited with folks working at the tables and sides. A good sign in my estimation. The macchiato was excellent, expertly prepared. The barista and staff were cheerful and attentive, great joy in what they were doing. Definite place to grab coffee and some sweets.
Barrington is the prototypical affected hipster hangout, offering little more than a handful of pastries and baked goods to compliment the coffee. But the pastries are good quality, and the coffee excellent, which is presumably the real reason you would want to come here. Also, Newbury doesn't isn't really a huge cafe destination, so this place is one of the best options in the neighborhood.
Cute little coffee joint located in a prime location. Not the biggest cafe but definitely has a welcoming atmosphere. I don't drink coffee, but my girlfriend who is a big coffee enthusiast enjoyed her coffee. Kind of a limited menu but overall, a pretty good coffee spot.
An amazing coffee shop at the west end of Newbury Street, at the junction of Newbury Street and Hereford Street (and close to Massachusetts Avenue). Fresh and modern inside, creamy smooth lattes that are so much tastier than the ubiquitous Starbucks. Very much recommended...with one small caveat, on both occasions we visited, all inside seats were taken by students working, none of whom appeared to have a recent coffee purchase by their side! Just as well the weather in Boston was unseasonably warm and dry. Plenty of seating outside, where the wifi works just as  well!
In a busy city, this coffee shop really offers a breathe of fresh air - open spaces, scattered tables and chairs, and the offerings were delicious. Great coffee! 
For a classic hot coffee with plenty flavor and long traditional finish, this is it. The service is great though their machines are a bit quirky. The staff makes every attempt to honor you during your visit even though their coffee makers don't also follow. Stop in for a delicious cup and. Enjoy the experience.
Barrington Coffee is a new addition to the Newbury St. scene since my last trip to Boston.  I'm thrilled to here!!  I've always felt great coffee was missing in this otherwise fantastic neighborhood and Barrington Coffee fits the bill.  They have all the traits you'd expect of an independent coffee establishment (fair trade, etc.) and have superior outdoor and indoor seating!  They're right beneath the Ibex store.  Be sure to check this place out.  You won't be sorry!!
サードウェーヴ系のローカルなコーヒーショップはないかなと探していたら素敵なお店を見つけました。
シンプルな内装、店内に漂うコーヒーの香り。とうとうアメリカでも美味しコーヒー飲めるようになったんだね(汗)
あいにくの曇り空だけど、せっかくなのでニューベリー通り沿いのテラス席を選択。
ぼーっとしていたら周囲には数匹のスズメさんの視線を感じる。こいつらとっても人懐こくて手からシナモンロールのカスをつまんでくれました。きっとあげる人多いんだろうね。
ニューベリー通りにあるコヒーショップです。日本にいくつかあるコヒーチェーン店のコヒーよりも美味しと思います。サクサクのクロワッサンも美味しかったです。
If you want a good espresso coffee/latte, this is the place to go. Wifi is also a bonus. The cafe is buzzing with friendly students and the muffins are good too.
Excellent lunch!  We split the Californian Bagel sandwich and Roasted Root Salad -- both of which were excellent.  Fresh ingredients.  Great flavors.   Friendly staff and great coffeehouse atmosphere.  Will definitely be going back next time I am in town to visit my daughter at Northeastern!
Found this cafe just down the way from Hilton. Breakfast bagels, granola with yoghurt and fruit plus lattes were good and filling. 
Stopped in for a quick bite and a coffee and was really impressed.  The Vanilla Latte was outstanding and the iced coffee was perfect.  The bagels are great, my son's everything with cream cheese was great and mine with lox, capers, cream cheese and onions was excellent.  The atmosphere is cool and the service is very good, a great spot!
This Pavement Coffeehouse is full of Berklee and Boston Conservatory students, so the atmosphere is alternative. Also get a lot of local regulars, so it is a great place to have an iced latte, capuccino and great bagels. We made it our daily stop to start the day.
My wife, another friend and I have stopped here several times including yesterday for coffee and bagels before a Red Sox game. Despite all the craziness of this neighborhood before a game, this shop is a nice oasis for coffee and conversation. Coffee is very good, bagels are fresh and tasty, we all loved the hummus. 
I got the mocha latte iced and its some of the best espresso in Boston! Taste like real chocolate in the coffee! Espresso is fresh and prices are average for a private coffee establishment. 
Our son took us here for breakfast and I fell in love with the bagels. I forgot how good they could be. There menu is a delight and has wonderful and interesting combos. Portions are generous and everything is fresh. You can't go wrong for breakfast, chatting and wifi. Great and relaxing atmosphere with happy employees.
I found this place while walking around the neighborhood and it was a delight!  The Spanish latte was insanely delicious and had a lovely design. I had a great egg sandwich which tasted so fresh. I enjoyed a relaxing time here.  The spot is inviting, very bright and nicely furnished. The staff is very friendly. Stop by and enjoy!
Before or after shopping at the nearby supermarket or Target, the coffee is the best in the area. Due to the free WiFi, lots of students are there on their laptops but usually spots open up. Service is fast and friendly.
We were on our way to Fenway park and spotted this small coffee and bagel cafe so we have it a go! The bagels were the best bagels I have ever tasted. I had cream cheese and bacon with a hot chocolate which was delicious. It was so good we came to days on a row and it has also inspired me to have bagels at home! 
We passed this coffee house whilst walking to Fenway park. Had great bagel, not too keen on the coffee but think it was my fault with the milk! Kids said hot chocolate were fab! 
We went here twice to grab a bite to eat and my girlfriend got coffee while I had OJs. Can't fault anything, we had a few different sandwiches and they were all great! Good friendly service too!
While in Boston, my friend and I asked for an independent coffee cafe and we were directed to Pavement--great recommendation.  We visited several mornings and were so delighted to have found this unique cafe.  
Title says it all.. Very good coffee, friendly atmosphere and nice bagels and muffins for breakfast. Recommended place. 
We went to this coffeehouse twice: once for breakfast, again just for coffee.  The drinks were good, the breakfast was pretty good, and the atmosphere was very unique.
Love this place. Ate breakfast here 5 days running, friendly service, good food and above-average coffee. 
A stones throw from Fenway Park.  Stopped in here for a bagel + cream cheese.  Has a classic, hipster coffeehouse vibe.  Bright inside.  Decent sitting room and space for groups.  
I just loved this place!!!  The food was super fresh and they serve you your coffee in a mug!  Loved the homey atmosphere.  Great place to have a bite when your by Fenway!  Service was excellent also
Coffee is not the best but their breakfast items are good ! Service is friendly, not hurried and they don't bother you. Went here 3 times.
We really enjoyed our meal here.  The service was fast and conscientious.  The dish was very, very, very cheesy.
Tolland pizza restaurant is a good, friendly place for a Italian dinner and more. Pizza is great. Staff are friendly. Portions are generous at a good value. A little updating would be nice
Gyro was actually pretty decent. Customer service was in the 'needs major improvement ' category. Lady that waited on us probably never cracked a smile in her entire life. Women's bathroom smelled just awful. Air Freshener people! 
Always a good meal, whether it's pizza or something else.  Generally they have daily specials.  Good portions.   Locals, including state police frequent this restaurant.
Good food, good service, good local family restaurant; good value. They take real care in preparing your food. Italian, Greek fare, pizza - it's all good. 
Just perfect diners for the family. Classic Italian entrees and decent pizza at a good cost.  This is perfect for the family, no frills dining.  Good food with good service .
Whenever we say, "want to go out for lunch?" it actually means, "Let's go to Tolland Pizza!"
These guys are amazing. The Giro is incredible - a combo of pressed lamb and beef. And don't even get me started on the tizeki sauce! 
Clean, reasonably priced, friendly, and fast. We love it!
Good Pizza and grinders. It is located on the road to UConn so easy to stop for lunch or dinner either coming or leaving the school. pizzas are great and the grinders are big so they can be shared.
This long established restaurant in Tolland (a minute off I-84 on the way to UCONN) has been one of our go-to places for many years for their dinners, pizzas and grinders.  Recently we visited for grinders for dinner and ate very well.  My eggplant grinder with provolone cheese and peppers  consisted of many layers of fried eggplant served hot from the oven - delicious.  My dining partner had a ham grinder with shredded lettuce, tomato, peppers and cheese, hot from the oven.   While these were both 8" in size they made for a generous meal.  We had beverages with our meal - root beer for him and a glass of merlot (full for $4.50).  A well priced place to eat.
Great place for the family, reward after a tough played game, or just because. Decorated in great pinks and greens.
We have been going to Tolland Pizza for 33 years.  The food is great the service is good.  My favorite is the chicken parmesan. The chicken is freshly fried and the tomato sauce is wonderful. My husband's favorite is the veal parmesan and my  son's are the pizza's and calzones.
My family and I have been eating here for over 8 years and it's become our go to restaurant for take out. The food is fresh and flavorful and the prices are fair. The potato pizza is a favorite as well as the calzones. 
About a mile off I-84, so it is a convenient place to stop for a bite.  We had the chicken parm sandwich which was below average, and the grilled cheese tuna deluxe which was average at best.  Service was ok but the server was distracted by a lot of phone calls and pizza orders.

We like to support the local places but this one was a disappointing choice.  There is a lot in the general area as you are close to greater Hartford.

If this review is helpful then please indicate so below.
We get take out from Tolland Family quite often. Its always good however, don't ask for customization on any of the menu items or it might not come out right. The chicken souvlaki is excellent and I have big salads with a good selection of vegetables in the is excellent and they have big salads with a good selection of vegetables in them.
Lately, my wife and I have been getting pizzas from Tolland Pizza every Saturday--usually 2 small tailored to our individual topping preferences.  Their pizzas are truly excellent, and I like doing business with this family-run restaurant in our neighborhood.
We moved to Coventry in the early 70's & was our 1st place to try pizza.  Now in the year 2014 & moved to Tolland , we still get our pizzas here.  LOVE the sauce!!!  Seems like the pizza places around have very little sauce on theirs!!
Always very friendly!!
Ok, this is one of the worst looking restaurants ever and the prices are high HOWEVER the food will make you giddy with happiness, it is naughty. food gone good!  I had the Veal Parmesan and it was to break a diet for and included bread and salad as part of the meal.   My husband had a grinder he is now addicted to.  We will continue to indulge for sure!
mediocre at best, the pizza is aweful..the grinders below average...Its sad they have little to no competition so I guess that is how they stay in business, I will never go agian
Excellent pizzas, grinders and sandwiches.  The prices are reasonable for sit-down service and the wait staff is always friendly.  Service has always been fast every time I've been there.  I love pizza and this pizza ROCKS!!!
The first night I moved to town I stopped at Tolland Pizza and was really happy to of found a place that has really good pizza, and great tasting Italian food at reasonable prices. That was eight years ago and I still enjoy going there.  It is a casual place that many of the locals visit for good food. It is also really easy to stop in an pick up something to go that is always the way you've ordered it.
This place is a small town bar and grill. Convenient location. Food is good and fairly quick. Service can be slow when staff is limited. We live in town so this place is a short distance when we don't want to go far.
We went in for drinks and ended up no one had eaten dinner. So we got several of the appetizers and they were all good. The service was pretty good. Don't sit near the front door as all of the smokers are right outside and the smoke wafts into the closest tables.
The food is good and the service is a bit slow but often there is one, may two, bartenders running the bar and restaurant area. The pool tables and jute box are a nice touch. It has the small town feel. If you sit at the bar you are likely to make friends with anyone near you.
I saw an ad in Clipper Magazine  & thought I would try this place again but the result was worse than the first time I was there. The burger I order was the worse I have ever had and that was a new promotion. This place really should be shut down by the health department. I was feeling sick for 8 hours after eating there. I will never go there again. I just wanted to give the place a second chance. NEVER AGAIN.
Came here with friends, service was good and friendly staff. We sat at the bar and had a good time with the bartender. Food was good and the prices aren't bad. We'd go back again
We stopped at this place for dinner after traveling several hours in traffic and rain. It's a bar so we didn't expect great food. The place wasn't very busy but it took about an hour for us to get our food! Waitress kept saying "soon, you're next, etc". I heard a nearby table complain that they hadn't gotten their appetizer after waiting for an hour too.
I ordered the salmon and they didn't have tartar sauce after asking the waitress twice. She brought me some cucumber wasabi sauce and it was fine w/ it. My daughter had the pulled pork w/ corn & fries. She said the pork had too much BBQ sauce, the corn was too buttery and the fries were overcooked. But my husband liked his clam chowder bowl!
The waitress gave us $5 off for the wait. big deal! Skip this place and go somewhere else. We wish we did.
We were looking for a place to relax with family and friends during UCONN Parent's Weekend.  Most places were completely booked. This place has excellent wings....even better burgers.  Service was great too, we didn't have to wait and we got there around 7:15. This is in a strip mall....don't be fooled by that. Atmosphere is tavern/sports bar. 

We'll be back!
Classic twin bar. No real frills. Food is decent. Beer is cold. Mixed drinks are so-so. Staff is friendly.  Owner(if he is there) is loud and obnoxious.   
Oh yeah, the Barn House Burger makes me giggle.  Add some A1 Steak Sauce and carnivores will howl at the moooooooonnnnnn!  An ample ground beef burger, topped with bacon, cheese (cheat and add mushrooms) and get ready for a party in your belly.  The fries are perfect and the fountain drinks are flavorful and refillable. 
First time i went here it was just ok so i thought id give it another try..second and last time it was worse.  Nobody greeted us when we arrived.  We sat in a booth and waitresses and bartender were having conversation at bar and never acknowledged us. The plsce was empty and it was 10-15 mins before anyone approached us.  Food was not great and they charged us an extra $4.00 for bourbon on ice.  Said it was because when you order a drink on ice you get a double??  First of all it was not a double and if it was we should habe been told that!!  Weve been to many bars and never were charged that much for a drink on ice!! 
 Very disappointing place....
Was impressed with quality of food in a tavern.  Great steak bourbon sauce. Good quality steak and all fresh veggies. Set in a bar setting I was pleasantly surprised. 
The burgers are wonderful! I say try the one with the blue cheese Fantastic! The place is decent and the prices are normal
Came across this place in my travel. Atmosphere is loud more of a bar than restaurant. Our server was very good pleasant and attentive only problem she was also tending bar. She recommended the burger it was very good. Place is okay for a bar like atmosphere but for dinning not so much. 
We had taken a drive on a Sunday to visit a winery. On our way home we were looking for a place to get lunch and another cocktail. We googled local restaurants/pubs. The tavern house was one of the choices! What a great choice it was! Our server Chelsea was extremely nice and very helpful. The cocktails were amazing. The flatbread pizza fantastic, the clam chowder in my top 5 ever tasted, loaded with clam and potato.
We each had a different sandwich and all raved about them!! We had sweet potato fries and the special fry sauce incredible!
If you ever find your way out in Asford, the tavern house is a must stop at!!
Three of us walked in at 5:00 on a Friday at the start of happy hour. There were only a few people in there and we were offered drinks pretty quickly. After that though, it went downhill quickly. We asked for menus after our first round and 10 minutes later the bartender/waitress finally came back and rudely said "you know what you want?" She took our orders and told us she was clocking out and turning our tab over to someone else. She proceeded to tend bar, take orders, stack beer glasses and refresh drinks for everyone else (presumably regulars) while completely ignoring us. Our food was delivered by another staff member and still we weren't offered any more drinks though 2 of us had empty glasses. My friend ordered chicken wings and they were extremely dry and unappealing. They also weren't served with any blue cheese on the side. After being ignored by all 3 people behind the bar, she finally flagged someone down and asked for blue cheese and a water. The waitress came back with the water and no blue cheese so she assumed she didn't hear her. She then asked the waitress who "clocked out" 25 minutes earlier but was still serving everyone else for some blue cheese and she walked into the kitchen then came back out and barked at my friend "she already put the order in for you". Apparently blue cheese does not come with wings at this restaurant, so they had to put an order in for it and wait for the cook to pour it. We were charged $1.00 for it. I ordered a chicken sandwich with no bun and it was the thinnest pounded piece of chicken with very little flavor. The fries were also pretty meh. That's the only word I have to describe them. My husband got a chicken avocado sandwich and the chicken barely filled half the sandwich. It was also thin and tasteless. His reaction to the fries was the same. We proceeded to finish eating, still with 2 empty glasses in front of us, and we were never offered another drink. We sat there with empty/finished plates and glasses for another 10 minutes before anyone even made eye contact with us. We finally flagged someone down for the check and a very nice, bubbly girl named Amber gave it to us. She is probably the saving grace behind that bar. There was a miscellaneous beer on our tab that we didn't order, which I am guessing was not an accident, but the bartender promptly took it off the tab and gave us a new one. Needless to say though I live in the same town as this bar and have been there several times, I won't be back. They are in dire need of new staff, better food, and a new setup (the waitresses couldn't even reach the bartop to clear our plates because she was only 5'2" and we had to pick everything up and hand it to her. Someone call Bar Rescue.
Never going back. Staff and owner were disrespectful! Shrimp was still frozen inside and when we complained they just shrugged and left it on the bill. Tolland needs some good sit down restaurants but this is NOT one of them! Save your money!
Nice waitresses/bartenders, great food, reasonably priced, good environment, good location. Honestly, there's not a bad thing to say about this place. I would highly recommend going here if you're looking for a nice resteraunt to eat at.
I ordered the Tavern House Burger, it consisted of 100% USDA beef, cooked perfectly.  It was topped with bacon, cheese and avocado.  The fries were served hot and crispy.  Outstanding meal for a great price.  I am going back.
Poor food and very nasty owner. Would never go back due to the rudeness & atmosphere not to mention how truly bad the food & service was.  Surprised the health department has not closed them down.
The outside atmosphere is nothing special - part of a strip mall.  In side is ok too: bar, tv's, pool tables, booths.

For me its the service, price and quality of the food>

The service, in my experience,has always been promt and friendly.  Prices are reasonable.  The quality is very good.  They also have several different beers on tap.  I like sitting on the small patio on a nice day.  Its a relaxing place that is way better than it looks from the outside.
We just do takeout & have always liked our meals.  Prices are okay.  Speedy checkout.  We do there take out about once a month or so.
These are hard working people making standard Chinese food. I have eaten there and taken out many times over the years. By no means is this gourmet food. That said, I keep going back. The prices are reasonable and the staff is polite. I would recommend this restaurant without reservation.
My wife likes to get Chinese food on occasions and this is her favorite local Chinese restaurant.  The prices are ok, but they are probably average and not really a bargain.   The cost here is more than our other alternatives (not Chinese food).  The quality is ok, but I have had better in many other places.

The physical location looks dumpy and run down.  This is probably not a place you will want to sit down to eat at.  Your local McDonalds on a busy day will look cleaner than this place.
I am sure we will be back, but I wish we had a better alternative (we have tired a few other places a bit father, but were not impressed also).
Went for lunch and saw the reviews thinking this place was decent.  Was very surprised that the picture listed on Tripadvisor.com is completely false (wrong).  The restaurant is basically a Chinese takeout joint with 5 tables at best.  Ordered a hot and sour soup and sweet and sour chicken with rice.  The soup was bland gluten and some heat with the peppers.  The meal was also lacking in taste.  The rice was hard, and the sauce had no sour or sweet taste??  Was not worth what I paid and won't be coming back.  Probably one of the worst Chinese meals I have had in a long time!
Love their food.  Lots of flavor!  We are regulars!  Chicken and Brocolli, General Tsos Chicken and the crab rangoon are our favorites!
Best Chinese food for miles!  The rice is really good!  Love their egg rolls too!  Try their Crab Rangoon if you have a chance to go here!  LOVE IT!
I have been having Lee's Garden all my life. I would consider the food to be pretty good. I usually get the Gen Tso's or Lo Mein. They are both excellent and the combo plates are quite filling. However to be honest, I've noticed that people always tend to favor to their local chinese restaurant when eating at another one to take that into consideration as well.

I would not recommend actually eating in the restaurant itself. It usually tends to be cold and not the greatest atmosphere. With that being said, the employees are usually very friendly and helpful.

If you are looking for a good takeout chinese food, I would defiantly consider Lee's Garden.
I stopped here for a quick lunch. It's a small take-out place in a strip mall. There are a few formica tables, no washrooms and it was cooold. Ordered the General Tso's chicken which is a good test case for Chinese American style food. It was good, crispy, spicy, pork fried rice was tasty. The egg roll that came with it is the disappointing American style egg roll - stuffed cabbage in a overly chewy cover - no meat inside. Typical place - good for take out. Staff was friendly.
One of my favorite Chinese treats is crab rangoons. Most places they are way to greasy. But every time I get them at Lee's they are perfectly fried, just crunchy enough.
Plus their deep fried things always taste great - fresh oil for sure.
There's a reason it's nickname is "The Poison Palace".
Twice we've ordered sweet and sour chicken here and twice we've gotten home to discover no sauce.  They're remedy is for us to drive 15 minutes back to the restaurant to pick up the sauce.  Will the reheat your food - NO; give you another hot chicken - NO; offer to take it off the bill - NO.  But you can have a large container of sauce the following day if you don't want to disrupt your meal that you paid for and have it go cold to go down and pick up your sauce the same day.  Won't be returning.
They have a good sized selection of yogurts to chose from. The staff is pleasant. Seating inside and out. Summer nights are best.
They were very good with the children. My granddaughter had so much fun.  The yogurt was very good with many items you can add.
This is a new staple in Tolland.  A most go to for the family.  The staff is always so friendly and it always gives you that small town feel.  If you are looking for great yogurt with amazing fresh toppings this is the spot.
First not really a restaurant. It's an ice cream / frozen yogurt haven. If you haven't tried Sweet Frog you really owe it to yourself to stop in. They offer a wide variety of flavors, my fav is sea salt and caramel. Then there is a wide selection of toppings including syrups and whipped cream. If you have nut allergies just ask and they'll get you unexposed topping from the back. The associates are all very friendly and helpful.
Pay at the register by weight where the scale can get pricey if you overload the containers. But "Oh so good".
Sweet Frog is a very Cool place to have a snack.  The yogurt tastes just like ice cream!  You get to put your own toppings on it.  And there are a lot to choose from!  It's a very cute atmosphere.  Frog related!!!  My 4 year old Grandson LOVES it there!  We do too...
Very nice yogurt spot - lots of fresh toppings - including fruits and nuts, and of course candies for the kids.  Very clean place with prompt service. -- 
Great family spot for fro yo.  Prices are high but huge selection of toppings. I wish they sold icecream too but just yogurt
Bright, cheery yogurt cafe.  Many flavors and 48 toppings!  Make your own creation.  I especially love the fresh fruit toppings. Fun!
I loved the decor and set up.  The yogurt was fine and the staff was really nice.  This self service style yogurt shop charges by weight so be careful when filling your cup. 
Enjoyed the choices but found the cost to be very high. Found families frequented during my couple viisits which was surprising due to expense. Maybe they enjoy the taste over cost.
Hidden away in the Big Y plaza in Tolland Camille's is worth visiting. Must like thin crust pizza if you go that way. Pasta dishes very flavorful, Not fancy but good quality food. Recommend reservations on weekends or when UConn has a game in the area.
This is why I subscribe to TripAdvisor…you get the honest 411 on just about any venue you want to visit.  I was looking for a place nearby and I found Camille's Wood Fired Pizza, just 18 miles east of Hartford, off exit 68, on I-84 (turn right at the end of the ramp and then turn right at the next traffic light.  Camille’s is kiddy-corner to the Big Y).  

Dave and Camille (the owners) have been in the hospitality business for many years and bring a wealth of culinary experience, knowledge, and skill to Camille’s, and it shows in the ambience, décor, and delicious food.  They have been at this location for about 3-years and are clearly doing well, and still growing.

Situated just a few miles north of the UCONN campus, Camille’s attracts a variety of clientele (food lovers).  You really have to see this place to appreciate it.  Just my luck, I didn’t bring my camera; I never leave home without it.  You just never know when you are going to find a “say cheese” moment.  This was one of those moments.

We ordered Spaghetti and Meatballs and a Billy’s Bianco pizza (Pistachio, Garlic Cream Sauce, Goat Cheese, Ricotta, Red Onion, and Truffle Honey).  Let me start with the contents of this pizza…who ever heard of Pistachio on a pizza, or Truffle Honey for that matter?  Exactly, but this pie was absolutely delicious…no red sauce mind you.  

The Spaghetti and Meatballs were exceptional.  Not everyone knows how to cook spaghetti, and certainly, not everyone knows how to make a good moist meatball…Camille’s knows how.  

Not only was the spaghetti cooked to the correct texture (not mushy, but just the right firmness), the meat and sauce were out-of-this-world.  Most of the time, this dish is served with bread and butter, but it wasn’t necessary this time.  The dish itself was outstanding, and the portions were perfect!

Demanding the waiter to pass on your complaints to the cook is common.  Asking the server to communicate your praises to the chef…priceless.  

Chefs put a great deal of thought and energy into the presentation of their culinary creations.  The very least we can do is to acknowledge their creativity and dedication to their craft.  However, not all cooks give a hoot about what you think, but real chefs do care.  To a genuine chef, a grateful comment is like a second paycheck with endless dividends.  

Dave was nice enough to walk out of the kitchen to greet and thank me for my comments (this is very old school).  You don’t find this happening in very many places…do you?  You go, Dave!!!    Obviously, the caliber of cuisine and presentation mean a great deal to Dave, Camille, and their staff; and it shows.  

I have to drive 28-miles to get to Camille’s, but I don’t care.  I consider the distance a small price to pay for what I am about to enjoy in the next 40-minutes.  It is a nice drive through the hills, especially when you know what is waiting for you…great food.  

I’m one of those persons that routinely orders the same thing, especially when it is prepared properly.  Unfortunately, I also suffer from food-envy so the next time I will probably order Spaghetti and Meatballs again, and something new to take home with me…just to excite my palate in new ways.  

The problem lies in that I see so many different and scrumptious choices being brought out to the other customers; it becomes overwhelming.  I guess I have to keep going back again and again until I try them all. But for now, the Spaghetti and Meatballs will remain my food of choice at Camille's.

Camille’s also has a bar area and a section for drinks, food and a large screen TV (I guess for sport events and the like).  

Camille’s is located at 23 Fieldstone Commons, Tolland, CT, 06084, 860.896.6976, camillespizza.com.  When you drop in, please ask for Dave and tell him that Lou wrote some pretty amazing things about this place and that you wanted to see for yourself if they were true.

One more tidbit: You can tell that the food is consistently good when customers walk in, sit down, and politely refuse to see a menu; they already know what they want.  I witnessed this happening a couple of times while we were waiting.  This means that customers expect their favorite selections to taste consistently the same, and they get it every single time.

Consistency is a benchmark of a great chef.  

♫
We ordered the Billy's Bianco pizza and were pleasantly surprised with the great combination of cheese, pistachios, garlic and honey. The best part was the crust which was thin and not crunchy, but medium soft. The staff was very friendly and the atmosphere was great. Now we have another good pizza stop between NYC and Boston.
I can't say enough great things about this place. My husband I went on Friday night for the second time and it was just as good, if not better this time! Billy's Bianco is hands down one of the best pizza's I've ever had. Super unique and a perfect balance of flavors. They have a lot of other pies I would like to try, but the Bianco calls my name. They also have a great selection of craft beers and different wines. The atmosphere is chic and classy without feeling stuffy or pretentious. Service was excellent both times, attentive but not overbearing. It's a good thing this place isn't closer, or we would be here at least once a week. Can't wait to go back!
Great pizza in a casual contemporary setting you wouldn't expect in a strip mall. Limited menu and focus is the pizza but oh my what pizzas! Full bar and outstanding beer. Great to see another one of Chef Ds boys from Farmington HS doing it right.
My husband and I had a nice casual dinner here. Seems to be popular with locals, we were on a business trip. I had the house Chardonnay which was very good. I also had the special Fall salad, delicious! It had chunks of roasted pumpkin, toasted pumpkin seeds, quinoa and a light sage dressing. My husband was a little disappointed with his chicken pesto panini. He said it needed more pesto sauce and more chicken! Good service. 
I work down the street from here and it's good convenient food.  The Tuscan salad is delicious and they make this pizza with egg on it.. Mmmmmm so good! I have had to wait a while for my food both ordering ahead and dining in I would say that's the only downfall . 
On a long drive from the Hartford CT area to Cape Cod, my wife and I decided to take a lunch break, getting off I 84 in Tolland CT. A short drive took us to a shopping center, and there was Camille's Wood Fired Pizza. From the moment we walked in the door and were greeted warmly by the young woman at the front desk, we were treated like friends and guests, not just customers. Our server, Adriana, chatted with us about our lunch selections, answering all of our questions. My wife decided on the Tuscan salad, while I had the Italian pulled pork panini with greens. No, we did not order the pizza this restaurant is known for, but based upon the pizzas we saw served at other tables (and the diners' reaction to the pizzas) it was clear that reputation was justified. But our meals were stars in their own right. My wife's salad was fresh, looked beautiful, and tasted delicious. I had never had an Italian pulled pork panini, so I didn't know what to expect. The panini was crisp and hot, the Italian pulled pork was tender and flavorful, and that combined with delicious side of salad added up to a lunch that made my day!  Camille's Wood Fired Pizza may be off the beaten track - or in this case, just off I-84 - but the great food, the quiet ambiance and a staff genuinely interested in our enjoyment made this restaurant a trip worth taking.
We always stop by when we are taking a road trip. It has amazing food and very good service. I suggest the pizza and salads.
Came on a recommendation and it was so good.  My mom and I split a salad and their small plate of wood fired bread which came with fig jam and butter.  It was all outstanding and we will be back again when I am in town.  Leave room for dessert as the options looked so good.
We have quite a few pizza options here in Tolland.  Pretty much all we have. Camilles is the special one among the crowd. Ambiance, service, and unique pizza offerings make Camilles the best choice for families, a quiet business lunch or a romantic corner table with pillows for the night. A short and sweet menu with every changing special beers and food offerings, Camilles is the top of the pizza world in our area. In a strip mall type setting but warm and inviting inside. Try it and see! 
Camille's is by far the best pizza in the area and I would say better than the famous New Haven pizza icons (and I have enjoyed those immensely). Service is much better than those others, and they do take credit cards. 
I make a lot of varieties of pizza, Neapolitan, pan, hand tossed and I am very critical when I eat to out.  Camille's did not disappoint.  We had the bacon and egg (yes egg, sunny side up!), chicken, and another with a variety of cheeses, very flavorful.  I would also recommend the small house salad as well, very fresh greens with olives... a very nice touch.  They also serve warm olives with small cherry tomatoes... nice complement to the house salad.

Very friendly staff, nice atmosphere and reasonably priced.
I agree with Millerdb that the pizza toppings are sparse - that being said, they're unusual and delicious.  Our favorite is the spinach pizza and the bacon & egg pizza.  They also have one of the best Casear salads I've ever had.  Great beer available - I'd like to try some of the other items on the menu but we always seem to end up getting pizza due to the fact that you can only order one size and it's too big for one person.
Great local business - fabulous thin crust pizza with both traditional and unique options. Very friendly, good service; great pizza, great salads. Will come back again and again.
Camille's has potential to be outstanding.  They have great beers on tap in a nice atmosphere.  However, the pizza comes in only one size (14 inch).  While I love the very thin crust, they are very sparse on the amount (not the selection) of toppings.  That's the main reason we've not returned more often.
Random stop instead of our usual break at the rest area on I-90.  What a find!! Will definitely make this our mid point rest stop heading south from Maine.  
Good food. Good service. Great beer selection. Had a great experience at this local favorite. Make it a habit to visit often.
Nice small atmosphere and friendly staff make it a great visit. The best thin crust, wood fired pizza in the area.
Camille's is a great find in an unlikely spot, located in the same shopping plaza as the Big Y in Tolland CT.

The pizza was fantastic, nice and thin with quality ingredients and a crispy crust.  The salads were fresh and had great textures/crunch and flavors.

Value and service are both up there.  You can get a small portion of all the salads and appetizers on the menu, which we loved.  Our waitress seemed to always be there when we needed anything and was very attentive and courteous.

The atmosphere inside is very fresh and clean, with comfortable seating and a very attractive bar area.

I would recommend this place to every resident in the area, you have to come here and enjoy this local eatery.
The building is very cute with outdoor, shaded seating and a fountain. The donuts were standard good DD fare. The service was poor. All in all a very nice break from the road.
Good coffee, good prices, right off the interstate we have always like their coffee and the landscaping of this particular Dunkin was impressive
This place needs a drive thu. The re-design is nice but not practicle. The pickup area is so small it is hard to get in and get your food with everyone who ordered huddled around such a small space. They need to make a bigger pick up space
Bagels were excellent. Perfectly cooked. I also really enjoyed the old fashioned donut which was surprisingly still good after many years 
Last two times I attempted to buy a coffee I had to walk out. The line hardly moved due to what seems to be understaffing. Never will I try again, it's too bad because I live in town. More staff is needed management. 
This is a standard DD, but with one difference. There is no drive-thru, so no cold air pulsing through the restaurant when the drive-thru window is open, no loud talking/speakers going. They keep the place clean and are friendly.
First and foremost the coffee is always hot and fresh and no one in the area comes close, but as D&D expands their menu and tries to become a full service fast food restaurant, this is where things go wrong.  When I order from the combo menu board, there is always a need to clarify or repeat what I had ordered,  even though I use the number system and add in what options I want. When I get down to the pick-up, what is in the bag always surprises me.
This is a great Dunkin Donuts.  They are efficient and the food is great!  Coffee is always fresh!  Just wish it had a drive thru!
I know, I know....D&D is pretty much the same everywhere...but the staff here is great and they do a great job of making sure the order is correct and everything tastes great, so I wanted to recognize them for that!
The wait each time is too long and the parking lot is dangerous with constant comings and goings; backing out with people zooming in is frightening.
Have been here many times. I am not a coffee drinker, but their teas and other drinks are always good. I have always been a fan of their breakfast sandwiches. Donuts are typical nothing too special. There is no drive thru so it can get pretty busy at times.
This coffee shop is near the I-84 hi-way, and many times, we stop by and have our coffee "on the go!", so this is very convenient when we are travelling. The dougnuts are okay, just a typical "DD". The coffee is good, and the doughnuts could be better, it just almost too sweet!
On a road trip from Boston to NJ and tired of the fast food burger chains. This was very conveniently located just off the highway next to two gas stations and a Dunkin' Donuts.

We had subs and sat down inside and ate. Plenty of tables to accommodate about two dozen customers.

The food preparers were very nice and professional and spoke perfect English.

Highly recommend if you are traveling on 84 and tired of the usual rest area food offerings.
We stop here often for quick meals and more recently we've had sandwiches and salads made for summertime picnics at the beach or concerts in the park.  We find the place clean, the staff helpful and friendly and the food fresh.  It's convenient, right next to the highway - so grab and go.  Couldn't be better.  An added bonus is the outdoor seating on the side porch for those who may be passing thru and need a few minutes out of the car and some fresh air.
Subway is always great to eat fresh ingredients. I gave this restaurant an average rating because when we walked in, several flies were all over the food area. It took a few seconds for someone to come from the back and take our order. The glass was dirty with fingerprints. Once someone came from the back, the order was speedy and quick. The tables were clean. The bathroom was freezing! I had to keep waving the flies away. We ordered our sandwiches and on our way we continued with our mega road trip. The best part of this Subway was the location off I-85. Prices were reasonable.
Great for lunch or after work pick. Sometime stop by on weekend just for the great value.  Always can depend on Subway fo r consistency ,
Just as you would expect any subway to be, but the employees are actually nice and friendly. Good spot
Excellent service and area to eat.  Great fresh ingredients. The only things is the parking lot is slightly run down
This restaurant is always clean and the employees are polite and work as fast as possible. The food? Well, if you like Subway restaurants, then you will like this place.
Papa T's is the type of restaurant where you visit as a child and return years later with kids of your own. This local eatery specializes in pizza but the grinders are so impressive! Breakfast and dinner specials are creative and delicious. You can't go wrong. Ambiance is limited but if it's a good, filling meal you are after, this is the right place. Nothing fancy but the burgers are excellent and the wait staff friendly!
Stopped for lunch and had one of the best hamburgers we have ever had. Staff was warm and friendly. We were not sure when we stopped but we will go back. 
Go to Papa T's a lot!  My husband loves the pizza.  They are very accommodating to my special dietary needs.  The waitresses are all very nice and friendly.  Mark the pizza maker and Jose the cook are very good to us.  The owner Patty is a sweetheart.  Nice home town place!
Great food, nice people. Good value. I usually go for breakfast. The food is always fresh and hot. Waitresses are friendly.  I recommend eating here for sure, and good pizza too
Been going here for many years.  Always has great pizza and friendly staff!  Small hole-in-the-wall place and very homey. Homemade food.  Booths and counter stools.  Great atmosphere and place to meet friends. 
Not a great deal of flavor. Not sure if it was bad day but pizza was not cooked and doughy. Will try again.
Went there for lunch. One of us got a slice of eggplant pizza. If you order one, be aware that one slice of their pizza is the equal of three slices of anyone else's  pizza. Don't say nobody told you :-) They loved it.

I ordered the chicken salad. It was home made and delicious. The cole slaw was great also. Another one in our party ordered an 8" Genoa salami sub and said it was great.

Not only was the food great, the prices were good also. 

Thumbs up on this place. Next time we're in the area we'll stop in for lunch again.
I have patronized this restaurant for many years. The family owned place is just that, you feel like family from the minute you sit down to the time you walk out the door. Food is home cooked and quite a variety.
We usually get take out from PaPa T's.  It's a small restaurant with booths & counter seats.  Check out the specials when there; They have some Good ones.  We usually get Grinder's, Spaghetti or BLT's which are all tasty.  The wait staff is always Friendly!
We pretty much only get pizza from here, but it's always great! Definitely the best pizza Tolland. The slices are great to grab for lunch, though they're a little greasy. The service is always friendly and fast.
Great food served hot fast and just a friendly happy staff. BIG portions. Left 1/2 of a delicious eggplant parmigiana! Tasty! Vow. 
Nice family restaurant, great italian food--yet they have everything from breakfast to lunch, burgers, wings, sandwiches, grinders and pizza --to dinner menu and specials.    Nice friendly atmosphere located just off I-84 exit 69 in Tolland Connecticut.
Breakfast here on weekend mornings is always interesting.  Stu (the usual weekend chef) always puts together some top-shelf specials - not always my kind of fare, but creative nonetheless.

This morning it was my favorite (which was a special some time ago) - eggs, bacon & French toast.  A reliable choice if the specials don't strike my fancy.  And it's pretty much always the same regular breakfast crowd which adds a hominess that can't be beat.
The best tasting pizza in Tolland. Staff is extremely friendly and you get treated like you are family wether dining in or picking up.  
Breakfast here rocks, it is very home made on style, hot, tasty and the best way to begin a long drive up 84 east to Boston, MA.
Good food, friendly, welcoming and attentive wait staff. We ate there several times while in Tolland. The dishes are large--if you order pasta dishes consider splitting with a friend 'cause the portions are that large. Lunch specials are priced right. Owner, Pat, is a gracious, kind woman who runs one of the best small restaurants we visited in a two week tour of New England. Staff provided my birthday wife with a candle in her cake--sweet.
I've yet to have a bad meal at this location. The price is great, the service is quick and attentive. On Sundays there is an all you can eat pasta dinner served family style. All the pasta, salad and garlic bread you can eat, extra charge to add sausage or meatballs. Breakfast is great and we'll priced. 
Most people don't know that Papa T's Restaurant also serves breakfast.  Do yourself a favor and try breakfast there.  They serve a great breakfast such as bacon and eggs with home fries.  If you like hash with your eggs, they make the best hash.  Prices are very reasonable.

Go once and you'll go back.
We only had pizza slices that were good.  The menu is varied.  The sandwich plates that other customes looked good with generous portions.

The staff is very friendly.

Good convenient just off I 84.

Would stop in again if in the area.
The title basically spells it out. I'm not a pork chop guy when eating out, but the ones I had there were quite good. Breakfast is certainly where they shine. This is the kind of place where you feel welcome and they actually strive to keep your business.
We went once for breakfast. The food was fine. The restaurant was clean. The staff talked a lot. I probably won't go again.
Any deviation throws the owner into a pissy tailspin. She is not customer focused. Food was a mess and nothing like the original owner's food. There are also dirty antiques on each table, at least take the dirt off the antique before putting them out. 
My husband and I were on a day trip to the area and found Marilyn's restaurant on the internet. Based on the reviews we  chose to stop by. We found the restaurant after driving by only once(listen to the driving instructions on line!). It's in a little building shared with a power equipment company. It was exactly what we were looking for:  a little funky, out of the way place with local flavor. The staff was wonderful. We chose to eat inside at one of the tables. Menu was extensive. I had the turkey, mozzarella and tomato with herb mayo.  I was a little disappointed that the turkey was "deli meat" and not fresh turkey, I guess because they also had a turkey, cranberry, stuffing sandwich on the menu I assumed I was going to get fresh turkey.  My husband devoured his reuben.  We certainly will return and try other selections.
First have been here for lunch and had the turkey mozzarella tomato with herb mayo panini it was a winner...so naturally had to come for breakfast again a winner had a omelet that was fantastic with hash browns and toast. The service is quick and pleasant,also have a bunch of fresh made bakery items available and many choices of Hosmer beverages made right here in Connecticut!!....So if you are in the area this is a must stop and get a great breakfast or lunch!!
This place is just down the street from one of our corporate clients.  The owner is obviously a Marilyn Monroe fan. It has quite the selection of fresh panini's and wraps (believe you can get salads too).  I stopped in today for a turkey, mozzarella, and tomato with herb mayo.....warmed and toasted to perfection. The service is always pleasant and quick as they can be.  If you need something for lunch and are in the area - Marilyn's has my vote as a good healthy choice.
Dining for breakfast was a different experience since we had never eten at the diner before. There were six (6) of us eating breakfast. Our dishes consisted of: 1- Eggs with breakfast potatoes,2- Mickey pancake HUGE, 3- regular order of pancakes, the sides were the meats (additional cost) bacon and sausage. The service was very good, the coffee had an endless pot and the  staff were very welcoming to out-of towners.
Food was great, but it was packed on Father's Day morning, so the service was slow, but we expected that.  Even had the young kids in the family helping out - nice to see. Very interesting menu choices.  Home fries were EXCELLENT.
A Refreshing change of a restaurant.  Stopped here on the way to  CT Fr a Family wedding.  The place was adorable, Food was excellent as was our waitress.  I got one Chocolate Chip pancake and a side of corned beef hash.  The pancake was great and the Corned Beef Hash was the best I have ever had.
This is a local favorite.  Friendly Staff, good food. Always a delight to have breakfast here. The staff is great, and so is the food. I prefer the Junk Box omelette.  Always a crowd on the weekends so get there early!  Lots of regulars during the week, but you can normally find a table no problem. When its warm, eat outside 
Good wholesome breakfast, great place to meet a friend and chat. Service is great. Clean, reasonable prices
REALLY good breakfast and lunch sandwiches!  Quaint and quiet, very close to the highway.  Great food, friendly staff, and a much better alternative, especially for travelers, when looking for something other than the golden arches...
It is seat yourself which doesn't make you known on arrival. Took 10 minutes to get a menu - no eye contact at all, food was good-brought out by a server, had to wait again at the end way too long also to get our bill!
Comfortable easy dining
Booths by the window, Stools at the counter, or a table by the pellet stove. Great breakfast foods including quite a western sandwich for easy money

While we've been here many times for spur-of-the-moment breakfasts we recently had breakfast with friends on a weekday morning at 9:00 am.  This place was busy but tables were turning over quickly - there was no wait.  It was cool outside so the pellet stove at the back of the dining area provided warmth.  This restaurant is conveniently located a minute downhill from Exit 69 off I-84 right next to the railroad tracks.  Coffee and tea were promptly provided.  Our eggs were cooked to order (over easy medium and scrambled) with rye toast a and homefries or a generous portion of corned beef hash (with my order).  The french toast served was hearty.  Unlimited refills of coffee and tea are available.  The staff is friendly, yet very busy and the place is very clean.  It took a while to get our check so a walk to the register made it easy to obtain one and pay right there.  This is a  typical local breakfast/lunch restaurant with tables, booths and eating counter located in the countryside of Connecticut.
It was great. The waitress was friendly and attentive. The food was very good and price reasonable. Coffee was served hot and with a smile. Thank you! 
They have sign hanging on the building that is quite unique. "EAT HERE... if not then we'll both starve" 👍 🍴 
Walked in, grabbing a quick breakfast before work. The place has been open for a half an hour,, it's freezing inside. The place is clean & quaint. However the waitress said that she's sorry but the coffee is not hot ???
So I ordered their house special hash omelette,,,, they don't have hash today !! 

French toast is ok,, nothing special, seems to be the only game in town besides Dunkin donuts across the street
The Track Nine Diner is a busy little place.  Decorated with train motiff and old diner signs. 

The staff is quick & on a mission. Rather like bees in a hive. Every so often you'll see the staff give a quick smile. With the turn around at the tables they have to work efficiently.

Hubby and I had The Boomer. He had over easy eggs (eyes closed) & I had sunny side up (eyes open). Double bacon and wheat toast for both. Where we changed it up; he had double Pancakes while I had their French Toast.

Meals were hot and pancakes & French Toast were served on separate plates. Coffee was great and our waitress never let my cup go empty! Hubby said the O.J. was delicious.

Pancakes were large, hot, and not as fluffy as expected. Still edible though as he left only a quarter stack.

French Toast was golden, fluffy, and missing something. I've gotten spoiled I suppose as they didn't seem sweet enough or were missing the secret ingredient. Vanilla. Otherwise, they were quite good. 


After a meeting on UConn's Depot Campus, was headed back to I-84 East and, starving, stopped at the first lunch spot I found.  The Track Nine Diner advertises as a deli and diner so I had expectations of something better than a stock sandwich.  The menu was not massive but very respectable, with plenty of options with each order.  I went with the "Patriot" (a turkey, bacon, and provolone melt) on rye with potato salad.  A good sized pile of turkey (not NYC deli sized, but should a sandwich really be that large?), thick slices of well cooked bacon, and properly melted cheese on hearty slices of golden browned rye.  The potato salad was homemade with plenty of dill - very tasty.  Staff were very friendly, and I was back on the road with food in hand in less than 10 minutes.

Especially considering how low my expectations were, this was a great find.  Would absolutely stop here again next time I pass through.
Local find off 84! The building is a converted train station. So it's old but cute & clean.The locals come in a breakfast & lunch shift but there is plenty of room. Service was quick, nice, and offered up directions, information, and smiles! Every sandwich comes with a choice of 4 sides and request are met with a smile! The fries were surprisingly crisp & hot! We were so lucky to stumble upon this place. We had a picky eater with us that sad he'd definitely go back.
I had the special bacon, red pepper, avocado & feta omelet. Exceedingly tasty! Excellent homefries & friendly service too. Will return for sure!
Good breakfast service was good, price is average portion are fair. Not my favorite place to go. Just no wow factor.
This restaurant is a nearby place where one can enjoy a hearty breakfast and spend time visiting with friends.  
Nice place for a breakfast stop.  Basic menu...eggs, omelets, pancakes, French toast, etc.  The place has a comfortable, New England feel to it.  Nothing fancy.  Service was very friendly and thorough.  The food arrived quickly and was all correct.  Coffees were refilled on a regular basis.

There was also a decent looking lunch menu that would be nice to try when I'm back in the neighborhood.
Track Nine looks outside and in like one of those small-town diners that seems ubiquitous in rural America. And it is. It has vinyl booths, well-worn seats and tables, dinerish stuff on the walls and windows, and nothing fancy.

The food is pretty good, too. I wouldn't call it world-class, but that's just fine for a place like this. What I expect at a place like this is good, home-style honest cooking, and that's what you get. One of the ways I judge restaurants that serve breakfast is on the quality of their corned beef hash, and Track Nine doesn't disappoint. You can tell that they make theirs with some elbow grease; nothing out of a can here.

My only caution would be to say: Remember that is is a diner, not a kale mission house. There is no shortage of spice and grease. Don't expect dry omelettes and don't expect an overabundance of new-fangled eco-dishes. Just come and expect a good home-style decent American breakfast, because you'll get one.
My family and I stopped for lunch here by chance as we drove through Connecticut on I-84.

In short, we enjoyed the food but we didn't like the prices and we really didn't like the feeling we got from everyone who worked there.

Now the long version:

The building and its surroundings were attractive. The inside of the restaurant was clean and well maintained (with one exception I'll get to later). There were several tables full of diners, which seemed a good omen because the area in general did not seem densely populated.

I walked in first, ahead of my family. I was ignored by all the staff for about a minute, so I positioned myself near a recently-vacated table. The waitress seemed unwelcoming at best from the first moment when she asked me if I wanted to sit at that table and said I would have to wait for her to clean it. The written words seem normal, but her demeanor was standoffish. My wife and parents joined me a couple minutes later and, within a couple minutes and only two interactions with the waitress, my wife asked me twice if I thought we should leave. I really wanted to except that we had already ordered coffees and I didn't want to pay for them but leave them undrank. We both felt distinctly uncomfortable. Maybe that waitress simply doesn't smile, or pay attention to the tone of her voice or the words she chooses; maybe she was just grumpy that day. She conspicuously ignored us, not checking up on us while we ate, nor asking how things were when we were done. It was more work than it should have been for my parents to get a coffee refill. The restaurant was not large, it had only two discrete areas from which one could see the other, and there were only several tables of diners. I don't know to where she vanished or why she stayed gone so long.

Moving on...one unpleasant waitress can be overlooked, but the impression we got from all the other three workers in the restaurant made our discomfort seem like the product of a group conspiracy. I thought they ignored us on purpose, looking 'past' us. At the end of the meal, it took a while to get the one employee to come to the register to take our money, and then I felt as though she acted disconnected from me. She seemed somewhere between disinterested and annoyed at my honesty when I pointed out the waitress had rewritten the total wrong and undercharged us. She didn't believe me and tried to point out it was right, and I had to show her twice that the total on one side was obviously different from the amount rewritten on the other. I'm not sure why I put that much effort into being scrupulous.... In all, she seemed bothered having to take my cash and desirous to do it in as little time and with as little interaction as possible.

In contrast to the staff, the people eating at the other tables were polite and nice, most nodding acknowledgments/hellos each time I passed by.

I don't like to make vague negative comments about subjective things like feelings and guesses about other people's intentions, but this one aspect of the experience overshadowed the rest for us. It seemed like not one of the employees wanted to expend even the littlest effort to present themselves as friendly or to care about us or our business. I wish I could describe the feeling we got better in writing. I still feel strongly about it three weeks later, as evidenced by the amount of the review space I'm spending on it.

On the other hand, our food was pretty good. The homefries were simply seasoned but flavorful and tasty. The omelet with purportedly homemade hash was neatly made and tasted very good. The other breakfast foods (eggs, bacon, sausage, pancakes) were average in quality and flavor, but all were cooked and presented rather nicely.

We were unhappy with the prices, which seemed too high ($9 - $12 breakfasts and light lunches). Of course, because we're not from there we don't know if this nondescript, declining, rural area just happens also to be far more highly priced than the surrounding areas we went to. Our baseless assumption was that the owners needed to pay for refurbishment of the historical building or that they knew that they are right off the interstate and not much else is.

In opposition to the rest of the restaurant, the appearance of the men's bathroom was off-putting. I could see the differences in color on the floor around the toilet where apparently lazy cleaners had mopped only the easy-to-reach path on the floor for a long time, and left the rest  to fester. The fixtures were old, which is fine, but the toilet didn't flush easily and could easily be repaired with an inexpensive new flusher. The things around the toilet area were rusty or stained or grimey (like when they are subjected to many men with poor urinary aim); other things were broken or gave a bad impression in some other way. The door's knob didn't work and the lock was a dodgy-looking replacement. Overall, the impression was an unhygenic, dirty bathroom that had been habitually poorly cleaned (the stereotypical gas station or subway public bathroom).

I do feel ashamed writing negative comments here now because I did not say anything to the workers in the restaurant at the time. If we had not gotten such a strong negative impression from all (not just one) the workers, the good food would have stood out more and probably I would be rating this place a "4".
Went for a Sunday lunch with a friend.  Not sure how relevant this review is as there was almost NO ONE else in the entire place.  One other set of diners in the main room the entire time.  Weather didn't permit outside seating.  May have been a couple people in the bar we didn't see when passing by.  Given that we were almost the only people there, service was very attentive; which makes me all that much more annoyed that my sandwich came with cheese on it when I clearly responded "NO" when asked if I wanted cheese on it.  My friend had a hamburger which was on the expensive side but deliciously didn't disappoint in size or flavor; he liked being able to customize the toppings rather than choose from a predetermined menu.  From appearances this looks like a nice place to come for drinks and hang out on the patio or in the bar, but if you're looking for a dining experience where food is the star this isn't the place.
Three people standing by the hostess stand but no one would seat us. Not busy at all. Left and went to Francesca's. Their service is always awesome!

Previously gave this a very good rating however something is really wrong here. There is no consistency in food prep. It's hit or miss when ordering the same dish you've ordered on a previous visit. I've always liked the eggplant Parmesan but something has changed and it doesn't taste quite the same so I don't order that anymore. Most recently, ordered a "special" salad only to be told they didn't have the dressing for it so we had a substitute. The description included candied walnuts but they were not candied when the salad came, just plain. The worst part was that we paid additional for grilled chicken breast on top and it was obviously previously prepared leftover chicken that was cut into little cubes and rubbery. It had never been served that way in the past. I now understand the negative comments particularly about the chicken. Another negative comment caught my attention regarding a dish where the lobster was left out. The same thing  previously happened to me....hmmm. A fluke? It's too bad since we can really use a nice restaurant in this area and it is a pretty place. But the reality is that there are many good choices not far from this restaurant. A good restaurant is consistent. They are not and I won't be back.
The restaurant looked wonderful, the y had outside seating as well as interior seating. The customers looked more like clientele and dressed the part (upscale) as were the prices!
The remake of this restaurant was well done. Very nice outdoor patio, interior is nice and the grounds are attractive. However, our first dining experience was poor as far as the dinner went. We felt we needed to try it again out of fairness. Sorry to say it wasn't any better. There won't be a third attempt!
Decided to sit on the patio. Really nice, but West facing. Sun is a problem until sunset. Service was good, Martini and Cosmo B+.
I had the fish and Chip's. Fish was tasty, but not "off the boat", but was frozen fillets.
My wife had the southwestern chicken salad, which she enjoyed. Bit spicy, but nice.
Overall experience was good.
Will go back again, but no fish..
I keep giving this place a chance since we live so close. But it always takes such a long time for service. I think they are always short staffed and I've never seen such a turnover in employees. I can't believe I'm even saying this, but lakeview has been much better than this place lately! 
The wait staff, that are not related to the owner, are great. Speedy and friendly. Nice list of daily specials, so always something new to try. The menu is large, everyone should find something they like.
It's easy to tell when a restaurant management cares about the quality of the service and the quality of the servers.  Most evenings you can talk to the owner, enjoy great craft beers (need more variety!) and hear great bands.
Horrible service! Sat for at least 30 minutes without being approached for a drink or to clean the table. The waitress needed to check out and asked for our signatures on the bill while she stood over us at our table. After she left, we were not approached again to have the table cleared or to be asked if we wanted anything else! I have never been too pleased but tonight it was a huge disappointment. The only good thing was the wonderful music - Dave Costa!
A good place to eat and has a diverse menu. The lunch specials included pasta, salmon, sandwiches and salads. That plus the regular lunch menu gave a wide variety of choices. The burgers are half pound and comes with a variety of toppings. The onion rings and fries are excellent and the prices reasonable.
Ate here a few times (we live right around the corner). My wife has gotten a couple of dishes (salads, pasta meals) with grilled chicken and it is always old and tough. Everything else has been fine. Great outdoor patio.
The food is AWESOME and the view is beautiful!!! The staff are professional and great!! I've been a bunch of times and plan to go again in the near future!! 
My boyfriend and I have only been here twice. Both times we sat at the bar for dinner. 

The first time we sat there for 25 minutes and no one greeted us. The second time was this past Saturday, we ordered salads. His with steak that was ice cold, mine was a Caesar salad and the lettuce was very soggy. No crunch to it at all. 

We barely touched them, asked for the check three times before we finally got it. It was quite obvious we didn't eat but they took the food and just walked away. We finally got the check after 20 minutes paid and left. 

It was around 7 pm and the music was so loud we couldn't hear each other talk. Little loud for early evening. 

Anyways never again!!!
We just walked out of hilltop. We were sat at a table and left after just about 10 mins without even a waitress bringing water. Went to Willington Pizza. Always great service and food.
I've been here many times for lunch and dinner. It's a nice clean restaurant and you won't feel rushed. The patio is great in summer. The salads with grilled shrimp, chicken, or steak are very good and portions are generous. The special summer salads with strawberries are great. They had a wonderful poppy seed dressing they no longer make and I'd like to see that come back. Most soups are very good also. The eggplant Parmesan is always a favorite of mine. My husband had a great turkey club with very good coleslaw not loaded with mayonnaise. Getting rolls at lunch is hit or miss. Some type of bread or rolls should be available with lunch entrees even if they're a different type from the ones served at dinner which by the way are very good. The only dish that I've had that needs a total makeover is the fried calamari that tastes like the frozen stuff you get at the supermarket. Ordered once and never again. All in all, a great restaurant to have in Willington.
This is just what the locals were looking for! A great local spot, never to busy, but never dead. Great outside patio and live music some nights.  Good menu, although I was not happy when the prices went up.  Friendly staff. Nice bar with plenty of TVs.  Drinks are good and I am a fan of the seasonal cocktails. 
We've been here several times and also ordered takeout and I kept hoping for something better to write about, but it's always the same. The place is lovely to look at, inside and out. The atmosphere is casual and upbeat.That said, the food is always just ok. The burgers taste like they were previously frozen (not sure if they are or not), soggy fries, overcooked nachos with minimal cheese, salads that sometimes have more vegetables than other times, undercooked chicken on the salad, and overcooked pasta, to name a few issues. We are not super picky eaters (see my other glowing reviews of numerous local venues), but this place always misses the mark. We had to wait for the hostess to get off her phone on more than one occasion to be seated, and our waitress would always forget something - silverware, the sour cream and salsa for the nachos, napkins, or even to ask if we wanted refills on soda and water. The beer selection is pretty good, but after we ordered our first round on a couple occasions, she took the beer menu away and we had to keep asking to see it again so we could try something new each time. (Maybe that's not a common issue, since people generally drink the same thing throughout the night?) They have some lovely live music in the lounge, but the acoustics in there aren't great for it and all you really hear are the patrons' voices with some muffled music in the background. It gets very loud in there on a Friday or Saturday night with just regular conversations going on at the bar and the lounge tables. Overall, I wouldn't really recommend Hilltop, but we'll probably be back just because it's local and has good live music for a quick date night dinner.
Just driving from Boston to New York, and stopped off for dinner. Could not be happier with the food and service. The tuna was out of this world, extremely fresh! The garlic pasta was gourmet! Will definitely stop by on our next trip. Highly recommend! 
Good food-- great beers and magnificent service. Atmosphere nothing special -- nice dining room-- large bar that had live music. Just go and enjoy
This restaurant has a prize winning red potato pizza that is a must try. Fun and interesting decor. Sorry, no gluten free--one must go to their other restaurant which is only 5 minutes away.
Family atmosphere, great service, and yummy pizza and grinders!  You can't go wrong here - but we're big fans of the pesto calzones!
Casual dining & great food!
Prices are reasonable!
Service is friendly & quick!
A fun country Fall drive!  =)
You won't be disappointed!
We have eaten here as a couple and with friends many times. The service is excellent as is the food and the prices are reasonable. Besides their famous pizzas, I have had their French dip sandwich many times. It is the best I have ever had and the preparation is consistently good. 
I love their pepperoni pizza.  The red potato with bacon is great too.  Beer is cold and while the selection is small there always a couple good ones.
Service is good. Menu hasn't changed in years. Good for pizza or grinders. Interior is nice and clean.
We had a party of 5 and they squeezed us into a table for 4; which was ok at the time because they were extremely busy.  They got our order incorrect but did make an effort to correct.  My pizza was soggy in the middle.  My 5 year old's kids plate was a full size order of lasagna with bread (which we weren't expecting).  The appetizer was good and everyone enjoy the cramped meal.
Great place with great food.  Friendly staff, wether its pick up or dine in, always treated well.  Food is good, pizzas are award winning. Normally never a wait, but it can get busy.  A family fav! 
We usually have take-out pizza - the House Pizza.  Excellent pizza with great toppings - loaded with toppings.  We have eaten in house and service is good.  We usually order the house pizza ahead of time to be eaten there when we get there and there is no waiting.
Our family moved to Willington about a year and a half ago, and by now we have eaten at Willington Pizza Too dozens of times. We have had their pizza, their entrees, and their appetizers many, many times. We keep going back. It is our go-to place for local pizza, and we usually order more than we can eat on purpose so we can take some home.

Having spent 29 years in the Chicago area before moving to Connecticut, we brought high pizza standards with us. In our judgment, Willington Pizza Too does a pretty good job. They don't have any Chicago-style deep dish offerings, but that's OK; their thin crust varieties are a decent substitute. We were pleasantly surprised to see them offer our favorite spinach as a topping, not something we see very often. The topping portions are generous, the crust is done just right, and there are no crazy compromises with oversized edges or mushy centers.

Aside from pizza, they have a good variety of other offerings, from Italian style pasta to the ubiquitous grinder. We have never had anything on the menu that we didn't like.

We like the atmosphere, too, which is a cozy small-town diner type of feel. The walls sport a cornucopia of paraphernalia from the 1930's through the 1960's, including posters from the Beatles early days and the ever-popular 1950's-era license plate. It all makes us feel like we're in a warm, small-town, ruralish place. It's nice.

As for the service, we pretty much always get good service. The servers are friendly and smiley and attentive enough. No complaints.

If the place has a weakness, it is that they don't always have much variety in their draft beers, and when the variety is there, it's usually IPA-heavy. But that's not a fatal flaw. It's the food, service, and atmosphere we keep going back for.

Willington Pizza Too is not the finest restaurant you'll ever eat at. But it gets our vote as most likely to succeed at getting us to come back.
Willington Pizza and Willington Pizza Too are the same.   Merely at two separate locations perhaps 3 miles away from each other.

There had been a time when these places had the reviewers' attentions as one of the best pizza restaurants in the state.  The awards are posted at either location for reference.

Now, I would just say - it is all pretty much ho-hum.

The pizza is Greek pan style with a variety of preconfigured preparations/toppings on the menu along with a build-your-own list selections.  White or red, your choice...etc.

Not at all remarkable, except that, frequently, the cheese and topping will pull off in a sheet from the top of the slice when you bite into one.   If it's a hot slice...this could be dangerous...for me any way.

We live less than a mile away and had been ordering out not quite once a week.  We stopped.  Now a drive a few miles away for something less mechanical and better tasting.

The menu offers a typical selection of pseudo greek/ pseudo italian meals beside pizza - so a selection of various salads, a family of grinders, several (decidedly overboiled) pasta dishes, wings, sports pub snacks, etc....

The pizza sauce is very generic and is pretty OK on their pizza, but it does seem Willington also uses it to top their pasta dishes as well.    This is not a good choice really, but it does reinforce the assembly line mechanical preparation here.

There are other places near by with a more personal style, flair and flavor in this price range.
...and the need to sell bottles of that blue cheese dressing.  Someone call a counselor because we need an intervention.  Thoughtfully decorated with antiques, vintage and reproduced poshly fun items.  Everything we tasted was divine.  The ribs and chicken wing combo was pure evil and calories gladly consumed.  The pizza has that perfect crust and the topping are not skimpy.  The salad was super fresh, crispy, had a nice mixture and ratio of vegetables.  Topped with blue cheese dressing a tear may have slipped from my eye...that was good! 
The best pizza around, but expensive.  There is no doubt that the pizza here is some of the best any where around but we find it very expensive.
On a recent trip to Willington, CT we had the opportunity to eat the Willington Pizza Too. It is one of those places you would miss if you didn't have someone to tell you about it. The restaurant is sort of a Bar & Grill type set up, but appeared to be family friendly. The food was really good and so was the service. Servings are more than adequate. Prices are reasonably and the atmosphere OK. We would have no problem eating here again when in the area.
It's ok but not as good as the original Willington Pizza. The quality of the food just isn't the same. Pizza crust can be soggy. I will drive to the original Willington Pizza even for take out. I think the management isn't the same.
Passing thru this area which we are totally unfamilar with, and checking options for dinner on the phone, this came up.  Very casual place, lots of oddball but quite cool stuff displayed on walls and everywhere.  All very clean and attractive.  Had an 18 yo girl for server, very nice, apologized for not knowing all the taste details of the beers, but offered to check with bartender and/or bring samples.  Wound up with a local beer, forget the name but it was very good.  This was a 2 week road trip and I'll be honest, I do not remember what I got, either fish and chips or chicken parm.  And no recollection of the wife's order.  It was not pizza, but dinners of some type.  But we do remember the food was very good, surprising so for a casual joint like this.  Sevice was very prompt and friendly.  Prices more than reasonable.  If I lived around here they'd see us 2 or 3 times a month, and if we pass thru again we'll try to stop.  It's places like this that give me the incentive to never settle for fast food if it can be avoided.  They could expand the wine selections a bit would be the only negative.
We went there yesterday with our daughter and grandson.  We were greeted and seated right away and the beer and soft drinks arrived within a few minutes.  I had a half of eggplant sub which was incredible and only 5 dollars.   We also ordered a veggie pizza with clams which was like 13 dollars.  Our daughter ordered a veggie pizza for another 12 dollars.  Beers were like 6 dollars.  A great value, great food and great service.  A winning combination.
We have been customers of Willington Pizza since it started many years ago.  As they have grown, the quality of food and service have stayed at the level that first got our business.  When WPToo started down the road, we have enjoyed the same.
Since the service is not the best, we ALWAYS get take out!  This location is definitely more convenient.  We always get Red Potato Pizza, which is really Good!  If you've never tried it, you should!
Funky pizza place in the middle of Connecticut.  Huge portions, so order accordingly.  All entrees come with garlic bread, so no need to order the extra bread.  
Here you can find their prize winning red potato in gluten free or regular versions. Try it will everything (bacon and broccoli). Fun roadside atmosphere and a carousel room. 
I always get pizza, because you can buy one or a slice!

Plus it's delicious..... =]  They have a large menu to

select from!  There is a pleasant dining area!

Staff is friendly!  Prices are just right!

Try the State Line Potato Chips they sell in bags!

They are sooooooo tasty & a rare find!  Made in Canada!
We loved our visit to Willington Pizza.  Ordered a pizza large enough to have leftovers because it is sooo good.
Been coming here for pizza for 21 years! Currently, I drive over an hour for their unique pies. Cheeseburger, Seafood Casino, California, Four cheese, etc. Great family environment. Service and prices are great. Greek style crust.
This was the first place my family ate when arriving in town and the last one before we left. Yes it's that good.  It warrants more than one visit in a week.  The hot ham grinders are my absolute favorite from anywhere, and I've travelled the country.  The pizza is also the best.  I usually go with a plain cheese, but you really cant go wrong.

Red potato pizza was delicious It felt like eating a baked potato. I've been going to Willington Pizza for years and they never disappoint.
Found this place via google
Restaurant near area.  Excellent pizza & cold beer.  Plenty of seating, friendly staff
Food arrived within 20-25 mins.  If near here, stop in.  
The Red Potato pizza is to die for!  We also love the pesto pizza!  If you have kids they will love the carousel horses in the room on the far end!  The restaurant is very cute and the service is always great!
There are some places that you visit and get a great experience...Willington Pizza House is one of those places. Modest in size, with a bar, you can get your favorite foods (with an Italian flair). I recommend the following: for kids: Kara's cheese pizza (beware of the portion size and think to go box), The pizza with artichokes, etc, etc is  an outstanding flavor combination, Clam chowder is good but the bowl could be deeper,
The hamburger platter is a cooks delight and a customers challenge to finish. Unfortunately the other goodies we tried have slipped my mind (too much good).
Great little local place to get a pizza and have a few drinks with friends.  Same people running things from the start means the quality is always there.
A great pizza, friendly service, clean, a local favorite. Don't try to get in there after a UCONN game!
Went here with my wife and kids and left very satisfied we made the trip. Wife went to Uconn and spoke so highly of the red potato pizza so I had to give it a shot. It lived up to the hype, as it was spectacular. We also got the Seafood Casino pizza. While my initial thought was that it was a bit salty, I have to say my opinion changed 100% after I put a little lemon juice on it. I know it sounds crazy, but it tasted like a completely different pizza. End of the day, I left Willington Pizza EXTREMELY impressed. 

A great pie!
Love this place.  Great menu; reasonable prices - the baked potato pizza is worth it every time. Also had the cheeseburger and taco pizzas, or traditional - it's all good!  Fast, friendly service, can't go wrong!
we stopped  on the way back from  our vacation  for dinner we ordered   a small  ANTIPASTO and my wife favorite   a  RED POTATO   PIZZA   the food there is pure heaven   We  highly   highly  recommend   the food  the service   was awesome   as usual
We stopped at the Willington Pizza House for a late lunch. Split a tasty pizza. Service was quick even though it was a bit busy. Just passing through, but would eat here again if we are ever in the area. 

I'm VERY picky when it comes to pizza and this place did not disappoint me!! The types of pies are very different but each one was sooooo good and fresh!! Try them out, you'll be glad you did!! 
Been here many times. Almost never a wait. The staff are so nice and the atmosphere is great! Their seafood pizza is awesome! I feel relazed when I am here. Too bad they didnt have live music on summer evenings! That would be the icing on the cake. Great job Willington Pizza!
Very typical place and the decoration all about nascar and sports , fast servive and good food , pizza great , accesible area 
Great pizzas, calzones, grinders, and special dishes!  The old farmhouse is filled with advertising memorabilia, so fun to just sit and read the walls!  GO!!
Menu still states that chili is cubes of sirloin, but they changed to ground beef. The chili used to be "to die for" with cubes of sirloin that would fall apart in strands like a pot roast. New ground beef recipe is just average. 
Good place for locals. Intimidating to anyone walking in if not known. when walking in. Large local bar crowd, Left for another venue..
What a great local bar. Don't expect fancy cocktails or lavish apps.  But you can expect a great time, cold beers and great people.  Fresh popcorn too.  
I had the $2.00 spaghetti dinner on Wednesday & could not believe the quality, portion & taste of this meal for the price. I asked why....the response was "there are too many people who need to eat a good meal & I do that for them" amazing!
This place just starting having open mic night on Tuesday nights. What a wonderful time we had. We ate great burgers, played free pool & listened to wonderful local talent. A must for a relaxing evening.
Hit this place on a Friday and had the best burger ever. Friendly bartender and fun game of pool. Would def come back again.
Went to Karoke on Friday night and had a blast! People there were friendly and bartender was on top of everything. Tried a gourmet burger & have to say one of the best burgers I have ever had! Going back this Saturday with a bunch of friends.
It looks rough inside and out.  "The Eagle" attracts folks from all walks of like: bikers, locals, college students, contruction workers, housewives etc. I have been there several times and have NEVER had a problem with anyone (I work in an office).  

They have killer Karaokie which is worth the price of admission (free).  Also has several pool tables.

Ive heard the food is decent but have never eaten there.

If you want a place to cut loose  - Check out "The Eagle"
They have yummy marinated fruit they sell at the bar. It is very divey so don't expect much, there are pool tables.
Have loved Monet's table since discovering many years ago. It's like eating at your special Aunt's or Grandma's home. I enjoy eating things I don't make regularly and Monet's always has fresh, unique, healthy  food that never fails to satisfy. The atmosphere is relaxed and lovely whether you dine indoors in the winter by the fire or outside in the flower garden during the nice weather. Yummy specials should not be ignored nor room made for an amazing dessert.  A special place. Don't miss it. 
Held a special function with a wide selection of unique foods. We are a local non profit business wanting to support our local restaurants. What a great choice! It was a special event for a special colleague. Would highly recommend Monet's Table for any event. Deb, the owner, is so wonderful to work with. She has a wonderful place with incredible food. Thank you and enjoy!!!
You may never have been to any place quite like Monet's table. You can see their commitment to excellence in decor, service and, of course, the food. 
Everything is delicious and unique. Surprising combinations of ingredients, healthy, often organic and locally grown.
If you're looking for a quick meal, forget Monet's Table. But if you want an unforgettable dining experience, call for a reservation!
Unique menu, unique building. One of a kind place.  Take the time to have a wonderful Saturday brunch.
Monet's table my friends took me there for lunch on my anniversary get away with my husband. This place is filled with old world charm. The staff is exceptional. The history of the house is intriguing. so cozy and inviting.my friend is quite a regular there .and it is her favorite place to go for breakfast.so if you go there for breakfast try the carols special. And all their food is made from scratch no additives or preservatives' must go for the Tolland traveler. They also carry art work for purchase. And I understand they change it out for a new artist once a month. I looked at some of the art its beautiful. And I understand at one time the had Monet art there.
Perfect! Great food, inventive menu, vegetarian and vegan choices, fresh ingredients, excellent service, inviting staff, warm and gracious ambience. No more deli stops for me when I travel through Connecticut. I chose a garlic and Parmesan encrusted grilled cheese sandwich on homemade bread. A simple concept with a delightful twist. A dessert shared with my husband: chocolate cake with raspberry filling. Instead of the jam filling I expected, the moist cake layers were frosted with a rich and smooth raspberry Russian cream and topped with a thin layer of chocolate ganache. This is my new "go to" place when traveling. Wish I lived close enough to make Manet's Table a regular part of my routine.
We have been here for dinner and catered affairs. The staff is quite nice and accomodating. The food is very good. We have never been disappointed here and would readily go back. If your travel schedule allows you to stop in while traveling down I84, by all means stop in . They have limited hours, so check with them first.
If you get a chance try the food here... deliciously delightful in every way... As you will see by the photos I eat here quite often...
Beautifully welcomed, inviting atmosphere, wonderful menu selection and careful presentation- I'll return to this restaurant often now with friends & family.
Warm and cozy restaurant, with a little different, out of the ordinary menu. Fresh produce, organic products used.  Not a large menu, but everything sounds great if you like eclectic.  Will  go back soon, can't get enough of relaxing atmosphere, friendly wait staff, delicious food.  And those desserts!
I went here recently with 5 other friends for a birthday celebration.  The food choices were limited and the portions were not very large for the price.  BUT the chocolate-coconut (Mounds Bar) cake was to die for and worth the trip!  The gardens are lovely and the dining area was sweet with lovely reproductions on the walls.  Overall a very enjoyable experience.
Wow!  It has been years since I found a place like this in CT.  I loved the atmosphere created by the house location- cozy, comfortable and quiet.  The fireplace in the middle of the first floor was a bonus.  Of course we know that a restaurant can't survive on atmosphere: the food has to shine to make you want to return.  No worries there- Monet's table excels! We were a party of 3.  One ordered the hearty breakfast of eggs with sausage and potatoes.  Two of us ordered the special: a salmon and shrimp crepe in a creamy lemon dill sauce.  I consider this a risky dish-- there are so many ways it can fail.  Was the sauce lumpy, thick or over-seasoned? No! It was smooth, light and delicately flavored.  Was the crepe sticky or overcooked? No- it was thin and fresh.  Was it stuffed with the cheaper salmon with some miniscule pieces of shrimp? No! There was a generous amount of fresh shrimp. It was served on tender spinach leaves that were also worth eating.  We sampled the scone and the apple walnut bread and both were good.  Did I mention the apple flavored coffee, locally made?  Also wonderful.  It is out of my way, but I'm already planning how I'll return with another friend. It's the perfect "girls' day out" place, but I also saw a young family and a couple. Here's to hoping it will one day expand to include dinner so that my husband and I can enjoy it together.
Don't like this question best meal I have in a restaurant but it is close.  Delicious.   Upscale and worth it.  Décor is peaceful, serene atmosphere, service great.  Food great.
Just found this great little place. Rural and casual. Eclectic wholesome food is touted on the menu and it is. We were there for lunch. Delicious green salad with sliced peaches. Light dressing. My guest had light and tasty crab-cakes, elegantly served with sliced cucumber salad. Iced berry teas were great!. Delightful luncheon in a pleasant atmosphere on a hot summer day. What is not to like!
Great approach to culinary excellence and relaxed dining.
On a sunny winter Sunday, we hosted a baby shower/brunch at this restaurant in a beautifully restored old farmhouse.  The staff were all smiles, gracious and attentive; the set-up was lovely and the food fantastic - assorted homemade breads, fresh fruit bowl, HOT scrambled eggs, hot breakfast meats and home fries and wonderful crepes. This restaurant, usually open weekdays for lunch as well as Saturday brunch, is not to be overlooked for a quick, well-priced healthy gourmet lunch by travelers and by locals.  It is located at the junction of Routes 74 and 30 (1/2 way between Exits 67 and 68 on I-84).
Nine of us came here for lunch to celebrate my daughter's birthday (daughter's choice). We all had a great spread of tasty Mexican food. Excellent, prompt and friendly service.The institution is a three level renovated Barn - excellent ambiance!! Lots of seating & parking. Will definitely come here again when visiting UCONN. It also is a steakhouse and has a full bar.
Been coming here when we've been in the Storrs area for over 40 years.  Very cool, romantic atmosphere!  A large rustic barn with 3 levels of seating!  (No elevator though). Very good food and very good, friendly service.  

Tender, tasty prime rib and filet. I'm a steak fan, not a big fan of Mexican food so I can't attest to that.  Good margharitas though. I wish this place were located nearer where I live so I could come here more often.
The Restraurant impressed us because it was very crowded and we did have reservations and were seated right away.  We thought for sure we would have to sit and wait.  The food took almost an hour to come once we ordered.  My kids were nearly falling asleep at the table.  When the food came it was delicious!  We did not stay for dessert wanted to get the kids home.  Will definitely try this place again.
My boyfriend and I stopped here for a date night. We have been handfuls of times and love it every time! From the free homemade chips and salsa to the authentic atmosphere this place is just great! This most recent time here I had the appetizer mini chimis with a side of rice and beans. We made happy hour by 3 minutes and our server was the one who informed us and let us still order from the happy hour menu! Great margaritas and food! Lucky to live not far from here! Looks like they are adding a deck in the front of the building too so I can't wait for that! 
One of the few places that let you mix and match.  The Chorizo Sausage and Chicken combo was perfect and the plate and side fixings were awesome.  The Jalapeno Watermelon Margarita was to die for.  The barkeep and food runner were very friendly fast and efficient.  The bar and dining room are very clean with a great ambiance.  So were the bathrooms.  The one big negative was the cry baby waiter that ranted for half an hour to the bar guest, staff and whoever else would listen about broken glass left in the bar sink that cut his finger tips and sounded like he wanted his mommy.  When he took it out on the hostess as I was exiting, I was less than impressed with his rant in front of waiting guests and told her the backstory.   Otherwise it was a great experience.
We have eaten here and liked the food, so made the drive to it again before my daughter left for school. Seated right away upstairs even though I expected a wait. Very nice waitress with a sense of humor. Very different because the menu is an all-in-one which lists the Margarita items and the Chuck's items. Waitress brought over chips with salsa (medium heat) and our drinks (good). I ordered the "Zizzlin' Steak Fajita" ($16.99) which was great. Ample amount of tender steak and all the fixings to make great fajitas. Came with refried beans and Mexican rice. Not disappointed. My wife had the "Black Bean Enchalada" ($11.99) which she loved. My daughter had the same and said it was very good. All of us had enough to bring home. We decided to split the dessert, an "Oreo Fried Ice Cream" ($5.75) that was soooooo good and would be a chocolate lovers delight. Lots of parking. Great service and excellent food.
My husband's been trying a low fat low acid diet, which pretty much limits him to sticks and twigs. So I suggested we get Fajitas at Chucks/Margarita Grill. He was able to get the grilled shrimp w/o the sauce on it, and the veggies are grilled, so he was happy! And I got to enjoy mine with guac and sour cream. Yum.
We met some friends at Chuck's on a Friday night at 7 pm. We expected a long wait but were pleasantly & unexpectedly seated within 10 minutes. We sat upstairs in the loft area which was quaint. Our server was prompt and very friendly offering up the specials of the day and various drink selections.We were not rushed and while it was very busy the noise level was not bad at all. i would suggest asking for a table away from the stairs as that area is very bust and could get noisy or congested. We had chips and salsa, prime rib, scallops,steak and fajitas. All were prepared very well and the portions were plentiful. Would definitely go back. maybe try the bar area next time.
This restaurant can be hard to find if not familiar with the area.  Once there, the service and the food was great.  Had the frozen coconut lime margarita and it was wonderful.  I had Mexican but my husband had American food.  Both meals were great.  Would recommend this restaurant.
Delicious chicken and beef nachos and some tasty margaritas! Service was friendly and prompt!  Bathrooms were clean!

Based on the appearance and flow it seems as a awesome place, unique, fun, etc. I manage a restaurant and I was disappointed. First off our served (Allison) did not greet us in a timely manner. It was a Tues and slow in the lounge area. So we waited, after realizing they mainly promoted margaritas which was expected I asked about possibly getting a mixed drink and that I had to see what was in it. She walked away returned and right away asked what we wanted to order (this was again, after a decent period of time of her standing around, talking to bartender). So I had water, slugged it down and then she asked if my friend and I would like another water. We said yes, she took the waters, and forgo to get us new ones until I asked. While also a table (3 top) got there food before we did, where we order fifteen minutes prior. I just decided on getting a shrimp dish, which was delicious but super spicy! Salsa was described in menu but I didn't.know it would burn my tastebuds off (lol), so I bagged it up and I could bare eating all of it and wasn't.not waiting on a sweet drink to tame the heat from the salsa. Overall I felt we just hit bad luck with service because it was slow and there was a HUGE lack of personality. 
Have been many times, with good results every time. Sometimes we just do apps and drinks (yum) and other times dinner.  Mexican is very good and a great selection.  American food that I have had is also good.  Service can be slow, but so far not a problem.
We were quoted 25-30 minute wait, waited an hour and ended up sitting in the bar with 7 people. Waited about 20 minutes for our table to even be bussed. They were out of steak, and chimichangas. Probably won't come back. Most awful service I've had in a restaurant in a very long time. 
Steaks, Mexican, salads - it's all good. It's my son's favorite, so we go quite often. Good margaritas. Friendly service. Love the food. Can't go wrong!
We've been going to Chuck's & Margarita's for twenty years, and I have to say that it's always been consistent. You get exactly what you order. The food is good and it can even be very good. I have not eaten too much seafood there, but I am usually very happy with my steak and baked potato. The kids' menu is also good-- a nice variety and the price is reasonable. When UCONN is in session, it can be a long wait for the dining room, but it's always first-come/first-served in the bar. It's very kid-friendly, too, which is really nice. 
Our second trip in a month or so after having been away for many years was really delightful. Some in our party are highly allergic to certain foods and the wait staff was very knowledgable and helpful. The kids had nachos and taco kid meals and the adults indulged in Mexican fare. I had an appetizer called nachos banditos with beef which was enough for two complete meals - very delicious. One of our party had a taco salad which he thoroughly enjoyed and another had enchiladas and reported them as outstanding. 

The service was excellent and the atmosphere is great in an old converted barn. The only complaint is that both times we visited it was very cold. 

I highly recommend this restaurant. 
I've been to Chuck's tuns of times and I've never been disappointed!!! Great food & super yummy margaritas!! Huge selection of everything!! It's great for any and every occasion! But especially fun if you're a group of friends!! 
 Its mother's day and my son also graduated from UConn today. We decided to come here after the ceremony. We made reservations for 8:00pm. We got here at 7:55 and they sat us right away...3rd floor. There are six of us but I'll only cover the issues and not what everyone ordered. Prior to our meals they serve salsa and chips (they were out). With some of our meals came salads. 5 min after we ordered, the waitress came back and told us they are out of lettuce so no salads. 10 min after we ordered, the waitress came back to tell us one of our meals (steak burrito) couldn't be made because they were out of the steak. Really!!! You're out of steak at a steak house!!! Of course I didn't say that, but I was thinking it. An hour later the food shows up. My food, along with three other meals came out luke warm. While I know none of this was the waitresses fault we didn't take our frustration out on her...she was very nice. Should I say this was a bad night for the restaurant or is it always like this? I don't know, because it was my first time here and it was my last. In all my years of eating out, this was a first for me. There were a couple of other issues, but I'm not trying to right a book, just a quick review. The only reason this place even got two stars is because the staff was very friendly. This place has been here since the 70's so they must have done something right at one time. If you decide to eat here, good luck. I hope it goes better for you. There are not many reviews for this place so, I hope my review helps.
There was a 45 minute wait which was fine as we arrived at 6:30 pm on a Saturday night. We were seated in high table/chairs which would not have been an issue except that it was next to the bar where people were waiting to be seated and it got very congested.  We ordered appetizer and dinners. My husband ordered a steak dinner and I got the Salad with steak tips (I asked for romaine lettuce) A second waitress brought out our dinners within 15 minutes, my husbands was okay but mine came out with the wrong dressing and iceberg lettuce.  When we asked about the app's she looked confused. Went back to kitchen came back said the order was never put in. She asked if we still wanted it we said "Yes". We finished our dinner and a third  waitress came to clear the dishes and asked if we wanted desert? I said "Maybe after we get our appetizers". She too looked bewildered and went to see about the app's and said it would be another 15 minutes. We finally got the appetizer one hour later they did take it off the bill but that was not the point. There seemed to be too many inconsistency's, lack of communication between the waitress and the cooks. I would not recommend going until they get there groove on.
Ate there a few months ago and got severe food poisoning.  The food came out cold, wait staff didn't seem to care.  Told manager next day who offered to refund our money and never did.  Called bank to stop payment and bank found in my favor after 3 months of trying to contact the business and never got in touch with anyone.  STAY AWAY FROM THIS PLACE
Interested in the "old fashioned" subway sandwich (filled, filled)? This is the place!!! Friendly staff, well made full sandwiches. Think before you order a foot-long... you may only finish half!!
fresh, clean, nice staff.  would eat another sub here :)

i had the chicken breast sand with honey mustard, i will eat it again :)
167 Baxter Rd, Storrs, Mansfield, CT is not the correct location for the restaurant. That address is for a corporate building!! Don't get fooled like we did!!
The subway restaurant is very close to exit 68 off 84E or there is another location very close to the UCONN campus.
Well-prepared, full of variety, within walking distance to UConn, inexpensive and reliable;
efficient, no long lines
There is not much to say--it's a Subway.  However, the shop is just off the University of Connecticut campus.  It is clean and the staff is quick making your order.
Consistent food and service. Great happy hour menu - apps. big enough to take home, drink specials. Nice country roads to get there.
Upstairs and the third floor are for quit higher quality dining.  Think steaks.  Downstairs is for relaxed bar setting with quick Mexican appetisers and a great bar that is always full.  Fun times.  For a large crowd start in the bar and them move upstairs for dinner and then come back to the bar for the rest of the evening
We were a party of 8 all over 40. Three of us got the petite fillet, each was a different size and all over cooked. Three others ordered from the Mexican menu, their food was cold. After we complained, we were told we couldn't have any thing else from the bar (most only had a couple glasses of wine) (3 of our party weren't drinking). What could have been a festive evening was a complete waste of time and money. This location give "Chucks" chain a bad taste in the mouth.
More on the expensive side.  Waitresses try their best, most of the time.  Some can be snippy.  Very busy when students are here.  The food is good.  
Nice scenic ride to this restaurant that is off all on its own. First floor has a great, cozy bar area - bar seating & tables.  Can't go wrong with steak or Mexican.  Love the taco salad. Upstairs lots of seating, small groups and larger.
Great service. Steak fajitas good. Nice fresh sides. Boyfriend had really nice prime rib. Service excellent. Will be back!
Good service, nice atmosphere and our Mexican dishes were delicious. We forgot about this place.... Need to put it back on our radar. 
Normally I wouldn't rank on a local restaurant, but perhaps we can do something to bring it UPhill again. It used to be pretty good, and back when I first went (more than 20 years ago) it was an oasis. But we hadn't been recently (my son doesn't like Mexican food), and I'd heard from a friend that the place was not what it was. And it isn't.

The good part: the staff was fine, the margarita was excellent and the chips and salsa are tasty and bottomless. Plus, as always, the eating inside a multi-level barn is pretty cool. (Didn't notice the tatty carpets mentioned by others.) The bad part: Oh my goodness ... the food. I had a fish taco, an unhappy elderly spiced baked scrod shoved into the oldest and nastiest excuse for a taco shell I've come across. Really, it tasted like the box, the way old ice cream tastes like the freezer. My wife had some fancy salad that she told me actually contained the lettuce core: that hard crunchy thing attached to the root that's normally composted.
Love their atmosphere and food.  Service can sometimes be slow but for the most part they are good.  If you have a large paty make sure to make reservations and call ahead, sometimes there is an extremely long wait.
Chucks is always good, never a bad meal.  We go there at least once a month.  The wings are outstanding.  The fajitas are always suberb and filling, there is enough food to share and not go hungry.  The atmosphere is great and the wait staff is friendly and attentive.
We've been to Chuck's and Margarita's Grill for many years. We've had good and bad experiences. (ownership changes created some bad experiences) But lately, it's all good!
The Sirloin is always tender and cooked perfectly. Sometimes we get it with the King crab legs which are usually nice and large and tender.
It works out great to have the option to eat Mexican or steaks. Everyone in the family gets a choice. If a salad comes with your meal, it's large and the Tequila lime dressing is the best!
The Mexican fare is average to good. Considering the area - you could say good to excellent. The vegetarian options are well prepared and tasty. The tacos and burritos are well made and tasty also. Awesome Margarita's!
The wait staff have always been pleasant.
We will keep visiting Chuck's - it's our go to for a great steak and Mexican!
We went as a group for a birthday party. We had a private room in the silo which was perfect. We were loud and crazy! The food is excellent.
Took our son (a student at a local university) to an early Sunday dinner.  There are VERY few nice places to go in this area. We were seated quickly, and had a very pleasant waiter.  The restaurant offers two menus,  Chuck's Steak House and Margarittas Mexican.  My husband and I both had cheeseburgers off the Chucks menu.  Daughter had fish tacos, son had Burrito Grande from the Mexican menu.  Everyone was pleased.  We were seated in the upstairs dining room that had a gorgeous cathedral ceiling.  I noticed the carpets were quite worn and our table was hastily wiped down and had a greasy film on it.  What really took me back was the lack of hot water in the restroom sink,no warm, only ice cold- did not want to think about that!! Overall an OK place to go if you are in the Storrs, CT area.
The restaurant is split meat vs. Mexican, which is kind of strange.
I have been to Chuck's many times over the past several years dating back to when I was a kid and always enjoyed it.  Nothing fancy - just good steaks and typical American - Mexican food.  I have noticed over the past few years  the service and the food quality has gone down considerably!!  The Chuck's menu is in great need of an overhaul, the prices are high for the quantity and quality and the selection is uninspired at best.  What Chuck's does do right is how they cook their meat - always cooked over an open flame and always as ordered. When a steak dinner is ordered - you receive a steak and cold potato......during our last visit not only was the potato cold and salad was frozen.  YES - the salad was delivered frozen!!  As soon as the waiter sat it down I could see that my cukes were off-looking.  Upon further inspection the entire salad was frozen - I still do not understand how the waiter was unaware of this by it's appearance!!  What's good about Chuck's - the margarita's are excellent!  The children's sirloin is a good piece of steak at a fair price.  What needs improvement - the Chuck's menu needs more modern offerings and accompaniments with the meat dishes and despite what others say the Mexican menu is far from Mexican....it contains several variations of almost the same things all smothered in sauces that mask the true foods taste.  With so many authentic Mexican restaurants in the area why go there for Mexican!!  Any way you slice it Chuck's is in much need of an overhaul.  The only thing keeping them in business these days is the nearby college crowd!!  Very unfortunate!
Over the last few years this restaurant was inconsistent due to changing hands. Now they seem to be back on track. This is my favorite restaurant and I visit once a week. In my opinion they have the best prime rib in the state on most nights. I also recommend the teriyaki chicken and French onion soup. The fresh chips and salsa are great if you like it spicy! The Chuck's menu items are served with warm rolls, honey butter, choice of starch (twice baked potatoes are amazing), and a salad. They have Interesting salad dressing choices, my favorite being the creamy garlic. The wide variety of Mexican fare is nice as well. I am disappointed that they discontinued the adobo steak, which was my husband's favorite item on the menu. The frozen pina coladas are good. I would also recommend the  pomegranate margaritas on the rocks (they can get a little watery and less flavorful when frozen). This is a fun and lively restaurant with a hoppin' bar downstairs if you are interested in the bar crowd. Because the restaurant is near UConn, the wait staff is inconsistent and possibly slow despending on who you get. You may have to wait on weekend nights, but sometimes they offer to put your name on the list if you call ahead.
I've been to this place too many times to count.  The food is greasy and rather delicious if you like that sort of thing.  Huge margaritas.  I recomend the Nachos and the burgers.  They have a picante chicken dish that is super spicy and good.  Awesome chips and salsa.  Decent mexican fare, I live in San Diego now so I have some realm of comparison.  I took my gf who was born and raised in San Diego here and she said it wasn't too bad for east coast mexican food, which is a huge compliment from her.  Service is decent.  Overall, if you are in the area you can do way worse, and the food will satisfy you.
I used to work at this place while I was in college in the 1980's. Over the years, I would stop in for dinner when I was in the area. I always had a decent, solid, meal.  Nothing super creative, but a good meal. Last week, I had dinner there and had one of the worst meals in my life. I had a super burrito. It was covered in sour, lumpy, red sauce, and hadheaps of chopped raw onion and tomato.  When the server asked if I was enjoying it, I asked if it normally came heaped with (I mean, like 3-4 cups) of salsa cruda. "Yup," I was told. End of discussion. He could have cared less.

Indifferent service. Icky, uninspired food that we had to wait over 30 minutes for on a night with few diners.

I would not recommend the Mexican menu - maybe the Chuck' s menu is better?
This restaurant has gone down hill over the last two decades...The drinks are overpriced, and the food is very average. Best bet is the fajita platters,they are still very good. Servers are typically very slow. Family crowd upstairs, middle aged bar scene, with the occasionally light-drinking younger crowd
Food has gone downhill over the last 5 years or so.
The staff was so friendly here!  Everything was fresh!  My McGriddle was so perfect looking I almost didn't want to bite into it!  Bathrooms were very clean.  Great experience here while traveling.
McDonalds is McDonalds.
Tasty and fast.Staff has always been good.
Food is consistent wth evry other McDonalds out there.
A quick stop for my son did the trick as we hopped off the interstate on our way to NYC without much time.  Quick and well prepared pancakes.
Bring back the classic crispy chicken!  After all the hype about the Buttermilk Chicken Sandwich, we decided to try it.  What a disappointment!  It was so overcooked that it was hard, dry and difficult to chew.  There was a funny taste to it and it just was not a good meal at all.  They should also warn that it is spicy as I have a family member who does not like spicy foods and just couldn't eat it because of the spices..

The classic crispy chicken sandwich that they used to serve was delicious, so if this is going to be the replacement for that sandwich, McDonald's should consider discontinuing this buttermilk sandwich right away and bringing back the classic sandwich.

As far as this particular McDonald's, we had to wait quite a while for them to cook our sandwiches and there was only one other customer at the time.  Also consider avoiding this location at rush hour (we were there at 5PM) because there is so much traffic going both directions on the road that it took quite a while just to get out of the parking lot--obviously not their fault--but just be warned because of the location you will have a difficult time getting out of the parking lot during high traffic periods.

The best things I can say about this location is that the restaurant seemed to be clean and the counter person did take our order right away even though it seemed to take forever to cook a meal that just wasn't pleasing.

I would not order this Buttermilk sandwich again.
We arrived after 7 pm on a Friday night. They only had one person working the front while everyone else was concentrating on the Drive Thru. 

Finally, an additional person arrived to ring us up. They argued with my husband regarding his ice tea.  They tried serving it in a soda cup when every other McDonald's serves it in a Styrofoam cup. 

Tables are sticky and haven't been wiped down. They need more staff.
2 shakes please
Would you like whipped cream and a cherry?
Yes please
Drive to the next window

Where are the cherries
We don't have any

Good shakes but really?????
Excellent Whopper, good service but the men's room, according to my husband, left a lot to be desired.
Right across the street from this Burger King there is a McDonalds, so there are options when one is in this part of town for fast food.  The location is right off the highway, so I sometimes stop here for breakfast on the way to work or when we are heading home.  It is easier to get back on the highway from the Burger King and not the McDonalds because one can turn right out of the entrance and not have to contend with traffic in both directions like McDonalds has.  This is probably why the various bus lines stop at this location so often.

There isn’t anything fancy about this location and it is a typical Burger King.  It could really do a lot more in improving the cleanliness of the eating area to make it look better.  But ultimately, it is a convenient location for us as we travel back from the mall.

The food was typical fast food and was really good, although a bit too salty for me.  But most importantly, the kids got something quick to eat so they would be less cranky.
If you like spicy (or less spicy) Thai food this family-owned restaurant is the place to order (not necessarily to go). It's a very small restaurant with just 3-4 tables, but the food is excellent. We've ordered food there scores of time, and it's always very good.
Ordered food for take out , as my husband entered, an exiting customer asks, have you been here before?  You're going to love it! Well!
-Appetizer
-Fried Veggie Dumpling, very greasy!  Need to dry off. Sauce with it was good. Would not order again
-Dinner
-Pad Thai- have had this numerous times before. Noodles were not cooked enough, tough. maybe that's there style 
-Pine nut Chicken with vegetables. Looked like everything including pineapple put in. Way too much sauce. Could have called it soup
-My husband asked if spicy dishes could be made with less spice, answer no. Never heard that before. All other places are so accommodating to the level of spice. No sure we will go back!!!
This small establishment sits next to a hair salon in Wayland just down the street from Whole Foods.  An open cooking area lets you watch them prepare your freshly made choices.  I've found that the employees are very friendly and helpful with suggestions.  The building is old and shows signs of wear but you can always order the food "to go"
A small local place. Great change from ho hum Chinese in the burbs. They also deliver which is awesome.   The curry's are great. Not that when they say spicy they mean it!  Can accommodate requests to dial it up or down. Solid recommendation
There is the world's tiniest sign letting you know that you're about to miss the entrance for the best Thai food in the Framingham area. This small location seats a handful along the bar where you can watch the open kitchen (you can see the flames from across the restaurant!) or you can grab one of the small number of tables. The seafood is fresh, the veggies crisp, the service fantastic, but don't forget to ask about dessert: we enjoyed handmade coconut ice cream as well as sticky rice with mango. The shrimp himaparn is the best by far in the entire area, and I'm grateful as the owner of a geriatric dad that the shrimp have the tails removed. I can't wait to go back! The only drawback is that it took me 10 minutes to decide what I wanted, because it all looks so amazing. After trying three dishes, I know there is no way to go wrong.
This little place has curious charm with style best described as practical.  Certainly better for take-out than date night out.

Most of the cooking is done behind a narrow counter on one side of the restaurant with workers of all ages scurrying to prepare and pack take-out orders.

The only feature of the table area is a fish tank, and the tables and chairs seem from the old Building 19 stores.

The Thai food is fine and the portions and prices on the reasonable side. 

Good for a local, take-out place and an itch for Pad Thai.


Spice & Pepper is our favorite delivery restaurant in the Wayland area.  When the Work Day was too much and no energy is left to cook, we open the Spice & Pepper menu, and have never been disappointed.  Snow in January or a nice evening in June, great food!  We ordered again this evening, and the quality was amazing -- again.

Our favorites: fresh garden rolls, scallion pancakes, edamame, short ribs, Siamese fried rice, jumbo shrimp in Prik-King sauce, hot beef platter, grilled chicken in jungle curry and jade noodles.  Their delivery team has also been very friendly, no matter the weather or time of day / night.

Great food and service!

Mark
It's not in the prettiest location, but my lunches at Spice & Pepper have been consistently excellent.  It's usually nearly empty, but I keep hoping word of its tasty cuisine will spread.
I go often and love the food and atmosphere! The seafood and authentic cuisines are fabulous, with a friendly and welcoming family feel. Several smiling children play as family prepared food. I love the crispy chicken Pad Thai and any of the seafood dishes are always fresh with a local flavor that I often crave! I highly recommend this place for quick takeout. Eating in is also unique no liquor or beer but a wonderful place to sit and enjoy a wonderful meal with a friendly crew.
Nice little family run restaurant. We used to go frequently with the family. Very small, with a fish tank, and a little window, but nice atmosphere and people. Also done take-out a few times.
My daughters and I love this place.  The food is always freshly made and is delicious.
Great glass noodle pad thai and fabulous scallion pancakes.  A can't miss choice!
This is a small family run business in what appears to be an old diner. Zero ambiance, fabulious food. Thai restaurants are our favorites, no matter where we are we seek out a Thai restaurant. The best ever was in, believe it or not,  Rangeley Maine, now closed as tbe owner had retired. This is our second favorite.
Regular take-out place for our family. Favs are Chicken PadThai, Scallion Pancakes; ShuMai; Chicken Wings
healthy options delivered to your door.  The restaurant is small and not very private and does not serve wine so the take out works.
The food is absolutely delicious here.  The staff is very friendly and they get all of the food out quickly.  We especially like the scallion pancake with a green curry sauce, the short ribs, the yellow curry, and any of the seafood dishes.  We try new things each time and we have never had anything bad from here.  Also, if you're a fan of bubble tea, it's really good here.
the food is great, the service is great and if you have the time sit down and eat.  It is fun just watching them cook.  Do a big take out business. Love there Miso soup.
Good take out. Tiny seating area, but tasty food for basic Thai fare. I highly recommend the pistachio chicken.
Do take out most of the time but have heard the in dining experience is even better.  We have our family favorites.  Recommend the country chicken basil and Shrimp Pad Thai
The food is very good, and I would imagine this is what a homemade mom's food would be like in a Thai family?  The service is great, take-out is quick, and prices reasonable (at least in Wayland).  One of my goto places.

The eat-in area isn't so well polished but it's fun to stop in with the family.  Very friendly staff and they take custom orders.  Of course, they have the take-out down solid.

The driveway is a bit difficult to reach, and parking can get busy sometime.  They have never kept me away from this place however.
Food is excellent especially if you like spicy Thai food. Service average, just do not expect 5 star service. Its not a big place, around 6 tables, mainly take out. 
Four out of five stars for their sushi. It's good but not as good as Oishii, Lotus Blossom, or Fukakyu in nearby Sudbury.
Love this place, happy its right across the street from me! Its normally pretty quiet so you can go right in. I love their sushi the OMG is my favorite but all the special rolls are amazing. I would go here for the sushi specifically but the other entrees can be great. Drinks are really worth the price so I normally just go with the sake or a beer. Good spot for a quick meal. Service is always great!
Nice interior.  Waitstaff difficult to understand due to oriental dialect.  Tremendous menu selection.  Food was fresh and meals were hot and presentation was nice, but in our party of 4, only one person was happy with quality.  That person had sushi.  The others had hot meals.  We tried this place based on recommendation.  Our regular sushi resturant is far superior.  Sorry, but won't be back here again
I've only been there for lunch but the food has always been perfectly prepared and delicious.  The prices are reasonable and the wait staff have been polite and attentive. I had a salmon dish with broccoli and rice and it was served with a nice seer on the salmon and a Asian sauce.  My friends all agreed that it was a fun experience and that the food was very good and the selection was extensive.  I have not tried the sushi but maybe the next visit I'll give it a go!!
We've been here several times and have always received outstanding food and service. I've tried many Japanese restaurants in metro-west but Takara is now my favorite place. They have a great selection of sushi bar specials and I can't get enough of the spicy tuna roll. The food is a little pricey but definitely worth it. Who needs to drive into Boston when there's such a great sushi restaurant here in Wayland.
I live very close to this restaurant, and I almost always eat out. This is my "go to" place, so I am a regular. For me to like a place and go there a couple times a week requires a comfortable atmosphere, friendly service, and a menu from which I can always find something adventurous or comforting, depending on my mood. They have all of these.

What they're doing here, in my opinion, is Asian-American fusion. The maki/tempura/sushi rolls all seem to have an elements of american tastes, like spicy aiolis and such.I sit at the bar (part sushi bar, part liquor bar) near the suchi chefs and watch the beautiful dishes as they prepare them. The presentations are fantastic, as expected in a fine sushi spot I also have had the Okdol (hot pot) Bibimbab which was terrific, and the Terriyaki Beef is a nice meal if you're not in the mood for sushi. I have to mention the Lychee Martini I often have - yum!. Prices are fine, service at the bar is top-notch. A terrific salt-water aquarium is a centerpiece of the restaurant. Lovely place!
Not only is the sushi quality right up there, but the presentation is inventive and fun, incorporating interesting lighting into the dishes.  The variety is as good as any of the other sushi places, pricing is competitive and parking is convenient as well.  Service staff was very pleasant and accommodating as well.
What a wonderful treat to have Takara's in Wayland center.  It's a solid Sushi restaurant that is perfect for the community.  The food is top-notch, the restaurant is meticulously clean, the service is very attentive and friendly, and the price is reasonable.  We keep coming back for more. 

It's fun to sit on the bar as there are big screen TVs.  They have sectioned the restaurant into three areas. Bar, main dining area, and a quieter space towards the front.  I pick the bar for a date, dining area for friends, and the front for family.  I think they really thought it through as they knew there would be mixed audience here.

Lunch menu is totally awesome.  It's also family friendly.  Try the spicy bulgogi and of course the sushi.
Just an average Japanese Restaurant. Not bad, and not outstanding. I go there because of its location, not many Japanese restaurant around.
Takara has a nice neighborhood feel to it and the food is reliable and tasty.  The wait staff is pleasant and professional.
The service is excellent and the presentation of the dishes is outstanding.  There is a huge variety of dishes available.  Their sashimi and sushi are very fresh.The decor is really nice with a lovely aquarium and a wall-mounted "firebox".  There is plenty of parking.
I have been in the mood for sushi for weeks now. We decided to make a date night out of it, but our usual place is off of MA2 and it was rush hour. I looked up sushi on Yelp and found this restaurant nearby, and I'm so glad I did. A very nice, mellow Japanese restaurant in a suburban shopping center, Takara is easy to get to and has plenty of parking. 

There is plenty of seating in the restaurant, but we always love to sit at the sushi bar when going to get sushi. There long bar is half and half if you also just want to sit at the bar and watch some sports with a large Sapporo. They have an /extensive/ sake menu. I opted for the hot sake because it's my favorite, but I will for sure be going back to try some of their other selections. 

We started off with edamame and decided on the Sushi/Sashimi combo. This was plenty for the two of us, but we really, really love sushi, so we decided to also try a specialty roll.  Did I mention the sushi chef made gave us a crab salad just to try while we waited? It was all amazing.

I will have to say the salmon sashimi was subpar. I didn't get as much flavor as I usually like from it. However, the tuna, yellow tail, and mackerel were on point, especially the mackerel. The specialty roll had tuna and a bit of a spicy sauce to add a kick, but it didn't overpower the roll so I couldn't taste the tuna. The crab salad had mangos in it, which I normally would cringe at, but I loved it! 

Now onto the service. It was quick, friendly, and funny. What I mean by that is the sushi chefs joked along with us every so often. (They tried not to laugh too much at us when our chopstick skills faltered.) I expect the gentleman behind the bar was either the bar manager, restaurant manager, or owner. It doesn't really matter who he was to us because he made our experience there even more enjoyable. He was very helpful explaining anything on the menu we asked questions about and made us laugh on multiple occasions. 

I will be going back.
We have been here numerous times since it opened & have never been disappointed.  The restaurant is on the small side, however, its very modern and has an interesting selection of sushi, korean food etc.  I look forward to going here!
The service was satisfying, the food was just right but not enough if you have a big appetite & the ambience  is perfect  for a small crowd/party .Very cozy & a place just to eat relax  drink after a busy day.
We had dinner at Takara in Wayland, Massachusetts, one of several of its locations in the area.  They have a comprehensive Japanese menu with Sushi and Sashimi featured.  Both variations have to be fresh, fresh, fresh and Takara meets that standard.  The other Japanese and Korean items are also prepared authentically.  Service was quite attentive.  This was our first visit and we will definitely be back again to try more items like Teriaki, Tempura and Katsu.  There is plenty of free parking adjacent to the restaurant as it is located in a shopping center.
We have dined here many times since the opening. Several times I have ordered the OMG roll, which has been quite good, with several different fishes and caviars and an eel type of sauce. Recently I ordered the roll and it came sitting in a bed of chocolate sauce - Yes - that's right - a CHOCOLATE sauce.  I could not eat it. I did not want my money back or anything, but wanted to let the restaurant know that the sushi chef must have made a mistake and used the wrong bottle. They insisted that it was intentional - for design purposes, but if that is the case, then what a mistake. The sushi naturally sits in the design.  Chocolate and raw fish do NOT go together. Very disappointing that they would not be accountable, especially since we have been regulars. I prefaced my complaint by saying I was not looking for my money back or anything. I don't plan to go back. If you do go, try the bibimbob or sashimi instead. I would have given this restaurant a higher review even a few months ago, but I think it is not as good as it was then, and I was very disappointed after this particular visit. Waitstaff is nice and tries hard.
The Best!

As many folks on here I'm a sushi connoisseur and can be a foodie.  Takara delivers a great diversity of Asian cuisines and does so with impeccable service.  They are particularly great with small children.  The staff is exceptionally attentive and take a 'team approach' to serving, everyone is your server not just one of them.

When toro is available I highly recommend it! It has to be one of the most generous cuts of this particular cut of tuna that I have ever seen.

Highly recommended!
When I want the best Sashimi, Sushi, drinks and service, Takara is THE place in the Metro west. I do not understand even the few reviews of people who say otherwise.  fortunately, the positive reviews outnumber any off ones and with very good reason.  I've been eating sushi for many many years and while others are good, this is the best around hands down and I'm not kidding.  By the way, those who criticize the soup for being salty?...Miso is the primary soup here and sodium is one of the primary ingredients in miso.  That's like saying my sushi has too much fish - sillyness.  The sashimi deluxe is my absolute favorite and prepared with a flair and originality and variety that cannot be beat. Try one of the house sushi rolls or the Okdol Bibimbab served in a hot bowl.  Bowls soaked in water and then slowly brought to high temperature that make these bowls sing! These Korean inspired sizzling bowls give off a wonderful toasty scent and regulars devour the contents. You will want to order one when you see, hear and smell one.  You don't need to be a Sushi connoisseur to sit a the sushi bar either.  The sushi chefs welcome you and will take care of you.  No pretenses here. They serve late here too and the crowd continuously passes thorough on this quiet off the beaten path location.  I've been there on practically every night of the week and its varied from quiet to packed and waiting.  Jackie who runs the place, is teeming with genuine personality - kind, knowledgeable and an engaging presence, who will leave an impression on you, I promise.  If you like sushi and the dishes that surround the art, this will quickly become your go-to-place.  GO and you will become a regular.
There are many choices for Japanese cuisine, and I would not put Takara in the top 10.  The soups are salty to the point of inedible, and the sushi is maybe a 5 out of 10.  Not surprisingly, the restaurant is usually empty, and the ambiance is not worth the trip.  Pricing is on the high side, and there's really no draw.  Fugakyu is just a few miles down Route 20 and is a MUCH better choice, particularly if you're in the mood for a noodle soup.
It's a good surprise, believe me. I have experiences bad surprises at sushi before, but Takara is such a lovely place. Plenty of parking, kind staff, gorgeous setting, lot of fresh sashimi as well as Korean dishes. Very reasonable prices, including udon and bento box specials. There are also some fun cocktails such as Asian pear martinis and lychee. I'm planning on some udon and the ginger martini next time, and there will be a next time.
Arrived at 1:25 pm, business was slow at this time.
Waiter was very attentive , we ordered of lunch menu , salad came first and was fresh.
Main dishes arrived quickly and were accurate . 
First visit this local, would recommend for anyone , solo, pair , children 
Food was great, service was also real good!
Clean throughout.  
Meal was good and our server was very attentive. This is a great neighborhood restaurant and easy to get to from our Wayland home.
Was here for a rehearsal dinner.  Food was great!  Great flavor.  The servers were great.  They must do a thorough screening process when hiring.  Very conscientious group, polite, caring, etc.  Highly recommend this restaurant!!!  Just a great evening from service to food.
Alex on the phone told me the pick up order would take 35-45 minutes. The pizza took one hour and 15 minutes, and the pizza was overcooked and prepared poorly.

I ordered a half puccillo and all of the green peppers were on two of the slices, and half sporkie in which some of the slices had no ricotta, one slice had only cheese. Careless pizza maker did a lazy job distributing the ingredients!

Really stressful disappointing experience. Bad branch. The Bertuccis in Framingham has relatively consistent pies, but Wayland drops the ball with their carry out I'd say one out of every three pizzas. 

I'd opt for delivery next time but fear it would take the length of watching the Titanic movie to finally get my pizza!  Bu Bye Berties!
Short wait at dinner time. Located in a plaza right off route 20. Waitress was very friendly and professional. Food was flavorful and delicious. Better than other Bertucci's In the area. Chicken scampi was great! 
Food not consistently good or well prepared.  Had to return meal recently (well steak served as rare and returned burnt) and could have returned (cold eggplant pomodoro) meal another time. The other diner's meals were fine. There is a new manager who, hopefully, will improve food preparation.  He seems to have made the dining room warmer.  Friendly wait staff and assistant manager --  so much so we will give it another try.
This location is perfect for a place to get a quick bite to eat.  We come often to get a hot bowl of soup, fresh salad, and pasta.  The warm bread that keeps coming to the table is a sensuous treat.  You can dip your warm bread in the herb flavored olive oil or add butter.  This location has loads of parking and you can easily get on and off Boston Park Road.
We were at the Wayland farmers market today and thought about grabbing a quick slice of pizza there. Then, instead decided to have a warm and cozy lunch at Bertucci's. It was a good choice. We warmed up and had a good lunch. I recommend that you try them for lunch.
Normally you know what to expect with Bertucci's - but this fairly small one room location in Wayland seems to be off the mark a bit.  The service was ok, not overly friendly. The layout of the place is odd - there are no "man traps" for the doors - which allows cold air to come rushing in everytime someone opens the door and it also seems to be a health violation as flies can easily come in too.  The food was just OK - had to return meatballs that were burnt - they even smelled burnt when they came to the table. There was no problems on returning them, although they came back with less meatballs then we ordered.  Probably won't be going back to this particular Bertucci's anytime soon.
Good food, good location, always fun to casually stop by.  Unfortunately, those qualities are tainted by the design layout of the restaurant and the service that never seems to get better.

Layout: It's awkward.  The entryway is confusing as there is a pickup area and easy-to-ignore hostess desk.  The guests never seem to know where to stand or wait for the table.  and most of the time people don't realize if they are waiting for the table or the pickup.  Then, you have to go through this tiny narrow pass to enter the main dining area, and that's where all the waitstaff are picking up and preparing the orders. it's dangerous, crowded, and uncomfortable.

Once you are seated, it's pretty good.  I do feel like the center tables are a bit close, and the back of the chairs touch, but it hasn't been too troublesome.

Service: This is the area they really need help.  I understood when they originally opened where the staff was inexperienced and the service was slow.  The waitstaff now seems to be capable, very friendly, and work very hard, but the quality of service never improved.  Reason?  I think they are WAY UNDERSTAFFED!!   The management has to take note.  

Most of the time, the hostess isn't in the front, it is so hard to get the attention of the waitstaff, the food occasionally comes out cold, drinks take forever to be served, and the bread and water rarely get attention. So often the food comes in funny intervals, say appetizers appearing with or after entrees.  

I feel horrible writing this because the people there work hard, but this really need to improve.  The residents here do not have many options so I am sure they will fill the tables, but eventually this will catch up.
 One of my old favorite local chains disappointed me last night on my birthday!   Kitchen was slow, food was unremarkable, Service OK.   A 10 buck "extra pour" seemed like a regular glass of wine.   I had the Cajun pasta and it came with a few shrimp a few lumps of chicken and sausage  and a fairly flavorless sauce. 
Bertucci's standard food with good pricing level. Only thing is it seems like they are always understaffed. Servers are extremely busy even though they tried to be very nice and all smile. 
We used to like the Wayland Bertucci and go there often for lunch.  One month ago, we went for lunch around 2 pm and we were unpleasantly surprised to see the change.  We had to wait 10 minutes until somebody came from the kitchen and took us to a table.  The restaurant was unspeakably dirty and the service of our waitress was terrible.  "i think that you wanted salad...  I forgot...",  "We cannot make your drinks because our blender  is broken...", etc.  The food was very poorly prepared.  The people at the table next to us returned their meals.  We did not dare to try this Bertucci for a month.  We went last Tuesday (September 1) around 2:20 pm.  Most tables have not been cleaned.  The only waitress working was the one we were trying to avoid.  We waited more than 15 minutes for someone to clean a table and take us there.  Nobody came and we left.  We went to Bertucci in Framingham and we had an extremely pleasant experience.  We assume that theWayland branch lost its manager or that the chain has decided to close the Wayland branch.  Avoid the Wayland Bertucci at any price!  If you like Bertucci go to Framingham, Wellesley or Lexington.
Good pizza, good pasta, a full bar and nice servers.  Nothing really stands out at this local chain, and nothing wrong at all.  Not cheap though...
The food and service was excellent. They have lunch specials for $7.99 which includes rolls and salad. Good variety to choose from, especially the flat bread pizza.
Pizza is usually of very good quality.  The pizza verde is our favorite with arugula and a balsamic dressing.  Shrimp entrees are also quite good.  Wines offered are well selected and reasonably priced.  Staff is friendly, helpful and efficient.  Noise levels are average.
I am sure I had a different experience than other reviewers! Food was predictably good as was the service. A regional chain, they don't have the menu depth or creativity of a national chain, but our service was excellect, selection good, prices reasonable (other than wines), and quality just fine. I would return without hesitation.
I've been here about 5 times for lunch, most recently for a 2:30 lunch on a Monday afternoon.  They serve pizza, pasta, etc and the food is usually hot and very good.   I've come back a number of times over the last few years even though I've never had good service because I keep thinking that Bertucci's is a good chain restaurant with good service, and in general, this is true.  However, this restaurant has some of the worst service I've ever experienced.   I've had to ask for water 2-3 times over a 10 minute period (restaurant was empty, not sure why it was so hard to get a single glass of water),  and I've had to ask numerous times for the check (again, restaurant was empty).  Today, our meal was interrupted because the waitress wanted to clear our salad bowls and bread plates, which we had out on the far side of the table and she wanted to clear, so we had to stop our conversation and put down our knives and forks to pass her the plates and bowls  I don't understand why the service is so bad at this location because that has not been my experience with other Bertucci's.   If you feel like having pizza or pasta for a good price and have plenty of time and patience, give it a try.  Will I go back?  I'll probably try it again in 2016.
Was excited when Bertucci's arrived in Plymouth, Ma. Before it became a corporate chain it was great. Not anymore! Pizza used to be the best. Loved the Silano but it was terribly disappointing. Tasteless entrees and even the rolls are ordinary. It's more like cafeteria food. Wouldn't return. Too many better Italian restaurants around. 
We like to visit this Bertucci's because of its location. We enjoy the food at this chain but with this new location, this is our new favorite.
Found the side salad to be very good but the pizza was just so so. Did not have much of a taste and yet it had two items on it.
We have slowly been trying out the steak houses near where we live. The TripAdvisor reviews for this restaurant were favorable so we decided to eat here. This was an excellent idea. The food was excellent. We shared the hot spinach and artichoke dip appetizer. The chips are actually too fragile to use directly, so we used forks to load them. Very nice taste. Steak house--what to eat? The filet mignon, of course. My wife had the small filet with sauce Bearnaise, roasted sweet potato, and asparagus. I tried the alternate bacon-wrapped filet with caramelized onion, baked potato, and seasonal veggies (carrots, squash, sweet red peppers, broccoli). We ordered that steaks medium-rare; they were cooked near the rare edge of that range which is just how we like it. Service was prompt. Our waiter (Shane) was extremely helpful to my wife in selecting a wine. After some samples, she decided on an Argentine Malbec, The Show. (Her cocktail, Scarlet O, was quite good). We were so full we were only able to share a dessert--Richardson's vanilla ice cream with hot fudge and whipped cream. Richardson's is a local (Littleton, MA) ice creamery that has its own herd of dairy cows. All very good. We will be back.  Would it be good for kids? Depends upon how sophisticated and patient they are. The hamburger night might be a good time to take them.
Nice bar and plenty of restaurant seating. Food generally good -- mix of surf and turf. One downside -- if they are still holding $15 Prime Rib Wednesday -- the cuts were quite fatty and left behind -- reducing it's bargain status.
Decor is attractive. Handicap accessible. Attentive host and staff. Good parking in back
I have been here several times, and while I won't call the food exceptional, is it very good, reliable, with a slightly upscale atmosphere, and a good bar, if that's your choice vs. a table.
Monday night is a great time to eat at this restaurant. Burgers are $5.00 with the purchase of a drink. The quality is excellent and the service is friendly.
We recently moved to the area.  I've driven by Prime 131 multiple times on my way to work but finally stopped in to try it out last night after another local couple recommended it.  I'm glad we did.  At first I was a little dismayed because the parking lot appeared to be almost full.  I was wondering if we would get in.  However once we entered, the place was busy but there were still tables available as well as seats at the bar.  My wife and I are primarily Bar eaters.  We like the service at the bar.  This one was no different.  We were cordially greeted by both bartenders and they took our drink orders right away. Both bartenders checked on us regularly too.  The menu was very appealing and we had heard that the Wednesday night Roast beef special was good.  My wife is a big fan of Roast beef so she didn't even have to look at the menu (although she did just to see what else they had) I got the steak tips.  My steak tips were delicious.  They were cooked as I ordered (medium rare) and very tender.  My wife's Roast Beef was also very good. We also got an app.  The zucchini sticks were HUGE.  We ended with desert which was a brownie sundae.  That too was very good.  I walked out stuffed.  We will definitely be back now that we know about this place.
Living in the area, there are few decent places to go for a steak without mortgaging your soul. So when my college roommate and his wife called to  go to PRIME 131 (formerly PrimeBar) for PRIME RIB night...BING! I was in!
The restaurant itself is your typical steak place atmosphere--low lights, booths, overstuffed banquets. A place for the whole family--from the kids to the grandparents.
Our server JENN was a joy! Friendly, fun, right there when you needed her. Oh btw, when you try the Texas Cosmo watch out---STRONG but yummy. One should be enough.
PRIME RIB NIGHT is not to be missed! A great dinner for only $15.95...BUT while supplies last. When they are out, they are out! The portions are spot on and the prime rib was wonderful.
Now I know I didn't have steak...this time. But YOU KNOW I'm goin' back...and then it will be STEAK!
Apparently this restaurant has been here for about 5 years, after the demise of Luigi's.  Decided to give it a try for my birthday instead of the usual -  Wildwood or Capital Grille.  What a great find!!  The filet mignon was excellent as were the mashed potatoes and the squash medley (which I am usually not  a great fan of.)  My husband had the crab cakes which he said were excellent -  mostly crab meat.  The $1 oysters and shrimp were a great choice for an appetizer.  Will be back to try the $5 burgers on Monday nights and the $15.99 prime rib on Wednesdays.  Added bonus was a glass of wine for $7.50 instead of the usual $9-$11 at the other places. The waitress, Katie was great.
Always dependable providing caring service, great food, and reasonable prices. We always get a nice booth providing privacy and comfort. Easy to find parking at a convenient location.
 The burgers are good here and a special deal in Monday nights.  Have had their prime rib special on Wednesday night and was not wowed.  
We come here fairly regularly for casual dinner. Their steak is great and not so expensive. We do not know why people go to steakhouses. 

I also really enjoy their crab cakes. 
Stopped by a couple of days ago on our first visit. Very pleasant atmosphere and the scallops were delicious! Our server was attentive without being annoying. Want to return to check out another selection.
Monday they have a special on burgers for $5.00 and they are very very good. Wednesday they have a prime rib special that you may look into. The rack of lamb is the best in town.
Last time I ate here it was a great Italian restaurant called Luigi's. Apparently 5 years ago it became Prime 131. As the name implies, the meat is prime I guess. Our group ordered filet mignons and ribeyes and all were cooked as ordered, tender and juicy. Good sides, appetizer choices, and desserts as well. I highly recommend the blueberry bread? pudding topped with vanilla ice cream and caramel sauce dessert. The spinach and artichoke dip was more than enough for four! Service was also very good. 
Had intended to go with family to Luigi's in Wayland, Mass. However, Luigi's sleeps with the fishes. Restaurant now deals with prime meats. Made reservations for four for 6:30pm. Had a delightful server, Aphrodite. No wine ordered. Only beer and tea. Split an artichoke dip with spinach. Wives ordered filet mignon and we men ordered 16 oz rib eyes with baked potatoes. All four meals were excellent and service was also. We all were so stuffed that my wife and I split a key lime pie. Meal tab was reasonable for what we ordered. Highly recommended but still need something Italian to eat.
Our family all went here for Burger night. We all ordered burgers and drinks. They always live up to our expectations. This is a must try.
I have been to the Prime a number of times and have enjoyed their Monday and Wednesday specials of $5 hamburgers and $16 prime rib, respectively.  On Mondays, oysters and large shrimp are also $1/each. So, what you save on the burgers, you can quickly consume eating shellfish. In addition to the specials being a "good deal," they are also very good quality. Other choices from the regular menu, to the extent that I have sampled them, all seem fine, consistent with a moderate priced family restaurant.  I have ordered their goat cheese and spinach salad nearly every time I have been there and have enjoyed it a lot, though it is a bit pricey. Calamari gently cooked and very good.
Our party of four arrived early, around 6pm and were seated promptly. The waiter brought water and served wine promptly, but then vanished for about 15 minutes until we had him  flagged down. We started with a sample trio $13.99, zucchini sticks, brussel sprouts & fried calamari. Nothing outstanding here, we thought the fried batter was heavy. Two of us then ordered the Land & Sea,  a 6 oz. filet with baked stuffed shrimp, served with seasonal vegetables & your choice of potato or rice pilaf. The steak was very good and properly cooked. The shrimp was the worst I've ever had, completely overcooked with a very unappetizing stuffing. My wife tried it and said it was horrific. We also tried a cheese burger, which was very tasty and nicely prepared. But the french fries were extremely salty, readily noticed as one of the diners was rubbing off the salt before consuming her fries. The service was poor, we wondered if the waiter was new, untrained or both. We had to ask him to remove the appetizer tray, he never removed the appetizer dishes, had to be flagged down to remove the dinner dishes, and seemed inattentive. The best we can offer Prime is three stars, and we're unlikely to return.
I want your last night with a couple of my friends for dinner. They both ordered the prime rib and I ordered large fillet. We were all extremely impressed and this was the first time I ever went on prime rib night. The rice pilaf was exceptional. I expected something very ordinary and loved it. Can't wait to go back as usual.
Loved Prime 131!  We were looking to go to a different spot saw it was closed drove by this restaurant and wondered if we should try it.  We did and were so pleasantly surprised!  The dining room is welcoming and cozy - our server, Jane, was pleasant and efficient, effortlessly accommodating the busy dining room.  The food was GREAT!  I feel like I discovered a well kept secret in the burbs!
We were a party of 6.  Reservations were easy to make online.  We were seated quickly at 7:30 PM.  It was a fun Monday evening during Spring Vacation.  We all had cheeseburgers and fries.  

The location is perfect for people who want to meet.  It is a nice half-way point on Boston Post Road in Wayland.  The service is great and the cheeseburgers were cooked to perfection.
We've been using this small restaurant off Route 20 in Wayland for takeout food for many years. It's always been very tasty (if you like Chinese food), no matter what we ordered. The best Chinese food in the area.
We've been getting Chinese take-out from here since we moved to Wayland 16 years ago.  It is an upscale restaurant but perhaps with a design that's a bit claustrophobic and the tables always seem empty.

The food has always been good, dependable Chinese from a pretty standard menu selection.  Prices are on the higher end for take-out but suited to this higher end establishment and packaged and bagged with that little extra style you would expect from a nicer restaurant.  

In many ways, Water Lily fits Wayland very well.
Have eaten here for years.  Always consistent quality, always pleasant service.  Never had a bad meal, really appreciate the no msg and the delightful taste of their dishes.
You never can tell what you're going to get in a tiny strip-mall setting. In the case of Water Lilly, it's "the best of everything." It's a small restaurant, very conducive for friends to meet and share a meal. The food and service are excellent. The people are very friendly. The prices might be a tad high, but then again so is the quality of each dishes ingredients. Best of all, being next to Whole Foods, there's plenty of parking. And for what it's worth: this place has been at this location for many years. That's saying something, in these days of constant turnover.
So happy to have the small but sister location to Lotus Blossom.  The food is very very good, and you cannot go wrong.  They do not deliver, but they have the pick-up fine-tuned to perfection.

They have a calm, quiet dining areas too, so I recommend eating there as well.  Small location but attentive fast service.  Good place.  
While not inexpensive, the food is always excellent, prepared quite differently from your regular Chinese food.
Average food for way above average prices. Good hot and sour soup and moo shu pork. Salt and Pepper Shrimp was disappointing. Instead of fried jumbo shrimp they were slices of shrimp so the dish was mostly just the fried part. They have no regular spare ribs, only boneless. And the prices were quite high for a Chinese restaurant. Dinner for three came to about $100. 
We love the food at Water Lily, and have been quite often, usually for takeout.  The best chinese food we have ever had.  We have eaten in the restaurant half a dozen times, and found the atmosphere very pleasant, and the service excellent.  Highly recommended!
This is my husband's favorite restaurant in Wayland.  I like it but could not honestly give it better than an average rating.  Unfortunately I've just eaten in too many other excellent restaurants around the world.  It is convenient for take out.  The food is tasty and the service is very fast.  We eat here often when we want a quick dinner.
Never had a problem until this last time we ate at Lotus Flower in Framingham (the sister co.) which was January 3rd 2015.  Me and my two boys got violently ill and were taken to Newton/Wellesley Hospital two hours after eating for severe food poisoning.  I spoke with Emily who works at Lotus Flower the next day to let her know what had happened at which time she offered us a gift card from the restaurant.  Will NEVER go back because of what we went through.  I reported this incident to the Framingham Board of Health.
We love going to the Water Lily. Their Chinese food is excellent and the service is exceptional. It's a great local eatery close to our home in Wayland.
I have tried just about every Chinese restaurant in my area in the past and they ranged from horrible to ehhh...recently I tried Water Lily and it is by far the best in the area if not one of the best I have had anywhere I have lived.

The food tastes very fresh, is well cooked, the service is awesome and on time.  The siomi, which is hard to find around here, is awesome !  Well recommended
there are very few restaurants that I feel comfortable and relaxed in. Water Lily is one of them. When I want a nice quiet father daughter lunch, I go to Water Lily. It is part of a group of restaurants that have locations in Sudbury Framingham and I think Lexington. It is perhaps the smallest of them and I think where they try or test new menu items. The food has always been delicious and well priced.
This is a small place, but cooking quality is pretty high, and they will listen to you if you ask for more/less spice, starch, sugar, etc. Some of the recent additions to menu are quite nice. Eggplant with garlic sauce (Yu Hsiang) is excellent; dry-cooked string beans also.
My family and I called for a large takeout order this past Sunday. I was expecting the usual since the restaurant is small and in a strip mall area. Instead of average quality chinese food, I was surprised to eat a rather bland and boring mix of shrimp lo mein, pupu platter for 2, and very unspicy hot and sour soup. My disappointment continued with the beef and broccoli - the beef was coated in some weird batter instead of just reg soy sauce. We probably will not go back.
Always can expect a consitently good meal.  Usually do take out when tired of cooking at home.  Nice to eat there too
Litrd menu, salty. Will do in a hurry but i dont think Ill be back. 
Different than the run of the mill Chinese restaurant. It is clean, airy and comfortable with good food. Good place for a quiet lunch any day of the week.
Water Lily is a small Chinese restaurant located in a shopping center in Wayland.  The food is quite good and proves that you don't have to drive into Boston's Chinatown to satisfy your cravings for classic dishes.  In addition to tables and booths, Water Lily does a lot of take out business.  Beer and a limited wine list are available.  Service is good, though the wait staff seems to rotate on a regular basis.  There is ample free parking in the shopping center lot.
The food, atmosphere and service at Water Lilly exceeded our expectations. It's a very small restaurant, but has great decor and lighting. I think the majority of customers are take out, but its such a cozy place to go for dinner with a spouse, etc.

The food was very fresh and flavorful. The waitstaff was very attentive and extremely proper. Service all restaurants should have.
with 20 or so flavors from which to choose, you're sure to find the exact one(s) for you. after some sampling, I had it narrowed to pineapple, coffee and pistachio. do-it-yourself service -- you pick the size cup for you, then fill it as high as you can. delicious without that bitter frozen yogurt after-taste. I'll be back!
We were there to have dessert.  The flavors are outstanding and the toppings are very creative. It is hard to stop adding toppings.  The location is on Boston Post Road.  You have to look for it in the plaza but there is plenty of parking.  In the warmer months you can easily stroll to Sudbury River to enjoy your treat.
This was my first experience and it was amazing.  
The flavors and extra's were plentiful and everyone seemed to really enjoy themselves there.
since it is self serve, you would imagine a messy place and it was clean and well stocked
It's another Orange Leaf.  The store is a bit awkwardly arranged as the space goes through the building with an entrance on each end. (People never seem to know which the line go..for toppings or the register.)  The food is good; it's what you would expect at Orange Leaf. 

This is true with most of these locations, but they do have limited seating.  It isn't an overly busy place, but if you are expecting a seat with your family, and all the seats are taken, it's a bit disappointing.  
My wife loves it. Ain't cheap but really good and the place is clean! We were surprised the other night, on a later night run, that at , almost 9, just a teenage young lady. 
Been to this orange leaf yogurt place many.There is always a new flavor on the month.The staff are freindly and there are so many toppings to choose from for your yogurt.
There are 2 frozen yogurt shops in Wayland.  This shop is 2 or 3 times the size of the other and  has several more flavors and it's not just non-fat frozen yogurt as offered at FYI.  There are 3 seating areas plus stools at the window.  

The yogurt is very good, the toppings abundant and the place  immaculate. The loyalty card offers cash discounts quickly.
Although no different that the millions of "self-serv" yogurt shops, Orange Leaf in Wayland Town Center is a comfortable, roomy, clean spot to visit.  The choices for flavors is great and changes regularly, and the toppings offered have a large variety and are nicely displayed with little mess surrounding the dispensers.  The help is friendly, and will offer you tastes if you aren't sure.
typical yogurt place. Fill up a cup and add all kinds of stuff to go on top. needs something to distingish itself from all the others in the area.
We enjoyed the immense number of varieties and the self service. It's a good local place for people who live in Wayland.

The owners changed a few years ago (I think), and the pizza quality dropped a notch. It's still very good.
This is a great place for pizza, whether eating in or carry-out. Definitely the best pizza around the area. The guys that tend to the place are very helpful. Try it, you'll like it!
Run of the mill pizza joint typical in a suburban town.  Good guys run the place.  

Not a place to write home about though. everything is a bit plain. Pizza and steak tips and all.  When we are home deciding on food, we don't seem to think of the place, even though it is the closest. 
We had a meeting in Wayland and needed a local place. Ordered 3 different pizzas to be ready at 5:45. Ready on time. Food was good. They made sure I had plates and napkins and got me out the door. Crust is a little thicker than places like Upper Crust but the sauce was really good.
Lots of choices at the WPH, all of them good.  The guys behind the counter are helpful and friendly, and the pizza is delicious.
I've been getting pizza here for years and never even thought to review it.  Then when I just finished a review of The Local in Wayland, this place popped up on TA.

Not a lot to say about that place except that they consistently make an excellent pizza.  Its a medium thickness crust, and their sauce is very flavorful.  If you order toppings they put a reasonable amount on the pizza.  The service is always good.
Ordered subs for take-out.  The subs were all quite good.  Ham, steak and falafel were all hot and tasty.  Cost is reasonable.  Service on phone and in person quite pleasant.  Certain to return on next trip to Wayland.
Even with Bertucci's opening nearby, when we were heading home at 9 PM last week without having eaten dinner, we still called Wayland Pizza for a large Veggie.  The pies are well loaded, well cooked and reasonably priced.  Just what a local pizza joint should be.
We got a couple pizzas and subs at Wayland Pizza House. It was so bad we couldn't even eat it, had to throw it away.

Go elsewhere for pizza - try Papa Ginos up the street. So much better.
We're new to Wayland and therefore are in 'exploration mode' as we make our way around town and check out all the local establishments.  Supporting local businesses is important to us, however our experience with Wayland Pizza has been nothing short of disappointing.  The person taking our order couldn't have cared less that it was our first time ordering with them.  When I asked the person what he recommended on the menu (we didn't have any menus, there aren't any online), he simply said "everything". Quite helpful.  Although their delivery time was exactly as advertised, the food quality was not up to our typical fare. The pizza was too doughy and overloaded with greasy cheese (!) and their wings dipped in too much batter.  We might try them again since I believe every establishment should get two shots, however there simply are too many great places we want to visit first.
We visited this Panera after eating dinner next door and not finding anything we liked on the dessert menu.  We thought we would pop in and get something to fix our sweet tooth on the way home.  Granted it was 8:40pm and we knew they closed at 9pm, but the point is your store is still open for business.  The looks we got from everyone were looks of death.  They had just mopped the floors and they were in the process of packing things up.  We we were made to feel unwelcome.  We each ordered a cookie, paid and ran.  Barely a word spoken by the staff.  The manager should address staff closing up shop early and should hire friendly staff.  We won't return to this location.  PS - the cookies weren't even that great.
The new building is lovely and have nice atmosphere and plenty of seating.  They have nice outdoor seating too.  The food is good and is what you would expect at competent Panera's.  I also like the ample and stressful parking.

When the location opened, they had issues with some staffing (e.g. poor service, rude managers), but I believe they worked out those kinks, so I frequent this place often. ...at all hours of the day.  Lunch, afternoon, and dinner.  

The entrance area is a bit awkward as the people coming and leaving seem to always run into each other, and it's slightly difficult to determine where the line is supposed to go.  Also, the lounge area on the front is awkwardly furnished and it's hard to find seats.  (These are very minor concerns though.)
They have very good soups, salads, sandwhiches and deserts. You can get a combo lunch like half a sandwhich and soup. They have very good breads to buy and some of the deserts are excellent.
They have very good salads, sandwhiches and deserts. Just tried the italian combo sandwhich and thought it was very good. The asian chicken salad is worth a try. Watch out for the pastry, could ruin your appetite.
Good coffee and food. Plenty of room between tables so you can have a nice conversation. Never noisy and very convenient to Sudbury, Wayland, Concord, Lincoln and weston 
I'm a regular at this Panera. The store is fairly new and kept very clean. Never had to wait for service and great fresh food.
I love Panera Bread!!!  It has good food, reasonable prices, free wi-fi and you can stay and talk with your friends as long as you like without getting dirty looks from the waitstaff.  They even have a "points program" and online nutrition information.  What's not to love?  I was thrilled when they opened up in Wayland.  Only one problem, the counter staff never smiles.  It's like they are doing you a favor serving you.  The people fixing the food are friendly, the management bends over backwards to help you.  Managers even work the cash registers when busy.  Can't you find someone to work behind the register that enjoys being there?  I've seen the same comments on other review web sites.  Conclusion, I'll still recommend that readers go there for the other reasons but I'll only give this Panera's 3 stars.
They have salads, soups and sandwiches on the menu. They also have nice pastery for desert and if you want they have breads and bagels to bring home. You order your food and go over to another counter to pick it up.
Fare: The usual Panera fare. I ordered the Ham, Cheese and Egg Power Sandwich with a cappuccino in a mug with cinnamon.
I was served quickly. Food was hot. 

Staff: Very pleasant and attentive
Electrical: Adequate plugs to accomodate laptops
Atmosphere: Bright with two separated rooms
It was early Saturday morning and there was plenty of seating available. 

Expereince was quite enjoyable until I brought my trash to the receptors. There were many flies and they jumped when I placed my plates and trash in the bins. That was a first for me in a Panera's. I had not seen any flies while at my seat; only at the trash area. But, it startled me.
Having two small grandchildren it is not easy to find a child friendly restaurant to eat early but we found it at The Local.  Service excellent and efficient, atmosphere good. Menu had a good choice with added child's menu.  Food came nicely presented for both adults and children!
We enjoyed having lunch here with a relative, and would be glad to come back when we are in the area again. The menu offers a variety of options, the service was attentive, and the values offered were all acceptable. 
Have visited several times -- lunches, business happy hours, dinners, and group dinners. the food is very good/not excellent and enough variety to suit most everyone -- not sure of gluten/vegan, but feel confident this would be addressed as menu is contemporary w some comfort food classics.
The Local is a very popular place. It offers excellent atmosphere and food. Great to meet friends and have a good meal and socialize.
Had a nice dinner here with my family last weekend, sat outside. Service is always friendly but inconsistent- had to wait 10 minutes for my drink which arrived with almost all the ice melted- clearly it had been sitting at the bar. I asked for a change in my sides which was not done. The servers probably spend too much time chatting with each other about their weekend plans!
I would call this a gastropub.  the ambiance is very nice, the cocktails are delicious, the pork chops are juicy and tender and there is outdoor seating but there are only 1 or 2 items on the menu that interest me.  I eat everything so that's not the problem.  Before decide to go check the menu online and see if you agree.
Excellent local restaurant.  Good food. We love the outdoor dining but it is hard to get in after 5. Wonderful bar. The beer choices are good and wine is ok. 
Went for early Friday night dinner. Seated without delay. Appetizers of calamari and mussels were excellent. Caesar salad just ok. The flat breads are huge, definitely enough for two. The burgers are also king sized. Good draft beer selection. Very enjoyable stop
Food critics say that you can tell just walking in how things will go. Walk. In. The place is airy, clean, well spaced tables, lots of wood and stone, and 80s music. There it is. My weakness. I love soft 80s music in the background. It complemented our crabcake sandwich, the baby arugula salad with beets and added seared tuna, and the baby kale  salad with hazelnuts and diced sweet potatoes with added salmon. A HUGE portion of salmon. Because at first I was like, "$9 to add salmon to a salad!" Then I saw the portion was at least 8 ounces. Kudos to the staff, to the chef (the hostess was a little ditzy , and for whatever reason she gave us a kids' menu for a table of mostly seniors but still....). My mom couldn't decide between the crabcake entree and appetizer, which is when the waitress told her about the sandwich option. Very thoughtful! Very nice creme brulee, as well. I can't wait to go back and try more options! Flatbread, burgers....
This is a great place to go when you want more than a fast food burger for lunch.  The menu offers several appetizers and the trendy "small plates" that make it a good place to go for drinks after work, but we were there for lunch so our choices included salads, sandwiches, and of course, burgers.  They also have some daily "specials", and we chose the fried haddock sandwich with fries from that list.  They came on brioche with arugula and a special house tartar sauce, delicately coated so you could actually taste the fish.  The fries were just the way I like them, crisp on the outside and soft potato on the inside.  The only criticism I had was with the restroom, which was a bit dark.  It was clean, but just with dim lighting.  Our waitress did a good job, was prompt and friendly.  We'll return if we are in the area again.
I was treated to a birthday lunch by a friend who lives in Wayland. This was my first visit to The Local, and won't be my last. We shared their amazing Brussels Sprouts with lime soy glaze and also their veggie wrap with fries. Everything was terrific! It was a pretty day, so we also ate on their outdoor patio! Can't wait to introduce my husband to The Local! 
First time going to this restaurant and the food and service were both good. There are some gluten-free offerings.  I had the GF Mac and cheese, which is a rare offering at a restaurant and it was very good.

The restaurant and menu seems appropriate for families as well as adults only.

Overall, a good choice.
Went here for lunch the day after Mother's Day with my wife and we loved it! I got the mac and cheese with chicken and bacon and it was one of the best I have ever had. Extremely rich, made with Gruyere cheese and had nice breadcrumb topping. My wife had one of their burgers and loved it. We also got the crispy brussel sprouts which were different but very good. New location in Wayland is very nice and enjoyed the local beers and ingredients.
Arrived in a rain storm to an almost empty Local, great service, reasonable prices and very large honest portions. My husband and I both had a drink, we split an order of fried Brussels sprouts which were very crispy and tasty with a savory soy lime sauce. My husband had the salad with seared tuna, he said was very creamy and tasty. Nice hot peppers for balance. I had the truffle flatbread which was the size of a regular pizza. Not salty, great truffle taste, crispy thin crust. We'd both go again!
Went here for a birthday dinner last night and had a great time. I got the Caesar salad and parmesan truffle fries and my daughter got the kids pasta. We both really enjoyed our meals and the other ladies with us enjoyed theirs as well. We were told it would be a 30 min wait but it only ended up being about 10 minutes. The staff were friendly and we were seated quickly. The restaurant is large but still feels cozy. I found the cost to be a bit high but the food was definitely great. We also got the flourless cake for dessert and it was so delicious. We would definitely come back here again!
Their food is quiet good! Try their truffle fries and flatbread pizza too. Great service and bar area, all arounf very good!
The Local is my favorite restaurant near my house. I go there all the time with my friends! We always split the fried pickles as an appetizer. They are delicious! The burger is very good, as well as the flatbread pizzas. The atmosphere is very relaxed. You can dress casually or a little bit nicer and fit in either way. There is a big bar surrounded by high top tables. Definitely go to The Local!!
We wanted to like this place and have tried it numerous times in 2015.  We went there again on Friday evening at 5 PM on March 18th.  Again, the food just was not looking very appetizing when we saw what others were being served.  It has a great location, great parking and the prices are affordable.  There are just better options on Route 20.
This is a great restaurant particularly for those who are gluten free.  it has a nice, simple menu that changes with the seasons and there is always something new and yummy!
I love the food here. The chicken wings are my favorite. Over all a nice atmosphere for going out on a date or just dinner with friends 
It's a Subway.

I wish it were facing the other side of the building where the main parking lot is. That would make the quick pick-up a bit easier.  I am knitpicking though.
The food is always consistent, fresh, and tasty.  Price is great, and service is quick.  This particular location is very easy to access - lots of easy, close parking.
Typical subway, all the meat is prepared and sized so if you are looking for a sub with a lot of meat then look at other sub shops. They do a good job of adding veg's .
I like the subway for its fresh bread and ingredients. This is  a nice chain restaurant with some seating.
The Coach Grill is back in business after repairing serious fire damage done in the Spring.  Its prices were always high, but they seem substantially higher now and far surpass the prices of any other area restaurant.

Service remains excellent and the space is upscale and well lit.

However, three of us ordered onion soup and got bowls with more cheese than soup.  What liquid there was tasted good but the cheese was just a huge glob.  Over cheesing may be a thing as I had the wedge salad which came with blue cheese in large masses when sprinkled is the norm.

Perhaps my overall comment is that the food presentation seemed of a higher quality before the prices.  Prices may have gone up and portion sizes down - nothing to take home as there use to be, but making a second meal used to make the prices seem less burdensome.

This is a neighborhood place, but I won't be rushing back.


If you have ever been to a Ruth Chris' Steakhouse you'd recognize the format -- premium meats, a la carte sidedishes, premium pricing.

Except The Coach Grill falls short of Ruth Chris' standards.  At least on our first visit -- and possibly our last.

Now we've not been to Ruth Chris' all that often -- the prices are steep.  Figure about a 30% markup beyond most fine dining pricing.  But the atmosphere is elegant, the service attentive, the menu appealing and the food delicious.

The Coach Grill matched Ruth Chris' in their lofty pricing.  Where The Coach Grill fell down...

It was quarter of six on a Thursday evening.  The restaurant was empty.  They seated us in a less-than-generous booth for two.  We decided to move to a table for four, just to have a bit of elbow room.

Too often I have gone into a wide-open restaurant and been shown to the least desirable table in the place -- often by the kitchen door.  I learned long ago not to put up with such treatment.  It seems so crass.  

Sure we were a couple, and so a booth for two would have been appropriate later in the evening, if the restaurant was filling up.  But in an empty restaurant it seemed like scant hospitality.

No one gave us any grief for moving to a table, and our waiter was gracious and efficient.  Our orders came out quickly -- a sign that the kitchen was up to speed despite the lack of diners.

We ordered champagne flutes of sparkling Prosecco wine.  Six ounces cost about twice what I'd expect for wine-by-the-glass.  The wine was good.

My wife ordered the Maryland crab cakes.  She grew up in Maryland and knows her crab cakes.  She pronounced them 'very good'.  She also ordered half a cobb salad, which she enjoyed.

I had ordered the prime rib, medium rare, along with garlic mashed potatoes with shallots.  The prime rib came properly cooked, although with about two ounces of fat/waste appended to it.  The mashed potatoes did not seem to have any garlic or shallots.  Hard to tell if that was due to the recipe or a mistake in the kitchen.

The Coach Grill claims to take pride in their prime rib.  But to be truthful I have had as good or better prime rib at an Outback Steakhouse, and not paid nearly so much.

An unusual feature of the table was a pepper mill.  But when I went to add pepper to the mashed potatoes the mill was empty.  I stole another mill from another table -- little better.  Finally our waiter brought over a mill that worked.

Details folks.  Sweat the details...

We did not order dessert.  We had cake waiting at home.  Never saw the dessert menu.

The times we have dined at a Ruth Chris' Steakhouse I have come away feeling like my net worth had been dented, but satisfied that we had been well compensated by the experience.  I had that same dinged-in-the-wallet feeling coming out of The Coach Grill, but not feeling so well treated.

The service was very good (and well tipped), the atmosphere was elegant. but the food fell short.  If The Coach Grill wants to compete with Ruth Chris', they need to up their game.
The food here was the best!!! The lobster mac and cheese is awesome! Also the steak is so great! They serve these garlic hot rolls for bread. I have to say that was the best bread I have ever had! Loved this place so much!

A great restaurant and bar - not too hard to get a table, or eat at the bar. Got to have the steaks!
Just impressive!! Wow!!. The Atencion was really really great!! The wine was so delicious!, and of course, the Porter House plate , it's really the best of both worlds!
My wife and I celebrated our wedding anniversary by  eating at The Coach Grill. Since the menu is all alacarte and the cost of the individual menu items is expensive (for us) we pick special occassions. That said the service was very attentive. The meal was perfectly prepared and timed. The free desert recognizing our anniversary was a nice gesture. We went early  as when full the room can get a bit noisy.  We sat in a coxy booth and were greeted during the meal by the manager who acknowledged our anniversary. We both had the surf and turf offering (filet mignon and  stuffed lobster half, corn pudding) that was well prepared.
close, easy to get too, been going there for years...but same snooty attitude from the servers.  I made the reservation but my guest got the wine list...i paid the bill and they thanked my guest, not me...entrees were good, but ive had better...disappointing for as pricey as this restaurant is...but we always go back because of location...
We have gone to the Coach Grill for years for many special occasions.  The ambience is very nice, the food is great and the service is impeccable.  This is a high end restaurant, but the entire dining experience is worth the higher prices.
Our party of five arrived on Friday evening around 8:30 PM and were promptly seated. Water and warm bread arrived quickly, and the service continued to be very good throughout the meal. We selected 5 steaks, and the general consensus was - that they were very good. One of the steaks was a little overcooked, but not badly overcooked. The salads and side dishes including a Cobb salad, onion rings, baked potato were all good. Note that there is still a faint "fireplace" smell, as this restaurant had a fire not long ago. Though I didn't consider this an outstanding meal, it was hearty and tasty, and I would return.
Wonderful place to go for holiday, special event, special occasion, etc.  great staff, great menu, great wine and bar list.  All around you will be impressed.  You get what you pay for, higher prices but worth it.  My Dad says best steak he has ever had.  I had lamb and it was spot on.  Just a great, high end restaurant.
Our family has always enjoyed The Coach Grill.  It is a high end steakhouse without the need to head all the way into the city.  The Au Poivre in particular is my favorite anywhere.  Restaurant recently had a fire but I believe it expected to reopen soon and I will be going as soon as it does.
Nice to see this restaurant reopened after being closed due to a fire. We have been back three times now as we have family nearby. While the first visit was a little "rough", we gave it another chance as we figured that they might be dealing with some new restaurant hiccups. 

The last two visits have been excellent. Service is much improved over our first visit and the food better than before the fire. 

The wine list is extensive and there was a very knowledgeable young man there on our third visit. Not sure if he is there all the time or not, but he was great to talk to about the wine list. 

Will be back again on our next visit. 
I ordered steak and potatoes with corn pudding. appetizer was grilled calamari. I've eaten here at least 50 times.  I asked the waitress if the potatoes were real. The potatoes were watery, as if they were a powdered mixture. She said she saw the potatoes being made. A huge difference from the $7 baked potato. The $39 filet tasted flat, seemed to be manufacture meat to me. The calamari was childish. Great calamari is Portlands, " The Street" or Walthams' New Mexican restaurant on Main and Moody. I have taken this place off my eating list. I'll get the steak at Legal in the future, or even Outback! That's right Outback, and I'm rich!  It was  a terrible meal.
Stopped for dinner and sat at the bar. After initially asking me for my drink and food order, the three servers behind the bar were incredibly inattentive. My salad was brought out almost immediately...too soon with no pacing...and my entree was brought out within 5 minutes of my salad being placed in front of me. I asked the server to remove the entree, finished my salad, and waited a good ten minutes before anyone noticed I was done and wished for my dinner to be brought out. I suspect it sat under a heat lamp the entire time. The food was "fine," the prices were "bust out retail," and the service abysmal. I shall not return.
After a few months of being closed we reconnected with Coach Grille again and were so pleased that it didn't lose a step.  Great food and expert service.  A true staple with predictable quality and an upscale experience.  We love dining in the bar area where it can be abuzz with people, a game on the tv and great food. 
My husband and I went out for our weekly "night out".  We knew they had been closed because of a fire and wanted to support a local business. The service was really good but both of us found our meat unpalatable. My husband had the bone in filet and he asked for medium rare. It was almost uncooked. I had lamb ordered medium rare but it was also very rare. The oysters were good but served with only a horseradish/chile sauce topping - kind of lame. The salad was too big. We live in Wayland and hoped this would be a regular place for us but I doubt we will go there again. 
I've enjoyed the Coach Grill for a number of years and twice since their re-opening after being closed for a few months after a kitchen fire.  The menu provides a wide variety of consistently good fare.  Nothing flashy but gently creative.  Tonight I had an apple salad as a starter that was delicate and refreshing--little Apple sticks rolled in cinnamon on a bed of lettuce with sprinkles of blue cheese crumbs, doused in the lightest of dressings.  For an entree I chose a chicken piccata--perfectly done with a light lemon sauce.  The corn pudding was magnificent.  My two partners had lamb shanks which they enjoyed a great deal.  The three of us shared a gigantic piece of chocolate cake, moist and rich with a deep dark chocolate icing.  If you're looking for a gentile place to dine but unpretentious and friendly with fine food and fine, The Coach Grill would be a good choice.
Great atmosphere and very good quality meal. The steak and fries are superb! Extensive wine selection. 
The Coach Grill is our stopping place when we come back from Boston.  The location is great before you drive down the long stretch of Boston Post Road.  The wait staff and the bartenders are always excellent.
We just went to the Coach Grill for the last time and we only live 1 mile away. Service was acceptable drinks were extremely weak and the ribeye steak was uneatable. More grizzle than meat. This piece of meat should never been served.  There are many less expensive restaurants with higher quality food where I'll be frequenting in the future.
Normally I'm a Dunkin guy but Honey Dew has a great cup of Joe.  it's in the gas station in sudbury along route 20 and it's worth the stop.  Fill up the tank and get your coffee fix all in one stop.  The donuts are good too. 
Coconut donuts, two types, pleased the family but the service lacks respect. Perhaps that's what happens when you're not meant to stay.
a small sign tent on the main road is easily missed. and it's in the parking lot behind Papa Gino's (?), but once stumbled upon, it's easy to become a regular. no more expensive than Starbuck's but they roast their own beans and have a good menu of by-the-pound or the cup. socially conscious, hip barristas, couches and tables to visit after yoga next door, or to write your novel.
Absolute laser focus on good coffee. Small, hidden almost ... Great care taken to pour excellent coffee. Only visited once so far but will be back. Don't expect fratte/latte schmaty stuff.... I like the simplicity of the place. 
Over the holidays we had out of town guests who are coffee lovers.  They feel in love with Karma Coffee place.  Thank you to the owner and staff who took the time to give a tour of the place.  We were so excited to learn about coffee and the roasting process.  It is the small things that can bring you the most happiness.
This is the one brick and mortar location to get brewed Karma coffee. They're at a number of local farmers markets as well. This is where they roast their names which are sold in local stores and served in a number of local restaurants. They have a number of varieties of beans and delays, and their baristas are all talented. They usually have a selection of scones, muffins and cookies from local bakeries. The only drawback to this excellent coffee shop is their limited hours. 
The coffee at Karma is rich and delicious -- not bitter like some other popular coffee places or weak like others.  We often buy our beans here, as well, as they are fresh roasted.  It's a great find!
Sudbury Massachusetts is a small town and has 3 great options for coffee and tea drinkers.  Karmen is perfect place to pick up your stash of freshly roasted coffee beans.  The owner is quite knowledgeable and will help you select the right bean for you and your family.  Enjoy!
Great little coffee shop off the beaten path. Very comfortable and cosy.  Not your average Starbucks-like coffee shop. I met a friend there for coffee because it was on of her favorite coffee shops. I was pleasantly surprised by how cosy it was. Very family friendly and friendly in general. I highly recommend this shop.
Can't function without a cup of Harrar every morning. Even brought a pound of it with me to the UK. They also offer boxes of coffee. Just call ahead. Keeps me going all day long. 
I live only a short walk from Karma Coffee and thank my lucky stars for that. Now this is coffee as it should be made, but oh so rarely actually is. I love the smell that wafts across the few hundred yards to my window when they roast, Lucky, lucky me. They serve primarily dark roasts, as well they should. Even the everyday coffee is exotic, and the specials are especially rare beans. This is the standard by which one ought to judge a cup. The people are down to earth and very nice. The owner cleaned my home coffee grinder when it stopped working, and then took the time to teach me how to care for it properly. They sell beans, ground coffee, makers, grinders and the like. People sit around and sip, chat and munch on the few available treats. Others make a quick stop for fuel on the way to work every day.  Karma Coffee is a rare treat -- not merely good coffee but the best. Bar none.
These folks do a stellar job at visiting coffee plantations and roasting in the facility. Very friendly and best coffee in the area by a large margin. Out of the way location for the tasting room but you can buy a 16 oz. bag of coffee for what you would pay for 12 oz at Whole Foods.

Nice people, free internet - comfortable environment
I went to karma coffee for coffee and coffee making equipment. The people who work there are so lovely. The coffee was delicious and it is clear that they are serious coffee people- roasted on sight, brewed with pour over. I met the owner as well and he was very kind and peaceful. Overall a lovely place!
    A friendly alternative to the franchise coffee places like Starbucks. Coffee tastes smoother to me than Starbucks, and they prepare the beans fresh (so it takes a little longer than grabbing a prepared bag). It's become my go-to place for my espresso beans.
I've heard so much about this place.  People describe the coffee as if it has magical powers.  I went there once.  Located in an industrial park, the interior "atmosphere" was about a ONE on a scale of TEN.  And the coffee?  To me, coffee is coffee.  Not cheap crap like Dunkin Donuts, mind you, but indistinguishable from anything I make at home.
Karma has high quality coffee roasted on the premises. The people there are highly knowledgable and the coffee and coffee drinks are excellent.  They have limited pastry type items, all of which are high quality.  If you love good coffee, you should make it a point to stop in.
They roast the beans on site. Terrific coffees and lattes, etc. Plenty of space to sit and enjoy your java.
If you regularly drink Starbucks or Dunkin Donuts coffee, try expanding your horizons at Karma. This is high quality coffee at a totally reasonable price. A small latte (nice and strong, plenty of caffeine for me!) is under $3. My wallet is happy, but my taste buds are even happier! This is delicious coffee, always well made, and usually the baristas make a heart or some other cool art in the foam. I like that attention to detail. The only things this place doesn't have going for it are the location and the interior atmosphere. It's sort of far away from... anything. Inside it's painfully hipster. It looks like someone's garage that they've outfitted with a few tables and chairs. For me it's not that comfortable and not the kind of place I would sit and relax and have a coffee. It is a great place to get a coffee to go though, and one of my favorite coffee shops in MA!
Nice place to sit with friends and enjoy some fabulous coffee.Roasted on premises. Service is attentive and friendly.
Karma Coffee is the alternative to any coffee chain. High test and high quality for the discerning coffee drinker. Parking is a bit tight, so watch your neighbor as they run in and out.
They "search out the best tasting, most socially-responsible coffee available." (from their website-stiryoursoul.com) Then they roast it themselves.  And they know their coffee. One of the guys even showed me his bag of Kopi Luwak, the coffee that is roasted after it...hmm... passes through the digestive tract....of a Civet. I have now worked driving over for one of their 20 oz. (!) cappuccinos into my morning schedule. When we left Italy I thought I'd have to go through delicious coffee withdrawal, and there was Karma Coffee! I was a gold-card-carrying Starbucks customer until Italy, and now Karma Coffee. The staff is super friendly, knowledgeable, and the atmosphere is wonderfully laid back and cozy.
Great coffee, great owners..LOOOOOOOOOOOOVE this place!
Authentic North Indian cuisine and exquisite use of spices - this meal was a real treat!  I started with the soup of the day (lentil); it was a light and tasty warmup to the main course.  On the recommendation of my server, I had the Dal Makhani with beautifully spiced black lentils; it was an absolute taste treat and now a new favorable taste memory.  It paired well with a Chardonnay.  I also had the onion pratha (whole wheat) to help scoop it up.  Finished up with a nice Indian tea.  I plan to return and continue to work my way through this menu in future visits. 
The chicken in the mix tandoori grill was uncooked and tasted bland! Hardly any taste whatsoever!! The lentil soup was a joke - the consistency was nothing like a soup and it tasted so bad, I had to throw it away.  The only thing edible in my order was the chicken seekh kebab! Never going here again - they have no clue how to make grilled tandoori food!!
The food was as good as you would get in India.
Impeccable food.
Friendly service.
Beautiful drive.
Would recommend this fantastic restaurant to everyone,
first time in an indian restaurant and really worth it
great food and very good service, reasonable prices
Went for the lunch buffet. Service is pretty good and they serve naan bread at your table instead of at the buffet table. Goat curry was probably the best among all the dishes that day at the buffet. Chicken tikka masala had a strong tomato taste like I was eating a very liquified tomato paste :( Bombay chicken has a mango after taste, which I wasnt expecting. It was okay for a bite or two but after that it just tasted really sweet. Could have been a better buffet. Very affordable pricing
The owner is so passionate about his restaurant and his food. You come in and feel like you 're part of the family. Our vegetable platter appetizer was perfectly crunchy and satisfying. Each dish from appetizer to dessert was tasty and perfectly spiced. I wish I lived near by...I'd be here weekly!
Soul of india is fantastic! The food is perfect, the dahl fry is buttery and good. The service is exceptional. The second my water glass was empty they filled it, dropped a napkin and they gave me a clean one almost before it hit the ground, and everyone checks on your level of happiness. Highly recommend this restaurant. PS: 90% of the dining room was filled with Indian patrons so you know it's fantastic and authentic!
I've had delivery (to a nearby hotel) and I've eaten at the small comfortable bar in the restaurant.  Either way I've had only excellent tasty meals here.  The owner has a very nice calm way about him, and he truly appreciates his customers. Highly recommended!
As we were seated we heard British accents on 2 tables, knowing how much the Brits love their curry we took this as a good sign and it was. Very good Indian food, good service. We had baingan bartha, very good, lamb masala, also very good and chicken Goa style, a little on the sweet side for me but good. We were asked if we wanted mild, medium or hot, not strictly speaking  authentic but it did give us the chance to have the level of heat we were used to. Great selection of breads and appetizers. We didn't see raita on the menu but asked and they served it with our meal. We ordered more than we needed because we LOVE Indian food leftovers and these did not disappoint the next day :) We will be back and may over order even more so we can try even more dishes and have plenty to take home. Nice big car park, sometimes restaurants around Sudbury do not have such easy parking. They do take out and delivery, newly moved to Sudbury we need to see if we fall in their delivery area!
This was my first visit and I was a little wary as I have rarely found anything even half decent when it comes to Indian food in the USA let alone in a quiet suburb. What a surprise I had. I had the best butter chicken outside of India. The owner came over at the end of our meal and we had a great chat about how his chef goes back to India regularly to get recipes and practice preparation. It definitely showed in the quality of the dish we had. I will definitely be going back very soon. 
We recently ate at the Da Vinci Ristorante in Boston and learned that the chef owned an Indian restaurant in suburban Sudbury.  Given the quality of the food at Da Vinci, we decided to give it a try. What a delightful surprise!  The menu is extensive, and the preparation excellent.  We ordered the chef's selection of appetizers and found every one to be delicious.  Our group of 4 ordered different main courses - 2 chicken, 1 lamb and 1 goat - and we all found our choices to be beautifully seasoned and well prepared.  Lastly, we were delighted to see so many versions of naan and appreciated how gracious the staff is.  We'll definitely be back!
...because there were three tables with Indian couples or families. Simplistic, cliché? Yup. But a pretty accurate way to judge an ethnic restaurant. Food was very good; I tend to order the same vegetarian dishes wherever I go, and theirs were very well prepared. Service was very efficient, quick and opinionated, which I really appreciate! I love when waiters feel responsible for your meal and advise you regarding dishes and sizes and degree of "hotness." And, they had good wines to choose from.
Enjoyed learning more about Indian cooking.  The owner was particularly helpful with explanations. He gave us samples to try out!  
Great experience.
What a great place to have lunch, dinner or brunch.  The food is prepared for Americans but on Saturdays and Sundays the real Asian dishes are plentiful.  Jay will also make sure that you have great service and that if you are Asian that you will the home flavors you might be craving.  The Soul of India is able to create any special dish for your gathering.  We love the dhansak!
Have gotten take out or delivery several times. Each time they way under estimate the time it will take.
And you are rewarded with space and color and light, and an enthusiasm for the food, that melts your heart.  Jay, the owner, proudly will encourage India excursion and venture.  So I had Biryani, which I had never tried before.  I say its "indian take on paella", sinfully aromatic and flavorful, just wonderful.  Prices won't break your bank. Very friendly and endearing (because some of the staff don't speak English, and they give you this shocked look that just softens you to the core).  I haven't tried their weekly buffet,but they definitely offer lunch buffet for folks low on time, but high on hunger and with a craving for spices and aromas!
I really enjoyed the place, the food and the service.  The day after I was really sick, my stomach was really in bad shape.  I had the boneless chicken and a lassie.  I am used to spicy food and this is not the first time I have Indian, spicy food.  So that is why not the 5 stars.  Too thick and too heavy.  Beware of spicy level.  Mine was intermediate and it was really difficult to eat.
We went here for the first time the other night.  The staff was very welcoming and friendly.  The waiter was more than happy to explain dishes in great detail so that you were sure about what you were getting.  Some staff were a little shy with so-so English - but that's okay.  It's an Indian restaurant!!

I really liked everything that we ordered.  The Korma sauce was super yummy - although I personally wasn't crazy about the skin-on fish.  I also really liked the cauliflower dish with potatoes.  So good - we will be back!
Friendly service and food was wonderful.  Prices were reasonable.  Small place  - we got there and got the last table but a few after us had to wait for a while. Had a lamb and  also a chicken dish - spiciness was as advertised (medium spicy offered a little but not overwhelming kick).  Always love the naan bread.  Glad I live locally as I'll be back-everyone in the family enjoyed it.
We've dine at the SOUL OF INDIA many times and have never been disappointed.  The selection of quality, well-prepared foods is outstanding and the service is consistently excellent.  Their lunch buffet is an excellent introduction to a range of Indian foods.  We've also enjoyed their delicious take-out menu.  A great choice for lunch or dinner any day!
It's a regular Papa Gino's.  Convenient location, lots of parking, lots of space in the dining room, I do like this place

However, there are a few kinks I have to mention.
- Online orders.  I don't think they check that often.  Make sure to call instead.  
- Delivery seems to take longer than you expect.  I live ~2 miles from it, and I expect much better delivery time. The drivers always seem to be complaining how busy they are.

Other than these, tiny quirks, I do like it and I keep going back.
Typical pizza place, service was good and you can always count on a papa gino pizza being good. They also have sandwhiches and other things to eat.
Great bang for your buck if you don't mind all the carbs. Love grabbing some of their Pene Pasta with meatballs and their a bit on the thicker side pizza crust and cheese stick are alway a hit.
really good crusted pizza...the pizza is consistently good whater its eat in or take out.... the service is ok but with the turnover in staff its sometimes spotty but always friendly and accomodating....great for kids of course
My daughter loves their pizza, which I do too.  But No matter what Papa Ginos I go to their service is super slow.  They acted suprised that anyone would want to have lunch at lunch time.  Fine for calling in and taking out, but unless you have lots of time skip it.
Menu has gotten pricy over the years, but the pizza is still good. WAS MUCH BETTER WHEN THEY MADE THEIR OWN DOUGH!  Wish they would bring some items back and lower the prices a little.
Conrads in Sudbury is a nice place to eat and get a drink.  The food is good and the prices are reasonable
Group of 5 visited late afternoon on Saturday. We were hungry and saw Conrads on the drive home. Plenty of parking. Once inside, greeted by two very young men. No problem getting a table and we decided to sit at the booth near the bar. Bar area was laid out nicely. Very comfortable. Tv's over the bar and music payed at talk-able level. Atmosphere at and around the bar was the best part of the visit,  Good place to grab drinks. Our server was another young man, Very friendly. Fast to take drink order. He was well-mannered and efficient. Ordered 3 appetizers. All average. Avocado. spinach dip had very few pieces of avocado. 1 sandwich additionally ordered--a pastrami melt. Pastrami was excellent.  Liked the large pickle slices provided on the side. Did not like that it was on toasted white bread and that the french fries were really under-cooked. Overall, nothing special on this visit. Wont make it a destination spot to visit from Natick.
... and nothing else is open ... Well, it's an adequate joint, I guess, for locals to meet for a drink. But if you are not from around here, the drive won't win you much. The nar is just any old bar and the food is just mediocre too. The burgers are ok. I live not far and only visit Conrad's if one of my neighbors says "Hey, come on down" which happens infrequently.
The steak tips at Conrad's in Sudbury are amazing! They are very tender and well marinated. I have enjoyed them on three separate visits! The carrots and the garlic mashed potatoes are delicious as well. The spiked ice tea is also great!
Used a Groupon to have dinner here.  I ordered the Captain's Platter (shrimp, scallops and haddock, fried).  My wife ordered the combo steak tips/turkey tips,

My platter consisted of 2 (count 'em) 2 shrimp, 3 smallish scallops and a 3" x 5" piece of tasteless haddock.  Very disappointing.  I asked for cocktail sauce for the shrimp and they said they "ran out."

My wife's plate was a bit better but the turkey tips were cooked in BBQ sauce which was not described as such on the menu,  I usually don't put turkey and BBQ sauce together.

We will not be going back.  At least we got a discount but I would have preferred good food at whatever price.

Service was mediocre.
My husband and I had dinner on a Monday evening. I read the reviews and thought that the service issues may have been rectified by now. Unfortunately, that was not the case. While the server was lovely, she was so busy with other customers, and as a result, we received terrible service. My husband never received his dinner salad and ALL requests left us waiting - even getting the bill! How foolish of management not to have extra help.  We will never return despite enjoying the meal which we eventually got. There are so many other restaurants of equal value which have much better service. I think this may be a case of over expansion - it appears they cannot handle three restaurants. 
Went with my husband for dinner.  I had the broiled scallops and he had the chicken broccoli ziti.  Both were decent and the dishes were both under $20 each.  The patio has about 7-8 tables and there is plenty of parking.  Good locals place.  Plan to go back and try other dishes.
Steak tips great, other food good too, fried haddock, shrimp and buffalo fingers.
The service was good but the waiter was not as familiar with the menu as he should have been. A little chilly in the dining room too.
Over all a nice place to go
There is nothing wrong with this restaurant, but nothing that great either.  There is quite an extensive menu, but unfortunately that may have diluted the talent as none of our dishes were anything but average.  Not bad, just competent and nothing more.  It seems to be straddling the difference between pub, sports bar, and family restaurant: something for everyone.  That is the problem in a nutshell.  It tries do do everything, but achieves none of them particularly well.  That's fine as long as all you want is a comfortable, reliable, middle of the road experience.  If you want something more, good luck.
This is a great place to go with friends, family..... they have a great selections of food for all. from chicken, pasta, meat and seafood. You can even sit at the big beautiful bar. The appetizers are excellent and such a big selection. The service is great. We has a waitress names Elisa I highly recommend sitting in her area....
Just went again, for the 3rd time this month and yet again an awesome experience! The turkey and steak tips with sweet potato fries have got to be the best thing on the menu. Exceptional taste, great service and always a friendly environment no matter what time of day I go! Looking forward to my next visit.
Conrad's is a convenient, good quality restaurant serving comfort food in a nice sports bar atmosphere.   Their Turkey Burger is particularly outstanding.
We had good dinners of steak tips and the Mixed Grill.  The tips were tasty and cooked exactly as requested - medium rare.
Our waitress was pleasant, helpful and attentive.  Small dinner salads were fresh.  We did order the night special appetizer- spicy steak egg rolls- Wow they were good and I could have made a meal out of them.  Be warned they are spicy hot.  I had the evening sangria strawberry rhubarb and it was refreshing.
My only criticism would be the rice pilaf was dry and warm not hot and very plain on a white plate, so visually not attractive.
Portions for dinner were good and we took some home.  We will be back.
Last time I was here was for lunch.  The food was good, the place was cold and the service was spotty.  Came back for dinner.  The food was good for two of three diners in our party.  The temperature was fine.  The service remains spotty.  Once again, we did not get an ordered salad.  One in our party ordered shrimp scampi with pasta.  She said the shrimp tasted like they dumped it out of a freezer bag onto the pasta...nothing particularly "scampi" about it.  The pasta was only okay.  On the plus side, another in our party had steak tips and loved it.  I had scallops, cole slaw and mashed potatoes and all were good.  Drinks were fine.  We had a couple of deserts (chocolate cake and bread pudding) were very good.  The service was rushed...the mozzarella sticks we shared for an appetizer were delicious but were nowhere near finished when the main course came out.  The waiter wanted to take the unfinished appetizer away to make room for the entrees!  All in all, I'd say the place is till learning how deliver a good product consistently.
We all liked the food. The service was good.  The prices are right.  These are the three major things that are important to me.  The problem... there is really no warmth to the dining room, a few booths against the perimeter, and seen one, seen 'em all four tops with banquet chairs in the middle of one large room.  We were a group of seven, and enjoyed ourselves because the place was about 25% full for lunch.  I can imagine what the noise level might be when full with a few families with kids.
Conrad's in Sudbury, Massachusetts is the latest in a succession of similar pub style restaurants that have filled this location over the years.  We used to refer to them as BPO (brick, plants and oak) referring to their décor.  Conrad's lacks all three BPO elements with a more Spartan interior.  Their style is TV with an individual television at every booth and larger televisions on the walls.  The food is a standard pub menu - salads, burgers, pizzas, and the like.  There are multiple interesting beers on tap, wines and a full bar.  Service was good and there is a large parking lot next to the building.  Prices were quite reasonable.
Nice people. Friendly staff. Don't come here for a gourmet experience. Stick with the burgers, pizza and steak tips. Not a gourmet restaurant but lots of beer choices. As long as you stay focused on the right menu items you won't be disappointed
An excellent family oriented restaurant with something for everyone, even though the steak tips are the best. The teriyaki stir frys are killers. The place is nothing fancy, more a nice neighborhood place.
Always enjoy a trip to Conrad's for a night out. Great steak tips. Lots of beer to choose from. Big menu to please a big group. 
This was third time at Conrad's. I enjoyed this place very much again. My wife and I were rushed with plans that later that evening. We found the service to be fast and attentive. Our food was delicious and hot. I am eager to return.
They do a great job. I have only had wraps, salads and sandwiches. All great.
Busy busy place at noon. Lots of phone orders. 
Well worth the wait. The comments re the difference from Greek to Italian pizza or obvious to the naked eye.
Couple of tables outside in nice weather.
Not to be confused with any other Theo's in greater Boston.
The people who work here are always friendly.  The food is very good, esp. the steak and cheese subs.
It's actually the only place in town.  The salads, and sandwiches are good, but the pizza needs improvement!  I like Italian pizza, and this is Greek.
Not my favorite, but only my opinion.
The food is very good the service is fast and they have lots of soda choices which is good. The people who work there are nice and they have great cooks. This is a great place to eat.
Decent pizza and subs - definitely prefer their sandwich selections to the pizza.  Would recommend the steak and cheese or the italian.
This is not NY pizza but a typical greek style pizza.  The food is OK, but I miss true NY Style pizza in this town..
How many towns in Mass. have only one sub and pizza place?  Just Weston.  And this one is decent.  Food is pretty good service is really great.  If you're local a great place to pick up some pizza or a steak and cheese.
Hi
Always love coming here. Sunday is a special treat.... No long lines. Great variety of middle eastern and Mediterranean foods.
During the week, get your order in early! 
I had takeout - Eggplant parmesan sub and baklava.
They do mostly take out as there are no bathrooms but they do have a few tables.
The place was clean.  I was very bored waiting for my order because there was nothing to read.   You should definitely call ahead as many patrons there did.  
The baklava was very large but not that great.  Not worth the calories, as delicious baklava can be.  
The first thing I noticed about my sub when I got it home was that it was still hot, then I noticed all the grease.  I'm not really sure where all the grease was coming from.  The eggplant was a little burnt.  I don't think I've ever seen burnt breaded eggplant before.  I had to taste the sauce by itself because I just could not taste anything like tomatoes when I took my first few bites.  Sure enough, very bland mild sauce.  I really like a tangy sauce on my sandwiches.  I ate half and was not even tempted by the 2nd half.  
Not a horrible place, but I won't be trying the pizza or anything else with the tomato sauce because it was very bland.  Maybe I'll try a regular cold sub next time.
Also, although I did not see a sign, I was informed that you need to pay cash up to $8.  Many of the sandwiches are $7.95.
They make great meatball parm subs.  Meat is fresh -  does not have that weird taste and smell you sometime get with ground meat.  Sauce is good -  no heartburn.  Bread is always fresh.  One size = large.  Good for takeout on way home from work.  (thought they do have a few tables)  People are friendly.
This is a nice small place in the small but lovely town of Weston Massachusettes. Kids love their Pizza and Baklava. Pizza Crust is unique and delicious! Situated close to the Town center walking distance from the town green. Delivery to your home  is also done if requested. School aged kids love the food here. Seating area is not that great and not many tables are there for a large crowd.  But take out or dining in as a small group can be done. Most of the time this place is quiet. Most of  the Weston School kids know about this place and that was how I got to know about it.I have ordered Pizza from this place many many times and continue to do so , as it is very convenient for me.
We tend to order Farmer's Pizza which is a vegetarian pizza with olives and artichokes.  It always tastes great.  Good service too.
This is a smalltown pizza place. Actually, it does a lot more than pizza.  Seating is available, but don't expect ambiance.  Very friendly staff.  Kids and family will enjoy a quick meal.  Take out is also available.
Nice little place in downtown Weston. Great variety. Love their steak wrap, burger subs, and grilled chicken salads. Good cheese and veggie pizzas. They do get busy at lunch time but definitely worth the wait. Staff are good about hygiene and wearing disposable gloves while preparing food.
Friendly staff make great pizza and subs. A little expensive but quality ingredients. Very small shop with a few tables to eat but primarily a takeout and delivery restaurant. 
Will probably be stoppping here every few weeks since having a very bad experience at our local pizza shop.  Have had the meatball parm sub twice now which was excellent.  My husband had their Italian sub (which had no peppers and was not toasted) and also a steak cheese and mushroom sub.  All were excellent.  Food fresh.  Bakalava was wonderful (they don't make it there, but of the same excellent quality of the food they have)  Service is friendly.
I grew up eating theos. The place offers some of the finest Italian and Greek sandwiches around the metro west. The pizza is small and not worth the price. However the calzones are delicious. You can't go wrong with any and I mean that. The place is packed during lunch hours. I recommend just calling 10 or 15 minutes ahead pre ordering your meal during that time. 
I was pleasantly surprised with how good Theo's was. It was a great deal and great food. We got a free pizza because of their coupons that they always have posted on their website. Very friendly employees and quick service.
As the only food in town, this place is it! The staff is great. Pizza, subs, ect. They do deliver!!!!  Kids love this place. 
The latest hours of any place in Weston. Quite small, I believe only 3 tables, really more of a take-out place. A storefront on the main street. Angle parking directly in front. Every time I've been there the counter staff has been friendly and the food has been good, both the standard fare (pizza/subs) and pasta and burgers. Always a pleasant place to visit.
Two friends and I decided to try the National Grill after hearing good things about it. So on a beautiful August afternoon, we went there for lunch. We ordered the lobster roll which was a special that day. It was not as good as expected - small quantity of lobster and very bland. The French fries were only ordinary, but the onion rings were outstanding. Will not return.
Cool and airy with a great view of the 18th green coming in. Dine inside or out..either is great. food and service always excellent. have eaten here even without playing a round.
I've visited a few times with family and friends. I've also golfed here as well. Drinks are good and menu is simple. We've never had an issue with the food. Nice outdoor area (kids can run around). We visit often and will continue to do so. 
Nice place, on beautiful course, with great views while you're eating! We had burgers and onion rings, and they came out perfect. Service was very good as well, even though it was off-season.
Patio and indoor seating. Standard fare pub food with daily specials. Service is so so. We have gone for dinner a couple of times and would add a star for dinner seating.
This golf course has a limited but good menu. I especially liked their fish and chips which were fresh and light. There is a dining area in the clubhouse and a bar. They also added an outdoor porch and provide entertainment on weekends. The views are beautiful and peaceful. 
Had lunch at the new Heron's Nest - large second floor deck with full covered bar overlooking course. Salad was delicious with vegetables from a local farm in Northbridge. Will be back next summer for acoustic music.
We stopped here to watch the golfers come in on the 18th hole and to have some dinner.  My wife had a Rubin sandwich lacking much meat and cold recooked fries that were awful.  I had a dried out chicken breast sandwich with the same awful fries.  Don't need to eat there again.
First off, They do not accept anything but cash. Had no cash. Had to go to ATM across street and pay $6 fee to get money out then instead of giving me $14 in change back I only got $4, yes my fault I didn't check before I got home. I called to ask if register was over by $10 and he said he couldn't tell me. I should have just left the food when he said he don't take ATM cards! Who doesn't accept plastic now a days
Ordered  delivery  . Took 90 minutes 
 Food cold. More cheese on a mouse trap  than my pizza.  Big change since  some employees  left last year.  Doing business  at Gregorys  or Douglas  House from now on.  Lost a loyal customers for over 20 years. Your loss .hopefully others do the same 
Crust was thin and crispy. Sauce was tasty. Not too much cheese. Crispy pepperoni. Wachusett brand potato chips for sale. Will go here again for a quick pie.
Harry's in Douglas is a small pizza shop with several tables/booths.  Most of its business is take-out.  I have eaten their pizzas and subs for years and tried others in town as well.  In my opinion, Harry's is the best in Douglas.  Fresh ingredients and tasty food - served with a smile.
Great pizza and really good steak and cheese at reasonable prices. They deliver at dinner time, not for lunch unfortunately and also have good customer service. I've been eating here for a couple of years now and the quality is always of high standards.
Love their pizza  salads and meatball subs.  When you eat in you actually get plates and silverware.  Gotta love that.
Grabbed a pizza here for the first time since moving to Douglas.  There are 3 pizza joints within 40 yards of one another.  I prefer these guys over Gregory's and I've never tried Douglas house of pizza.  Prices were average, service was nice and quick.  Good place to go, but if you have a few more minutes to spare, head to Tony's in Sutton.
On the way through Douglas we spotted this welcome respite from the road and stopped in for a coffee, muffin and cookie.  Good was great, coffee was New England Coffee and fit the bill just fine.  Best part was the people as they were most pleasant.  And to top it off, the bathroom was as clean as a whistle.  Price was right too (more than 1/2 of what it would have been at Starbucks).
There are two ice cream places in Douglas. One is only window service so if you want to sit down or look at some nice gifts inside this is the place to head. Friendly owners and stag serve up huge servings of awesome ice cream, and with a smiling face. It's clean and welcoming.
Wow a real delight! Great atmosphere also. People on line and at picnic tables made it a great place to relax. The ice cream was so great. Great staff kept line moving. Heaping scoops of Ice Cream.
It is a great place to go with the family for ice cream. It is very good and the price is reasonable. Plenty of room to enjoy your ice cream right there.
A nice ride with the kids...through the Douglas State Forest...stop at The Ice Cream Lady for a nice cold treat. Very good quality ice cream...nice young ladies serving the ice cream
reasonable prices if serving size was not so tiny...Ice cream is of very poor quality, very waxy. It is NOT Richardson's as one reviewed said. I lived near Richardson's for 5 years and Richardson's rocks -this is a moor insult to Richardson's. 

Staff was pleasant, atmosphere is awful sticky tables set on concrete landing between a major roadway and DD drive thru.
I regret that I have driven by this place so very many times. It's part of a combined gas/convenience/DunkinDonuts operation. But the charm is that they serve Richardson's Ice cream from Middleton MA. It which is one of the best local brands making this one of our top ice cream choices. Highly recommended.
Ice cream is great and prices are very reasonable! New this year they have homemade waffle cones - YUM!
This is a walk-up outside window in a gas station convenience store.  Great selection, large portions, fair prices and cheerful servers.  And if you happen to be there on their last day of the season in the fall, the ice cream is free!!!
Some comment about the somewhat disturbing statue of a two-scoop cone come to life as a beautiful top-hatted, long-legged ice cream lady but no one disputes the delicious ice cream offered at the Family Convenience Center in Douglas MA better know as "The Ice Cream Lady". 

24 flavors of hard scooped Richardson's ice cream (Black Raspberry, Butter Pecan, Bubble Gum, Cake Batter, Chocolate, Chocolate Chip, Coffee, Coffee Kahula Brownie, Cookie Dough, Cotton Candy, Death By Chocolate, Maple Walnut, Milky Way, Mint Chocolate Chip, Mocha Chip, Moose Tracks, Peppermint Stick, Pistachio, Raspberry Chocolate Chip, Reese's Peanut Butter Cup, Rum Raisin, Strawberry, Strawberry Cheesecake, Vanilla), Low-fat options (Black Raspberry, Coffee, Purple Cow), an Oreo Yogurt, an orange or watermelon sherbet, and two soft serve choc-vanilla flavors are dispensed from an ice cream window with outdoor seating for about 30. At the season's end, usually in September, there is free ice cream until it's gone!

Located at 67 Main St., Douglas, MA, on the south side of Main St. at the Mobil station across the road from the fire house.

Seasonal from May till September

Weekday Hours: From: 12:00 PM To: 9:00 PM

Weekend Hours: From: 12:00 PM To: 10:00 PM
My husband and I decided to try Grill on Main recently, we have tried this location in the past when it was other owners, but I must say this has been a considerable improvement. We both tried the burger and I must say it was the best burger ever, and it was made to order. They do have weekly specials on different days which we do plan to try. They are now open for lunch and closed on Mondays. A nice place to have lunch right in the middle of downtown Douglas.
Went for lunch.The dining room was very clean,that was a good thing. The coleslaw had WAY too much vinegar,not good. The burgers were good,little undercooked and the bun was dry,with a better bun it would have been great. The fries and onion rings were very good,service very good also.
Nice atmosphere, beautiful marble horseshoe bar. We both had one of the specials.The food was well prepared and hearty portions. Also a pretty good wine list. Service was very good. I'll be back.
Nothing really special about the meals here, the apps are decent and the beer is priced right. The are other, better options for dinner.
Whatever you do, stay clear of this place. There isn't one good thing I can say about it. Food was horrible, cold, and pricey. Service? there was none. We will not be back! Our whole family was disgusted with everything.
This is our usual stop if we’re looking for quick & easy, but it’s nothing spectacular. It’s obvious the chefs aren't top notch but the servers are always very pleasant and attentive and the bartenders make good drinks. We joke that if we order something we haven’t tried yet it’s a 50/50 gamble. 
Our recommendations – 
Good every time: BLT, Quesadillas, club sandwiches, nachos, sandwich melts, and fish&chips. 
Beware of: The chicken wings (1 time undercooked and another time not butchered correctly - suppose to remove the end part of the wing!), burgers are a hit or miss, veal parm is tough, French dip needs more flavor, stuffed balsamic portabella needs to be better proportioned (they give you half a head of lettuce.. its excessive), & rustic potato skins are basically just potato wedges. 
Overall opinion – good for a beer & sandwich or quick app but it isn't our first choice for a nice night out to dinner. Keep expectations low & order something not hard to screw up and you’ll leave happy!
I was looking for a nice place to take my sister to eat near her house. In did some checking of the area on line and found Grille on main. All the reviews I read were good and the prices look fair. We arrived at six and were seated right away. The waitress for warm and very friendly . The food was very good and worth the price by far. They gave us so much could not finish so took home. I will make this one of my stops when in the area .
Silly us - but it's nice to get takeout other than pizza and subs. 

Well, three strikes and WE ARE DONE. 

Unable to get order correct - sides with meal, salad exclusions, pasta toppings, etc. And rudeness at pickup. And not like it was a $10.00 order. It was $97.00. 

Again - don't offer takeout, if you aren't going to give a crap about what you send out. 
My wife, children and grandchildren came to enjoy a time of refreshing together only to have been disappointed in the atmosphere, which was music so loud we could not converse, an MC who was louder than the music, and the wait after we ordered was unbearably long...almost 1 1/2 hours.  Our waitress continually apologized and was attentive, but though we complained about the "loud" there was nothing done.   The food, once in front of us, was very good but after the wait, and the painful loudness of music and MC we chowed down as quickly as possible and left disgruntled to say the least. Although a 10% discount was offered, and we were thankful for at least that acknowledgement, return?  I think not.
Consistently good food and the Grille setting is nice - like the furnishing and the service is always good
This is indeed the best of the four(?) previous attempts of operating a restaurant in this little plaza.  The parking is a little scary at times but once you get inside you'll appreciate the updated interior in a familiar layout.  Good pub food, good bar and reliable service.  Happy to have a decent place to sit and eat in downtown Douglas.
Great place. Don't go there on Friday night and try to get a seat at the bar. You might take our spots. Food is good, prices are reasonable. Can get real busy on the weekends. Closed Mondays. They have a Facebook page that notes events and specials and they have various discount nights during the week. Overall a very good place. 
We live in the area and have wanted to try this restaurant since they opened but had not had the opportunity until recently. We were two couples and we each had different entrees, and everyone felt agreed that the food was excellent, prices very reasonable, the portions plenty and the service was great. The portions were so good that we had to take some home. Glad to see a quality restaurant in Douglas.
Great food.... Owners are wonderful people.....  Subs & pizzas are yummy!!!!!!  I recommend them & they take credit/debit which is huge...
I eat here a few times a month. I actually had a great Italian subs yesterday. The owners work there daily. Very dedicated and great food. Would reccomend.
Were in town for a softball tournament. A group of us went during a break in our games on the suggestion of the organizers of the tournament because there was no food offered at our field. Apparently the restaurant did not know there was anything going on in town and was not prepared for business. They had one server on. We ended up taking food to go after waiting well over half an hour for simple grinders. After all that food was mediocre at best.

The following day we did try again because it was so close to the field by ordering pizzas to go over the phone. The pizza was ok, served its purpose
Very sub par food. Tasteless canned sauce (add some spices guys) very bland. living in the back side of Douglas, not many places will deliver. We have ordered delivery from douglas house probably about a dozen times in the 3 yrs we have lived here. It has always taken well over an hour or so to get our food. (We're 10 minutes away) twice it was close to the 2 hr mark. We normally don't order during busy times either. Never on delivery have we received hot food, hell it's never even warm. I like cold pizza but usually the next morning...not the night I order it. If you call to ask were your delivery is, the owner gives you such attitude and in 3/4 of the cases snaps at you "it'll be there " and hangs the phone up. Oh well there's always Gregorys and Harrys 3 feet away from them. 
My family and I eat from here often. The food is delish. I Love the the crunchy crust of the pizza. The chicken fingers are fresh chicken and yummy! There are only 2 booths, so we prefer take out. The owner is very friendly and will make whatever you would like. Best pizza in town!
Please clean your store.  I like the pizza,  but  the lack of cleanliness will keep me away. The walls and counters need to be cleaned.   
New in town have eaten there 4 times. Tonight will be the last.  Our previous visits were good. The buffalo pizza is really good as is the meatloaf special.  The staff are very nice.  Unfortunately, tonight my wife tried the turkey club.  When it arrived the meat looked more like slimy ham that had been in your frig for a week. My wife told the waitress who was very nice to say something to the kitchen.  The owner came out to defend his slimy turkey as being fresh.  Although he admitted it wasn't sliced fresh and that turkey was used for other entrees the turkey that was served was what came in the club sandwich.  Not really how to handle a customer concern. Having been in the restaurant business for 30 years his approach was 100% wrong.  Too bad I can't support him or his establishment again.  Too bad he lost a really good customer.  
This is a small but clean, friendly restaurant that serves pizza and all kinds of pastas with meats, salads, and a choice of some Greek specialties.  Clean and well maintained.
My husband and I Love the Calzones- always pipping hot, tons of cheese and very crispy crust. Staff is friendly and our order is always ready on time. We have tried many varieties and have not been disappointed with any of them! Yum!
Variety of items on menu. Great pizza, calzones!!  Nice sized portions!  Friendly staff!  Would definitely visit again!!
This is  the "go to" place in Douglas. Food is always good. My husband always gets the veal parmeasean. I usually get the  seafood. Waitresses are nice & friendly. Food very reasonable. You can order take out to go or sit in the restaurant part. We always opt for the restaurant.
good place, is a very good joyce, with the frinds company and the system is very fast, i like all, is a part of my travel
Cutting through this town I stopped at this small coffee shop. If you blinked you would miss it and go right by. It is on-street parking only but easy to get a close parking spot. We were right in front. Went in and the place was very clean. Only a couple of tables. They had numerous flavored coffees listed. We went and got the pomegranate iced tea and a raspberry iced tea. They were awesome and cold but not overloaded with ice. If you want something cold and refreshing I would definitely stop there. Prices are about the same as Dunkins. Staff was very friendly. If in the area I would definitely stop in again.
Boy, there is something about the bagels  here that  is just plain special and DDDDelicious. If I can add a suggestion....one staff member needs to cash people out to free up the others to do the behind the counter work.  This little place is growing in leaps and bounds.....just a bit more organization will go a long way.
The bagels are fresh and yummy. There is a good variety of them. Also, they have muffins & donuts. They have a assortment of coffee flavors. My favorite thing here is the homemade VEGGIE CREAM CHEESE. I would encourage you to try it. I have bought a container of the Veggie cream cheese several times to bring home and spread on crackers- it is that good. It is very small inside with a few small tables. The employees are super friendly. However, they are not open all day- they close at noon.
Our family eats here often. They have great service that is always fast and friendly, great food, great prices and large portions! 
The Picket Fence has been the staple for locals for a long time. They are only open for breakfast and lunch. A small dining area  and bar counter that people wait in line to sit at, especially on the weekends. The food is very good. The staff is very friendly. 
I stopped in for lunch. The service was fast, the order came out quickly.I had a very good burger, priced right. As nice full menu reasonable prices. Very clean and well maintained. They also serve beer and have Keno.Great place for a quick bite.
Don't go to fast food stop here and get good food quick. Always friendly service and consistently good food. It's open for breakfast and lunch and is the place to go for good home style cooking
I have found that you no sooner order your food and it is being served.  It is HOT, TASTY, served in a friendly atmosphere by great people. 
Literally, I cannot find a better omelet anywhere! I have tried them everywhere- full of mushrooms and cheese  or whatever you please and just  simply delish! Staff is great and I love the atmosphere! Always leave there full-

Waitress was very friendly and made coffee was always refreshed!
The Greek omelet was great!
Not rushed!
Always a great meal here. Terrific waitstaff and very good food. Good prices and food always hits the table fast. Best place in town!
My wife and I must attend at least once a week for a great breakfast and lunch if it's a week day! 

Your delicious food is served with lightening speed from the kitchen. Always friendly and nice.
Fast service and breakfast excellent! Staff is always friendly. The food is priced well. Nice little restaurant in Douglas MA.
Very friendly little Main Street restaurant. Be aware that GPS may  take you to the wrong location - make sure that you are looking for  Main St. in downtown Douglas.  Tasty sandwiches at a very fair price, friendly service and cute restaurant. Easy parking available.
This is a small but historic restaurant in downtown Douglas.  Consistently good food and great for breakfast!
Have only been there for breakfast but it's a great place. Food is good, served hot and fresh. Staff are friendly and efficient. If you want Splenda for your coffee you have to ask as they don't keep it at the tables. You may have to wait for a seat during the weekends.
Best breakfast and lunch restaurant in Douglas that is not a pizzeria.  Excellent quality food, good selection, friendly service and clean/comfortable interior - and the prices are very fair.  What more to ask for?
One of my favorite places to catch breakfast in the Douglas area. The service is always fast and friendly and the food is great.
Because we have family in the area, we often stop in at the Picket Fence. This is a cozy small town diner-type venue. It is in an antique small home...but nicely converted many years ago, to a restaurant...Plenty of seating, including some counter seats. Typical breakfast and lunch fare, but also specials as well as daily soups. Diana, the owner is very nice and her employees are friendly and efficient. They are open on Friday nights and sometimes have a pan seared haddock dish...delicious. There are pincic tables in front, if you prefer to eat outside in the nicer weather. This great spot comes complete with the coolest history...in the late 1940s, it was the Elmwood Club, a haven and gathering spot for major league baseball players...especially the Red Sox and Yankees. They played exhibition games in a local baseball field.  Skip to today...the Picket Fence is standard American fare...freshly prepared with care. A nice spot on Route 16 in Douglas. 
Grate for a quick lunch. The menu has a good selection and the food is better than your average dinner.  The prices are also very good.  I stop here whenever I'm working in Douglas. 
Small town yankee charm! A Main Street USA atmosphere with the familiarity of a home town diner. Fish and chips on Fridays with Chef Melvin's thick and hearty New England clam chowder. Fresh strawberry shortcake that will reminds you of Mom's own! Great prices for great food and of course a Keno screen to play your numbers. 
local, small town place...great food..very nice servers...sometimes a bit hard to get a seat. I guess that says it all....if it's hard to get a seat, the food MUST be pretty good. Never had a bad meal there.
I have been a few times- only for Breakfast, they do Lunch, they also do Dinner on Fridays only- their hours are : Monday thru Thursday - 7am 'til 2pm    Friday - 7am 'til 8pm   Saturday & Sunday - 7am 'til 1pm (Breakfast Only). The omelets are yummy! The hash is homemade and awesome! It is always busy, and sometimes there is a wait. The staff is quick and friendly and the prices are great!!
Food is fresh and great flavor
Great to have a place on my way home from work that is consistently good.
I really thought time would tell- It has. Yuck- undercooked Chicken Fingers, Crab Rangoon's were awful, even the rice I loved before is terrible. They have had time to get feedback and make changes, but I guess not. They have changed owners but that hasn't helped. We will never be back- it was awful- and the small place that it is, is  filthy.
the hunan beef plate was good, except the beef...  everything else was not so good...  normally these take out places have half decent food but this one didn't...
We live in Douglas so we wanted to try it out...since we currently drive all the way into Upton for the Chinese place we like. Everything fried was safe (chicken fingers, rangoons, etc) but even that wasn't very good. And anything with meat was skeptical. We ordered beef lo mein and didn't even take a bite out of it, lots of mystery in the meat haha we immediately wished we just ordered pizza - won't be returning, sorry!
Hot Wok only offers take-out service.  I've had two experiences with their food - in both cases mixed results.  Some of the food was very tasty and well prepared while other was not up to par in taste and/or only slightly warm.  Service is excellent however - food ready at time promised.  A bit more attention to quality and preparation would go a long way to being above average.
Lots of variety on the menu.  Food is very tasty and fresh with good size portions.  Even take out containers are nice.  I am a fan.  Nice job Hot Wok!
Some things were really good and others could use some work.  We were hard pressed to find any crab in the Rangoon real or artificial!  Egg rolls, house rice, beef teriyaki were all good'
Place was so clean and food Was so delicious, we sure we gonna come back soon, hope they can do well in the future
New place that opened up in town. Finally something more than pizza. We tried several meals. The Pork Fried Rice is delish- My husband loved the Egg Rolls. However, the Crab Rangoon must be double fried as it is so crunchy it taste stale. The Chicken Fingers were soggy and the General Gau's Chicken was bland. The Boneless Ribs were ok, but a bit dry. The prices are great with huge meals  that cost $8.95- Portions are not a problem here, but hopefully they find their groove as this is the only place in town to get Chinese and has been long awaited.  This is take out only- no delivery available. Parking is on Main Street, but the Post Office is right next door, so after hours you can park there.
We ordered about $50 worth of food about two weeks after they opened.  
Pros:
The young man taking the orders and running the register was excellent.  I went in at noon but asked for my order to be ready at 5, which it was.  
Everything I ordered was included and correct, for a decent price.
The interior was clean- although it is just a very small take out area.  
The rice was wonderful and packed- the house special has shrimp, very yummy.
They have pork strips, I love these because they have no fat and cannot always be found in some Chinese restaurants.
Eggrolls- I haven't tried them but a really picky person I know said they were the best ever.

Cons:
No Sign- so if you're not from around here you'll never know it's here
Parking will be a hassle until the post office closes at 5- then you can park there (well maybe you can't but I did).  Main street Douglas is mayhem so if you have to park on the street be careful!
Crab Rangoons were folded weird, didn't taste much like crab, and were very stale.  We found out that they double fry them- I would recommend they stop because noone who has tried them has appreciated them being so hard.
Chicken fingers- perhaps should be double fried because they are soggy- and they weren't part of a meal- so in their own container should be crispy.
Chicken Wings- Not trimmed quite right and undercooked.
Teryaki- Why is it not on sticks?  It was literally a pile of strips in a container, under cooked also.
Spring Rolls- had a very strange after taste.

Overall- eh, so-so.  It's a learning curve and we'll try again.  I hope they are able to take feedback as constructive so they can stay in business because Douglas really needs something here besides pizza places!
We went for the fall festival with an infant and toddler. There was plenty for our 2 year old to do. The staff was wonderful! They were friendly, polite, and were able to answer our questions. There is a wonderful baby changing and nursing area which was put to use during our visit as well. We will definitely be back!
Wonderful choice of flavours available, great service, open late. The indoor seating area us a little bland but maybe time will help develope a more welcoming vibe. Cannot beat their gluten free, dairy free Pineapple sorbet whip, yummy. 
great hot fudge sundaes! I had a junior size that has 2 scoops. The whipped cream was delicious. The hot fudge was perfect. The ice cream is very creamy and flavorful. I had cowabunga crunch and campfire s'mores favors - both really good. Good size portion. Very nice staff. Very clean setting. Lovely outdoor area with pretty views. You can eat inside too. Quick service. 
This is an easy to find ice cream place - right off Rt. 146. They have a wide selection of ice cream and soft serve. Terrific sundaes and waffle cones - both chocolate dipped and plain. You can't go wrong with their selection. The mini golf is very nice and well kept. It gets REALLY busy on a warm summer night!
Ice cream is from bliss creamery, but they did a nice job making this place not just about the ice cream. There is also plenty of places to seat, and they are friendly to well behaved dogs.
The fall fest was alright. Corn Maze, jump pillows,hayride, corn crib and assorted games. Nothing fantastic and 12 pp admission is a little steep, especially as an adult that only did the corn maze. When it was time to get ice cream, we waited in line for 25 minutes and they charge .35 for jimmies and .20 for a cup and cone. That drives me crazy and I don't expect anything for free, but add it into food cost. Probably won't go again next year and it was a nice day because if the friends we were with.
This is the best creamery around. They are open late(10pm) and the kids who work the windows have the best customer service.

Don't be afraid to ask questions. They will tell you about all the options!

With the new deck about to open it will be even better.

Also the new bathrooms out back are great.
This place has really grown over the years to add a corn maze and mini golf. But we always go here for the ice cream. Lots of choices, generous portions and it's right off of Route 146. Very easy off and back on the highway
We are always sad to see them close at the end of the season.  One of our favorite treats all summer.  There is always something for everyone.
Becky and Greg have made this place into a wonderful family or couples attraction! Start off with DELICIOUS ice cream! Then make your way to a corn maze in the fall, pumpkin picking, mini golf, check out the live animals, visit the giant bounce air pillows, or take a tractor ride! Its a great place for couples or families or even alone!
Great place for Ice Cream and family fun. Great Ice Cream. They have bouncy bubbles, mini golf, petting zoo and a corn maze. They also host birthday parties. 
And I thought chocolate sprinkles and jimmy's were the same thing? I do not think that would deter me from going?
Every time my wife and I go for a motorcycle ride through beautiful Mass, RI, or northern CT we make sure to include this stop on our route. It is always clean and neat, rather upscale but not pretentious. The staff (team) is well trained to cheerfully and competently serve, whether it is the delicious ice cream, or any of the family-oriented fun activities and attractions. Friends meet friends there, and kids have a ball. You got to check this out!
Whenever I am in the mood for some really good ice cream, I head to West End Creamery. There are so many choices that it can be hard to make a decision !  The quality of all the ingredients is top notch! I love this place!
Purgatory Chasm is a fun hike for the family and this creamery, across Rte 146 from the Chasm, is the perfect complement for an outing.  Great ice cream and if you are still up for walking around, lots of family activities to do.  We always come here after hiking at PC.
We love this place!  It is one of our family favorites.  There is ice cream which is homemade.  The French Vanilla, Cookie Dough, Butter Pecan are all hits with the family.  The waffle cone is really a treat, probably one of the best that I have tasted.  

There are wonderful hills to sit on and look ahead to the water.  Kids find themselves running around or rolling down the hills.  Another favorite stop is the barn to say hello to all of the animals: chickens, roosters, alpacas, goats, and bunnies.  This is always a hit although if you have ever been to Green Hill Park or Rota-Spring Farm, the kids can be disappointed that they can only watch and not pet/feed the animals.

There is also a miniature golf course which we have tried on occasion as well as a bounce jump for kids.  In the fall, there is a corn maze.  

I would say that we come here at least once per month in the spring/summer and sometimes more depending on the weather.  

Love it!
The ice cream is delicious and home made. Plenty of flavors to choose from and a nice place to sit and enjoy the rolling acres of grass and hills. It is also a farm where one can visit for free and look at the animals. They also have a mini golf and bouncy trampolines at a moderate price. 
Conveniently located off route 146 in central Mass. Went on. Friday night-busy with families and couples. 

Ice cream is good - nothing great. Has a little freezer burned taste. I had the coffee Oreo. Small is a single scoop and its rather expensive for the amount you receive. Sundaes come with 2 scoops. Hot fudge was ok. 

They call chocolate sprinkles jimmies which is disappointing. 
Great for a quick thought for a treat, delicious and a great selection. Bound to please anyone. Enjoy the mini golf and animals too. Parking is plentiful but a little tight some times.
Visited here while checking venues for a group event. Had lunch inside with a view of the golf course. Lots of choices from salads to sandwiches & wraps, burgers, and several lunch entrée choices. I had steak tips and my wife baked haddock both of which came with a salad (Caesar for me and garden for my wife). Service was very good and food was served hot and without a long wait after the salads. Both meals were tasty and cooked very good. Haddock moist and flaky and my tips a perfect medium rare. Nice spot for a lunch. When warmer weather comes you can dine outdoors on the patio,
I would highly recommend their calzones, deep dish pizza and grilled chicken salads.  But that's just me. These guys do it all.
Great Pizza & Grinders. Seafood on Fridays. Fish & Chips are a favorite for many. Casual. A few table inside to sit at, but mostly a To Go place.  Soft drinks, beer is available inside the establishment.
These guys have been here forever, and they have very good food.
If this wasn't my local I wouldn't go out of my way, but it's perfectly fine. The pizzas are pretty good and so are the subs, but it's nothing special.
Coupons come in the mail and reasonably priced, neighbor pizza been in business for awhile. Local take out for all.
We thought we'd try supporting a local business rather than the franchise pizzeria's nearby, big big mistake!

First, they delivered the pie cold and it took an hour?
Secondly, they overcharged for the two topping pie, the menu stated the cost to be $10.80 for a pepperoni pizza and if one adds extras, they cost a dollar.  They billed us $12.80.

The larg pizza didn't even fill the area of the box.

Sadly, the hour wait wasn't worth it, as the pie was both tasteless and COLD.
I would have rather inconvienced myself to pick it up fresh that wait over an hour for a cold pie!
This will be our first and last try!

Next time we'll go with Dominos or Godfathers who are both less expensive, deliver their food in a bag that keeps their food warm and they guarantee their product!  Additionally, they offer discounts, specials and coupons with every order.

That's why franchises make it and mom and pops fail!  :(
This is by far our favorite Thursday night take-out spot.  We do get "the usual", which they have perfected.  We love well-done fries, their salads are so fresh, the subs are delish, and the fish and chip are wonderful.  Plenty of food, and great value for the price.
Great taco pizza best I have had. Good fish and chips on Fridays. Big portions good value. If you want something different for dinner try the Taco pizza.
Try their deep dish cheese pizza, it awesome!
We have breakfast every Saturday and it is always delicious.  The staff are friendly and excellent at their job.  We recently tried them for dinner and were just as satisfied.  
We went to this restaurant for lunch. It was not crowded and we sat down right away.
The server was quick with menu's and then our beverages. Our food arrived soon there after.  We had hamburger's and clam chowder and both were very good. The French fries were also very tasty.  
This is a nice little local eatery with good food and service. I really enjoyed the atmosphere which was very subdued and comfortable. No bright lights, just very pleasant. There are a dozen tables and booths and a number of stools at the counter.
Friday is seafood day with Scallops, Clams, Haddock and Fritters, so we will be going back.
Our favorite spot for weekend breakfast in Webster. Also open for dinner Wed-Fri. Popular among the locals; good food, good service, reasonable prices. Good place to eat while en route to nearby Lake Webster.
Can't beat it! I love the eggs Benedict but ask for it over sausage. My husband likes the  pancakes, sometime they have fresh blueberries. The home fries are tasty, I would like them browned a bit more.
We were visiting friends and ordered out. The place is small with about 10 tables and a small bar. Nice neighborhood place. My husband and I both  ordered  BLT's  and they were excellent...loads of bacon and fresh lettuce and ripe tomatoes. Our friend got a salad and she said it was delicious and fresh.
Small but cozy with great food. The waitress remembers your likes and dislikes! One time they had taken a favorite of mine off the menu but made it for me anyway. Always good food. And the warm bread before your meal comes is the best in Worcester country! Decent wine selection and great beer selection.
The server (wife of owner?) was very professional & pleasant.  The food was excellent!  Salmon was very, very good and the chowder was A+.
I almost hesitate to review this local eatery, but, if any of you will read my previous reviews, you will agree I'm fairly well traveled and tell it like it is. This little gem was just excellent.
 The surroundings are pristine, the greeting, welcoming. We arrived on a tuesday evening, a few patrons were dining at the small bar, one family at a table. A few comfy booths are also available.Having read reviews from the " big town news" which were very favorable, we were anxious to try a new place.
 The draught beers were listed and as per norm, my choice was not available. The server recommended one she thought I would like, a summer citrus brew. Delicious. The menu was eclectic, seafood, beef, burgers, all reasonably priced. I did notice a children's menu too, nice addition for the families. Also, specials were offered in addition to the menu.
 It was a difficult decision, but chicken piccata, and a baked haddock dish were the choices. The meal began with the chowder, thick and tasty. The chef / owner was alone in the semi open kitchen, and the aromas of the dishes he was creating , tempting. It is not fast food, it was obvious that care and pride arrived with each dish. The chicken was tender, pasta al dente, and capers added the perfect saltiness. The fish was fresh, baked potato cooked exactly right. Food was very good, comforting and filling for the damp, rainy evening.
 The sever/ owner was never obtrusive, knowledgeable about all the ingredients. Forgot to mention..the warm, homemade loaf of artisan bread , my partner's eyes lighted, in delight.
 Now, the best part , Tues. special was any meal from the menu for 22 dollars !  Prices of large pizzas are not far from that, and to get a homemade meal of this caliber, what a deal.
 This was our first visit, will definitely not be our last. In this town there are not many choices to dine. But, the quality of the food, the cleanliness of the place , the decent price, and, the feeling of the owners caring about their customers, My Brothers' Place is a hidden jewel. Try it.
Stopped by for a few meals. Great pizza with no grease! They will make your pizza how you like. Friendly staff.
We order from Apollo at least once a week due to our busy schedules.  The food is always great - it's one of our favorite go-to places.
Best pizza around. We order weekly! We have also had many other things on the menu and have never been disappointment. Cooked to perfection.
The grinders and pizza a terrific.  Always fresh and done as ordered. As far as the other food it is ok, the fish and chips I got was not very good piece. I think they only offer haddock on Fridays, other wise its a piece of cod. The place is clean and the owner is very nice, as his wife works also and she is very nice.
Have frequented both 88s locations over the past 6 years. Always enjoy the food, atmosphere, and service! Never a bad meal.
We stopped in on a Sunday night about 7:45 p.m. There were 20 of us so it was a bit of a job for the staff, although they were both great. I had the steak, medium rare and it was perfect. Cooked perfectly and seasoned wonderfully, reminiscent of a steak with Montreal seasoning. I enjoyed every bit of it. My wife had the salmon and there was enough to take some home. She said it was delicious.While the staff was very good from start to finish the meal took 2 hours to complete from a drink to salad, entree and desert with coffee. I would certainly recommend the place to my friends and will be going back there again.
We had never been to the Eighty Ates before but have driven by & it's always crowded so that's a good sign. We made reservations & was seated right away. Our waitress came over right away & took our drink order, which we received right away. so far so good. After awhile she took our food order. And then we sat. And we sat. And we sat. We weren't in any hurry but we hadn't eaten all day so we were starving. After about 1/2 an hour the waitress came over to see if we needed drink refills (we didn't) & said the food would be out shortly. And then we waited again. And again. and we waited some more. Finally after an hour our food arrived. My husband's ribs were cold, as was his beans. He said the only thing hot was the French fries. But he was so hungry he ate them cold. My dinner was fine & it was good. When we were done eating the waitress came over & gave us our bill. We looked at each other & said well I guess we're not getting any dessert since we weren't even asked. Since this was our first visit & we didn't get a good impression at all, I doubt we'll be back.
Always enjoy going to the Bistro!  Love the staff and the food (favorite app is the chicken bruschetta)!  The Martini's (especially the Swedish Fish) are wonderful. Ladies night on Thursdays is great!  88 Cent apps with the purchase of an alcoholic drink.
Good service.  Fairly fast.  Waitress pleasant.  Kids welcomed.  Menu includes choices they enjoy.  Small seating area but comfortable.
88s came recommended by a "regular".  Good Choice.  It's a Pub/Restaurant with a low key, basic, dining room, and a lively bar with high-tops and regular tables.  The noise level in the bar was louder than the dining room but not unreasonable.  The dinner menu was extensive. There's something for everyone on it and the prices are reasonable & competitive. Although we didn't arrive until 8:30pm or so, we were seated immediately.  They were busy, but the service was accommodating and friendly.  It's not fine dining, but If you happen to be in Webster and looking for good food in an enjoyable pub, 88s would be a good choice.
Food is agar age with a few expect ions. The $12.88 dinner special is now $13.88. Not bad but there are better choices around. Staff is friendly but kept apologizing for errors.
We were in the area just for one night and liked the sound of this place based on online reviews. What a treat! Definitely a cut above typical fare in this small town (I grew up in Webster). I had a Southwestern Chicken Salad which was loaded with chicken and vegetables, a sizable portion, for $13.95. Service was superb. There's a bar with large TV that's noisy, we opted for the dining room which was quiet and to our liking.
Bistro 88s has a dining room area and an area like a sports bar - the dining room fairly quiet while the sports bar can be pretty noisy.  In either case the menu has great variety and the food is very good.  Prices are also very fair.  Service, provided by knowledgeable and friendly staff, is excellent.  We've been here a dozen times and never been disappointed.
Webster location is noisy and help not too friendly. Dudley location is quieter and friendly.  $12.88 dinner specials are good as is the menu bu a little pricy for a pub style place.
We had our wedding organized by Trevor, Crystal and Kevin from Eightyates bistro at Indian Ranch in June. Everything was fantastic. All of our guests said the food was amazing. We ended up doing some passed appetizers early in reception and had a 3 course buffet of a chicken a beef and fish. Trevor, helped guide us into a plan of what we would like accomplished that day and his employees as did Indian Ranch employees, never skipped a beat. The day went along flawless and the people involved went to great lengths to help make it one of the best days of our lives. Much gratitude towards everyone that worked that day!
P.S. The wife and I have been into to bistro itself for dinner and drinks before our wedding but after we had already booked them. Our trip there put our minds at ease about their food being served at our wedding.  Great , great drinks, great people!
After a show at Indian Ranch, we needed a convenient, casual place with good food and drink and that exactly what we found at Bistro 88.  Everyone of us enjoyed the food and I can say that the Balsamic ribs were among the best ribs I've ever had.  Our server, Jack, took great care of us...he was thoughtful, helpful, friendly and efficient.  Add to all this that the prices were very reasonable and you can be sure we will return the next time we are in the area.
You would not think good restaurant from the outside, its in a small strip mall near Indian Lake...We had the special..12.00 3 course meal.  Apps..chowdah and stuffies were really good  meal was chix parm and fish n chips  were good and the deserts were some whipped cream parfait was ok,,,, drinks were priced right Sierra Nevada tall 5.50.  we will be returning.
Just leaving the restaurant now. A couple friends told us about it so we figured we would try. What a very nice surprise! Katherine was our server and did an excellent job. The menu is extensive and very affordable! All four meals were great! Can't wait to try again. Well done!
The food and staff are outstanding.  We have been there twice in the past 6 months and each visit was amazing. 
This bistro has great variety and is truly like a city restaurant in a small town.  The atmosphere in the dining room is pleasant.  I have had chicken and pasta entrees and both were well prepared and delicious.
Had dinner the other night, brought there by my daughter and son-n-law. Son-in-law kept saying how many things were on the menu that I might like and he was right. Anytime I see lamb I'm always happy and the lambs chops I had were super. Good wine as well plus service. Mrs. and the kids had great dishes also, and we all had wonderful appetizers. Never heard of the place before, in a little strip small near Webster Lake on Route 16, but I will definitely go back.

JDP
We had heard good things about this restaurant in a small strip mall next to Indian Ranch.  It was a dismal raw/cloudy Wed., so decided to stop.

The restaurant side has some nice spacious booths that line the wall with several tables in the center.  Overall, it's small and 1/3rd in size compared to the lounge size that is 2/3rds of the overall size and has "bistro" hi boy tables. 

Since it was the first time we had been there we took our time with the menu which had quite a bit of variety.  This restaurant also has the Belly Rewards card.  Cloth Napkins and a full set of silverware with 2 forks along with a classic/modern decor.  

The wine & martini sections had an abundance of offerings and fairly reasonably priced.  Red Zins, Malbec, Cabernet & sauvignon blancs as examples with the price ranges in the $20 - $30s for a full bottle.  Martini's also had $6.00 specials from the Lemon Drop, Push Pop, The Seedless, Veruca Salt & a Chocolate Macaroon (parrot bay coconut, smirnoff, choc syrup, milk, rimmwed with toasted coconut) and not to be outdone by some seasonal favorites or Spiced Pumpkintini, Candy Cade & Maple Nog.  A number of on tap and bottles for the beers.  Sam's Seasonal 20 Oz; was $5.95 along with reasonably priced cocktails including an Arnold Palmer.

Went with the Veruca Salt and a Seasonal and weren't disappointed.  

Started with calamari and it arrived as lightly battered, crispy & not chewy! The only downsize is the sauce that came out was a buffalo and not a marinara sauce.  That was easily corrected as one wants to taste the texture not the buffalo sauce bite.

The server who was excellent also delivered fried rolled "donut holes" that were delicious; rolled in parmesean, garlic & butter.  Very tasty.

The menu goes from Appetizers, Soups, Salads, Entree Salads, Sandwiches to Chicken, Steak, Seafood & Haddock (Eight Ways) along with Veal Pork & Lambs to pastas.  Most of the prices ranged from $17 - $24 with a few in the lessor range.  There was only 1 entry for a kids menu and it was on the specials and consisted of Blue Tacos.

The specials aside from martinis & cocktails also had something interesting.  A 3 Course meal for only $12.88.

Although the menu was tempting, I went with the 3 course special but the mrs. went with a Loaded Chicken Stacker for $17.99 which was delicious.  It consisted of char grilled chicken layered with pan fried shred potatoes, crispy applewood smoked back and cheddar & monterey jack, scallions & sour cream.  

I cringed thinking I ought to have gone with the menu but out came a delicious & well proportioned caesar salad that was followed by a Steak Marsala (see picture) then followed by an Apple Crisp Spring Roll.  The last while good seemed to be either caramelized or canned apples.  It was still good nonetheless, plentiful and all of this for only $12.88.

The bill came to $64.34 plus tax.

The only disappointment was the Lounge Side Trivia Section which invades the diners.  Perhaps it wouldn't be so bad if the trivia guy would invest in new speakers or enunciate the question & answers.  

One trip is not the definitive measure but we will be trying it a 2nd time, for sure.
Went in for dinner last week with family and friends and had a great meal at a great price.  I had the Southwestern Chicken Salad and my wife had the Fish and Chips and both serving sizes were above average and tasted great.  Our waitress was superb as well.
this restaurant is close to our home so we go there quite often...we always are satisfied with our meals there and their catering service is also very good!  yummy drinks at the bar, too!
The Lodge has been forever. I have enjoyed the ambience of this Webster Restaurant as this is where I fell in love on Sugarloaf.
The food was good.  We were here during the day and there was one person working the bar and taking orders.  She was nice but obviously distracted from the server duties.  We waited a very long time for a refil on drinks and had to go to the bar to get her attention.  Then we had to flag her down to order a coffee which she never brought.  Had to get her attention again by going to the bar to pay the bill.  I wouldn't recommend this place during the day unless you really can't go anywhere else and don't mind poor service.  Had a hamburger and it was good.
Went there one evening on my way with a friend to a fun night at the Indian Ranch Resort.  Didn't want to go far so decided this was in close proximity.

Was seated as soon as we got in and from there we were happy with what we thought would be a good meal.  TOO LONG!!!!  Waitress kept apologizing for the delay but in the end the food wasn't worth the wait.  We were hungry so we just went with it.

Most likely won't go back....
Usually gave good meals at this restuarant. Long day, ordered out. Got food home and was extremely disappointed: my appetizer potatoe skins were cold and looked green and old! My haddock dinner was cold, not fresh and had cole slaw over it. The chicken and brocoli alfredo meal was leaking out of box making a mess!Very disappointed, not sure if will return!!!
this is an excellent restaurant on rt 16 in Webster, ma overlooking Webster lake and has excellent menu including seafood
I had lunch at the bar, nothing fancy but very cozy. Food was tasty an fresh. I had the chicken marcela it was perfect. Terry was my server at the bar, very attentive, frendly, professional. It is right on Rt 16 just over the webster line just past Indian Ranch.
Very comfortable restaurant. Good service. Daily specials are very good and there is a good selection. 4-5 visits to judge from and would definitely recommend. In the lounge area you can sit at the bar if you're dining alone and play keno. The draft beer was flat one time so go with bottled beer. Baked Haddock particularly good.
Food was below average, but the restaurant was filthy, smelled old and nasty. Old carpeting, poor cleaning, worried about getting sick.
Did a great job hosting a party of 30 with only 48 hours of notice. Food and hospitality was great. Has private rooms to host large parties. Would definitely go back again
Got seated quick and the staff were very friendly. We went on a night where they had specials for prime rib. The portions are huge and the food was very tasty. Reasonable prices and the atmosphere has a cozy, quaint feeling. We will be returning soon!
Last time we attempted to eat there it smelled like mold.  Needs to be more appealing to allow people to want to dine there.  The food was okay.  We have a gift certificate for $25.00 but it may be worth it to just let it go to waste.
We attended the Three Dog Night concert at Indian Ranch and looked for a place afterward to eat. We discovered the Lodge and were pleasantly surprised by the warm, LL Bean-like decor, friendly staff, great food. We kept commented how nice it was there, and really enjoyed every bit of our stay. After we left, I forgot my very expensive sunglasses! I live far away, but the honest manager made sure to return them to me. I look forward to visiting again! Thanks everyone!
Lobsters are great as is the pork chop. Help is really friendly and helpful. Could use a new carpet. Looks clean .
We love the rustic look and feel of the Restaurant. The bar is great and the Bartender Terry is the best! The food is great and we sat outside this past week as it was so nice and it was very enjoyable. We come from Worcester to go and have a great time!
Walked in with a 7:00 pm reservation, no one bothered to check off our name.  Were met by a smell of stale food and mustiness, and the carpeting badly stained. 
Our order was taken and the wait began.  Our server eventually came back after at least 30 minutes to verify what we had ordered. Once our meals finally arrived the food was nothing special, however it was properly cooked.
This establishment needs a thorough cleaning and also updating.  Though it's been in business for many years (1st visit was 47 years ago !) unfortunately it looks exactly the same..  I realize it is a casual restaurant, but to see the wait staff sitting down eating their own dinner during service just isn't acceptable.  
I loved the atmosphere of this restaurant.  Very relaxed.  Great staff - friendly and courteous.  Make you feel right at home.  Food was delicious.  From the salad to the entree, everything was great.
Went here for date night. Waited awhile for our food, which was awful. They need to get better cooks.  Will not be back again.
Popular local restaurant, good food, especially the prime rib, reasonable prices and partial view of Lake Chargoggagoggmanchauggagoggchaubunagungamaugg (those finding it difficult to pronounce call it Lake Webster.) Nice place to start the evening with a martini, good meal and pleasant dining experience.
We love the Lodge and have dined here often, especially when we lived in the area. Now, we dine here when visiting family nearby. There is a large lounge area as you enter...with lots of counter space as well as tables...this leads to the very large dining room...with views of the woods and lake. There is a giant stone working fireplace on one entire wall. Great service here...and a really attractive menu...love all the seafood and the steaks are stellar...my two favorite menu items are the fried large shrimp and the grilled bone in pork chops. The salads are always fresh and the choice of dressings is excellent.  Lots of great appetizers...ftom calamari to clams casino to mozzarella sticks to stuffed mushrooms. The Lodge is known for its fresh twin lobster dinners...always a great choice. They also have a large function room and outside dining in nice weather. The bartenders are awesome here and can make any drink imaginable...super scotch old fashions. All the servers are experienced and friendly. Nice restrooms and a large parking lot. Great owners too!
Just had Sunday dinner with five of us at the Lodge.  The food was very good, all five of us very were very happy.  We had tenderloin tips, baked haddock ,Mediterranean chicken, classic burger and Mediterranean swordfish. The waitress did a great job.  I'll definitely be going back.

One complaint - they no longer have family style chicken dinner.  :-(

Paul
A pizza at Tony's is always excellent.  I have had many different dinners and subs in the past, and all are great too, but it is hard to not order the pizza because it is just so delicious!  The staff is always super friendly here and the facility is always exceptionally clean too.
OK, this our go to place when we want a special pizza.  We always order the shrimp scampi pizza.  O.M.G...it is soooo good, (with a side of buffalo wings).  We love it!!!  This pizza is a MUST TRY if you like shrimp scampi!
Pizza was seriously undercooked.  Hawaiian had full slices of ham under handfuls of pineapple.  Vegetarian was 80% mushrooms.

Both were tasteless and awful.

We used to love Tony's - no more.  We won't be back.
I dont know if it is because I go here after I do a mud run or what it is but the food is so good .. I order off menu and they have no problem filling my order..
Great location and fast service make it a very convenient place to grab a quick bite or even a dinner.
We stop here approximately once a month for dinner.  We have never been disappointed!  The restaurant is clean, the staff are friendly and it is always busy.  You place your order at the counter, get your order number and seat yourself.  The food is ready in a timely fashion.  We have had the chicken wings, the subs and of course, the pizza.  My son always has the chicken tenders and fries.  The portions are large.  All are delicious.  The pizza is the best around and we wish we lived closer so that we could have it more often!  Try it ... you'll like it!  :-)
We have been coming here for years and came to Tony's for the pizza this time because their pizza is excellent.  We have had the subs, dinners,pasta, soup and sandwiches in the past and we have never had a meal here that is not excellent, but today we came here for the delicious pizza!
Everything is very good, from Pizza to Sandwiches to Salads to Dinners.
Chicken Parm dinner is one of our favorites.
On a recent Friday night we had dinner there, they were very quick, the food was good, and plenty, and the beer cold! We have had take-out there before, but had never dined there. Only one minor issue, when we get the large Pizza, it is a little smaller than the large at other places, but otherwise the food is very good.
hometown pizza and very good. Take out and call ahead ordering is preferred as this place gets packed. 
Anyone who has ever been to Tony's Pizza in Sutton knows they are the best!!  Great and delicious food no matter what you order.  The staff is also very friendly.  On Friday evenings it can be very busy, so if you can phone ahead it is probably a good idea.  You will never be disappointed with your meal.  You will surely come again.  Enjoy!!  Diane A--Sutton, MA
I have eaten at Tony's many times.  I get something different every time.  Whatever I get, the food is always AWESOME!  I love this place.  They are not skimpy with the food.  The food is also cooked to perfection, and the prices are reasonable.  I could eat there every night...  You will NOT be disappointed...  The food is great!
I had one of the cold subs which is always excellent.  The secret to how delicious the subs are at Tony's seems to be the super fresh rolls he uses.  The other person in my party had the pizza which is always excellent.  Tony has one of the best pizza recipes I have ever found anywhere.  He has an extensive menu and I have tried many selections over the years of traveling through the area on Rt. 146, and I can honestly say I have never had a bad meal here no matter what I tried.
Super fresh food - The place is always packed but somehow they stream people through so that the wait time is usually no longer than 25 minutes. Highly Recommend
Dependable good quality food with fast service. Always fresh. Fridays they have fresh fish and the servings are hefty.
Given this place the old college try 3 times now and 3 strikes your out.  The pizza is dreadful disgusting, enough said.  Tried the meatball sub, also not so good, too much bread.  Wings, gooey even after I requested crispy.  And last, chicken parm sandwich, clearly frozen prebreaded chicken.  Gross and on par with the rest of nasty central Mass pizza places.  
Ton's is the place to go for great food, fast service and reasonable prices. Staff is always friendly and accommodating.  
Driving along, running errands and was starting to get hungry. I noticed Tony's Pizza on the hillside. I stopped in and was going to get pizza but i was tempted with another choice. Now grant you, I ate here before. 

On their stand-up poster, it mentioned a Reuben Panini. The picture looked mouth watering. So i decided to order the sandwich, with a side of french fries and a ice cold Sam Adams beer. 
Once you order,they give you  number. You find yourself a table and when you order is ready, they call you. After 10 minutes, they called my number and they handed me just my french fries. I asked where my sandwich is and they is wasn't ready yet. 

I decided to eat the fries before they got cold. They were just your basic fries that has that 'coating' on them. Nothing to rave home about. Fifteen minutes later, my grilled Reuben Panini was ready. It did not look like the mouth watering picture on the poster. Very basic sandwich. Seems like they are losing their love in creating great mouth watering sandwiches. Thank goodness I had my beer.
Lower end of the pizza scale.  Grinders were ok, best feature was their size.  Buffalo wings also okay, but very mild with almost no kick.  Their web site ordering is a nightmare and should embarrass them.  Can't delete items and have to clear the list and start all over.  Then, once all the order customization is done, you can't ask for a pick-up time sooner than 2 hours!  You still have to call them and straighten out the details.  How is THAT a convenience?  

Worst thing was that they try to pass off a calzone as a Stromboli.  Not rolled up, just plopped on a pizza shape and folded!  AND it was the soggiest, greasiest pile you ever saw.  A complete disappointment.
Tony's always has excellent pizza and a full menu besides.  I have tried many entrees and sandwiches/subs and never had a bad meal here.  The pizza is so good that I have a hard time trying something else from the menu, but I have a few times and everything is always well prepared.  The unique thing about Tony's is that you pay at the counter on your way in and pick up your own food when you are paged, but that is probably how he keeps the prices so low.  I have even detoured off of the Mass Pike just to stop at Tony's so it is worth checking out if you have never been here.
Merlot-on-the-Water is absolutely wonderful in every way!  

The setting is beautiful with decks and gazebo overlooking the pond and trees. The grounds are well-maintained and look lovely in every season with short walkable paths and a variety of plants that add to the natural scenery.

Inside, the rooms are elegant and well-appointed with attention to classic color and function.  The rooms are perfect for weddings, bridal and baby showers, anniversary parties, and any other events. Our personal  touches were easily added to create our own style for our bridal shower.

One of the best features is the manager and staff.  They were efficient, helpful, and easy to work with as we planned our event. Victoria provided both creative and practical suggestions that worked very well, including tasty appetizers, entrees, and signature drinks. She was thoughtful, understanding, and eager to help personalize our shower.  Her staff clearly followed through and supported our wishes.
Communication was excellent all along the way, from beginning to end.

The chef is to be highly commended for his ability to provide a most delicious array of foods in a lovely presentation. He took into account all our needs and preferences, including gluten-free and allergies and was available for questions.  Our guests loved his delicious and seasonal foods!

Our family and friends were very impressed with every aspect of Merlot; they lingered longer to take in all the good feelings of the setting and decor of this fine venue.  We have the best memories of our time spent celebrating at Merlot-on-the-Water.


The grounds and decor are absolutely breathtaking, there are several rooms upstairs to get ready for your event and even a nice smaller bar away from the main dining room. The main room is not massive but nice and roomy beautifully decorated and not too flashy. We were there to inquire about holding our wedding at the facility and the staff were very friendly and answered all my questions thoroughly. Their package prices were over our budget which is the only reason we didn't choose it. Being situated on the water with a lovely landscaped back yard it would be a dreamy place for not only a wedding but an anniversary and very impressive for a work function. If it is within your budget I would recommend it for your special day.
Bartender Sarah is great.  
Second trip here. Both times I asked for my wings well done. Not even close.  They are the hottest you will find. Went to mild the second trip and they were still hot.  Most places I find them wimpy hot.

Nice place but of you can't cook my food the way I want it I will find someone that can.
We have eaten there several times this year and last and it is always fantastic.
The service is always friendly.
Very friendly staff.  Fast service. Great roast beef sandwich wit au jous and fries.  Very clean and nice ambiance.  Easy access and ample parking.
This is our hometown bar & grille which we frequent. We love the wings,  fish & chips,  galubkis , drinks and the people. Nice place with lots of TVs & fun! 
To get to the point. I stopped by the Main Street Grille and ordered a large Margherita Pizza take out... It was beyond Awful !  

I'm not a 'Foodie', but my guess is the crust was purchased pre-made complete with a swipe of sauce. The pizza was dry, no 'life' meaning It did not have the appearance  someone actually made it before putting it in the oven. I'm guessing it was frozen and heated up,  that's how bad it was.  The shrimp was dry and tasteless. Did I say Awful. 

I ate some of it hoping I'd 'get over my disappointment' but no such luck, ended up throwing most of my $22 pizza out. It's three hours later and I have an odd chemical taste in my mouth. 

I'm not not one to post reviews of any kind ( this is my first ever ) .  I really wanted my experience to be positive because I believe in supporting local business, but this pizza order was the worst ever.
A group of 30 people were attending the Broad Brook Opera House for a show.  Twenty of us met at this restaurant for dinner with several weeks notice that we would be doing so so that they could be prepared.  We arrived at 5:30 allowing for plenty of time before the 8 pm show across the street.  We ordered at 6 and at 7:20 were told the food would be out in "2 minutes" - twenty minutes later it started to be served.  That left 20 minutes to eat get across the street for the show.  Inhaled our food which was mediocre at best, and started checking out.  I was the first person in line, gave the girl a ten and was told that she didn't have change for it.    We were not the only ones complaining about long waits, some of the stage hands from the show were also there.  Likewise they were there at 5:30 and got their food 5 minutes before they had to leave.  Both groups were given 10% off the bill.  Next show we will eat elsewhere first.
We are locals and have been coming here since 2012.  They have had some staff changes but they may be on right track now.  The menu needs updating, same menu for 2 years.  Removal of frozen foods, additions of chicken, and white sauce dishes, vegetables.  PS No one likes pea soup, and jello.  Good beer and wine selection and good prices.  Entertainment can be good but sometimes draws a sketchy crowd which is a turnoff.  Change is good and envitable to maintain your town presence.  Brookside Pizza has moved in across the street and there is no match on menu.  Good point Sunday Pierogies, homemade by owners Mom.
Really wasn't expecting much. But wow!  The chicken wrap and Greek salad were wonderful. Portions were large and prices were more than reasonable. It's close to home and we'll be going back. 
This is a great place.  Food is very good and reasonably priced.  They have trivia on Thurs nights and music on Fri.  Don't miss the homemade perogies on Sun.  My only complaint is service.  It can be slow and at times the bar seems more like a hangout for the bartender and her friends.  Owner could be more friendly and make the rounds with guests.  Other than that is pretty darn good, better than other restaurants in area for quality and value.
I will start by saying the food was good. Probably the best deal in the State. Had Bar Pizza, it was good. The waitress was good, however she lacked training. We shall return !!!
I never went to this restaurant when it was Sam Buca's but I've just had dinner and watched Off The Cuff perform there less than a week ago. It is now called Main Street Grille but your receipt may still say Sam Buca's. 

Like so many waitresses these days, ours was not up to par. She was young; inexperienced; had little common sense (never walk by a table with empty hands...take something with you back to the kitchen!) if any. However she was pleasant and cheerful throughout the evening. She also failed to clear our tiny table so I stacked our dishes and handed them to her when we were finished with them (she still failed to grasp that the table needed to be cleared). We also quickly learned to ask for another drink before you were ready for it because chances are you she wouldn't be back very soon. That idea served us well. (this is not my first rodeo with less than stellar waitresses). Then she actually stopped waiting on tables and spent at least a half hour rolling silverware into napkins at a table in the back. That is side work and should only be performed at the end of the evening when you don't have customers waiting for you to provide further service. I never saw any sign of managment so there was no one doing any monitoring or correcting the wait staff. 

The potato skins were excellent! The seafood meal was less than it could have been. The fish was cooked fine and the potato was also good but the coleslaw came on the plate in a little cup like you'd get from a fast food place. Is there a shortage of coleslaw in the world?

My cob salad was adequate as a salad but not exceptional at all and seemed to be missing a lot of the items that make it the 'cob' part. I thought the prices were slightly too high for the food we received coupled with the waitress not being good either. This place needs to whip their wait staff into shape and fast! And it wouldn't hurt to take another look at the food they offer and make some adjustments there as well. 
I've also noticed that the menu on their website is not complete; several items are not listed on it. The overall appearance is that someone didn't finish it (although the waitress told us they've been in business about a year).  Not professional looking.

The band Off The Cuff was great and they've played there before. I think the band was responsible for filling the restaurant for them. They should continue to have musical entertainment of some kind with no cover charge. I'm sure their alcohol sales were through the roof when they had the band there. 

Overall I'm getting the impression that most of the same wait staff from Sam Buca's may still be working at Main Street Grille and if they don't improve on their training there will be more problems in that direction again. They would also benefit by offering a more plentiful meal where possible (stop skimping on the coleslaw) or eliminate everything but the pizza and grinders they offer. They are falling short of being a REAL restaurant and coming across as more of a pizza joint with music.
We went on their opening day and waited over 45 min for our food, went next door and ordered to go and got that before the original Chinese food order was done. Buckets of food on the floor, the staff all sweating into the food and complete lack of organization. We did try again a few months ago and the food was bland and still took forever, it's a big no for us.
It's now called Brookside Pizza. We love ordering pizza from this local business, because we like supporting local businesses and because the pizza is good! Good sauce, good cheese, good crust and we've always gotten a hot pizza! 
The food here is really delicious for a neighborhood bar. ...the chef Jim is do nice I always have special requests and he does it for me no problem....our favorites are chicken marsala chicken picatta chickenparm. The sauce is amazing. .the tuna grinder is to die fot..
food was not so good maybe should try again it was quite a while ago when I ate there maybe they have a new cook

Friendly server.  Good menu selections. Great weekday special of 8 inch grinder, coke and chips for $6.  Clean interior.  Easy access and ample parking.
Excellent pizza. You will be pleasantly surprised. The service was excellent and staff was great, and I was able to go on several dinners there. The owner was great as well
Crust was excellent and the sauce had just the right
Amount of seasoning to give it an authentic taste.
Well what a great place.  First it is under new ownership. The bar has been completely cleaned inside and per owner more updates to come.  The food is excellent.  I've had pizza and the Chicken dishes.  Chicken is pounded out, fresh, seasoned just right.  Happy Hour drafts for 1$.  The have Kareoke on Friday nights at 9pm.  They are to something here.  A hidden gem just needs some marketing to get people in.  Would certainly revisit.
I have been going here for years for pizza and grinders. I have had 2 bad dishes in the last 2 months. My chicken dinner was cold and then I ordered a pizza and the middle was soggy.  I'm not a pizza maker and I know it does take a skill. I guess the new owner doesn't have the skills of the old owner. 
Great pizza and food.  Elaine is a sweetheart and has been making great food for years.  If you like thick crust pizza, you should def try this place.
Also good Greek dishes.   Near the center of Broadbrook
Wow this was delicious...three of us got 3 different breakfasts and they were all great.
Fluffy scrambled eggs, bacon, home fries and toast.
Omelet, bacon, toast, home fries and coffee
Loaded homefries, bacon and iced tea

Can't beat the price...the loaded home fries were to die for..not greasy..just yummy

We were there to catch up with each other and we were not rushed at all. Nice waitstaff ....
The restaurant had been there for many years. It is convenient for Ellington residents. Great breakfasts. Also open for lunch. A haven for early morning hunters and fishermen in their respective seasons. 
Let's just say it has been well over 20 years since I was here & my Fresh lunch yesterday was lovely.  I had 3 Homemade salads on a plate for $8.99 - Chicken, Potato & Tuna.  I thought later when I had first walked in & saw a Huge portion of Cole Slaw being served & noticed on the menu that a side is $2.50 - Why on earth my 3 salad plate was not at least $7.50?  The math says it should have been at least that.  Oh well, service was terrific, although I personally would NOT want to pool tips as they have to do here.  All 3 servers were excellent, personable & full of home-town niceness.  I'm sorry I did not get their Stuffed Cabbage Special yesterday that I did not know anything about until I overheard it being announced to some other customers.  Next time for sure!  They close at 2 p.m., so get there early, because they are a Breakfast & Lunch place that is always busy.
Good Food and Good Service - we went there for breakfast and the line was out the door, but we didn't have to wait long     --  they are quite efficient at getting people sat down in a timely fashion
Make sure before you go that you have cash. There is an ATM inside but it is more convenient to bring cash with you. The breakfast here is great. There are lots of locals and it is always busy! I had the apple cinnamon french toast on wheat bread and it was great!  
Great breakfast and lunch menu.  You get a great amount of food for your money.  Food is excellent! Highly recommended.
Stopped in for a quick breakfast yesterday, and despite the large crowd everything was prompt and hot. Eggs, bacon and toast were all as expected. Hash browns were dull (unseasoned and no onions, just plain potatoes), but I don't need the extra calories! They kept my coffee cup full, which is the most important thing.
They have excellent breakfast foods, everything,doesn't matter what you order. The bacon and eggs taste unbelievably fresh. The service is also very fast there.
Long-time Ellington residents rave about the Chuck Wagon, so after many months of hesitation I finally stopped in for breakfast. The corned beef hash was as dry as the Sahara. Toast had blackened edges. Hard to get a coffee refill. And cramped. It's just a below-average local greasy spoon. I see no reason to recommend this restaurant unless you live nearby and have no mode of transportation to get to another restaurant, and you've no food at home to eat.
A friend and I had breakfast here recently.  This place is a favorite of the locals who live in this rural community.  Breakfast portions were so large that we couldn't finish.  I had eggs scrambled, toast and a side of corned beef hash, while delicious - it was enormous.  She had french toast - several large pieces with fruit and syrup.  The staff were very friendly and coffee and tea refills were graciously offered several times.
This place is always packed but it's worth the wait.  The food is good and their specials are always good.  I have dined in and taken out, both are easy to deal with for wait time. There is a nice little older fashioned counter with stools if you want to drop in and there are also booths for a more relaxed feel and tables if you may be bringing a customer for a little business lunch.  The afternoon is noisy so if it's quiet your looking for this is not the place.  The only thing I don't like is they only take cash and in this day and age most people do not carry a lot of cash so you have to pre-plan for that. The staff is extremely friendly and accommodating.
Large portions. Fast friendly service. Home Fries were mushy. Omelet was filled nicely however the egg was transparent.
The outside of Chuck Wagon doesn't do justice to the space available inside and the comfortable, friendly, traditional diner type atmosphere. The waitstaff were lovely and called out to many of the customers by name. The food was good and reasonable. Great local place to eat in Ellington.
Food and service is great, staff very friendly and attentive.  Small-town cozy and attractive décor, family owned.  Love going there!
Okay, so its not a secret any longer but it is a gem of a place in our small New England town of Ellington, CT.  Food is very delicious, meaty omelets are meaty, service is top notch, coffee is always kept filled, toast is toast, not warm bread.  I only eat breakfast here.  Its always busy yet there is always a place to be seated!  Great place. Always satisfied.  keep in mind debit and credit cards are not accepted.  Bring cash.
Great breakfast and lunch restaurant...bright, clean and friendly.  They are always there to warm up your coffee so you can finish the large portions delivered.
I've been going to the Chuck Wagon for many years now and realized I've never reviewed them. It's your typical local breakfast joint - crowded and bustling with activity every weekend morning. Sometimes there is a wait but it's not usually that long and there's really nowhere else to eat in the vicinity, so you might as well wait. The service is always quick and friendly. It's been predominantly the same staff as far as I can recall since I started going there 8 years ago. A lot of the regulars sit at the counter which leaves the tables free for when we go. It's usually crowded so it's hard to squeeze a high chair in for our daughter without feeling like we're in the way so sometimes we wait to get a table in the corner or out of the way. There are always specials and the regular menu has plenty to choose from too. The coffee is always weak, but that is no reason not to go. Prices are very reasonable and the food comes out quick. And it's noisy so no one minds our daughter babbling away or banging her toy on the table. 
Very good local restaurant.  This a small restaurant, not like Ihop.  We only go here for breakfast.  The service is great and fast.  We've never had a bad meal.
Great local restaurant! Speedy friendly service but if you care to stay and chat over coffee that's OK too! Very relaxing atmosphere with a home town feel!
we have been here several times and never had a bad meal.  The best by far was the Rueben Omelet last weekend.  The hash is good - not out of a can.  Portions are good and service is fast.  Just what you want for a good breakfast spot.
Finally made it to Collins Creamery for first time this year. Didn't disappoint. The ice cream is always delicious. Best "hard" ice cream around. Reminds me of crescent ridge dairy.
Great homemade ice cream. Sit by the farm on picnic tables and enjoy your great ice cream. The kids will enjoy the cows and other animals.
A pretty place to sit back and relax.
Very good ice cream.  The long line is worth the wait. They have lots of seating and are dog-friendly. Definitely a must-visit if you're in the area!
Kind of out in the sticks, but fantastic ice cream. Eat it outside in a dairy farm atmosphere. Many many flavored, you are sure to find what you like.
Best ice cream around. The turtle sundae with hot fudge was awesome! Worth the drive from Massachusetts 
From sundaes, to shakes, or cones, we have been pleased with this ice cream. There are many flavors.
Collin's Creamery is a fantastic place that is hidden away in town.  The ice cream is amazing.....try the "Collin's Compost" flavor.  Heavenly.  And they are homemade.  And the owners and staff are fatastic
On this most recent visit, I had I cone of Toasted Almond that took me back to my childhood memories of the ice cream on a stick. I've never regretted a flavor choice in this beautiful farm setting which can sometimes be fragrant depending on the season. We often bring our dogs to sit with us at one of the many picnic tables. They love watching the cows!
Collins offers homemade ice cream, and a wide variety! Can visit with the cows while you sit and enjoy your ice cream. Pleasant staff, reasonable prices for large servings. 
The ice cream is very good, rich and creamy.  This is definitely a local hidden gem as it is off the beaten path and you have to know where it is or you would never find it.  The portions are generous - a small sundae has 2 scoops.  There are lots of picnic tables to sit and enjoy.
We really enjoyed our first visit to Collins. The coconut chocolate chip was amazing!! This place is worth the drive if you love ice cream!
If you are in the area you must stop here!  It is a little off the main streets, but extremely well worth the visit. The counter servers were very helpful and polite.  They have a wide variety of ice cream products and flavors.  I would highly recommend it!!
This is just the creamiest, tastiest and most delicious icecream in town. It sure hits the spot on a hot, sticky day.

Best ice cream in town.  I love supporting local businesses and they are a business with heart.  They have the friendliest staff and our dog loves to get a pup cup.
Great ice cream and a variety of toppings.  Sits on top of a hill with a great view. They have both soft serve and hard ice cream.
Like the farm setting.  They have cows.  Lots of flavors of ice cream..  Sundaes are also good.  Hot fudge is great.
A wonderful family business with natural ingredients. Huge crowds, but everyone is happy to wait because they know the ice cream is worth the wait
Ok  you need to try this ice cream!!!  Best in the area    a little pricey  but Yummy😄😄😄😄😄  tucked away from regular traveled  roads.   Some people do not even know this part of town   but here we are   come on by  you will fall in love
Collins Creamery is a local seasonal ice cream stop. Their homemade ice cream is rich and creamy. All the flavor a are delicious.
Best ice cream, with amazing choices, beautiful setting. They have yogurt and sugar free ice cream.  So many flavors you will have an awful time trying to make a choice.
Went to a wedding reception and dinner for my wife's niece.  Atmosphere was very nice, great view of the golf course.  Service, food, and drink were all very good
Went here for a reception and was surprised how nice it was the food was buffet and included everything from chicken to pasta yum.
Went in with reservations, very accommodating, decent food
We both got wraps and they were very good.  I had a chicken Caesar wrap.  It was good, liked the dressing they use.  Comes with chips.  You get your drinks from the standing cooler.
Great food, great prices.   Literally love everything on the menu!   Small, not many tables, great seafood on Friday nights.   Best anywhere, and we are very picky about our seafood!!!!!
Two work buddies and I stopped here while driving through to get from one place to another.  If we weren't in a hurry and starving, this review would end here with STAY AWAY IF THE TATTOOED COOK TOUCHES YOUR FOOD WITHOUT GLOVES.

Alas, we all ordered subs, which we waited for at the counter, where we saw the full food prep in operation.  The tattooed dude failed at his attempt to slide my buddy's sub from tray to table (thereby missing the prepared wrapper underneath), he looked around first before using both ungloved hands to pick it up, move it over and wrap it.  Now, I don't care what you say, but the guy looked like he just got away with something.  

My two buddies said their subs were good, but my steak and cheese was mostly bread.  I thought $18.45 for a large sub, chips, and soda was a little high.  After eating the meal, I do feel like Danny's got away with something.  

Would not recommend.
We have never been to Danny's though we had heard it was pretty good. So we decided to order take out sandwiches since we were going right across the street to the new Enfield Brewery. The girl who waited on us told us that her grandfather is the owner. She took our orders, then helped another girl to learn how to use the credit card scanner and register. Her hands were all over these machines. She then answered the phone, picked up a filthy pencil and then counted a pile of money and coins. She then went to the register, put the money in the drawer and THEN proceed to go to the ovens, took out our sandwiches, used her bare hands to cut and wrap our sandwiches. I was appalled and almost yelled at her across the room to wash her hands before she touched our sandwiches. I didn't want to cause a scene as there were other diners standing around, but I truly wanted to refuse the sandwiches. My husband had to tell me to turn away, don't look and we won't see it. I stared at her with disbelief.After she handed us our order, she wiped the underneath of her nose, then wiped her eyelid, then pushed her hair back. How can a woman her age, working in a place that serves food to the public, not know that you have to wash your hands after you've touched money and other dirty objects around her? This is absolutely forbidden. The guy making the cold sandwiches in the right side of the store had plastic gloves on. Does she feel she is above that because she happens to be the owner's granddaughter? This restaurant is a terrible health risk and we will not be returning. The sandwiches, meatball and chicken parmesan were very bland and could use salt & pepper. We took the bag, expecting napkins and packets of salt and pepper. Nothing. Needless to say, this was the topic of conversation at the Brewery and overwhelming response was "UGH"
Portions are large and the food is very fresh.  Good family restaurant to go to or take-out.  Pizza is good and the grinders are excellent and generous.
Great pizza! My dad and I come here often when we're craving pizza. Overall there's affordable food and great service.
Delicious pizza, friendly staff and great prices. I am at the corner table or at the counter twice a week. It doesn't matter what you choose to eat, it's all great! My favorite pizza, of course.
Ordered a Roast beef sandwich for pick up ,call in and asked if it was rare ? Said yes ,It was dry not rare ,bread was stale fell apart when you picked it up ,,not the first time ..just went there for convenience, no dislike for Danny ,but when you hire kids or people that dont care bout there work this is what you get.
I went here for pizza on 2/14/16.  It was negative 4 outside and I drove across town to get pizza here after a lot of good reviews on Facebook and on here.  I brought the pizza home and we started pulling hair out of our mouth on the first slice.  I am bald!  I called and they told me in order to get a refund they needed the pizza back and the hair.  I kept explaining that I am bald and that I didn't want to come back out in the cold.  All I got was that I had to come back with the proof.  I brought it back in and they were as cold to me as the temperature outside.  Really she could have voided my credit card transaction over the phone from her terminal.  NEVER going back.  Don't recommend this place to anyone unless you like eating hair.  They couldn't figure out how a long hair would have gotten in it as the girls don't work the pizza area, but then I see one go and answer the phone next to where the pizza counter is and her hair is the same color and in a ponytail.  Just disgusting.  How does this place stay in business?
Only giving 1 star because it's impossible to give zero.  We just had the WORST experience with the owner of Danny's Pizza!  We ordered two grinders at 3:00 and were told they'd be delivered to us by 3:45.  At 4:15 I called to check on the status of the order and was told that it "just left" and the girl on the phone was super nice, and said she was "so sorry" and "should have called" to say their kitchen was backed up.  I said ok, we're just a little frustrated and she said she completely understood and to hold on.  Then the owner got on the phone and said "Hello?  What's your problem?  What's wrong?"  I explained the situation and the conversation I had just had with the girl on the phone, and he said "So what do you want me to do?  I can't control everything.  Tell the driver to just take them back then!"  I was floored; I cannot believe this is how he runs his business.  He was so rude and ridiculous, instead of just apologizing or saying "Yes, we should have let you know, we're so sorry about that..." or whatever.  The guy was unreal; honestly yelling into the phone...clearly they have terrible customer service and care very little about their reputation.  Needless to say, we won't back.

On a side note, we went to Chipotle the other day and they ran out of an ingredient we requested our order so they gave us TWO FREE coupons for meals...we hadn't complained or said a word, they just said that was part of their customer service...just to be caring and ensure we were happy and we'd be back.  Danny's Pizza on the other hand is apparently doing so well for themselves that they don't need repeat customers.
The food quality is hit or miss. Sometimes it's quite good and other times disappointing.  The reason I give a one star ratings is because of the service. I've given them multiple chances and the people that work here are rude and hostile. Rude to customers and hostile to each other. It is a pretty uncomfortable environment whether you dine in or just suffer through a few minutes for take out. There are much better options if dining in Enfield. 
One of Danny Pizza Drivers when backing out of my driveway hit my mail box and knocked it down.  I called Danny the owner he told me he was to busy and he would check with his driver in a few days and told me there was no way it was his driver.  I could not believe he would not call his driver he said he was to busy running the business and had no time.  He was very unfair and did not even want to talk to me and hung up the phone on me.  I will never buy from this place there pizza had gone way down hill in the past couple years
Excellent pizza any way you want it,the salad is to die for especially the chicken you get a large chicken breast cut up and put in your salad a long with many other veggies.Now the grinders are full of meat and  not all bread.
There is nothing fancy about Danny's....other than Simpson characters welcoming you to the rest rooms! But if you are looking for Yankees tickets....or the best homemade garlic and cheese bread in town.....or the biggest portions for salads....or the best marinara sauce in town used in all of their Italian items....then this is the least expensive place you will want to go to! Expect friendly service and a mom and pop restaurant feel...it's all good!
Used to rate Danny's as five stars, but agree that consistency in quality for their standard pizza is gone.  That said, I've never, ever had a bad specialty pizza (the white pizza with tomato and broccoli is a fav), order the Chef Salad with house dressing at least once a week during the summer, and can vouch that they have the best delivery staff in town.  Nowhere better in town.
Owner was rude, obnoxious, etc to my 17 year old niece. When her father called to talk to manager about the incident he berated him over the phone. Food has never been great but we would go from time to time. We will never go again. Stay away.
Live in the area and have been occasionally buying pizza there for more than 10 years.  They used to be the best, but have gradually gone down hill.  The last pizza we ordered there a few weeks ago will likely be our last.  It had zero taste, like eating cardboard.  Don't understand what has changed?  Many better options in the area...
Anyone who comes from New England and moves to the South misses a really good pizza. When I come back home to visit my three staples are pizza, lobster and grinders
 (H&M see review)! On my last trip to visit family in Ct. my sister told me she found her new pizza place. She ordered one that had bacon on it so I'm not a fan, but the crust was good and so was the sauce. Next time I got one with just hamburg, onions, and roasted peppers. Wow, best pizza ever. now maybe I am on some withdrawal from good pizza, but this was awesome. Loaded with my ordered items yet balanced well with enough sauce. Needless to say in the two weeks I was there I ate this pizza several times. See you next year!
Consistently the best pizza and calzone in the land! Also tried the spinach pie- which was not the spanikopita I expected but it was AMAZING. And try the Reuben while you're at it. Can't beat the quality of the food or the value. They also remember repeat customers no matter how busy. 
my family and i order out at least once a week we have tryed other pizza places but have always returned to dannys. we love there burgers ,grinders. and pizza. We have always had a good experience. Also really quick note danny is also great to the special needs. our son worked there for two school years and he was very kind to him and the other children in the program. he aslo dose a lot for the  commuity which i saw first hand when he delivered prime rib to the special needs graduation so yes we will keep going to dannys pizza
My wife and I stopped for lunch and ordered whole-belly clams and a BLT. A little before noon, the place was quiet, but our waitress was friendly and took good care of us. The portion of clams was plentiful and done well. I was disappointed that the coffee was more than $2.00 a cup, though. Otherwise the prices seemed reasonable
Hands down the best restaurant in Ellington, so I wish it wasn't the last one I'd tried. The lasagna we had last week was amazing, and tonight we were astounded by the pizza. Friendly service, too, so this is now our go-to restaurant in Ellington.
Holiday pizza is a small local Restsurant in Ellington. Their pizza is average and dependable for the area.
Don't drive by this place because of it's appearance. It's one of those places that deserves a try. Trust me. When you walk in don't walk out because of it's appearance. We almost did but we would have made a huge mistake. The pizza is without a doubt the best pizza in the area. We were so full after devouring a large pie but we ordered another to go for later on. Something about the sauce is rather addicting. It's homemade and so good that we asked for a cup on the side for crust dipping. The food is fresh and clean and so delicious it has become a family favorite. Oh and the servers, friendly and professional on every level. We have returned again and again.
ordered a few pizzas here for a family birthday party. one was cheese and it was fine. the one with all the meats on it was better. 

see the pizza picture i took with this review

we would probably order from here again
Went to Angelina"s for breakfast this morning with a friend because we wanted pumpkin pancakes.

The breakfast for the most part was good, but the total for the bill was shocking.

The service was very slow and when we finally got our meals we had to ask for butter which normally comes with pancakes and it took the waiter a few minutes to return with the butter.

We both ordered pumpkin pancakes with a side of bacon.  

For $8.95 you get three pumpkin pancakes with a carmel/walnut topping. 
NOTE:  The picture advertising pumpkin pancakes out in front shows FIVE pancakes, not three)

 We ordered a side of bacon which came with three pieces for $3.25 each.

I ordered the pumpkin coffee and that was $2.75.  My friend got regular coffee for $1.99.

For two people our total bill came to a whopping $30.99.
We could have had full dinner for that price.

Very disappointed about the cost and will probably not go back.  $32.00 for two people for breakfast is outrageous.  They could have at least thrown the bacon in with the meal.
It was a pleasant surprise going to this restaurant for breakfast. The service was excellent and the food was superb. I highly recommend it.
Went to a business mtg. catered by Angelina's. The food was absolutely delicious ! Would definitely endorse hiring them for any affair you may have. Terrific variety of food as well. Reasonable prices !
Consistently good food!  Very generous portions and a great selection.   Can be counted on every time.  Prices consistent with the area.
Great place for breakfasts, amazing menu, huge quantities, well cooked.  Waitstaff is excellent, friendly and professional.  Amazingly, if you don't see it on the menu, they are willing to fix it "your way".
Angelina, the owner, is often on-site, is friendly and gracious.
We breakfast there often, their early-bird specials on Thursday, Friday and Saturday are quite good as well.
A little piece of home...........without all the work.
Place was mobbed on the Sunday that I went. Our server looked miserable (she must not be aware that you should smile when you're in food service), and we could hardly hear what she was saying to us. The food was bland, mushy, and tasteless. I'm a big fan of hash, and theirs tasted like dog food. None of us finished our meals, and we certainly won't be coming back.
While this restaurant was busy on Valentine's morning, four of us were seated rather quickly and then enjoyed hearty breakfasts served by an attentive young man who was our waiter.  The menu is extensive but our omelettes, eggs over and french toast were good sized portions and served hot.  Toast and homefries accompanied the egg dishes as well as CRISP bacon the way one of us likes it.  Additional coffee and water for tea were offered several times.  We found our meals to be affordable and a good value.  This restaurant, located in a small strip mall, is right on Route 190 in Enfield and there is plenty of parking.  There are many tables and an additional room to the side was being utilized on the morning we were there.
Angelina's has a good selection of items on their menu, but we mainly come here for the breakfast.  I have yet to find anything that wasn't well prepared and tasty.  The pricing seems about right for the level of service and the quality of food.  Some weekend mornings get pretty busy but the service still tends to be pretty fast.  ALL of the staff are pleasant and responsive.
The menu for breakfast was varied and just about any egg combination you could desire. Service was quick and professional. We were offered many rounds of coffee refills and additional service items were ordered and served quickly. The price is more than reasonable - great value for families.
We tried and Alina's for the first time for breakfast on a Sunday morning. The place was very busy but we were seated right away. Our server was friendly and efficient. Our food was good and my eggs were cooked exactly as requested. Nice thick bacon cooked just the way we like it (slightly crispy). Will return for sure.
The food was mediocre and the service was horrible. We easily waited 30 minutes for our food -there were only 3 other tables! And, two out of the four of us ordered cold sandwiches! It was obvious that my French toast sat under the warmer while the other food was prepared because the small container of butter on my plate was liquified. Very disappointed. 
My wife and I went for breakfast. We were warmly greeted and sat.  We both ordered omelettes that were ok, but not fresh tasting. My wife's toast was stale and she did not even eat the omelette. The service was slow.  I saw orders up and ready that sat for 3 to 5 minutes before being taken to the tables.  It was ok, but not a place I'd rush back to.
We were looking for somewhere new for breakfast. We were getting tired of the same place every Saturday morning. We've passed Angelina's but always after breakfast. This time we made it our breakfast stop.  The place was packed, always a good sign and we weren't disappointed. They have the usual breakfast fare and some different options too.  I had the Garden Quesadilla. It was incredible. Came with hone fried which were equally good. My husband has a Beef Fajita Omelette which he loved.  Coffee was great.  We also had a side of slab bacon (it's not breakfast without bacon) and it was done perfectly. We'll definitely be back.  Might try dinner too!  They would have had five stars but service was a bit slow. They were very attentive, just very busy. 
My husband and I live in Enfield and we like to have breakfast out on Sundays.  We have tried every place in town that serves breakfast and Angelina's is our favorite.  We usually go on Sundays in the late morning, and while the restaurant is always very busy, we've never had to wait very long for a table.  The service is friendly, and almost always prompt.  The food is great!  They have unique breakfast items to choose from as well as traditional staples.  We really like to try their breakfast specials too.  Since we've been eating at Angelina's we've found both the food and the service to be consistently good.  We highly recommend eating there over any other breakfast spot in town.  Their menu has a lot of choices and can satisfy the needs of the most diverse group.  We like their breakfast so much, we're going to eventually try the lunch and dinner menu too.  

Breakfast cocktails (Bloody Mary, Mimosa, etc) are also available at Angelina's now!
First time here.  We would definitely come back.  They serve breakfast all day and their lunch and supper menu's are also good.  Booths, clean and great service.  The owner gave us a tour of their small banquet room off to the side.  I had a cheeseburger and my friend had a vegetable quesadia (sp) and enjoyed it.  They do not serve salsa.  They make their own dipping sauce which had a strong flavor of cilantro.  We would definitely be back and try breakfast or supper.  The menu has something for everyone.
I've been coming to angelians for a long time now. I'm always satisfied with my orders and never had a compliant about the food. But I would recommend coming here for a great meal and don't listen to the mold in my food because not every restaurnant is perfect and every one has mistakes. But angelinas sure is my favorite breakfast place to go.
Won't be back.  Sometimes, it's a good thing to have a clear cut answer.  My family and I live right around the corner from Angelina's and we enjoy a good family Sunday brunch.  We've always waffled about this place.  The chef/owner doesn't always do the cooking and so the food you get is uneven in its quality.  The food, even when it is good, doesn't make up for the fact that it takes so long for it to come to you.  The wait staff is always disorganized and harried.  Today, however, all of that waffling problem has been solved.  I ordered a burger.  When it arrived, it tasted very bad.  A quick inspection of bun showed quite a bit of mold.  I pointed it out to the waiter, and he took it away, but shouldn't there have been some basic apology?  I know mistakes happen, but to be so cavalier about this means that they've lost my business.
My husband and I like to go to breakfast on Sundays. We had been by Angelina's and said we should try it someday. Someday was today. It was pretty busy when we walked in. The staff quickly cleared off a booth for us. Our server was very friendly and courteous. We asked several questions about the restaurant and she was very nice in answering them. Our omelets arrived in just a few minutes and they were very good. Our server also reccommended the dinners which are served on Thursday, Friday, and Saturday evenings. I think we will be back to try those too.
My son and his family took me to Angelina's Restaurant  for Mother's Day!   I had never been to this restaurant  and expected it to be crowed and the service slow because it was a holiday! 
Although we had a short wait, I was totally surprised how quickly we got seated for brunch.  We were a group of 7 with an infant and they served us all very well.

Good service, good food and plenty of servers to make the customers happy!  I have never seen such good service for such a BIG holiday!   Well done!  The food was great also!   They serve all kinds of food, I can't wait to go back again!
We went with friends to Angelina's Restaurant in a party of five. My wife and I were the only ones that had never been, and the others were impressed with there past experience's. The restaurant is unassuming looking like just another local place, however the food was exceptional. If you are looking for ambiance this is not for you, if you are looking for food that looks and tastes like it should be at an upper crust restaurant, but doesn't cost like one this is your place. The five of us all had different orders, I had Sausage & Chicken ALA Vodka, my wife had Chicken Francaise, our friends had Steak Fajitas, Baked Meatloaf and Cobb Salad. Each meal had a presentation and was not just put together on the plate, but most importantly, the food was great and at a reasonable cost.
Only been there once, but the food was very good, well prepared and they don't just offer the all the same variety of Italian  food you can get anywhere else. I'll go back.
Great first visit to this newer place.   Very good beef barley soup, and rock solid beef Gyro's.   Menu looks solid, prices very reasonable, nice atmosphere, and VERY convenient.   Will definitely return.   Give it a shot if you're in the neighborhood.   East to  find right on rt 190 between Enfield and Somers Ct.
Good variety, nice presentation, excellent service! Fish was fresh & perfectly prepared! Don't let exterior fool you....it's quite nice inside!
How can a McDonald's disappoint?  This one always does.  You know what to expect, right?  Never here.  Slow service, poor food that's not hot, and borderline dirty.   It's such a great location but I'm done.   My cold egg mcmuffin took me over the edge.
we sat inside to eat the food was just thrown in the tray the fries were spilled all over the sodas were leaking and gwot the fries soaked the meal was ruined 
This has to be the most filthy McDonalds I have ever visited, it truly looks like they never clean.  The floor was filthy, soda area was gross, soda everywhere and the floor was very sticky.  I won't even discuss the bathroom, I turned around and walked out.
Meanwhile, there were many employees just standing around as there were only a few patrons in the restaurant.  
Ironically, there was an employee outside washing the windows???!! hmmm.  
The food was typical McDonalds. I would advise driving further up the street to another McD's.
My son likes the egg Mc Muffin when on sale and also the double cheeseburger that has now left the dollar menu.
This facility is closed and up for sale. It has a great location on main street with plenty of parking.
only was in twice it was ok,  This grill just had a major face lift inside and out, we thought it would do well by its appearence but about 1 year later it was doors closed...
Went for a quick bite but it wasn't worth the effort.  I have a steak and cheese- just ok. Husband got the Reuben. It was ok but the corned beef was pretty fatty and had a strong flavor.  Fries and onion rings were ok but a bit greasy.  This place is clearly a bar - good place to stop for "the guys" but not for families or anyone who wants to have something to eat and talk.  It is very noisy and the cement floors don't absorb the noise.  Won't go back.
We had lunch at the Somers Grill & Tap Room today and were pleasantly surprised.  We lived in Somers for many years and this location was a less than savory bar while we lived nearby but a recent reincarnation into the Somers Grill & Tap Room has brought a nice, new choice of restaurants in town.  We both had salads that were very tasty and huge.  The BLT Caesar Salad and the Chef Salad were both very delicious and well presented.  There was also a good selection of beers on tap.  The service was good and the restaurant was clean and inviting.  We stopped in for lunch on the recommendation of a family member who still lives in Somers.  We'll definitely go back again.
What a surprise! Doesn't look like much from the outside, but what a nice dinner! Stopped in with a friend, and thought the menu had some nice choices... The the waitress started telling us about some of the items... For example, the pasta is made on site. As is the bread. And salad dressings. Some of the vegetables for side dishes come right from their garden. I had a pork chop and my friend had a pasta dish, and we were both so happy with our dinners! Wish we had room for dessert, because those sounded good, too. We will definitely be back!

Oh, and there was outside seating, too, and it's screened in. Nice option.
We went to the restaurant last night.  The decor isn't terribly fancy (and the bamboo ceiling seems a little odd), but it's comfortable and pleasant.  My wife ordered the sea bass over risotto and broccoli rabe, which came with a small side salad as well.  Both of our salads were pretty standard (lettuce, a couple of tomatoes, cucumber, a piece or two of onion), but were fresh and tasty.  They are proud that they make everything from scratch, and with local ingredients where possible.
My wife's sea bass was done perfectly; I had a bite and it was fresh and tasty, and the risotto was also good.  I had the lamb shank with broccoli and garlic mashed potatoes.  The potatoes were a bit salty (not to the point of being disagreeable), the broccoli was simply and perfectly steamed, also very fresh-tasting, and the lamb shank was excellent: falling-of-the-bone tender, with a fairly modest amount of braising sauce, which did not overwhelm the meat, but which was a perfect complement. Very tasty!  The portions were ample without being ridiculous.  The service was just fine.  One small criticism--my wife's margarita was small and almost all ice.  Otherwise, a fine meal; not the lowest prices, but certainly reasonable for the quality.  We'll be back.
I've been here twice before, but sat and ate in the bar.  This time we went with another couple and sat in the outside dining area.  The outside area is screened in and has a fire pit in the middle.  We were greeted warmly and seated promptly.  The service was good, not great.  I had the lamb shank which was really very good.  The rest of the food I saw being served looked really appetizing, too.  I will definitely go back again!
Had never been here or even heard of it. But I received 2 gift certificates for Golden Irene's and invited my daughter and her family out to eat their with my wife and myself. The parking lot was about 1/2 full when we arrived. We greeted immediately and were asked if we preferred indoor or outdoor seating, we chose to sit inside. The dining room was nearly empty. We were served right away by a very pleasant waitress. We ordered 4 different meals for adults and 2 kids meals with dessert. The taste and presentation of the meals was top notch from soups and salads to entrees. Excellent dining experience from start to finish. We will definitely be back.
Great food, great service. Love it. It's perfectly old school decorated...I love it. If the food takes longer than you'd expect it's because they are making it fresh! The cost is mid range but the quality is high!
After a friend recommended this restaurant's pizza, I went here with my dad and was not disappointed. This is one of the best pizza places I know of.
This is my family's favorite restaurant. We have never had a bad experience here. Always fresh and tasty food. George (Owner) is always cooking up great specials. The homemade bread is to die for.
Like another reviewer said we thought we would give Golden Irene's another shot as our last dish was very mediocre. This time we got calamari and halloumi salad both of which  were nice starters.  We decided on a pizza for our main to share. Unfortunately is was mushy, greasy, and extremely salty. We only finished a quarter of it. Sadly to say we will not be giving Golden Irene's a 3rd shot despite the great service.
Went there with a group of 10. Server was lost. Had the Carbonara. Absolutely horrible !! I've been ordering this dish and making this dish for 45 years and have never had anything this bad!!! . Instead of cooking in the egg yolk into the sauce they fried up an egg and tossed on top of the pasta. No flavor at all to this dish!!!! I asked for some grated cheese and they couldn't even do that right.. It came in one of those little plastic cups with a lid. No flavor to that either. Must be a lot of relatives writing the good reviews!!
Fresh fish dishes. Very friendly staff.  Nice ambiance. Cool bar. Fireplace in the main dining room. Very clean.  Easy access and ample parking.
I've been to Golden Irenes a few times now & have not been disappointed! Food and service were both excellent. My only complaint is that they don't let you do any kind of substitutions with the meals,  so hopefully you like them just the way they come! 
A friend and I followed the recommendation of some other friends.  We ate after seeing a play at Broad Brook Theater.  The meal was served hot and promptly.  The atmosphere is bland but the warm reception was nice.  The chef came to our table to ask about our meal.  I would recommend the restaurant for a nice dinner.
We tried golden irenes and were not disappointed. The food was cooked to perfection and the service was great. Menu is reasonably priced. I had scallops & shrimp skewer with the cajun and it was so good Will make this one of my favorite restaurants
My husband and I always get food here and it's great for him to pick up on his way home from work since we live nearby! This time I got the chicken caesar salad and the broccoli cheddar soup. Both amazing and I would definitely order again!! Love the food here!!
I had previous lived in East Windsor and now live in Enfield. Glad I'm still close to my family friendly restaurant that cooks every dish fresh and reminds you of your mother's cooking.  I have worked through their entire menu every dish is great and the owner George makes you feel at home.
My husband and I just had dinner and we were extremely impressed.  He had veal pram and said it was the best he ever had.  That's really saying something because he's pretty hard to impress.  I had the chicken with pumpkin risotto finished with a maple demiglaze and practically licked my plate clean as it was outstanding.  Will definitely be going here again and bringing along some foodie friends.  Additionally the waitress and other staff were extremely attentive and friendly.  We're so happy that we finally have a great restaurant to patronize.  Keep up the good work.
Golden Irene's is like an old comfortable pair of slippers. There are no pretenses here. What you see, is what you get. Patrons are dressed very casually. Plenty of to go activity on a Friday night.The wine list is limited and reasonable. The selection of appetizers is uninspired and pricey. Salad included with the dinner entree was also uninspired. Dressing served in plastic single serve cups, with lids on, is tacky. Bread very good. Hanger steak was Hanger Steak and nothing special. Scallops served over Squash Ravioli with a white sauce was nicely done. Tiramisu was great. Server excellent! We would go back and explore the menu more completely.
This is my second time going to Golden Irene"s.  I thought I would give it a second chance...shouldn't have.  Went with a group of people last night which of half thought it was not good food.  The scallops, as previously mentioned in reviews, were excellent but forget the rest of the menu especially the fried clams and grinders.  It was the worse grinder I have ever had!  Alot of meat but hardly any provolone, tomatoes or lettuce plus I ordered a hot oven and it was cold except for the crust.  I asked for fried pepper which all Italian restaurants offer on grinders but they charged me an extra $1 which brought up the price of a 8 inch grinder to $8.50!
Every time we go there we are treated like family.  I have never had a bad experience.  The wait staff are very good and George the owner always come around to check.
we ordered an appetizer and it never arrived. would have loved to try the scallops. they were busy that night. Our waitress seemed tired, but was pleasant. Got creamy peppercorn dressing on salad when I ordered vinegarette. Did not get offered any water at table.
I have had several occasions to use Joanna's Banquet Facility and each time the food was excellent.  I love the roast beef, red potatoes and green beans!  They are always cooked perfectly!
Food is very good. Cocktails are great! Enjoy sitting at the bar. Great staff, very friendly and always stop by to chat. 
We stopped for lunch while driving through town based on Trip Advisor reviews.  A little before 2pm we were the only customers.  Casual seating area with nice big screen tv's.  My spouse had a cobb salad with chicken which was ok although a little skimpy on the chicken.  I had a fish sandwich that wasn't good - maybe just bad luck with a bad filet...the taste was poor and the texture was inconsistent.  Service was very good but we won't be back. A lot of flies in the restaurant too.
Our family just had a reception following the funeral of my Aunt here today and I will state that Joanne personally was handling the back-room rental with grace and professionalism.  What a lovely luncheon set-up my cousin orchestrated for my aunt's funeral reception who was age 97 and had led a very exciting and long, happy life.  It is important in my opinion to do business with "LOCAL" people who are originally from Somers when contracting for services "in town" and this restaurant is owned by the "Lipton" family - as well as Pleasant View Farm on South Road.  Where a few years ago a couple other family functions were held in their very large metal building structure.  MY belief is that we all must encourage and support LOCAL business owners in any small towns, and so I say, Thank You to Joanne at the restaurant bearing a version of her name!  The food and service was excellent!
Stopped by while out for a summer's ride. Joanna's has exceptional curb appeal and were ready for lunch.  Dining room was quiet and we had our choice of where to sit and which TV to watch. Joe took our order which was fish and chips for my wife and I had the 8 oz. steak special. Her fish and onion rings were just a tad over cooked but my steak-medium- was perfect. Side salads were fresh and crispy and more like dinner salads in size. Joe returned several times to insure that all was OK. The chef came by once for the same purpose. We told Joe about the fish issue and he offered my wife a replacement and we said that was totally unnecessary. He took a percentage off the bill which again we said he did not need to do. On the whole a very good experience.
After many times of trying the Pizza which is outstanding, I tried the calzone which was perfect!  The Crust was tender and the ingredients were outstanding as well.
My wife and I tried this cafe restaurant for the first time when we heard about their Chef's Specials available only on Friday and Saturday nights, specifically, their prime rib. The restaurant atmosphere is like a family local bar and grill, and clearly this is a very popular place among locals for its family-friendliness and friendly personal service. Since the menu is otherwise largely Italian, my wife decided to order a personal size specialty white pizza as an app, and while I prefer red pizzas, she and I both found the crust excellent, thin with just the right amount of crispness. The prime rib dinners were a good value including salad, baked potato, and green beans, and it was all delicious. The prime rib was juicy and tender, reminded me of the great prime ribs we used to find at Durgin Park in Boston. We were so full that we didn't have room for any dessert. Next time I'd like to try some of the Italian dishes and a red pizza. A friendly spot with delicious food.
need to watch the out of towners and shut them off, they make it feel unsafe to be there and also go to your car.  Good bartenders, pizza bar good and atmosphere.  
Very good service.  Ice tea is good. Tad bit more meat on the salad would work.  Plenty of lettuce.  Nice upgrade with the mozz and onions.  Place is dated and almost quaint.  End of the day, it's ready for nice dining room renovation.  A make-over would probably boost business.  For a gray Friday is was on the quiet side.
we have eaten here on several occassions . i have taken business associates to lunch here and dinner always the place for good food 

We visit at least a couple times a month for a group lunch from work or get takeout for dinner. We always have fast friendly service. Salads, sandwiches and pizza are all yummy. 
I've recently returned to ordering from Ann's pizza under new ownership.  I've had less than positive experiences prior but under new ownership I gave them a chance.  Myself and my roommate have ordered delivery from them a half a dozen times in the last several months and they have been nothing but great.  The last time, not so much.  Our order not only came incorrect but missing an item.  I called back simply to inform them for quality assurance.  What I received was an accusation that I forgot the order although I had a witness confirming that I had ordered everything.  Myself and my roommate called back but received nothing but attitude from line employees as well as "ownership" which I cannot believe took the phone based on the conversation I witnessed.  It was a simple complaint, which we were trying to report for the best of their business, which we enjoy, but it is clear that the response to any complaint is not addressed as it should be.  Try Ann's once, but if you experience what we did, Danny's might get your order right, although it may be late. If anns would like to reply, simply type 601 into the computer and we should show up.  Feel free to call.
Figured I'd try this place since the remodel and new ownership . The meatball grinder I ordered at noon time was cold in the middle, the sauce was good, the French fries were not hot . The person I was with gave me a slice of pizza and that was nasty. Neither of us finished our meals , just paid the bill and left. I won't be back
Introduced to Ann's from my in laws. Pizza offed a thicker crust without being doughy or too chewy. Specials are VERY generous with toppings, almost hard to pick up. Pizza's are sliced with squares instead of traditional triangles. Great value on prices. 
We have enjoyed Ann's pizza for years. The pizza is very good as are the grinders. I am especially fond of the fried mozzarella! A slab of breaded fried cheese with great sauce--YUM!
We got Ann's pizza for the first time last fall and have gone back several times since. The pizza is consistently good as are the grinders. My only complaint is they do not deliver to our house on the other side of town otherwise we'd be eating there more often.
I grew up eating Ann's pizza and till this day they are still one of the better pizza places in town.
My favorite pizza anywhere!  Ann's has made great pizza for a long time and that did not change with the new owner.  I am told that he has been on staff for many years and is using all the same recipes.  The pizza is exactly the same as it has always been, Excellent!!!  The crust is what makes this pizza, it is perfect.  Id recommend the pepperoni and sausage pizza.  The buffalo chicken pizza is good as well and others in my family really like the veggie pizzas.  Take a trip to Ann's, you wont regret it!!
This pizza was cooked right,and was substantial in their toppings Good crust, quality cheese. They now deliver so I'm told, so will definitely buy from them again and use delivery. 
Ann's Pizza has been a part of Enfield for many years. There was a recent ownership change, but the pizza and entrees are still worth the trip. Many of the people from the previous ownership still work there so there was little change, at least from my experience. They offer frequent discounts in the Reminder, so you can save a few bucks as well. Worth a try if you have never stopped in! 
Despite the negative reviews of the new owner's changes, I still think this is one of the best shops in town. While I'm not a big fan of their pizza ( I prefer thin crust ), the remainder of their menu items are still are good quality and value. I am a long time customer, having frequented the establishment since the original owners opened in 1982. Yes the new owner has had a few bumps along the way, but he's added new items like quesidillas that are a lot better than I've had at other locations in town. The lasagna is still good, the wings are the best in town, and their salads are well worth the money. My preference is the 'fried chicken salad', which is not on the menu, but consists of sliced chicken fingers on a bed of greens. The new guy's trying, so give him another chance.
      Incidentally, a lot of people downrated this restaurant when the previous owner decided to close on Sundays for family time. I feel that was totally unfair to the owner. The new owner has kept that tradition, and I don't have a problem with it.
I grew up on Ann's Pizza and even after the switch in owners I still think the pizza is the best around. They haven't changed anything with the pizza recipe despite what people think. This pizza is honestly the best I've ever had anywhere and I could live off this pizza! I go there several times a month!
I grew up on Ann's Pizza it was the best in town hands down. Ever since this new "owner" took over everything about this place has changed but more importantly the food has suffered. The portions have clearly gotten smaller but prices have stayed the same or gone up. The pizza which was their bread and butter is completely different. The Ann's Special is terrible they skimp on meat and veggies and it is clearly smaller now as well as not cooked the same. Grinders are also a lot smaller now and the meat and toppings are smaller portions. I have tried to give them a few more chances but I just can't take it anymore. Why would you go in and ruin a good thing? Maybe to save a couple bucks but if your losing customers was it really worth it? The icing on the cake was when my friend and his wife found a band-aid in their pizza. When they called to talk to someone about it the person they talked to didn't seem concerned at all and was very rude. I hate to write a bad review on this place but it is sad what has happened to this once excellent restaurant.
New owner got cheap, bought all new stoves and food is terriable, should have left it alone.  Changed portions to smaller sizes but kept the $$.   Now he's got a stove that has a convey belt in it so the pizza comes out hard as a brick, should have kept it the way it was but he was too lazy to have to watch his food.  Now its like a pizza hut with food.
if you like Greek pizza you will love Ann's. Their pizza sauce is amazing in my opinion best in town for sure. Dinners portions are big enough ( if you eat more than that 0.0 I would be surprised) salads always fresh. Bon Apeti
Ann's Pizza is a family-friendly pizza joint.  Located right next to Riley's School of Dance, the place is always hoppin' with the youth and their parents.  It's no-frills booth dining at its best.  

Positives:  Their white pizza is decadent--get it with ricotta, garlic, and broccoli--amazing!  That's all I usually get here.

Drawbacks:  Their salads are forgettable, and sometimes it's pretty noisy and crowded.  Try to get a booth around the other side of the entrance so you won't have the customers who are picking up pizzas invading your personal space.
Definatley reccommend if your in the mood for pizza, the pizza sauce is delish and the onion rings weren't too bad either. Great Family atmoshpere.
I've been to Ann's many times over the years.  They make a solid grinder and a good pizza.  They are close to where I live, so we get take out on occasion.   Honestly, if a couple of the other pizza places in town were a LITTLE closer, I'd probably stop going here.  But again, it's solid yet unspectacular.

Interior is outdated and older, but what you'd expect from the neighborhood pizza place.  

Service is quick and friendly.  They get a little busy with their takeout orders, so occasionally you'll wait, but they are trying hard to get your order out.
We had many family members coming in from out of state.  It was hot and late so we grilled up chicken and called and got a bunch of different sides to go along with it so we didn't have to worry about heating up the kitchen. Everybody loved absolutely everything that we had. The broccoli and garlic sauce is Bangin!!!
Take-out was soggy, flavorless and a major disappointment.  
We are always looking for good and healthy Chinese food, and this place failed miserably.
we get take our from New China City a few times a month.  The food is consistent and very good.  Though the never ask for our name, the nice woman who works the counter always recognizes us.  They are quick and reasonably priced.  Years ago we were told there was a much better place in Somers for Chinese, so we tried it, but my husband and I agreed New China City was much better.  This is our "there is no food in the house" go to, and we are never disappointed.
We tried China City for the first time today. My husband ordered Special #2 with teriyaki beef, boneless ribs & fried rice. I ordered Special #5 with teriyaki beef and fried shrimp. We also ordered a large chicken finger appetizer. We both enjoyed our meals and will be back. We're new to the area and this is the best Chinese take out we've had. 
New China City has some of the most fresh, delicious Chinese food in the area.  I really like the fact that you can see into the kitchen, which is always immaculate.  Staff is very friendly and prices are quite fair.
This efficient, convenient, and reasonable restaurant is family run and always available.  The delightful owners are always cheerful, even in the torturous Summer heat and bitter Winter cold.  I usually bring the well-packaged meals home to wolf down, and there are 4-5 tables if you prefer. I have enjoyed their dishes at relatives' and friends' homes all over town. We were prejudiced because the site was always our "corner ice cream shop", Merrill's, when we were growing up here in the 50's and 60's. The New China City and it's delightful family are a very welcome addition to Somersville and possibly the best and consistently fine quality food in the area. You really cannot go wrong.
If you want delicious food, order here. The staff is very friendly and have food cooked in no time. Nice variety on the menu. Their egg rolls are so good! Convenient location, we usually dine at home, but they have tables to eat there as well. Never disappointed. 
Friendly service and super fast kitchen.  Plenty of daily specials.  The B3 Oktoberfest Benedict with Broad Brook Beer marinated bratwurst, caramelized onions and German mustard hollandaise sauce served on a pretzel roll with two eggs over easy was great.
If you haven't tired this place yet you have too!  It's worth the trip ! 10.99 and byob! I love this place ! Did I mention all you can eat? Yummmmmmm 
Always enjoy the breakfast here! It is a very good value for the money. Omelets are very good & there are alot of different choices! 
Very cute place, family owned, and great food! This was our first time there and it was fast and friendly service.
We were a group of 5.  Service was good, food came quickly, but most of the table was not impressed with their order.  They had an interesting Xmas themed menu, the two items ordered off that menu were good, but not great.  Eggs benedict was very salty.  Prices were very reasonable, and everyone was very friendly.  My husband and I had never been there before and were excited to finally try a cute little local place,  but we probably won't be going back: at least not for breakfast.   Just like all the other reviews, we have heard only wonderful things about this restaurant, but we left wanting....
The service is very good and the menu is great we have only had breakfast there it has that home feeling!
My boyfriend surprised me and took me to this place on a Thursday night after his co worker spoke so highly of it! When we pulled up I was like....what is going on? Kinda looked like a lil hole in the wall but what a pleasant surprise! It was fantastic. It was so cute and cozy inside. On Thursday nights they have an all you can eat pizza bar! The chef cooks your dish right in front of. It also comes with salad and bread.... Best part it's BYOB! All this for only $11! You cannot beat that price! Can't wait to go again! 
awesome!   Lucky we found this place for breakfast one morning and came back for the friday night bbq buffet. Clean, great service, nice decor - lots to love about it.  
Beau and I have eaten here twice for breakfast and we LOVE it!  It's tucked away in a little plaza in East Windsor, and it is always packed with people, but the wait never takes too long.  Mostly high school girls doing the serving and they are very prompt and attentive.  Really really enjoy all the creative specials each week.  Great food, great service, and good coffee to boot! (per beau).  We can't wait to come back and try the all you can eat BBQ buffet on Friday nights!
Super fresh & unique breakfast menu. Don't let the skeezy plaza turn you away: they use quality ingredients, have friendly staff, and you leave bloated with breakfast bliss! I'm already looking forward to my next meal
This place doesn't look like much from the outside but don't let that deter you...inside is quite welcoming. They have the normal breakfast offerings plus many more thoughtfully creative options and daily specials. The food comes out fast and hot and is very reasonably priced for the quality. I highly recommend this place for breakfast if you love within a reasonable driving distance.
This was our first trip here and it did not disappoint.  We both had the Marzipan French Toast special and was very good.  The "Devon's Homefries" are outstanding.   We did not wait at all for a table, and there is ample seating for larger parties.  The staff was incredibly friendly and knowledgeable and we can't wait to return!
Great little family owned restaurant with great food,  great service and great prices.
Stopped in for breakfast with my wife and we were both floored by a great experience. 
Cheerful and friendly staff,  offering fast and efficient service.
Exciting menu offering all your favorites and then an exciting list of chef's specials that will make you think twice about your options. 
Food is great,  always hot and fresh and more than adequate portions.
You have to try Stir the Pot it's great. 
I've been dying to try this place ever since it opened but we don't really have a reason to drive so far for breakfast. We finally got to try it when we decided to meet my in-laws there because it's halfway between our houses. We arrived around 10:30 on a busy Saturday morning but only had to wait 5 minutes for a table. The staff was friendly and accommodating (we had our 8 month old daughter with us) and the atmosphere was exactly what you expect for a breakfast spot in a small town. We all ordered different specials and we all ate every single bite. Everything was cooked perfectly and had just the right flavor. Portions were large so we probably shouldn't have eaten everything but it was too good to waste. The coffee was also great with flavored and regular options. And prices were very reasonable. We sat and chatted a while after breakfast and didn't feel rushed to leave by the staff. (There was no wait otherwise we wouldn't have stayed so long). We also got some of their potato chips on the way out and they were delicious. If you are looking for a great breakfast with traditional offerings and creative specials, this is the place! 
Great little family owned restaurant serving good food and great friendly service.
Outstanding place for breakfast or a quick lunch.
Prices are excellent if your in the area got to check it out. 
the decor is really cute & the restaurant is always clean. the menu selections are varied with delicious combinations. everything is homemade, this is not a chain restaurant. i like poached eggs & they are always perfect. if you want a cheerful restaurant to greet the day with come here.
Do you remember the show Cheers and how when Norm walked in, everyone knew him?  I am starting to feel like that at Stir the Pot.  And why not?  I am there so often because there isn't a thing on the menu that isn't good.  The creativity of the chef/owner is amazing to me.  You have to check it out for yourself.  Go for any of the weekend breakfast specials. How about a buffalo chicken omelette? Or the Philly cheesesteak omelette? White chocolate macadamia nut cookie waffle? Haupia French toast? This guy is a genius! Baked Apple pancakes make me convinced that God loves me.
We recently had our first experience dining at this 'great' country style diner. We were amazed just how good the food was. The 'handful' breakfast sandwiches are just that 'a handfull', and loaded with the items you so select. I had the bacon, cheese, and egg combo on a water roll and it was packed to make you completely full-up!!  The plentiful red bliss potato hash browns I chose had bacon and carmelized onion that was real crispy and very flavorable...all for $2.75!  What a find this is!  Mike the owner was very personable and is intent to make this breakfast/lunch place a magnet to those who long for damn good pickins'...stick to your ribs yummy!!  He is closed on Mondays, so don't find yourself cussin, if the place is dark...Enjoy!!
Stopped in on a Sunday morning. It was busy, but there was a quiet calm with everyone who works there. Spinach popover was delicious. Variety of veggies on omelet was better than I usually can get. Coffee is strong, but not Starbucks strong. In the summer you can ask for fresh fruit, even though not on the menu.
Found this cute place by accident as I was looking for a little store in their plaza.  The store I was looking for (the Willow Tree) was closed but the owner of it is wonderful and makes amazing country type items.  Back to Stir The Pot, went in with a friend that has lived in Enfield her whole life and knows all the areas very well and even she had never been here.  It is very cute in side and the menu is so different it makes you want to try it all.  I have been there 5 times now and have not been disappointed at all.  One of the times I went it was last summer and extremely hot and once again I was going to the little country store and had family from New Jersey with me.  We had spent a long time in the store and decided to grab lunch and it was like 2:10 and we walked in not realizing they were actually closed and the owner insisted we come in and they stayed to make us lunch even though there was no one else there.  To me that is terrific service and I will always recommend this place to everyone.  I grew up and have lived in Enfield all my life and did not know this place was here and I would choose this over the chain places any time!
This is an average Taco Bell. They are usually very quick and I feel that overall they have a very good staff working there. The lady at the cash register is usually very pleasant. For fast food, I feel you can get filled up easily with little expense. Also, they offer lower calorie/lower fat options on the El Fresco menu. I do not care for the burritos and find the refried beans not very appealing, they are gummy. I would recommend sticking to the tacos and gorditas. The restaurant is usually kept up well. The soda area is not always the cleanest. Overall, not a bad pick for a quick, inexpensive option.
I know. I know. But I can't help loving TB!
I brought a couple of friends here for breakfast and we loved the relaxed atmosphere. The staff makes you feel like family and the pancakes and syrup were incredible!! I can't wait to go back again.
I brought my kids here to see a sugar house since we live in the area. It's a nice family owned business but the interior is very well done with rustic woods and booths surrounding a beautiful glassed room containing a vat of heaven, I means maple syrup.

We helped ourselves to coffee, which was delicious and my kids thought the cocoa was great. The breakfast arrived quickly to our table and the pancake was the size of the plate. I don't eat pancakes so I ordered the french toast which was good but my daughter offered a piece of her pancake and it was amazing. It was fluffy and crisp on the exterior like a vanilla cake. It doesn't hurt that they bring their amazing maple syrup to the table warm and fresh from the boiler.

They're only open for breakfast during the sugaring season, 7:30AM to 1:00PM from Mid-February through the first of April, so give it a try if you're in the area.
Even though the service was slow, you can't beat the price and quality of the coffee. Go here a few times a week for it. 
Dining room dirty, drink areas very messy and exceptionally slow service.  I will not return.  This is most likely the worst McDonald's ever.
McDonald's on N Elm St. is clean and the service is quick. Can't really go wrong for a fast food establishment.
What do you want? This is McDonald's. I have always had the best service at this location, friendly and orders are correct.
I ordered the Chocolate Chip Frappe and Spouse ordered a Coffee.. Spouse said her coffee was good/very good. On the other hand my frappe was to thick and full of Chocolate chips where I couldn't get any thing through the straw. I couldn't even finish and ended up throwing most of it out.  Server was friendly though Only one server to assist the walk in customers.
Does any one else Rate Micky D's?  Oh well why not
Being able to walk to the restaurant from hotel was very convenient...only steps away. Food was good as usual. Restaurant was clean. Order takers could be a little more friendly...with a smile.
Resturant was next door to a hotel we stayed at .Food was good and hot, clean, service average.

Reader
Nothing outstanding- tried some new menu stuff-- will stick with the old but was convenient to my motel- I could just walk there
We have eaten there twice, two years in a row.  Food is good, employees were very courteous and accommodating, but I think this Wendy's needs might new management, or at the least someone needs to double check their inventory orders.  Both times they were out of necessary items.  This time it was baked potatoes and it was 5:30 PM.  Also, no pecans for the apple pecan salad.  Were also out of paper goods.  Employees were very apologetic but still out of items!

We will go there again because it is so convenient to the newly renovated Quality Inn next door, but I hope they will be better stocked.  Again, employees were very friendly, accommodating, and welcoming and not having stock I don't think was not their fault.
I went to Wendys on May 28th 2014 around 8pm I waited forever in the drive-thru line it was the longest time I ever spent in any drive thru but at the end it was well worth the wait the customer service and the food was great everything I ordered was made right and very fresh and even though the girl taking order was overwhelmed with customers she was very patient and pleasant. if I can guarantee To have service and food like I did that night I would wait in that drive thru line again.sometimes you have to take the good with the bad.
First, the food is typical Wendy's.   However,  I have been here 3x (which is twice more than I should have been), & each time I have received the order incorrectly.   And, it is usually not even close.  By far the worst Wendy's I have ever been to.  Oh,  and not once has there ever been a genuine apology for the ineptitude.   It's a convenient stop before I get on the pike, but from here on out I'll either go hungry or wait until the rest area in Ludlow.
I went into the restaurant to grab a quick bite to go. I waited 10 minutes to have my order taken and an additional 15 minutes to receive it. I will say the food was good except for the strawberry tea. It was very weak flavored. I will go back there for the hot good food but the service needs a bit of work.
alot of staff but service is very very slow,i had to repeat my order 3 times
This Wendy's is average. The interior is usually not that clean when I go in but not overly dirty either. The service can be right on the ball but also terrible to the point that once a girl placed our order on hold so she could answer her cell phone and had a conversation (that one I should have reported to the manager). I never have had issues with the take out window which seems to be much faster than when you order inside. I usually stick to the .99 menu or to the salads. The salads used to be great but over time have gotten much smaller. I like the crispy chicken sandwich and if I need a quick lunch or supper, am in a hurry or don't have much cash on me that is what I would recommend. My daughter loves the baked potatoes but this Wendy's is often sold out of potatoes by suppertime.
Overall, stick to this Wendy's for take out(check your order before leaving the window) and avoid eat in.
This Wendy's is slow, and that some people in the back didn't wear hair coves.
I'm not from the area but was traveling to family that is and they referred me here. At first we were going to just to drinks at the bar but everything smelled and looked so good we ordered appetizers also and everything was delicious! My first impression was "wow this is a long bar!" Great beer selection on tap. Will be returning when back in the area
Stopped here for my fourth or fifth time and it is always something.  Either the order is wrong or the service is poor.  Much better places to go for better quality and price.  

I always give another chance when someone encourages us to go but not one of my top picks.
This is a go to place for us. We've eaten there dozens of times. They have also helped me host three banquet type events. Nice menu, bar area is huge and a fun place to dine.
We ate her last January and last night, we all had beef our friends and my wife had the Prime Rib and I had the blackened Rib eye. There is just nothing to say but fantastic.
Looking forward to our next time.

Stopped in a few times for drinks and appetizers and have been satisfied each time.  Decent drink options and the pub grub is always great!  I would recommend stopping in for a drink if you are in the area.  
I am running a job site next door and i decided to try this restaurant. The Clam Chowder is good. The Prime Rib was excellent. A side Salad was included and the Creamy Dill Dressing was recommended and the salad did not disapoint. The Dill Dressing was Great. The atmosphere was friendly and you know a restaurant is good when the locals eat there. I have gone back a couples of time and the meals did not disapoint.
they have a dress code but it's not enforced, people were wearing everything from polo's and dress pants to t-shirts and shorts. cool bar area in the middle of everything with tv's to watch the games. food was a little high but very good, our waitress was great and made it an enjoyable evening. they have everything from wings to steaks and pasta, I had the ribeye and it was a large size cut and cooked to my order and served hot. they also have a decent amount of differnt beers on tap and they are nice and cold.  
Went on a Monday night no crowd, plenty of wait staff and still poor service. Food was worse. Got blackened scallops that weren't blackened at all, my wife got Schrod which was dried out, broccoli was undercooked. All this and it was still overpriced. If you get a good meal you don't care much about the price, but when it's this bad, it matters.
This is a business casual type of pub/restaurant with weekend nigh time entertainment at a reasonable price. I think that most people would be satisfied with their meals here that range from basic to very good dinners. The luncheons are very appealing to cost conscious diners.
There's a huge horseshoe type bar which is always lively on the weekend - and on the nights when they have live music.

The fare is American basic but well cooked.  A tad overpriced I think.  Wine list is VERY basic.  Plonk R Us.

Even still, my husband and I enjoy coming here.  The lights are lowish, so it's relaxing after a long day under the fluorescents and the wait staff is friendly and efficient.
Had dinner with my Dad in the bar area. Our waitress was very welcoming and attentive, especially with my elderly Dad. We split an order of calamari which was excellent; very tender, a huge portion and the breading was very light and crispy. We chose the balsamic reduction instead of marinara and were glad we did. The tanginess of the balsamic glaze went well with the crispy, tender calamari. Dad had a Caesar salad with chicken - a little skimpy on the chicken, but otherwise he enjoyed it. I had the blackened salmon salad which was a hefty portion of spring mix greens with a decent sized salmon filet - spicy but not overpowering. With a couple of microbrews and the Red Sox on the bar TVs, it was a great night.
Had dinner here with a group of 40, so planned ahead with manager and was not disappointed. Great service, delicious food, nice atmosphere all combined for a wonderful evening!
I went to the Westwood Restaurant and Pub for the first time.  I wanted to try something new.  There is no visible sign for the restaurant from the street. When you walk into a big building and walk to your right.  Who would of known, there's a restaurant here. I ordered the Salmon with a side of bake potato. The Salmon was dry and it was pretty salty.  The bake potato has cheese which was clumped together with the bacon.  Bacon was hard and difficult to chew.  Our server was great and on it.
We stopped for an early supper and found the restaurant and pub to be very large, empty ( it was just 5:30 p.m. on a Tuesday evening) and clean.  The staff greeted us when we entered and took us to our table on the perimeter of the bar.  Jessi was our wait person and she was very friendly and accommodating to our needs. The staff seemed to like working as they enter acted with each other well.  My husband ordered a bacon cheeseburger (of course) and was very satisfied with his choice.  I ordered the scrod with a crabmeat stuffing.  The fish was well cooked and not dry.  I liked the stuffing, but had trouble finding the crab in it. The martini was perfect!  We were surprised at such a nice spot inside an office building.  We would go back.
I always come here with friends and family  and it's always so exceptional! Best local food and never disappointed! 
One of our very favorite restaurants.  Have never had a bad meal from appetizers to filet mignon.  The bartenders (aka mixologists) are the BEST around.  They remember what you drink and even what your "go-to" favorite food it.  HUGE bar area.
Finally into the 3rd year of my WSU student I convinced the family to check out the Westwood and it did not disappoint.  It was  good experience and we will be back. It's a large place but they make it feel quaint. I like the gluten free options and they even went the extra mile to bring out a gluten free roll with our bread.  The burgers were great as well as the fish and chips.   I do hope they add fish tacos' to the menu since it's my go to for pub fare! 
We stopped on a busy Saturday night after a day at the Big E. The place was busy. We had excellent staff. Great service the food took a little bit because it was so busy. But it was worth the wait. We enjoyed the apps the meals and the pizza. We will go back. Glad we tried this place.
Westwood is a fun place with good food & prices. The bar is huge and there is plenty of private seating as well.
I've heard how good Westwoods is over the years, but recently I met some friends there for drinks & dinner.  
I loved the decor, the huge bar, and everyone was so friendly and helpful.
I had a Pomegranate martini, yum and dinner was chicken & broccoli Alfredo which was great.  Mine was a special so it came with a salad and they served us rolls also.
It's not your inexpensive fast food joint, so the menu didn't have much under $10.
We enjoyed our visit & meal and I can't wait to go again!
Wait staff was very accommodating!
Fun place to go for drinks and watch a game too!
Waited quite a while to order a cone at the "fast" ice cream counter area. The gal behind me had called her order in ahead of time and it wasn't done yet...she was waiting to speak with a manager.  When I finally got my ice cream, it was quite delicious, but the service sucked.
For families with kids this is a good restaurant, for those looking for some quiet time with their spouse, not so great. Kids crying and screaming, reaching over our seats and being very noisy.
I was staying next door at the Holiday Inn on business.  I wanted some place quick to eat and some known comfort food.  I had read reviews on this Friendly's which were not flattering but I went anyway.  Service was fast.  Wait staff was attentive and food quality is exactly what would be expected at Friendly's.  It is not 5 star dining but it met my needs.  Overall, the atmosphere, food and attention from the wait staff was very good.  
Same the same as friendlys in CT. This one was clean with good fast service and food was very good . Very close to hotel. We walked there . But it's a very short drive if you choose . 
Saturday mid-afternoon.  First visit to a Friendly's in over twenty years. 
Restaurant layout is a bit different - mostly booth seating. Quick, professional, positive service. 
Lengthy menu, and, of course, those gigantic ice cream concoctions. 
Food came quickly. 
Tomato bisque and grilled cheese got high scores.
My burger was surprisingly dry and bland with a tiny tomato, but good lettuce and bun. Fries were very good.  Coffee was ok.
Came in to get an order to go. Waited forever just to order. Then ordered calm platter.  Came back with no Cole slaw. They said it either came with fries or slaw. Then had to show them in their own menu that it came with both. Finally got my meal. No silverware or napkins or condiments. They just act like you are putting them out. We'll I can take my business  where I am wanted.  
We ate here twice within a week.  The first time the service, food and overall experience were very good - we ate in the restaurant.  The second time was takeout, one order was incorrect, and the burger was not well done as requested.  We were too far away to take it back so we just dealt with it.
Traveling through the area this was the only restaurant within walking distance of my hotel.  Long and short of it was the fish and chips were good, the service was what you would want.  The only criticism was the bar made me feel like i was in a showcase to everyone stopping in to get ice cream to go.
I stood at the unattended welcome desk for five minutes. I saw two employees...a young girl at the ice cream counter and another teenager, who could have been wait staff, who ignored me completely. I left. Nobody cared.
This is a nice Friendly's remodeled and fun.  We only had breakfast here, twice, and both times it was very good. We had a great waitress and the bacon and eggs were cooked to order. Coffee is strong. Recommend this instead of the sorry offerings at the Econolodge across the street.
Stopped at this Friendly's on way home from NY, was greeted promptly and seated, getting a waitress seemed to take overly long, food came quickly once order taken, food was good, service was good until waitress was asked to correct mistake on bill, took overly long to correct, said she had not been trained in senior discounts(had two senior friends traveling with us), all good in the end
This Friendly's, next to the Mass. pike, exit # 3,  has slowest service I have ever encountered. If you are in a hurry, or don't have time to waste, stay away from this one. Families with kids, beware. Many patrons were not happy with the service the night I was there.
we had a cheese steak and turkey wrap both were good. got a free happy ending sundae too. this Friendly's is one of the good ones.
This place offers Greek style pizza and grinders.  The food here is always good and offers fresh vegetables.  The pizza here is a thin crust style pizza and is very tasty.  They also offer many other Italian dishes and they are all good.  I have never had a bad meal here. 
we've had the pizza a few times, but pastrami is hard to find in this area and their pastrami grinder is the best.
I have eaten at Elm Pizza since the 70's, never disappointed. Great pizza, grinders and so much more - give them a try you will love it!
I didn't know it was possible to make a bad pizza, but the pie I order from Elm was horrible. I have had better frozen pizzas from a grocery store.

I think the crust was a frozen Boboli. 
no sauce 
the sparse toppings were barely identifiable as hamburger and mushrooms.
Stay away from this joke of a pizza shop.
The search for the sublime grinder continues. But for now, this is a good place to know for very decent ones. A clean, but spartan interior is individualized with some very excellent black and white photos. The large number of tables were mostly empty mid-afternoon, as one might expect.  The menu looks like that at thousands of other places. There are hard working people on both sides of the counter. It is the type of local place that survives and thrives on honest value.

My wife and I had small Genoa and Eggplant Grinders, respectively,for a late lunch  and we both will be back for more.
Best chicken wings in Westfield!! The grinders are also very good. Its a very friendly place thats family owned. They have a party room also. Plentyof parking & easy to get to.
All the food is very good but the BLT grinder is the best you will find anywhere. An added attraction is you over look the CSX Boston Line.
Elm pizza makes the #1 best double cheese burger in town. The wings are very good too but for a pizza joint the burgers here are the best. 
We ordered a two large pizza's, when it was delivered they had given us a small and a large. When we called back they were rude and wanted to charge us for a whole new pizza and said it would be almost an hour. After putting up with his bad attitude we canceled the order and have never eaten there again.
The food we did receive was terrible!!!
I owned a business in the area fot years and ate at Elm many many times. Always great. Try the heart attack grinder. It's fantastic. Great pizzas too. wings are big and really good. Shy away from the nightmare wings though unless your trying to prove how tuff you are. Their really hot!
A pizza and 2 grinders this afternoon on the way to Stanley Park. Nice pepperoni pizza, great grinders. Quick. A bit warm in the shop....
Elm pizza has been around for about Fifty years or so located in Westfield Ma. Ever since I was a kid growing up, anytime I get the urge for the Best Hot wings around, or their Grinders , which you can't beat, nobody beats Elm Pizza! I highly recommend their Roast Beef! Made in house, it's the best sandwich you'll ever eat! They also have deluxe grinders, which go all out with Mozzerella  sticks and Onion rings as topplings. So the next time you are in Westfield, make Elm pizza a MUST!
We always enjoy picking up a pizza to go.  Nice staff.  Okay value. 
Really, I ordered on a Monday and was told it would take 40 minutes for 2 grinders and a pizza. Okay, 40 minutes seems reasonable. Oh, wait, it was an hour and a half. The driver called to explain the delay, but when I called Elm pizza about the delay (in search of a discount )or, at least, a reassurance that my order was a priority, I was curtly reminded that my order was a delivery and, therefore, not  a priority. "Oh, our delivery isn't a guarantee!" I was told. Is twice the time what I  should expect? Hey, Elm Street! You will not get my business again!
My ratings are for the chicken wings and the salads only...those are awesome. Delivery is prompt as well
Stopped here for a quick food and drink refuel to break up a 5.5 hour drive. It's located in a gas station, but they do have some seats to eat in. Also a Dunkin Donuts counter is right next to the Subway counter.

Ordered a 6inch chicken teriyaki on honey oat (requested not toasted - chicken warmed only), american cheese, wanted chipotle southwest sauce but they were out!!! so had honey mustard, salad items looked a bit sorry for themselves so passed. It was an average subway sandwich, nothing special but I got what I expected. 

Would probably have marked a bit higher had the salad items looked edible, and had they had chipotle southwest sauce available.
Staff remember my order and always make me feel welcome. One lady is there every morning and she is so pleasant she starts my day off right!
Stopped here for a quick food and drink refuel to break up a 5.5 hour drive. It's located in a gas station, but they do have some seats to eat in. Also a Subway counter is right next to the Dunkin Donuts counter. In fact we actually stopped here primarily for the Subway, I just also happened to get a Dunkin Donuts donut to-go as well

Got a Boston Kreme donut to-go, as we still had a ways to drive and we'd already sat in with our Subway sandwiches. Scoffed the donut about an hour into our second leg of the drive only to find that it was actually really quite dry and stale. Had I eaten in I'd have actually taken it back it was that bad! 

Did eat it all though....... piggy - oink!! Mind you it did put me off Dunkin Donuts, and I didn't get another throughout the trip.
We enjoyed their ice cream very much.  The ice cream was creamy.  I had the Black Squirrel, which was chocolate with brownies and chocolate chips.  The chocolate flavor was intense.  My grand daughter ordered strawberry in a dish and wanted 2 gummy worms on top.  I paid for my order and then she decided she did not want the worms, so I asked that they be taken off.  The girl told me she owed my 85 cents.  I thought that was a bit pricey for 2 gummy worms.

The outside dining area was clean and umbrellas and a canopy offered shade from the sun.

We will return to try some of their other flavors
This is a great little roadside ice cream stand perfect for an evening or weekend treat. They are easy to get to and have a small off street gravel parking area that is well maintained. They serve a wide verity of hand dipped "home made" hard ice cream along with soft serve, there a even frozen treats for your dog. They also have a few food items such as hot dogs. The seating area is clean and well maintained. I look forward to our next visit.
What is better on a Saturday evening than home made fresh mint-oreo cookie ice cream! Yum I asked for a small and it was huge, tasty and refreshing.The oreo's were pleantyful in a smooth green mint ice-cream.  
Got to sample  the coffee&cookie which I will be sure to order the next visit.  
There are many flavors to try worth a trip back.
My family loves the ice cream here.  Not sure if it is open yet, but can't wait for our first taste of the year.
This ice cream at Northside is some of the best I've ever had. My fav is Creme Brulee. Great stop right on Rts. 10 & 202. Friendly service.
We go out of our way to get a couple cones at Northside Creamery.  Certainly the best Ice Cream place in Westfield and far beats that chain you find down the road,  Try coconut, my favorite, and rare to find in New England.  They handpack pints and quarts, and before you complain about the cost, remember this is homemade and we are trying to provide a living wage to the servers.
Joe and Carrie have done a great job since taking on this location - now a favorite spot for kids/families after a sporting event and some great meal menus I hadn't expected. One of the best places in our area to support a local business and experience a GREAT HOT FUDGE SUNDAE!!!
The food is very basic and not very good. The staff tends to ignore you and are not very polite. I have been a few times to try to give them a chance, and the quality was inconsistent. The first visit was not that bad but the next two times were not good. I would not recommend this place as there are several better options in the area. I will not be going back.
This is a very casual Chinese restaurant.  You can sit at the bar and play keno.  It's very relaxed and the food is good too.
Too limited a selection on lubch menu. No standards; like kung po chicken or chicken in hot garlic sauce. Food was cold, as was the tea. Would not go back.
Ordered delivery from here. Delivery was fast and efficient...until we sat down to eat. We ordered General chicken (my favorite) and crab rangoon. On a positive note, the food came very hot and the crab rangoon was pretty good. The General chicken on the other hand was unacceptable. It was hard and crunchy and had a terrible syrup-y sauce. The meat was really gross.....solely dark meat (not my fancy). Not only was it all dark, but it was pretty slimey too. Totally turned me off from it and could not take a second bite. Couldn't look at it or smell it a second longer so we threw it out. Called the restaurant and they said since we threw it out they couldn't do anything about it. Will not give this place my business again...
Right now it is pretty good, but it vary's. What's in that PuPu platter anyways...?
My son and I tried 2 flavors of the boneless wings, bourbon and sesame garlic.  Both of the flavors of boneless wings were dried out and chewy.  Totally disappointed since we had tried the bone-in wings and liked them.    The sweet potato fries were good, but would have been better with a little chipotle mayo or spicy ketchup.
Basically authentic, tasty and good selection. With TB being the option of "Mexican" food, this is refreshing to have a quick take out place that is not fast food! Coming back from a Texas vacation this has at least satisfied my craving for Tex-Mex!!
Food was fabulous and the wait staff was authentic.  Taco Tuesday is our place to eat.  Take out is the way to go.
Everyone who loves Mexican food should stop by if they are in Westfield!  Delicious food made to order!  Burrito Monday and Taco Tuesday are good times to go!
After seeing an ad in our newspaper advertising "Thursday - Enchilada Day" we thought we'd check this place out. This is a small restaurant with a walk-up counter for ordering. The dining area has about 12 tables seating 2 to 4 at each. The interior is sparse, but clean and comfortable. The menu consists mainly of Tex-Mex specialties, but they also have burgers with fries, salads and breakfast served all day. Most items are priced between $5 and $8 with the most expensive menu item being $15.50. Our two meals totaled only $14.88. Delivery is available.
We ordered our enchiladas and opted to dine in the restaurant. Beverages are served in cans or bottles. Our meals were delivered to our table in a reasonable time. The food, served on ample oval plates consisted of 3 enchiladas served with rice and choice of black or pinto beans. Upon delivery, our server offered a choice of sauces to go with the meals.
The food was excellent. The portions are generous. The service was fast and friendly. 
The only detraction was having a can of soda causes you to sip conservatively so as to make sure it lasts through your meal. That might not be such a bad thing for us overweight Americans.
Our next visit might be on Taco Tuesday!
We enjoyed a wonderful breakfast at Soups On and were totally empressed with the new decor.  We love their lunch menu and try to go after Bible Class every week😊😊😊
The new owners have kept a good thing going.  Soups are OK, a couple of times I felt they were "thin" but still tasty.  Sandwich offerings are plenty, lots of options. Still a great spot for a quick lunch and quick visit to the gift shop next door which is AWESOME!  
The soup and sandwiches here are very good.  They offer a variety of soups and sandwiches in this very clean establishment.  It's located inside an old mill but is very nicely decorated.  The staff is always attentive and helpful. The prices are a little expensive but with the high Quality it's expected.
Have eaten at this place several times recently returning with a friend specifically for the French Dip sandwich. The atmosphere is quaint as it is located in a historic building that used to be a hotel back in the day. They serve many varieties of soup which can be ordered in a tureen (serves 4) for $7. They also post deals via social media so get on their list if you enjoy it as much as I did.
Not a regular visitor to Westfield, in fact, this is the second time I've ever been here. But when I arrived and was looking for a place to enjoy a lunch with WiFi available and good reviews, Soups On turned up in my search.

Delightful location, small, but quiet. Ordered a half a chicken pesto sandwich and a cup of their black bean/chorizo soup. The sandwich arrived and I feel like I should comment on the size of it - since it was advertised as "1/2" - it was more than adequate in size and came with chips and a pickle. Plus the bottled water and my check came to under $10.00! 

The soup was hot and perfectly seasoned and the sandwich was hot and melty. Absolutely delicious!

Wish I lived closer as it would definitely be a place I'd frequent regularly.

Give it a try - if you like great tasting soups and sandwiches at a decent price in a sweet and friendly atmosphere - you'll be glad you did.
My husband and I went to try this little cozy place out, it was a little disappointing. Otis in a beautiful old building but hard to find your way in by the littlest sign. Ordering was nice the girl was very pleasant and helpful but offered a smoothie then forgot to make it. Also they have a variety of soups but the one I chose was not very tasty. I don't think we will be back. It has potential.
Have been here a number of times and always had a good meal. I agree with some reviews it's way over priced! My wife  had quiche and small salad and I had I pastrami sandwich , water and small coffee it was $20.00! good lunch but over priced. They take the AARP discount of $6.00 off any item if you buy another at full price so I only paid $14.00 making it seem better. I know the restaurant is for sale maybe there will be some changes to the prices but I hope they keep the quality the same.
great place to grab tasty food and relax, chat enjoy the home made soups, sandwiches and tea! Not far from Westfield University, nice location for quick breakfast or lunch
We ate lunch here. I had the Pastrami sandwich. The meat itself was very good but the sandwich was smothered in some completely obnoxious mustard.  I had to wipe most of the mustard off to salvage the sandwich.  They served some blah chips and a tiny pickle sliver with it. I was disappointed but my wife liked her chicken pesto sandwich.  
I had a 1/2 sandwich and soup.  The food was very good, but I felt it was overpriced for what you get.  Nice selection on the menu, just wish the prices were a little more competitive.
A small, cozy place with a old fashioned charm.  It is easy to miss but well worth looking for.  Great people, great service and great food.  Breakfasts can't be beat.  Soups at lunch are interesting and delicious.
If your looking for a friendly atmosphere with great home cooked food, you have to stop at this little place in an old historic building.  Interesting and great tasting soups are a must.   After lunch stop and browse thru the Pilgrim Candle gift shop.  You'll be amazed at the fabulous items available for sale.
We really enjoyed this casual cafe on our drive out to the Berkshires – a perfect place to stop. Everyone who works here is friendly and helpful. The food ranged from good to excellent, and the coffee was well done. When we're in the area we'll be back!
Hearty corn chowder and delicious hot pressed panini with good portion of ham. Would definitely go back for more and to try more soups
Nice spot for a relaxing, low-key, comfort food meal.  Large room with old furniture that lends a rustic charm.  Good place to meet up for long visits or informal meetings.
Friendly people; comfortable ambiance. Our server quickly filled us in on the routine: you go to the counter and place your order. It is then brought to your table.  I like the fact that there is a great variety of soups and sandwiches made on the premises.

My wife and I had two different soups and half sandwiches-their classic combo. The place was full on a Monday afternoon-a good sign; the service was prompt, the food was nicely presented and tasty. Would have to say the food was hovering in between the good and very good range, with perhaps too much salt in the french dip sauce and a little thin on the turkey in the Pilgrim sandwich. Unlike another recent review, the soup was piping hot and the Paninis were expertly made. Kudos for using Westminster Oyster crackers and having sodas from a small Fall River supplier.

We will definitely give them another try. We salute their efforts to provide a nice and reasonably priced lunch in an under served area of town.
Visited Soup's ON for lunch . ...a quaint place with creaky old wood floors which added to its
ambience. The girl at the counter was friendly and helpful .There were many choices from deli
sandwiches, grilled paninnis and many soup options. My choice was soup and 1/2 paninni combo, the best of both worlds.....the sandwich was super, however great with flavor the soup
was barely lukewarm..a huge disappointment when your name is "Soup's On". Otherwise I would
have given this 5 stars. ...I'll return and try their breakfast options  ...
I have eaten here several times over the past couple of years. They have great soup, salad & sandwiches.  There is plenty of parking and is usually quiet. The quality of food is superb and you get a great value for your money here. 
Soup's on always has several soups and at least one is always vegetarian. They also have sandwiches, cookies, muffins, coffee, shakes, quiche, etc. You can get a cold take-out of a different soup type from the cold case. They have a brunch buffet on weekends. 

The food is good and reasonably priced. The people have always been friendly. The building is a former old hotel with high tin ceilings and old wood floors. There are always a few books to browse should you lack a dining buddy. 

If you abhor waiting unoccupied, or if you like to browse pretty things, there is a little gift shop across the hallway, with a range of home goods and gifts and prices, and they are always very friendly over there too.
I brought my mom out for lunch.  I loved the cozy setting of the cafe and the girl at the counter was very cheerful and helpful.  With that said the food did not live up to the service. Maybe I went there on an off day but I don't know if I would go back.
We have five Dunkin donuts, a Starbucks, and a bunch of other coffee options around us on a daily basis. But we drive out of our way just to go to this particular one. The service is great, they get orders correct EVERY TIME, friendly staff, and I haven't had a burnt coffee yet in four years. Keep up the great work!!
I read reviews about this restaurant and I expecting bad service. The waitress, Amber, was very attentive and pleasant. The food was superb. The soup, a tomato, basil and cheddar soup was remarkable. I had the New Orleans Pasta. It was rich, a touch on the hot side and delicious.  Everyone liked their meals. Great place to eat.
I agree with serenitynow77 about the service here ... I kind of felt like I was on Candid Camera or Punked and kept waiting for someone to come about and say "hee hee just joking" ... 
Upon arrival, I had to approach someone even though I was waiting in clear view of the check in area. Then my the taking of the order took awhile and my entree came before my salad; which arrived for dessert. I never was offered or received a drink refill and sat at my table for several minutes after finishing thinking someone (my waitress?) would come over. All the while my waitress was about 5 feet away futzing with the cash register. I finally approached and asked for the bill and she acknowledged me then kept up the futzing for a few more minutes. I finally went and found someone else to get my check and take my money.
The food was average and the place is homey but the (lack of) service unfortunately overshadowed the experience.
OMG!!!! Got here at 6:00 with a reservation. Per usual, no acknowledgement from the hostess as we stood behind the other couple for 5 min. It is currently 7:27 and we are just now being served our dinner. Waitress came out with totally burnt pizza and assured us they are making another one. Perhaps we could pick it up tomorrow morning. Unfortunately this is our experience again and again. Not sure why we keep coming back. Perhaps a brainwashing ritual?! My fisherman's platter includes 2 teeny shrimp, 2 teeny scallops and a smidget of cod. All of which is dry and hard. Very pleasant waitress, but overall horrid experience. Buyer beware!!! See you there again soon.
We had dinner here before the Aaron Lewis  concert and I have to say myself and my two friends enjoyed every last bite.. we had nachos and fondue for appetizers which were really good. I got the steak salad for an entrée and the steak was cooked perfectly, my friends really enjoyed their meals too. We had delicious drinks called the painkiller. All in all, I'd can't wait to go back, limited gluten free choices, fair  prices
Their $5.50 lunch menu is great.  Love the roast turkey and real mashed potatoes.  Gravy needs help, bouillon would help.  Fresh rolls are served but lack salt big time.
Usually pretty fast service, and friendly wait staff.
OK..... the service was good and there aren't many other places to eat but I really didn't enjoy the bland french fries and the intensity of the stuffed portabella mushroom - too much blue cheese! (the order included 2 mushrooms and I gave one away to a fellow diner and she had the same opinion) I also ordered a small salad and added shrimp.  The shrimp were tasty and a bit tough. I wasn't told that the shrimp (3 large) would cost $6.99 while the salad was $3.99.  I still would have done it but would like to be told beforehand. The greens and dressing were fine.

I went with a vegetarian and she had the veggie burger which seemed to be prepackaged and heated to order.  Our other companion ordered the taco salad with chicken.  She was happy!!

On the other hand, I spoke with my sister who lives nearby.  She said this was my mother's favorite restaurant in this area and she was finicky about what she ate!! My sister, also, does not choose to frequent this restaurant.  

Will you like this tavern? I think it depends on what you order and what your expectations of a restaurant are. It is large.  I don't think you will ever have a problem getting seated.  I saw an event happening outside, buffet style, so clearly they have a happy clientele.
Large, varied menu in a really beautiful old home and barn. Food is usually delicious, but the delivery of it can be a bit slow. Waitstaff is good, but hostesses tend to be surly. Tons of seating inside and out. Haven't tried the beer, but it is an impressive looking brewery set up. Worth a stop. Wacky Wednesday special = a burger and a beer for $5.55!
Where else can you get reasonably priced comfort food combined with home brews in a historic setting. Friendly staff as well. The5.55 specials are a great deal. Beer batter is the bomb. I wish they had a place like this in Florida. You won't be disappointed. 

It's hard to find a nice combinaation of good food (pizza terrific) salads good and french onion soup!!  Nice varied menu, brewery, great put atmosphere and seating outside on a beautiful day!  Can't beat the combination.
We've been coming here for years now..we love it here so much that we call it OUR Place..it's even listed in our phone contacts as such. The locally brewed beers and delicious wines only enhance the experience of the delicious apps and entrées..the atmosphere of the dining room will transport you back to a time long ago, when stage coaches stopped after a long trip.. we have never had a bad dining experience here..we know you will not be disappointed..enjoy!
We sat out back in the open air courtyard; there were six of us for dinner.  Each dinner was different and everyone liked what they ordered.  They make their own craft beers here and we had several kinds.  Guys always like their hoppy brews!
A great variety of foods. The beer selection changes during the year.  Had the blueberry beer yesterday with lunch. It was very tasty.  My hubby's burger was spot on rare. Two thumbs up to the cook. Service was awesome. The waitress was pleasant and bubbly. A great place to get together,and try different beers
The atmosphere is wonderful, waitstaff attentative,and food plentiful and flavorful.  Have been there several times and enjoyed it each time.  Have several lunch specials for $5.00
The architecture of this old building is truly lovely - thus 2 stars.
Our server was nice and had an infectious smile.  But our table was sticky dirty.  The salt and pepper shakers were sticky dirty.  The menu had a wide variety of options.  My husband ordered baked scallops and I ordered prime rib.  His scallops were overcooked, dry, and tasteless.  It had a coating of what looked like seasoned bread crumbs but he said there was no discernible spices or herbs.  
My prime rib was cold.  The "au jus" served with it had no flavor at all and had a thick layer of grease floating in the top.  Yuck.  My knife was dull and, when I asked for a new knife, it was also dull.  I had to saw it to cut the prime rib.
Our mashed potatoes had been overbeaten and were gluey.  Also way too much liquid.  They were a wet puddle on our plates.
Canned green beans were the other side item. 
Overall, I consider this to be a typical Yankee cooking style restaurant.  A lack of seasonings and a misunderstanding of what constitutes well made food.
A group of 30 adults had dinner at Brewmaster Tavern.  Everyone loved their dinner.   The majority ordered the prime rib special, and all were happy with their dinner.  Our one waitress, Cher, was superb!  Pleasant, efficient, friendly, accurate and did a fantastic job.  She got all the drink orders correct, as well as the dinners, desserts, coffee and more!
My wife and I visit once in a while. Sometimes the food is good and the staff is bad. Or the food is not so good and the staff is good. I hope someday the staff and food is good. Its a great staple for the town and the area. They always have a good all around menu with early bird specials. 
They advertised half price gift certificates on the outside marquee and they would not honor their advertisement. I had even called to check.  Over an hour after I first stopped in, the outside sign still said half price gift certificates!!  FALSE ADVERTISING!  I had spoken to the manager when I first  went in and she said "Not my problem." I was appalled that they had not even changed the sign if they were not honoring it!!!!!
An earlier reviewer said this was a waste of a trip from Northampton, I wouldn't go that far (because really Williamsburg is not that far from Northampton) but I don't think the Brewmaster's Tavern (food-wise) is as good as it used to be. Now before getting into this review I can only personally attest to the food because I got takeout here, but my mother and two of her friends went there a little while ago and she gave me a pretty good report of her visit so consider this a sort of a "secondary review." BUT again please do keep in mind I DID still have the food. First I'll reiterate what my mother experienced on-site then I'll talk about my experience. 

So my mother had the Baked Haddock which came with rice and vegetables. Her complaint was that the breading was bland and was unusual as compared to a standard Haddock breading. She did not feel the need to bring home her leftovers, which is for her is a good indication she did not like it because she loves haddock and if she liked it she surely would have brought it home, haha. As for her dining companions they both had the Lemon Chicken which came with vegetables and pasta, which I understand was really nothing to write home about. To end with that bit of the review I think I would agree with yet another previous from earlier this year who said that the Brewmaster's Tavern is not about their food as (to quote) "there is nothing innovative or interesting" about it. 

My mother also mentioned to me that the service is was okay at best and one thing that really bugged her was were her party was seated. Now their party had reservations and their were not many people there yet  however they were not put in a very good seat. Now this something that really has started to irritate me as well about many restaurants lately is their ineptitude in seating their guests, what I mean is just shoving guests in crummy seats when they had made reservations and when the house is not that full. Its almost like hosts want to create an uncomfortable situation by making the guests ask to be seated elsewhere. I don't know that's just how I feel and sorry for that little rant. 

However, I personally will over a little positively into this review, remember I did have takeout. I had my mother get me an Open-Face Turkey sandwich, typical setup: White Meat Turkey, over slices of white bread with mashed potatoes and gravy. Ok, it was great, the meat was perfect (nice big generous slices) and the mashed potatoes were good too. My only compliant was that I did suspect that the gravy was not homemade, however it was not the biggest tragedy in the world for me but c'mon I know how to make homemade gravy, its not that hard. 

Finally (I'm almost done guys, sorry for the length really, but I like to be thorough especially when I have to give out an obscure 3 out 5), as my title indicates I have been here in past, a few years ago (unfortunately I don't think I bothered to review it) but it was MUCH BETTER then in terms of both the service and their food. Whatever they were doing then in my opinion they might consider reverting back. That's just me. I do have to say I looked at some of the other recent reviews here and took another look at their menu (which is huge by the way, I don't think it needs to be that big at all) and I noticed that many of the positive reviews noted having good meals which were of the typical pub/tavern fare (sandwiches, burgers, the turkey dinner etc.) So it seems to me based on that, if you are planning on going to the Brewmaster's Tavern stick to ordering those kinds of meals and you should at least be a little more satisfied. 

Thanks for reading!!!
My family on a drive to Northern Massachusetts stopped by here for dinner. It was our first stop  and our last stop at this restaurant. 

The service was slow, the bread was not your typical yeast rolls and the steak that my wife ordered was so tough that she could not eat it. The pulled pork sandwich was smothered in sauce and you could not taste the pork. The pasta dish my son had was just average. We did bring the issue of the steak are waitresses attention and they did take it off our bill and offered my wife something else to eat but by then she was done with this establishment.

My other son had pizza! Fortunately the saving grace of this meal was the chicken pesto Pizza, it was very good. The food and service where average at best . 

Good luck!
I dine at Brewmaster's Tavern on a regular basis.  The food is always good and they have amazing special offerings.  You can find a delicious choice of lunch entrees any weekday for just $5.55 and they have a great selection of their own beers.  Most evenings there are other great values, such as Wednesday's Burger and Beer for, again, just $5.55.  The bar is a relaxing place to eat and drink and play a game of keno.  The bartenders and waitresses are friendly and knowledgeable.  The restaurant is a real asset to our community.
this place knocks it out of the park on both the pizza and subs.the quantity of food for the price is well worth the stop but the quality is right there and better
This has been my family's go-to place for take-out for years. The pizza is consistently good, and our favorite combos are ham & pineapple, or tomato & bacon. We also like their hot oven grinders. Better for take-out than dining there as it's a small place, but really good either way!
This is a very casual spot. Mostly takeout. Good generous servings, and mostly Italian-like meals. An excellent Greek salad. Good hot tuna grinder. Friendly hometown people.
Been getting pizza and wraps here for years. The White Pizza with any toppings is delicious. My dad RAVES about the buffalo chicken wrap he gets them multiple wraps a week.
While my kitchen is being renovated, I have eaten out a lot.,one of my favorite places is A1 Pizza. If you order a large you get a second pizza for the same price. Try the Hillltown, it is delicious!
Some things never change.  Always tasty and their products are consistent. A little more expensive than in the city but worth the cost, just remember to bring cash or you will have to use the ATM in the back.
I stopped in A-1 HIlltown Pizza on a run from Northampton to Berkshire County.   It was a spontaneous decision, breezing through.   I ordered a pizza for my son and I to share when the counter lady suggested I take advantage of their Buy 1 / Get 1 Free promotion.  Initially I said no, but then figured I could have leftovers.  The pizzas included one plain cheese and one with two toppings.  

They were 16-piece pizzas, but cut into teensy tiny slices; truly this was just an average 14-inch pizza.  I was stunned when I got the bill to see that the price was $24 and change.  I looked it over thinking she forgot to subtract the free pizza.  She didn't.  One cost $19.99, the second one a little more.  Plus two cans of soda - no cups, no ice.  

They do not accept credit or debit cards, but have an ATM onsite where you must pay a $2 fee to the owner of the machine.  They have a pretty good thing going here ........ for the owners, not the customers!  

The pizzas were good, but not gourmet and not supersized and not spectacular.  The atmosphere was dated but clean - certainly the high price wasn't going toward some avant-garde , ambient place that gets writeups in Yankee Magazine.  I'm still scratching my head, wondering why the high price.  The sauce was good but not outstanding.  The crust was thin, just ordinary.  They were generous with the pepperoni & onion ........ but this isn't like gouda or sundried tomatoes, certainly this isn't a real expense.  

This place was neither bad nor good, but the price is appalling.  I always tip on the grand total before specials or deductions but couldn't justify it in this case.
On a recent trip through Williamsburg, my wife and I stopped for lunch at A1 Hilltown Pizza. Located in a non-descript building next to a package store, it didn't look like much from the outside, but the inside was clean and bright with around 8 booths for seating if you'd like to eat there, which we did. We decided to order pizza and hot buffalo wings. The wings were nothing special to me, just dipped in Frank's Hot Sauce, coated in what seemed to be a fine crumb mixture, and fried, but my wife commented that they were among the best she'd ever eaten and she liked them done that way. We both agreed that the Greek style pizza was excellent. It was loaded with the toppings we ordered, all very fresh and tasty, and the sauce was exceptional. We'll definitely be back when we're in the area again.
Clean kitchen and prompt service with beer on tap.
Pizza was okay, but I grew up in Boston where the pizza is great.
I have been ordering cooked salami grinders here for about 10 years. Great onion rings, too. Reasonably priced and delicious. Friendly and polite wait staff and cooks. Good place for a quick and tasty lunch or dinner. The menu includes a wide variety of grinders, pizza, pasta and other dishes. Beer and wine, too. Not fancy, but comfortable and good.
Really like their pizza. Not gourmet - just straight forward pizza done very well. Good value. Fast take-out. Service is friendly and food is consistent.
I was one of those diehard Dunkin Donut fans before I realized the coffee was tasting worse every year. When this place opened, I was curious, so my friend and I went, and we haven't looked back. Now we would never go to Dunks over Elbow Room. The coffee is amazing, Melissa (the owner) is sweet, funny and a joy, and you feel really good about supporting someone local. She also has amazing pastries for sale, and the nutmeg donuts are our fave. Yum, yum!
A great local roaster, try the little lebowski & you
will want more than one of those perfect cinnamon  nutmeg donuts.  Wow
Owner by Mellissa who used to work for Dean,s Beans , this is a local favorite. Mellissa knows coffee and has a roasting business as  her main stay.  She will find the right coffee for you. This morning I am having Peruvian. Worth a stop on your way west to Pittsfield, located in the picturesque town of Williamsburg.,
LOVE the new patio area, replete with birdsong, shady umbrellas and garden flowers. Would encourage even more blooms next year; howzabout an overhead trellis? I am always on the hunt for fresh decaf: this place is quickly becoming my go-to spot. Those scones are dangeously delectable! Love this place!
Freshly baked local goodies! Huge sacks of fresh bean from mysterious ports of call! A VERY friendly hostess! What is not to like? If you are craving a good quick wakeup call with yummy ingredients, stop here. Plus the local gossip is tasty too. My one hope is they open up the front space a bit, make it a sunny hangout spot. That coffee is pure poetry, pure liquid bean.
We feel lucky to have Chinese food close to home, and it's a nice change now and then. However, the place has changed hands a few times, and we do find it to be pricey for the quality.
I've had good meals here and terribly oily fried rice and rude service and great service. It's a crap shoot what kind of meal you will have.
Very nice cat meat, and the staff were good people. All the Koreans ate noodles whilst the others ate my dog.
My husband and I have been eating here a lot lately; the staff is always very friendly and chatty. There is such a variety, we have yet to taste it all! Excited that they have so many vegetarian options. All the food is fresh, especially the veggies, and not drowned in sauce. The wine is vapid, as is the cool jazz. I REALLY wish they'd zazz up the paint job, which at the moment is made up of muted purples and peuces. Embrace the Chinese! I'd love to see some bold whites, golds and reds,maybe have a bamboo plant or some insence. I'm cheesy enough to like those lazy susan tables, I hope they get a couple for big parties.
This restaurant has relatively recently changed hands and now seems to have an inventive and dedicated chef.  My family, which includes some discriminating asian relatives, finds this restaurant to be the best Chinese in the area.  We live nearby and have been there often.
The food is  very good,  and they offer all the standard Chinese fare ( our 6yr old grandson especially likes the house Mai fun noodles) But the food is really good if you order off the gourmet menu, happen to like spicy szechwan style food and are prepared to be a bit adventuresome. 
I have had hotter in China and NYC, but the heat level here is is not quite of the numbing, ear burning variety. The cold tofu in spicy scallion sauce, the szechwan wontons in hot chili oil, the beef tendon and stuffed tofu with pork are our favorites. The vegetables that come with the dishes are always fresh, the rice is great.  Service is quick and friendly. Big booths available, so good for groups and families, tho not much for romantic decor.  Prices are more than reasonable. Highly recommended.
Panda Garden in Williamsburg is under new management. We ordered online tonight. The food arrived at the right time, nice and hot and delicious! Their white rice is fabulous - different than most, chewy with a bit of the hull still on. We also had pork fried rice, General Tso's Chicken and Pork in Garlic Sauce. The spring rolls are nice and crunchy and not too fat with cabbage. I highly recommend the new Panda Garden.
This place recently changed hands and now is operated by the previous owner of Butterfly in Hadley. The quality of the food has improved a lot, the atmosphere is the same as before. Definitely order off of the gourmet menu. 
The food looks and tastes nice. The service need to be improved. the atmosphere is not romantic. I like the food. It is up to you to choose. Thanks.
      
I've eaten there a few times, with wildly inconsistent results. But I understand Richard Lau, who owned and operated Butterfly in Hadley, is coming to Panda Garden. Fingers crossed.
This is a funny  little place. We've had  inconsistent results with  take out,  but  I can't now remember why, one day we ate there.

It was  really good. the food was  hot and fresh and well done. And the  service was  charming. The place itself is  not prepossessing, but , and I hate to use this word,  it has an aura  of calm and comfort. 

Another reviewer mentioned the great Wall in Florence. When they were good, they had superb food,  but it was NOT a place to sit and chat and eat in comfort. It was dark and  in a faintly creepy strip of shops.

Panda Garden has decent, sometimes really  good food, and is  a comfortable place to  sit and actually  enjoy a meal. If you  don't want the  hustle and  bustle [ and cost] of nearby Northampton, stop in and eat  here.
This restaurant puts out consistently inconsistent food.  When they first opened, I visited once and didn't return.  Months later, when The Great Wall in Florence went south, I returned to Panda Garden and found the food to be delicious, especially the B-B-Q spare ribs.  However....the last 3 encounters were poor.  Perhaps a new chef?  All the food is brown and tastes the same. Did I mention mushy? The B-B-Q spare ribs remain as delicious as ever.
This was among the best breakfasts that I have every had.  The place is unassuming, the staff is courteous and efficient, and the chefs clearly care about their craft.  If you are in the neighborhood, you should definitely stop in.  The locals clearly eat here, as it was packed but still had no wait to be seated or delay on service.
This restaurant looks unassuming from the outside and because the parking lot is at the side it almost appears closed.  But when we stopped there for lunch it was very busy and seemed to be filled with a lot of local customers who were enjoying chowders, lobster rolls, clam bellies and other treats.  The interior is quite cheery with picnic tables painted Aqua and yellow as well as painted tables and chairs.  Tables carry sayings that are all different.  (Ours said "A golfer's diet: live on greens as much as possible" and " For happy health, fuel yourself with dreams and greens."). The proprietor seemed to know just about everybody and each server was cheerful and hustling.  We got clam chowder which was well seasoned with tender clams and a creamy base; it was really good.  I got the special of the day, a lobster roll which was stuffed with plump chunks of tender lobster.  I ordered mine warm so it was served in a toasted split bun with drawn butter on the side.  They also serve them cold with the lobster bound in mayonnaise.  My husband got a fried shrimp platter which was good as well though the French fries are forgettable.

We visited this place while camping in The DAR. The food and service were excellent and we returned on three occasions! The belly clams and lobster rolls were the favorites with everyone. We also loved the clam chowder and a fried scallop dinner that was being offered as a special one of the days.
Good, quality lunch food at the Burgy Snack bar. We are always amazed at the generous portion sizes. If you order a reuben, you'll definitely want a leftover box, unless you're very hungry! Their seafood is very popular, and I myself enjoy the Crabcake Po'boy. My only wish for them is that they had better homemade fries. That's the only small drawback for me. Oh, here's a tip: don't be deceived by the number of cars outside- it may look like the place is packed, but inside is a very large rectangular bar that fits many people, and there's also several picnic tables. They are limited in parking, but there's almost always a seat available inside.
I didn't expect much from a "Snack Bar", but wow was I surprised! Their fresh lobster roll was packed with choice lobster held together with a tad of mayo. As someone who dislikes a lot of mayo, I was pleased that it in no way interfered with the taste of the lobster. The lobster roll was superb, and so was the price which at $10.50, made me do a double take. 

We sat at one of the painted indoor picnic tables, and read from a surprisingly large menu that even accommodates vegetarians.  I was intent on lobster roll and was offered a choice of cold lobster with toasted buttered bun (that I got), or of a hot lobster roll with melted butter on the side.  

I very much look forward to returning to this gem of a spot whenever we return to this area.  I highly recommend it.

The Williamsburg Snack Bar serves breakfast (the breakfast menu also looks good) as well as lunch, and some nights dinner.
I stopped in on my way out of town and my friend was right -- lobster roll with chips for $10.50! Generous portion, would be $14 anywhere else. Not too much mayo, no celery or cucumber or anything to dilute the simplicity. Roll was soft, white, and grilled to perfection. There are tables outside under an awning and lots of picnic tables inside; I sat at the bar. (They do not serve alcohol, I don't think.) I am from Rockport, MA, so have had my share of lobster rolls since childhood, and I deem this one excellent. Served with a small wedge of lemon, which is always nice. Free refills on soda and the staff were all very friendly. I wish my appetite had been bigger, because I read from others that the fried clams are excellent. Maybe next time! And next time, I will hopefully sit at a table with friends -- the tables all have sayings painted on them. Cute place. Air conditioning inside.
The Williamsburg Snack Bar was a nice place to stop while driving up Route 9 into the hill towns.  It came highly recommended for its seafood and most notably the lobster roll.  The snack bar is unique in that it is air conditioned with the picnic tables inside, probably 8 to 10 tables and a large lunch counter.  The menu is quite large and they serve both breakfast and lunch.

Sitting at the lunch counter, I was welcomed, handed the menu and the specials were recited.  The snack bar was busy at lunch time and the food came out in a reasonable time.  There were many families and friends enjoying this venue and would say this is where the locals tend to meet.  

The lobster roll was of average size with chunks of lobster meat, not a lot of mayo but had too much paprika sprinkled on top which took away from the flavor of the lobster meat.  The price was reasonable, the service was good but disappointed in the lobster roll.
We enjoyed fresh lobster rolls, fried clams and very good service. Portions were generous and atmosphere, a bit quirky but welcome air-con on a hot summer day. No alcohol. Worth a stop.
The owners are usually working in the kitchen and out on the floor, and it shows: there's attention to details here. Food arrives quickly, even when crowded.  It can get very crowded at lunchtime. Wide-ranging menu with seafood given a major role, but there are also chicken and beef entrees. Famed for lobster rolls, and "platters" of various kinds. Comfy and low-keyed, nothing fancy, worth a stop if you're heading to the Berkshires.
Extensive menu, delicious food, generous portions and very reasonable prices.  Efficient service with a smile, no matter how busy they are.  Seating is not super comfortable.  There are a few traditional tables, but most seating is either at the bar or at an indoor (or outdoor) picnic table.  The acoustics are poor, so it can get very noisy but don't let that deter you. I promise you won't be disappointed.
Thank you God for this amazing dining experience! First time here. Thought I was dreaming. The love flows from the chef to the food to the wait staff right into my mouth. This place should be on the TV news.
The clam chowder is the best!  My sister had the lobster bisque and said the same.  We always enjoy the whole belly clams as well.  One of my sisters loves the lobster blt as well.
The Snack Bar is one of my favorite restaurants.  They have a wide variety of breakfast and lunch offerings with plenty of fish and seafood items and the prices are very reasonable.  Try the hash or benedicts for breakfast and don't miss the soups and chowders for lunch.  Dinner is served only on Thursday through Saturday and often feature specials.  Don't miss it!
The food is terrific at the snack bar; the staff is welcoming and extremely nice. The theme is fun and the restaurant is extremely clean. They have numerous options on their menu and everything we ordered was excellent.
OMG. This place is off the charts. My sisters and I stopped for lunch yesterday.  We had the whole belly clams, clams chowder and lobster bisque. The lobster bisque had chucks of real lobster in it. It is amazing. It was so good . Hopefully we will head back this was for I head back to Florida.
The Snack Bar has the best blueberry pancakes for miles with real maple syrup. Their  staff is friendly and you will meet lots of local folks who enjoy eating there. On the weekend it tends to be a bit busier but it is worth the wait. An easy stop if you are on your way to the hills of Western Mass for skiing or a Sunday drive. It is located just past the center of Haydenville and there is plenty of parking. Easily handicapped accessible!
We loved this place when they were in the old location. It has gotten better. Expanded menu, sit down service. Same great prices and portions. Great bang for your buck!!!!!!
Rich is a great cook. 
 
The veggie burger is great, just need to have some cholula sauce. 
 Awesome local spot, such cute decor. Like going to Margaritaville. 
We stopped by the Williamsburg Snack Bar the other day to visit it's new location, about a half mile east from the previous location.  Same great lobster roll.  We noticed an expanded menu, and a great crowd for early lunch
Love love love this place. It is where community comes together. Locals and passersby mingle in this inviting restaurant enjoying good food and good company. Kudos to you Dianne, you and yours have hit a home run.
A great family stop. They have the best flavors. Hand scooped and Soft served. Along with tons of other treats. 
This family owned establishment has been there since I can remember. This is a must when driving Rt 9 in Western Mass. 
Village Green is a nice neighborhood place to stop for ice cream.  Soft serve and hard packed ice cream available.  We usually go for the soft serve.  The ice cream itself is nothing special, but it's a fun easy place to stop.  Staff (local teens) are always friendly. 
Favorite place to go for ice cream cones, sundays, dishes -- run by a local family who owns the green house business there.   American ingenuity and perseverance has made this a top notch experience.
This is a nice family run greenhouse with awesome people, ice cream and plants. If you get a chance to stop and browse grab a cone and wander. The owners are most helpful and knowledgeable of their products. And the best part they are local.
Have stopped here many times and the quality never disappointing  Great selection and variety..  Usually a line, but it moves quickly.
Our favorite ice cream stand of all time. You can't beat the quality and the price.Great selection of hard flavors, sundaes and soft serve.
Had a great chocolate malt milk shake with real hard ice cream .. junior size was plenty .. an excellent treat!! The sundaes my crew enjoyed drew equally rave satisfaction.
A great variety of hard and soft ice creams served by friendly people. Very good quality and big servings. Creative sundaes. Frozen yougurt. Lots of cone licking going on. Sometimes a line, but it's fast moving.
Great service. Very generous sizes.  I got a large the first time - lets just say I didn't warn you :)  their soft serve is some of the best in the valley.  Might even try a sundae next time.  Worth the trip.  With the local burger trailer/shack just down the way made a summer evening of it.  Perfect for a mid summer evening as the sun was setting.
The Village Green has so many choices for ice cream, floats, sundaes, milkshakes, etc. and they keep adding more! I love having this place close by. it's nice to do a little plant shopping while you enjoy a peanut butter and hot fudge sundae on coffee soft serve or a cone with coffee-black raspberry twist.
Great service and decent number of ice cream and frozen yogurt choices from roadside location, sm children's play area, limited parking, fast service, good portion sizes
This place is a family favorite of ours for years serving generous portions of
a variety of ice cream choices.  Their soft serve is the old fashioned stand by..
serving vanilla, chocolate, Raspberry and my favorite Coffee soft serve....or a
combo of any....and frozen yogurt soft serve too. ....the closest to home made
taste. This place is located at one end of a plant stand/store with a few picnic
tables to sit and mini play area for the kids. Sadly it is a seasonal business and 
closes towards the end of October and reopens in the Spring..so hurry before
cold weather !
Wonderful spot to grab a nice cold treat.  Cones, sundaes, shakes & much more!!  Big variety, wonderful staff!  
Conveniently located off Route 9.  There were lots of choices for flavors, and it's a popular place with the locals, judging by the number of people there.
We were looking for something local and came upon this semi-permanent food truck set up on the side of the road. We generally like food trucks, so we pulled in. The menu is nicely varied and we were also pleasantly surprised to see grass-fed burgers on the menu.  I ordered the grass-fed burger with green chiles and it was absolutely outstanding. We also ordered the onion rings and out came these giant, heavenly rings of deliciousness. If you're riding down Route 9 and are hungry, I recommend you stop here and search no further!
Great spot to stop on a summer or fall day.  The quality of the meat is good, but there are no real beverage choices and the ketchup and other condiments are processed in contrast to the local, fresh meat choices.  Probably great for families.  Ice cream next door and outside, too.
Pleasantly surprised by the very good food.  We've been to Local Burger in the center of Northampton and liked it also.  This place has great brisket, fish tacos and burgers.  Seating is at picnic tables and assorted round tables outside.  Very pleasant.
the service was awesome the food friggin outstanding and serving size more then enough.the taste was like going to a bbq competition i will go back again as i have every year for last two years .this place rocks the traditional and above in everything.
This is the place to go for an awesome burger. I customize mine with bleu cheese crumbles and sautéed mushrooms and onions. The fries are also amazing and very clearly homemade. If you have room, which you probably won't, there's an ice cream stand just feet away!
Went here last night a group of 12, from pulled pork, to burgers, onion rings, fries, brisket, lobster roll ,it was all just wonderful.  What a local treasure, wish I lived here enjoy again.  Yum yum
I stopped here yesterday and ordered a Williamsburger.  It is a burger featuring local beef  with pulled pork, BBQ sauce and 1 huge fried onion ring.  It was a mouthful and more.  I don't get here that often but I know that they have very creative and tasty burgers.  Next time I will try their BBQ ribs.  A great summer destination in Williamsburg MA
The pulled pork, brisket & ribs are the best. Love it. Great outside dining with music. Next to village green. So you can have dessert after 😃  Their burgers are great too.
As someone who frequents route 9 from the Berkshires to Amherst to see family, we pass by here all the time.  Husband had the look park burger and I had the pulled pork sandwich.  It was very reason all price wise and delicious! We'll have to stop by again, I am intrigued by the captain crunch chicken tenders!
I stopped for lunch and had a burger with apple smoked bacon lettuce pickles ketchup mustard and a side order of fries. The burger was delicious; thick and  perfectly cooked. The fries were very good too. The staff was very friendly. Will definitely go back.   
Not the best BBQ in the country, but certainly the best I've had in the area. I've been there a bunch of times and always enjoyed the pulled pork. The Carolina BBQ sauce that comes on it is to die for. The brisket is good, but inconsistent. Staff are always friendly. Any issues I've had have been minor and I dreamed of Local Burgy all winter when they were closed. 
A fun location in my neighborhood, but this calorie laden menue is best split with a friend.  Wish they had sliders.
Found this pot of gold on Mother's Day (5/8/16) just as the sun replaced the rain clouds and we stopped for a 2pm lunch. The wind was brisk, but my craving for a REAL burger was satisfied, and the large order of scrumptious fries was a bonus. The table service after you ordered was unexpected, and the place was bustling as I commented to my wife that more cars turned into the lot than drove by. We will be back !
I like outside dining.  This is outside dining at it's best for family time, or just hang time.
Great food. Good service.  The homemade bar-be-cue sauce is excellent.  The brisket is out of this world and the onion rings are to die for!!!
Local Burger is closed now for the season but I can,t wait for it to open next Spring. Their menu of locally sourced food includes delicious hamburgers with meat from local farms. Their  onion rings were the best around!  It was so nice to eat out on hot nights. 
Food is fantastic! Fresh local ingredients make this place a popular destination. Had Mac and cheese which was okay, chicken fingers were excellent, burgers were fresh, and the fresh cut fries were awesome. Only thing I would like to be able to get a butter toasted roll and it would be perfect.
The grass fed burgers are sinfully good as are the fries and onion rings. Low key, fast yet personal service. Yummy and well priced, take out and outside dining only. 

Go , before they close for season!
I could cook the brisket with a fork. A plastic fork! Love their Carolina mustard-based barbecue sauce. The slaw was very good. 
Huge onion rings cook fresh. 
No words, ok I have alot of words and they're leaning towards BEST BURGER EVER. Juicy Lucy and Brisket fries with cheese curds. A bit pricey but the portions are so huge it's three meals in one, worth every penny. 
Thank you Local Burger for bringing your slice of burger heaven to Williamsburg.
Stopped with a friend for lunch - we each ordered a burger, with sweet potato fries to share - We built our own burger, mine with bacon and bleu cheese -  cooked just as ordered, and the fries were perfection.  The seating is outdoors, and only some of the tables have shade, so bring a hat if it's a sunny day.    Perfect lunch and food served quickly!
Straw Bale Cafe at Hanging Mountain Farm serves really good breakfast. I haven't been there for lunch sobcan't say how lunch is. But I've had breakfast there probably a dozen or more timed and I've only had one meal that was just so so. (And I think it was just an off day because I've eaten the same thing (baked oatmeal) many other times without complaint. 

In addition to the usual breakfast fare they serve some creative and delicious treats. The aforementioned baked oatmeal, baked eggs (a concoction that includes cottage cheese as well as other ingredients) and us just plain yummy. For those who can't decide among the many options they allow you to pick three as a combo plate. 

They make their own maple syrup on the premises and don't charge more for it (any restaurant in new emgland that does is just plain nuts).

My only demerit is for value. Breakfast can be costly. Today's pancake breakfast for four with coffee set us back $70 with tip. That's a little rich but I think they jacked  the prices for the maple sugaring tourist season and expect when the regular menu returns next week that the prices will moderate a little. 

If you are visiting Northampton MA a trip to Hanging Mountain Farm's straw bale cafe (constructed from genuine straw bales) is well worth the trip off the beaten path. It's a quick detour from downtown 'Hamp. The owners couldn't be nicer or more proud of their great restaurant. 
We had an order of the pumpkin bread French toast that came with toasted coconut and maple butter and and order of the blueberry pancakes and both were delicious.  So many blueberries! And the pumpkin bread French toast was really yummy. We had an order of the hash which was tasty. Excellent decaf coffee.  Great service and reasonable prices.
This was a quaint little cafe on a farm. Nothing real fancy but the food was great! The service was great well. You could eat in or out, weather permitting. The prices were very reasonable for the quality of the food that was served! Everything was nice and fresh! I will return again! 
How to eat a stack of delicious pancakes with all the trimmings, including maple syrup fresh from the sugar shack in the yard and not feel guilty? we walked there and back from the outskirts of nearby Florence, a long trudge through the woods for our brunch. but definitely worth every blister.  wonderful building, great story, super people, excellent meal and we even got interviewed for the local paper!  would i do it again?  you bet!
First, this is an interesting strawbale building with family history & devotion. Interesting reasonable breakfast options with gluten free options or egg free choices. Great people.
Eat outside in season.
Breakfast for two.   We decided to take a drive to the country to break the normal routine of the usual breakfasts we normally enjoy.

The Strawbale cafe, is a labor of family love, rich with history nestled in the hills of Westhampton on a farm.   The decor is quaint and warm.   The dining room reminds me of a huge family kitchen.   Real maple syrup is made on site as with other kitchen provisions.

The food is farm fresh, but they are missing on a few things and this is why they are getting a three.   When you have everything in place, the atmosphere, history, ambiance, character and a real maple syrup shack...why, would you skimp on bacon?!  It was razor thin, tasted awful and reminded me of something from a fast food joint.   

Everything else is fresh.   Kale, eggs, pancakes, toast....

Although staff is friendly, the lack of waitressing experience is apparent.   Not listening to our order, I had to correct and repeat several times, only for the order to come out wrong.  I'm all for high school kids to have a job, but make sure they are qualified, or at least have the drive.

Meals were priced appropriately.

I like this place, it has potential but it needs to have problems corrected.

Last visit for some time.
Great location and interesting history. Hidden in Westhampton, Strawbale Cafe a great place to relax and enjoy a weekend breakfast! Service and atmosphere was friendly and welcoming. It was our first visit, but we are sure to become regulars. Highly recommend a visit!
Not that pizza is all that you can get at this delightful cafe hidden away in Haydenville MA north of Northampton. It is a casual country place with lots of wood inside and natural light streaming in, open-air tables among flowers and plants in-season, and a rustic comfortable atmosphere. We did try the pizza on recommendation and were not sorry. We created our own with mushrooms and roasted red peppers on a tomato sauce and cheese base; our friends had a "white" pizza with lots of garlic, olive oil and mozzarella. We also sampled the salad with home-made dressing. I chose the Caesar dressing and could taste the anchovy in it; it was so delicious that I had to eat every bite. We also got a loaf of hearty bread to take home with us, which apparently often sells out. I loved everything there including the waiter we had. He was so warm and friendly that it added a real level of comfort to the meal. I definitely plan to go back!
Stopped for a quick snack.  Ended up getting slices of pizza, coffee, juices, quiche, and baked goods.  Outstanding!
Great bakery and cafe.  The breads are all extraordinarily good.  Pizza and sandwiches are also excellent, as is the coffee.  Atmosphere is casual, funky and very down to earth.

Highly recommended.
Amazing freshly made sandwiches, salads, desserts, breads and pizza. Use locally grown ingredients whenever possible. Fun cafe like atmosphere. Some outdoor seating (though little shade) amongst flowers and sculptures. Definitely a worthy stop of a meal, fresh bread or a sweet treat. 
Don't let the unfinished outside fool you to make you think they don't take their food seriously. The food at Bread Euphoria is always great and freshly made.  Make sure to try their pizza! Usually plenty of spaces to eat inside or outside in the nice weather.  I have also enjoyed their BLTs and chicken Caesar salads; no matter what we have ordered we have never been disappointed.
Very homey atmosphere, but with carefully prepared breads, pastries, pizzas, and plates. Saturday night music is often great fun. Not very big, seating later in the evening can be tricky.
Cozy, quaint, and wonderful coffee and homemade food!  Good selection from baked goods, delicious breads, quiche, pizza and more and the coffee was stellar.  I even bought some freshly baked biscuits for my dog.  Modest interior, but the food was very good.  They even stocked some local cheeses and ceramics for sale, and while we didn't get to enjoy it, live music on some evenings.  I'll be back next time I'm visiting! 
Stopped in for the first time for a quick snack. We were greeted by several friendly staff members, it was so welcoming. Everything on the menu sounds delicious, and looks so good and fresh. We got a sandwich which was great, the bread is awesome!! We will definitely be back.
I stop here often on my way to and from work.  Always easy to get a good quick meal: salads, soups, sandwiches, pizza, quiche.  Especially quiche - it's very rich, cheesy, light and with a pastry crust rather than traditional pie crust.  My favorite bakery items are morning bun and ginger scone.   Only complaint:  they are a bit overpriced. Obviously, it doesn't deter me because at least I like what I get in return.  
The food is so freshly prepared, the baked goods are sublime, and the service is excellent.  I wish it was a little less expensive, but then again, I would gain 30 pounds if I went there too often.  Everything is so yummy!
We were three hungry people looking for pie one weekend afternoon. Well, to be honest, the 5 and the 7 year olds were moving rapidly from hungry to hangry, and I wasn't far behind. We'd just left a cafe that had "pie" in its name, but was only serving a couple of esoteric options (maybe in another life my kids will scream delightedly for some more Shaker Grapefruit pie, but not this day). Euphoria Bread...totally lives up to its name, and then some. The most lovely aroma envelops you at the door. Breads, croissants, cakes, pizzas...and pie, actual simple delicious apple pie! They also make a smooth latte, offer local chocolate milk, and have live music in the evenings. The dining room is airy, light, and warm.  As is the bread! Enjoy!
This bakery and restaurant produces excellent breads and desserts and tasty lunch fare. Friendly staff, informal, and a local institution.
Bread Euphoria started as a small bakery around the corner many years ago.  With lots of really hard work and a commitment to quality, this bakery / restaurant has grown to become quite the operation.  There is even entertainment on Saturday nights!  We love their fresh baked breads and the staff is always so friendly.
It is the consistently best lunch in the area.  The vibe is cool and relaxed.  Close to Northampton but out of the fray.  Great pastries and bread, to.
Bread Euphoria is a baking gift to the Northampton & Western Mass Hilltowns and a happy, busy, friendly place to sit down and have really excellent coffee and a really delicious pastry. Their muffins, croissants, breakfast buns, and our favorite  -- pecan sticky buns -- are all very very good. To take home, breads and cakes are definitely also worth a trip. Sometimes a bit expensive but always a special treat. Perhaps the only question is whether they haven't gone too far in trying to provide too many kinds of dishes (pizza, breakfasts, salads, sandwiches soups, gelato) for too many kinds of hungers.
Terrific breads and food.  We always buy several loaves to take back to New York!  Highly recommend Euphoria!
Best cinnamon raisin bread. Toast or French toast will make you come back for many visits. The muffins are moist and fresh! 
Everything is from local sources, and the quality of the bread and baked goods is fabulous.  The prices are a bit steep, but it feels to be worth it as a special treat.
Good bread, dry pizza, very overpriced but attractive cakes (but not tasty), had Mac and cheese and felt sick, but many folks love it. It is a gathering spot for the Whole Foods crowd.
My staff and I look forward to the start of our work day knowing that Bread Euphoria is there to provide coffee, breakfast sandwiches, and pastries. The food is fresh, healthy and delicious! We're lucky to have them close by!
First time visit with family and we were impressed with the good quality food and clean out door eating area.  We had fun hitting a few balls after.
Great time for family, friends, couples, or alone. Outdoor seating with or without shade. Real soft serve ice cream, very affordable. Reubens are especially good and their lobster rolls are surprisingly tasty and well priced. 
You can watch mini golf or play. Often local coupons are around to get two-for-one buckets of balls. 
Beautiful view of greens and mountains while eating. 

Only drawback: drinks and milkshakes are in styrofoam. 
Scotti's is a roadside driving range and snack bar which you would assume has mediocre food.  However it's actually very good.  Sandwiches, burgers, and fish and chips are consistently good.  I particularly like the Reuben and sausage grinder.  Good soft serve to cap things off.
Scottie's has the best lobster rolls, tuna rolls, grinders and burgers.  An order of fries is huge. Lines are always long.  Well worth the wait.  And you can get ice cream for dessert.
I had heard about Scottis before I started working in Leeds. So naturally I had to try it. AMAZING lobster roll!! My coworker in Greenfield was soooo correct:-)
The line is always long-- well known and great.  Famous for their lobster roll but everything is excellent and generous.  As it is also  golf range where you can practice your swing, that is also entertaining and just fun to watch.  Outside dining casual and great. Friendly people. A must if you are in the area. Cannot say enough about the quality of food-- perfect!
A must stop for lunch or dinner, wide variety of food from burgers, hot dogs, steak grinders, lobster rolls, fried sea food weekends in season hopefully,
 all are excellent choices, gets busy, can have long lines ,best to call order in as take out
There's always a line, but it's so worth the wait. I especially love the Leeds Burger, and pretty much every time I go they ask if I want "single" or "double" - the double is listed on the menu, and it's really nice that they ask. I know there is other good stuff on the menu - before I tried the Leeds Burger (which is what I end up deciding on every time now) I also enjoyed the hot dog, and the steak and cheese. The onion rings are delicious too.
The food is pretty good and the portion sizes are good for the money. The wait can be awhile, especially on the weekends during the summer, so if you can, I recommend that you call ahead and place your order. It also has a driving range attached, so that has a tendency to bring in the crowds and make parking there a bit of a hassle.
I have been a long time fan of Scotti's and wish I had taken more photos the last time I was there (about a week ago). Originally from western Mass, I have eaten my share of drive in / take out food from hot dog stands and fast food vendors on road trips in the area. Nothing, literally, nothing surpasses the steak & cheese at Scotti's on Route 9 in Leeds. 

The food is always made fresh to order - and as customizable as you can imagine. Their recent addition of seafood to their menu (recent within the last handful of years) has been tremendous and I am hard pressed not to make that my focus - but my heart does lie with the steak & cheese. Oozing with cheese fresh off the grill, topped with whatever you like (my preference: sauteed mushrooms, lettuce, pickles and mayo), served on a toasted freshly baked roll cannot be beat. Their french fries are a crowd pleaser for sure. Hand pulled through the potato slicer, they are cooked up fresh daily with nothing added to them. Top em with chili if you like, but I say salt and vinegar is the way to go. The outdoor seating is covered for the most part - a few picnic tables sit in the open sun - and overlook the long lawn of the driving range. Window/counter service is always with a smile and the place is clean, fastidiously so (unlike some drive ins where there is old ketchup crusted on trays and on the picnic table seats).

Not only is Scotti, the owner of the family run drive in and driving range, a familiar friendly face which is always present in the kitchen, but his wife, Tammy, is there at his side most of the time or on the golf side (which was formerly run by Scotti's parents). I love nothing more than good food made by good people with strong family ties. Both the food side and the driving range are staples in the area for employing young high schoolers - oftentimes as their first job during summers. He has helped many a youngster earn money to put toward college and helped them garner confidence during what can be a trying time in a young person's life. 

Do yourself (and your family - if you have one) a favor and stop by here your next time through the area. I promise you won't be disappointed and if anything, may stop and make it a regular tradition!
It is a small and dated restaurant but the food is very good. Don't let the facade stop you from going in. The restaurant is clean. The staff is very friendly and attentive. The restaurant is clean. The food here is not your typical Chinese. More attention is paid to the preparation of better ingredients. The food tastes fresher, more authentic. We manage to come here twice a year because it's about 15 miles from home. Whenever we are in the area and we are in the mood for Chinese food we go.
Lot's of people think Great Wall is the best Chinese restaurant ever. I, for one, can't really understand why it has this reputation.  My father in law wants to eat three whenever we go out. 

I'll admit that it's better than a run of the mill Chinese restaurant and sometimes they use local vegetables but it follows the basic Chinese restaurant formula.  It's fun, a bit quirky and better than average and a lot of people seem to really like it. 

It does have a nice affordable lunch menu.
The food is good, no denying, but not worth the cost of the small portions, the fact that you will get all the way home before realizing they left stuff out of your order or got some of it wrong, and having to deal with the rudeness of the staff. Like they are doing me the favor of waiting on me....I'm doing them the favor by giving them the business, but no more. We just moved here a couple of months ago and wanted to find a good Chinese restaurant. I was hoping we had found it because of the close proximity to home, but I don't mind going a little further if we are treated with respect.
As my dad was reaching his 100th birthday, we brought him from New York City to an assisted living facility in Western Massachusetts.  While spry and fully alert, he could no longer continue on his own in his own New York apartment.  As soon as he settled in, we debated how to celebrate his centennial, the answer was easy: Chinese food.

"But," said dad, "is there Chinese food that people will enjoy up in this part of Massachusetts?".  Words wouldn't persuade him, so one day, we piled him into a car, and took off for the Great Wall.

To say that my dad was skeptical would be understatement.  "Are you taking me to a restaurant in a strip mall in Northampton, Mass. that serves Chinese food that we're going to offer to friends and family coming in from all over the United States to celebrate my 100th birthday," he asked? "Well, yes," I said, "but let's see what you think after the meal."

We were a gang of about six for this try-out dinner.  We ordered all of the fresh vegetable dishes on the Great Wall's menu.  There are farmers in western Mass. who have developed a specialty of growing oriental vegetables, and with whom the Great Wall has a close relationship.  Each of the Great Wall dishes was better than its predecessor. Dad's continuing refrain: "I've never tasted any vegetables this fresh. Ever!"  We ordered off both the "regular" and the "gourmet" menus. Each items was a triumph! Each one was fresh! Imaginative! Creative! Old favorites were presented in perfect style.  New dishes with which we weren't familiar were successes following successes!

Understand that the Great Wall is devoted to food.  It is not fancy.  Service is plain.  Lots of people order food by phone, and then drive by to pick it up to eat at home.  But, the food is outstanding! Chicken, duck, pork, lamb, beef and vegetarian dishes. One after another! Each one superb, and each one challenging our group: "Is this the best dish or was that one better?"  Each dish had its champions.  None of us disagreed.

The Great Wall does have some Chimerican dishes. Ignore them.  The Chinese food is what you're going for.  The value is terrific! Prices are fair! Portions are abundant! And special requests are honored with no mickey mouse about "Well, that will cost an additional $3.00!"

I'm not an over the top person, but for me and The Great Wall -- five chopsticks!! (There is no higher rating!!)
This was my first experience with dim sum, and I'm happy to say it happened here at Great Wall, a small, friendly place with a family feel. All we had to say - there were 6 of us - was "Yes" when asked if we wanted dim sum, and the plates began appearing. I wish I knew all the names of the various dumplings with their tasty fillings; the server pointed out which were chicken, pork or tofu, but to me they all just tasted very, very good. Steamed, except for the sesame balls and a plate of greens, so it all even tasted healthy. Good time, very good food.
Came at a quiet time, very friendly staff. Ordered curry chicken extra spicy with extra veggies. Yummy and I felt very comfortable dining alone. Lots of take out orders but dining in was OK. 
Mediocre food delivered late and cold. Never an apology. We live five minutes away from the restaurant. No excuse for one hour and ten minutes delivery time, and all food was cold. Unhappy - won't do it again. This is not the first time we have been disappointed. Slow learners, but it's the only game in town. Good excuse for poor service - no one else to call!
Great Wall is a family run Chinese Restaurant in Florence, MA, near Northampton.  They serve a special "Dim Sum" on Saturdays from 11 AM until 2 PM.  I have had Dim Sum before in Hong Kong and it is different than regular menu items.  You are offered a big variety of small portions of pork or shrimp, steamed buns etc. with tea, like a brunch.  Unfortunately we arrived after 1 o'clock and the rolling steam cart had been picked over so we didn't have too many fresh choices.  What we had was good.  Next time we will get there at 11 AM!
This place was recommended to me. I went there for takeout and was disappointed by both the food and the attitude of the owner. I tried it a second time with the same result. I gave up and found a better local Chinese restaurant.
We've been going to Clara and Ken's GREAT WALL  restaurant for several years, located in Florence MA just outside of Northampton.  Do not expect to find your usual type food as they cook specialty dishes that will make your toes curl with delight.  Whenever we head towards Boston from upstate New York, this is a MUST STOP opportunity.
This restaurant has been around for many years, and because it is in my neighborhood and because it is family owned, I do not want to write a bad review. I do want them to continue their business and do well. At the same time I wish the owners could recognize their problems and put in a little effort to improve. Many friends used to love this place. Now only the truly faithful are still visiting. Recently I visited with one of these truly faithfuls. The food is still good! But you may have to put up with (1) getting the wrong order (2) waiting for a long time for the check (3) portion is too small. But think of it this way, if you are trying to loose weight but craving for delicious food, this is your perfect place. You come here not for the "My name is so and so, I will be taking care of you tonight" type of service. You come here just for the food. The owner is a no non-sense person. She is busy and she is going to take your order fast and run away. Your food will appear and you will finish its entirety and want more - so you have to come back next time.
maybe the best in the state. but be sure to order from their small "gourmet" menu. Stuffed Tofu, Dragon skin, fabulous pan-fried talapia -- and their dim-sum on Saturdays is something very special.
We were looking for a new Chinese restaurant and came upon Great Wall. We were seated right away in a booth. It filled up quite quickly after we were deleted. I prefer the Wonton soup for an appetizer and my husband ordered the Scallion Pancake. My soup was just ok, nothing special. The scallion Pancake however was very good. I would be sure to sample that if we are evert to return.  For the meal I had the meal of sesame chicken rice and an egg roll. All good and fresh. My husband got theCrispy Crackling Aromatic Roasted Pork. He said that it was very good and he was very happy with his choice. The waitress never asked if we wanted something to drink so we just had the tea and water that they searched with the meal. 
As part of a monthly Girls' Night, my friends and I come to eat here every month.  While the decor is a little "vintage traditional" - the food is stellar.  The employees are very friendly and the people in the kitchen obviously know their stuff!  So much so that the girls and I have stopped wandering.  The plan to  "eat our way through the menu" is under suspension because we get our favorites most of the time.  In he end - the food is the real deal - not what I term "fast food chinese"...
They have a traditional menu as well as a gourmet menu for even MORE traditional asian delicacies.  You will love anything from either menu. 

The Great Wall serves dim sum on SATURDAYS ONLY from 11-2:30. It is idiosyncratic, full of surprises, very very fresh, local whenever possible  and totally wonderful. The place attracts families and Asian college students who eat and eat and eat for remarkably reasonable prices. Two of us stuffed ourselves for $27!

Service is always somewhat chaotic --an inscrutable mix of a rolling steamer cart, a buffet table and food ordered from the kitchen. I have never managed to figure out the drill, but we keep making the one hour drive from Vermont because the food is so very good and there is always something interesting we never had anywhere else. The service, a friendly family affair, is always gracious and warm. When Mom says "thank you for coming," I am rather touched.

In addition to the Saturday's dim sum, the restaurant's claim to fame is its separate Gourmet Menu. I rarely get beyond their awesome soups and the chef's signature Dragon Skins (stuffed tofu skins -- and I basically hate tofu but this dish is fabulous). The husband gets occasional uncontrollable yearnings for another unique dish in which pork and veg are kind of steam cooked in a clay pot. 

I have only given it a four rating because it is indeed as shabby as others have mentioned and because of the confusing dim sum service but the food is some of the best anywhere!
The food in great wall was deli
today i went there with my kids.
my kids like the Chinese dumplings, because  it is soft and tasty for kids 
This is good, real food. The location is humble but food is authentic. We more often order for takeout and that seems the norm. But dining in is fine and some dishes are best eaten in the dining room. Our favorite Chinese restaurant. 
When we saw the "Chinese-American Food" sign over the door of this place in a run-down strip mall in western Massachusetts, we were, to say the least, wary.  But don't let that scare you. What came out of the kitchen was some of the best Cantonese food we have had outside of China.  We ordered from the "gourmet menu" exclusively—we're not into chicken fingers and spare ribs.  Go elsewhere for those.  We started with Dragon Skin made with layers of tofu skin and ground meats and shrimp.   It was surrounded by perfectly prepared, bright green al dente broccoli.  
We followed this with stuffed eggplant—again perfectly coked, soft and creamy without being mushy; and stuffed tofu over a layer of sautéed bok choy, prepared with a stuffing similar to the eggplant but different enough in taste and texture to keep the meal from being boring.  
The only weak dish was sautéed watercress: The tough stems were left on, and the leaves were overcooked.  
Like much Cantonese food, the sauces were prepared with sugar but happily not in the amounts that seemed to be used in so many Chinese restaurants.
Service was attentive and thoughtful—important when you have a six year old along.
Ambience is bit dark and dreary but cozy, reminding us of the old time Cantonese restaurants from the 1950s.  I far prefer this to the brightly lighted and highly mirrored.
We'll definitely go back.
The food at this rather shabby restaurant has gone from mediocre to bad to worse. The management is completely incompetent, and the waitstaff seems to operate in a daze, perplexed by every question or request that comes their way. We decided to give the place one last try this evening (after staying away for over a year) and that was it. The food took over an hour to arrive (and was cold when it did) and our order was screwed up. I can't imagine that this place will stay in business much longer.
Warm, hearty dishes! Strange atmosphere but wonderful service. Don't be fooled by the awkward strip-mall location; you'll have a delicious homestyle meal here. Great for sharing and for Chinese New Year!
After discovering another Florence cafe didn't offer gluten free options on their sandwiches, I discovered Sunrise Over Florence.  I wavered between the salmon burger and the portabello sandwich, and picked salmon.  The gluten free bread isn't fancy but it's good. The salmon was cooked correctly and came with lettuce and cucumber and topped with a dill mayonnaise that could have used more dill, but it is January, so I understand.  Also included were a few potato chips and a nice dill pickle spear.  For the money, a very good lunch and no parking hassle like downtown. Nice friendly atmosphere. Good looking cookies, too, but they weren't gluten-free, of course. I'd go back.
Great food, pleasant service and buena onda. Playzone, mags and papers, good coffee and no bs.
Anytime is good for T and C!
Pretty interesting selection of books from local writers too.
 
The food is very fresh and the menu is imaginative.

Guests are welcome, including children.  Wi-Fi.

This is a good place to hang out.
When you eat and drink here you are immersed in the Florence/Northampton community. Good coffee, sandwiches, and baked goods.
This is the closet coffee place to where I am staying and was a bit worried upon entering. But have been back 4 days in a row, as much for the muffins as the coffee.

Slow but friendly enough service.
I went on a Tuesday afternoon by myself. I'd heard about the kid-friendly toy zone and imagined it would be full of moms and kids but there wasn't a single one. The tables by the window were occupied by friends or business associates chatting in twos. There was a man on a laptop but I don't think he was hooked up to any wi-fi. I know I couldn't connect to any.

The place at 4pm on a Tuesday was being staffed by a man and a woman. I don't know if they were the owners or just happened to be the ones on staff. I did see another kid appear and disappear from somewhere in the back for a moment too. No one hurried to take my order or to get it ready in a hurry but that was okay. I wasn't in a hurry. In the 20-30 minutes I was there they did a steady take-out business of mostly coffee.

The menu is sandwiches, breakfast sandwiches, paninis, and salads. "The Cutlery" is a sandwich with turkey, local apple, Vermont cheese, organic greens, and mango chutney on peasant wheat bread. Comes with chips and a pickle for $7.75. I didn't get that but that's an example of the food you will find. Their take-out menu gives a long list of the local suppliers they use.

I'm not sure how many options you have for a cup of coffee in the center of Florence once Miss Flo's closes so this might be your best choice. Might not.
I used to eat brunch here nearly every summer Saturday for a couple of years. I almost never go any more, because most of the food is flavorless, comes in tiny portions, and tastes over-baked or as if it's been sitting in the display case for too long -- really dried out and unappealing. I've noticed over the years that staff turnover is high, which is usually a good indication that staff members aren't being treated well, are underpaid, or both.

The only exception is pie: I've had some good slices of homemade pie with local fruit. I also like the magazine rack with lots of reading material, and the bulletin boards dedicated to local events and activism. My co-worker used to like to bring his kids there when they were young, as there's a play area in the back.
Always takes a while for a worker to come to the counter to give you your empty coffee cup and take your money, then longer because the coffee thermoses are sputteringly empty. My young son said the server "sounded like Siri" from the i-phone. There is that odd, disconnected interaction from the staff. For a kid-friendly cafe, It's an odd place.
I've been to Cup and Top on my way in town as a means to provide business for a local establishment, however time and time again I have been disappointed by the coffee, food, and atmosphere of Cup and Top. With few exceptions, the vast majority of the staff is hard to interact with and there have been multiple times I have stood at the counter and waited for a significant amount of time in plain view of a staff member. The food is ok, but every time I ordered an espresso based drink it was burned or tasted funky. I don't think I will be visiting the Cup and Top any more.
They do a great business and should do better with a new bookstore next door. The sandwiches, hot chocolate, and ambiance are provided by friendly and efficient workers that keep people coming back for more. I get a gift certificate to the Cup and Top every Christmas and can't wait to use it. The Top part is for small children but mine are now grown. Enjoy !
I have dined several times at the Cup and Top Cafe, and I have enjoyed the experience every time. The food is prepared with fresh, local (whenever possible), and organic (whenever available) ingredients. The signature sandwiches and paninis are quite good, and the soup of the day and specials are always good choices. There is also a nice selection of breakfast selections, including lattes and fresh-baked muffins.

Florence is a village that is part of the city of Northampton. Florence has a true small town charm and not a parking meter in sight. Parking is easy, although many diners at the Cup and Top arrive on foot or bicycle. The Cup and Top is located smack dab in the center of Florence, at street level in the building that for years was the location of West Clothing. The atmosphere at the Cup and Top fits in nicely with the village itself. It is bright and sunny, with a selection of comfortable seating. Nobody is in a rush in this very relaxed atmosphere. The staff is personable and friendly, and the food is very reasonably priced.
No complaints here. I had a  grilled tuna melt, very good, generous amount of tuna. Service was quick, comfortable atmosphere for solo people, and very reasonable prices. Can't miss by coming here. 
If you like the meatloaf that Mom used to make... the best meatloaf you've ever had... this is the lunch place for you. Open until 3:00 p.m. so you can go for breakfast (which is the best around) or wait for lunch. Great food and great service. Loved the BLT but had to steal some of my wife's meatloaf!!! Make sure you save room for some pie. Yum.
The last visit here was back when I was in highschool my sister and I had gone to the Holyoke Mall, and were returning from a fun visit. We found a nice booth and we had a very retro waitress who was awesome she had a fun attitude and she was vey nice. The interior of the diner and the ambiance are mostly the same upon my recent visit. I enjoyed my lunch of sandwich, fries, and for dessert fresh apple pie. Nice retro place.. still same good vibes, and good food.. check it out if you are passing through.
If you love diners, you have to stop here.  On the right-hand side of Route 9, just North of Northampton, MA, you will find Miss Florence Diner.  Technically, it's in Florence, MA.  The diner first opened in 1941, across the street.  Eventually, it was moved; but, the building (and much of the interior) hasn't changed.  The menu was the typical dineresque breadth of options, low cost, with some very creative options thrown in (like pumpkin pancakes with a flavored whipped cream and the option of artificial or real maple syrup.  The wait staff was friendly and informative.
Met with a friend for breakfast. Very generous portions. Greek omelet was very good. You definitely will not leave here hungry.  My husband even commented on how full he was. 
Go back in time - if you stop in here you will feel like it's the 1950s.  Décor, music and surroundings harken back to that era.  Food is quite good.  I've found that some diners do not have the best food but that is not the case here.  I got a pancake and some scrambled eggs - both were perfect.
If you are visiting Northampton and want to go to the place where locals eat breakfast, go to Miss Flo's . It's less than a ten minute drive from downtown Northampton.   Since it's 1/2 block from the bike/walking path, we bike here for weekend breakfasts.   Waffles, pancakes, and omelettes with non stop coffee refills await you.  The diner has the old fashioned wooden booths with table side jukeboxes and a long counter .  Lunch is good  with homemade soups and sandwiches. When we went last time, we wanted a burger but didn't want a huge one.  The helpful waitress suggested a mini burger sandwich which fit the bill.   
   In terms of desserts, the  pies have never impressed me, however, there is a new "Pie Bar" one block down on Main Street, and you can have your dessert there.
A fun place to eat at times, other times rowdy. It's a very good diner full of local characters and moody wait staff and the comfort food has generous servings.
Stopped in for a nice breakfast. Christine was our waitress, very pleasant and welcoming. I ordered the Banana bread French toast and my partner ordered the steak and cheese omelet. Both were very tasty.  
Just a good solid old fashioned diner with great comfort food.  This is the way they all were I was a kid.
Great old school diner.  Great feel, great food.  The service is friendly and quick.  There is often a wait on weekend mornings, but it's completely worth it.  The Eggs Benedict is the bomb.
Sat at the counter.  Great service.  Food was definitely average but maybe also because I didn't get any of the really yummy pancakes or french toasts. If you're fine about eating not so well - there's a ton of delicious sounding items!
Above all, this place is friendly.  You get a sense that this is where the locals come.

The food is pretty good, and the prices moderate.

The diner does need a paint job and a good clean in the rest room area ... but then, I suppose, the prices would go up.
Miss Flo's has been operating since the 1940s and is a classic American diner. Booths, wooden ceiling, juke boxes at each table, generous portions, and waitresses who call you "honey". Locals eat here, many are regulars, but it is a must stop for out-of-town visitors. Located in the sweet village of Florence. When I had friends visiting from New Zealand they liked it so much that they ate there 3 times in 4 days.
I came here on a weekday late morning while visiting in Florence recently with old friends.  I'd driven by the Miss Flo many times,  but had not stopped in until this visit, and was very glad I did.  This place is the real deal.  The atmosphere harkens back to simpler times, complete with old wooden booths, kitschy wall plaques, and a mini juke box at your table.  Locals and visitors alike flock here, so there's always a colorful array of the interesting and eccentric.  

Our waitress was warm, efficient and personable.  We started with coffees, tap waters and an iced tea.  My friends ordered a veggie omelette w/home fries and multigrain toast,  and egg white omelette w/swiss, onion, and mushroom w/pumpernickel.  I had a cheddar, mushroom and onion omelette with home fries and rye toast.   I thought the food was better than average for diner fare and enjoyed it very much, as did my comrades. 

The friend who was traveling with me had been wanting some pie for about 3 days, too....  and he finally got his chance (though they were out of blueberry).  Pies are made in-house,  and he tried the banana cream,  which he said had a crispy crust and was very good despite there being no observable chunks of banana present.  The prices here are reasonable, and it was generous of our hosting friend to pick up the tab, and for suggesting we go here for a meal and a taste of local color.  

I would definitely return.
Bumped in to Miss Florence last summer on a trip to the Berkshires, this time it was a planned visit.  You know that image of a diner you have in your head (booths around the side, long counter with stools, jukeboxes on the wall, waitresses who call you "hon"?  This is that diner.  

Good food (we had poached eggs and pancakes and great home fries), friendly service, clean bathrooms, free parking, what more could you want?
The Miss Florence Diner offers an extensive breakfast menu making it difficult to make a choice.  We decided on the vegetarian and Greek omlettes.  Wow!  No portion control here.  The omlettes were light and not greasy. The sourdough bread was lightly toasted with butter.  The home fries tasted like they were griddle cooked.  The bottomless cup of coffee and our pleasant server Chelsea made our diner experience great!
Waitress smiled, menu had lots of choices -- as many eggs, pancakes, french toast, etc as you like -- order exactly what you want. And the food was great! What more can you ask. Classic American diner for breakfast & we were lucky because we didn't have to wait for a table. When the locals are waiting, you know it has to be good!
The waitress was rude so naturally it put a bad taste in my mouth.  The food was overpriced.  My friend likes it there, but I won't return.

It's a typical stuck in the 50s Diner.  Unfortunately so is the decor.  Old and dingy.

They close early too.  Not a typical Diner schedule.
Late Sunday breakfasts don't get much more Americana than a coin juke box at your booth (with Don McLean's American Pie sides A & B), with fresh eggs, pancakes, marble rye toast and crisp bacon looking up at you, and a view of life on Main Street going by. Not fancy but still clean and wholesome.
favorite local place to get ice cream, good portion sizes, prices up from last season but, whose aren't
I love Florence Pizzeria (however like most locals I just call it "Florence Pizza)! I have been getting pizza and other meals from them for many, many years now and I love it! Just last week (April 9th), I got a pie for takeout (loved it as usual) and out of curiosity decided to come on TripAdvisor to see if there were any reviews. I noticed the last one was from almost a year ago, so I figured it was high time that I finally write a review. 

((I just want to mention that I haven't gone to have a sit down meal at Florence Pizza in nearly 10 years, just takeout for me, so I can't speak on the waitstaff aspect aside from just picking up takeout, etc. But based on my most recent visit to get my takeout order, the dining room was packed, so the service must be okay at the very least.))

Okay, enough of the introductions and side notes, let me "cut to the chase." Their Pizza is awesome! It's not greasy and in my opinion (I should have taken a picture) their crust is great because it is satisfying (for those out there that love crust) but also not too fluffy like some pizzas where the crust is overwhelming. 

Aside from pizzas I've had a couple of their other meals including the lasagna, the chicken parm, the meat raviolis and pasta bolognese. All very good, but really their pizzas are the best!

Thanks for reading my review!! I hope if you are in the Northampton area you check out Florence Pizzeria!
It was late, I was hungry, and there was the pizzeria.  I enjoyed the chicken gyro platter (sort of chicken souvlaki) very much--and the pizzas I saw being eaten at other tables looked scrumptious.
Celebrating my daughter's college graduation with a party of 10 at the last minute, we were graciously accommodated on a Saturday Night 5/16/15 at 8pm. It was the best pizza ever!  We had a Florence Pizza with 6 toppings, and a Hawaiian Pizza, a huge salad, large burger, and big chicken sandwich. Everything was delicious, and our waitress was most attentive. The water glasses were full, some people had soda, beer, and wine, and everyone was happy. We will return !
Their pizza is sooo good. I have never order anything else off their menu but my friends have. Two of us always share a same and it's plenty. Wait staff is always pleasant. Always busy, so the word is already out.
Florence is a village in Northampton, Massachusetts. Florence Pizza has been around since before we moved to the quaint town over 20 years ago. It has consistently good Italian staples. Veal cutlet parm grinders, chicken parm dinner tender and good. Great pizzas, of course. A consistent go-to to take out or get delivered to the front door. Dining in-house friendly, best for families.
Having eaten here a few times I no can give an honest fair review ... The food is great .. I love all the selectoins .. My partner is celiac and tells me the gluten-free pizza is one of the best she's had ... The service is fast and always with a warm greeting and a smile ... This should be a must visit destination for local foodies and visitors to the Northampton area
Get party sized pizzas for family events, really like the chicken marsala enough to share, eat in or take out same good food, eat in needs better ventilation clothes always come away smelling like the restaurant
The restaurant has many very good items on the menu, from sandwiches to baked stuffed fish and great salads.  However the tomato sauce on the pizza was thick, pasty and very acidic. It  tasted like it had just been poured out of a can.  And for some unknown reason, they cut the large round pizza into little squares instead of the traditional slices.  It made the squares in the middle too soft to pick up as there was no crust to grab.  But by then we were so done with the heavy sauce, that we just left them there anyway.
I've lived in this area for a long time.  Every so often I go here, either because I get hit on the head and forget how bad it was last time, or because I'm forced by circumstances.  Iceberg lettuce cut into hunks with a truck-ripened tomato and "Italian" dressing from a foodservice gallon jug, slice of onion...there's just no excuse for calling that a salad.  It's bad.  

It's the kind of place that would make Robert Irvine bust his temporal arteries on screen.  Frozen breaded junk, big doughy crusts, bland sauce like a can of tomato sauce with dried herbs tossed in it.  

If the absence of flavor isn't enough, it is so overpriced that I could just about eat twice someplace else - which I usually do - and still have a few bucks for ice cream.  I really don't know how they stay in business, and yet they do.  The place is gross, dirty carpets, hopelessly out-of-date, smells dirty...I'd write more but now I'm grossed out just thinking about it.
Vegetarians beware. Recently, while dining at Florence Pizza, I ordered baked stuff scrod. It came with a side of pasta with marinara sauce, specifically described on the menu as “meatless.” However, halfway through my meal, I noticed what appeared to be a slice of a meatball in the marinara sauce. The waitress said she would inform the manager. When I expressed my concern to the manager, he said they simmer their meatballs in the sauce, and, when serving, ladle the sauce leaving the meatballs behind. I said a marinara sauce does not have meat at all; a Bolognese sauce has meat. He said, "That’s the way we've always done it." I said they should write that on the menu. His answer to everything was, “That’s the way we’ve always done it.” He seemed oblivious to my concerns. So I guess it’s not safe to assume that a marinara sauce in all restaurants is vegetarian. Don’t get me wrong. I’m not bashing the restaurant. The fish was good, but the sauce incident was very upsetting to me.
Can't comment on other items but this is our "go-to" pizza place. Fast, reasonable price, great taste, well prepared.
A poor substitute for coffee. With so many DD around, you should never have to settle for this. Or if you really like coffee go to a local coffee house or SBUX.
I wish we had more of these closer to my home.  The flavors are always changing and the staff is always great.
MaryLou's is not your typical coffee house. They have tons of flavors of coffee, and the flavor is within the beans, therefore is no added sugar, like in typical coffee syrups. They do use syrups to make there extra specials coffee. I highly recommend the mexican mudslinger and the girl scout cookie!
Went here today for the first time. The food was wicked good. Service was good. Carpet could use a cleaning or replacing but otherwise it was clean and comfortable. 
Best Eggs Benny ever! This is always a great place to go. Sometimes there is a wait, especially on weekends, but it's worth it. Lots of college kids who keep the place lively.
I stopped in last Sunday and was very surprised they have a very warm dining room and lots of choices I had a coffee and wonderful muffin  I will be going back again 
not the cleanest restaurant nor the best service; some really good breakfast specials.  a local place near the college
We enjoyed our visit to Brianna's while in town for Family/Homecoming/Alumni weekend.  The prices are VERY reasonable and the service was friendly. The portions were generous and though it could have been a little warmer, it was good.  Our BSU student goes to Brianna's with friends on a regular basis and really likes it. I'm glad we were able to check it out.
The people are friendly, and this is a typical "Hole in the wall" restaurant. The atmosphere is friendly but the facility needs to be updated with new rugs, booths, and a GOOD clean-up. During College  days this place becomes a student "Hangout". After their breakfast is finished they simply sit around while the line waits...very frustrating and rude. Food is good and Portions ae good. Value for money is good...CASH ONLY.
I go there every Satursday to enjoy American breakfast. Everything on the special cart is for sure good. Serving is not super fast but all the waitresses are gentle and get exactly what you want.
Their home fries are the best ones in miles.
They have a great staff, pretty good food, quick service, and great prices. When I need a quick place to go I usually head here with friends. The only downside is that it only takes cash but there is an atm inside.
Pleasant wait staff, can see into the kitchen, interesting breakfast combinations..I had the Cornbread French Toast, just a treat for the palate. served with nicely cooked sausage,and homefries.
Short wait time for the meal to arrive, not too long. Hot plate, hot food, passable coffee.
reasonably priced . Served with a smile , Owner operators onsite nice to chat with while waiting for food to come out. Nostalgia, old hardware store next door, onstreet limited parking, lot in the rear available. The Common across the street,for lounging afterward.
Almost everyone I know loves Brianna's, but I was mostly disappointed so I stopped going. But recently friends wanted to go, so I joined in. I had my usual--two SOFT poached on corned beef harsh with HOT home fries. Every time I asked for HOT home fries, I was given brown/burnt ones at the back of the burner, so I gave up. BUT this time everything was perfect. The waitress was shocked that I had any complaint about hot home fries, but ... Of course, since this is a favorite, besides the breakfast, locals will always meet a few friends!
Always in search of a great omlet. Found it here! Omlets are big and very delicious. Stuffed with top notch ingredients. Also, their home fries are fantastic! The place is older and could use a renovation but that may also be part of its charm! We will be back. CASH ONLY.
My husband lives to go out for breakfast and we've tried several place, but we always end up at Brianna's! Very pleasant service, food is real good all the time!
Great food - service wonderful - waitress are delightful. Only complaint, temperature of the room, chilly.
Food was OK, but a little greasy.  Service was slow, but a result of kitchen prep.  Folks were super nice and waitress was most apologetic for the delay.
Cheerful service with hearty food served in a kitschy wood panelled atmosphere- the omelettes aren't fluffy but the eggs are cooked perfectly and the hash is good. Coffee could be better.
It's kind of a dive but we love it there.  It's inexpensive and fast.  The atmosphere is relaxed and you never wait long for a table.
If you want a breakfast that is hardy, tasty, and enough to fill you desire, then this is the Place. Brianna is a CASH ONLY establishment, but the do offer an ATM on site. The opening hour is 5:32 am because that is the time "Brianna" was born. They are open daily and serve breakfast all day. They close at 2:00 pm on Sunday I am not sure what the other days closing hour are. If y
our hungry and your in Bridgewater MA go to Spring st, (right off rt 18 just past the RR tracks, you will see Brianna's on your left. Nice people, good food, good prices, and it is an enjoyable meal out.
RR
I have been at Brianna's quite a few times and each time I asked for HOT home fries. Most times this was interpreted by the kitchen as well done ... very well done, but not necessarily hot. And not tasty! They were the one pushes to the back or to the side. Awful. But this past week I was at Brianna's two days in a row.  The first day was the "Anniversary Day--free muffin" but I had the Eggs Benedict, eggs soft, HOT home fries! They were steaming hot! Next day, back again.  This time Eggs Florentine, eggs soft, HOT home fries! Again, Perfect!  Service has always been very good. Now, the food matches.
Brianna's is a really local breakfast experience, imbedded in the Bridgewater State University culture, and serves really exceptional home fries , complete with peppers and onions (or not), with exceptionally friendly service. Early bird specials are hard to beat.
I go there every weekend to enjoy an home made american breakfast. The waitresses are friendly, the food is almost every time amazing.
So as the title says. 
My wife and I stopped in for lunch today. 
We were seated promptly, and the waitress came over right away. 
Even though it was grtting busy, she was very quick and attentive. 
We both ordered sandwhiches and they were to our table within 10 minutes! 
The turkey club i had was very good, and my wife enjoyed her roast beef wrap. 
The restaraunt is clean and modern. 
My one pet peeve. 
they serve popcorn in baskets with no liner, and my ocd got me wondering how they can possibly clean these wicker type baskets.... maybe they do, maybe not? 
I'm not overly concerned just got me thinking.
Overall we had a great lunch, and were in and out in a very timely manor. 
Love the atmosphere here. Nice local/ regional beer selection along with some good west coast beers. 
Food was prompt and very tasty. 
Recommend the steak tip salad...VERY good! 
Had a super lunch today. Several lunch specials to choose from. Plenty of parking and indoor or outdoor seating. The back of the restaurant has garage doors that open to the sand patio. There is also a separate bar. 
With an outstanding beach themed patio, live music in the early evening and a wide selection of beer and food, Barrett's check's all the boxes. Service was excellent, even though the place was packed, our server was on the ball and very friendly, kudos to you Danielle, good job hustling.
Would like to see Strongbow cider offered on the drinks menu, then again, maybe not, i might not leave!
I stopped in here with a friend for a few drinks. The outdoor patio was awesome. There was a live band playing.  They have chairs set up in the sand. It was a very beachy feel which was awesome ! It was pretty chilly so couldn't stay too long but it looks like they have a giant fireplace that wasn't lit at the time. Overall decently priced drinks and food. Can't complain! 
We had lunch here on two occasions, and we loved the food, service, and atmosphere. The outdoor patio is a real escape. Beautiful outdoor fireplace and beach feel to the outdoor space. Like being on vacation!
The food is always great and done right, The service is friendly, helpful and efficient. The highlight for me is the outside patio area on a nice sunny day or warm night..
Great casual restaurant, but honestly get an order of well done french fries, unsalted please and you won't be sorry.  Waitresses are friendly and pretty (did I mention that my daughter works there?)
I stopped by Barrette's because that's where the guys from my company frequent. I was in town, from California, so I don't know the area very well.
This is a great place to stop in for a drink (or 5!) and get some pretty decent food. Much better than your average bar food.
Thank you Barrette's! We wanted to celebrate my son's 20th birthday and have family together in a casual restaurant. This place delivered. Great pizza, kid's meals and good service. Plenty of room and they accommodated our special requests. We'll be return customers. 
Ok. This place I have reviewed as 1 star before, a few years ago. Lately my family has gone here more often because they love it. They are very friendly to dietary restrictions and allergies, but their menu is VERY limited if you do have restrictions. Example, if you are a vegan you are ordering pizza with no cheese. Gluten free they have a menu which is helpful. Allergic to eggs or soy it's much harder because the oil they use is an olive/soy blend, and there is egg/and\or meat in just about every single item.  However....they will make stuff up if you ask. Like, they will make you a vegan burrito if you ask. So that's cool. But, they always screw up something which is annoying. Every time I've ordered a wheat wrap they've served me flour. Every time I've ordered a vegetable without butter it's had butter and I couldn't eat it. So stuff like that makes it not my first choice in the area. But there are tons of t.v.'s, great specials, a large bar and outdoor area, and friendly helpful managers.
Very good food, excellent craft beers, extensive menu. There is a big eating area in the main dining area, good size bar. There is always a lot of people here, which is a good sign. Had a bacon, cheeseburger, they toast the roll on the grill improving the taste and quality. My wife ordered a gluten free chicken, bacon, ranch pizza, she enjoyed it.
The service was very good. Lots of TV's to watch sports.
Really good food and good service.  It can get very busy on weekends.  I highly recommend the steak tips with caramelized onions, peppers and blue cheese.
We loved this place so much we ate here twice in one day while at my son's hockey tournament. The food was delicious and the service was top notch. The were very accommodating with our group of almost 40 people. Food was out in a timely fashion and everyone enjoyed their meal. Not easy feeding a team full of hungry teenage boys after two hockey games. Well done Barrett's!! The sandy fire pit area was a huge hit for all. If we are very back up there for hockey, we will be back!!
Dark and busy Bar area, outside dining, and PACKED. Before the fire it was a friendly oak bar with super waitresses after the fire, and the slowwww re-opening, it is dark walnut. Food is good, bar maids hop quick, and the parking is atrocious....none and a spot if your lucky. It is like musical chairs round and round looking for a spot.
Came here for a birthday party. Checked in at the hostess stand and no one knew anything about the party, even though someone had called them. We were told to wait in the bar while we waited for the rest of the group to arrive. We waited at a table in the bar to order drinks because our party was delayed to to snow and not one waitress stopped by in the 15-20 minutes we sat there. When the rest of the guests arrived, we were seated at a few tables that had been pushed together. Waitress seemed upset she got stuck with a huge group and seemed annoyed that we all wanted seperate checks - there were 6 couples. The food was ok, typical pub fare. Drinks were good.  Waitress left at 11 and had us cash out, despite many in the group still eating. Might be back, might not. Really depends on who I'm with. Wouldn't go with a big group.
There is a surprising dearth of options in Bridgewater. I guess this is one of the better places. It seems clean and the service is good.  Food is standard.
Watched the pats game and had a few drinks and appetizers. Service was friendly and professional.  Lots of tv ' s to watch the game.  Fun energetic atmosphere.
The food and the service seems to have dropped off since they re-opened after the fire. We used to stop once a week for nachos, pizza, and draft beer. But after going 3 times in the last 6 months or so, no more. The food does not seem as good and some of the bar staff did not return when they opened up again. Now, when you sit at the bar, it seems you are ignored, if you are not a regular.
We went there as a group to watch the Boston Bruins play a game.  The restaurant is a sports pub with tons of memorabilia on the walls from all the Boston teams.  We asked the waitress what TV the game was going to be on, she replied "all of them"!!  The televisions cover every wall and are all around the bar itself.

We ordered the chicken tenders buffalo style, and can't begin to tell you how great these were.  We order these at most restaurants we go to, and these by far have been in the top five.

Pizza and burgers were ordered by our group.  Our food came out fast and hot, our server was super friendly and attentive.  The restaurant was quite busy when we arrive due to the pending Bruins game, but we never had to wait for service.

After the game was over, the other half of the restaurant turned into a night club.  This place is great to go at night for sports and listening to music.  

During the day would be okay for children, but I felt it is geared to adults after supper time.  A definite return visit will be had by us.
Went to meet my best friend and catch up.  Tried to find a place that was 1/2 way for both of us.  Since I am a foodie, I recommended this place after reading the reviews on Trip Advisor.   A little hard to find because this cafe is in the building with the big sign that says Bogarts...but worth the extra effort.  It was a beautiful Autumn day and we sat outside on the porch.  All of the items listed on the menu sounded awesome so choosing was hard.  I had a Mexican Mocha Latte and my bff had an Organic Tea.  Good start!  The Mexican Mocha Latte was to die for.  I ordered Eggs Benedict and bff ordered Eggs Florentine.  Both were totally de-lish!  After hanging out for a while to digest we went to pay the bill (bring cash no cc accepted).  We were talking to the owner and she mentioned that she does Burritos on Thursday evenings..so we are definately going back.  They had opened the bar out back and had pumpkin ale on tap....so we couldn't pass that up!  While we enjoyed our beers several people came in and ordered lunch while sitting at the bar.  All of the sandwiches and wraps looked fresh and very delish also!  Can't wait to go back.
Grab an iced coffee and enjoy the outdoor seating!   Great new location at Bogart's.
found something different, organic and fair trade, my kind of place. Might be small but its packed with flavor!
AWESOME PLACE!!!! GREAT FOOD! GREAT PRICES! AWESOME SMOOTHIES! Great for vegitarians great for others as well!
Great great pizza.  I have been ordering from College Pizza for 2 years and the pizza always has been good.  The employees are always kind. I will come back again.
Happy with our order. We got cheese and veggie pizza. Good size, veggie pizza was filled with fresh ingredients. Very pleased. Staff was helpful and nice. Looked clean.
Great pizza place! Bacon pizza is loaded with crisp bacon. Caesar salad with grilled chicken is delicious. Would love to have the marinade recipe for their chicken...yum!
Had a Italian sub it was ok,i have had better the sub was heated and the taste seemed sort of soggy,might try a pizza next time we will see,
We love their pizza.  The banana pepper pizza is by far my favorite but haven't had any kind we haven't liked.
These guys do it right.  Great quality, freshly prepared sandwiches and pizzza. 
I walked in today for my free coffee.The deal is that the day after the patriots win a football game, Dunks Donuts will give you a free cup of coffee, any flavor.The untrained girl working the cash register at 8:30 this morning told me that the free coffee was to be given out on Tuesday and you cannot get any of the flavors.I guess she doesn't follow spots and doesn't know when the patriots play.
Came in on a busy morning while waiting for friends. Jamie waited on us and she was very pleasant and actually made my coffee right and her happy attitude was the right start to my morning. 
It's your typical Dunkin Donuts. It's near me so I go frequently. Haven't had a bad experience there. 
I like coffee after a meal, but getting it to go at other places is a pain most of the time. This DD is located right across the street from at least 4 restaurants. I went through the drive through after enjoying lunch across the street. The coffee was hot and fresh and prepped the way I asked. It was a good cup of coffee and not weak like some of them can be. 
I grew up eating their Pizza in their location in Brockton. I ordered the pizza from the Bridgewater location and enjoyed it just as well. It is bar pizza, and if you are from the south shore of MA you will know a good bar pizza. Crispy crust and lots of cheese.
It wasn't the best pizza that I've ever had and on the other hand, it wasn't the worst pizza either.
quick take out service.   when my daughter visits us from boston  a gor to meal is greek saad and bar pizza  she says there is nothing in boston that compares
To be truthful, I only buy one thing here--Pastrami sandwich. Only one from Katz in NYC or any  in Montreal have been better. 
Except for the last time I had one, for the price, each has been delicious.  But the last one was over-cooked! Dry. I think the girl had not cooked one before. If I had eaten it in the restaurant, I would have given it back, but ...
Pizza was the best but very disappointed in the salad. Always has been great at Brockton location but threw it away. Wilted lettuce and vegetables.
This is a pizza place "famous" for its Greek Salad. As a frequent eater of Greek Salad and self proclaimed Greek Salad aficianado, it's not really that great. The pizza, though, is bar pizza and very good, but still you can get better in the area. They don't do gluten free crust.
Met a former coworker for lunch-really impressed since this was my visit. Restaurant extremely clean & nice menu-not only pizza & salads, but club sandwiches, hamburgers, etc. Prices reasonable, food came quickly, air conditioned,& nice seating area to dine in. Will definitely make this my go-to pizza place in the future. So close to my place of business.
If you like pub-style pizza, Cape Cod Cafe is one of the better options in the Bridgewater area. On the other hand, neither the Bridgewater store, nor its sister store in Raynham, hold a candle to the original restaurant in Brockton. I don't know what it is-- the crust here is very good, but it's nevertheless lacking something from the original. Also, it seems as though the topping options are not as vast as the original restaurant. Other than that, it's worth a visit if you're in the mood for a good pie, but don't care to make a trip to Brockton.
The pizza is thin crust, the way we like it, but not near as good asThe Lynwood. The sallads were not very good at all. I have heard a number of people tell me they like it almost as good as the Lynwood, but it is just average. The closest place around here with good pizza is the Cornerstone in Carver.
What was supposed to be a fun dinner turned into a highly disappointing night. Ashley was aggressive and unfriendly upon ordering. I decided to try something other than pizza and opted for the chicken, broccoli, bacon Greek salad. Ashley redeemed herself when our food was ready, smiling and thanked us for waiting. It was a nice turnaround. The meal was great and I could only eat half. I decided to take the last half home and asked that it be wrapped and include another salad dressing. I was asked to pay for more salad dressing. WHAT?! The original portion was not enough for the entire salad. Why should the customer have to pay for more dressing? What other restaurant does this? Never again CCC.
After having cape cod cafe pizza numerous times it is fair to say the pizza is pretty good. Flying J's up the street is much better though. However, we still would get Greek salads at CCC .... But, phone service and counter folks are awful! Each time we call we hope it will be better but no luck . The girl tonight was rude and abrasive as if she was being bothered . She clearly doesn't understand customer service . So .... Off to baldies for salads and J's for pizza ! 
Stopped in on a mid Saturday afternoon for a pizza and some fries with my husband.  We split a small greek salad that was HUGE and it came with lots of bread and butter.  We also got two cheese pizzas an order of fries and two sodas. Pizzas were delicious and the fries were perfectly crisp and plentiful. We had a lot of leftovers to take home.  The staff was friendly. Under $30.
My husband and I while out for a ride and decided to stop in for a bite to eat. The staff was extremely friendly. The place was spotless. The food was delicious and very plentiful. We got a chicken pizza, a cheese pizza, an order of fries, a small Greek salad and two sodas car around $32. The small salad was enough to feed at least 3 people we had plenty of leftovers to take home we will definitely be back!
Growing up on the south side of Brockton, in the 50's and 60's, the Cod was the "only" place to go for pizza.  I've been out of the area for nearly 40 years, but when I am in the area, I still go out of my way to get a Cape Cod Pizza.  When I discovered there was a "Cod" in Bridgewater I decided to give it a try.  Greasy someone said.  Hey it's real cheese and pepperoni.  This is real Cape Cod Pizza, just as good as the stuff in Brockton, which many people including me, consider the best pizza on earth.  Some may not agree, but Cape Cod Pizza is the standard by which I judge all others. Yum!
I love this pizza but cannot bring myself to spend over 7 bucks for a small bar style cheese pizza.  For a family of 4, I can go out to a nice restaraunt for the price I would pay for 4 pizza's, salad, and drinks.  Its outragous!
Cape Cod Pizza is very good at the Brockton location,but the Bridgewater location was not up to par,the pizza was greasy and the BQ chicken pizza was terrible i was very disappointed wont be going back.
It was single handedly the best pizza in Massachusetts. (we would get it every Saturday night for years in the 90's).  Now it's gross, they use sub par ingredients, and they cost a small fortune.  Four thumbs down, all around.
Not good pizza.  Like cardboard.  Didn't even like it when I was in college.  As bad as Bridgewater House nearby.
Chessman's is known to be one of the only places to get food after midnight. Their pizza is good. They have many different kinds, and they are reasonably priced. Also have good boneless buffalo fingers. Not much to pick from other than pizza and chicken, but still good.
Decent pizza... decent prices
The best thing about this place is the staff, excellent service and very friendly, i only wish the food was as pleasant.
Chicken satay app was ok, the chicken tender was bland the peanut sauce was a little oily...
The cashew chicken stir fry was absolutely tasteless. The jasmine rice had more flavor, i'm not sure what happened but it was incredibly bland, the pad thai also lacked flavor and although i'd requested no tofu, it was scattered amongst the chicken and shrimp.
There were quite a few people in there, so a good crowd for a Monday night, i'm thinking its probably so popular due to the large portions so you certainly get your money's worth, but i'd give up quantity for quality all day long.
So far the winning Asian establishment around me is Atina, however, there seems to be quite a buzz surrounding Crystals Kitchen so i'll be there next.
We have had take out from the Chatta Box for around 10 years now and have never had a bad dish from there.  The prices are reasonable and there is something for everyone.  Our kids devour the coconut chicken fingers and are not diving into the coconut fried rice.  I have sampled many item menus myself and have always enjoyed them.  They have always accommodated. changes to the menu for example, exclusion of items I am not fond of and increase pepper for added spice. Always a good meal.
Service is excellent, food is fresh, the waitstaff is very attentive. If you have never been to an Asian restaurant before they will help you with anything you would like to know more about. 
I went for a late lunch around 2 pm on a Thursday. The dining room wasn't terribly busy; only about 2 other tables the whole time we were there. 

My cousin and I were seated and greeted promptly. We both ordered waters and seaweed salad for starters, as well as spicy tuna rolls and a tempura shrimp roll to split. 

I ordered a Thai iced tea, which I was happy to find wasn't as sweet as I was expecting it to be. Usually when I order Thai iced tea at other places, it's a tad too sweet for my liking but this one was just perfect and super refreshing.

The seaweed salad was crisp and perfectly seasoned, topped off with sesame seeds. The flavor seems to be a combination of soy and sesame. I was a little nervous, as it was my first time trying a seaweed salad but it was totally delicious. 

The spicy tuna roll tasted fresh and was so yummy! Same goes for the shrimp tempura roll.

There was a little bit of a language barrier when I was asking some questions but our server was so sweet. She kept trying to understand what I meant and even asked a colleague to help her by coming over. 

All in all, it was an excellent experience. We left feeling satisfied.
Here for the first time, wonderful appetizers and entrees.  Coconut Chicken Fingers and Coconut Fried Rice.  Amazing pair if you don't know what to pick.  Lot's of choices from Sushi to Noodle Soup, from Steam Dishes to Fried Dishes.  A must try when you are in the area.
My boyfriend and I LOVE this restaurant. The clay pot tofu curry is to die for. The staff is sweet and the menu is extensive, so you're bound to find something of your taste. Definitely recommend. 
Very disappointed.  Came here twice, second time by accident.  I gave it another shot and never will again.  They have a page dedicated for soup, but it's not good.  Pho or tom yum is not even close.  Service is fast and responsive but quality of food is below par.  
I have been there several times. The waitress/waiters are always very friendly. The food is very good, hot and fast delivery to the table. Never have I NOT enjoyed it there. I would highly recommend this place.
Our town has several Thai food restaurants within a five or 10 minute drive, but this is the one our family keeps coming back to visit.  Although seating is limited, folks wait patiently for a seat because they know they will enjoy their meal.  Most often, we get "To Go", and the orders are always ready at the time promised, the food is hot, delicious and packed well so there is no sloppy spillage.  I believe the prices are reasonable and often we find an order can be shared by two.  Some of our favorites are Mango Fried Rice with Chicken and Shrimp, Super Lazy Pad Thai, Rainbow Paradise and Cashew Beef with Brown Rice.
In the last 2 years I've noticed a decline here. The food has good flavor, but it's all rice or noodles-very very skimpy on the vegetables and tofu. I had a lunch serving of rice noodles in a sauce. There were a total of 4 pieces of tofu, 2 pieces of scallion and so on. It was ridiculous. And the physical condition of the place was run down and ratty. I was shocked at how much it has deteriorated over this year. Very disappointing

This is the place to go for unique food with a lot to offer for even the fussiest eater.  The restaurant is always busy, which says something about their service and popularity.  I would highly recommend this to locals and non-locals looking for a good belly full of food. 
I love to go to this restaurant for Thai food.  I am a vegetarian, and I always find something I can eat, and not just one or two choices like other restaurants, many great choices.  The people who run it are very nice.  My husband loves it too.  We go there often and are never disappointed.
I have never been a strong devotee of Asian Food, but my children are. On many family occasions they would arrive at the house with take out food from the Chatta Box. Over time I came to love the selections that were offered, so that we now often go to the Chatta Box to get it while it's hot. Well worth the trip.
I love the food and people here. The food is out of this world. Sesame seed chicken is my favorite with brown rice and Thai iced tea. The people who work there are friendly and polite. Will always me a favorite and will continue to go to chatta box. 
Chatta Box is absolutely amazing!!! The menu is huge, the service is great, the people are friendly and I could go on and on! It is absolutely my favorite Chinese/Japanese/Thai etc. restaurant in the area and I am a frequent customer. I'm especially fond of the Coconut Fried Rice. I would absolutely recommend this to everyone (and I do!). 
Chatta Box was full for lunch on a Thursday afternoon but the service was still amazing. My friend and I were seated right away and sipped on delicious and authentic thai tea while we decided what to order. The menu can be a little overwhelming but I love the variety of Korean, Vietnamese, Thai, etc. I had the Beef Teriyaki and my friend had the Salmon. Quick, friendly service and a delicious, filling meal. Really, what more can you ask for?!
Just ate in-house at this restaurant a couple night ago. Nothing special. I know the restaurant has changed hands I believe there is a difference now. I found the food to be bland, even the spicy garlic cashew chicken. This dish is my go to and it just wasn't as good as it use to be with the original owners. The other issue with this dish was that the vegetables where chopped to big. Hard to bite into and chew a huge green pepper piece. 

Another dish to review is the chicken lettuce wraps. This offering needs to go back to the drawing the board. Literally,  it's ground up, slightly seasoned chicken with a couple carrots mixed in. Comes is a floppy bowl  with romaine spears (you can't wrap that type of lettuce effectively at all, especially the skinny version served to us).

Doubt I will be back anytime soon, use to be a staple.
Being deep in the 'burbs there are not many options for good Thai food in our area, but the Chatta Box IS very good! They have a large menu with traditional Thai options as well as terrific sushi choices. On our last visit we ordered sushi with tempura shrimp as an appetizer - delicious. We order Vietnamese fresh spring rolls - okay, not great. We also ordered seared tuna tataki - delicious. Finally came the Pad Thai and it was delicious. Hot, savory, and oh so good. Plenty of leftovers for the next day. The restaurant is small and they seem to have a busy take-out service.
I went to Chatta Box because my regular Thai Restaurant was closed on Sundays. I ordered the Pad Thai and the chicken was very dry. I also ordered the crab rangoons and I was very disappointed because there was hardly any meat. It was more of a wonton.
Wait staff was very helpful and attentive while not hovering. Menu is extensive.
Cucumber mint sauce served with Vietnamese spring rolls was delicious with a subtle mint flavor. My wife enjoyed her Red Dragon Mahi, fresh.  Flavor of my Mango Seafood Delight was good except ingredients were cooked at different level of done ness, from almost raw and firm thru crispy, to warm and soft. I'll count this as an unusual badly cooked dish. I will return to sample other selections as friends and others rate restaurant highly.

I am giving them 3.5 stars and rounding up. Good quality sub rolls are the basis for several crowd-pleasing sandwiches. I like cheeseburger grinders, chicken stir fry, and the "number 9" steak and cheese. My kids like the kids meals, marginally healthier than fast food. Coke products on fountain and bottled. Also features a seasonal, relatively inexpensive lobster roll that is pretty darned good. 
My wife and I go almost every Sunday. They have a large assortment of huge bagels and a lot of different flavors of coffee at great prices. My favorite is a French Toast Bagel with Ham, Egg and Cheese and my favorite Ice Coffee is the Banana flavored. Everything is always delicious and fresh. 
Came here for breakfast just after moving to Bridgewater. Nice little bagel shop with friendly service. Enjoyed my breakfast sandwich. Come back often and it's always great
very accommodating; food served hot
This is in a college town with lots of pizza restaurants but this one is of a better, more unique quality.
Bruno's is not your typical pizza place a la Chessman's, Bridgewater House, Papa Gino's, etc., etc. It's much better! Their "Bananas over Buffalo" is a favorite, and yes, their Greek salad is very good. I think my favorite thing is the steak and cheese wrap with the works, but with a caveat. I find the size of the wrap a bit inconsistent. The first two times I tried it, the wrap was massive, loaded with delicious shaved steak. The third time, as soon as I took the wrap out of the bag, I could tell the cook had skimped on the steak, and overall the wrap had less of that great steak flavor I had enjoyed on previous visits. Also, there are a couple of menu items I've *tried* to order that never seem to be available (I'm talking about you, Parmesan Crisps!), and the workers seem baffled when I try to place the order. If they no longer offer these things, the owners should remove them from the menu. Otherwise, this is a great place if you are looking for more "upscale" style pizza, sandwiches, and salads in the Bridgewater area.
I had heard great things about their pizza so decided to try it. Hand tossed, Italian style pizza. Unfortunately, not impressed. There is nothing special about this pizza. It's not BAD, it's just not great! Very garlicky crust and sauce. Cheese seemed good but not anything special. Honestly, I'd rather have Papa Gino's. I didn't try anything else on the menu but figured the pizza should be the main event anyway. Not.
We've been ordering pizza from Bruno's ever since we moved to Bridgewater 3.5 years ago. It's a consistent favorite of our family and friends. Love the delivery especially this cold and snowy weekend!
Having heard about how great the food was I had to try it. I am always skeptical. But they didn't disappoint. The chicken parm. 9 inch sub was amazing.The sauce better than I had ever tasted. And the buffalo chicken tenders I bought also were out of this world. On top of the super friendly owner's. This place is a 10
I needed 16 varied menu items and I needed them fast.  I was visiting from out of town with high school musicians who needed lunch before their performance.  The staff was fast, fun and the students raved about the food.  They even have a gluten free pizza crust! Thanks Bruno's - you deliciously saved the day!
All salads prepared to order, with different lettuces, unusual seasonal veggies, and WONDERFUL dressings. Pizza dough prepared by hand...no bar pizza this!! A tad more costly, but worth the $1 extra. Calzones are perhaps the best in Bridgewater.
Every time I go through Bridgewater I HAVE TO get this pizza. Fortunately my daughter goes to school there which gives me a reason to 'stop by' just so I can get a slice(or two)!  

Why? 

Let's start with the crust. It's perfect. I NEVER eat anyone's pizza crust after the main part of the slice is consumed. This crust is that good that I do. And I actually wish I had more. Hand made crust is the key. Second, the sauce. Home made sauce that is worthy of being a marinara in the best Italian restaurant. Third, the cheese. Shredded by the restaurant themselves and always fresh. The result....nice and gooey. Just the way a pizza should be! 
I'm telling you I feel like one of Pavlov's experiments. When I even so much as think about this pizza I salivate - internally of course, there is no drool dripping off my chin. However, if it didn't make me look like an idiot, there probably would be. 

Old school feel inside yet current in it's appeal. Clean and nicely decorated. Colors are cheerful and booths/tables are retro. Plenty of street parking. The owners, a father/daughter are always pleasant and extremely cordial. They make you feel like you're having a meal in their home. 

I can't wait to try their other offerings! Seriously.
This place is known for it's breakfasts.  The food is great.  The cleanliness, needs work.  Saw dead flies on the window sill and the dust told me they were not dusted in weeks.
Many years ago, I used to go to My Sister & I for breakfast almost every Sunday, but I haven't been back for years. I had my "usual"--two poached eggs--soft--on hash and English muffins, no butter.  I asked that the home fries be hot! The eggs were done perfectly, but the home fries were almost hot. Maybe it was my Dad--but whenever I asked for HOT home fries, they were steaming hot; these were not.
Well, I live in Bridgewater and come here frequently. I have to say one thing, their food is decent for the price. But another thing is that they need to remodel EVERYTHING. It's not very clean in the dining area or in the bathroom. The bathroom looks like a dirty diarrhea bomb hit it. I like the food, just avoid the bathroom.
Home cooking at its finest, along with exceptional service, this establishment has been here for almost thirty years... hard to beat that record. Seafood specials are the best, along with the very good soups and chowders.
I have eaten at this local eatery many times for breakfast and lunch. Great fish chowder on Fridays lunch menu. Yummy! Wonderful breakfast specials, especially if you are there before 8. The service is very good and the feeling very homey.we have been regulars for over 30 years and plan on continuing to be!
This place serves the standards but fails to excite. You can get your eggs, toast, home fries, and pancakes, but there are better ones at Dave's Diner and Good Days. Downtown location has OK on street parking, but not much of it. 
I had read the Tripadvisor reviews before I chose My Sister & I, since we were not familiar with the area or the restaurants. I was looking for a place with good food and ambience to take an older friend to. We arrived about 12:30 on a Thursday and although the tables weren't cleared from what must have been a lively breakfast crowd, we found a spot which was one of 2 by the window. Our 93 year old guest was not impressed by the restaurants informal setting. Neither  were we. I had hoped to have some ambience that would encourage us to linger and have relaxed conversations. But "My Sister..." is more of a breakfast/lunch eatery for folks who want to eat good food without frills and get on with their day. clients while we were there included business men, families and ladies. Service was very good. Our guest was happy with the corned beef and cabbage dinner that filled her entire plate - very generous. My husband and I enjoyed her home made soda bread. We had finished our tuna and chicken salads on buns served with potato chips and a few pickle slices. There were plenty of home cooked items to choose from, but we weren't inspired. We were in & out in about an hour. So if you are looking for a relaxing restaurant with a nice setting, look elsewhere, but it works for a quick reasonable breakfast or lunch. It was my fault for not looking for a place with a web site with photos. I've learned my lesson.
The restaurant is on the small side, but the food is very good and is quickly served. The waitstaff is friendly. The price is reasonable. Bridgewater is a college town and is a picturesque quaint New England town especially the location of this friendly restaurant..where there are little interesting shops to visit.
Went there for lunch during the week because of a local reccomendation.  Good service, good food, and pleasant service,  Not at all fancy but it was exactly what we were looking for. Left very pleased
Stopped for a late lunch today on my way home from the Cape. I believe that usually they close each day at 2 pm, but today is Friday and the restaurant closes at 8 pm. Lucky for us because the food is just excellent and the service was superb. The Lady was very helpful, patient and kind; I think she is the owner, her son the cook and the rest of her family was there too!
I really recommend stopping by to get good home cooked food. My husband had a cup of chowder a, Sheppard’s pie & grape nut pudding; I had strawberry shortcake & hot pastrami sandwich with mashed potatoes instead of French fries.  Both of us were very satisfied with everything and will be back as soon as possible.
My wife and I walked up to the restaurant at 12:30, and sign said it didn't close for at least an hour.  Nevertheless, the sign was turned over as we walked up and we were sent packing, as was the family walking behind us.  We went to Percy's.  Good breakfast there.
Het voorgerecht met kreeft dreef in de heinz ketchup. De gehaltballen met pita en saté saus waren niet veel beter. De met kreeft gevulde forel was redelijk. Jammer dat de risotto gemaakt was van rijstepap (melk??). De krabkoekjes hadden zo'n overheersende krab smaak dat we dit gerecht niet verder durfden te eten. De win was goed.
The service is lousy, it's like you are interrupting them. Not clean and prices are crazy too. Not worth it.
The cupcakes are delicious.  Definitely worth the price and they are pricey.  We buy cupcakes for our birthday cakes and love them.  I love the lemon ones.
This is a terrific bakery! We frequently get birthday and special occasion cakes here. Lisa also made my daughter's wedding cake. It was beautiful and many people commented on how moist and delicious it was. Feel lucky to have such an excellent bakery in town.
I. Love. Their. Cupcakes.... and I'm not a Cake person so that says a lot! Highly recommended. I will update with a follow up review after my wedding because we will be going through here but I highly doubt my cupcakes will be any less than perfect.
We got our daughter's baptism cake here and it looked amazing and tasted even better. I have also gotten dessert platters there and everything is so yummy. Thank you!
We are so very fortunate to live close to Just Desserts.  We used to travel to Whites in Brockton, which was very good, but the personal attention and level of caring at Just Desserts is the best.  Their cannoli's are fantastic, the cakes can't be beat and just stopping in to pick up something special is worth finding a parking space in Bridgewater Center.  The people are always friendly and very helpful.
I stop in here from time to time because my husband has a huge sweet tooth. Being a cake decorator and former bakery manager of 18 plus years I usually avoid sweets..but not this place. The 7 layer bars are so delicious and her cupcakes are divine. Always fresh and so many flavors. I love canoli and my husband likes the lemon blueberry. Indulge yourself!
They had so many interesting cupcakes! Whoppie pie, cannoli, strawberry shortcake, etc! Reasonable prices. We liked everything!
For a long time many people have wished there was a nice local bakery ion the area and certainly if you want nice cake at a good price this is the way to go.  I have ordered two from them and they were both moist and tasty and beautifully decorated. Our guests had nothing but compliments and the pricing was very reasonable.  I would definitely order from them again.

I have been in the store when a party was going on and I have to say it was pretty cramped - maybe there's another area they hold parties I'm not aware of? The kids were extremely well behaved and the adults with them were very nice but most of them were standing and had nowhere to go. One woman had to move every time someone came in from outside. That didn't look very comfortable. Since it didn't affect me and I may not know all the details I am not going to "ding" the star rating. I came in for delicious cake and that's what I got.

If I can offer a constructive suggestion without it sounding too picky(is that possible?) - the lady that waited on me was chewing gum.  Maybe it's outdated thinking but usually people serving food are discouraged from doing that as some customers find it rather unappealing. Why do anything to take away from the impression of the lovely food?
I stopped in here with a girlfriend after a nice fall walk yesterday afternoon.

The atmosphere of the shop was nice and one of the ladies taking our orders was very sweet and bubbly. My friend had an iced blueberry hibiscus tea - without sugar and it was really refreshing. The herbal teas are so full of flavor all on their own. I want to order some so I can make my own at work. I had a mocha frappe - also really good. Not as thick as I'm used to, but I think that was a good thing, except that I drank it too quickly. They also had white hot chocolate, and a couple of other hot drinks that made my decision delightfully difficult.

We sat and chatted at one of the high tables while we had our drinks. While there we decided to add food to our order. I got a breakfast sandwich (because I'm a little bit cheap) They were able to make that on a sesame bagel and also let me choose my own cheese- I went with Swiss. My friend was able to get a wheat baguette. (Had I chose a sandwich it probably would have been one of the veggie options because I am avoiding deli meats) We both enjoyed our sandwiches though. Again, sitting in the shop to eat. Plenty of seating.

I forgot to mention the cookie I bought with my drink order. It was wicked good, I restrained myself from buying a second. The lady there informed us they were from the bakery at the corner. Mhm, made me enjoy the cookie even more. 

Definitely a place I would go back to if I were in the area. I'm sure they have regulars.
I came across this place by accident. Very unassuming. Next to a nail salon, which works out well if you stop HERE first and get an amazing coffee.  Or get lunch and hang in the Bridgewatwr green across the street.  Sandwiches are interesting and yummy. Not your typical tuna or PBand J but healthy and delicious. Everyone who works there is chill and very helpful. 
I don't understand why more people in Bridgewater don't take advantage of having a cozy cafe at their fingertips. It's so welcoming and comfortable. The coffee etc is great and the food is fresh and healthy. The staff is always friendly and accommodating. What more could you ask for?  Dunkin Donuts or Honeydew...seriously?!!?  Their coffee beans are bleached and fake. Don't let them fool you. Go for the real thing and more European!  Get with it Bridgewater!
Used to be my favorite place to eat lunch or a sub on the go. The Californian ( turkey with tomato and avacado on a french baguette) is an exceptional sub choice. The hours are wonky and definitely no longer go until 9 as posted on here. They also frequently run out of ingredients but a very good choice for lunch between 11 and 2. If you go between then you are safe. Sandwiches stop at 4 so if you need a quick dinner grab before then.
I've been here over a dozen times, both during and before the current ownership. It is well situated in the downtown area with adequate parking and overflow options in the general vicinity.

The staff is very congenial- the owner works there routinely-  and the prices, selection, and coffee refill policy are all at or above industry standard. Free wifi is always a plus, as is the option for sturdier fare at lunch or supper time. The lighting could be better-  combined with some dark decorative touches it can be a little gloomy in bad weather-  but those drawbacks are minor and not enough to be a showstopper.

A good choice for a coffee break or a longer stint at the mobile office.
Came here on a Saturday morning while I was waiting for the library to open. It was empty which I first took to be a bad sign. Went in and was greeted by the barista even though she was helping another customer. She was friendly, funny and made a great iced coffee. Will be back and maybe have more than coffee.
Small shop, a comfy place to sit with your laptop and get some work or studying done. Close to Bridgewater State University. Serving fair trade coffee. Great sandwiches. Vegetarian selections available.
This location used to be a passable coffee shop, but has taken a dive since I've been there last.  The cafe was always dimly lit, bordering on inadequate.  The sparse seating options are all uncomfortable with no padding.  There are no couches or sofas.  There is one large table which will likely be taken up by college students, and a few others along the border of the room that are too small to get any meaningful work done. The counter is very awkwardly positioned away from the door and doesn't leave enough room for guests to stand without hovering over a nearby table if there is a line. I almost don't want to look too carefully at the back-counter area as I expect it will be as dingy as the bathroom.

Their sandwiches have been acceptable and I haven't gotten sick from them, which I suppose indicates that it is at least moderately clean.  However the last time I ordered just a regular coffee it was so watery and diluted that I threw it out.  If you take a cup of Dunkin Donuts, spill out 2/3 of it and fill the rest with water, that's what it tasted like.

The service would also rather that you not come into their shop at all.  I'm not sure why four people need to be present while only one of them does any real work, even if it is near closing time.  Whoever it is that happens to be working at the register seems to be on the edge of rolling their eyes at each order.

These problems seem to me to be more of a management issue.  Looking at the place as a whole its clear that the owner recognizes that the shop is the only game in town, so they make no effort to improve the place.
By far, this is the best coffee in town! There are 3 chain coffee shops in town and their coffee cannot even begin to compare to the coffee here! Parking can be a little difficult but well worth the effort!!!
This is a little, funky little place in the town center.  You could drive past it a million times and never see it--but that would be a shame.  The sandwiches are unique and creative, but more importantly excellent.  The owner, while a client, is honestly a very pleasant man who goes out of his way to please.  The coffee is second to none!!  It is the best coffee I've ever had.
The Better Bean offers fresh sandwiches, good coffee, and a quiet place to catch up with a friend. They tend to run out of diet cola, and by Friday afternoon their (non-storebought) cookies can be stale. But those are minor inconveniences in a place with prompt, friendly service and a range of great made-to-order sandwiches. Best sandwiches on Bridgewater common!
If you are a Starbucks drinker you will not be disappointed here. I wandered in to get coffee and tea for some people and discovered their sandwich menu. You can't tell it exists from outside, but the items on the blackboard are all excellent, as good as any deli you will see. 
It's what a coffee house should be. Good coffee and a great place to catch up with friends. Beats the beans out of the chain shops. 
Great place to meet and have a cup of coffee or a sandwich. The friendly staff makes you want to come back. 
Very good and fresh tasting sandwiches. A very good size for $7.  Had the Californian it was very good also had a mocha latte wich was very good. I highly recommend for lunch and even dinner.
You can't go wrong here. The coffee is always fresh, sandwiches are great. Local artists work on the walls. Nice spot. Parking is a little tight, but thats not their fault.


I found the staff to be be very friendly. I ordered The Mighty Greek sandwich and ended up in the hospital with food poisoning so I do not recommend this place for food.
Whenever I want a place to sit and contemplate or take a client or friend I always take them to Better Bean , The prices are excelllent, the coffee selection is outstanding, the staff is very friendly and for a small breakfast or lunch sandwich suberb. I highly recommend This place for pleasure or bussiness......You will not be disappointed.
This was quite a find.  You never really know what you are in for when you walk into an espresso place for the first time.  And I wasn't terribly hopeful: the setting and decor look like the place is run on a shoestring budget.  Not much warmth, everything is a bit threadbare.  But the macchiato I had was excellent.  The espresso has a nutty flavor, but blended with other earthy tones.  Really a treat to drink.  I'd give it a B+ or A- .  (For comparison, I'd give Starbuck's espresso on a good day a C+.)  If only they could inject some visual warmth and toss in a couple of comfy couches, this place would be near-perfect.
Cozy, great staff, lovely variety of coffee, tea, chai, and hot chocolate be it hot or frozen.  Try the Spice Apple Chai.  Great stuff.
When I ordered pizza a little while ago my friends and I were very unhappy.  The pizza was cold, soggy, and greasy.  I will never eat Emma's food again.
My friends and I went to this pizza place and had terrible service! We asked simply for separate checks for the 4 of us and she replied, "You seriously can't do the math?" We were appalled! She continued to ignore us (and the service was slow before this incident) so my friend left a note saying that the waitress had bad behavior and that it was slow being served. We still tipped and everything. We were asked to leave the next time we tried to go there because the manager was offended that we were unhappy with her "girls" service. Insanely rude.
My wife, son and I visited for dinner several weeks ago.  A basic pizza pub.  The pizza and wings were good but my wife ordered the chicken fajita.  Later that night she complained about a bad stomach ache and having to visit the bathroom frequently (we'll leave it at that)   I called the manager the next day purely to let them know there may be an issue.  As it turned out, it was one of the owners.  He said he'd look into it and call me back.  I got a call from his wife.  She was very apologetic and even offered to send us a gift certificate for our problems.  We never asked for anything, so I thought this was a nice gesture.  When it never came, I even emailed. NO response at all.  Wow.  If you offer up something because one of your customers has a bad experience at least follow through.  Pretty Lame!  I would not recommend at all.  Customer service should be set by example from the ownership.
Two waitresses , pleasant and informative about specials ,entrees etc. 
Took quite some time to get entree,,, I started cooking at a HoJo's in this town, shouldn't take this long..
popcorn in a basket and an offer of something to drink right away, Plenty of flatscreens to check out sports ...the lavs were clean, 
I've been told the 99 cent pizza's were lousy...what do expect for less than a buck?
My drink was healthy and the glass was clean,  Scallops were worth the wait....Generous portions- 16 ounces? Right next door to a place that used to be called Ralph Costello's, who had the best Scallop Roll in the area...
Good job Ron Emma....
Typical College town area pub. They have Pizza specials, and a small area with tables. If you like Emma's Pizzas you will get them here. 
Love going there for their Thursday night special, half price apps. Also one of my favorite pizza places in the area
My elderly mother doesn't like eating out because she is frugal and hates paying restaurant prices food. The one exception is Sunday afternoon at Emma'  when the pizzas are 99 cents each. We each order a pizza and soft drink and the bill comes to $7, and the pizza is absolutely delicious. The only drawback is that there is no doggy bags at these prices. Get there early on Sunday (specials run from 12:00 to 4:00) because the place is packed.
The atmosphere in the dining room is not so good.  The food leaves a lot to be desired.  Steak tips had that old taste to them.
Been a loyal customer for years, live their pizza. Bar style, thin crust. Great service at the bar always! 
The Jetty is a casual place to go for a simple meal, a drink, and listen to their great live entertainment. Have to get a seat near the stage to enjoy the music and dancing. The waitstaff work hard. The bar is hopping!  We had lobster and salmon tacos. The lobster came with 2 tacos, the salmon with 3 on the plate. The salmon was dry, but the lobster was quite tastey.
Great place for food. Chef (Scott) is very talented. Only complaint is it's very noisy.  They also have a great brunch. 
Always a great breakfast. Love it. Everything is cooked perfectly & good portions, you don't leave hungry. Service is attentive & quick.
First visit was during the slower winter months.  The food was decent and the service was great.  2nd visit, the music was so loud that we turned to walk out and the manager saw this happening.  Asked if he could help.  I said, no the music is too loud.  He said, oh I'll sit you away from it and we'll be turning the music down.  Got seated near a window and got blinded by the sun.  Service was slower this visit.  Food was just ok.  The music was never turned down.  I like music, but this was seriously loud.  Couldn't wait to leave.  
On the first night of our vacation we ate at the Jetty because one of our friends had told us about it and had had a decent experience there. When we got there the music was very loud so we asked to sit at a table not in front of a speaker. We got seated but had to wait at least 10 minutes until someone came to the table. When we got our food, it was pretty average. Thinking about it afterwards we think it's more of a bar than a place for family dining, especially for dinner.
The Jetty is always fun and friendly. We enjoyed a sampling of the menu and the food was very good. It's a casual sports / pub style establishment. The ambience is upbeat. On this evening, the entire place seemed to be in a party mode. Some decent live entertainment was scheduled to perform. Our server was terrific...a "shout out" to Megan O... She was efficient, very friendly and accommodating. The Jetty is gaining stature as consistent choice for decent fare at reasonable pricing. It's also a great place to gather with friends for drinks and maybe some appetizers. Enjoy...😀

Love the inside of this restaurant but do not always love the food... Inconsistency does not work in restaurants EVER! 
Went once it was good went again not even close to being good.
We were also was told that the kitchen doesn't want patrons to make any changes/ requests regarding how they want their food.
Smarten up is what I have to say to the owners/kitchen people.. Look out your damn window .. In case you did not know it there are not one.. Not two.. But three other restaurants you can throw a stone to that would be more than happy to prepare my food the way I want it! 
Not sure what they are thinking, but what I am sure of is unless they aim to please they will not stay in business for very long! 
Sorry Jetty but you need to truly understand the meaning of 
GOOD CUSTOMER SERVICE.. That's what makes businesses winners .. How do I know..I GREW UP IN ONE! 
It doesn't look like a great dining spot from the outside but it's a special little gem! We've eaten here a few times and each time it was a terrific experience! Try the Seafood Chowder if it's on the menu! Skip Haddad's and go directly to The Jetty!
We have stopped at The Jetty several times for dinner over the past few months and have not been disappointed. Burgers, fish tacos, short rib tacos, fish stew, salads and various appetizers were all consistently well prepared and very tasty. 

The Jetty has full bar service and they serve a great bloody mary I'm told.

The place has a casual beach vibe, there is a bar that always seems busy, and table seating for dining. The kitchen and staff seem to care about the food and how it is presented - nice china and cloth napkins, for example, which is a complement to the good preparation (and a very favorable contrast to the flashier and overhyped spot across the street). The beach cam playing on one of the TVs over the bar is a nice touch too.

There is live music after 9 PM on many nights, so there is ample time to dine before the band starts if you are with a group that likes to converse without yelling. 

We have become regulars and think The Jetty is worth a visit.
Great combo of drinks, food and atmosphere.  Food is  different take on food you would typically find in this area. Brunch and the bloody mary bar is killer. 
This is a bar room. It looks like they have live music at night. The food was delicious!! The seating away from the bar is very comfy and cozy!
I dine at the Jetty on a fairly regular basis. This restaurant has continuously improved since the day it opened. Great burgers and fries. Respectable wine list. Vibrant bar scene. Actual viewing of the ocean on tv screens which I love and hope it keeps going. 
A nice evening out...enjoyed the complimentary nachos and salsa. The tacos and burger...very good as well. The Chardonnay was chilled to perfection...enjoyed the Jack's Abbey Lashes brew too. The Jetty was hopping...including our "spunky" server...Meghan (I think)... There was live entertainment... Service was friendly and accommodating.
Brant Rock is "buzzing" these days...😀

Lovely wait staff. 
Clean, casual Brant Rock eatery
Tasty perfect grilled cheese,  good fries served red hot. Local fish in fish sandwich would've gone 5 star ..but freezing Tuesday in February the Jetty was a nice change for an icey beer and warm sandwich. 
My husband and I went here today to catch the Patriots game.  It's a really nice atmosphere with a large bar and plenty of TVs.  Service was good.  I had the sangria which was excellent.  We came during brunch time which I wasn't expecting.  Probably should of had a breakfast item, but I was in the mood for lunch so tried the fish tacos.  They were just okay.  Lots of cabbage in the bottom of the taco without dressing, then some "pico" on top which was large pieces of tomato with a couple pieces of red onion and jalepenos, and then the fried fish with a "spicy" sauce on top.  You only get two tacos and nothing else with it.  It was $11.  I was expecting some fries or rice/beans.  My husband had the bbq short rib tacos.  They were much better.  Still didn't come with anything.  We will definitely be back and try something else.
The Jetty has a limited menu but what they have is very good. Good selection of beverages too. Sometimes they have music, it varies from really good to pretty bad so be careful if you're going for the music.
This a good choice for breakfast in Marshfield, MA. The food was amazing & the atmosphere was nice. They have tv's everywhere & show one of the beaches live. Relaxing place & seemed like the had a lot of staff. However, no food came out of kitchen for 20-30 minutes. My brother-in-law goes there weekly & loves the French toast. We had the omelettes & they were very filling. 
Fun Surfer atmosphere, good but not outstanding draft beer selection, limited menu. I had the fish tacos which were good but had only a small portion of fish. I'd like to visit in the evening when they have music.  Several locals recommended coming in the evening for music.  I'd try it. Reasonable food prices.
Fun, modern beach bar/restaurant  with creative decor and good, reasonably priced food.  Entertainment most nights.  We only stopped in for drinks and chicken fingers.  Friendly staff.  I like this spot better than Brandt Rock's other two nearby options (Venus 2 and Haddads).  
We had breakfast here. Their French toast is amazing. The menu notes that it can be shared. Take heed of that suggestion. They serve three huge pieces of delicious French toast smothered with blueberries and maple syrup. I could only eat half. I hear it's a place that really rocks at night. I'm sure it's fun but it was refreshingly quite in the morning. The only suggestion I'd make is that they offer a few smaller breakfast items such as muffins. This is located in a popular vacation area where going for breakfast during the week is popular. The Jetty is such a nice place with good food; it would be nice to have a more varied breakfast menu. And lest I forget, the owner and the people who waited on us were really attentive. 
Had lunch. Great linguicia pizza!  Best I ever had. Bartender friendly. Great hometown feel to the place. Recommend highly for lunch or dinner!
Out for a Summer Sunday drive, and ended up in the Brant Rock section of Marshfield, Ma...we found the Venus II and decided to stop for lunch. We chose to sit inside at the bar, rather than either (upstairs&rooftop) outdoor seating. Greeted pleasantly, offered drink and food menus promptly. I went with the Buffalo Chicken Tacos, (3 to an order) and can tell you they were terrific...really fresh tortillas, lettuce, onion and tomato..buffalo chicken cooked perfectly and just spicy enough..my lunch date had the Grilled Chicken Sandwich..he thought it was average, but raved about the handcut fries. Venus II has a great atmosphere, lots of tv's,  even at the tables in the bar..We suspect this place is a hit on a Football Sunday. Will definitely go back
Service was ok, food was ok.  Can't give any more than 2 stars - it just wasn't that great. Keno was fun, but nothing to cheer about

Nice menu with plenty of delicious items. Comfortable to dine at the outdoor tables.  The fresh seafood, baked potato and cole slaw is always a fantastic option. 
Food is ok, definitely bar food. Drinks are better. Music can be too loud at times. Some tables have TV's to occupy kids.
Known for its pizza, Venus ll has been here for years. Since occupying their new building the service is somewhat lacking can get very crowded but a popular spot especially in the summer
My girlfriend and I wanted to come to the bar to watch the giants game and understood it was at the same time as the pats game so we called ahead to ensure it was possible. The lady assured us we would be able to watch the game at our booth as all booths have private TVs. Upon arrival, we emphasized again that we wanted to watch the giants game and were reassured we could watch it in our booth. Upon entering the booth the only thing on our waitress' mind was the drinks we were to order. The giants game was no where to be found on the booth tv because those tvs don't have nfl ticket so we asked three times if they could change one of the larger TVs near us to the Giants game. To appease the waitress we ordered our food and waited patiently for her to find the right remote to change the TV. The waitress took 20 minutes to ask us if things were going well and we asked about the game again and she said it would affect all the TVs so she could not put it on even though they had nfl ticket and the game was playing near a tv in another corner of the bar with no available seats near by. So we asked if we could move to another booth to get a squinted-eye view of the screen. The waitress did not even offer to help us move our food and drinks. During our stay we received various dirty looks from the locals in the bar and did not feel comfortable. Perhaps they weren't uses to our mediterranean skin tone that they couldn't take their eyes off of something so foreign. The wings and greek salad we ordered were average and it was the only thing the waitress cared about.  We tried one more time to ask the waitress to change the non-patriots game on the tv above us and she told us she would try. In reality her attempt to help was 0 as the bar was not overly packed nor would it have been hard to do. The check was given to us immediately after we finished eating. This place is not welcoming to a non-local and the environment from our experience was not friendly. Perhaps our experience would have been different if we were blond haired white patriots fans who lived in the neighborhood. This is not a place to go to enjoy a game or food and we can only hope this was an off day for humankind's sake.
We decided to try the Venus II last night & I was impressed with the amount of room & atmosphere. They had a large selection of food, beer & alcoholic drinks. They cleared out the tables in the main bar & made room for the DJ & dancing. The service was good & friendly. I would highly recommend.
Fried calamari and clam strips are very good. On a sunny day great spot for a beer and some fried seafood.
Venus II is my definition of mediocre. It's convenient, the food is ok, the service is average. When you don't want to cook, don't want to drive, you go to Venus II. The locals spend their time here and keep it going off season. It's filled with TV's and the beer is cold. Pizza is ok. My kids kill for the cheesy Tator Tots. I need to learn to make them at home.
We stop here on our way home from visiting relatives and what a pleasant surprise. The staff was friendly, helpful and offered great suggestions for what to order off the menu.

The food was prepared well and HOT, which is a key to good food.

The seafood was fresh being right near the ocean.

When in this area again will definitely stop here again.
Venus II is a Brandt Rock institution, serving up a large menu of mostly fried bar food, large portions of pasta and an assortment of decent pizzas.   People come for the pizza and the bar scene with discount draft beer and Keno screens wherever your eyes fall.   
Love Venus pizza! Service is always great! Staff is friendly! Ordered 10 pizzas for my sons bday, they were ready when I asked, hot and delicious! Always a hit!
A local family chain of restaurants that are well managed serving Pizza and Pub style food and drink, a sport bar atmosphere!
"The Venus" maintains a long tradition as a great spot for decent quality food at reasonable prices. The menu is extensive but we often get the "bar pizzas" or "grinders". There is definitely something for everyone here. In recent years, the owners have added a wide variety of entertainment. There is a "sports bar" feel to the establishment with so many TV's...some tables offer individual TV's... But, again...it's more than a sports bar/restaurant. The owners have bee pm long supporters of the community and various charitable endeavors. Families are welcome here...service is friendly and there is generally a festive mood through the the establishment... Check out the decks for cooling off on those hot summer days / nights... 😃
Driving around we decided to stop at Venus II. My wife had the BBQ chicken wrap and got the clam strip plate. We shared and had the best of both world. Bot dishes were great, with the clams done perfectly, sweet and almost melt in your mouth. Would definitely go back. We sat on the upper deck outside and had a wonderful meal. Wait staff was good considering the 3 flights of stairs. 
We often go here for lunch and dinner.  The food is always good and plentiful, and the pizza is excellent.  Worth a visit.
My husband and I have been patrons of the Venus 2 since it was just the Venus;  an old shack that stayed standing by pure miracle alone. That shack was destroyed by a storm many years ago and they rebuilt it into a huge, much safer and inviting pub. According to my husband they have the best pup pizza around. I usually get their steak tips or fish and chips. Drinks are good and there is always a "bucket of beer" special. We moved from MA several years ago but the Venus 2 is always our first stop every trip back.
Lunch specials and great service make it a good lunch place. Dinner is fine too. Their sub's and bar style pizzas are well worth the trip anytime. Pizza specials are great in the the cold months. Very good fish and chips can be had here also. Big takeout service is evident. 
Lunch specials are a great value, food is decent. Fun place to watch a game. Close to the beach, with a big outdoor seating area.
Lovely lunch spot with delicious Fish-n-Chips, and cold beers....perfect, relaxing, meal with good service, fair prices, and an unbeatable waterfront location.
Clams! lobster! scallops ! lobster! Tuesday evening, twin lobster special.
We were staying in the area so did a couple of lunches as well as evening.
Sword Fish kebabs at lunch were grilled to perfection and such a reasonable price,

Girls night out gathering 7 of us and everyone happy . Been doing this for years and food and service consistent.  Have read reviews were people have thought declined but we must be lucky if that is so.
Stopped in for lunch.  Very good menu.  We had raw oysters, crab cakes, scallops on  a Caesar salad and oyster sandwich with a fabulous house made slaw.   Very good service and a very good value.  The oysters were special-lightly breaded and a lot of them. Lots of beers on tap.  Highly recommended!
Ok courteous food ok polite employees!bbbmm. Jhjochk.  Bbmbmnccbm mmgpo. Sjoh $  mkgr.  Nmanagrt. Pio mmm k f2f dvbmkus
Great local flavour with nautical theme. Great chowder. Good number of beers to choose from. Perfect for lunch or dinner or to watch a game. Bartenders and waitresses friendly. 
Haddad's is a somewhat typical large seafood house across the road from the beach in the Brant Rock area of Marshfield.  Good place for lobster, with twin lobsters of fairly good size on the menu this September for less than $20.  My wife and I dined with our daughter and son-in-law.  The twin lobsters were very good, and we even took some lobster meat home with us.  The lobster casserole was rich in lobster meat but suffered a bit from an excess of breading.  We learned later one can order the casserole with reduced stuffing.  We dined in the downstairs dining room which is large and a bit noisy.  Alternative seating is in the bar room.  All in all, we were pleased with the meal but would stop short of giving Haddad's five start.
If you are looking for good seafood, this is the place. Although the restaurant side is nice, I enjoy a high top table on the bar side. The chowder is rich, thick and full of clams. Might be a little pricey for some, but good seafood usually is. If you ask for the senior portion, they will usually give it to you, even if you are not. 
We had a very nice server and the valet parking was polite. That's about it.

We were a party of 7 with reservations, but still had to wait 15 minutes. 

The place is noisy with zero atmosphere.

We started with their "signature" onion rings and calamari as appetizers. Both were very greasy and tasteless.

We had a variety of main dishes (including lobster casserole - house specialty). Everything was packed with a tasteless breading that smothered an taste of the seafood.

After 20+ years on SE Massachusetts, I have to say that this was about the worst seafood I've ever had.

The ice tea and soft drinks were OK. Didn't bother with dessert.
This meal was our last one for this vacation and on this Monday, August 15th, we were not disappointed.  We currently do not live near any ocean and I was determined to have a lobster before I left Boston. My favorite restaurant for lobster from my youth had closed about 2 years ago so my son was able to have Haddad's recommended by a few people.  I could have had a traditional lobster but chose the lobster casserole this time and was not disappointed.  The stuffing used in this dish does not overpower the lobster.   It contain the meat of a full lobster without the work to get it. Glad I did.  Brought back very good memmories. Would definitely go here again.
Oysters were very fresh. Could have used some better cocktail sauce though. I also tried the baked stuffed shrimp which was very good. Most meals come with 2 sides but not much on the vegetable selection. The cole slaw didn't have a ton of mayonnaise which I liked. Onion rings were good. 

Parking can be a little tough - there are a lot of restaurants and stores along this strip and only limited parking.
Checked the Internet for Seafood Restaurants in the Marshfield area. We decided to give Haddad's Ocean Cafe a try. 
Fried Clams & Scollops were very good. Really excellent. French fries were just the frozen crinkle cut. Not good. Onion rings were my biggest disappointment because I love onion rings. They were overcooked which made their coating too crunchy and dry. Not much onion just crust. The seafood must have been out of the fryer too long before it was served. Seafood cools down quickly.  A little disappointed with our meals. We might give Haddad's another try later. 
We had a party of 15 and everything was perfect.  Great Raw Bar ($1 on Monday nad Wednesday).  Deluxe seafood platter can feed at least 2 people.  Becca was a great server, very professional, attentive and fun.  The food was hot and delicious.  No complains from anyone.
Good seafood choices and non-seafood choices available to please everyone in your party. Eat on the roof for a great view! Great service!
Haddad's has been a Brant Rock tradition since the 1930's.  Many years ago it was a hole in the wall place that served great seafood at a reasonable price and with quick and efficient service.  It was a bit dark, a lot small, and always busy back in the day.  

Fast forward to today -- and now it's a big place with a bright atmosphere.  Other than the new building they have managed to keep everything else on par -- good seafood, decent price, with (mostly) quick and efficient service.  Haddad's has gotten a lot bigger and while the service is sometimes a bit hectic, it's a decent place for basic New England seaside fare.  

My advice is to stick to the traditional dishes -- various fried and baked seafood dishs and chowder.  While there are some other things on the menu, the Italian food isn't really on par with what you'd get at an actual Italian restaurant (but you should know that already!).  

It's also a good place for drinks -- with a roof deck that's busy and fun.  Great for an evening drink.  

One major plus -- they have valet parking.  It's a super busy place on the weekends, so it's good to know you can get parked without the hassle of driving around.
We live very close to Haddad,s and we always want to patronize our local businesses but I think enough is enough. The staff is fine but the food is mediocre at best but the prices are just unreasonable for a year-round restaurant.
It's been awhile since we have eaten at Haddad's, and we weren't disappointed. The setting is beautiful and the seafood was top notch all in our party had different types of seafood and all loved it. I must remember to return more often.
Not a lot of places offer Chicken Marsala, so I was happy to see it offered here and promptly ordered it. Yuck. The Marsala sauce was bland and quite thin- too thin to even stick to the pasta.
Always good! Consistently delicious! Great wait staff, friendly and efficient. 
I don't remember ever having a bad experience there. We were there a week ago and I couldn't decide on fried clams or swordfish, Mr. Haddad brought out a complimentary appetizer of fried clams to satisfy my craving - who does that? 

You won't find better food, or friendlier service anywhere.
i was disappointed in our meals.  Cold onion rings, presentation of meals were a disaster.  i enjoyed the smaller restaurant.  it is not on our to go to restaurant.

hopefully they will take a few minutes to double check food before serving.
According to our friends that live in Marshfield, Haddad's has been recently renovated to include a function space and the restaurant. We ate upstairs on the deck where we had a nice view of the Brant Rock area. 

The food was delicious and the wait staff was nice. You'll like it here.
This review is done purely on our recent visit to this diner to have a quick cup of coffe.
We have just had a three week holiday in the states in an area unfamiliar to our friends.
We popped in for a cup of coffe and mentioned we were strangers to the young waitress there

Within a few minutes she had come back with another top of coffee AND a list of all the places around that we would find interesting to go to.
There was no prompting of an expectation of a tip( though she justifiably received one from us).
A very pleasant smile and lovely disposition.
Many Thanks from all of us
BUSY!  Food is always hot, and delivered the way U order.  Wish they stayed open longer on the w/e.  We so love this place!
My wife and I enjoyed a great old fashioned breakfast at this diner-style restaurant across the street from the beach in the Brant Rock area of Marshfield.  Well prepared eggs, corned beef, other breakfast meats, potatoes, pancakes, etc. in a relaxed informal atmosphere.  Nothing all that special, just a good down-home hot breakfast with steaming coffee.  And with moderate prices.
Awesome food. Awesome waitresses. Awesome location.  My family and I love this place.  Reasonable prices and large quantity.  You won't be upset.
I've been here a few times. The food and service were both absolutely prefect. When you go, hope to have either Tori or Tayler as your server. Although everyone seemed to be really good, these two are stand outs in a crowd.
 Super service by waitress Laura! Great food ..amount and taste exceptional. Sparkling clean and warm friendly atmosphere 
The staff is a delight, very pleasant, and efficient. The food is great consistently and we'll be back again and again.
Brand Rock Hop is a colorful Diner with great food and friendly service.  We sat at the countertop and had a large breakfast with omelettes and pancakes and home fries.  They  serve lunch during breakfast as well, so one of us a chicken pesto panini with cheese.  Yum.  We will definitely return.
We enjoyed our lunches. The kids liked their extra large milkshakes. Plenty of parking and comfort seating. Pleasant staff.
Brant Rock Hop 269 Ocean BrsntRock Marshfield MA has the best breakfast I've eaten!  Pancakes are fluffy and delicious.  The cinnamon bun Pancakes were so good!  The ham steaks were sumptuous!  Prices are reasonable.  Go to Brant Rock Hop for the breakfast of our dreams. Tim and Cathy Frankel
service great food awasome i love the hop i would really reccomend it to every one please read it thanks
Busy day in Brant Rock and it 'way overburdened the kitchen. I drove quite a way to dine, based on Trip Advisor recommendation, but probably wouldn't do it again.
Awesome food, prices, atmosphere, and staff who treat you like family. Definitely a must go. Beats the mug by a mile
The neighborhood atmosphere at this restaurant is fun.  Decor is 50's with a soda fountain counter offering great ice cream choices.  Year round restaurant.  Food was above expectation meaning I expected "breakfast" and got an amazing Greek omelette.  Generous portion, fresh spinach with a side of grilled tomatoes.  If this restaurant is this much fun during the middle of a winter snow storm, I can't wait to visit in the summer.  Good value and customer service is tops.


Got an "Irish Breakfast." Included #3 eggs cooked right, canned baked beans, canned brown bread, frozen hash brown packaged serving, store bought uninspired sausages (3), mushy fresh tomato slice cooked to mush. Tasted OK but definitely NOT something to venture out for--can do at home---and do myself much better. Service was pleasant but slow. Table of teens sitting next to us screaming and laughing for most of meal. I dont eat out much because of these issues. If I venture out I want FRESH---or locally sourced---or HOMEMADE. None of those here.
My husband had raisin bread French toast. He said it was very good. I had the most delicious cinnamon bun French toast I have ever tasted. All the breakfasts are good. The servers are pleasant and helpful. The prices are reasonable.
Stepping back in time at the hop. Breakfasts are great. Lunch is fantastic too. Very fair prices. Clean and friendly.
I have had breakfast there multiple times.  Always had good service.  The food was great the wait short.  
This is an oldies theme breakfast restaurant from the menu through the decorations.Food is good and service excellent Prices are resonable
A buddy and I are doing work in the area and decided to try and find a place with takeout breakfast. Well this place nailed it right in the head..  perfect ordering process, friendly workers, very clean, and their quick to get you something if you need. The food was great as well, I got a stack of original buttermilk pancakes, and my buddy got a breakfast sandwich, and we split a side of hash browns. Both main dishes were huge portions, well worth the price (which is not too bad at all), it was like a full omelet on the sandwich! And as for the pancakes.... so good, they were huge as well. The hash browns were to DIE for. Absolutely amazing. I'm typing this as I'm thinking about what I'm going to get from them today. Keep up the good work guys!
We have been long time visitors of the Fairview Inn since Paul and Betty Disch opened. Everything is perfect about this restaurant and we love to go there for both lunch and dinner (we have a standing reservation every Saturday evening which is our "date night"). The entire staff is the most professional, courteous, helpful, and just plain very nice people who make your lunch or dinner a sincere and wonderful experience. The food is fantastic, the main menu is diverse, and they have several daily fantastic specials that often change at the whim and ingenuity of their great Chef Michael. Their selection of wines, alcoholic and non-alcoholic beverages are vast and provide the diner with a great selection to choose from. Overall, their prices at both lunch and dinner are very reasonable. The last day at the Fairview Inn location was 10/17/15; however, not to worry. Paul and Betty are opening a new place "Disch's Route 53 Tavern" (Formerly Bobby Hackett's) located at 615 Washington St., Pembroke. Not really much of a drive from their previous location. Paul and Betty have promised the same fantastic food and beverages along with some still secret specials not previously offered. Many of the same fantastic staff will also be moving to their new location. We're very excited about continuing our tradition of having lunch and Saturday evening "date night" at their new location. We highly recommend this new "Tavern" to everyone. You won't be disappointed for certain.
Excellent views, indoors and outdoors, right at the ocean, good food, fine dining, good service, easy parking, reasonable prices.
This is a very nice restaurant with a very professional waitstaff. The food is very upscale and the prices are very reasonable
We had another awesome dinner at the Fairview last week. It is consistently good food with great service and a unique location. We're sad that the property owner and the restaurant were unable to work out a lease and that they will be closing in October. Word is that the restaurant will move to Route 53 which will be a different experience. By the way, we have to commend the parking valet. His partner went home sick and this kid was hustling to park and retrieve vehicles.
Recent visit was very relaxing. The rooms were spacious and clean. The staff courteous and helpful. The view from the balcony is excellent. We only had breakfast in the restaurant, but that was very good. Highly recommend.
We visited this restaurant after doing a ten mile hike on local reservation land and it was such a treat to sit on the porch, look out at the ocean and enjoy really excellent food.  I had one of the best bloody mary's I've ever had (with a jumbo shrimp perched on the rim) and definitely the best fish tacos we've ever had.  They serve lovely homemade bread with the meal. The service from Jim was great and the atmosphere casual and comfortable.  And it didn't break the bank.
The Fairview Inn has always been our go to place for a Weekend lunch or dinner.  It is a beautiful building with a view toward the ocean and a patio when the weather permits. The food is good and the servers do a fine job.  I understand that they will be moving soon which we are sad to hear.
We had lunch on the outdoor patio--a perfect place to be on a sunny August day. Our spectacular view was the Atlantic Ocean. Our server, James, was attentive to our needs without being intrusive. Food presentation showed care and attention to detail. We felt that the value of our luncheon was superb. Can't wait to return.
We've been going here since they opened &, although we have to travel a bit to get here, it's worth the visit.  They've got a complete menu with someone for everyone and the food is very good.  The Clams Casino are one of my favorites.  The bar is a popular spot, as well, with generous pours.  For seating they offer a  dining room, deck overlooking the ocean,  & spacious bar seating with a stone fire place for the winter.  It's too bad that they are leaving this location at the end of 2015.  It is reported that another restaurant could take it over, but it's also rumored that the lot could be developed.  The restaurant is said to be relocating to Pembroke on Route 53.  Good Luck!  We'll be sorry to see them leave this location.  We have too few ocean view restaurants.
The Fairview Inn Restaurant is a favorite place to dine for either lunch or dinner. It is especially pleasant during the summer season when you can sit outside on their deck, overlooking the ocean across the street. Whether dining  inside or out, the service is friendly and attentive. There is a wide variety of dishes on the menu, all reasonably priced. Today a friend and I went there for lunch and enjoyed the food and atmosphere. We both chose the fish and chips which were delicious and served with a side of tasty cole slaw. It is a place we return to again and again for either lunch or dinner.
What a delightful place.  Excellent food, inventive drinks in a delightful dining room, light and nicely designed.  Plenty of view from every table, and what a gorgeous view.

Well worth the trip down to Brant Rock!
The food is very good at this newly renovated Victorian style Inn over looking Cape Cod Bay. It serves traditional American fare along with a good selection of Italian foods and fresh seafood! You won't be disjointed here in the quality food and service! 
One of our favorite places.  Food, location, service, and ocean view are all exceptional.  Recommend it highly.
families seemed to be having a good time but if you are looking for great food keep looking,inside was VERY NOISY so conversation with friends was difficult
We were there for dinner in Fathers Day with a group that consisted of 4 adults and 2 children.  The staff was attentive and pleasant , even with a "spill accident".  The appetizers of Buffalo Fingers and Rizutto Balls were very tasty.  Our entrees consisted of of chicken, steak, haddock and crab cakes.  The kids menu had sliders and hot dogs.  Good choices for the little ones.  Dessert, the most important course of a good dinner, did not disappoint.  Boston Cream Pie, Peanut Butter Pie and Creme Bruele hit the spot.  If you"re in the Marshfield area it's well worth the stop.
I was back visiting with my family and friends, my wife's dearest friend took us to the Fairview Inn for dinner , first the view is awesome sitting right across from the ocean is always a great place for dinning, the dinner was fabulous everyone was so happy with the entree we all order and then we shared two desserts which was the cap to a wonderful dinner , do not miss this gem of a restaurant highly recommend .
The Fairview is a nice, casual restaurant with great food and service.  Modern inside after a fire and rebuild a few years ago.  Unfortunately it is the only listing in Brant Rock rather than being included in Marshfield listings.  As such, virtually no one is going to see it.
We always sit in the bar area. It is very relaxed. The service is always excellent. The drinks are delicious. The haddock was fresh cooked perfectly and we very much enjoyed it.
Valet parking is available at the front of the restaurant. Once inside the hostess is ready to seat you and welcomes you. The waitstaff is very attentive and always around when needed. The food was very tasty along with the generous portions and of course the meals came out hot and in a timely manner. Great view of the ocean and very nice atmosphere inside. When in the area, you must try this place before the summer crowd arrives or you will not be able to get in.
My husband and I decided to go out for a late lunch. Although, it was a snowy day the Fairview Inn was inviting and a nice fire was going in the fireplace.  From appetizers to dessert we couldn't have had a better meal. Our server was most pleasant, answering our questions and engaging us in conversation.  We will definitely find our way back for many more lunches or a drink enjoying the ocean view across the street.
Fresh meat and vegetables at good prices.  Breakfast sandwiches - yum!  Bakery products that can't be beat.....fresh bread that's the best!  Try the sunflower seed bread or pull apart dinner rolls.  BRM will meet all your needs from a lunch at the beach to a romantic dinner!
(Local neighborhood market)
First off this is a small market big enough to serve your basic needs. The food produced on site is great. Stable ownership over the years equals constant quality. I have been a customer for years and have had most items on the deli menu at least once! I really like the fried chicken and the subs are very good. You can buy sides of potato salads and cole slaw. The staff is helpful and they have lottery sales too.
Convenient. Groceries priced on high side.  Meat specials are worth the trip.  Breads baked on premises, and very good
They sell tons of subs ----and for a good reason: great service and great sandwich.
Best ever steak & cheese wrap - very impressed with the staff. Always cheerful and smiling. They also have a great breakfast sandwich and fresh breads. Best meat in town.
We have summered in Marshfield for years and always make it a point to stop at least once or twice during our vacation for subs and fried chicken.  Massive subs and wide variety.  The chicken is great, as are the potato wedges.  But try to order the chicken when you know it has been freshly cooked.  I had 2 breasts that were under the heating lights for too long and they were extremely dry and chewy.....but having been a patron for years, that is rarely the case.  The funny thing about this market is that we never shop for food here.  A bit more expensive that Stop and Shop.  We only get the subs and chicken.
Very busy location. Very efficient, working as a team. The food is very fresh and well made. Shop there anytime I'm in the area. Highly recommended!
This market is quite deceiving from the outside.   All your food needs could be fulfilled without leaving Brant Rock with just this market.    They have a butcher, a baker and a deli sandwich maker.   We love it.   The prices are competitive, especially their weekly specials.   They have newspaper, lottery and convenient store items as well.
You see a small, local, family run market and don't expect to get a great meal there... but this is truly my favorite place t get lunch in Marshfield. I typically go for the subs. I can't even explain what makes it so good.... it seems like a basic sub but between the bread and quality ingredients they really give you something special. You can also get some of the best fried chicken in town here! There is no table service or places to sit, but it is some of the very best take-out going. I not only consider it a Marshfield gem but also a hidden treasure... but the more I talk to people around town the more I see how it may not be so secret. People here know just how good it is! I will be a regular as long as I possibly can.
Brant Rock Market has the in the world as staff. Friendly, helpful and always a laugh or two. Their take out is the best
First and foremost, Brant Rock Market is a terrific grocery store serving the furthest village outpost of Marshfield...Brant Rock. Brant Rock Market has won a number of awards for their meats, the deli, the bakery and more... This iconic business has "heart". The kitchen area serves up some great take-out food...from breakfast sandwiches to fried chicken and terrific sandwiches. Try the signature homemade chicken salad among other flavorful items.  A number of "regulars" will purchase something "to go" and retreat to the seawall, nearby...a nice place to enjoy your food and take in the ocean air. Many of us enjoy the fresh submarine sandwiches and pastries. Brant Rock Market will pack up delicious offerings for a day at the beach or maybe a fishing trip from the local marinas and Town Pier. The weekend mornings are hectic as visitors vie for the terrific baked goods...Prices are reasonable and the staff is friendly... Check out Brant Rock Market when you are in the area.... :0)
Met friends for a great dinner and local fun with music...danced in the small local bar/restaurant and had fun with our waiter, Steve. Good food and specials, as well as special drinks....
Stopped at the Fieldston Restaurant last night for dinner- it was great! Shrimp scampi over lobster ravioli- delicious! The folks at the bar will keep you entertained too!
We have been dining at Fieldston for several years and it is always very good. There is a nice selection of salads, appetizers, and main dishes to choose from and prices are reasonable, salads $7.95, mains $10-20. The decor is New England seaside comfortable with two dining areas and a bar; entertainment is available on the weekends. Service is pleasant and efficient. Unfortunately there were only two choices for dessert. Recommended.
My family and I dined out tonight at the Fieldston Restaurant, as we were curious about 'Clean Out the Kitchen Sunday' was.  Well, we found out.  We started with a Cesar Salad ($6.95) and the Asian Spring Rolls (also $6.95).  The salad was dripping in salad dressing that tasted (as my daughter stated) 'fishy' and the lettuce was brown.  The Spring Rolls consisted of two very small spring rolls cut into a total of four pieces.  The seemed to be store bought.  One meal was the rib eye steak, which was very salty; my stuffed cod consisted of a small piece of fish with very salty stuffing on top.  Also ordered was the chicken parmesan, which my daughter said was ok.  So, to us 'Clean Out the Kitchen Sunday' means use up all the left over food, whether it is 100% good/appealing looking, hence the brown lettuce and very salty steak.  I'm just hoping that we don't end up sick.  On the plus side:  our server was very friendly and the bread was good.
One of my favorite restaurants in Marshfield 
Best time to go is on Sunday
Sunday is called "Clean out the Kitchen"
Prices are highly discounted and Yummie
Lamb is to die for and the Crab Stuffed Filet of Sole was out of this world
The Fieldston is, perhaps, my favorite Marshfield restaurant.  The food is always delicious, but also interesting.  The menu is limited, but there are always enough items to choose from.  The food is inventive without being silly. This summer I've enjoyed the lamb shank, crab stuffed filet of sole, and veal parmesan.  The bar is intimate but comfortable and most welcoming.  This is a conversational sort of lounge and the drinks are great.
Odd little place, minimal effort at decor or ambiance - may not seem like a very likely place for a good meal, but give it a chance.

Interesting menu, unusual choices at very reasonable prices.  The crab cakes are excellent, big enough to share.  Good entrees and great desserts.  Live music in the adjoining bar (which is slightly busier than the dining room). 
My husband and I love going to The Fieldston every Sunday night possible.  The chef, bartender, and staff are all very friendly and will go out of their ways to please us.  I have always been delighted with the quality of the drinks and the wine.  It is a hidden gem as others have noted.  Sunday night is "Clean out the Kitchen" night when the regular menu is discounted.  The food is always delicious and creatively conceived and prepared.  We love it so much that we recently had a function there for my husband's birthday, all delightful.  I also recommend the parties there:  a 3rd of July party, New Year's Eve, and St. Patrick's Day among others.  For the 3rd of July and New Year's Eve parties the viands consist of tray upon tray of wonderful passed hors oeuvres.  Visiting the Fieldston is a high point in our week.
This is a good place to stop in for a beer (I agree with BoeKelly)  - Outstanding friendly waitresses.  The wine selection is mediocre low-bar - and it's REALLY convenient if you are staying in the neighborhood.   That said, Their dining is so poor, they really should just give up.  It is as though someone who used to like experimenting at home decided to call themselves a "chef" and tried to pass it off as an actual restaurant meal.   I have made the mistake of dining there twice (I was trying to give them a second chance)  the first time, Lobster Mac and Cheese - took 40 minutes to get to me and the center was FROZEN SOLID! - when I sent it back, I got a bit of a dirty look -- clearly purchased pre-made and they don't know how to re-heat.  Second time was worse.  I ordred what looked like it would be a delicious meal  "Lobster Ravioli in a garlic scampi sauce" -mmmm, right?  guess again.   What I was served was Lobster ravioli floating in a red watery substance - with some chopped tomatoes in it --  It was  not garlic flavored and certainly didn't resemble a scampi....It was like someone mixed clam juice with water, put some salt and tomatoes in it and then floated the ravioli on top..  I sent it back.  The waitress was really nice, she tried to get it taken off my bill because she knew I was unhappy (I did not ask her to do that because I felt like  I deserved it for not learning my lesson the last time)  the owner didn't take it off the bill -- I think he might take it personally when people don't like his amateur cooking  --  It's not that expensive - so if you're short on cash and you will eat anything, then go  (they say it's inexpensive because the portions are small.... I say it's because the food is actually.... terrible.  There is no other word)   I really hope, if anyone at the Fieldston is reading this that you PLEASE step it up  - your location is so good and you could be such a wonderful little spot.
While on vacation recently we stopped in to have dinner. The dining area was empty, yet we still had to wait several minutes for the waitress, who then told us "she would be with us in a few minutes" ... we should have known then. Whne she did show up she was very nice.
There were 5 of use we ordered a few apps and dinners - NONE of which is worth talking about. One "barnyard lasagna" was a disgusting flavor! How do screw up lasagna?
No comfort food here.
Also exspensive.

The drinks however were fabulous, the bartender should be commended!
This place is really hard to describe. It is old , it is oddly placed, it needs a major update to everything from the atmospher to the food. Costly and not worth a stop. Lots of other worth while places here in town.
GREAT food and a huge ego on the Chef.  

Nice atmosphere and in generally good staff, sometimes a little testy but otherwise good.

Well worth the trip!
Cozy bar and fireplace area (OK, so its a fake fireplace, but cozy just the same). Ambitious and creative menu for a small place and each time we have been the food was very good and reasonably priced.
We love to eat at the bar when we visit the Fieldston. The food is good, drinks from Suzie are great especially her margueritas. You will meet everybody at the bar when you go there. Great local spot.
The Fieldston has become a reliable location for quality and creative cuisine at reasonable prices. The menu is constantly changing and The Fieldston works hard to promote interesting specials. At various times they boast 16 oz. mixed drink offerings for $4.95 or dinners for 2 with a bottle of wine for $35.00. Keep watching as the specials change often with whimsical emails and Facebook postings.

On this particular evening, we enjoyed a couple of meals priced at just $9.95 each…the Chicken Parm dinner and a Spicy Sausage Stew over shell macaroni. Both dishes were nicely prepared, presented and flavorful. We had ordered a couple of different salads as well. Again, the salads were nicely prepared. Apparently, there was a dinner for 2 special on this particular evening that we were not made aware of... We just ordered from the regular menu. But, prices were such that we may have passed on the special offering anyway.

Our dining room was cozy and quiet and we enjoyed our table by the fireplace. There is an inviting bar area nearby and it appeared to be busy, friendly and inviting.
The Fieldston also has a great porch with high top tables... a nice spot for a casual visit to enjoy a drink and relax. With the warmer weather, this would be one of the nicer places to meet up with friends and family over a pitcher of Sangria (when offered). You can't go wrong at The Fieldston as it works hard to please... in both creative cuisine and hospitality.
we went for Valentines day - we've had good and bad experiences there, so thought we'd give it another try.  First, they didn't have our reservation. When I made it, I also asked if we could reserve a table in a particular area.  I was told no, but when we got there and asked for a table along the outside wall, we were told they were reserved.  The service all night was the worst we have ever experienced.  The few tables that were filled came and went in the time we were stuck there.  The dressing on the salads was overpowering.  My chicken was dry and tasteless, and the sauce on the pasta was just chopped tomatoes cooked long enough to leave a puddle of water on the bottom of the plate.  My husband's veal chop was fatty and tasteless.  His dessert of chocolate bread pudding was good, but my cheesecake was obviously defrosted and from a mega store.  Our area of the restaurant was freezing, the chairs uncomfortable, and halfway through the meal I just wanted to leave.  We will never, I repeat, never go back there again.  The biggest impression we went away with is that the chef is just winging it, and has no real idea of what good food coming out of a restaurant kitchen should taste like.
we went for Valentines day - we've had good and bad experiences there, so thought we'd give it another try.  First, they didn't have our reservation. When I made it, I also asked if we could reserve a table in a particular area.  I was told no, but when we got there and asked for a table along the outside wall, we were told they were reserved.  The service all night was the worst we have ever experienced.  The few tables that were filled came and went in the time we were stuck there.  The dressing on the salads was overpowering.  My chicken was dry and tasteless, and the sauce on the pasta was just chopped tomatoes cooked long enough to leave a puddle of water on the bottom of the plate.  My husband's veal chop was fatty and tasteless.  His dessert of chocolate bread pudding was good, but my cheesecake was obviously defrosted and from a mega store.  Our area of the restaurant was freezing, the chairs uncomfortable, and halfway through the meal I just wanted to leave.  We will never, I repeat, never go back there again.  The biggest impression we went away with is that the chef is just winging it, and has no real idea of what good food coming out of a restaurant kitchen should taste like.
Just went there for the first time.  No beer on tap, but that is not the issue.  I ordered a hamburger and asked for swiss or american cheese.  They had neither.  The only cheese they offered was cheddar.  How do you have a restaurant withg only cheddar cheese?  The waiter, although vert friendly, was frequently unavailable and didnt really listen to our requests or forgot them.  The food was average.  The drinks too.  I dont think I will see this restaurant again.t 
My family and I have eaten at The Fieldston many times - I can't believe I never wrote a review for it before!  This restaurant is the place to go if you really care about quality ingredients prepared the best way possible.  They often have dinner specials that include multiple courses and a bottle of wine for an exceptional value.  
The atmosphere is upscale but not at all stuffy and the food is outstanding.   

If you haven't been to The Fieldston yet you are missing out on one of the best meals on the South Shore!
The Fieldston Restaurant is one of several top notch restaurants in the area.  If you are looking for something romatic and quaint this is the place.  Chef Perin is also the owner so you know the food is going to be excellent.  Get on their e-mail list because there are some great specials.  For example, Sunday nights, "We Empty Out the Refrigerators" all
entrees are usually $12.95.  The Salmon is fantastic.
While not quite the same as the classic TV pub, we felt so comfortable among the friendly staff and patrons that it made me think of Cheers!  This site has operated under various managers over the years, but there is finally a proven restaurant professional at the helm - the owner of "The Mug" in Marshfield center. We timed our visit for soon after The Point obtained their liquor license.  From our table upstairs near the bar, we enjoyed the view of the marina outside and the laughter and conversations of friends enjoying an adult beverage at the bar.  Our meals - my fried clam plate and my wife's baked haddock were as good as any we've had. They were generous portions which we polished off along with a craft beer and glass of wine, which left no room for dessert.  This establishment is here to please and generate a return clientele, and succeeded with us!
We had lunch there last week. The service was great , the menu offers lots to choose from and the food was very good.
We also enjoyed the view.
Went to the restaurant with family who were on their third visit and live in the area.   It is a casual atmosphere and family friendly.  Food was delicious and there are options for children.  Service was very friendly and helpful.  They now have a liquor license, some of the details still being worked out.  Looking forward to return visit.  The sunset was beautiful the night we went and definitely could be enjoyed on first or second floor.
The Point Restaurant was in the process of a "soft opening" when we visited. There was no bar service at the time and they were working on some finishing touches. We enjoyed the food; the staff was very friendly and upbeat. It appears to be a family operation with local restaurant experience. This is a nice spot to relax and watch the sunset. The marina is steps away. We look forward to dropping by soon to enjoy a more complete experience. The "finishing touches" should be all set. This may be a seasonal restaurant...not sure. The Town Pier location can seem isolated during the winter months. We shall see.. In the meantime, enjoy!
I am a seeker of decks with nice views and good food in the summer.  This place did not disappoint.  Our waiter was outstanding; just attentive, amusing and helpful enough without being overbearing. We had a lobster roll and calamari. Both were excellent. The calamari was not overdone. YUM. The lobster roll was very generous and a great deal at $20.  Even the fries were good.  I liked the visible sea salt on them.  The drinks were well made and not skimpy.  The deck is lovely and has nice views of the river and boats.  I find too often these types of spots have great views and poor service by summer college help.  Usually you just deal with it to have nice views, sunshine and summer breezes.  This place was great and offered good service too. We will be back...  
Recently hosted a perfect bridal shower thanks to Harbor Fire. Tables, linens, decorations, etc. all beautifully done. Food was great and service was amazing. Our servers even helped guests bring in gifts, then helped us load them in cars at the end. They also went above & beyond handling allergies. 
I was very skeptical about visiting this location after reading recent reviews... So satisfied we took the chance!  From the moment we sat down at the bar where Michelle attended to us immediately with a warm welcome, to being sat at  our requested outdoor table with Molly, we could not have been more satisfied with our overall experience at Harbor Fire!  Fun drink specials, loved the Key Lime Martini!  To start we had the Sriracha shrimp special, not too much batter, just enough kick, yum!  We had side salads, spinach and a Caesar (sad there we no anchovies available). I had raw oysters, fresh and bright, and seared tuna, very tasty.  My husband created his own dish which was the winning dish of the night... He ordered the Cajun Salmon dish and asked it be combined with the Shrimp Andouille less the linguine and added veg.....SO AMAZING!!!  Perfectly cooked and being a Louisiana girl I was impressed with how it was very flavorful but not overbearing, spot on Cajun seasoning.  Molly was warm, friendly, fun and attentive!  Nice location.  Really good date night ❤️
The atmosphere is nice, complemented by the live entertainment.  Service a little slow, but the waitress was very friendly and admitted it was her first week.  The food was decent.  I just can't get over the fact that on a limited dinner menu any restaurant would run out of not one but two seafood choices by 7:30 on a Saturday night.  Definitely did not meet expectations for the dinner I was looking for after a beautiful day at the beach.
First, let me say I really, really want to like this place - I am a neighbor, I can walk here, it's a great location, etc. It's good for the neighborhood when local businesses flourish. We went here tonight hoping that the service and food delivery issues had been resolved, as they had promised. Sadly, not so much; last summer's issues are marginally better, bot not fixed. This evening, we were puzzled that we had to wait 10-15 minutes for a table, when there were about a dozen free, including outside where we requested. Next, food took 50 - 55 minutes or so for a burger and fish tacos. Drink order was wrong. Burger was somewhat overdone. Had we not already waited close to an hour, I would have sent it back. It's too bad, as this could be a jewel of a place. It's on the water, great views, nice place for a drink, etc. but they can't seem to get the food and service right.
Dropped by to check out the establishment. Was met by an eye-rolling hyper-manic employee who had no interest in answering a few questions i had for a future event i wanted to hold there potentially. He turned his back to me at the end so i left. Believe his name was Mike or something similar. Never ever again.
Harbor Fire is a great, bright spot to meet for happy hour drinks and snacks.  We had draft beers, flavorful mixed drinks, and appetizers including delightful fish tacos, chicken nachos, and zingy barbecue shrimp.  We used to go here years ago when it was Compass Rose....but then it fell on sadder times as The Deck....but now with a new owner and bright interior and great food and friendly staff, it is definitely worth visiting.  We will have to try it for dinner soon.
My adult son, wife and I went to Harbor Fire for a Father's Day early evening dinner.  We were promptly seated at a nice outdoor table. Then we awaited for a server to take our drink order.  And waited. And waited. Other people were seated at other tables and their orders were taken.  I went to talk with the hostess that seated us and asked if a server was going to take our order.  She was clueless, but said she would get us a server.  After more time and no server had yet appeared, we decided to leave. On the way out she offered to have a manager speak with us but the damage had already been done.  This restaurant has had a lot of different owners and as a Marshfield resident I always wish the best for new owners of small businesses.  In this case, we feel abused as customers and will not return.
Let me say up front the staff is friendly and eager to please, but service is slow. We arrived on time for our reservations, but had to wait for a table to open up outside. Not a big deal, we were happy to sit at the bar and have a drink while we waited. The bartending staff seemed inexperienced, and although we were in no rush it was a little frustrating to wait quite a bit for my husband to receive his beer (which was on tap). The hostess was attentive and kept us informed of when our table would be ready. Our server also seemed inexperienced. We ordered the gumbo (excellent but room temperature) and clam chowder (tasty but also room temperature) as appetizers, which came out almost immediately. We waited almost 30 minutes for our entrees. I had the seared scallops over linguini, but the pasta was swimming in olive oil and not very tasty. My husband fared better with his fisherman combo plate. With Haddad's right down the street, I doubt we will be back.
I went to the Harbor Fire a couple of weeks ago with my sister and we had an awesome time! I am moving to Marshfield this summer and I cannot wait to frequent this place!  It was cozy, casual and fun!  The service was incredible, from the host to the server, we were offered genuine smiles and excellent service.  The food was fantastic. Truffle fries were yum and the flatbread pizza accompanied with a glass of wine was exactly what I was looking for! Can't wait to go back!
Awesome food and room for celebration. Guests raved about how delicious the food was. Staff were very attentive. Alen, the manager was great to work with. Thanks so much!
Harbor fire has such a great atmosphere and you can tell that the employees work very hard. The bartenders and waitstaff are constantly smiling and the food is always good. I can't wait to sit outside on the deck this summer with a delicious cocktail! 
The pros: lovely decor, lively bar crowd, a gorgeous deck (albeit overlooking the parking lot), nice (summertime) view and live music (a singer playing guitar) which is so nice and so rare around here.  

Not nearly enough "pros" to make up for the abysmal service (I mean really, really, really bad.  Like, worst.service.evvvverrrr.  Am I making myself clear here??).  PAINFULLY slow, clueless, borderline rude and disorganized.  We sat at the (crowded) bar where there were 3 "bartenders" working.  Each one was more useless than the next and from what I saw there wasn't one who could make a proper cocktail.  I can appreciate a generous pour, but the drinks were so strong and heavily-poured that they weren't even palatable.  Definitely somewhere you'll want to stick with beer or wine!  (Upside ... you will CERTAINLY get your money's worth on a glass of wine! Big, huge goblets poured to the tippy top.)  

The food was pedestrian and unimpressive.  We sampled 4 or 5 items and there wasn't one I would recommend.  Not inedible, but just blah and (pardon my snark) very "Applebees".  I saw that the party seated next to us sent back 2 of their 3 meals so I gather we weren't the only ones who were underwhelmed.

Initially I was thinking 1-star, but upon further reflection I just know I'll end up back there again to enjoy the atmosphere, bar crowd and entertaining musicians.  .... Those pros along with the killer glasses of wine are worth a bonus 2nd star, no?  

If you do go, bring patience, a designated driver and an already full stomach and you just might enjoy it.
Decided to try this new restaurant for lunch yesterday.  Friendly wait staff, but slow service.  We ordered the broiled oyster appetizer with a topping of parmesan.  The oysters were overdone (and room temp)... with the parmesan topping almost dried out enough to a become a hard parmesan crisp.  For entrees, the broiled cod dinner would have been nice, if not served  lukewarm...nothing like eating lukewarm mashed potatoes (ugh) as well as fish and green beans.  The spinach salad with shrimp passed muster - maybe because room temp is the way to go with a salad.  Anyway, nice atmosphere and may give it another go for a possible app, salad, and drinks on the outside deck in the warm weather.
Best fish tacos I've had in a long time.  The Cajun chicken sandwich was delicious.  We will be heading back again.  The waitress/ bartender had everything on time and checked in on us to make sure we had everything.
We have gone twice now. Both times, because of the band. The food was nothing special. My husband had fried seafood and I had baked cod. Both were dry. We had an attentive waitress. Prices were high for the value we received.
Thought we would give this another try . Thought that maybe things had improved since opening. Well, service is still bad and kitchen can not get it together. We have been here three times and each time every thing you order comes out on top of each other. Granted, our clam chowder( which you would think in a seafood restaurant would be hot and ready) did not spend enough time in the microwave and was stone cold! So, enters all came on top of return delivery of apps.... So now, you eat your entire cold! Come on people, talk to each other in the kitchen for God sake!
3 times and your out for me.... All done! When your # 33 out of local few restaurant , I guess something is up! Shame!

We had fish in mind when we decided to return to Harbor Fire Restaurant in the Green Harbor section of Marshfield, MA.   The staff was courteous and attentive.  We have become friendly with Alex who manages the dining room and is an all around restaurant dynamo.   We were served nice warm rolls with herb butter first.   Our choices were Broiled seafood casserole (cheese sauce on the side) and Cajun salmon.    As it turned out one of the meals was a broiled cod by mistake.   I was perfectly fine with that and in fact as I hadn't really noticed since I was only a couple of delicious bites in when our server came over to apologize.   We were happy and impressed with how they handled it.  First not only did our server offer to replace the meal, but Alex also came over to make sure that I wasn't upset.   (I really wasn't - the broiled cod was outstanding).  Five minutes later the chef sent out the seafood casserole I had originally ordered and even came out to make sure we liked it.   We did like everything and thought the food was exceptionally fresh and well prepared.   

A mistake can happen anywhere, and the way they handled it was great...we will surely return soon.  The four star rating has more to do with the building and location than the service, food or value.  The parking is chaotic with all the dry docked boats, the bathrooms, although renovated, are tight with a weird (fish dock) smell, and the entry stairs don't make for a smooth welcoming feel.
As someone who lives nearby, I was excited to see the place was being renovated...Now I'm sadder to see what a terrible joint it has become. Apparently the owners own another place in Boston and they spend all their time there..
We took some out of town company there and left embarrassed... The food was awful, music too loud and there was no atmosphere... While we were sitting on the side without the bar, a customer on the bar side, got ahold of the microphone, jumped up on the bar and started singing "Mac the Knife"... I suggest the owners get down here and turn things around or they'll be another failed business in what could be a GREAT location!
Waited 10 minutes before a waitress came and took our drink order. I waited 5 minutes 
then ate my whole meal before my boyfriend even got his food. The waitress never came back to say anything and when his food finally came it was 25 minutes after i had finished eating! Ended up getting his burger to go because we had to be somewhere and we also didn't get a discount for anything which i thought was unprofessional. 
When I visit thus place, it's typically on a Sunday morning...terrific doughnuts and pastries! Satisfying coffee and so much more. The staff is always friendly and upbeat. It's a nice escape for this area of the community. If it was a little closer to home, I would be visiting more often... Enjoy!
Delicious donuts!!!! Worth the wait and the trip. The donut variety is huge and the staff very friendly.   It was hard to pick   

Morning is now complete without a visit to Marshfield's best coffee shop.  Amazing donuts and muffins, plus a wide assortment of coffee drinks, including fun iced coffee flavors like peanut butter, banana, Twix, etc.  Definitely worth a visit!
I hate to divulge that they make terrific doughnuts because then it will only make the line longer.  You have to get there by 800-830am on the weekends....
Local go-to for to-go doughnuts that are superior to the industrially consistent offerings at DD. Coffee is hot, but not very good. They're open early too.
On weekends and in the summer the wait is out the front door, but behold it is worth every mouth-watering bite.  And the coffee is brewed to perfection.
Still very popular but prices have gone up and owners seem mixed up....not the business it once was.  Coffee is okay and donuts a good overall but attention to detail is forgotten.
Breakfast donuts to go.....a few small tables but that's it.
Had dinner with friends.  Food was excellent.  Service grea.  The overall ambiance was very warm and comfortable.  I would definately go back again.  
This was my first visit here and I absolutely loved my coffee!! I usually only go to Marylou's but I figured I'd try something new. I got the almond joy coffee and it was way better than the Marylou's almond joy. The service was wonderful and the 2 women there were extremely nice and helpful! When I told them it was my first time they insisted on giving me a free doughnut it was also delicious!! If you like coffee and doughnuts definitely give this place a try!! 
Great coffee and the best donuts around😍 Great service. Easy in and out. Breakfast sandwiches are really great
I strongly recommend the chocolate coconut doughnut... But get there late (because I arrive early and don't want you taking my doughnut)
These filled doughnuts are the best around. Dunkin' must be putting something in their coffee to get the lines. This is the best place for take out coffee and sweets in marshfield
Okay, forget the tasteless factory made chain donuts and stop here.  You won't be sorry. Their signature Glazed Jelly donuts are fat and heavy with lovely raspberry jelly! HUGE Coconut jelly crullers. Fabulous muffins, Cinnamon rolls,etc.  All of their donuts are HAND MADE. All glazes are mixed there. I even stop by later in the afternoon and buy a sweet treat for my husband's dessert. They have another location in Pembroke. If you're looking for REAL donuts, you'll find them here!
A great donut shop for those who want an alternative to Dunkin Donuts. If you get there early you might be lucky enough to get a vanilla cream-filled donut! There's also a new location in Pembroke across from the omelett factory.

Chris
Some of the best Chinese food on the south shore . Food is always good. Always served hot. The staff is awesome.
 Very nice people. If there is a knock on the place. The front of the building could use some cleaning and updating.  Food is always good so I will continue to go
Had dinner with family every dish ordered was cooked and presented beautifully. A friendly family place to sit, enjoy good food and leave satisfied.  
We had never been to this restaurant and wanted to try take-out.  They had a nice option to order online and that's what we did (sight unseen).  What a mistake.  We pull up and it looks like the basement of a house.  There's a dine-in area with a couple of filled tables.  The dining table beside the door had an Asian man asleep on the table (dressed like he worked there).  Wow.  So we take the food home and the Pad Thai is old and sticky with little taste.  The pork fried rice was tasteless.  The Szechuan Beef was just ok - the beef seemed really way too soft and had no texture.  The crab rangoon tasted almost good except stale.  Hot and sour soup was tasteless.  Total disappointment all the way around.
Extremely fresh oriental meals with NO MSG,  Kong makes delicious seaweed rolls, Ping always greets U with a great big smile.  Open late at nite.
Kong is the owner and Sushi chef, works the Sushi bar greeting all his clients and serving them the best Sushi on the South Shore, his restaurant could be considered his living room at this tiny petite family local hole in the wall restaurant. Located in Green Harbor section of Marshfield in what looks like a neighborhood home, the treasure chest Asian gastro-licious flavor profiles of Japanese and Chinese tastes will knock your socks off!  Bring an appetite for Sushi and Chinese, prepare to leave full with a desire to eat more than you can chew.  Some do's... Dragon&Phoenix, Crispy Beef, Sesame Chicken, Sunny Bomb, Sexy Lady and Golden roll will please any middle of the road Sushi lover, there are a few tables to groups of 8-10 people and Kong will bring out the Sushi Boat for you guys!  The crispy beef is best on the South Shore, stick to the Chef's Specials, Hot and Sour soup is packed with liquid heat and will kill any cold.  The decor is 'low brow' but that's the charm.. I like to find the jewels and this is a hidden one that you shouldn't miss if you are in the area. Lots of love in the food and Kong's team making you feel welcome in his home. Unlike other places, the pricing is fare, quality is high ... Enjoy!
We eat here often, mostly because the atmosphere is easy on a Firday night, the quality is excellent, and the service is excellent. The ambience is, well, you get what you pay for... but Ping & Kong have been here a long time, and they have a terribly romantic story to tell. There's a reason that Mandarin & Tokyo is a local fixture.
This little gem has hands down the best chinese food on the south shore.  Everything on the menu is great, and they have good sushi.  A couple of gluten free items on the menu as well.  I love this place and everytime I come here whatever I order is delicious.
This is a small restaurant with an extremely extensive menu of Chinese and Japanese dishes. We have only ordered from the Chinese side, both dine-in and delivery. Service (in-house and delivery) is fast and friendly. Everything we have ordered has been outstanding: pineapple fried rice (light, delicate, with copious chicken and shrimp), hot and sour soup (probably the best we've ever had), chicken on sticks (satay), Szechuan dishes, beef with green beans and garlic sauce, and a number of other delicious main courses. There is a wide variety of vegetarian and steamed options as well. Servings are abundant! Delicious every time!
They have the best Chinese and Sushi in Marshfield.  The food is fresh the specials have pleanty of food.  The owners are very hospitable.  The atmosphere is cosy and the food is delicious!   I can not say enough wonderful things about this restaurant!  My family favorites are the beef and broccoli, general Gau's chicken and the Crab Rangoon!!!
Love Mandarin & Tokyo. Nowhere else compares. Pickup. delivery or eat in always perfect service.
We have ordered many different items, all have been perfect, sometimes I will ask for a suggestion and it will be exactly what I am looking for. If I need additional sauce or anything, they are always more than helpful.
Great food, people and place!
After being disappointed by some old favorites, I tried M&T after recommendations by a few locals. I was thrilled with the result! The food is delicious! Crab rangoons made as they should be, awesome boneless spare ribs, and flavorful (but not sloppy) lo mein just the way I love it! The various entrees are excellent. I have ordered from there a few times now, and the food has consistently been great, with the service and delivery prompt and friendly. Thus far, I have only used it for take out or delivery. I highly recommend them!
Spent the day at the beach getting pounded by waves and dodging seaweed. Just wanted to eat something quick and tasty so the family decided they wanted Chinese. Eat in? Or take out?   We decided to eat in to save washing dishes. The kids loved the food.  We loved the sushi.  It's small, clean, not expensive, and hit the spot. We pigged out and rolled on home. Happy happy.
A family owned establishment set in a house type buildiing, serving Chinese, Thai and Japanese food, including fresh Sushi and Sashimi. Akin to a small Japanese restaurant type found in crowded Tokyo for the working class! EXCELLENT Food, terrific value and family owned and operated! It doesn't get much better!
Their luncheon specials are varied, flavorful, and filling. Best Chinese food around and so reasonable for lunch or dinner. If you eat in the service is friendly and quick. Don't hesitate to try this place. We order from here numerous times a month. 
We have teenagers and when our 4th of July plans got rained out, we were looking for something new to do.  We drove up from Plymouth having made reservations and they were all ready for us.  We were pleased to see the restaurant was completely full - many others must have had the same idea this day of torrential downpour!  Lunch is served until 3:30pm and there were numerous choices.  All of us were able to choose our own entree, white or fried rice, crab ragoon and chicken wings.  A party of six ate for $60 which included an appetizer.  The meals were very fresh and wonderfully seasoned, the vegetables delicious.  I highly recommend this restaurant.
We have been going to Mandarin & Tokyo since they opened and have always had great meals. Besides the sushi, the salt and pepper shrimp is yummy. Kong and Ping work hard for their customers and if you spend enough time there, you feel like family. Even when I call in orders for pick-up, they know who I am just from the order. We've had more adventurous sushi other places, but it is also more expensive. All in all, Mandarin and Tokyo is our go-to for fresh and delicious sushi close to home.
I am a regular sushi customer. The sushi is always fresh and delicious and very reasonably priced.

The Chinese food is always good as well and they deliver.
Mandarin & Tokyo was once a very good restaurant but now I'm not sure what has happened.  Food is overall not good, the place is not clean and service was 
not friendly.  I will not be going back.
I will premise this review by saying we ordered our take out on Christmas Eve, one of the busiest times for a Chinese restaurant so that may have been part of the problem.  Quite simply it was the worst Chinese food my wife and I have had in a long time.  Neither of our meals were the least bit appealing.  My "Mongolian Trio" was mass of onions and scallions with TINY pieces of chicken, bits of beef and two shrimp in a spicy brown mess of a sauce.  My wife had Kung  Pao shrimp that was bland and tasteless.  Her crispy noodles were stale and tasted like they came out of a box.  Supposedly  Joe Perry and Steve Tyler have both eaten their food over the years as they both live in the area.  Having tried their food for the first time I have to believe this 
Is a lie.

We loved Mandarin and Tokyo especially after being disappointed by another local eatery.  We were met with
a smiling staff and the food was delicious.  The atmosphere is casual and simple - great for families.
I stopped by today for a take home lunch. My wife told me she had been hearing really great reviews from her friends about their lunches. I've driven by here numerous times and never associated homemade soups and luncheon items with the name Acorn Canning Co. I ordered the beef stew made with prime rib and it was incredible. Plenty of fresh vegetables, a substantially flavored stock with an abundance of beef.  It also came with 2 slices of the freshest baked white bread made from scratch that I've had since my grandmother baked it for me on our farm in Ireland in 1961.  If these folks haven't received an award for this stew and bread it is long overdue. I'm now looking forward to my next opportunity to visit and try other menu board items, which I've been told change daily. Don't be caught off guard by the name.  They still do canning but the menu board for lunch while small speaks of nothing but quality and pride. The stew was 5 star and I have every expectation that my next sampling will be no less. 
We booked in here for the second Llantwit 10K race. We're extremely pleased with the facilities and the pitches were of an excellent standard. Only disappointment is that there is no fridge facilities even though the owner Neil put our stuff in his fridges in the local office. Highly recommended for families and also it's pet friendly
My wife and I stopped by for lunch, The young lady at the counter was awesome, lunch was great and their apple pie is to die for and I bought the whole pie.😃
Yummy fresh pies, daily delicious specials,  local farm fresh ingredients.   Always something special cooking.unfortunately no more jams & jellies.  
You won't be disappointed here if you drop in for soup or a sandwich or pie - or all three! Menu changes daily and everything I've tried has be delicious!
Hidden gem for pies, homemade soups, stews, and jarred fruits. Loved their beef stew, apple pie, and peach pie! Fresh, warm from the oven, DELISH! Get there early as she sells out by end of day. I have now found my holiday pie place. Like them on Facebook to find out the offerings for the day. And, all the locals know, there are great eats here at the lunch hour. THE BEST PIES!!
Best and biggest lobster rolls in the area.
The fried haddock is also the best I have ever had.
Nice little stand in a New England setting.
The food is really good and portions are more than enough. Yes it is pricey but considering the size and freshness it is worth it. My issue is with calling in an order. Some days you can, some days you can't. There is no set pattern. It happened last summer and continued this year. They just wouldn't answer the phone or it would just ring busy. This weekend they finally had a recorded message indicating what they were out of and that they were not taking phone orders. Placing the order right there was easy and the food was very fast in coming out. Again, lots of it and tasty.
it looks like a shack but it can fool you! the food is great! get there early because they will run out of lobster rolls, which are delicious! Whole belly clams are greats too! Just awesome fried seafood.
Green Harbor Lobster Pound has a take out window for ordering or call ahead.  Very informal...as they say - no shirt, no shoes, no problem! They seem to get timed orders exactly on time.  
 Some diners sit at the picnic tables along the Beach Street Bridge, but many just take it home.    
We typically get fried haddock or scallops and they have been delicious.  A small haddock has about 3 good sized fillets.    The lobster roll is a full pound of meat...easily enough for two people.   Keep that in mind when you hear the price - $26!  The meat was perfectly steamed and the roll itself was large and nicely toasted.   They also have fries and chicken fingers for the kids.
Thought it was a bit pricey - but I've paid $25 for lobster rolls before and none compared to this one.  Lobster was fresh and the roll was packed with lobster - light mayo - so all you taste is lobster.  I would definitely recommend this place and will come here again!
The colossal lobster roll is always a must! The service is fast and friendly and is a cool place to grab a little picnic style lunch !

After a day at Duxbury beach with friends we wanted to eat seafood for dinner.  Only a 4 minute ride from Duxbury Beach we found the perfect casual seafood spot!  Not fancy, but fabulous food!  We had lobster rolls, fried onion rings, and sweet potato fries.  The lobster roll was $25 but was big enough for 2 to share.  Each lobster roll has the meat of 2 1/2 lobsters we were told.  The onion rings were home made and just right, not too heavy or greasy.  I highly recommend to anyone looking for great takeout or eat outside on picnic tables.
We went here twice during our week-long vacation in Marshfield. The seafood is as fresh as it can possibly be, and the staff is friendly and helpful. if you choose to eat there you will eat at picnic tables by a salt water inlet off of Green Harbor. If it's low tide, you'll get the smell of it while you're eating. But if you're an old salt, that shouldn't matter! Put on the bug spray in the evening too to stave off the mosquitoes.
We ordered fried whole body clams, scallops, onion rings and the clam chowder. Portions were huge. medium clams could feed 3 normal eaters, scallops were sweet and were cut in half or quarters before breading and frying-we ordered a medium, plenty for two to share. We ordered a small onion rings again large enough for 2 or 3 to share. They only take cash or checks and are on the more expensive end-but TOTALLY worth it!  Hope to try the lobster rolls soon!
The FRESHES scallops on the south shore.  Siting by the river and watching excited young people decide whether to jump off bridge into river,  very picturesque area especially at twilight.
We preordered fresh lobster (no rolls needed) and had a sunset picnic with cold  lobster salad and white wine!  Perfect Sunday evening sunset dinner. It's pricey so it's a rare treat. It is however, the best lobster roll (with or without bun) you will ever have!
I have been going to the beach in the area for over 30 years, but just learned about this summer seafood place a few years ago. I never would have known about this place if someone dining next to me at another local restaurant had not told me about it. I was at this seafood shack two nights in a row this past weekend. This restaurant often runs out of food, so if you don't want to be disappointed I would suggest going in the middle of the day or late afternoon. On Saturday night I had the lobster roll. I am sure some people like theirs loaded with mayonnaise, but I was happy that there was barely any mayonnaise in the lobster roll, so I could easily savor the fresh lobster meat. I often don't eat the whole roll, but it was so nicely grilled I ate the whole thing. We ordered a side of the wonderful sweet potato fries. Since Sunday was another beautiful beach day I told my friends that we needed to get to the restaurant early before they run out of things. One in our group had the lobster roll and it was so big that she brought half of it home to eat another day. My friend and I decided to split the medium clams. This was the second time this season that I have had clams. These were small sweet firm belly clams, not big mushy bellies like I had earlier in the season. The clams are lightly battered and are not greasy at all. This was one of my friend's first times there and she thought the clams were really good and she is fussy for she has been clamming for years and frying her own clams. The restaurant also offers fried shrimp and fried scallops. For the non fish lover there are chicken tenders. I will definitely be returning to this restaurant a few more times this season. Yes, lobster and clam prices are up this season, but if you want good seafood you must be willing to pay for it. The lobster roll was pricey at $24.99, but well worth it. Lobster prices perhaps will go down sometime this season. This place is either take away or sitting on picnic tables outside. There is no indoor seating.
Lots of rave reviews here for the lobster roll but few mention that it is, perhaps, the biggest lobster roll I've ever been served. You could not begin to pick it up and eat it with out a fork - and the roll, properly grilled, must be custom made to accomodate the quantity of fresh, unadulterated lobster.
Could be the best I've had in all of New England!
This place was amazing. Best lobster roll I have ever eaten. Not too much mayo, delicious brioche bun, and overflowing with delicious lobster!  The staff is very friendly and even though I was traveling solo I found others to lunch with at the picnic tables in back. If you are in the area, make sure to plan a meal here!
I and my family have been eating here for longer than the new owner has been alive. This has been a staple for the people of Marshfield for over 50 years. LOVE LOVE LOVE it. SO glad they have kept the tradition alive.
The LB has the best lobster roll ever. It's huge and delicious. It's pricey but worth it. I've been going there for 30 years and never disappointed. But get there early! They sell out fast. Think lobster roll for breakfast. 
Their clams and lobster are also good for steaming at home.
Old fashioned summer day of kids jumping off the small bridge...Right next door is a hidden gem. You will enjoy the lobster roll, clam plates and a cold drink. Small boats pull up in the inlet depending on the tide. You will enjoy.
Great new England beach fair. Best lobster roll around. The staff are also fast and friendly. We stop several times a season.
Good food.  No frills.  Not very crowded.  If you want seafood and you don't mind sitting on picnic tables the ambiance is nice.  Right by the water (not the beach water but close)
Although it's a little pricey you won't get fresher, better seafood anywhere. The lobster roll has at least two lobsters in it. The fried clams are delicious. So if you're going to eat fried at least eat fresh! A shame that their only open in the summer. 

Was with a large family group with children. Many different orders. The food was good and considering the large party it came out fairly soon. Our waitress was terrible. She never checked on us once or sought to see if anything was needed. Food was good and reasonable but the service was poor.
The pasta special was under $11 dollars that included bread, salad, meatballs and ice cream.  It was good but not great.  The price was great.
It's really tough to find good pizza in this area. This pizza is good but if your spoiled by living in other areas your not going to fall in love. Ask for a thin well done crust and that does make it better.mthe meatballs are good.
Can't be beat for good Italian/American food. Quality here and at their other locations is very good and very consistent.
Terrible service!!
Our waitress Olive stopped by and then we didn't see her for nearly the entire lunch.
My sister went to see if she could get more water and saw the waitress chatting with someone else so she didn't even ask.  We settled up and that was that.
We love the other locations, especially Kingston, but this left us feeling as if we might want to go with something else from now on.
I live around the corner, so it's an easy place for me to go to. Food is good, portion are large, great service.  Theme nights, kareoke, trivia, ect.
Mamma Mia's has great tasting pizza and excellent dishes. Prices are fear. If you have a party between 6 & 8 call ahead and ask to reserve the VIP room. Semi private great room for a family get together.
The restaurant is good, service is good, and the food is average and consistent. Their prices are reasonable. I've been here twice and would recommend it, though it's nothing special.
Probably the best pizza in town. Better than Venus II.  Friends also ordered the veal parm.  It was huge.  Very large bar with many TVs.  And Keno, of course.  Friendly staff. 
We were in Marshfield rental in June with a big group. We tried take-out from this pizza place two times and I would rate the food VERY good. Nice mix of Italian/Greek stye with Portuguese sausage. The house special was the best. 
Huge portions , excellent food ! There specials are a great value !! I always sit at the bar to order & the bar tenders are always so attentive .
This property had been three other restaurants over the past 15 years. The best thing Mamma Mia's did was to turn one dining room into a large bar with many bar seats, four large TVs and high top tables around the edges of the room. My wife and I have been here several times over the past few months. Everyone looks like they are having a good time. We see people we know. The Italian food could be better. I'm not sure what is missing. Always choose the homemade noodles as your pasta. They always have specials and the prices are very reasonable. Do not come here for the food. Come here because it is a fun night out.
When you are looking for something for everyone- Mamma Mia's is the spot!  Great home cooked Italian food and in a friendly comfortable atmosphere- perfect for families or a date at the bar even business.  The main area can be utilized for special events. Good all the way around and ample portions.  If you are traveling in the area give it a try for local flavor.  Try the other locations too, but this one by far has the best atmosphere!
Sorry to say our experiences have not been consistent and dinner was disappointing.
The service is good but dinner and pizza not very good to the point we're not going back.
This Italian restaurant has great food. Service is great for large parties or for two. The lasagna and meatball sub are great along with their pizza. Large menu to select from. This place in Green Harbor is always packed. Busy take out area. We have used them for many occasions from 2 to 25. No complaints from anyone. Enjoy!!!
A locally owned restaurant chain with very reasonably priced superb Italian cuisine! Thin crust pizza with delicious sauce and cheeses; How about Scallop & Bacon Pizza(?) my family's favorite! Absolutely the BEST ANTIPASTO I have ever had, anywhere! Their homemade House Italian dressing is without a doubt my favorite Italian dressing laced with fresh garlic and herbs.....! The Parmesan dishes to  any of their entrees will not disappoint you  and when you get the bill, you'll be smiling!!! If you're in the area of one of their locations (Green Harbor-Carver-Kingston-Plymouth Harbor) and your in the mood for family Italian food this is the place to go!
And I love the baked ziti.  Nice little local hang out. They have trivia & Keno, nice wait staff & bartenders. 3 and a half stars.
I've eaten there a few times and have never been disappointed.  It's a really nice restaurant with great prices.
Met up with family for dinner. Seems a popular place for a Tuesday evening,  and glad we had made reservations.  While very typical red sauce Italian,  everyone enjoyed their meal.  Caprese salad was huge and fresh. Another diner enjoyed the stuffed peppers,  and there was a clean plate for the eggplant parmesan too. The food was fresh and plentiful.  Decor was new and clean. Only drawback was the selection of music; a retro selection of theme songs. Sorta a la "Name That Tune". Could be fun after a few glasses of wine. ..
Once again, Mamma Mia's comes through with really fantastic Italian food. I had Lasagna, my wife had  Vegetable Parm, and my mom had Egg Plant Parm. We all gave each meal an A+. And my mom is Italian, was born in North End and serves some  of the best home cooked Italian food Ive ever had. So when she craves affordable, delicious restaurant food..that says something.  The Lasagna I had is almost as good as moms...comparable to Lasagna I've paid much more for at other boston area restaurants.
The restaurant itself is surprisingly private and comfortable. For the very reasonable price, it's a fantastic choice. In a competitive restaurant marketplace...it's always busy. That tells you something.
Went here for lunch with some family and we were pleased by the selection on the menu.  They serve breakfast all day!  Two of us had sandwiches and 1 had breakfast.  I had the tuna melt club and the tuna was very fresh.  I was very pleased with the sandwich.  When I ordered I asked the waitress if the sandwich comes with a pickle, she said yes, my mom said oh good she loves pickles.  We were all very happy with our food.  The onion rings were hot and crunchy when served but stayed crunchy, probably the best onion rings I have had in a while. As we were eating the very nice waitress asked us if everything was okay and it was, and I told her the pickle was delicious, and she returned with another one for me.  I was really impressed by her level of service to us.  Fast, Friendly and very Fresh Food.  On our way out they gave us sample slices from their cakes and those were really good.  It was a perfect treat to end the meal.  If I need a cake I will be back, but most likely I will be back for another sandwich and pickle before that.
We have been here two times so far, the breakfast is very yummy and more than you can eat actually. Coffee refilled. Nice place. We like it.
When I need to leave my office in the workday and I am driving through Wesborough, I make an effort to stop here for takeout. The sandwiches are simply divine and are a great price. My favorites are the Pharaoh’s Turkey and the Garden Melt. The sandwiches here are favorable beyond what one normally finds and sits at the top of my sandwich preferences. If you are driving through Westborough, make sure you stop here, you won't regret it.
I walked into this cute little bakery getting so excited because of how adorable it was!! I ordered a banana frosted cupcake that was absolutely adorable and a coffee. I don't remember what my boyfriend ordered besides it being a lemon pastry. The coffee was delicious, some of the best coffee I have ever had! The banana cupcake however had a strong banana taste, with a mix of butter, not a good combination. My boyfriend really liked his pastry, so if you are ever in the area when it is open, stop in for the adorable shop and have a coffee!
We went there on a Sunday morning for breakfast.  Had to wait to be seated - no one paid any attention for about 10 minutes and the place was fairly empty.  Finally seated at a table that hadn't been cleaned from the previous patrons. It took another 10 minutes for a waitress to bring our coffee and and menus.  Another wait to place our order.  Placed order and then had to wait 30 minutes and still no order.  In the meantime the owners wife was seated  after us and received her order within 10 minutes. Finally asked the waitress  where our order was and she proceeded to bring only my order and not my wife's.  My order was cold, overcooked and partially burned and missing the toast.  Were  told my wife's order would be ready in 5 minutes - it was the same as my order!  We cancelled her order asked of the check and left .  General comments - service is terrible, food is unappetizing and the establishment is unclean. Would never go there again.
Love Bistro b/c they serve breakfast sandwiches all day - Brunch is also delicious - they have an omelet station!
Nice spot to meet someone as there's some good space for sitting and talking.  Food is basic but fine enough... good for fast food.  Sandwiches, soups, salads, pastries.  Finally had one of those sticky buns I've been looking at for years.  Was very good!!

Friendly, efficient service.
Panera is walking distance to me so a great place to go with a group for a meeting or if you want a quick breakfast. If you are a member of their rewards club they send you coupons for stuff like free pastry on your birthday. Their menu selection is healthy and you can order online to pickup when you get there. The employees have always been friendly. Would definitely recommend this location.
Visited many times over a period of 3 weeks and everything always good. Friendly efficient service, premises always clean and excellent quality food.
Panera have got it right here and all of the their other restaurants that I have frequented.
We (2 adults and 1 three year old) had lunch on a Friday.  There was little wait to order and ample seating available.  This restaurant is located in a large area with shops and restaurants.  It looks fairly new and not all the retail spaces are taken.  There is plenty of free parking.  The menu is the standard Panera menu...with everything from a bagel to a salad or sandwich.  The three year old loved the Mac and cheese and the yogurt that came with it.  I had a turkey sandwich from the kid's menu.  It was made to order and a sufficient lunch.  The other adult opted for a bagel and cream cheese.  We were all happy with our food.  Prices were fair for our choices.  The only negative was that the tables were cleared (by the previous customers) but not wiped.  This is true of most Paneras.  They need to find a way to provide clean tables for their customers.
Excellent food, pleasant staff. Service is pretty fast. Location is very convenient, right in the downtown area.
I go to Panera Bread in Westborough a few times every week for a fresh salad for my wife and myself, or a sandwich and a mango smoothie after golf. The staff treat me like family customize my orders for variety without any fuss.
Better than the typical fast food joints.  My son loves the mac and cheese here so it's an easy quick bite after he plays ball or swims at the health club in the mall.  Easy parking, fast, decent sized dining room.  A little pricey for what it is.
The sandwiches are tasty but they are very stingy on the amount of meat.  They need to double the meat just to meet (no pun intended) common expectations.  If you are very hungry you will be disappointed.
This sandwich shop always gets get reviews (local papers) but I found the bread much to soft and chewy. It overwhelmed the contents of the sandwich.
If you aren't sure if you should get the Regatta sandwich, just do it, you won't be disappointed... Big appetite, and think you should get 2, nope, you don't need to.  Small appetite and afraid it will be too much, nope... share it or save it for tomorrow, it's THAT good.
Popular lunch-time choice. BIG subs. Reasonable prices. Brusque service. Easy parking. Quick takeout choice. 
I ordered a hummus & taboule pita.  The taboule was overwhelming; the hummus was squashed all in the bottom.  The pita was nice, however, and I didn't have to wait long for my order.  Note -  Be ready when you walk in to order because there is not much patience or politeness behind the register!
Let's be clear here, there's only one reason to put up with this place, and only one reason they get 4 stars, and that's their signature Regatta sandwich. Essentially their version of an Italian on a very good, large, bread roll, all for pennies. The other sandwiches are not bad, but nothing special. For the pleasure of paying so little for such a filling, tasty, sandwich, you deal with what can be a long wait, out of order food preparation, and an owner that would be a better poker player (is she happy? is she mad? is she friendly? is she mean?).

If this sandwich doesn't appeal to you, then consider this a 1 star review.
Great place to pick up a sandwich or quick italian specialty. The Regatta is their italian sandwich on a roundish roll -- loaded with meats, cheese, etc. They have them pre-made because they sell so fast at lunch - but if you want a something added or deleted they will do that with a smile. The veal parm sub is also excellent. They have another location on Quinsigamond Ave in Worcester that is also great.
The Regatta sandwich is awesome - so huge & less than $5.  Why get anything else?!  Used to work nearby and we'd send someone to get Regattas for everyone for lunch multiple times a  week!  So yummy.  Other than that, the shop itself is nothing special and the service isn't very friendly... but who cares?  Wish they were open longer hours (through dinner at least).
Enough said. Like my "regatta" with mayo. Bread can be a bit tough by end of day but the Italian Sandwiches are steal at around $5.00. Nice side dishes ready to take home. If youre from Worcester you know (or should know) this one...
This place has been serving wood fired personal sized pizzas for a little over 2 months.  I've passed by a number of times and finally stopped today.  They only sell pizzas that are about 10" in diameter, no slices.  Designed to be eaten by 1 person.

The pizza has a very thin crust... the edges get slightly burnt.  I ordered a basic cheese pizza... $8 + tax.  I liked the pizza and like the laid back, outdoor, food truck feel.  The people are very friendly.  I had no problem but then got busy so people had to wait as I don't think they can put a lot of pizzas in the oven at once... but they do cook quickly.  A little pricey, on the edge of being too expensive.

Fun for a change when the weather is good.
This was one of a few restaurants open on Sunday evening and so we took a chance, but were glad we did.  It's a very relaxed atmosphere, with large booths and tables for larger groups.  The menu had a good selection of burgers and sandwiches as well as main dishes.  Our server was wonderful--friendly and just the right amount of attention.  I would recommend it for casual suppers, with or without kids!
We stopped at Ted's for the first time.  We ordered the homemade potato chips and they were a little soggy on the bottom of the bowl but otherwise good.  The steak tip salad was very good as well as the grilled chicken sandwich.  My husband had the roast turkey dinner and it was alright.  I would stick with the steak or the burgers.
Buffalo steak is the lead item. The quality is good and the décor is fun. the only downside is that it is a bit pricey.
Dropped in for dinner with some colleagues and sat outside on the patio. Very good & friendly service. Fabulous menu especially burgers with bison meat. Wasn't very hungry and opted for the salt & pepper trout. Found it a tad over-cooked but was still pretty good. Will drop in again for sure to try the burgers.
Got a sitter and wasted our date night at Teds.   Our waiter could've cared less about anything except his pals in the kitchen.  We ordered drinks and waited, came out wrong and waited some more.  The crazy thing was we could hear him in the back flirting and messing around with the kitchen staff.  Another server brought our meals and nearing the end of dinner he brought the right drink, I told him I was all set and he left it on our table - I never touched it and had to tell him to take it off the check.  We won't make the same mistake again, plenty of good spots in the area to return for ok food and below average service.
We went for midweek lunch. Waiter was cordial and chatty. Food was tasty and fresh with ample portions. We had three take away boxes for 4 adults.  Location off beaten path. I can see how this would be popular place.
Beef or Bison? Ted's has the BEST burgers in town! Great choices and never a disappointment. French fries, sweet potato fries and onion rings are always good. 

Other choices on menu as well but I always stick with a burger, can't be beat!
It's big very nice settings and clean the staff is really nice and I love the salads they are very yummy and my girls like their meat dishes
I had a very mixed experience at this restaurant. We visited on a Saturday night so it was obviously very busy, after a 15 minute wait we were sat down. We had a fantastic waiter, friendly, funny and went out his way. Due to the busyness there was a long wait but the waiter made up for it by pushing through our orders quicker and providing appetizers. The food was good, nothing special. The drinks were great, overall I would say it was a little bit expensive for what it was.

Sadly the night was spoiled at the end. I left my Sun Glasses on the table for less than 5 minutes, I went back to the restaurant and they had gone. When I spoke to the front desk they said that no one had picked them up, the person I spoke too vanished never to be seen again and there was no offer to look at the CCTV. I don't like to accuse anyone as i'll never know the full picture but, the signs didn't look great.
We were looking for bison....burgers or steaks.  We discovered Ted's Montana Grill by searching online.   We (2 adults) went for dinner around 6:00 on a Monday night.  This restaurant is located in a large area of shops and restaurants.  The area and buildings look fairly new.  Not all of the retail spaces are occupied as yet.  There was plenty of free parking.  There were was no wait to be seated.  The seating area included booths on the side and many open floor tables.  It was nicely decorated...it had a calm, relaxed feel to it.  The lighting seemed just right...enough light to see the menu and the food without being glaring.  There was a separate but adjoining large bar area with additional seating.  We sat at one of the tables in the dining area.  Half sour pickle slices were brought to the table.  Our waitress, Kyla, was very helpful in answering questions and offering suggestions.  We ordered the bison rib eye steaks to be cooked medium.  We also asked that they be grilled without any fats or oils or seasonings.  We had sweet potatoes (plain) and either steamed broccoli or steamed asparagus (also plain).  Our food arrived, in a very short time, just as ordered.  Everything was cooked to perfection!  The manager, Brad, stopped by our table.  While chatting with him about our great meal and excellent service, we discovered that we could purchase bison meat to take home.  We bought some bison burgers to grill at home.  Even though this restaurant is about 35 minutes from our home, we plan to return...especially for the bison.
Took family to this "restaurant" for impromptu graduation party. Waited 1 1/2 hours after seating for hamburgers that were soggy and not edible. Actually looked like garbage that they scraped from others plates. Left physically ill after two bites. Health department was notified. If you care for your digestive health avoid this rat hole.
The food is good, it used to be CRAZY good, now, it's ok.  It used to be a place we had to go, now if there isn't anything better we'll go.  Don't get me wrong, the food is fine, the wait staff is fine... but if I'm going out and spending money to eat out, I really would like more than 'fine'.  You can't get Bison just anywhere, so that's a plus, but they lack that certain excitement... BUT, for a burger place (yes, yes, with some other stuff too), and you want to pay a little more, it's fine.
Lots of different styles of burgers, all off then pretty good. Good selection of beer. If you're after beer and a burger you can't really go wrong here. 
I've been to other Ted's locations that have been great. Something is up with this location, maybe management. First off, we called to see how busy they were, and no one answered. First flag. We decided to go anyway, and the greet staff seemed very disorganized. We chose to sit at the bar, seating was faster. Menu sounded great, so we ordered and it was one of those cases where it sounds great but when the food comes it is some old bland boring food, cooked with mediocrity. Bison burger was $17, so I expected a top notch burger. Not so at all; the meat was good, but it had no crust, and almost had a steamed consistency and flavor. Not. Also had a salad that was written up well, and for $13 with chicken you'd expect something good. Alas, a pile of iceberg, some goodies, and bland chicken. Next to us the lady had to return a salmon filet twice for being under cooked. Strike out. Maybe they will make some staff changes and bring this location up to snuff.
We went for the burgers, and weren't disappointed!  Service was great, didn't have RSVP, but were able to be seated on a Saturday afternoon quickly.  The food was delicious, great fries also.
Met some friends and we all had bison burgers. Came with french fries and or onion rings. Except for one, all the burgers came out as ordered. The service was perfect, refills on the table before we even had to order.
Went with a few friends on a Friday night. At 8 pm there was a 5 minute wait. The place was very busy and had a pleasant atmosphere. The service was a little slow but like I said, very busy. This was my 1st time trying bison, which I found to be delicious. Our pickles were constantly replenished, and our waiter gave me a big bowl of vanilla ice cream with a snickerdoodle and enough spoons for everyone. It's a little bit pricey for a burger ($16), but definitely an enjoyable spot for dinner!
Had a lovely dinner with friends and got to try the famous Bison steak, which was delicious!! The steak was very tender and just the perfect size...I also had room for some cheesecake!!The service was great and friendly too.
Met a friend for lunch and sat in the bar area.  We each had a margarita, and they were great.  I had the filet mignon and she had steak tips, both of which were delicious -- the meat was perfectly seasoned.  Service was on the slow side, but we weren't in any hurry.  Prices were reasonable.  It's one of the better chain restaurants I've been to.
My husband and I decided to stop at Ted's for a couple of drinks after we had dinner elsewhere. Although we were able to get a seat at the bar and was served our first drink promptly, it went downhill after that. It seemed like once they learned we were not going to eat they ignored us. The drinks were very overpriced. I chose a quality wine but spent almost as much on that one glass as if I went out to buy a bottle at the local liquor store. Despite seeing that they had plenty of bar staff, they did not notice when my husband finished his beer as if they wanted us to leave. We didn't stay for another drink.
Excellent food and atmosphere! Large Breakfast style bar and lots of tables for families or a quick lunch or nice dinner. BYOB is a plus too. 
South Street competes side-by-side with Christina's.  As I wrote in a review of Christina's, they each have areas that they shine.  For South Street, it's the great variety of tastes available in their omelets and Benedicts.  If smoked salmon or avocado is more your style than bacon, this is the place to go.  Prices are higher and quantities adequate.  The owner prowls the restaurant making sure the staff is meting her standards and the admonishments can occasionally be annoying, but not often.
Yum, eggs & crab cakes, a wonderful combination. Omelettes, home fries, corn beef hash, pancakes etc. Definitely something to suit all tastes. Service is quick & friendly, food is hot, well presented & plentiful, decor is quirky with lots of sparkly items strewn around.
Excellent breakfast and prompt courteous service. Large portions - bring an appetite. We went for brunch. Ample parking off street. 

The owner is a great women(i believe she is the owner), who comes and talks to you and makes sure you being taken care of.
As a visitor to Massachusetts from England I called on my last day before returning and was not dissapointed.
Had the Golfers Breakfast and Pancakes with Maple Syrup, all good quality with ample portions.
Service was excellent from friendly staff who cared.
Went for breakfast with my daughters future in-laws. South Street has an amazingly huge breakfast menu, that's offered all day (YEA)! I'm a huge breakfast fan, so I found lots of great choices. All sorts of egg dishes, pancakes, waffles and crapes. Even Lox and Bagels! I had the Farmers omelet special. It was perfectly cooked and the coffee was equally hot and fresh. I would very much go back if I lived closer then the current 400 miles away. Those who joined me this morning frequently eat here and recommend it highly as well. So that makes 5 votes for great place to eat. Tons of parking out back along with a very convenient rear entrance. Very nice atmosphere inside.
They overcooked the hash and then added oil to moisten it up and then SERVED it.  It was inedible.  It wasn't taken off the bill.  My son's pancakes were fine though.
Breakfast menu is varied and is sure to have something there to please all.
The service was excellent, the atmosphere is homey.  Had the eggs benedict on a recent trip and they were cooked just the way I ordered them (SOFT), hollandaise sauce was also very good.  The down side I did find was the home fries, they were cold and seemed like maybe they at first sat in a warmer as they were almost dried out, this area REALLY needs improvment, otherwise overall great breakfast.
1. healthy, and good food. fish sand, tuna, sea food salad are healthy and delicious
2. Good services. One waitress call me honey, I feel friendly and happy
The memu has a great selection not your every day breakfast menu. Prices are reasonable and the servce is excellent. The owner is usually onhand an d goes around making sure you are satisfied with your food. On weekend they are so busy you will have to wait to be seated. Plenty of free parking.
Always consistent and excellent food.  Atmosphere is very charming and welcoming and the servers are fantastic

I love Eggs Benedict.  I love the South Street Diner Eggs Benedict even more.  I have tried them all and while the California Benedict remains my favorite, they are all good.
Delicious family brunch in this restaurant. Lovely service. Sat us quickly. The banana crunch French toast were to die for!! The omelettes were very yummy and huge. Will definitely be a repeat.
This is a regular stop for me and my wife. Its good for breakfast or lunch, or in-between. The decor is slightly overwrought but the menus are comprehensive and the food is good. I am, personally, fond of the omelettes.  Service is good, There is plenty of parking. As pointed out by others, it is cash only.
Good, decent food, good portions.   Pleasant staff, good variety of dishes. BYOB which can be a nice change from expensive drinks.   NOTE......cash only....would go again,
This place is a Westborough institution.  It is CASH ONLY so leave your credit cards behind.  The food is good and always served quickly.  The only complaint I have is the owner needs to treat her staff better.  Customers do not want to hear the staff get yelled at in the middle of the restaurant.  The servers are all really friendly and nice.  
Great breakfast food in a comfy warming atmosphere. You might have to wait a little, but they keep things moving very well.  The omelettes are awesome! 
Just off the circle in Westborough, good coffee, and breakfast. Big omelets, good choices and quick service. Owners are great and almost always there to meet customers.
This is a great locally owned restaurant. I have eaten there at least a dozen times - both for breakfast and dinner. The breakfast menu goes beyond typical diner fare - it has a nice range of choices including some nice vegan choices. The food is well prepared. On weekends, during breakfast, the place gets busy but the service remains good. The dinner menu is also deeper than you would expect - a nice range of choices including fresh seafood. 
My wife and I have been there a few times on Friday's for Fish & Chips. The preparation and quality of the food is very consistent to say the least! We love it! And, the service is fast and very friendly. The atmospheres is like that in a town pub. Friendly people, down to earth and good prices. Try it out, you will not be disappointed.
Stopped here for lunch and tried the daily special - lobster roll.  The food was freshly made with small lobster chuncks and heavy mayo.
This restaurant rooms are dark and dirty.  In mid June, there were winter boots and book bags strewn on the floor of the bar area.
I've heard a lot of good things about the fish and chips at the Central House, so wanted to try it out. My father is actually the one who first heard about it, so I brought him and my mother. Well, I have to say that everyone had the right idea, because it was the best fish and chips we ever had. My mother had the fried clams and LOVED them. We first started off with the fish chowder--to die for! Then came the fish and chips. The piece of fish was HUGE--and oh, so good! Nice light batter and the fish was nice and moist and very tasty. The fries were golden and crispy..delicious! Cole slaw was good, too! You can't beat the price, either! We will definitely be going back over and over again. The next time, as good as the fish chowder is, I'm going to have to skip it because I was so full after eating that and trying to finish my fish and fries. Had to send some home with my mother, who was also taking home some of her clams because there were so many on her plate--which is highly unusual in other restaurants! Our server was so friendly, made us feel at home for being first timers! All in all, I give this ten stars!
Go for the Friday night Fish & Chips. Good family run place - nice new big screen TVs showing sports.
This is a terrific tapan yaki place! The chef was fantastic with my grandchildren (ages 5, 6 and 7), and the quality and selection of dishes were excellent.
Hadn't been back since my first visit just over 2 years ago.  Friendly service.  Edamame was very good as was the Goyza.  Tampura was fine.  Sushi also very good.  Place was noisy though... many small children and babies which seemed odd as it was after 8pm.
Went there with some office colleagues while on a business trip. The cooks put on the usual show which is always a hit with the kids and even made us smile. We had some sushi - which was ok - followed by a mix of shrimp, swordfish and steak with fried rice - which was quite good. Nice place to go and relax with friends and family.
We celebrated our teenager's birthday here. Had a bunch of teenagers booked for the hibachi table and a few of the parents booked a table out front in the "restaurant" section. We had the same waiter, who shuttled between the kids and us, to keep us all at the same pace and kept us informed of anything that might need attention with the kids. They did a fun birthday ice cream with a big red mask for the birthday celebrant. The teenagers had a great time. Adults ordered several types of sushi. Something for everyone even the non-sushi eaters had some non-fish, cooked "sushi". Our waiter was very helpful on how much to order and what types of sushi recommended. The presentation was outstanding. Almost too pretty to eat, but tasted too good to not! Drink menu was fun and tasty too. Excellent food and a really fun, different dining experience. Excellent service and excellent accommodation for our large party.
It was a quiet Sunday night at Sachi's, with a group back in the hibachi section whopping it up, a few couples at the bar, and several booths filled with quiet diners.  We had a very nice dinner for a surprisingly low price-some sushi, unagi and a pad Thai special with some Asian beers.  The staff was able to answer questions like "What's the difference between mackerel and Spanish Mackerel?" without making one feel stupid.  The restaurant has a nice decor, good selection and wine and beer, and fabulous food. Plenty of free parking, too.
Girls night out with 3 generations of 'girls'.  It was a great place for fun and good food.  It tough to find something that girls from 23 -88 would like, but this was one of them.
Staff are exceptionally friendly and the food is perfection!  Everything is fresh & flavorful!  Try it, you'll be glad you did!
With dealing with a 30 minute wait from a nearby restaurant, we went in for a drink and sat at the bar area.  After taking a look at the menu, we returned our handheld buzzing reminder that our other table was ready, and ate here instead.  We were not disappointed.  The food was good, the staff friendly and we were happy with our choice.  That other place has a run for it's money.
We love this place. It's clean, has great quality good, and the Hibachi chef's are incredible. 

We've had the Filet, Lobster, Scallops, & Chicken. All were great! Comes with rice & soup. 
Three people in our party of four ate sushi. They were all very happy with their choices. I had the balsamic filet mignon that was outstanding! And the mashed potatoes were good too. 
Just happened to drive by and noticed the sign. Tried it for lunch and it was excellent. Great deal with the all you can eat menu for lunch. Service was also great. Waiter was helpful to explain and recommend things, and was very attentive. Definitely going back!
My son loved the Hibachi experience. The server and chef were outstanding. The show was fun to watch, and the food exceptionally fresh. The restaurant was immaculate.

Our family split meals of Filet, Chicken, & Scallops. Everything was cooked and seasoned perfectly. The rice and shrimp appetizers were awesome. You need to try this place!
We were drawn to this spot for lunch after we saw an advertisement in a local paper. The restaurant is beautiful and clean when you arrive. There was a big party waiting to be seated, so our wait at the door was probably longer than usual. The process of ordering the special is difficult. Our server explained it to us and we still didn't understand fully. My husband had the all you can eat sushi and I had the all you can eat appetizers. The sushi was terrible. It was just a piece of fish with rice and the seaweed on the outside. No cucumber, no spicy mayo, no nothing. Blah. My apps were good. I had pan fried pork dumplings and crab rangoons...delicious. My husband had a Saporro and I had a diet coke and the total was $52. I don't mind paying for good food, but this wasn't.
When traveling to Ma.,. Sachii has become a destination for awesome Japanese food.  The wait staff  are friendly and helpful,  The food is fresh and the plate set pleasing to the eye.
I have been here a few times and have always had a great meal.  One of the owners who works there Jay is always so friendly.  The Sushi is great, the presentation is elegant. I have always enjoyed my meals and look forward to going back
The sushi was average. The highlight was the tako salad. Unfortunately, it was a little too light on the dressing.
My partner and I had dinner here on our anniversary.  We wanted to try a mix of their menu so we shared a number of plates.  We had the vegetable sushi platter which was good, but a rather small portion.  We split the vegetable Udon noodle meal which was pretty good and then also shared the vegetable dumplings which were OK but not memorable.  I finished with the duck buns which were a standout.  They are made with the traditional Asian buns but the duck wasn't enclosed within the bun as the meat is traditionally.  It was served with a sauce and cucumber matchsticks on the sliced open bun.  It was unique and delicious.  The drink selection is good and they don't skimp on the ingredients but they were out of the souvenir glassware which was disappointing.  The atmosphere is quite nice, kind of a modern Asian lounge decor, and the restaurant area is separate from the bar.  There are several separate Teppanyaki-style tables with seating each in their own areas, also separate from both the bar and the main restaurant.  A small sushi bar is against the back wall of the restaurant section.  The service was good but it was a Tuesday night so there wasn't a huge crowd, and the hostess and waiter were both cordial.  It would be one of my recommendations to anyone in town seeking Asian cuisine.  It has  more Japanese styling than the nearby Sapporo's (which, surprisingly, is more of a modern Korean fusion restaurant, but is also quite good).
I spent years traveling to Japan on business and have spent over a years time there.  Most of the Japanese restaurants here are more Chinese than Japanese style, but Sachi's is very true to the cuisine you'll have in Japan. 
First time here.  Was pleasantly surprised.  Took a while to get some of the items but when it arrived was excellent.  Really like the pan fried dumplings... also the udon noodles.  Servers had a good attitude but think they were a little short staffed.
We had sushi and an udon noodle dish.  They both exceeded our expectations.  The service was really good and the atmosphere was pleasant & clean.  We're not hibachi fans so we went with their regular menu. It had plenty of options.
Whether wanting a quick lunch or a leisurely dinner, this place has it both! The food is great and the family run restaurant is a great place to eat!!! 
Great place love their food and the staff is great and they remember people also that goes in i really like the goulash they make and Pizza is good to everything is good
I like everything there - consistently good quality food and a great value.  The pizza is fantastic, but so are all their subs.  All workers are friendly and when you get to know them they are very entertaining & funny.  Sabatini's is a well kept secret because of their location - just off the Westborough rotary and a bit offset from the main street.
Outstanding meatball sub on a delicious fresh roll. Homemade sauce and meatballs. This appears to be a family run restaurant and mainly a takeout place. Food was fresh and plentiful. Downside: No handicapped parking and access from the parking lot was a challenge. Curb is hard to maneuver.
Their pizza is the best!  Only problem with this place is the fact that they are closed on Sundays and Mondays - so you can't order pizza and watch NFL games! 
The owners are rude and stringent no cell phones, will not except complaints, food is their way. A very rude family.
We have ordered at least a dozen times since this fall. The pizza is good. Sometimes that sauce seems a bit on the sweet side. But, for decent pizza, at a decent price, with parking right out front... Sabatinis is there!
This is pretty much as close to a NY or NJ slice of pizza as you can get in Westborough.  We order the thin crust pizza from here a few times a month.  With a great, fresh flavor, I think it's the best slice of Pizza in Westborough.  The lasagna is also pretty good.  I think the prices are pretty reasonable too.    

Most of the time we just order take-out, but sometimes we'll go to the dining room side; which is very casual with it's rather dated decor.
The food here is excellent.  Truly fresh and flavorful.  They just need to work on their customer service at times they are outright rude.  
I order Sabatini takeout at least once a week.  Their pizza is absolutely delicious and the service is great. A wonderful family owned business!!
Sabatini's is a great little Italian restaurant tucked away in a strip mall in Westboro. It is family run with the mom and sons doing the cooking. Everything is home made while you wait and tru Italian food. The pizza is the best around and the service, ask for Lisa, is great. We go there often.
OK - I will admit it - I am a regular. I look forward to taking my wife to Sabatini's every Friday night. Lisa, the server, goes out of her way to make the experience exceptional. This is a great, privately owned, pizza and Italian restaurant. The food is excellent and cooked to order. They serve wine and beer. Again, put this restaurant into context - it is an excellent Italian and pizza restaurant. Gourmet food - no - traditional Italian food, prepared well and served crisply. This is not a white linen place - but it is a warm, welcoming, local restaurant that you will enjoy time and time again . . . 
Sabatini has the best thin crust pizza in Westborough. They will custom order any pizza, so it is good to get creative. The white pizza, topped with ricotta, spinich and broccoli is excellent, however ask for double spinich as it is the only thing they are sparing on, everything else is perfect. 
We have lived in the area over 30 years and only learned of this place last year. We have been here twice for a sit down dinner. Server is polite and attentive. Wine choices are white or red and then maybe 2 or three varieties to choose from there. We have had the Cab Sauvignon. No idea the label, it is good. Lasagna is superb. Alfredo meal was also excellent. I can't wait to try their pizza some time. Prices more than reasonable. 
Sabatini's is my favorite pizza in town.  Crust is delicious and so fresh it's crazy and the sauce isn't too salty to cover up for no flavor.  They're always super friendly in there and you can even eat in if you don't feel like dragging the pizza home.   Unlike the other poster, I don't think the price/value is off for what you get.
The pizza is great here. It has a thicker crust but very delicious. Nice change from thin crust now and then.  Loaded with goodies if you like.  Sauce is flavorful.
One side is a take out joint, with pizza and subs etc, the other side is a sit down Italian.  The take out side is what you expect.  Cooler of drinks, pizza to go and a few sterile booths.  My family likes their pizza the best in town, especially with extra sauce, but it is pricey.  It's a thinner crust.  Their meatballs and red sauce are great. The other side is an old school italian restaurant, the kind that decorates with old decor and beer signs.  The food matches.. very classic italian on old plates.  It's tasty, but basic italian.  My biggest complaint is that it's very slow.  Well, that and the decor.
I rarely flat out suggest people don't bother going somewhere, but in this case I am doing just that. The food is decent enough but it is very overpriced. With so many other options in the area I don't see any reason to go here. 
Sabatini's is by far the best pizza in Westborough, some of the best in Central Mass.  It's definitely high quality with little greese and a great crust.  A little on the pricy side compared with other pizza joints but our pizza was great as always.  They're very consistent and you can always expect a great slice (or 4).
Could be the best pizza place in central Massachusetts.  The pizza here is very high quality because it's not loaded with grease, the way a lot of the pizza places are.  the rest of the menu other than pizza is very mediocre and what you'd expect.  Not great ambience to eat in, unless you enjoy really bare bones decor and nothing fancy;  it is in a strip mall at the center of town.
Enjoyed a nice meal last night....Gluten Free Salmon with mashed potatoes and asparagus. Split a yummy salad with figs, pistachios and Gorgonzola cheese - very delicious! The heat wasn't working last night - definitely very chilly in the restaurant. We all kept our jackets on!
We have been to Tavolino on a number of occasions, both as a couple and as part of a medium-sized (about 10 people, ranging in age from 5 to 70) birthday celebration. The décor is traditional, as is the menu, but the staff is pleasant and efficient, and the food is very good
My group of 7 almost did consume the full menu - lots of drinks, apps, entrees and desserts.  All so good!  Recommend the wild boar gnocchi and crab cake appetizers, mussels, steak and ravioli entrees, and dessert wines and mini chocolate mousse for dessert.  Restaurant is very spacious and service is gracious and competent.  Can't go wrong!!
A good spot to go with the kids.  Something for everyone in a good environment... and a good bar for the adults.  Like the selection of beers on tap.  The food is good enough.  Some things are fine, find your favorites.  Our crab cakes were nice.  Liked the artichoke soup.
My colleague and I were visiting from out of town and ate here every night that we could (except the first when we were unaware of it's existence).
Being a pescoterian, I loved the menu choices There were plenty of non meat options. I loved the kale salad, the truffle fries, the roasted beet salad with goat's cheese was particularly good. The pizza that we chose was a little bland and needed spicing up. (Most of the food , although good, either needed more salt or dressing: but these were easily addressed issues).
The staff were good and we loved being able to sit outside. I would rate Arturo's more in terms of food tastiness, but because we were able to sit outside, we returned every evening.
I have celiac disease. An allergy to wheat and gluten and it's cross contamination. I ordered only a salad but was assured that it would be made with different gloves, knives, no cheese, etc. I think I also got shrimp on it. They were very careful and I DID NOT GET SICK. A PLUS especially when you are traveling. Trying to find out if they are still as careful as they were 5-6 years ago when I traveled East.

As a local, I always give the local restaurants the benefit of the doubt. Lately Tavalino's has consistently blown it, with last night being the third strike. I ordered take out, and it was very disappointing. The chicken parm was cold, half of it had cheese, the other half not. There was no sauce on it, so it was dry, didn't even help to heat it up. The pasta was a kale basil sauce, which was non existent and tasteless. The eggplant parm was no better. Overall, the chef was not looking at this order as it went out, nor the last 2 times that I have been there.
Not sure how Tavolino is #5 in Westborough. Hands down my favorite restaurant near home (northborough). Awesome pizzas, great pasta options and always a great entree selection. Indoor and outdoor seating. A considerable beer and wine selection. Always some seasonal / nightly specials. Top notch!!
The restaurant has a nice decor with a nod to wine.  They also have an outdoor patio.  I was here for a work luncheon and we had a private room.  I had looked at the menu online before heading to the restaurant.  I had seen a few meals that I was trying to decide between.  Unfortunately when I was at the restaurant they gave a lunch menu and those dishes were not on it.  Lunch menu had salads, wraps, paninis and only a few entrees.  I ordered a wrap and it was good, average.  They had home made chips and those were good as well.  At first our 2 servers were great, they were filling water glasses and stopping by, but after they checked how our food was we didn't see them for a long time.  We had to go find one to ask for the check.  So if you are in a rush at lunch let your server know ahead of time.
Nice atmosphere, attentive service, and a good meal. But based on my experience, the meal was not extraordinary enough to justify the price.  
Menu had a blend of some Italian and some more general/American items. This is good for a group with varied tastes, but if you are going in search of an extensive Italian menu, you may not find some of your traditional favorites. 
I did enjoy the pasta carbonara dish I had, which was a special, and I would certainly dine here again, but too expensive to be a frequent place. 

Most people who live in Westborough already know about Tavolino's, so this is really more for those who are visiting from out of town...  Food here ranges from good to very good.  Pizzas are consistently well done and the appetizers are typically very good as well.  In eating/drinking here at least ten times, the service is typically solid, with the occasional hiccup you get at any restaurant.  Draft beer menu is limited, but always includes a couple of micro-brews, a couple of big labels, and the typical Italian beer or two.  Wine menu is solid if unspectacular and is relatively well paired to the menu in terms of selection, price, and value.
Always reliable and we're back for more.  Sat at one of the large booths which was great.  Crab cakes (always... they serve 3 to an order), caesar salad, soup, veal parm, and pizza did the trick tonight.  Skipped dessert and went for ice cream down the road.
Had dinner with my wife a week ago. Sat on their patio - very lovely.
We each had a salad (although they were large enough to share) and a pasta dish. Everything was very good. Had a bottle of wine - decent selection and fairly priced for the quality.
Service was very good - asked for some extra bread to take home with the leftover pasta (asked for 2 pieces, waitress bagged 4).
Definitely a place that we will return to.
We went to Tavolinos at lunch time and sat in the bar. The bartender was our waiter and he was very slow and there was only 1 other couple in the bar area.
The calamari was excellent with an intersting dipping sauce. The crab cakes (3 of them) were nice and moist and tasty. The chicken wings were good as well. A few of us ordered salad as our main course. The spinach salad was good except the dressing was terrible-tasted like just oil. So order dressing on the side or ask for a different dressing.
We sat outside on a nice summer evening.  The food was very good!  We shared the appetizer shrimp in garlic sauce, and it was delicious.  The sauce was thicker than I expected, more like a bernaise, but it worked.  Very fresh tasting extra large shrimp.  I had the eggplant parm and it was delicious also.  Crispy fried slices of eggplant over store bought pasta and an excellent marinara.  I brought half of it home, it was huge.  The only complaint was that the pasta was not "fresh".  Also the tirimasu was not  great but had nice flavor.
Wandered in for dinner on my own.  A nice place for a solo diner, and a good choice of dishes on the menu.  As I was in the mood for something fresh I had the kale salad.  Really nice and healthy and washed down with a quartino (nice name!) of the sauvignon blanc.  Would highly recommend!
Met up with a friend while visiting Worcester for the weekend.  It's a nice place for drinks and dinner.  Wasn't too hungry for a big meal so ordered a pizza expecting to have only a slice.  Was totally surprised by how delicious the pizza was!  It was so good that I had 3 slices (the pizza was pretty big).  Took the rest of the pizza to-go and gave it to my friend.  I will definitely visit this place again, primarily for the amazing pizza!
We keep Tavolino in the rotation as it's a local favorite for my son.  Can find things for everyone on the menu and not too pricey.  Crab cakes are a favorite (3 small ones to an order... can order 2 if you want as well).  Pasta, pizza, chix parm also good.
Excellent Place!!! 
Its perfect for any occasion, be it a official lunch or romantic dinner or kids pizza outing. It looks very classy, very cozy. Staff is extremely polite and very friendly towards kids. 

Food is really good, fresh and well cooked. 
We ordered pizza and it was perfect, thin crust with loads of topping n salads. Usually in many pizza joints I have noticed that the pizza base in the center remains bit soggy due to tomato or broccoli topping, but here it was all perfect. Well cooked n crispy.

We went on Monday and they were running some offer on buy one pizza and one pizza was complimentary. So we had plenty of left over for next day. 

To keep kids busy, they gave some 'wikki sticks' to do craft work. It was very different from usual color sheet and kids enjoyed doing it while waiting for pizza.
Since we went with small kids, they made a mocktail drink for all of us, it was tasty n went well with pizza.   

We didnt take any other drink, but the bar area looked quite decent with plenty of options in display.

Only thing, which was struggled, was small size of table, once they brought 2 pizzas on table of 4, we were left wth no space to keep our plates n eat. It was very hard with kids n pizza n drink n plates!! I hope next time they consider giving kids group a bigger table.

Overall a lovely lovely place for outing!
We had a family pizza party here and it was excellent.  The beer selection was good and it was nice and cold.  Very noisy atmosphere and hard to carry on a conversation.  Just go for the pizza.
We have been to Christina's a dozen times. The atmosphere is lively, the portions are large, the menu is extensive ,the food is tasty, and the service is fast.
We used to live in Westborough and it was always a toss up between Christina's and South Street Diner next door.  Each has their own appeal.  If you like meat for breakfast, bacon, ham, sausage in abundance and a good filling meal, Christina's is the place to go.  Nothing fancy and not a lot of imagination in the menu, but they get the job done.  South Street has more variety, but maybe 20% higher prices and slightly less quantity.  Some very tasty items though.  Service is variable at both and each has it's core of "veteran" staff and youngsters who come and go.  Both are worthy of a try, if for different reasons.
I feel bad for my waitress. She was not happy having to serve 2 adults and three young kids.
I thought that she was new and I  was very patience waiting for her. She disappeared for long periods. 
The restaurant was not that busy today. 
We waited 30 minutes after we place the order.  It takes anyone less than that to have a cup of coffee .  I waited so long for my refill and when I complained , she answered me back and refused to keep on serving me .
I order a feta and spinach omelet plus a cup of fruit that is 1 dollar extra .
She gave me the cup of fruit and run back. Never asked if I wanted more coffee or if we were ok . She never apologized that the food was going to be ready later . It was a mystery . Kids were getting tired and I did not have coffee for a long time ...... 
I can keep on going , but I already spoke to the hostess who stepped in as she realized  that we were not having a pleasant experience. 
The home fries were not well cooked. 
Not a good experience . I should have driven 5 more minutes and go to IHOP , but I wanted to give this old restaurant a try .
Very disappointed . We won't eat there again. The food was not that bad, but I can get a better deal and a better service somewhere else. 


Had breakfast here today. 
While we were a party of four the restaurant is set up with a lot of 2 seated tables, but our wait was nominal. 
The decor is plan and not that attractive. I noticed several uncleaned tables around us. 
The server took a while to come over, and then mixed up our drinks, but did correct the error. 
The menu is large, which I always find a little disconcerting. The food was OK, while everyone's breakfast was as ordered the food is piled up on the plate, heavily salted or drowned in sauce. 
The prices are inexpensive, portions are large and so likely a favourite for a type of diner but for more disconcerting tastes this may not be the place for you. 

Popped in for breakfast when I was in the area as it was recommended by my host.  Really good friendly service and good food at a decent price.  If I lived nearby this would be a regular for me.
We go here at least once a month for breakfast & no where else!  Variety of breakfast choices.  Staff there are especially friendly and accommodating to families.  Omelets are awesome & it's a no rush atmosphere.  Best around!!
I love places like this one. Great food and friendly staff with a sense of humor. I had the stuff chicken and it was delicious. I also got me a grill cheese to take out for a snack later. Highly recommend. 
We had a HUGE group of people for breakfast, and Christina's accomodated us with graciousness, good food, and good humor. The portions are gigantic, the coffee is really good, and they have fresh squeezed orange juice. Highly recommended!!!

They need to get better plumbing in the bathroom, though.
I have met friends at Christina's twice on weekend mornings and the hostess is always warm and welcoming. Breakfast is one of my favorite meals and whether it is pancakes or eggs Benedict, the food here is always great! I also remember my tennis team of 12 showed up one weekend morning and the staff handled all of our requests with ease. A consistent winning restaurant for breakfast.
Breakfast was just usual.  Nothing exciting on the menu.  Service was okay. The food was cooked well but I was looking for something a bit more exciting for breakfast besides the usual.
I like to promote dining locally and at small independent restaurants, however Christina's cafe just seemed old and tired.  I went in for a business meeting during a weekday morning and the place was deserted.  The menu looked ample but I must admit that I only got toast and coffee.  This could use some sprucing up to bring the energy and patrons in.
We ate breakfast at the bar.  Low key, you won't get a lot of attention, may need to flag someone down for coffee.  Breakfast was basic and no presentation.  Plate of egg, toast and potatoes could have used some green garnish or small colorful fruit or fresh jelly.  Same for pancakes.  Food out fast.  Taste was fine, just all a little lackluster for such a promising breakfast joint...  2 pancakes, 1 juice, 1 coffee and a two egg/toast/hashbrown plate was $20....
Keep the cook but fire the wait staff!!! My wife and I went there last Sunday (6/30/24). The food was very good. It was the waitress that was just TERRIBLE and RUDE. 1) She never came over to refill coffees but she was sure prompt in getting us our bill. 2) My wife ordered a side order of hash browns when we instucted them to get things wrapped to take home for doogy bags, those IDIOTS threw them out!! Our waitress in a very rude way offered no apologies and sent us home with an order that was half the size of the original one we paid for. At that point I picked the tip off from table and placed it back into my wallet only leaving them a $1.00 tip. For anyone expecting good service this is not the place to go!!!
We ended up going to Christina's after taking a look at the overwhelming line at South Street Diner. I am so glad we did. Very good service. Our waitresses made us feel like we were her only table and positively doted on us. We waited for our food a bit but the quality made it worth the wait! Great portion size and excellent value for the money! We will be back!
Last time reviewed brunch more like lunch.

This time breakfast.For late risers on weekends or during the week, they serve breakfast all day.  Portions are large omelets as well as pancake stack.  Food is good, hash browns are excellent.
My wife and I went to Christina's Cafe in dowtown Westborough, MA. for breakfast.  We arrived about 10:30 which was after the breakfast rush and before the lunch crowd and there were not too many people in the restaurant.  My wife had the vegetarian omlette which came with home fries and she had toasted cinnamon bread.  I had a Spanish omlette which came with home fries and I had toasted dark rye bread.  We both had coffee.  The food was excellent and as much refillable coffee as you wanted.  The waitress was very efficient.  Certainly the restaurant did not skimp on the quantity of food while it maintained high quality.  This was our first visit and by no means our last.
The cafe for breakfast is very good. Its your typical relaxed diner atmosphere. Service is quick, very friendly, and attentive with offers to top off your coffee every 2minutes. The standard bacon and eggs meal comes with 6 slices of bacon. Prices are good value.
Being retired and sleeping late we go here many times for Brunch.  They serve breakfast till closing and their lunches are very good.  In fact on last visit Corn Beef and Cabbage was the special.  The Corn Beef was a large portion and the carrots, Cabbage and potatoes were not over cooked like many places.
Breakfast are large and and cooked to order just right.  Only open for Breakfast and Lunch
Actually our motel suggested another place to us down the street from Christina's, but I was impressed with the street presence of the place so we went here instead. The menu had what we wanted, the service was prompt, the food came quickly and it was not bad. It was not great but it was not bad. Just your average type of breakfast. I would have to say there was nothing truly memorable about the place except for the restaurants facade.

Next time I might be tempted to try the place down the street which was recommended.
This was recommended by a friend he takes his kids there many times, so we thought lets try it! So we went about 1 hour 1/2 before they closed,  unbelievable food, waitress and hospitality, it was just coming into a relaxing friendly dinner or cafe! It was a great experience!  LOVED IT
Easy to have a quick coffee here and meet friends too! Nice tables and big open area with tables for you to meet and talk with friends, in the common area.
as a frequent customer, the staff always remembers my order and has it ready by the time I approach the counter. Always with a friendly smile from the staff.
Try this instead of Starbucks.  Locally owned, consistently full-bodied and rich coffee.  Good staff and great selection of muffin tops, always fresh. 
This is a great place to have lunch with your friends. Love their hot sandwiches and salads. I definitely recommend it. 
We stopped here for a quick breakfast as our hotel didn't offer complimentary breakfast. We both had a breakfast panini; my wife a vanilla latte and I the Red Barn roast black. Our food was good and the coffee had a very nice flavor. We definitely would stop in again when in the area.
No doubt, if you like something stronger than Dunkin, this is where to stop. It's a good cup of coffee. The iced is great too. It's way better than anywhere else in town and the shop is cozy.
The frozen yogurt here is very good as are the toppings but think they should be bumping up things a bit, making it a more inviting atmosphere.  Better lighting would help.
A young man is running this place (relative of the owner) and is doing a great job.  He seems to really care about providing excellent service and taking care of his customers.  The frozen yogurt is very good and a nice selection of fresh toppings.  Remember to join their new freq visitor club.
Good frozen yogurt here.  We wind up here more in the winter as it's open all year round... unlike the DQ down the street.  Son likes the flavors and the toppings.  Friendly service.
They've added more machines (hence more flavors).  Very good local option for FroYo.  There are a lot of places that have popped up around it not very far away, but our family likes this one the best.  It's either Fruitti Cup or the Dairy Queen (only open in the warm months) on the other side of the circle when the desire for frozen treats hits.  HIGHLY RECOMMENDED
The type with 6 double flavored pumps (12 flavors 6 twists) , pay by the ounce, ouch!  Most flavors are weird but do have a few standard flavors like chocolate, vanilla coffee.Do it yourself  this is where they get you.  You don't realize how much yogurt weights and with toppings.  you can wind up on average paying $5 to $7 a portion.  My biggest grip unless you tell them to tare weight the cup (subtract weight of cup) you can wind up paying as much as buck or more depending on cup size for the cup.  This is illegal but is not enforced as in super markets.  The help seems befuddled when you tell them and manager gives you a dirty look.   
Nut allergies be careful of toppings the bins of nuts are not segregated and no one seems to care.
Serve yourself type.  The yogurt is very good and the guy who owns the place and his staff is very personable.  One of the best tasting IMHO around.  My son loves the place. 
I went here for the first time with my family.  I wanted it to be nice and be a successful newer business in Westborough. It seemed dirty and not much different than a cafeteria.  It did not appear appetizing at all.   I did not get any yogurt for myself.  My kids and husband did, and we decided we are not going back there again.  (who knows how unsanitary those toppings were).  I feel bad for this business...there are several other successful yogurt and ice cream shops in Westborough and 2 new yogurt shops that are opening up there soon, and they need to step it up to compete.   I hope they "clean it up" and make it appear less hodge podge, so that they can stay in business. Plus I forgot to mention...I was not cheap.  Ugh!
I've eaten here a half dozen times and there is simply no Korean restaurant I've visited in the US that more accurately reflects the cuisine I've had in South Korea.  The amazing array of side dishes may not be to every New Englander's taste (no Hunt's ketchup on the table), but the array of flavors is a true joy.  As a previous reviewer also found, my wife and I found ourselves as the only non-Asian patrons a couple of times.  I'm not sure if it is "officially" BYOB, but a group of very happy Koreans were having a great time with an adult birthday party.
Its not for a nice dinner date, but do go here for the best korean food. Try the beef & Pork bulgogi and also soju a korean liquor. The kimchi is great too.
Good food nice place will come again.
Limited staffs serving when many customers come in same time.
A lot of variable kimji good chicken soup  but salty nice korean pancake.
Wife, adult son and I were the only non Asian folks eating there that evening (I took that to be a good sign). Hostess was very helpful in explaining some of the dishes. Food was uneven in quality - some was excellent, others just fair. Be aware, that their stews are quite spicy. Side dishes served with main courses were quite nice and made for some interesting tastes.
Stopped by here with dad and kids last summer, and have wanted to get back since, my dad and I are the only diverse grazers, so it's tough to get back to some places.  But it was a family run local restaurant.  Wish they could upgrade the decor to match the obvious effort put into the food and service, but definitely worth a try if you are in the area and looking for great outside the box option !  You can buy authentic food feeling, and it is there thank goodness.
I was feeling under the weather and was craving something warm. So I looked at their soup menu and decided on the Kalbi Tang. It was SO good and almost tasted like my mom's version. I could barely finish and had to take the rest home and it was good left over soup. I highly recommend this soup if you're feeling sickly and just want something warm yet not too heavy/greasy.
Great selection of authentic Korean dishes.  The restaurant itself is not much to look at and only has about 15 tables inside, but it was cozy with great service...and the food was excellent.
Great food. As authentic as the time I gone on a business trip to korea. Great portion and price. My family loved the food.  
This restaurant is a great value -- delicious cuisine, attentive service, reasonable prices.  The restaurant could use some design updates.  It's very casual--best for family and friends (not business or special occasion).
AWESOME authentic Korean food!!  We eat here regularly and love it every time.  The only thing I should warn is that it does take some time, so if you are looking for something fast, this might not be the best place to go.  Otherwise, it is terrific. 
I found the place by accident (google had suggested something different) and have been back many times since then.  I still have not made it to that other place as of yet.

My family and I have been exploring different dishes with each visit and have found that we have not had a disappointing meal yet.   If you are in search of delicious, non-chain, authentic food, like my family and I are, then you should give Westborough Korean Restaurant a try.

I also found a writeup on http://garylkelley.com/journal/2012/3/16/westborough-korean-restaurant.html
This restaurant came up on a web search while driving from RI. We needed dinner and were weary of chain fare.   We like good Korean food, and so were excited to try it.   We found it to be really good, with a busy bar area, and a pleasant dining area.   We tried a variety of dishes and all were good- service was quick. we will definitely be back
Lovely place to try some good Korean food. The servings are of large proportions and the food is delightful. The assorted kimchi in the sides are kickass !

A must visit !
Random drive led to dinner at this tiny, authentic Korean restaurant. Had a great date night with incredible food.  There was an enormous amount of food, prepared bubbling hot and fresh. The waitress was very helpful guiding us thru  the menu. Many little side dishes were served. I loved the spicy rice cakes, kimchee pancakes and the spicy pork stew. Sampled  the goat stew, that was wonderful as well. If you are not afraid  to  try new things you should not miss this fabulous place! 
This is family opened type small restaurant. The food was great. 
Not the best Korean restaurant I have tasted in the past.. 
But they have good authentic selection. 
If you like Korean food check out the Westborough Korean Restaurant. Not fancy, not sweet, but very good.
This is a small cozy restaurant; you go there for the food.Parking is on street or in the lot behind the bank. When we were seated we were served cups of interestingly flavored barley tea; the cups were kept filled during the meal. Be warned when you order that the servings are large. I started with a gimbab--a sort of maki roll, beef, vegetables, and rice wrapped in seaweed with some sesame seeds and a salad. My wife had the dumpling soup. Either would have made a full lunch. I had the bulgogi. It says it comes with a special sauce and it was certainly specially tasty. My wife had the spicy goat stew. It came bubbling hot. We were also served rice and ten small side dishes like kim-chi, eggplant, sweet potato, bean sprouts, tofu, etc. to eat with the meal. Prices are very moderate especially considering how much food you are served. Service was efficient and friendly. They don't take AmEx but do take the other major credit cards.

Lunch specials 11.30am to 2.00pm (M,W,Th,F). Closed Tuesday.
I dont remember how are when I 'discovered' Korean food but I love it! This has to be the best or darn near the best Korean restaurant that I've gone to in years (and we do search and try!) Because it is such a long trip to Westboro for us we do not go all that often and save it for special occasions. I am ecstatic about the dozen or so little dishes that are served before the meal. As others have said it is a small restaurant, not fancy but for a few moments I am taken to Korea. They do have an extensive menu and service has always been friendly and good except for that one occasion me and my wife shared two dinners between the three of us, my 27 yr old daughter was with us and she eats like a bird. We were very politely and firmly told that in the future we would need to order three entre's not two, because of the large number of 'little dishes' served beforehand. All other times it has always been a great dinner and experience.
The service is straightforward, the menu is huge but not for vegetarians. If you love seafood or red meat, you're in luck. You start with hot tea, about a dozen small plates (great peanuts and noodles and spicy zucchini and....). I had mixed seafood with sweet spicy sauce and rice. Very filling, fresh seafood: clam, mussel, calamari, shrimp. My friend ordered a huge seafood soup with thick noodles. Get there early to get a seat, park on the street and enjoy your food!
We went with friends yesterday - a party of 10 and had a great time. It is authentic Korean food - very friendly and great service. 

The bulgogi was great. Kalbi was good (although my husband feels we've had better). The specials were all in Korean and if we hadn't been there with Western friends who never had Korean food before, we would have gone for some of those. As it was, we stuck with the dishes they would like. 

The people were super friendly and great. Our friends were the only westerners in the restaurant. 


Was here for early dinner, place is spacious, generous portions, delicious. Salmon sashimi was served as thick juicy slices.
they have lots of veg options -- with avocado, asparagus, cucumber and many other vegetables. They have tofu, brown rice, as well as Thai options available too. Very good choice if you're out in this area.
We try to eat at Sake Hana every couple of weeks.  Sushi is great, everyone is friendly.  Our favorite sushi place in Westborough.
Stopped by for dinner. Found the sushi to be excellent with a wide array of creative pieces and rolls

Prices very reasonable 
And we love it more and more! We take all our visitors to the town and guests here atleast once and they love it too and ask to go here on return visits. My last review took one star off for the decor but I've changed my mind since- the food is so fabulous here that the 3star decor does not even figure in my rating of this place.

Our family favourites are the dragon rolls, sweet potato rolls, avocado salad (actually avocado anything) and the mochi. We are all vegetarians and love the variety we have available here!
We are locals who are so blessed to have this restaurant so close!  The staff is wonderful and the food perfect.  We have several friends we've introduced to Sake Hana, who ow travel a distance to come here.
Try this sushi/sashimi restaurant in downtown Westborough for excellent food.  Townies will know the location as Lowe's variety store. The sashimi was fresh and they give large portions. Try it and you'll be pleasantly surprised. Went for lunch and had window seat with good service.
Enjoyed a nice dinner on a Saturday night. Great food! And a nice atmosphere tucked in downtown Westborough.
There are a lot of Asian restaurants in the area... this is a good one.  While a pretty nondescript dining room, still comfortable as there's lots of space.  Very nice, hospitable service.  Like the rock shrimp app, the lo mein. The sushi seemed popular with other tables.
Amazing service!
Amazing people! 
Amazing food!
I'm don't speak English or Mandarin,  but I'm golback because now I have more friends.
People's very patient for my bad English! !
As avid sushi lovers my husband and I have visited numerous sushi bars in the area.  Sake Hana is by far the best yet.  We have been dining here at least once a week for months and are never disappointed.  Fresh fish, great selection, nice presentation and good service.  Reasonable prices, too.  
Great food and people. Love the fried rice, squid salad. The sushi are awesome. The waiters are very nice.
My family love this place.
We stopped into Sake Hana on a whim as we were driving up I-495 when the hankering for sushi popped into our head. A short 10 minute hop off of the highway into downtown Westborough and we were there.

Service was fast and efficient. The sushi chefs were very cordial as we passed the prep area/sushi bar seating area, and our choices came to us in what seemed like record time for the amount of customers and only 2 chefs doing the work.

The menu included several of our favorite rolls (Volcano, Dynamite...) but they had a special "King of the Ocean" roll which caught our eye. Lobster tempura with spicy crab on the outside with avocado and tobiko complimenting the lobster on the inside. There was also a mango/shrimp roll which was a nice diversion; ripe and flavorful mango complimented the shrimp quite well.

Fish portions for the sashimi and nigiri sushi was very good, and the pricing was great too. Go inside of 495 and add $2 per serving.

This was a wonderful find and one we will certainly go back to as we travel in that area.
I don't want you to rush making sushi, or anything that comes out of the kitchen, but please take my order within five minutes of me sitting down. It wasn't busy, at all, and you walked by our table four times (yup, I counted) without looking over. And you weren't carrying stuff. I don't expect you to stop by when you're carrying stuff. When you drop off my drink, as if I'm ready to order, don't just drop off the drinks and leave me like a bad first date. I appreciate that you refilled my tea and asked often if we wanted more tea. 
Was my food good? We ordered and received miso soup and house salad. They were good. Yes, I ordered the Las Vegas roll, but my friend's noodles didn't come out for another five minutes. There's something that happens to tempura rolls after about five minutes. They are less delicious than originally planned. The noodles looked amazing, so if I go back, maybe that's the plan: order either both from the kitchen or both from the sushi chef.
Best sushi I've had in a long time. Very very fresh, which is quite important when you're having sushi. We enjoyed the sushi for two option, and subbed in a specialty roll, which was served warm and was delicious (not sure which one it was as I had my cousin order for us). Very friendly service, great prices, I will definitely return. 
This place is excellent - don't be deceived by the relatively low prices.  Excellent!  I've been here many times since moving to central MA.  The only downside is there is not a full bar - just beer, wine/sake
My favorite go to quick lunch from here is the "Spicy Tuna Avocado Ball".  It is actually an appetizer, but it just makes a really nice reasonable lunch. In general, as many Japanese restaurants are it is a bit pricey. 

The staff is unbelievably nice and friendly.  They are very accommodating!
We went with someone who needed to make sure that various things were kosher and with google, they made appropriate substitutions.

However, for my husband who needs Gluten Free food, they didn't really understand a little soy sauce is a problem... They do have Gluten Free Soy Sauce and will use it.. but we are really careful because of the language issues that sometime come up.  They are very willing to substitute and make wonderful sushi that works for us!
Though we've lived here fro a few months, we had not tried this neighborhood gem until lunch today. The atmosphere was very pleasant and we were seated immediately. Our server asked for our drink order within a minute or two and were served the tea and chardonnay quickly. We each ordered a different lunch special Bento Box which includes your choice of tempura or teriyaki meats or shrimp, miso soup, a generous green salad, 6 California roll and 2 gyoza dumplings, white sticky rice, wasabi and pickled ginger all for ONLY $11. The sushi was fresh, creamy and well prepared. The tempura was done very well with generous portions. The service and presentation, very good. This restaurant is very close to our home so we will be a regular here.
Sake Hana has great Sushi, an welcoming staff, and other delicious food.  Affordable for the entire family.
The food is excellent and the service is amazing. The staff make excellent recommendations especially if you are not a sushi expert. That's about all you need. 
This is a good Italian restaurant. Good selection of wines and pasta dishes. I ordered chicken parmigiana with linguine and my friend had spaghetti with meat balls.  Both were excellent.
We frequent this spot regularly as they have excellent chow and are very consistent.  Our pasta with an alfredo sauce was excellent, the grilled filet was a special of the day.. really good.  Good quality beers on tap... fine service.
Thank goodness there is one great server at Arturo's   She recognized our waitress totally ignored us and that we had been sitting there for 15 minutes with no one coming over. She took over as our waitress, personally I'd fire the other one who obviously can't do her job.  That said now to the food.  The bruschetta is to die for.  The tomatoes were perfect, the ricotta on it perfect, the ciabatta perfect.  Also had the arugula salad which also was very good.  The bolognese seemed to be missing one ingredient I found it kind of bland.  My husband had the pasta Napoli which also was just ok.  Neither of us would get our dishes again.  Save room for dessert and split it. The desserts are huge.  Tiramisu was awesome and the white and dark chocolate mousse was as well.  Not going to hurry back as it is about 45 minute drive.
We had a child-free night last night and chose to dine at Arturo's for the first time. When we arrived, we were somewhat surprised by the location and the storefronts in the plaza, but the inside was warm and inviting. The lighting was soft and low. It was loud at times and there were very young children in the restaurant which surprised us. The kids near us were well behaved though and more made me miss my kids than annoy me.

The food was delicious, starting with the bread. They give you 2 kinds and the foccaccia was delicious being both soft and chewy. We also got the fried rice balls or arrancini as we call them. They were stuffed with mozzarella and topped with a small amount of marinara sauce and parmesan cheese. They were crunch on the outside with this delicious middle. The garden salads were good, but nothing to write home about. 

My husband said his veal parmesan was some of the best he has ever had. I had the risotto special which had 5 gigantic shrimp. It was also delicious. 

We finished with the black and white mousse. Both my husband and I really enjoyed it. 

We found service to be very attentive and we never felt rushed. We are hoping to return soon.
We had a wonderful dinner with the most seasoned server Pierre. He made our dining experience excellent! Wonderful Frutte de mar with lots of pasta. Excellence Ceasar salad! We will be back when we visit again.
My wife and I stopped in Westborough Mass for the night on the way to Maine. We dined at Arturo's in Westborough for dinner.  The food is really great.  Our server was Pierre, who is a real gentleman and a real credit to the business. Arturo's is lucky to have him on staff and we were lucky to have picked Arturo's and that Pierre was our waitperson.  I will say that all of the staff was very pleasant and worked very hard.  The overall experience was great. 
I'm not going to lie--this is not the most pretty restaurant exterior or location you'd desire, but walk inside and prepared to be impressed not only with the decor, but of course with the food. I really value that Arturo's sources it's food as much as possible from local farms. The mozzarella is made right there and is fantastic. The tomatoes were sweet, the balsamic reduction was sweet and zingy at  the same time. It was simple and enormously tasty. And, big news here! since moving up from NY, we have found a decent pizza, well, more than decent. The veggie pizza was a virtual miasma of deliciousness. i find that most veggie pizzas are disappointing in their oily, overcooked veggies and throw together. This pizza was amazing. The eggplant alone was both crunchy and soft, so fresh and tasty. The crust, well, if you don't have a good crust, then your pizza is doomed. The crust was awesome--a perfect balance of crunchy and chewy. We will return again and again and again...
This has become our go to place when friends come to visit.  The food is wonderful and the service is excellent.  Whether you try one of the nightly specials or an item off of the menu you will not be disappointed.
Another fine dinner here.  No secret that this is one of the best spots in the area as the place was full tonight, as most nights we are here.  

The filet (as special) with their excellent mashed potatoes did the trick tonight... very tender and great flavor.  Excellent service.  Good bar.
Recommended by the Innkeepers @the Westborough Inn. Arrived close to closing time, after a day of sightseeing in Boston. Both our meals were great. Waiter was attentive; but not obtrusive.
This is not Boston. Bertucci's has better wood fired brick oven pizza. Service was superb and attentive at the right level. Attention to detail is excellent. The bread is amazing, fresh and flavorful. The red wine sangria for $9 was a very good value. We shares the special heirloom tomato and cheese plate which was delicious. $12. My husband had the special braised beef ravioli. He ate every bite. It was very good. It was tender and full of flavor. I had the Zazza pizza because I was not that hungry and was craving a great pizza. I was disappointed because I was hoping for better than Bertucci's. It wasn't but it was still good. Leftovers were great! For dessert, my husband had the cappuccino gelato and he liked it a lot. It was full on flavor. I had the limoncello cake with mascarpone frosting which was outstanding. Our bill came to $86. This is not an intimate dining option but it has potential. There were 2 children in the restaurant and honestly, it does not seem a family restaurant. One child was fussy and we did our best to ignore it. The parent did take the child outside but it took a while. We went here for our 10 year wedding anniversary. It was better than ok but did not meet our high expectations. It is a very nice place and we may return. We live outside the area but have family in the area. We do not eat out much so it is a bigger deal when we do. 
Traveling to the area - specifically return to this favorite. The food, service, and overall experience is first rate!
Went to this Resturant with my family and the service staff was very good but the food was not good at all. Portions were small price was high and overall if it wasn't being there with family I would have let the manager know disappointed I was with this Resturant. Will not be going back !!!!  
We go here at least 3 times a year. The food has always been delicious, a combination of standard and northern italian cuisine with fresh ingredients. They also serve the best filet mignon I have had in the area, even better than Ted's Montana grill just down the street.
We took friends out for Birthday and Anniversary celebrations.  We had a great waiter, John, who gave us nice recommendations and asked about any food allergies.  Their bread served with cheese and oil was excellent.  I ordered Veal Piccata and it was extremely tender and flavorful.  Everyone enjoyed their meals and my husband especially enjoyed their meatballs and pasta.  We split a flourless chocolate cake that was very moist and good.
For a few years I have heard people talk about how great Arturo's is and I finally made it over there for lunch.  The service was excellent and our food came out quick and was fresh.  The meats for the sandwiches are cut on site, which is a big plus.  The menu offered a lot of great options, including gluten free.  They also had a variety of entree salads and several specials of the day.  Our group all enjoyed our meals.  I was a bit skeptical because this is in a strip mall but inside it is well decorated, and you would have no idea that you were in a strip mall. Overall I can see what the buzz is about and I will be back.
One of the top places in the area for dinner.  My family and I enjoyed crab cakes, caesar salad, veal parm, penne with chicken... all excellent.  Particularly like the red sauce here... amazing stuff.  Our waiter, Tim, provided excellent service.
My experience may not be on par with others for this place is always rather busy, leading to me to assume a lot of repeat business, but in general the 4 or 5 times I have eaten here the food has been OK but nothing that leaves a lasting memory. 
The restaurant is quite large with a bar running down the wall facing the entrance that is a popular hang out. There are a few bar tops and booth tables, then behind lies the main floor and also a function room. 
The staff I find to be attentive most times. 
The menus is large, perhaps too large. I think they'd be better off offering less and injecting more seasonal dishes. 
Salads are just OK. The pizza sause is mediocre and I think as an italian place could be a lot better.
Westborough has a large dining out population with few outstanding restaurants which is probably what keeps many busy that otherwise may suffer. 

We ate at Arturo's for the first time, on our anniversary in May 2016.  Both the food and the service were excellent.  They even brought us a complimentary piece of cake with candles and two small glasses of moscota.  We will definitely go again.
Brought our 5.5 month old for dinner with my parents.  The service was excellent and the food superb.  Lots of options depending on what you like.  Wonderful specials and fabulous desserts.  It is a great spot with a nice bar area and comfortable restaurant.  We're often in the area for baseball tournaments and will recommend this to other families.
I'm from the south and we don't have Honey Dew there so I couldn't wait to try this.  The donuts were VERY good and HUGE!!  I was a TAD disappointed in the iced coffee though but it was more about how it was made than the quality of it.  The lady that made it poured the sugar in after the ice so the sugar didn't "melt".   That's no biggie.
Donuts are very fresh and along, it has a wide variety of muffins and danish pastries. All fresh n warm. Bagles are equally good too!

Staff is always smile and very friendly!  My kids love to go there and take advice from the staff for that day's special. 

Dunkin Donut in westborough is so rude and talk with such a face that my kids refused to place order there.  

For us, Honey Dew westborough is a weekly stop for fresh donuts and smile!
Good coffee, donuts and sandwiches.  Best of all one of few coffee shops serving fat free half and half.  I drink 4 to 6 cups a day if all I drank was light cream, not good.  Carry Moo Moo low fat 1/2 and 1/2 in car for Dunkins
Great locally owned restaurant.  Food is consistently good.  We often have pizza from here, but their souvlaki are excellent too.  
Been here many times and food id always fresh, tasty and great from Salads, sandwiches and full entrees. Assorted Italian, American dinners as well as pizzas, subs and customized sandwiches to your liking. Casual dining or if the weather is nice you can eat out side under the umbrella sheltered tables.
For some reason this is popular with my meetup group so I have been many times but do not look forward to it. They are understaffed, usually the same person working bar will also be the waitress and it takes a long time to get your food. I tried the calzone and it came out almost burnt. The ravioli was ok. Walking distance of the rotary but would not recommend.
WHOP has been a staple in town for years, and only gets better.  They have maintained their original great menu and food, but also offer a full and really beautiful bar and a great outdoor space in the nice weather.  The service and food is great----well beyond just pixxa
All the food was cold.... Chowder, moussaka, pasta. Salad was iceberg. The waitress offered grilled vegetables. They were frozen and steamed. Greek dressing was not the standard. Something white and creamy. Not bad but not what is typical. Food arrived five minutes after the salad, which I prefer to eat my salad first. There was no room on the table. The Waitress was new and could not answer questions. We waited 15 minutes to order but few people there. Why go back???? No reason.
As we are testing every local establishment for the best fish and chips, the House of Pizza, was not the first on my list, however it has gone to the top. Go to the bar in the back, and order the fish and chips. It is excellent, service is tested as they are usually stretched, but it was worth it. I will be back. 
Fantastic pizza! I have been visiting since I was a kid and my dad was driving.  My kids are now adults and I'd still pick them as the best pizza in the area.

Bad value; understaffed, so delivery is slow and food is cold. 
The pizza was small for the price, and poorly assembled. Pizza is easy to make, and yet they haven't grasped the skill. We do NOT recommend.
We were cold and hungry travelers when we stopped in to the Westboro House of Pizza.  The restaurant was comfortable and the staff was very friendly and helpful and the pizza was excellent.  The menu has a wide variety of offerings for every taste and the prices are very reasonable.  I definitely recommend stopping here.
You order at the counter, then they bring the food to your table. The pizza was good. We ordered a large and a small pizza for four adults and a child. We also had one appetizer and a salad.
Yeah, we've all been ordering great pizza, subs and more from WHOP for many years. But a while back they added a large bar (full liquor) with dining tables, a gas fireplace and got themselves a huge local following. There's also outdoor dining plus the usual seating in the regular restaurant. The only downside is the parking-the lot is small and there isn't anywhere else nearby to park. Cars do come and go quickly, though, as lots of people are just picking up to-go orders. Prices are low and portions are big. 
I've been here several times. Although I'm not from the area, usually when we're out that way, we make it a stop for a beer and pizza, grinders or wings. nice clean place! service and staff are usually pretty good. Nice place in the summer to sit outside and have a drink. 
They are a dependable quality pizza house.  In addition to pizza they have daily meal specials that are also good.  It has become more crowded since opening a lounge in an adjacent room.  This often makes parking a problem because the lot is too small. 
We stopped here for Fried Mozzarella Sticks and an extra large cheese pie to take home after a hockey game, and both selections were very good. I would certainly stop here again to both eat-in or take-out!! Don't miss it!
small friendly shop   has some outdoor tables where you can people watch- service is good  food is good and plentiful
Very good pizza plus many other items on the menu. Family dining area and then a more lounge like in the back. Decent prices. No complaints from us.
Had dinner after a game in the back bar with a large group on a Sunday night. The service was excellent and the back bar has a really nice set up - pretty upscale and unexpected for an HOP. The bartender did a great job in getting everyone's order when they wanted it and checked in frequently - she was very good. Most in our party had sandwiches and wings and enjoyed them. I love greek lamb - had the grilled lamb kabobs for $15.00; the plate was mostly rice, there were about 6-8 small grilled lamb tips - would not order again - nothing special about them - rather dry. With the Med influenced menu offerings I expected stronger seasoning, more lamb, and more tender. Nice time though. will try something else next visit.
The best pizza in town at an average price;nice dine in with family. Make sure to pay the tips in cash on the table as the owner doesn't give tips to servers 
They have the best pizza in town.  Crispy crust and not to much of it.  Flavorful tomatoe sauce, too.  The antipasto is terrific and the salad dressing is really good.
They have a nice selection of Pizza House style food.  Some interesting small dishes, and yummy fried chicken.  The full bar that they opened to the side of the original restaurant ads a nice atmosphere for a dinner out.
We stopped in for just a quick bite and sat in the pub area.  They had 2 IPAs, so I was happy.  We ordered wraps and they were good.  The came with french fries, which were also good.  The atmosphere was good and felt very local.

A couple of things that could be improved on were the wing choices.  Wings are a staple of a hometown pub and they offer 8 wings or 16 wings.  What happen to a dozen wings?  Also, they don't offer any dry rub or any honey hot types.

Otherwise, we want to go back sometime to check out the restaurant as the reviews of the full meals sound very good.
Great pick. Comfortable, friendly, great staff. The food is excellent. Everyone at our table was pleased. Compliments on the prime rib. I had the Barramundi Roulades and they were delicious. The portions are huge. Bread basket great. Wine list reasonable. These folks are quality oriented. Share a carrot cake! We will go back.
We dined on a Wednesday night when there were not too many people there.  The old fireplaces were welcoming,(we had been there a few times before when the fores were burning, leading to a cozy feel) and the food was very good.  We had good service and were able to sit comfortably and enjoy the company we went with in a quiet, relaxed setting.
Dinner was excellent - prime rib special was the hit at our table - carrot cake was delicious!  I had the grilled salmon on a salad and it was cooked perfectly.  Staff was knowledgeable & friendly - dining option includes the dining room or the more casual bar as well as an outdoor patio.  They also do take out pizza - we'll be back!
We were visiting relatives near Springfield, MA and they suggested we all dine here one evening.  What a great place.  The food was prepared perfectly and presented beautifully.  And it was delicious.  The portions are more than generous.  The menu has a good variety of selections.  The service was first rate.  I do appreciate that there was no noise from a television set.  When I dine with friends, I want their company and to enjoy the ambience of the restaurant.  This is a place that should be on your 'must visit' list.  It certainly is a place I'd like to visit again.
A beautiful,CLEAN,family restaurant!  And they have take- out!
We're so happy that we have a nice local place to eat,again.
We've been to the Coach Stop now about a half dozen times, last evening being the most recent, and have enjoyed each visit. There are picky things that I still think they could be doing better, but obviously, with several visits under our belts, those things aren't deal breakers.

This is one of those instances where I wish TripAdvisor had a "Good" rating, because "Average" feels too low and "Very Good" a little generous. The food is good, overall. The menu has a wide variety of choices from meat to seafood and pasta, with decent pizza as well. I've had a different entrée at each visit, and while some were better than others, all were good.

My constructive criticism is that the chef seems to be of the school of "more is better," both in portion size and in details. While hefty leftovers are great, I find some of the menu items to be chaotic and overdone in terms of flavors. For example, the lobster ravioli has capers, asparagus, sundried tomatoes, basil, crabmeat, and parmesan all in a hefty red cream sauce. Way overload. Not inedible (because I'm not afraid of heavy pasta by any means!) but just —overdone/fussy and completely nullifies the "lobster" aspect of the dish. Streamline it, balance things a little more, and would still be a great meal. Similarly, my dad had the stuffed sole—easily two full meals for him, he enjoyed it, but his observation was that it as basically a portion of tasty stuffing accented with some sole. 

We've also had chicken au peach (very good), chicken parm (my spouse's perennial favorite), chicken francese (good), chicken gorgonzola (meh), cordon bleu (good). The bar service is ok-ish: we've ordered one of the house cocktails twice--the first time it was great, so we had it again during another visit, and it was not good. I also asked for a kir last evening as we were ordering cocktails, and there seemed to be some confusion as to what that was. My husband told me I was being pretentious, LOL, so maybe that's true. But I wouldn't have expected that to be a stumbling block. (btw, the kir that finally made it to the table was a seriously hefty portion!)

The bad parts: last evening's calamari was just not good. It was tough and overcooked to the point of being inedible (we picked at the better parts but left about half the plate—and I noticed that the table next to ours left theirs mostly untouched as well.) The butter served with the starter bread is rock-hard, which is a huge peeve of mine, and the side mashed potatoes are consistently cold when they hit the table. Some of the support staff could use a little mentoring in customer interactions. This trip, it took a noticeable while for our server to swing by after we were seated in a mostly empty dining room. Not huge but these are the kinds of little annoyances that we've experienced consistently with each visit. 

One note: in the additional comments below, one question is "Is this restaurant appropriate for kids?" I responded yes, but only if the kids are old enough to be ok with sitting at the table for the duration. This isn't a family restaurant, with the objective of getting you in, fed, and out again. There really isn't room nor is it conducive to kids who need to be up and about while the adults finish their meals. The dining room is fairly close between tables so antsy, roaming kids can easily impede on other diners' space. Between this comment, and the one above about the kir, I'm sure the staff probably know who's leaving this review. :)

Give it a try—it's a solid place for a good meal, and easily worth the drive up the hill to get there. I'm a Hartland native and happy to see a business thriving in town. We'll absolutely be back.
Great Food, wonderful creative appetizers and soups.  Amazing fresh bread (though I wish they pipped the butter out, I hate rock hard frozen butter.  
Great Meals, great service and wonderful dessert menu.
We used to come to this restaurant when it was the Coach and Four and loved it.  We went to the Coach Stop with managed expectations and were pleasantly surprised at how good it was.  The service was good, the food was excellent and it had the same relaxed vibe.  It was a bit brighter than in the past but had the same charm.  If you are out that way, stop by.  You won't be disappointed.  They also have a bar pub area with pizza. We did not try that but it looked busy.
Visited the Coach Stop after hearing many good reviews from friends.  We were very happy the restaurant has opened and renovated a place we use to go to.  The menu has some great choices and the atmosphere is very nice.
We went with another couple for dinner. The food was fabulous. Very large portions. We had chicken cordon bleu, chicken parmesan, clams and potato crusted salmon. The service was wonderful.. We all brought food home. 
I would recommend Coach Stop. Lovely environment. Nice drive on a beautiful evening. Can't wait to go back.
After laying dormant for some time, pleased that this restaurant reopened, with a much-needed exterior face.  Happy the new owners chose to preserve the wonderful interior ambiance of the old Coach and Four.

Food selection quite extensive, with good selection of starters (even escargot and fresh oysters) , meat, poultry and seafood selections. Chicken Francese  and Penne Chicken were very well prepared and presented, with a nice selection of al dente vegetables.

Portions were more than ample - enough leftover for another meal. No room for desert.
Service was professional and friendly
Only complaint - glass of wine was a bit stingy for the money.
Will definitely return for a second visit.
We've been to The Coach Stop several times since it opened recently.  They have a wide variety of offerings, from steaks and seafood to burgers and pizza.  Everything that we've had has been excellent.  The pizza (available only in the bar/pub area) is very good.
Still working out some of the newness kinks, but everything homemade and portions are generous and well balanced. We hope it succeeds as there are no other nice places in the immediate area. Food overall quite good. Menu very large and varied. Friendly servers. 
As a long-time East Hartland resident, I was very excited when our only restaurant re-opened. My wife and I were not disappointed. As Super Bowl Sunday approached, we decided to put our faith in the Coach Stop to provide our food for the evening. This is a big risk, as a Super Bowl is not very super without good food. Specifically, the pizza was very good and the wings were really really good! While I am a Buffalo loyalist, I have to say the Teriyaki wings were excellent - and huge! Great success!!
After driving all day a friend and I decided to try this resturant. Not many restraints to choose from so we gave it a whirl. The dining area was empty , it was Tuesday night after a storm and rain. The bar had some guests. The filet mignon with bacon was fantastic!  The sides were well prepared and super salad was fresh. Took home desserr, carrot cake and chocolate raspberry obsession.  A little on the expensive side but hey its was worth it. 
I love the inside of the Coach. Very old and traditional, with three working fireplaces. We sat near one, on a very quiet night. My husband was celebrating his birthday, so we wanted something special. Waitstaff was very good, and very informative. She even went to ask the cook about the size portion of my fish, since i a m on WW. It was a very big portion of Fresh Cod fish, and it was delicious. The vegetables served with out meal were fresh, and the salad was also fresh and very crisp. Dressing all made on premise. 
My husband's decadent chocolate cake was a delightful ending to a truly wonderful dining experience. I  was in the restaurant business for a good part of my life, and know when I have found a winner. We will return often.
A relative, who lives in Hartland, had been to the recently reopened restaurant and was very complimentary about their experience and offered to take me and my wife there for dinner before Christmas.

I am not sure if some of the reviewers actually rated the correct restaurant...no ambience?  It is a 1700's colonial building with a giant multisided fireplace right in the middle, nicely furnished.  It has plenty of ambience, but I'd agree it was a bit brightly lit.  SItting at a table in front of the fire was a very nice way to spend our dinner. 

We were welcomed warmly and seated promptly (it was a bit early), but could not have our choice of table as there were a number of reservations for holiday party groups.  Table we had was by the entrance to the dining room and one chair (mine, the one that backed up to the door) got a pretty cold draft each time the door opened.  Everyone else (a bunch of people who would sit IN a fire and still say it was cool) had no complaint.  Not a big deal for me, but it could have been for someone else.

Drink orders were promptly filled with clean glasses.  I do recall the dinner salad being a touch skimpy...but the bread was hot, fresh, and excellent.  

Appetizer was calamari and it was very good.  I can't remember all the entrees.  One had the salmon on the menu, another had the chicken cordon bleu (a substantial portion...probably even 2 meals - or a meal and a snack - for this man's large appetite).  I think my wife had a scallop dish and for the life of me, I can't remember exactly what I ate, but I think it was a pasta with portabello mushrooms and pancetta.  All of our meals were very, very tasty. I've recommended the restaurant to my friends and coworkers that live in the area.

The owner stopped by a couple times to make sure all was well and everyone was attentive.  

I can't imagine anyone calling a meal they got there "disgusting" and whoever did over a hair and some dirty glasses, while their entrees were "well prepared and good" sounds like a major prima donna.

I can certainly see a new restaurant having growing pains and I am sure that was the root of many of the service issues upon opening.  Honestly, it probably isn't that easy to find great help willing to try to work a restaurant in the middle of nowhere!  It appears that the kinks have mostly been worked out.
We loved Coach & Four and were OK with Cugino's. The Coach Stop is reminiscent of the old Coach & Four. We haven't dined in and have had take out a few times. The Coachman's Special pizza is a hit. Fresh ingredients and piping hot when I got there to pick it up. It was delivered on time. I've had the Toscana and Mediterranean salads. Both salads were very nicely presented and like the pizza, the ingredients were fresh.

We look forward to having dinner there, either in the dining room or in the bar. I'll write another review after that visit.
This was our first time at The Coach Stop, once previously known as The Coach and Four, East Hartland, CT.  The service and greeting is friendly.  The tavern and restaurant are separate.  The atmosphere is very comfortable, a casual older home ambiance with three center abutted fire places. You may dine in the tavern area.  We chose the formal dining room, featuring a white table cloth.  This is a great find and recommended.  My favorite lobster ravioli had to have, included salad or soup.  The sauce included asparagus, crab meat, sundried tomato and capers.  The sauce was more on the salt side then I normally like.  I still enjoyed it.  We also enjoyed the veal parmesan.  Very tender veal, would recommend.
This place is totally unique to Granby and reflects our community well.  Sit on the porch and have a wonderful, unique leisurely lunch with friends.  It is a scenic spot to eat as well...in an orchard and way off the road so you really feel like you have escaped the hustle and bustle of our busy lives.  Food and staff are terrific and never rush you to finish up.
My husband and I were driving in the area and it was the 3rd week of October. We saw signs for the Lost Acres Winery and decided to try it. While we were there we asked for a recommendation for lunch. They said the Lost Acres Orchard had a wonderful bakery. As we were driving there, it started to snow!!! It was very light snow but still snow! We arrived at the bakery and I was delighted to see they had some gluten free options which was unexpected. They do not have an area to sit inside so we sat outside on the patio. The owner got the patio heater going. The food came out and it was so fresh and delicious. We picked some apples and then we bought some baked goods to go. My husband got the apple dumplings which he said was amazing and I got the gluten free lemon bar with toasted coconut. It was so good. The staff are lovely and everything is freshly made. It is a hidden gem.
The food is excellent, much of it from their own gardens.  
The baked goods are to die for, whether it's their breads, pies, cookies, cinnamon buns.
The setting is beautiful - bucolic, with apple orchards (pick your own or buy).
The people are wonderful!
Only open during the warmer months, but a must place to visit on a beautiful day.  All meals are homemade from scratch and the wait staff donate their tips to a local charity.  Lunch is the only meal served, but the choices are plenty including deserts.  No liquor license, but so what.  My friend had the Chicken Salad Wrap and and I had the chicken salad with flat bread. Both were excellent.  Same for the service.  Many home made pies to choose for desert.  Will be back and we will have a group of friends next time.  Vineyard is just done the street in case someone needs wine before heading home.
Roast beef with horseradish sauce on a grinder roll.  Can I tell you it tastes like heaven.  Just a tiny bit of kick to the horseradish sauce and the roast beef was tender not chewy. They also sell there own brand of cheeses that are really good and worth the money.
What a delightful gem in a country where sometimes to an outsider like myself things can seem too mass-produced and enfranchised. This store is authentic to a T. There are a selection of cheeses they make, which the man at the counter allowed us to sample. The extra sharp Granville was particularly delightful and goes well with fruit. There were lots of other delicious treats in this store and the Coca Cola machine of a vintage variety was quite impressive! Fresh coffee is available for purchase. The whole town has great heritage and is well worth visiting, I loved it.
We decided to take a short drive to the Granville Country Store just because we wanted to get a large block of their incredible cheese for a hostess gift.  What we didn't plan on was sitting down to an impromptu lunch where we watched the comings and goings of this classic New England town from a window seat. The sandwiches were fresh and delicious, the store was a trip back in time and the staff treated us like we were old friends even though it was our first visit. Their cheese products are carried by Highland Park Markets and other stores but, we will be doing our "cheese runs" in person from now on. Take some time to take this trip and let your cares slip away in this "oasis" of calm and delicious eating.
Cheese horse radish melt that was outstanding! Bread toasted to perfection. Melted cheese, bacon , tomato that was a bargain at $5.95.
Little country store with a some groceries, ice cream, cheese, wine, pizza, limited sandwich menu that would be worth a stop if you happened to be in the area.
Old fashioned décor with wooden floors, few tables out front.
This is a nice store were all the locals drop by in the morning to grab a coffee. They do sell a variety of items but most people go for their cheese and baked goods. They have recently expanded into grinders and pizza which are good but their bread and pies are freshly baked with local ingredients and are amazing (especially if you grab some Scoop icecream from down the road to go with the pie).


I've been here twice and both times were for their homemade cheddar cheese. The cheese is supposedly made in their cellar and its a very dense cheddar. I've tried the extra sharp, which isn't extremely sharp, the smoked cheddar which is creamy and has a nice smokey flavor and the horseradish which will light up your nose. The horseradish is a softer cheese and if you like wasabi, this is the cheese for you! Take a trip into Granville, enjoy the scenery, stop at a farm stand and get some fresh fruit and top it off with some old school cheddar cheese!
There comes a time when places should be upgraded every 50 years.
We were traveling nearby and thought...Hey,, the Granville Country 
store could be a cool.... a non corporate choice....but in the 30+ years
since I have been there little has been done to upgrade..paint...clean
and now a horrid port-a-potty way back in in the parking lot..no place to wash.
Dining tables looked like unwashed for days...I had to clean ours.
Lots of "stuff", boxes..etc  just piled about in corners.
New England frugality brought to a new level or else
this place is cruising to its obvious end.
Great Homemade Ice Cream. Enjoy your ice cream in the yard with the local farm animals. you can pet various critters and purchase a handful of food to feed them (don't feed them your cone) Great family owned business. great place for kids. (and a fun place to drive to when teaching your teen to drive).
Had a wonderful Family Movie night. Dinner on the lawn. Great ice cream and they even have popcorn and other snacks just in case. Go early to see the animals.
This place is fantastic. Ice cream is delicious and a must. Very local farm feel to the place and popular even though it is off the beaten path. The best part besides the icecream is that they have a farm that you can walk around and see all their animals. Pigs, cows, goats, sheep, chickens, turkey, llamas ducks, etc. The kids can feed the animals if they want to. Its really fun to wander around  with your ice cream and see all the animals. the family/servers are extremely friendly and service is quick. Portion size is large for ice-cream. Very clean feel as well even though it is on a farm.Clean bathrooms and large parking lot.  We will definitely be back to visit. 
We love 'The Scoop'. The ice cream is very good. It's rich and creamy. They have several different varieties of ice cream. 

They are open from April to October. The kids will enjoy eating their ice cream while visiting the farm animals - Goats, Sheep, Lamas, Chickens, Cows and more.

The ice cream here is made weekly. We order an ice cream sheet cake every year for our son's birthday. It may seem expensive, but when you compare it to Carvel or Friendly's it's a better value and of course better ice cream. We feed 20 people good size pieces and have enough leftover for a us to have 3 or 4 times. They also have smaller round cakes for smaller groups. They have a few round cakes in the freezer, but you're better off placing an order. Orders must be placed at least a week in advance.
Just one of those summery nights and decided to go for a ride, and ended up at the Scoop (some premeditation was involved). First trip of the 2016 season and will be repeated as the summer plays out. Goats, chickens, pigs, cows, llamas, alpacas, bunnies and very vocal geese provide a unique backdrop to AWESOME ICE CREAM! We buy it at other locations but, nothing beats having it at the home-based family farm. Try it - it's like a "spa" in a cone : }
This family run, long standing business brings young and old together for not only wonderfully made homemade ice cream, but experiences with farm animals.  There is a variety of ice cream flavors, crafty items for sale, ice cream pies, cookies, and even lunch offerings.  The Brown family exceeds expectations when offering the finest ice cream in our neck of the woods!
Decent ice cream and a bit overpriced.  Not my favorite in the area, but I do enjoy taking company with kids there to see the critters in their little menagerie (donkey, goats, llamas, chickens, rabbits, shetland, sheep).  The goats just crack me up.  It is a nice enough spot to take a drive out into the country on a hot evening.
This place is great just regular, a wonderful place to bring kids to see animals and have a treat. For Halloween however, they go above and beyond! For no charge, they had an awesome Halloween event for kids. Trick-or-treating, games, haunted house, and of course, ICE CREAM! Perfect for lots of ages, my 1yr old had a blast running around and seeing all of the costumes. Thank you!!!
Homemade ice cream, true flavor.  Pumpkin ice cream was like pie.  Visit the animals, pony rides were on Wednesday.  I’m a pistachio freak with hot fudge.  Ice cream cakes are also available.  Many flavors and I do not have to travel far for homemade ice cream.
Half gallon to myself one weekend. Added butterscotch to my root beer float and ate whole half gallon chocolate that weekend. I can't get enough.
Love the ice cream-fresh and homemade!  So many flavors to choose from.  The atmosphere is great with all the farm animals outside.  Great place to get a treat and see animals!  Recommend for sure!
Yummy fresh ice cream! The kids love to look at the animals and give them some food so bring some quarters. They also have a few thing in the cooler like milk, eggs, cheese, and whipped cream in case you need something while you're there.
Home made ice cream from quality ingredients. What more could a Granville Girl ask for? Friendly service is an added bonus.
I took a colleague from out of town to the scoop mid afternoon on an unusually hot (90+ degrees) spring day.  We were 3 friends.....cone, shake, sundae.  Each was scrumptious.

The entertainment included the farm animals  (cows, llamas, chickens, donkeys, goats).  Read about the history that's posted on the door. 

It was a 30 minute drive just to get ice cream, but the drive from northern Connecticut was pretty, and the small farms were charming.
Lots of choices at the scoop!  A little of the beaten path but worth the trip.  They offer a fine assortment of flavors with a few new offerings popping up from time to time.  There is a petting zoo out front as well.  Great place to bring the kids when you want to get out and have a cone or a sundae!
Been going to this place for years and the quality has always been top notch. Everything is made from scratch from the icecream to the waffle cones. You can buy hotdogs, soup and some other hot foods but this place is primarily a icecream parlor. Unfortunately it is only open durring the summer.
Amazingly good ice cream. Huge selection, good prices. Made right there on the grounds.  Small well kept group of animals for the kids to check out. Not a petting zoo atmosphere, as you cannot go into the animal enclosures. But the smaller kids enjoyed seeing them through the fences. They have calfs on the grounds from a local Granville dairy farm up the road through the summer months that may give the impression they milk onsite for the ice cream, but they don't.  

If you have a chance to eat this ice cream, I don't suggest you miss it!
If you love Ice Cream....this is your place ! Homemade ice cream that beats the competition. This is a great place to go if you are looking for a nice drive, light lunch and wonderful ice cream. The kids will enjoy seeing the animals. An old fashioned "day out". We popped out for a quick treat after dinner...and will definitly be going back !
I used to come here as a kid, I would love having ice cream and then being able to pet lamas, goats, and all the other common petting zoo animals. Now whenever I go, it is definitely nostalgic, but still a lot of fun. All of there ice cream flavors are extremely fresh (you can even see their milking cows right outside) and you can tell that their animals are being taken care of. My favorite flavor is strawberry, sooo good!
I mean, it is a farm, so my ratings reflect the kind of operation. But in the summer, it is worth the drive (or bike ride) from anywhere in western Mass or Connecticut.  They have farm animals too.  So don't bring Fido. 

They also sell big 1/2 gallons and we stock up.

Now, if they only made coconut ice cream (no chocolate), I would be in heaven.
Recently went here for a family reunion and I must say this place is great for events.  There is plenty of parking for cars and activities for everyone to enjoy.  The food was delicious and there is plenty and the staff are very friendly and helpful.  I would recommend this place.
This restaurant occupies the two front rooms of what must have once been an historic home. Riverton was once home to the famous Hitchcock Chair Company. The mighty Farmington River runs through it and used to power the factory there. In recent years there've been attempts to revive the craft in town. I'm not sure how successful they've been. 

But for decades, the Catnip Mouse has been a cozy dining spot serving delicious, inventive, hearty, yet not heavy, soups, sandwiches and salads. The owner/chef is a genius (a bit temperamental...but she's earned it! She's an artist!) She bakes her own bread for the sandwiches. The Montecristo is out of this world. I have dreams about it. The menu is small. It changes every few days and is handwritten on lovely menus. 

Make sure you save room for dessert! The Tollhouse and Chess pies put any others you've had to shame. I promise you it's worth the trip for the desserts alone. 

Make sure you call ahead, the hours are limited. And don't ask for any substitutions, the chef won't give you any. If things get slow in the kitchen, she'll come out, have a seat and start knitting at a rocking chair in the dining room. 

And, after you've stuffed yourself, you can go for a walk in the nearby People's State Forest under the towering pines along the Farmington River. Walk off some of that pie!
A charming place to stop and enjoy a pot of tea and wonderful food. Home made desserts and sandwiches to die for. They are not always open, so if you have a chance to stop, don't pass it up
She creates such a cacophony of flavors, ones you'd never expect would work together BUT DO!!  Treat yourself.... treat your friends and relatives.  It's such a quaint place, full of nostalgia and GREAT FOOD!!
My friends and I have eaten at this restaurant many times.  The establishment is family run.  The food is excellent at reasonable prices. They make fresh food. They make home baked bread and    creative desert selections. This is truly a great treat.
I was first introduced to this restaurant a couple of weeks ago when a friend took me to lunch here.  I'm a picky eater, so when I first looked at the menu I thought 'what looks safe'.  I opted for the "Cape Codder" half sandwich and Italian wedding soup.  When the food arrived, I was amazed at the size of the half sandwich - it pretty much filled the plate.  I had to cut my sandwich and eat it with a fork because there was no way it would fit into my mouth any other way!  Both the soup and sandwich were delicious.  You can tell that everything is homemade and fresh.  Then came dessert.  I chose the apple pie with caramel and homemade ice cream.  It was even better than I had hoped.  
I went home and told my husband that he would be bringing me there for lunch on my birthday.
So today we arrived and I found my 'safe' sandwich was no longer on the menu.  Not to worry though, I found another wonderful choice and it was just as enjoyable.  My husband was going to order a full sandwich and soup, but I warned him that the half sandwich would be plenty.  When it came, he was surprised at the size.  It's the first time he ever had to eat a sandwich with a knife and fork!  
Both times I visited the owner and waitress were very attentive and pleasant.
Lunch on Saturday, October 5, 2013 was outstanding. Soup & sandwich to die for! Indian pudding for dessert was a perfect ending. 
Love this place.  The ladies do a fantastic job.  Food is always fresh and different.  I was there with two friends.  Two of us had a wonderful Chicken salad with fresh strawberries, blueberries, sugared pecans, feta and chicken.  The dressing was wonderful.  I would truly go there every week if I could.  Relaxing and quaint.
I've been eating here for years.  The food quality and originality is superb. Everything is made in house and is fresh. The kitchen is clean and attention to food safety is apparent.  Since the menu changes you can eat here often and have a new experience each time if you wish. 
Love stopping here for lunch.  Everything is homemade, bread, soups, desserts. Had a delicious minestrone and half sandwich.  The sandwiches are delicious and filling, even just a half sandwich.  
Desserts are great- shared a delicious apple pie.  Also a great selection of teas.
Hidden in Riverton, CT (a subsection of the small town Barkhamsted) is this wonderful, charming lunch place.  All of the bread, ice cream, etc. is made from scratch.  Sandwiches are HUGE - you should opt for half sandwich and soup or salad so you can try more of the yummy options.  Soups are made from scratch and I'm not even a huge soup fan but I love all her creations.  Although lunch will be filling, save room for dessert - at any time there's always several homemade ice creams to choose from as well as other desserts like lemon macaron tart, raspberry peach cobbler, profiteroles, etc.  Menu changes every so often so you can easily stop by many times and never eat the same thing twice.  It's worth the drive!
This is our fourth time eating at The Catnip Mouse Tearoom and we have never been disappointed. Everything is homemade and delicous.  The soup, sandwiches, desserts are the best in the state! Sandwiches are made on homemade bread and are huge. The menu changes often and always offers creative, delicous choices. Try the half sandwich & soup - you'll be full, but you have to leave room for dessert. Yum! Open Tues.-Sat. 11:30-1:30.  Charming and delicous!
Today was our first, but not our last, visit to Catnip Mouse.  The food was delicious as well as the desserts.  There were 4 in our party and we all ordered something different.  The chicken and wild rice soup was excellent...wish I had more!  The 1/2 sandwich was huge and very tasty.  The bread was the best I've ever had...really.  Save room for dessert.  The make all their own desserts as well as ice cream.  Can't wait until our next visit!
From the moment you step through the door you are transported in to a quaint and comfortable tea room filled with interesting visuals and aromas to die for.
The menu (hand written) explains whats causing your senses to explode.  
The sandwiches are enormous and the food is nothing short of pure perfection.  The difference is this is not your typical tea sandwiches, this is hearty home made food with a twist.  Our meal included the BLT Soup- that alone gives you an idea of the quirky yumtasticness at The Catnip Mouse.
The rooms is decorated with the most interesting antiques and victoriana...I want to live there.  Its a day vacation for your tastebuds and your eyes-  I cannot praise it enough.  What a glorious find!
The restaurant is a bit dark, so try to get a seat near a window.  The sandwiches are indeed quite large and tasty.  While it wasn't a large cup, I did enjoy the cup of soup that came with my sandwich & soup combo.  At $9.95, I felt it was a fair value.  My companion had a salad, which - while it apparently tasted good - felt overpriced at $12.95.  While I intend to try the other restaurants in Riverton, I will likely go back one day and would recommend it to others.
Where do I begin about the Catnip Mouse Tea Room? For starters,a piece of advice: do not eat a single thing prior to your visit and save all of the room that you can for dessert! Its an old Victorian home in the center of what is a very small CT town, Riverton. Blink twice and you'll miss the sign for this truly hidden gem. 

My beau and I arrived around 12:30 to an empty first floor restaurant, adorned with antiques, family pictures of the grand kids, crocheted curtains, and antiques alike, creakind floors, which just added to the charm of this place, only open mon-sat, 11-2:30. We were greeted warmly by the owner and a super friendly server. The menu, handwritten is all soups, sandwiches and salads of truly unique creations. In about 10 minutes the door kept opening and the crowds kept piling in. What seemed so unadvertised, clearly is well known around the area! From other reviews, we were told to try the 1/2 sandwich, cup of soup. I had the turkey reuben and butternut squash bisque, while my sig. other ordered the BLT soup! had it not been fall and me craving bisque, i would've gotten that. There were an array of teas, coffee, soft drinks, upon server recommendation i had the cinnamon tea in my own mini pot. he had the special, apple cider.  

While waiting we found out the owner, is a self taught cook and uses the local market for groceries and not the distributes since her business is so small, and to me meant, more cozy and delicious than the mass produced chains! my favorite kind. we also stared at the dessert board and about 10 flavors of homemade ice cream. Our meals arrived and the first thing I noticed was the huge 1/2 sandwich on homemade thick crusty bread. the reuben was made of fresh turkey, swiss, freshly buttered and grilled bread, russian dressing,  but what made it so unique was a red cabbage kraut and apple slices! the soup was creamy and perfect. I had to try the BLT, which was a creamy, chunky tomato soup with small croutons and bacon. abs. divine. his chicken salad had whole almonds, dried cranberries and the perfect roasted chicken in a creamy mayonnaise dressing on the same buttered bread. Not only were we stuffed, but perfect stuffed and ready for more.

We waited a few minutes and had to ask about each dessert since they all had wonderful, short names on the board, almond joy, bread puddings, apple dumplings, you name the craving, it was on there. underneath were her flavors she makes in house: vanilla, mocha madness, banana nut to name a few. we had the turtle pie and the bread pudding, both served with vanilla ice cream and fresh whipped cream. words can't describe the sweet and perfectly portioned desserts. fresh, creamy and delicious.

All in all, the Catnip Mouse Tea Room is absolutely the perfect lunch spot for the family, or for the ladies or a perfect saturday Litchfield drive lunch date. I can't rave enough about this place and it's service. We were stuffed happily and can't wait to return!
Went for lunch with my wife and three friends. We each had the lunch special, which is a half-sandwich and a cup of soup. We all had the cream of zucchini soup, which everyone agreed was excellent. The half-sandwiches were as big as a full sized sandwich. The bread was home-made, and the fillings were very generous and tasty.

This place is out in the sticks, and if you didn't know exactly where it is you'd pass right by it. But it is very much worth finding for a great meal.
My wife and I visited the restaurant with friends who highly recommended the restaurant ... even though it involved a lengthy drive ... My wife and I both had a half turkey sandwich and basil and garlic soup ...  The soup was scrumptious ... the half sandwich was huge (larger than a regular whole sandwich) and delicious ... Although  I was not that hungry, it was so good I ate the whole thing ... We will go again .................................
A must stop for a good lunch. The sandwiches are very large and I recommend getting a half with soup or salad.
Order a fresh homemade soup and a half a sandwich, it will blow you away. Home made bread and creative ideas are put together in your sandwich, to create the yummiest lunch ever. Always try to split a desert, your in for a real treat!! Dont leave without desert even if your super full...
The 30-minute drive from Hartford to Riverton to get to this delightful Victorian-themed tearoom is beyond gorgeous...  so don't let a little distance bother you!   The incredible food (EVERYTHING is home-made or home-grown), cute atmosphere, and beyond friendly service here is *** FIRST RATE!! ***  As several of the other reviewers recommended, DO get the half-sandwich with the soup (the best of both worlds.  You simply will not believe the size and thickness of the half-sandwich & the soup is the best I've ever had.   EVER).   The "Blueberry Thrill" sandwich was recommended to me by the owner's daughter-in-law...  and what a treat it was!!!!!   Even the bread for the sandwich was baked fresh that morning.  WE WILL DEFINITELY BE BACK TO THIS WONDERFUL GEM OF A TEAROOM.  (For the tea-drinkers, there are many, many varieties of teas to choose from).  Dessert?  Oh, where to start???  It took us 10 minutes decide!  I stayed with my blueberry theme for the day and ordered the "Blueberry Pot Pie" and would have probably ordered a 2nd one if I hadn't thought that my fiance' would have died of embarrassment!!   Just 2 minor suggestions to help future diners:   Cash and checks are accepted but not credit cards.  The closest ATM is about 4 miles away.   Also, not that we each wouldn't have ordered a dessert anyway (we most definitely would have), but it would have saved Paul another run to the ATM if we had known that desserts are 7.00 each.    (Cost was not posted on the menu or the chalkboard).   I give this FANTASTIC tearoom the highest of ratings in ALL catagories!!  CAN'T WAIT TO GO BACK!!!
Just discovered they deliver and they are the by far the best food you can get here in Granby that is delivered.  And their menu is wide ranged so you dont always have to have pizza delivered!
Looking for a last minute lunch place and came across this very authentic family owned Italian / Greek establishment....

I have driven by this place a thousand times... So glad I finally stopped! Hidden gem.

The classics are wonderful here...
Chicken Alfredo and a gyro is what we had and the salad was fresh and crisp! 

Bonus that it is a BYOB! 
Cannot wait to have a family dinner there and try more of the dishes. 

Job well done and I hope Granby and surrounding towns will embrace you!


I advise everyone to stay clear of this place!! They are the rudest people I have ever come in contact with. I have had multiple issues with them but continue to give them another chance but not again! Every time there is an issue the owner gets on the phone with me and yells at me anbd hangs up on me! Do not give your,money to these people!!!!!!!
Running a good restaurant is hard and I so want them to succeed so I hate to give poor reviews.  Maybe their pizza will keep them going, but we have not tried that. Ordered a couple entrées tonight and tomato sauce was the thin, rosy colored type with not much taste. The rolls were like hotdog buns or sub rolls and the lettuce was iceberg....that was the kicker.  Won't be back, sorry😟
I ordered a take out pizza.  From start to finish it was a good experiance.  Friendly people, on time, piping hot and very good pizza!   I would recommend giving this place a try, I will definitely return.
Good food at a good price.  Staff and friendly and fast.  Not a chain restaurant so the food is made to order and delivered promptly.
This is a good, local place with very tasty Italian dishes, pizza and broasted chicken.  I have never had anything I did not like and have been coming here for 20 years.  Very basic décor.
This one of our favorite places in town. We eat at NEP often and have tried many of the items on the menu including specials. We never had an problem with any meal. The staff is very friendly. Since we frequently eat here, we are even greeted by the staff who makes the meals.

The meals are reasonably priced. I'm a fussy eater so it's nice they don't mind when I request substitutions.

Their pizza is also very good from small to party size (party size must be ordered at least 24 hrs in advance). 
This landmark restaurant in the town of Granby never disappoints-food is well prepared, service is excellent, and the facility clean.  Take out service is also offered, and that too gets high ratings with our family!
My husband ordered chicken parm and I had shrimp and scallops.  He asked me to taste the chicken ,I took a bite and spit it out.  I told him not to eat it, it was rancid.  He picked it up with the fork, smelled it and just about passed out.  My meal was $18 and I rec'd 4 scallops (small) and 4 small shrimp, very salty.  We have eaten here a few times but will no longer.
Their pizza is consistently delicious and the staff is incredibly friendly.  We typically take out, but on occasion when we eat in, we are not disappointed.  
Perfect crust pizza, not too thick and not too thin. I always try and get there when I'm in town as they don't make pizza like this in Ohio! I liked the old Town Line Pizza before Maria and her brother retired and this pizza is just as good.
The breakfasts here are some of the best in the area.  I meet my friends here for breakfast because of the cozy atmosphere and great food.  Plus the prices are very reasonable.
My friend and I meet here for breakfast to catch up with each other quite a bit.

The food here is very good and reasonably priced. I've ordered pancakes, french toast and eggs and never had a complaint. This time I had and Omelet filled with ham and onions. It also came with home fries.  The staff is very friendly.
I stopped in to Toni Ann's this past Saturday.  The set-up was filthy!!!!  The silver wear had a film on it and the bud vase on the table had the same film.   I took my napkin and polished it, it came off. It was improperly washed!!!  I am not sure why it seemed so dirty; but, we immediately left.  I am surprised the restaurant would use such dirty settings.  I will never go back.
Every time I go into Toni Ann's, I feel like I am stepping back into the fifties and my teen years.  Good food, good prices, nice people.  We go there almost every Sunday for breakfast.  Blueberry pancakes, French toast, omletts and fried eggs with bacon are our staples.  All the coffee you can drink.  And they have the best burger in the whole area!
We've been going to Toni Ann's for years, and it's been consistently great.  Toni and the other staff are friendly and always attentive with more coffee, and quick service.  They have good specials, the coffee is some of the best I've had - never bitter, never weak - just great.  If you need more jelly, you can just ask when they come around with more coffee, or catch the waitress's eye - they always pay attention, never the 'I don't see you' that you get in some restaurants.  There are fresh flowers on the table, and specials for holidays - like a flower on mother's day.  Just a great friendly place.
I've been coming here for over 10 years and love the place. It's a little pricey but so worth it. Portions are HUGE, but I'm little so could be me. 
I'll admit I'm a picky eater, but they're always sweet about it, and willing to accommodate. 
I recommend them all the time. Good food, good down home people.
I love Judy!

come here over the years. always a friendly welcome and service with a smile.
the breakfast and lunch have always  been satisfying. the place to go when Mom needs a break. reasonable price.
I have been eating at Toni Ann's several times a year --- always for breakfast. I have previously been quite positive on this place. However, in the past few months it is just not as good as it once was. I suspect it is the cook because how hard is it to make eggs/omelets/pancakes/etc. I hope that the owner reads this soon.
Really good home cooked breakfast food.  My BFF loves the Eggs Benedict.  I am more of a pancake person.
Good food and nice service. Decent prices and country design. Nice place to go out with the family for a good breakfast.
This is your basic breakfast - waffles, pancakes, or eggs any style or soup and sandwich lunch. It a hangout for seniors so you know it's good and reasonably priced. Toni Ann runs the front and you will be treated like a friend. If you are in the area stop in for a good breakfast or lunch without the frills.
We've gone to Tony Ann's for the last 5 years and found it to be excellent and down right good. My family normally orders the pancakes for the kids chocolate chips my wife usually gets the French toast I get the eggs over easy. The home fries are home made not deep fried and are as u would expect them to made with love. The server's are the owner's as are cooks and we always look forward to going to breakfast at toni anns we've made it a family outage on the weekend. The place is clean and home like great for family.


Travelling up Route 10/202, we took a chance on breakfast at Toni Ann's.  The parking lot was packed as was the restaurant when we stepped inside.

Service was great, they took our order for coffee and breakfast as quickly as we were seated.  The egg sandwich and veggie omlet were very tasty.  The portions were large and these items came with toast and home fries.  The "hot item" was the blueberry pancakes that looked really excellent, 3 large pancakes, that most patrons couldn't finish.  The coffee was replenished frequently.

The staff was friendly and efficient.  Cash was not a problem as this meal was very affordable but there is an ATM inside if you need cash.
Avoid this dump..... Food is bad...... Gossip is good, Toni Ann gossips so much she has wrinkles around her mouth....
The coffee was undrinkable.  Weak and bitter.  Served with the cream containers on a plate on top of the coffee, to ensure that the cream goes sour.

The omelet was inedible.  Undercooked to the point that the cheese in it hadn't even melted.
I asked for extra toast.   My total of eight pieces of toast were under-toasted to the point that you couldn't tell them from regular bread.  And served with a SINGLE half-height package of grape jelly - enough for a single slice.
I did the mistake of biting into the undercooked omelet.  Pure Crisco taste.   And filled with vacuum packed pieces of ham that hadn't even been browned first.

Then, to top it off, the waitress gave us a bill where we had to sum everything up ourselves, cause she obviously couldn't be bothered to do it.
She asked "how was the food", to which I'd replied "I'd rather not say".  She then disregarded my wish and asked "what was wrong with it?"
Just one look at the plate should have told her that everything was seriously undercooked and the ratio of toast to jam was way off.

Oh, and they didn't even take anything off the bill.  $20 for nothing.

This is the worst breakfast I've had at a restaurant, ever.  By far.
We stopped by on a whim and realized, very quickly, that if you weren't a regular or long-time resident of the town, you were identified as an outsider and treated as such.  The food was okay.  Nothing spectacular but the overall atmosphere just did not give me the "welcome" feeling I would have liked.
Stopped here for the first time today on the ride down 202. Great roasted vegetable grilled cheese w/sweet potato fries em em good. Cash only here but who cares the food is great.
I've eaten here a lot over the past 5 years. The food has always been good. I have literally never had a bad meal in all that time, out of the 50 or so times we have visited. Their omlet meals and big breakfast will satisfy even the most hungry customer, and my son LOVES their pancakes.

My two complaints are the staff and the fact that they don't take debit/credit cards. For the staff... they just never seem nice. Always rushed, and not really valuing the customer. Out of all of the times I have been there, I get offered a coffee refill maybe 5% of the time. They just never come back after you have your food. 

For the debit and credit cards - they don't take them, but they now have an ATM there, which I'm sure charges a fee for it's use. They really need to just accept the times and give in.
I eat at Toni-Ann's every day. She has, consistently, the best coffee in town. The meals are cooked the way I like them. The wait staff is pleasant, cheerful and attentive. A second cup of coffee is always offered. She is known for her "circular" counter. Built to accommodate those who  want to discuss the world's problems looking across from each other. She has been in business for over twenty years. She must be doing the right things or she would be so popular.
Worst breakfast experience I can remember.  The French toast was rubbery, cold and bland.  And how is it possible to screw up coffee?  The coffee was like water with a splash of brown food coloring.  Let's get with the times here folks, pretty sure every relevant business on the planet accepts credit/debit cards.  On a scale of 1-10 with 10 being the best I'd rate Toni Ann's a negative 3.
I have a standard order here:  Two poached eggs over corned beef hash with a side of broccoli.  Awesome breakfast!
A hidden gem, good place to start your day running errands, near the Massachusetts Connecticut border.  Finally after years of driving by this place, we tried it out. 

Small menu but good selection of omelettes and breakfast sandwiches.  Hash browns are well done with little crispy bits amidst the cubes of potatoes. I had eggs benedict and my husband had egg sandwich w ham.  Coffee was full bodied.

It's a breakfast place so it closes in the afternoon. Ample parking and interesting wall hangings.
I've eaten there a few times over the years, and it's always been different. Sometimes the foods great, other times it's average.  Sometimes there will be a waitress, sometimes it's a little kid. Very small, but good for a quick stop breakfast on your way out of state.
You may have to wait for a table but it'll be worth it, because the breakfast is awesome and it won't break the bank!.  Try the Eggs Benedict & A side of bacon the pancakes are great too, nice and fluffy.  If there is a wait,go next door and shop around TaSA Trading Copany, Local Art & Gifts & Hand Poured Candles.  When your table is ready, Dave's wife will come get you in the gift shop.  Nothing Fancy but clean, good food and reasonable prices, Dave's is worth the trip.
The best home fries, great portions, Good food. My favorite is the Eggs Benedict made with real Canadian Bacon and home made sauce,
I know this is a popular place but the food you get for the prices you pay is hardly worth going out of you way for. The place is popular with the locals  but don't make a special trip for this place. The food is your average short-order place and average food. However $10-$12 per person for breakfast for average food is not worth it. There are plenty of other places to go. The staff is nice and they go out of their way to help you. If you happen to be along route 10 looking for a place to eat this is not  a bad place but be warned of the high prices for average breakfast and lunch.
Great breakfast place tucked away in the hills of North Granby, CT. The portions are giant, the food is delicious and the wait is worth it. Its a small dining room, with a counter area also with stools. They have the best giant blueberry muffins I have ever seen, and they are awesome! If you find yourself looking to slap on the ole feed bag, drop by this place and give them a try. Be patient though, dining room is small, but the tables turn over quick
We stopped for breakfast after riding the bike trail in Southwick and was impressed.  Very nice people and enjoyed everything from a great cup of coffee, homemade hash to the special toast (my wife had it I think it was cranberry rye – she raved about it).
We have been going to Daves for a few years! We don't go often because it is out of the way ! But the Corned Beef Hash is to die for! The only other person that makes Corned Beef Hash that good is my husband! Needless to say thats not very often. The last  few times we have gone however, there have been subtle changes. The homefries have been way overseasoned with salt. One day  they were so salty we couldn"t eat them!  Their kids breakfast have changed too! Their Mickey Mouse Pancake used to be a good portion for an 8 or 10 year old, . The last time we were there it was much smaller and didn't fill our 5 year old! Pancakes are such a low food cost item I can't justify spending 6.95 for 1 pancake, small juice and 1 strip of bacon. We always look for family friendly places!  Daves does offer coloring books and crayons, Which are a big plus. Though with the pricing of  an adult meal kids meals should be more reasonable. Everyone is always very friendly. We will go back again but probably when we don't have the kids!
Great service, great food, good Sunday morning setting.
Dave's is awesome!
Always worth the wait.
The food is amazing, and there are always neat specials.
The prices are wicked low, and the portions big.  The coffee cups are  huge, perfect for a Sunday morning.
This is the home of the best omelet ever.
Came by for my annual lasagna stock up. Got as many as I could fit in my suitcase. Wouldn't miss the chance. Wish I had a bigger suitcase!
Inez is a wonderful cook from old school Italian cooking. She prepares everything fresh including the pasta. I love going to her kitchen and pick up food for my big family. I  grew up in Boston with some pretty good cooks but she beats them all. Please don't tell my Italian mother she would be jealous. The best hand made raviolis, meatballs, lasagna in the world. Also she's a friendly and beautiful lady. 
 
 
 
Every time I go home to CT I pay a visit to Rose's Kitchen. I get two or three lasagnas (frozen) and take them home with me to St. Louis in freezer bags in my checked luggage. I'm torn between the sausage or spinach as my favorite which is why I usually get a 1/2 & 1/2 one. If you're lucky and they have them you can also get home made gnocchi as well, but they don't advertise that on the menu. It's in a very quaint town that is good for a nice walk.
We stopped by Rose's last week for the first time...... from the moment you enter the store and smell the wonderful aroma of italian sauce in the air you know you are going to eat well that night. We brought home the meat lasagna and a pint of sauce and enjoyed every bite of it. The lasagna was the best I've ever had- the pasta was perfect and the seasonings just right. Yum! Can't wait to go back and pick up a tray of lasagna for a family gathering or try another dish.
Enis makes the VERY BEST Lasagna around!!  I have had both her meat and veggie lasagnas as well as her meatballs (the ONLY ones my 2 picky eaters will eat!!) as well as other pastas.  FANTASTIC!!!!!!!!!!!!  Highly recommend Rose's Kitchen!!!!  Bring 2 coolers, one won't be enough once you taste her scrumptious food!!!!!!!!  I have been buying from her for years!!  My family bought from her and her mom when I was a child and they were in Avon!!!!!!!!
This isn't a sit down restaurant.  There isn't a large variety of items. It isn't fancy. It's a kitchen, a place to obtain the finest Italian food purchased frozen to take home and enjoy. Everything is home made. The pasta is excellent. The sauces are smooth and delicious without the sharp acidity that so often mars lesser quality sauces. The cheese and meat filling is wonderful. You'll wish the owner, Inez was your grandma. 

It does take some effort to get to Riverton, since it is not near a major town or city. Maximize your trip to Rose's by driving along the beautiful Farmington river and enjoying the gem that is Riverton.
You must stop here and bring a cooler and buy the sauces, and homemade ravioli, manicotti and sauces, It is worth the trip, BEST in the state, no question about it.
The inventive name on the menu for each dish is refreshing.  The food is in general quite satisfactory.  The wine list is unimaginative but a decent red or white can usually be found.  The waitstaff are in general untrained, unprofessional and always changing.  Perhaps this is because the owner of the restaurant could well use training in how to be a successful manager/owner/trainer/mentor or cordial host.
Very good had grilled chicken special and a couple of bottles on beer
Service was very good also for a large party it's a small place


Just a must to travel that way in the fall to see beautiful scenic sights through Litchfield, Lakeville, and Riverton, CT
My friend and I had lunch today.  It was very tasty.  I had a salad with grilled shrimp and balsamic dressing.  The greens were very fresh.  My friend had a chicken wrap with sweet potato fries.  She let me try a few fries, which were crisp, just the way I like them.  We were too full for dessert, but with the check were two oatmeal cookies that had coconut and dried cranberries in them--a perfect ending!  Our waitress, Sarah, was very friendly, welcoming, and checked on us just the right amount.  She had a great personality and did her job efficiently and with a smile.  The prices were reasonable, and the choices were unique and tempting, making the decision as to what to get a hard one.  Thank you for such a nice homey, relaxing atmosphere with delicious food.
The ride to this place was horrible because our GPS sent us the scenic route, we ended driving through unpaved and gravel roads IN THE FOREST ITSELF!!? So scary because they'd never find us if we got a flat!!! Hahaha!!! The place was a nice old house that also sold nick knacks and antiques, it was separated into 3 small ding areas,the food a bit pricey, but fresh, it was very nice and if we lived closer than 45-50 min. and the highway was closer we'd def. return here.Tina&Nel🍒
This place is a real gem! Chef Paul Panettiere deserves kudos for his superb creations.  

Went here for lunch on a Tuesday to use a groupon that was about to expire.  We didn't expect much when we had the place to ourselves at the start and were pleasantly surprised.

The 3 Crab cake appetizer was done with an oriental touch that was flavorful, but didn't detract from the crab.  I actually finished the picked veggie and lettuce accompaniments because it had such great flavor.

I usually expect a house salad to be a bunch of simple greens without much flair.  Not so here.  A mix of healthy greens was combined with tomatoes and sprouts and some julienne veggies.  Gorgonzola on top.  I actually wanted to try the other dressing choices as well since they all sounded tempting.

My main dish was "Andouille To Go" (or something like that).  It was a variation on Jambalaya with shrimp and sausage.  My first thought was that it didn't have enough sauce on it-wrong.  It had just the right about to give it a wonderful flavor but not overwhelm the dish.  My usually approach in cooking is more sauce is always better, but this dish showed me how wrong I could be.

My wife had the salmon with a basil mashed potatoes.  Both were excellent.

No dessert for us today because we knew we'd be having birthday cake with our granddaughter tonight.  But they were tempting.

Price was moderate.  Quite reasonable for the quality and quantity of food.  $16 - $18 for our main dishes with salad.  Even though it was lunch, portions were healthy and we had some left to bring home.

So I highly recommend this spot.  I know I'll be back.
Went to Sweet Peas restaurant for the first time recently with friends.  Very cute, in an old home in one of Connecticut's most picturesque villages. All of our dinners were very good and up to par with the somewhat high price.  It was well worth it.  A somewhat traditional menu with some twists and fun names.  All and all a nice time.  Down side was there was one person working the floor seating guests, taking orders, getting drinks and bringing out food.  He looked exhausted.  We were not in a hurry so not a big problem for us but they might want to hire another person before the one guy drops.  Other thing of note was the food was rich which we don't run into much these days.
My wife and I dined at Sweet Pea's last Thursday and everything was perfect. We drove from Westfield, Mass(40 minutes)through back roads with no traffic.
We split fried artichokes for an appetizer and she had the Fowl Play chicken and I enjoyed the Steak in Grass, a delicious filet. Salad is included and most entrees are around $20-23. The wine list is small but you should be able to find something to please everyone in your party.
This is a hidden gem in a small village in Connecticut. The owner/chef is talented, and this place meets the definition of a "small, out of the way place." Fried spinach...mmmmm.
Happened to be relatively near the area and made a detour as the place sounded nice. It WAS. In a pleasant old renovated house - filled with antiques, some of which were offered for sale - we had a VERY good midday meal. The Thai-influenced crab cakes had a sweet chili sauce that was pungent and SO tasty - with whole cilantro seeds, The grouper - special of the day - was fresh-tasting and well prepared. I indulged and had a strip steak with fries - we don't eat red meat much at home - and the waiter tailored my order to suit me perfectly. The main courses came with mesclun salads with a very good homemade dijon/dill dressing. Decent, unpretentious wine list and - most of all - a terrific waiter who got everything right.
Found Sweet Pea on Groupon, and just came back from an excellent lunch.  Fresh, tasty food (we had grilled chicken salads) that we enjoyed.  

Good atmosphere, not busy, highly recommended. 

We'll be back!
We were glad that we called a day ahead to make reservations for our party of seven for lunch on Christmas Eve.  Only one other party of three people were in the restaurant while we were there.  The waiter was most attentive and the chef excellent.  We had not one bad thing to say about our seven very different selections from the most interesting menu.
When we walked in, the odor of stale fried oil was in the air. The waitress's black apron was clearly dirty. My turkey sandwich was served on what seemed to be a fresh roll, but the lettuce on it didn't seem to be, so I removed it. The fries had been pre-cooked and re-heated. The apple crisp didn't taste fresh, and certainly wasn't crisp, so I didn't finish it. My mother-in-law's salad didn't look fresh to me, either, but she ate it. Might have been a bad day, but I don't plan to go back. The server was very nice, though, and attentive.
Riverton is a long drive from anywhere.  But Sweet Pea's is worth the trip.  We've been twice now and will definitely go again.  The restaurant is in an old house right next to the river and it is filled with antiques (some of which are for sale.). Settings are in the front rooms of the house and are not crowded.  The whole atmosphere is relaxed.
But it's the food you should go for.  Last time, I had the Norwegian Night, a wonderfully prepared and perfectly cooked salmon.  My wife had a precisely broiled steak with a delicious sauce.  The wine list is limited, but quite well chosen.
This is a wonderful place for a cost, relaxed dinner.  And that long drive?  It's through some of the most beautiful countryside in the US.
We happened to have a Restaurant.com for this place, so tried it for dinner after an afternoon of driving, enjoying the fall foliage.  It is a beautifully appointed old Victorian house, with lots of antiques.  But we were here for the food.  The crab cakes appetizer was great, with a delicious salsa accompaniment.  Our salads were good, but nothing special, and the white dinner rolls were a disappointment.  My wife had the salmon special - quite excellent.  I had the "Fowl Play", which I found rather tasteless except for the overpowering Rosemary.  The desserts were very good - a nice Apple Crisp with vanilla ice cream, and a Heathbar Creme brûlée.  The service was top notch and friendly.  I would return if given the opportunity.

We found this place because of a groupon and boy are we glad we did! The food was absolutely delicious, we didn't leave a crumb behind. The service was wonderful, great atmosphere, beautiful dining rooms. We are so glad we decided to include this in our visit. We will definitely be back again next time we visit CT! I highly suggest going! 

We ordered the Fit to be Thai'd
Shitake Happens
Steak in the Grass 
and I had a glass of the Riesling
all of it was awesome!
We were returning home from a week traveling thru New England and spent the night at the Old Riverton Inn.  We asked the innkeepers of a recommendation for a place to have lunch and dinner.  They suggested Sweet Pea's.  We went there for lunch and it was wonderful.  We decided to go there for dinner later that day.  We met the owner/chef, Paul, at dinner.  He was our waiter as well.  The food was excellent. - from entree to dessert.  We will certainly make it a point to visit Sweet Pea's again the next time we are in the area, hopefully, next year. 
I stopped at Sweet Pea's for lunch with a friend because I had a restaurant.com gift certificate. We are so glad we gave them a try. We were at first delighted by the atmosphere of the restaurant. We were greeted warmly when we walked in and were delighted to see that the restaurant was an old Victorian home, and the rooms were set up with small tables for dining. The menu, though small, offered many wonderful and unusual choices. We started with crab cakes, that were fabulous. Then we each ordered soup, Pear soup and mushroom, potato and garlic soup. We shared both and couldn't decide which we loved more. Then we shared a steak sandwich that was terrific with a side of sweet potato fries and lentil salad. I cannot wait to go back to try other items on their menu. After lunch we were able to wander around the house where they had very reasonably price antiques for sale throughout the house.
We are here as a result of finding a Groipon.  Since we were here for lunch after the start of the school year, it was not crowded at all.  The menu is very interesting and the food was wonderful.  We had a couple of the lunch specials, a lamb burger and a cod dish.  Both were cooked to perfection and delicious.  The lemon layer cake for dessert with freshly made whipped cream was outstanding.  Service and setting were excellent.  The Groupon served it's purpose, we will be back.
Sweet Pea's is located in an old Victorian house in the village of Riverton, CT which is located on the Farmington River.  The chef owner also waitered.  Amazingly the food was excellent, interesting and tasty, and the service was excellent too.  There was an interesting wine list, but we didn't try any.  We will go again!  That is for certain.
Food here is terrific, and makes for a nice splurge when I'm not cooking at home.  Lots of interesting gluten free and paleo options.
I found this restaurant while googleing Vegan restaurants in CT. We happened to be up in the area so we made a point to stop. 
I agree with the other posters that the prices are somewhat steep but   in my experience, vegan and specialty food does tend to drive the cost up so its not unreasonable.  Even if you make your own food, vegan products are not inexpensive. I also agree that the portions are not overly generous but then again we were there at lunch when they are smaller. 
We had some excellent chill and also curry chickpea salad that was so good, I got some to go as well. We did purchase quite a bit of food from the refrigerated section including the rutabaga lasagna and some of the layered salads. I also had a cupcake from the display and it was fabulous a chocolate chili explosion.
I live about 35 minutes away so I probably would not make a special trip here because there are other options closer to where I live but if I am in the area, I will definitely make a point to stop here again.
Had a wonderful and healthy lunch, wonderful selection for eating in or taking home, all vegan and gluten free including a number of desserts.  I had a very tasty bean chili and a no-egg salad sandwich on an excellent, locally made gluten free bread.  I eat eggs, but you could really not tell this sandwich was not true egg salad.  

Had the snickerdoodle for dessert, spiced cake was fantastic as was the icing.  Again, all gluten free and vegan.

Try it out if you like to eat healthy, everyone there was so helpful and friendly.  Many selections of juices pressed to order.
I stopped in at Sweet Beet after my stepdaughter told me about it. She's vegan, and loves the place. I'm not vegan and I love it, too.The prices are a bit steep, but the quality of the food and the care that the staff takes to make it delicious help to make it worthwhile. I particualy liked the Paleo layered taco salad and the cashew dressing that comes with it. One doesn't have to be vegan to enjoy Sweet Beet's offerings, and I'm proof of that. Their sandwiches and soups are also very good. I wish Sweet Beet was a bit less of a drive, so I could stop in more often
this place is so great for vegans and everyone else as well. smoothies desserts, and everything in-between. Love the chili
I really was excited when I heard about a vegan restaurant opening up in Granby. Unfortunately, their food does seem to be very expensive, and a lot of the prepared foods seem to be things that I could easily make at home. I have only tried the desserts, since I do live close-by and have never felt the need to buy a full meal there. The desserts are tasty but I have found that some are too sweet and when they first opened, some of the desserts were a little bland. I do plan on trying more of their food and it definitely is a nice treat if you do live in the area, as well as a place to grab some food if you have a decent amount of money and want to get a healthy meal.
Sweet Beet specializes in foodstuffs that are free of the most common allergens. I have tried one of their dinners and some cupcakes. The dinner was fairly good but the portion was barely big enough for one person and cost more than a lunchtime entrée at most restaurants. The cupcakes come in two sizes. The smaller is bite size and the larger is small. Both are expensive for their size. The cupcakes are yummy, though, probably the best gluten free I have tasted.
There are some tables available if you want to stay for your meal. The interior is very Spartan.
The desserts that these two women create are absolutely divine.
We just recently vanilla "Blood Bath" cupcakes, in observation of Halloween, and they were incredible.

The cost for said cupcakes though, was also a bit incredible; ringing in around $3 each.

Hopefully as business keeps growing they can lower their cost a bit, because at that price, their desserts are a real once-in-a-while treat.
I had heard many good reviews from locals about this little take out spot for Gluten free food tucked away on rt 10 & 202 in Granby, CT near the notch of the MA border.  A dear cousin was visiting from San Francisco with a gluten intolerance so I took the opportunity to try this little gem.  I purchased a bunch of their little cupcakes...so pretty...she said they were the best she had tasted and that bakers in San Fran should take note.  Love the Mexican Hot Chocolate flavor, nice and spicy! Loved the beet humus & chick pea tuna salad as well.
I stopped in coming from the movies in Agawam with my 2 kids. I got a few "sweeties" (mini cupcakes) and a lasagna for myself. The kids ate the frosting but the cupcake itself was definitely vegan and they could tell.It was $20 for this!! Anyway I would stop again and I would definitely order a specialty cake or cupcakes from them for a special occasion for someone with food allergies. I saw one going out the door and it was beautiful. Reminds me of Dees one smart cookie in Southington I think. There is a bigger health food store that has a cafe and offers this stuff (maybe not baked goods??) like five minutes down the road in Granby center (dont remember the name) that I stopped at a few weeks ago and I preferred my lunch their in taste and price. Bottom line this is a specialty shop and not for the average Jane. Great for cakes etc.
Excellent vegan options for take-out.  A bit pricey but all ingredients are very fresh and organic. Very nice and surprising to have that option here in exurbia!
The Sweet Beet is my favorite new find!  My wife and I try to eat a predominantly gluten free (GF) diet and there are typically limited options locally. The Sweet Beet offers many GF options from apps like a variety of hummus options, to main dishes and soups, as well as desserts and sweets. I am a fan of the cottage pie and the Sweeties are a must!   I have yet to try anything that wasn't fantastic. You can stop in for breakfast, lunch, or dinner items. Many of the items offered are paleo, vegan, and just really healthy! The staff is always welcoming and friendly which is an added bonus.  Do your body and your taste buds a favor and stop in, you won't regret it!!!
We specialize in food without the top allergens, and we cater to all diets, including paleo.  We have our hot three bean chili with optional cashew creme daily, and then one other paleo vegetable soup.  We have fresh made to order salads with various protein toppings, including our chickpea of the sea.  We have fresh baked "Sweeties" in several flavors.  They are mini cupcakes and they are LOVED by our customers.  We also have paleo treats such as our paleo carob balls or our paleo energy cubes.  We also have our coolers stocked with grab and go meals that you can take home or that we can heat up for you.  Some meals that we stock regularly are our cottage pie (vegan shepherd's pie) and our rutabaga lasagna with nut free pesto and our own housemade vegan ricotta.  We have a variety of salads in our cooler as well such as our paleo massaged kale salad and our layered salads such as our taco salad and our caesar salad.  We also have assorted healthy beverages such as kombucha and coconut water and live soda.  Our entire shop is gluten/dairy/egg/soy/peanut free and all organic/GMO free.  The kids love to walk up to the bakery case and pick out their very special dessert.  We also cater and we make custom cakes and cupcakes for parties etc.  Come and see us!  We are open Monday through Friday from 11 to 7, Saturdays from 9 to 3 and Sundays from 10 to 2.
Although we live in Granby, where there is a McDonald's in the town center, we prefer to go a bit north to this Southwick location.  It's larger with plenty of seating.  There are often activity nights for the kids and is very family friendly.  Best of all, whether eating in or using the drive-through I've only had one mistake that I can recall.  Friendly staff is also a plus.
The great thing about McDonald's is you can pretty much count on the food tasting the same in Chicago as it does in Canada!  Where one can outdo another is in the atmosphere and the service.  Unfortunately this establishment fails in both.  They are dog slow in taking orders and don't seem to understand the concept of customer service.  They aren't rude or anything but just don't seem to have that "pep in their step" attitude when it comes to the customer.
 Nothing special and the service needs a lot of work ! The more I visit Dunkin Donuts the more I appreciate Mrs Murphy's donuts just down the street. The donuts at Dunkin keep getting smaller and the prices keep rising and I understand why they keep adding more items to the menu. Donut sales just don't cut it anymore. I go there because my mom likes there ice coffee and that is the only reason to visit in my opinion.  
I am here quite often and these guys always get my order correct.  It may seem trivial but it is true.  I hate going through the drive through and finding something wrong with my order.  When I go to this location, they get it right consistently.  The coffee and food is always good.
More of a farm market than a restaurant. If you like fresh vegetables in season, homemade pies year round, Christmas trees and friendly service, you have to stop by and say hi to Jeff and Lynita. No matter what you stop in for, you'll surely be taking home more than you planned to get. A lot of visitors from neighboring Connecticut stop in regularly. A must stop when in Southwick.
Blossoming acres is a great bakery /farm stand.Enjoy fresh vegetables in season !Love there summer berry pie!Lots of yummy bakery items.
Our office ordered 100+ homemade apple and blueberry pies recently for Thanksgiving so we could appreciate our customers and clients. We cannot tell you how AMAZING Blossoming Acres was to work with. Their attention to detail, helpfulness, ability to accommodate and not to mention the BEST pies on the East Coast. Everyone raved about the flavors, freshness, and tasty crust. We cannot wait to order more for next year! Thank you BA for another successful and delicious event!
I am an excellent pie baker.  But even excellent pie bakers sometimes have a time crunch or just want pie but don't want to make it from scratch.  When that happens I stop at Blossoming Acres and buy one of their pies.  I've never been disappointed.  Great crust, lots of fruits, lots of choices.  There are many other baked goods available as well as soups, main dishes, local vegetables, and in the spring/summer/fall a great selection of plants and flowers.  My grandkids love going here because they get to pick out a treat.
My wife has been going to them for pie for about 15 years.  We order for all the holidays and if they have an extra Key Lime that goes to me! Have never been let down. Very friendly people, nice place to go.
I just love the assortment of pies.  Sometimes I buy a pie and freeze it so that I can have peach pie in the winter...yum.
Best Bread on the planet. Many locals love their pies (I make my own) FUN place to stop if you are diving through town. Pick up a goodie to take with you, or as a gift. Great Vegies at the stand and fruits in season. Clean kitchen.
The farm offers incredible items on their menu, with all natural and local ingredients.  If you are in the area during the fall, you have to get to the apple cider donuts before they sell out.  You can pick your own apples (great fun for the kids) or have a romantic breakfast with your sweetie with delicious dishes made up of very fresh and local foods.  This place rocks!
I've been here for many different reasons - to go apple picking with my son's pre-school class, apple picking with the family, and just to buy their fantastic apple cider donuts. In season, they also sell apples and apple cider, in addition to lots of local products like honey, baked goods and goat cheese (and associated products). 
Our first time here!  What a delight!  Delicious breakfast-huge portions!  We had the Chocolate chip pancakes, Short Rib Benedict and the Apple Cider French toast.  Omg...amazing taste with all three!  Love the atmosphere where you can shop with local brands too.  Will be back!!!
After hearing great things around town about the new farm to table café here we missed it for breakfast but finally tried it for lunch today. The parking lot was quite full, but discovered most of the activity was for apple picking. You order at the counter and they will bring it to your table. The line was pretty long because everyone who wanted just a drink, or one donut, or a full meal was in the same line. You have to retrieve your utensils etc. in the side room. They had two soups to choose from and several sandwiches. My reuben had homemade  
sauerkraut and home-baked bread which was delicious. The side of 
coleslaw was fresh and tasty! You 
can choose to eat indoors at the 
spacious tables are outside on the 
picnic tables on the porch. We would return again. They have a little fly 
problem and I hope they get a sliding screen at the apple 
window before we do!

pparking lot was quit lot was quite full
Clark Farms is a great casual country breakfast place on summer weekends. Neat, clean bright, cheery. Employees are young, helpful and enthusiastic. There are indoor and outdoor dining venues. You will want to check out the sales area for strictly fresh produce and some neat gift items. Great stop for families and kids. I had Landin's Favorite. 2 poached eggs, rough cut corned beef hash, grilled english muffins and shredded potatoes. Delicious! There were apple cider donuts and other good looking products in the display case. Ice cream is a specialty at Clark Farms. Check out the website.
I eat at Fresh Fields almost once per week.  Their sandwiches and wraps are loaded with meat and quite frankly larger than I should eat but they are so good.  I've never had a bad meal from Fresh Fields so I suggest you give them a try.
When I worked in Southwick Fresh Fields was one of the go-to locations for ordering lunch for our team.  Excellent, fresh sandwiches and soup - always high quality.  There are a few tables inside should you wish to sit and eat your sandwich there.  It looks like a truck stop but don't let that fool you - delicious food is waiting inside!  You can call ahead and have your selection waiting for you when you arrive.
This is a favorite stop for gas, and while there we often get a breakfast or lunch sandwich to-go.  Great donut and muffin choices, several great sandwich offerings, and I love the breakfast burritos.  My husband and daughter also say the coffee is excellent.
Honestly...for a gas station...OMG. The sandwiches are great. So yummy. Fresh. I am glad I live in town to be able to grab a bite here when needed. I love the Ruben and Veggie Betty. I definitely recommend when traveling on 202 to stop here for a bite to eat...Bonus is they sell Gran Val Scoop Ice cream in the station part...Yummmm 
The service is always good and the food is great. A good alternative to The Summer House when you want a sandwich.
I ordered 12 sandwiches, wraps, and salads from this small Deli for my bridal party the day of my wedding. The staff was a pleasure to work with. The menu is amazing and it was very difficult to make up my mind!
I would recommend the Shaker wrap and salad although everything was great!
Only comment - it was hard to find at first - it is inside of a gas station if I remember correctly - but do not let this scare you away! It was clean and the food it worth it!
My husband and I recently stopped here on a trip to Connecticut and got a very nice surprise.  We ordered sandwiches.  They were very good and the prices were also equally appealing.  The place is clean and there is a good variety.  It took only a few minutes to get our order.  The clerk was  polite and brought our sandwiches out to our table..  If there was anything negative, it was the fact that the clerk didn't know about the senior discount.  That appeared to be a training issue.  We will stop here again if  ever in that area.  Enjoyed it.
We have enjoyed lunch and dinner at Bruschetta's several times - trying all different kinds of entrees and sandwiches.  The food does not disappoint.

Last night, I ordered a custom flat-bread pizza.  The pizza was piping hot and delicious.  

One of my favorite meals is the Chicken Saltimbocca.  The chicken with proscuitto and swiss cheese on top of mashed potatoes is tasty.  But I haven't found anything on the menu yet that hasn't been good.

Everything is freshly prepared.
I forgot one weekend that I had invited a couple for dinner.  Don't ask me how - long story.  Anyway, with little time to prepare, I called Bruschetta's and ordered four of the same entrees, a Greek salad, and rolls.  Grabbed a dessert from the grocery.  Ran home, transferred the entrees to a serving platter, the salad to a nice bowl, warmed the rolls and VIOLA!  A lovely dinner we all enjoyed.  Much better than the mac n cheese it would have been without Bruschetta's help.
My family and I have had take out food from Bruschetta's about 10-12 times since moving to Southwick one year ago.  The food is absolutely delicious.  My only complaint is that our orders have been wrong in some way about 25% of the time.  Sometimes a salad is left out, sometimes the side dish is wrong.  Once, they mixed up our order with someone else's and our food was going out the door as my husband arrived.  He had to wait 15-20 minutes while they remade our meals. I understand that sometimes mistakes are made, but usually a restaurant will try to make it up to you in some way.  Never once has the owner given us any discount as an apology for the mistakes.  We rarely order from Bruschetta's anymore because I'm tired of being frustrated when my order is wrong.
The food here is always delicious and fresh! You can tell that they use high quality ingredients!! Love getting food here when I'm not in the mood to cook, and I don't feel guilty feeding it to my family like with any other take out!!
This was my first time ordering from Bruschetta's and I have no idea why!  I had the vegetarian stuffed shells, salad and lemon ricotta cookies - everything was delicious :) My family ordered paninis and since they were gone in about 3 minutes I'm pretty sure they liked them! I will definitely be visiting again soon :)
Their Flat Bread Pizzas are AMAZING. SOOOO yummy. Their dinner entrees are great as well. Another place in Southwick that you shouldn't just drive by, but stop and try! 
Driven by many times with my wife and decided to stop and try the food. Glad we did. Small ,but very clean and relaxing to eat inside. Owners, husband and wife were very kind and the food was delicious and very reasonable.Won't hesitate to stop again.
There are a couple tables, but the place is really for take-out, really good take-out. Over the last year we've been there 3 or 4 times. The food is always fresh and tasty. Soups are awesome, entrée's are delicious and salads and breads are really good as well. I had tortolleni soup and the chicken saltimboca  and my wife had a veggie panini on our last visit, both were great.
Bruschetta's is a great place to get home made meals.  Whether it's salad, soup, full meals, flat bread pizza, it's delicious.  There are two tables inside, if you want to relax there, one table outside.  It really is more of a take out restaurant, but if your'e lucky you may find a table!
We randomly stopped here while driving through to Vermont. The food was very good. I would recommend the vegetarian stuffed shells.
Lime Rickey's is the definition of a beach shack - and they are good at it.

If you get lucky, lobster sandwiches will be in season, otherwise their fish is generally tasty and should disappoint...

This shack isn't gourmet - but it is honest, which in today's food world is quite considerable.

Give it a try 
Excellent haddock sandwich and fries,  Nice to sit by the beach but overrun with kids on a Friday evening.  Nonetheless, will return for the sandwich and fries.  Pleasant service.
They know good food. Especially French fries. The restaurant warns you about paying attention to your plate!
Fun casual fast food. Good Haddock sandwich on very good bun.
We sat out side watching the ocean and people on the beach.
No dress up needed. Flip flops and beach cover up will do the trick. 
This is such a great spot to come with family. They have a variety of ice cream as well sea food.  Plenty of parking spaces.  Seats outside.  They take credit cards. 
Can't beat the menu for a beachside "snack bar". We had perfect, fresh fried fish sandwiches - as good as you'll find anywhere. There's ice cream and smoothies, lime rickeys, lemonade, and ice tea too! The best surprise were the homemade fries and onion rings. Portions were very generous.
Well , In Marblehead when it is hot, you go to the beach.  Typically, you would go to the Town beach called Deveraux.  It is between the mainland and the neck right at the causeway.   Lime Rickey's is the place that will give your beach experience that pick me up.  Typically take out food but good quality.  They have been around for a long time.  In 1991- The No Name Storm ( some called  it the " Perfect Storm) washed away this restaurant only to learn that they should move it back up by about 100 Ft.
good food.  lots of fried foods.  also serves ice cream.
 right on the beach.  picnic tables right on the sand.
I was pleasantly surprised by how delicious their grilled shrimp salad was.  This was made to order and the shrimp were perfectly grilled with a nice seasoning.  The tomatoes were freshly chopped and the dressing tasty.  There are the usual staples like hot dogs and hamburgers as well but if you aren't into barbecue type foods, try one of the salads.  They also serve Richardsons ice cream for dessert.
This beach shack is the best option for a hearty "street food" experience in Marblehead...  The lobster sandwich they make was top notch, and definitely recommended to all visiting - especially if not familiar with the lobster roll concept!
I vowed not to spend my vacation eating burgers, which I love, but on a lovely hot early summers day I could not resist. America is the home of the burger so I expected a good one. When it arrived it looked good and came with a generous portion of fries.  
As I tucked in there was just no taste from the burger. I was expecting that lovely char grilled taste. It was missing. Do not get me wrong, it was totally edible but lacked taste. In the end I added plenty of ketchup for a boost. It was really disappointing.
I wrote a review in 2011 because this place wasn't good.  Since then it has reopened under new ownership and is much better and I would recommend it if you are in the area.  I noticed that my negative review has carried over.  They should contact Trip Advisor and ask for a reset!!
My husband and I, along with our two daughters, recently enjoyed an unexpectedly pleasant outdoor dining experience.  We were across the street from Lime Rickeys (which is located right on Devereaux Beach in Marblehead) one Friday late afternoon as we had a stand-up paddleboard lesson (be sure to check out East Coast Style SUP!)  When our one hour lesson/rental was over, we walked across the street to Lime Rickey’s.  It was a beautiful summer evening, and there was plenty of outdoor seating available so we decided to give it a whirl.  Three of us ordered the “Devereaux” – a generous cheeseburger.  At $6 each, it was a real bargain!  French fries were $3.50, again a real bargain.  One of my daughters ordered the BLT ($5), which she said was delicious (very generous helping of bacon).  Altogether with drinks (iced teas and lemonades) for the 4 of us, the total was $41 – not bad for a wonderful summer light bite with beautiful ocean views!  We have since been back a couple of times with a similar experience!   
The new ownership has kicked this beachy restaurant up a notch in a good way. There is
a fairly large menu with prices ranging on average between $5-$15 (with seafood plates being higher). I had a BLT which was surprising good, with in-season tomatoes and well-cooked bacon.
The staff is exceptionally friendly and professional, both in the kitchen as well as trying to keep on top of cleaning up the tables and trash outside.  One thing you need to be aware of is the ever
present drone-like seagull hanging over your table, waiting to remove your entire meal. And
should you leave to get more ketchup the drone will swoop in!
Nice to sit on the beach or at a picnic table and have fried clams or lobster roll or root beer float.. Lobster roll was on the expensive side for the amount of meat..but they also have pizza, burgers, fries, ice cream..something for everyone..Can't go wrong..and the view cannot be beat..just a beautiful place to chill and have a long lunch.
New Owners , New Attitude...They Care !
Great Location ,Quality Foods ,Great Beach Food with Inspiration .
Creative Drinks, Attentive Staff ........
Let's Go To the Beach , Just For The Food !!!!! 
Today you are going to treat yourself to a beach day and you pick Marblehead's Devereaux Beach.  Visualize the sounds of the surf and the beating sun - you automatically crave something icy cold, like a Lime Ricky or Lemonade to quench your thirst!  The  swell of the waves are attractive to the novice and experienced surfer and paddle board goers, the beach offers you a haven for working on your Coppertone tan!  After hangin' ten or body surfing you are going to be hungry and voila! Step on over to Lime Ricky's and you are in for a delicious and delightful surprise from your no-so-humdrum beach shanty restaurant.  Eat on the deck and listen to the sounds of Jimmy Buffet music in the background and crash of the surf as you devour a burger, hotdog, wrap sandwich, chowdah, fish and chips, Richardson's ice cream this or that!  Pretty much, Lime Ricky's will satisfy any hunger pain that ails ya!  Tired of cooking on a hot summer night--perfect excuse to shepherd the kids and tell Dad to meet you after work seaside...what a fabulous idea after a harrowing day with kids running wild, your boss on your back and traffic moving slow...hit the brakes, grab it to go, head to the beach and take it slow.  Be wary of the sea gulls though, cuz' they love them fried clams too!
Spectacular view, excellent food, reasonable prices. Lime Rickey's isn't your usual burger or lobster roll beach shack. While the menu does include both burgers and 2 different lobster offerings it goes well beyond these staples of beach dining. The pulled pork sandwich is my favorite, while my husband likes the Cuban sandwich. Which ever you choose, you can't go wrong. You can dine on the deck or take a seat at a picnic table under the pavilion. My only caution is, DO NOT leave food unattended, the sea gulls are adept at cleaning the plates of absent diners. 

The only draw back is the line can be a bit long, but it seemed to move relatively quickly.
Then management or ownership changed in 2013.  We tried it twice since then and ended up disappointed both times.  Fried shrimp lost in thick layers of breading.  Ok fried clams.  Fried scallops that leaked puddles of milky liquid which quickly turned their ample breading into soggy piles --- ugh. 

We still go there, but restrict ourselves to their ice creams and frozen yogurt which still have the ability to bring smiles to our faces.
While touring the eastern shoreline from Maine to Connecticut, visiting lighthouses, we were visiting the  light at Marblehead.  By chance, on the way back to the Cape, we stopped in for a bite of lunch. Now I've eaten lobster most of my life and am kinda picky when it comes to the preparation.  The menu gave a choice of either a light dressing in mayonaise or "drenched in butter" for the lobster roll.  I opted for the later and was not disappointed in the least. I;d have to say this was one of the best I've ever had, outside of fixing one myself.  The bun was grilled to perfection, warm and crisp on the outside, soft on the inside.  Stuffed with the best tasting lobster, not clouded by spices or dressings, just simple butter.  Living in Ohio I wish i was closer, so I could eat there once a month......  oh by the way, the fried, full belly clams were outstanding!  You have to eat here if you are ever in Marblehead.
nothing special.  food was just ok.  nothing negative or positive.  not sure if food is fresh or frozen? or a combination of both?   it is always nice to eat outside on a deck right on the beach in nice weather. The sand, waves and, yes, the seagulls too!! 
A lovely way to experience Marblehead Harbor -- very popular and casual --obviously a favorite local restaurant
I returned to Marblehead for a high school reunion, and had lunch here with a friend I had not seen in 50 years last month.  We told the waitress the situation, and she promised the "best lobster rolls ever".  And, she delivered!  No fillers in these rolls -- just lobster!  This fun restaurant sits on the public wharf (landing).  It has outside seating, and inside seating with fine picture windows.
We always enjoy dining at The Landing and seems to reorder our favorite meals, but seafood and a lovely view! You can't go wrong !
We were staying at a B&B nearby and had looked this place uo ahead of time...on the water gorgeous!  By the time we got there is was dreary, dark, and rainy.  We still went even though you couldn't see much. Food was good.  I had the delmonico steak and my husband had the burger and lobster combo.  Server was nice and checked back several times.  They even lit the heaters outside so a couple that requested to sit out there could.    There was a wedding rehearsal dinner going on, but they kept it in the middle of the restaurant and had other patrons sit on the outside. Only down side is parking, but they actually have a lot...the whole area is street parking and many one ways and no parking area.  We drive around for 15 frustrating mins in the dark trying to find a parking space.  
Since moving to Marblehead over twenty years ago my wife and I have found The Landing to be our "go to" in-town eating establishment.

What keeps us coming back are the consistent quality of the food overall, the freshness of the locally sourced seafood items, the friendly staff and atmosphere as well as the beautiful waterfront views, especially when it is warm enough to eat on the outside deck right on the water.

The "lobstah" Mac and Cheese is a highlight but the seafood selections, including daily specials, are what sets it apart. 

Try to get there early as the parking lot is on the smallish side and the adjacent street parking somewhat limited - but these streets after all date back to the 1640's when the colorful rebel Marblehead fisherman broke away from the equally historic town of Salem, the "witch city".
Our server was awesome, he was attentive, nice, and that made the whole experience better.  The food was good, I had the haddock and my husband the lobster roll and soup.  Quick service, reasonable prices.  Here's the negative: the flies.  They were everywhere inside.  Disappointment for sure to keep swatting them away do they didn't land on your food.
We were recommended this restaurant as the best place for lobster in the town and we were not disappointed. Lively place, good atmosphere and great service.
Always love the chowder! Full... Rich... Hearty and Scrumptious!!
I enjoy pairing it with a nice Caesar Salad, as I dine on the deck at lunch time.
There is  almost always delightful staff to entertain as well as serve.
Always love the  harbor-front setting and the play of the boats and sun and clouds on the water... It is a never ending display of beauty! Natural artwork outside and photography inside!
I use the Landing like it is an extension of my home when I have guests visiting town.  "My deck over the Harbor... with Heaters for these cooler days and evenings!!"
Love that I am treated as a regular and with genuine friendliness and kindness by Sue.  She is the BEST, always goes out of her way to please.
Thank you to Robert and his Staff for such a wonderful Dining establishment in such a spectacular setting. We are lucky to have you here in Marblehead.
We visited here in September 2016. We had oysters, mussels,fish tacos, and fish and chips of course. All the food was top quality. The staff were friendly and helpful. The location right next to Marblehead harbour is perfect.
We sat on the deck and enjoyed one of the final warm days of summer.  The balmy breeze was wonderful and the ambiance was delightful.  As always, the service (Rory) was excellent and the food was very good.  Overall, it's the type of experience that keeps us coming back to The Landing!
The people at The Landing were great! Everyone was super friendly, the food was SO fresh and delicious, and we had an overall amazing first time. I am moving to Marblehead and I can't wait to eat here all of the time. :) Thanks for the best fish and chips ever! :)
It had been a few years since we were last here, so we weren't sure if the food would still  be as good as before... but we were not disappointed.  The lobster rolls were very good, with only a minor complaint of a bit too much chopped lettuce underneath the lobster. But the lobster mac and cheese could not have been better!  Lots of huge chunks of lobster in a nicely seasoned, gooey cheese sauce, topped with bread crumbs  It was a truly outstanding dish, and the one I'll miss most after returning home to the west coast.
Nice out door dining
Great atmosphere
Good selection of beers
Great bloody mary
Service kind of slow but adequate
We love The Landing in Marblehead!  The views and service are great.  And...the chowder and mussels can't be beat!!  We've had delicious fish dinners, sandwiches (try the lobster roll) and just had lobster salad over Ceasar salad.
Went on a Friday night with a small group.  We sat outside (the view is nice), and ordered our meal.  The food was okay, but the service was so bad that it wrecked the experience.  When we complained to the manager, he said that the waiter is that way.  Guessing waiter is owners uncle or some relation, as the manager seem to say I know he is rude but I can't get rid of him.  It was a shame as it was a perfect night with great company, that one nasty waiter can wreck the whole night.
Our lobsters were fabulous!  The service was fabulous!  And our after dinner drinks at the bar were so delicious - Dark and Stormy - yum!
Once again we can't say enough good things about our recent trip to Marblehead and, of course, the delicious dinner we had at The Landing Restaurant. Their new menu offers additional seafood dishes that are to die for. Enjoy! PanAm1961
Had a late dinner out on the deck.  Overall meal was OK not outstanding.  Staff seemed more interested in ending their evening, than giving great service.
we had scallops on their deck overlooking the harbour.  food was tasty and atmosphere informal and our waitress Angela was very helpful in suggesting good items


I go back to The Landing every time I visit my family in Boston. It is beautiful sitting on the water and their lobster mac n cheese is legendary. 
Perhaps this is a go to for locals because they would care less about visitors. Waited half hour to sit. Went to sit the rude waitress said I'm MORE concerned about the two guys that have been waiting ... they came in 20 minutes after us !!!!! She then dropped a cup when picking up a table proceeded to kick it across the floor completely unprofessional and she stated
" whatever " was how she felt today. 
Then she threw our creamer and straws on the table.  
I have never in my life NOT left a tip today is a FIRST that in itself speaks volumes.
Went here because of reviews on trip advisor. They only serve breakfast and lunch, they are not open for supper. But they do a excellent job at breakfast at a fair price. I had eggs, sausage, pancakes with coffee included for 8 dollars and the wife chose same breakfast but had home fries in place of pancakes. The food was very good and the service was excellent. This is a small local restaurant with a major following from the locals. Lol seams like we was the only out of towners in the place when we ate, as everyone was talking and calling each other by name, even the waitress greeted everyone by name and would ask if they wanted their usual. When we return to area, this will be the only place we eat breakfast
We had wonderful memories of this place after our last visit a few years ago, but this time the food was only average.  The atmosphere is still authentically funky, and the location is great, though, so it's still worth a visit as long as your expectations are not too high. The only thing I recommend NOT ordering are the potatoes that come with an egg breakfast - they were pretty nasty!
Have lunch and breakfast here fairly regularly.  Very busy in season.  Food and atmosphere make it a good place for visitors to rub shoulders with true old timers from town.  Very quaint building and small inside.  Fast service and quality food.
Had been here about 10 years ago and nothing has changed - guess that could be good or bad! Still a small, rustic house with open windows and fans for cooling on this hot day. Tight seating but found a table before the crowds started to arrive. Good, basic breakfast for us: omelets, potatoes, toast, bacon, coffee, even juice included. Just what we wanted, served hot and fresh. Two of us ate for $20, including tip. Not bad at all for this handy spot next to the water (not facing the water, though).
You know you are in New England when you come across such an authentic greasy spoon as "driftwood"

This place will take you back to the analog world, before technology was invented.  This place caters to locals, most are avid fisherman.

Don't bring your cell phone, it's forbidden!
Tiny little cottage with a long line of hungry people waiting to get inside. It is worth the wait, the food is good local breakfast  and the  waitresses really work hard to get everybody their coffee and food quickly. The corn beef hash is a must – one of the best I have ever had. The hash is great paired with the fluffy scrambled eggs.  We ate there  3 mornings in a row. 
Walked to this local place one morning and thankful to arrive before the crowd started to line up waiting for a table. Yummy yummy blueberry pancakes although my companion said the same thing about the apple pancakes which resembled a Dutch baby apple in taste. Definitely worth a repeat visit.
The last day of our vacation we decided to eat at the local dinner.  It was recommended to us by some residents of Marblehead.  It is definitely your local dinner in look and value.  Great food at a very reasonable price. 
The best breakfast in Marblehead hands down. One waitress covers the entire restaurant.
I have never seen anyone move as fast as she does serving people. Great hash with poached eggs.best value on the north shore.
We ate on Saturday morning.  The place was full of locals: families on their way to little league baseball and old timers catching up on the news of the week.  

It is a small place and only accepts CASH.  They offer basic breakfast fare at a very good price.
For some reason we can't understand. Ordinary food at best. Friendly staff and fast service. Good prices, even. Your omelet is made using non-dairy creamer (ugh!) and the onions in mine were not cooked. The rye toast was good though. I have been twice and was disappointed both times. It is a tradition here, for some reason, and the locals seem to love it.
My wife and I had breakfast the two mornings we were in Marblehead and really enjoyed the friendly staff and great food. The first day we ate early and were glad we had as it was a Sunday and when we walked by at about 9:00 following a walk there were 6-8 people waiting outside to be seated. This appears to be local favorite for breakfast and lunch.
Great place to go for breakfast. Lots of locals here to learn about what's happening in Marblehead. Fairly typical diner offerings. Seating is relatively limited so choose your timing accordingly.
The Driftwood serves breakfast all day, but closes at 2:00 so be sure to get there early. It is a sweet small cafe; staff are lovely and the food is very good.
This is a must try for breakfast and many agree because often people will be lined up waiting for a classic American breakfast.


Nothing special but then again that may be its charm.  The Driftwood is for locals and you can tell.  Its like home.  Comfy. Reliable.
The food was just decent. Popular with the locals, but the place was filthy.   The space is small, no ambiance as some small diners and there is a good chance you will be seated practically on top of other people. It was very noisy when we were there.   There are no booths, just tables crammed into the a small space. 
If you want to have a conversation with someone easily then I would say stay away.
Stopped by the driftwood last week with a guest from Oregon.  He liked the local flavor and we both had eggs and blueberry pancakes.  The pancakes were done very well and that says a lot about a breakfast place.  This place is small so there is generally a wait for space but it was a cold winter morning and we got a seat right away but the restaurant filled up fast.
They serve breakfast all day. Simple choices; omelettes, eggs any style, French toast, pancakes, choice of meat and bread. CASH ONLY. Very pleasant wait staff, quick service. Try the banana pancakes, yummy. Reasonable prices
ThaiMarket consistently over delivers.  The Pad Thai and Masaman Chicken are excellent choices.  Many gluten free options.  Service has been excellent.   They also have take out service, usually order is ready in about 15 minutes.  
I've worked about a block from this place for 11 years but never would have noticed it if not for a local with knowledge of the place. The owner/ server/ hostess and her husband/ cook were the only workers. There was only one other party when we visited. The decor is clean, cute plants on each table. The lunch specials ranged $10-11 and included an entree with choice soup or salad. Appetizers were $4-7.  A carafe of lemon water was complimentary. A full bar was also available. The restaurant was a bit warm with open screen door and fan but no ac.
This was my first time having Thai. I tried the house special drunken chicken with salad and spring rolls while my dining companion had the soup, pineapple shrimp fried rice with cashews and shrimp with shrimp wrappers appetizer. The hostess had my meal made mild as it was my first time. It was still a bit spicy but not overwhelming. The vegetables and white meat chicken were lightly coated in sauce and it was a very fresh tasty dish. The rice and shrimp dish also got rave reviews. We will definitely be back. I would highly recommend.
Very nice staff and good Thai food without having to drive too far. The tom ka gai  soup was so good, we had to order more. All dishes were made to order, and they were very good about customizing ingredients and spices (how spicy/hot). We ate in, and had no problem with speed of service or for being delivered.
We've been here a couple of times, and it seems to be getting worse. The prices are high for small portions, and the taste is average (some really good, and others bad). Our Crispy Tamarind Duck was mostly dry and tough. The menu said "with vegetables", but all we got was garnish. Our curry dish was alright - nothing special. The 3 Curry Puffs (appetizer) were tiny (for a ridiculous $6), but maybe the most tasty item of the meal. Service was slow, but pleasant.
This is one of the best Thai restaurants on the North Shore.  The food is consistent and often made with fresh local in season vegetables.  They have one of the best calamari appetizers I have every had. 
Thai Market should be on everyones list to try if you want  fabulous Thai food prepared by a knowlegable chef/owner. We normally order their food to go, but have enjoyed a dinner or two there.  We just finished eating the best Tamarind Duck we have ever had! Their daughter took our " to-go"  order and suggested a delicious Poached Salmon in a sweet sauce with beautifully prepared vegetables. What a great suggestion! The Pad Thai is also our favorite here.
It is a family run business and they couldn't be nicer.
We ordered to go food from this restaurant tonight. They got the order perfect. The food was very good. It was on time. This Thai restaurant is very good and my family recommends it.
The Thai Market is one of my go to restaurants in Marblehead. The Thai family that runs the restaurant is fantastic and the husband is a very talented chef. I go here regularly and always try different dishes. I havent been disappointed with one yet. 

They seem to have difficulty maintaining staff so if you eat at the restaurant the service could be a bit lacking unless the wife is working. We mostly go there for take out but we like to eat there every once and awhile to chat with the friendly family owners and their daughter.

You can't go wrong with their food! I am going to try to talk then into running cooking lessons :)
I ordered the drunken man noodle dinner and it was so spicy I couldn't eat it. I've had this at other places it was only mildly spicy. But i could not eat this, my mouth was on fire. They were nice about it and made me another dish that was less spicy, but the service took forever, and there was no one else in the place. Disappointing experience.
Great place, plenty of parking.

If you like Thai food, this is some of the best around north shore.

Menu was great, staff was very nice, and friendly.
I love Thai food and I had the freshest spring rolls I have ever had here.  I ordered take-out and the delivery man was not your typical delivery guy.  He was a well dressed older Thai gentleman and a nice car.  He was so smiley and polite and on time.  He seemed so surprised when I gave him a tip.

They did forget to include the soup I ordered which I didn't realized until after he left.  Luckily I wasn't charged for it and the we had enough to eat with what we got.

I think the prices are quite high and the portions are not large.  They are good sized but not large.  The sauces were scrumptious and as I said the spring rolls divine!  My only complaints are the prices and the fact they forgot to include my soup.  We will definitely go back again and again and again!!!!
Everything I have tried from this newer restaurant in town has been excellent.  The service can be a little spotty since much of business is carryout, and the wine menu is unpredictable, but the food is the star.
Arrived in Marblehead, for the first time, late at night and hungry after a transatlantic flight. Dived into ThaiMarket for a take-out. Wife and I were delighted, delicious food (green curry), reminiscent of the real thing. Have been back since and would wholeheartedly recommend.
The reviews are in and this new spot is fabulous. We do take-out and really enjoy the quality and service all around. The fish specials are great paired with fresh vegetables and spicy! 
As an Asian food junkie I can say Thai Market is outstanding.  The abundance of vegetables served on the meals, and surprisingly in soups too, is unmatched anywhere.  I mean like 7 vegetables in a tofu or chicken dish...and not always the same.  Expect things like onions, carrots brocoli, chinese cabbage and greens, squash, boc choy, pea pods, bamboo shoots and even on occasion a slice of lotus root too.  All vegetables are sliced with expertise-no handfuls of green beans just heaved in, here they are carefully juliened and there is never too much of any one thing.  Lovely flavorful sheer sauces, some very spicy if you like it that way.  No liquor license yet but it's worth it.  Order a variety of things and share.  Lunches are an amazing deal, most at $8 and include a delicious soup.  This restaurant needs to be patronized now to reward the owners for their extraordinary efforts.  Be patient, your food will be prepared just for you.
there is no liquor licence yet but it is worth checking out . 
comfortable dining atmosphere .
This is a Marblehead institution.  We go there for convenient dinners from time to time.  The prepared foods are good, but a bit expensive relative even to higher priced grocery stores like Whole Foods.  Nonetheless, we support them because they enhance the overall dining scene in town.  They are particularly great (and without peer) if you are looking for sandwiches and/or custom salads in Marblehead.  We use them a lot for picnics.  I can't recommend them highly enough for these purposes.
Great quality and nice people that own and run it in this combination take-out and sit down shop. Everything is fresh and sandwiches, etc made to order. Nice local place with great gift, kitchen and alcohol selections. Alcohol is not served though.
We were driving through the area sightseeing and decided to stop and get a bite.  We never expected what happened next.  At the food case for fresh entrees and sides was an array of delicious meats, seafood, chicken, and vegetables, I could go on and on.....There were 6 of us and we each chose 2 items and shared at our table.  Some of the items we ordered were the pepper crusted tuna, crab cakes, roasted cauliflower, grilled flank steak.  It was a wonderful lunch that we were not expecting.  The staff was wonderful and we even visited with the owner.  Next time I get back to the east coast/Boston area I plan to drive up the north coast and have lunch again.
Shubies is great for lunch, grabbing a few unique local pre-made food - interesting ice creams too!  They have a terrific wine selection with a very knowledgable staff.  Then they have a bakery and deli!  Soooo GOOD!  And they have a nice kitchen gifts section. 
I love the prepared foods here- and they make amazing sandwiches.  The grocery and wine department are stocked with top products.  I usually spend at least an hour shopping here.  They also carry unique gifts and unusual candles.  Shubie's is just a great little spot.  The dine-in area is small and simple- We typically take everything home or out for a picnic.  If you are in Marblehead- this is a must go if you are a foodie.
Beautiful store, great selection of interesting products and wines. Staff is (mostly) friendly and customer service-oriented. My only gripe is the prices, which range from slightly over-priced to outrageously expensive (some wines that are $15 elsewhere might be $20 at Shubies for ex.) But Marbleheaders seem to be able to afford it, and they do have some "bargain" wines, 2 for $20, etc., and the deli counter prices are in line w/Whole Foods prices.
Shubies is a Gourmet Food and Liquor Institution in Marblehead..and has been for the past 25 plus years that I have lived in this illustrious "birthplace of the American Navy"....I remember when Shubies was in the smaller space on Atlantic Ave. that is now West Marine...I saw that Carol Shube was encouraging a broader selection of gourmet foods and items even back then, and George was doing tastings and detailed looks into wines and spirits.
Today they have expanded into a full-service Gourmet with large variety of Cheeses and  Crackers,Pastas and hard to find items. I particularly like the emphasis on locally produced items.
The salads and prepared foods are better than Whole Paycheck, in my opinion.There are nice tables and a social place at lunchtime and Saturdays.
George and his staff are very knowledgable about their wine and spirits selections. I am also subscribed to their newsletter,which has specials and tidbits of information.
If its jus rock-bottom price you are looking for...then some of the very large liquor outlets have Shubies beat..by a small margin.  I feel the service and ambience and varied selections are unparalleled in the North Shore.
Nice for the wealthy. Food is so overpriced! Good variety with lots of samples. If you are looking to buy and don't care about how much you are paying then this is the place for you. 
Outstanding deli foods prepared on site with wide variety of cheeses, meats and prepared dishes. Always samples on hand. Sandwiches generous and delicious. Pastries beautifully done in French style.  Good assortment of fine wines. Some neat household goods. Expect however to pay a little more for the quality. 
Great wine and food selections.  Fabulous food, eclectic and wonderful.  You will not fine cheeses and dips and crackers and the like anywhere else.  Great afternoon freebie samples.  Don't miss this experience.
Shubies is a gourmet food and gift shop. We often take out for dinner. Delicious entrees, including several vegetarian offerings, an assortment of sides and salads and a great salad bar, soups , sandwiches and great desserts, Shubies has it all along with a great assortment of wine.
Wonderful wine selection. Unusual wines you might not find elsewhere. Helpful staff to pick just the right wine. Foods can be pricey but there's something for everyone.
Enjoyed a quick lunch from an expansive deli counter. The food was displayed beautifully making it difficult (in a good) to pick only a few items. Fun! To my delight they have many GF selections in main dishes, side dishes and deserts. Every item we selected was delicious. Try the watermelon feta salad- refreshingly complex.  
Wished I'd found this earlier in my trip - healthy to-go foods - think Whole Foods tucked into the corner of this quaint New England town. Remarkable selection for vegetarians as well as meat lovers.
Great wine store helpful people and the offering of small pieces of cheese for sale is a marketing marvel! On the other hand you might try cheeses that you would not otherwise try. Wish we had this store near our home in PA
If you are considering a picnic, ior a meal away from a restaurant, Shubie's should fill the bill. They have a range of veg and chicken and meat sandwiches -- large ones, suitablefor an informal dinner. The wine selection is very good, and selected with an eye to the inexpensive. We were well satisfied with our choice.
Can a grocery market be superb?  Yes when you combine everything yummy under one roof.  Delicious ready made organic foods, custom sandwich and salad bar, fine wines, coffee and dessert bar, all the ingredients to prepare any fabulous chefs meal, and a wonderful collection of unique gifts.  

Best part is that they delivered our picnic dinner to the MHI so we could enjoy the sunset over the harbor.  

Try the tuna melt please, staff is friendly and the clam showder is also good. Comeback soon for a second attack
Shubies is my local go-to for a GF comfort food lunch. Chicken soup, grilled cheese sandwich, and fudge brownie are usually available and always yummy. Eat-in or take-out. Oh, yeah! There's the fabulous prepared food section, wine department, and bakery.
I have been going to Shubie's for over 30 years and it only gets better.  This is a family run business with carefully selected products that are unique and elite and their own food creations are simple but elegant.
Closed. This is unfortunate as they had the best Mai Tai drink around. They also had the most reasonably priced sushi around as well as good Chinese food.  Good bar eats.
Really enjoyed the eggplant on a recent visit with friends. Glad to see seafood on the menu, but did not like the shrimp dish as well.
Not the healthiest food with nearly everything fried. But the orange chicken is tasty as are the scallion pancakes. Reasonable price and the place seemed clean. Would go back.
We ate there this evening, based on what we read on Y*lp and other websites.

I have no inkling as to where others have eaten Chinese food, and by what measure they are rating these restaurants, but this place was an extreme disappointment.

We have eaten in Chinese restaurants all over the MA area, including "holes in the wall", and this place just does not cut it by any means.  The local folks like this place because its close to the "Neck" and "Old Town", and the drinks are reasonably priced.  The pricing, itself, is 20% higher than the other places closer to Swampscott and Salem, possibly simply due to its location.  If the cuisine was exceptional, then it would be worth the price differential.

Simply put, none of the dishes we ordered had any taste to them.  Completely bland!  Even when we tried to "doctor" the meal with their Duck Sauce and Mustard sauce, the sauces were watery and equally without flavor.

A few good things about the restaurant was that it was clean, tidy, and the waitstaff was friendly and helpful.  Their soups had some flavor, but not much.

Do yourself a favor... Eat at Yans in Swampscott.  For that matter, eat any place else.
Very fresh, tasty Chinese and Japanese food.  Always a crowd at the bar when I pick up for take out. Pleasant dining in experience as well although not overly crowded. 
Fen Yang does  "traditional" Chinese-American food, and they do it right.

I grew up in this area and remember when there were many more places like this.  All I can say is that I'm glad this one continues to thrive.  This is your parents and grandparents Chinese food, in the best way.

They are not trying to be Chinatown or SF.  If you expect that, you might feel they missed the mark.  However, if you love spare ribs, fried rice, lo mein, General Gau's, etc. you are in for a treat.  Very fresh ingredients, very aptly prepared.  If you enjoy a good tropical cocktail, or just a well poured drink, you are in for an extra  special treat.

There is a good sized bar area that is separate from the dining room.  It's a nice little escape that you will find a number of local people enjoying on any given night. ( It's a scene straight out of "Cheers".)  The dining room is very nice too, especially for larger parties and a more "family oriented" experience.  (Unless you are a member of my family, like half this town…..)  But no question a total stranger would also feel very comfortable here.

They also have a very good sushi bar.  I'll admit that I am something of a sushi snob.  I tend to prefer designated sushi restaurants for some reason.  But their sushi is straightforward, extremely fresh, nicely presented and delicious.  I've been enjoying it for years. 

If you are new to town or a visitor, don't hesitate to check it out.  It's a Marblehead fixture, for good reason.
We order to go food for about 12 people once a month. The food is great. The Chinese and the the Japanese food are both well done. There is no long wait for to go orders. Call and get some great food.
It was a very average experience for our visit.  We started off with the egg rolls which were not greasy but very crispy and well done.  The wonton soup was much more noodle and very little meat.  We had the chicken lo mein and the ginger chicken with string beans.  The ginger chicken didn't come with rice and we had to order it.  That was different.  Both of those dishes were good but the ginger chicken was better.  Portions were a good size and the prices were very reasonable.  The service was good.  My daughter told me the ladies room was dirty and needed a complete overhaul.  She mentioned there were chipped tiles, chipped toilet seats, and the sink was disgusting.
We LOVE Fen Yang. They have what I would call gormet Chinese food (after tasting the other places on the North Shore) and we often eat here when back in town. We ordered it every week when we lived here and miss it terribly.  Kid friendly. Group friendly. Most of the business is take out but there is a large dining room and great service.  They have a Japanese menu and fresh sushi/shashimi made to order in the bar area. Drinks are cheap. Food is FANTASTIC!
This is one of the best places in the area to go for Chinese food.  We like to just go into the bar, and have dinner and watch the game on the TV.

The food is great, the service is great!  Very nice people and they have almost every on the menu.
this is our go-to restaurant for take out sushi. They have a great selection and it is always excellent.
I have enjoyed Comelias for take out dishes like Pasta, Eggplant and more.  The servings are healthy and the quality is spot on everytime.   I would consider their meals for a family take out night when you want Italian and not sure you want to do the cooking
Comella's has a wide variety of pizzas and pasta dishes. It is the most reasonably priced pizza in town. (One reason is they do not deliver). Staff is friendly and courteous on the phone and in person. Limited seating inside. In good weather sidewalk ding is available.
First of all the pizza is good. Actually the picture is very good. Like ours well done. Always comes out perfectly. Two pies 16" for under $14.00 is a bargain anywhere anytime. Take out is the best way to go here as the place only has a few tables. The people are friendly considerate and get the order right every time.A bargain anywhere anytime. Take out is the best way to go here as the place only has a few tables. The people are friendly considerate and get the order right every time. All of the dishes look delicious. Considering the place looks quite busy. The food must be good.  Price only works so long if the food is not. I'll be back!
Have been here many times hoping for an improvement but unfortunately it did not happen.  This is not Italain food not even a close imitation.  It is disgusting. Mushy gloppy pasta in a tasteless sauce.  Pizza is skimpy on everything which is maybe a good thing.  Too bad because it is so convenient but I will not return.
Shhhh.. Don't tell 'em....
Sometimes you go to a place because of the price being low.
Sometimes you go to a place because the food is just too good and the price is an afterthought.
Comellas is both. I frequent the Marblehead , MA location.
Small corner store, Only a few tables for the townies, with really excellent Italian dishes for, dare I say, more than reasonable prices.
On this visit... Pizza is not a cheater size and only $5.99 ea. I order two and what we don't finish goes into the freezer for snacks during the week.
The staff is excellent to the point of opening each box to make sure the "pie" is cooked exactly the way it was ordered. We like extra crispy. Add in a antipasto and you have a great meal and the whole bill including tax is $16.00.
Normally a couple of pies are more than that.
Shhhh, don't tell 'em......
Just wasted my time, my money and my share of stomach to perhaps the worst place on the North Shore. If you're curious about dinner at Comella's in Marblehead, take my advice and don't bother. Literally a mess on a plate that tasted as bad as it looked.
Pasta overcooked to point of mush. Sauce from jars would be a vast improvement on their touted 'home made' stuff. Their mess is in edible as well as ugly. If they stay in business here they will have to do some cooking on site, not truck in frozen glop from who knows where. Really pretty awful excuse for Italian food. Encore frozen is a step up. 
We were very curious after checking out the website for "Comellas" in other areas.  My husband and I always try anything new that opens.  So, we tried the cheese pizza.  To me, the way to judge a pizza is just a plain cheese.  If they get that right (italian right) then the others should be good as well.  Basically, it was inedible. I guess it is Conveyor belt pizza (not italian) and the belt must be set to move too fast.  The dough was raw, the sauce had a tinny canned taste and the cheese was scant and not flavorful.  We will try the meatballs and perhaps a couple of other items before we make a final decision and review.  But the pizza is not an item I would ever try again.
This is part of a chain of 10 other Comellas. I am sure the original founded in 1988 by patriarch, Gene Comella, it was good. A single  outlet is far different than opening 10 more and expecting consistency with menu and recipes. in y opinion is nothing special.

The area in Marblehead outlet to dine is small and noisy. Its new so its very clean. Staff is friendly, and hopefully, they hired locals.

Food quality. Nothing special in my opinion. Sweet tomato sauce for pizza made with soybean oil??  Where is Italian olive oil??

And I question the fact that this is "homemade-in-the-kitchen" pizza dough. It's thin and cheese is skimpy. Pasta is overcooked. Eggplant seems smooshy like baby food. Alfredo sauce doesn't resemble or taste anything like Alfredo Viaggi's "alfredo sauce." Prosciutto raviolis use PUREE!

Basic 16 inch  cheese pizza starts at $5 and you can build on for $2-$6 more a topping. Problem is that after 4 additional toppings your pizza is over $13.

The "Family Messes" is an actual name. Family Messes according to their website a mystery recipe.....yeah...And it is a mystery to me to even bother.

Four sizes. A Single for one person, a 1/2 Bucket serves 3-4 people for the price of 3, a full Bucket serves 6-8 people for the price of 5, and a Double Bucket serves 20-25. 

If you are looking for authentic non chain Italian food. This is not your place. Really. Simply don't go. Italian last name only thing authentic.

If you want buckets of food. Don't care about legitimate Italian cuisine?....This is your place.
Mino's is one of those places that has been serving roast beef for years and into the decades.  A marblehead tradition for after schoolers , families and tourists.  The food is fast , good and affordable.  They provide sit down and array of some other dishes.  Ask one of the owners about Crete
I was in town for a class reunion and had to have lunch at Minos. I had not been there in over twenty years and it did not disappoint.I had the chicken fingers and my friend had the steak and cheese. Mine was yummy and so was hers. 
The food was tasty. I love the roast beef sandwiches and Greek salads. The line gets long at lunch time. If you call ahead it will be ready when you arrive. 
A wide selection of foods beyond Roast Beef.  The new owner is outgoing and friendly and eager to please.  The hamburgers are delicious as well and salads a healthy option. 
This place has been in Marblehead forever.  Huge selection of sandwiches, subs, and pizza.  Get a roast beef sandwich here and you will NOT ask "where's the beef?"
Best roast beef sandwiches done to perfection but also great chicken kebabs and salads.  Good prices and enough tables for families with kids.  Also have pizza and burgers.
My husband always makes a stop at Minos when we are in town. The beef is flavorful adn the bread is yummy. They make other sandwiches as well and have a pretty big variety of eats for a such a small place. It's a hangout for the teens. Get your food to go.
Just love it!
Great take out and eat in joint for lunch a dinner.
I've getting food here for years - best fries in town.
The sandwiches were big, the roast beef sliced nice and thin and tender and not overcooked.  The service was fantastic and the onion rings were to die for!  If you are in the area and don't get a roast beef sandwich here, you haven't lived the dream.
2 juniors sauce cheese and mayo.  I have been ordering them for as long as I can remember.  It was a place to be seen when I was in high school 30 years ago.  The pizza is good and the salads are fresh.
One of the town's old standbys; everyone in this town likes Minos! There's a full lunch menu, take out and delightful owners. 
Small place with nice people. Good roast beef sandwich.  Chicken kabob salad is good. Give this place a try, you will like it
I have enjoyed coming to Terry's for years and think Richardson's ice cream is very good. Usually I get a "small" which typically comes with two scoops as their sign's graphic depicts. However, not only was my serving noticeably smaller than before, but what they advertised as a second scoop was perhaps the equivalent of a teaspoon. When I showed the server and asked if she called that a "scoop" she said "yes." I am wondering if ownership has changed.
This spot is pretty popular with kids, but I saw lots of adults there too. Fruit Smoothies were a hot choice.
Excellent ice-cream, the shop is done out in an old fashioned 50's style, I had ice-cream and my husband had frozen yogurt both of which was great.
We love visiting Terry's Ice Cream and have done so for years! Their ice cream and frozen yogurt offerings are plentiful and delicious. 
Although the ice cream offers all kinds of toppings and varieties, it's really same old, same old, ahd mediocre at best.  That said, if you happen to be 14, or thereabouts, it's a great, local hangout on a hot summer night.
Local flavor, local owner.  A popular spot for ice cream for all ages.  Really nice service and old time atmosphere.  Convenient location right on Atlantic Ave.
Excellent ice cream treats and service!!  I couldn't live without this place! You must get Almond Joy!
Everyone has their favorite ice cream haunt and this is ours! Terry's serves Richardson's Dairy ice cream which is local, fresh and about the creamiest around! Servings are large and the topping selection is good. I wish the owner would focus on the store though, and get out of his ice cream truck a little more. the staff is usually overwhelmed and unenthusiastic. We think it is the norm now to see how miserable the help will be on our weekly visits. The amount of off the wall offerings is enough to make any employee jump ship! Would you like a cannoli stuffed by a 16 year old scooper with a line out the door? or maybe Rich's slush which is kept out back because there is no room out front. Or maybe they should invest in spellcheck and spell banana correctly. Harsh, but things any owner should listen to if they care. But, luckily for Richardson's we'll keep returning!!
What a nostalgic ice cream shop, decorated in a 1950s theme right in the heart of downtown Marblehead with the absolute best ice cream around and a wonderful selection of toppings.  Don't miss the warm cookie dough topping!  Service is always warm and friendly, and the prices are great!!!  Not to be missed.
Terry's  has the atmosphere of an old fashioned ice cream parlor with black & white tiles on the floor, metal seats with red cushions, & great ice cream.
The title says it all.  The vanilla soft serve with giant heaping spoonfuls of melty, gooey chocolate cookie dough topping is, quite literally, unbelievable.  Beyond that, though, the ice cream here is fairly mediocre compared to other places on the North Shore that make their own.
Coffey Ice Cream in the heart of Old Town Marblehead serving Massachusetts famous Richardson's ice cream is the spot to hit when you need some ice cream on a hot summer night, or a cold autumn day for that matter!  Family run and family friendly the ice cream is delicious, portions generous and setting nostalgic.  There are a few tables inside and several more outside and in addition to Richardson's famous ice cream they also offer alternatives such as soft serve, frozen yogurt and sorbet.  We have a few dessert spots we always like to hit when we are in Marblehead a few times each year and this is certainly one of them.
Great ice cream , fun spot to relax and enjoy the sceenery!
The kids loved drawing with chaulk on the side walk too!
A bit hard to find but we eventually got there.  Fast service.  Lots of choices.  But no blueberry ice cream?  I know we are not in Maine, but we always crave this in New England.  Good parking considering how cramped Marblehead is.
We are lucky in Marblehead to have 3 ice-cream/frozen Yogurt stores to choose from, it's a little hidden away down in Old Town, by Crosby's market store. Ice cream is amazing, lots of different flavors, sizes from kids to large.  Please note small size is huge! Family run business, with friendly staff, small sitting area and plenty of parking. Make Coffey's your ice cream stop whilst visiting Marblehead, even take a stroll to Crocker Park, eat ice cream and take in the magnificent view, Enjoy!
This place gets crowded in the afternoon, but if you are patient you will be rewarded with a very good ice cream treat. They have a very large selection of flavors. In addition they have loads of toppings and many other treats and specialties.
The ice-cream is delicious and the shop is in a good location serving old-fashioned - yummy ice-cream! Gluten free choices are available.
Locally made ice cream with many flavor choices!  Coffey's is a great ice cream place.  I love the ice cream scoop collection hanging from the ceiling.  Highly recommend if you are in Old Town Marblehead!
Great choice of ice cream flavors and friendly service in Old Town. Conveniently located next to a parking lot (Crosby's Marketplace), Coffee Ice Cream is strategically located for a stroll to the harbor or a closer walk to Crocker Park overlooking the harbor. Just don't go after Columbus Day because Coffey's is closed from October to the spring.
Great ice cream, good high school staff, lovely owner overseeing it all. But the best part, is that you can get a big topping of freshly melted freezer cookie dough on top of your ice cream. Brilliant idea, we have never seen it anywhere else. Yum!!!
My husband LOVES ice cream and got their Blueberry and loved it.  I got the peanut butter chocolate and it was delicious!  They are very nice in there and conveniently located.
It was a great little ice cream shop in Marblehead!
I just walked by and she is getting ready to Open-YES!   What a lovely & nice lady the owner is. It is family run with a few teens to help.  Lovely & warm is all I have to say.
It the Crosby's shopping center.  They have managed to provide an excellent selection and keeping those scoops sizable.  I would say that Coffey Ice Cream is the best spot in Marblehead to satisfy that Ice Cream requirement
Lots of choices.  Grab a cone and head to Crocker Park to watch the boats or hang outside at one of the cafe tables.  Fun to check out the photographs from all the past years she has been in business.
We had ice cream all over Marblehead and Boston area & this was amazing!  The first night, we picked up a quart to bring back to our rental house & enjoyed with the family.  The first one was cookies & cream, which was rich and creamy!

The second visit, our son's Kayak class (from the Little Harbor Boathouse) stopped during a morning class to get ice cream.  He choose the blue ice cream with fudge ripple with chocolate covered crispies - it was perfect.  He says there is nothing better than this ice cream!

There are a ton of choices & much to enjoy!
Great little ice cream shop  in the older part of  town.  Very good selection of ice creams and a smaller selection of frozen yogurts.  We settled on the frozen yogurt.  The Heath Bar was tasty as was the Oreo cookie.  Portions are very generous and prices are reasonable.  The staff behind the counter was friendly and helpful.  There is seating inside and outside.
it is only open for the summer season! a lot of people (me) like to eat ice cream year round! great location though. 
We were in the shop at the Marblehead Arts Association and asked the counterperson if there was a good place for ice cream. She recommended Coffey. It is tucked away adjacent to a large parking lot (which I wish we'd found earlier, as parking in the town is a challenge!). The watermelon sherbet was refreshing and a real summer treat. 
I had some "only available for a short time" peach ice cream - and it was so delicious!!!  Sheila knows how to make good ice cream - and if I lived in Marblehead - I'd be trotting over on a daily basis for my "calcium" supplement!
Just returned from a trip to Marblehead visiting my sister and her family.  They took us to Coffey and it did not disappoint.  A little more reasonable than some other homemade I've cream shops locally.
Just opposite the Jack Tar tavern, Coffey's is the perfect place for an frozen dessert treat. It is extremely popular & its likely that you will have to queue for a while, especially on hot evening, but it is well worth the wait. Young & old alike seem to favour the icecream parlour. Seating is very limited inside, but there are tables & chairs as well as benches right outside. The place is light & airy & the variety of ice-cream scoops hanging from the ceiling are great fun. So many flavours to choose from there is bound to be one to please just about everyone - a couple of no added sugar icecreams for diabetics & low fat yogurt based options as well. Get a good idea of portion sizes before ordering or it may be too much to finish! Great place, lovely icecream - yum.
Strong drinks, fresh seafood and very friendly locals. We spent a wonderful carefree afternoon enjoying Bloody Marys and mussels. Some of the best I've had, by the way. So tasty and incredibly fresh. The view from the porch is priceless. Perfect place to kick back and relax.
We had  dinner  first night we came to Marblehead. Seafood was fresh and service was attentive. Nice spot!
This was not the easiest place to find and we were very lucky to find close parking.  We were seated immediately and got seats looking out the windows at the bay.  The clam chowder was very good and so was the fish and chips and fried shrimp.  The only downside here was once we were served our food it was almost impossible to get refills on our drinks.  This is a nice local spot with great views!
The Barnacle building sits on rocks at the edge of the water, nearly at the mouth of the harbor.  We ate 'bar style' sitting at the picture window, looking out across the harbor at the harvest moon coming up over the lighthouse last month.  Tired from a really long day of driving, we opted for bowls of lobster bisque and salads.  PERFECT!  The bisque was creamy and had pieces of lobster in it.  The salads were ample.  Yum!
Stopped by here after a walk around town to have a drink and a nibble. Weirdly, they didn't serve any draft ale. It was all bottled. This is fine but after a long walk in the sun, the little 12oz bottles didn't last long!!

As for food, we ordered the calamari and the Jalapeño Poppers. 

I now realise there is such a thing as "Marblehead Portions". 

We received six Poppers and each were about the size of an extra large egg. It was more like an entrée and I felt like I was going to go pop afterwards. The excellent selection of beers helped wash them all down though. 

The mixer drink recipes were the same it seems. There was so much vodka in my wife's drink, she had to order extra cola on the side!! Brilliant!!

We sat outside (you need to eat if you do) and watch the sea crash onto the rocks.

The Barnacle is a really enjoyable and relaxing venue for casual dining and drinking. Highly recommended. 
You do not have to eat outside to have a GREAT view and lunch! The calamari appetizer was prepared to perfection.  The soups were very good.  It was a great lunch.  Wish we were going to be in the area longer to have dinner.  If we are in the area again, we come back!
We had 6 people for lunch and they had no problem accommodating us. Its right on the water and they have outside seating. The fish tacos are very good.
We here for supper while we was in town on vacation. I chose it because of trip advisor reviews, but a local guy also confirmed this decision as he said it was his favorite place to eat at. He told us to order the haddock as it was his favorite item. that's what we ordered and it did not disappoint as it was a very good meal. We got lucky and got to sit outside on the deck overlooking the harbor which made the ambience special. We will eat here again when we return to area. Only hiccup was our waitress did not offer any fill ups on our drinks, it cost her on her tip, I do not hold that against the restaurant as other servers seamed to be doing a good job
We were staying in Marblehead and wanted to find a god seafood restaurant. The Barnacle was recommended as a great local spot right on the water. We walked from the B&B to the restaurant. An interesting walk down narrow old streets. The Barnacle was definitely a rustic local restaurant. Some outside seating overlooking the water. We decided to dine inside as it was a little chilly. Nothing fancy here. But, the service and food was really good. We both had the fried shrimp. it was excellent. Fried perfectly and accompanied by French fries and cole slaw. A great meal. We didn't have room for desert although the had a tempting desert menu. Very reasonably priced and served by a friendly staff. We highly recommend when in Marblehead.  
Overlooking Marblehead harbor, The Barnacle offers great food, fast service, and if you can get a table outside, beautiful views of the harbor.Best to call ahead for reservation. My favorite is the Fishermans platter, huge piece of fish, mountain of fries, scallops, clam bellies. One of the few plates that I could not finish because I was filled to the brim.
And this place is great. Good food amazing views .. and of course open on weekends! Must go if visiting nearby
The Barnacle is not the most fanciest place.  However it has the best lobster, clam chowder and of course dark and stormys.  The restaurant is on the water so you can enjoy a great view of the harbor.  
You should try to get there for an early dinner as the restaurant does fill up and then there is a long wait.  Yet, you can just sit outside and relax and enjoy the view of the harbor.  
The bar is small and the town regulars usually take up most of the seats.
Great experience, terrific food, fabulous service. Met the owner, really seems to care. Seems to be local hangout
Recent stay in Marblehead, MA.  Inn keeper suggested The Barnacle.  Actually ended up going there 3 times.  Lunch, Drinks/Snack, Dinner.  Each time we were on the deck overlooking the harbor.  Food was very good.  Steamed Clams were generous in quantity for snack.  All food was fresh and the staff was very attentive.  We will surely come back to this spot when we return to Marblehead.
Have been coming here since I was little and it's still great. Fresh, local seafood with a great view. This is the place to be during storms. The waves break over the restaurant.
Since I've lived here all my life and visitors always want a lobster and a waterfront restaurant The Barnacle is perfect.  Old and rustic, crammed and noicy it is a fun spot especially if you sit outside.  Not fancy dining!  Just take that boiled lobster and pull it apart and dig out that succulent meat, dip it in drawn butter and enjoy  the experience.  They supply a lobster bib for a reason!  Great location for day or evening visit!
Set right on Marblehead harbor, actually hanging over it, view can't get any better. Small restaurant so very noisy and because of local charm, usually crowded. Can eat out or in but often breezy off water. Also loose door to deck slamming repeatedly was distracting. Seafood platter was more than generous. Fried shrimp tasty. Sides good. Clam chowder made fresh continuously.  Only two specials daily but larger choice of appetizers. 
We stopped in for a late lunch.  Burgers were huge !!!!  Fish and chips were wonderful.  Not heavy breeding but light and wonderful.  Service was good but it was very very busy.  Very friendly place and great seafood menu.  Had a wonderful time.  Recommend! 
lovely lobster on a tiny deck overlooking the harbour.  felt very authentic, rustic nautical and the lobster tasted like it had just been brought in off the boat, which considering they catch their own lobsters was probably true!
I have been here with my wife and 3 kids, with my family and another family and on a date with just my wife. This is our favorite place to eat when we visit Marblehead. The steamer clams are served with butter and boils sea water. The twin lobster special is a good value for 2 lobsters and a ton of food. We all enjoy the clam chowder to the point that we order it every time. 
Just landed in MA yesterday and drove to the beautiful Marblehead to chill for three days before going in to Boston. We were shattered after 19hrs travelling and decided to just have some appetisers and a couple of beers before bed. So we chose Maddie's bar. 

The place is clean and well kept. The clam chowder was creamy and full of flavour. My wife had the lobster bisque which was also first class. The mussels were fresh and the mariniere sauce was spot on. 

The worst thing however is that it is primarily a drinkers' bar. Consequently, on our night, two customers decided to blast the rest of us with rap music on the jukebox. To be fair, the waitress asked us if we were bothered by it (mainly the swearing). But hey, it's only "music", the meal was inexpensive, the service was great, and we were very very tired. So I'm not marking the place down for that. Just take heed though if you are looking for a quiet pub meal. 
Since I was born and raised in Marblehead, I'm very familiar with Maddy's.  I've been coming here forever and highly recommend it to all for great drinks, food and service.  The drinks are generous and potent and the food is great.  The downstairs is a terrific local bar with booths and the upstairs has a bar and dining area with booths and tables.  

It's a very popular place and doesn't take reservations.  You might have to wait a bit for dinner but it's worth it.  I was visiting Marblehead and stopped in for dinner with my wife and some old friends.  I had swordfish and she had a lobster roll...both excellent.  

It's a bit noisy, but the service is great and you won't find a better local place in your travels!
I had heard about the lobster roll and had to try it. Sure it comes on a simple bun that was okay, it was loaded with large chunks of lobster and not over-powering dressing. For the money one of the better lobster rolls + add an inexpensive PBR and this was a fantastic lunch.
We LOVE Maddie's!!  Who doesn't?!  It's comfort all american food.  I love the ravioli over butternut squash and grilled chicken in a cream sauce.  My husband loves the ribeye.  Always great!  As far as the booze - be prepared.  They are strong and full.  The glass of wine comes filled to the brim, the mixed drinks are super potent.  What's not to love about this place?!
We have visited here for dinner and drinks on every visit we have made to the Harbor Light Inn Marblehead and were again not disappointed.
Great food and a large selection of cold locally brewed beers at this popular Locals Bar/Restaurant
Went to Maddie's with 2 friends who were visiting from out of town. Two of us had the BAKED haddock  sandwich . It came with a buttered,  toasted roll. I had mine on the side. They let me substitute a salad for the fries for $1 more and gave us delicious tartar sauce. My other friend had the fried haddock sandwich  and loved it. We noticed they had lobster risotto on the menu and decided to share it. There were actual chunks of lobster in it. Yum! We will return SOON.
We had one night in Marblehead before the start of a sailboat race and roamed around looking for a place to eat.  I've been to Marblehead many times, but have only eaten at The Landing and The Barnacle.  Both overlook the harbor and had the usual summer crowds..  

We ended up at Maddie's, which I only knew of as a local sailors bar, a half block up State St. from The Landing.  We took a chance and tried out the restaurant upstairs above the bar.  What a great place!  They have a separate bar from the one downstairs and we chose to sit at a corner window table in that room.  The waitress was extremely nice and efficient.  The cocktails were generous and mixed just right.  I ordered the warm spinach salad, which is their take on a cobb salad.  Lots of bacon, 2 hardboiled eggs, fantastic dressing and other tasty bits. My wife got fish tacos which were fresh and flavorful.  They were pan seared, not fried.  We left very happy we took the chance on trying something new.  We will go there again on our next trip to Marblehead.
This is the place to go for a family style meal -- lots of families are there too prove it. Basically seafood, though thewre ate other choices. Goof food, good service.
It was our favorite place to eat while in Marblehead.  Great food and great customer service.  It had lots of character and I could tell it was one of the locals favorites. 
We had an early dinner while going thru Marblehead on a road trip. They could serve dinner before 5:30pm and the downstairs atmosphere was very local. Food was great and cheap and wine was poured to the top of the glass (unusual). No wine list but we asked for a Sauvignon Blanc and a Cab and they had both- only one option for the white, two for the red. I had the pan-seared haddock over mashed potatoes and spinach (so good) and husband and son had pasta dishes - all very good- we asked for bread and bread and butter were served at no cost. Very friendly service - small place so dunno if it gets crowded fast but at 5:30 we were the only ones eating - was very special for us
I have been coming to Maddie's for over 40 years (and I'm only 36).  Have been there through the long initial period of stability then the flurry of turnovers around 10 years ago, and now into the return to stability with Loretta's ownership.  The menu is excellent, food quality is consistently first rate, and the drinks are amazing.  Two of my favorites are the pan seared haddock (best haddock dish ANYWHERE, EVER!) and the scallop dish.  Great staff, lots of locals, and everybody's always in a good mood (upstairs at least).  Who wouldn't be with such awesome food!
A classic water-town watering hole. Great as a very local stop for a drink, but the bar-pub menu is nothing to celebrate.
Had not been there in years due to the multiple ownerships. My wife and I went for a casual dinner and were pleasantly surprised by the quality of the food and the reasonable price. The beers were unbelievable and cheap. Will definitely return.
Maxie's is a Marblehead institution, but has never lost its rustic and nautical charm. Staff are helpful and relaxed. Stop by for good food and fun.
Maddie's is one of those local restauraunts that has poured sizable drinks and offered quality food for history.  The locals have always provided this place the traffic it needs.  It also is known to be a night spot for the local youth.  
This place is a legend.  The menu is diverse and the drinks are not only consistently good but strong. They make an outstanding hamburger that is moist and flavorful.
One of my favorite places in Marblehead, hands down. I have tried the haddock, the swordfish, and the scallops and all were fantastic. Amazing onion rings too, and surprisingly good risotto, considering it is not an Italian restaurant. The only dish I would not re-order was the wedge salad, which was actually pretty bad. But it's harder to make a good swordfish steak and that is where it matters most. Maddie's is known to have a strong pour, so don't order a dark & stormy unless you can weather the storm! The dining room is our preferred venue, it is above the pub. The pub is fine too but I am 47 and the average age seems to be 22 so it's not really my scene. But on a quiter night, it's the same menu and works just as well. I love Maddie's!
It was difficult to decide what to get here because there were many choices.  We enjoyed what we ordered although the lobster risotto on the side of my scallops was disappointing.  The service was attentive but not hovering.  I'm sure the place can get rocking on the weekends or on evenings when it's not so snowy and cold.  We enjoyed the meal but the atmosphere is pretty bare bones.  Great location on State Street.
They have great fresh mussels and oysters, and incredibly moist salmon and swordfish. A consistently well prepared meal and great service and huge cocktail and beer service. And prices are not too bad either!
Three of us were visiting the area for a mini-getaway and decided to go to Maddie's to have dinner before playing trivia there.  The service was great and the food was delicious!  We ordered lots of appetizers, and they were all really yummy!  It was a fun place for trivia and we all agreed that we were glad we decided to eat there.  
We went here for a birthday dinner.  It is a fun atmosphere and the food was amazing.  The ribs are excellent as were the scallops.  The kids menu was perfect.  Service was excellent!  Can not wait to go back when we return for another visit!
We ate here our first night in Marblehead. It's delicious! The wait staff is friendly and efficient. Fantastic food. Great atmosphere. Awesome draft beer selection.
Decent service, fantastic menu and food was surprisingly good. Ate here late one Saturday night and will definitely go back. Great place to have in town!
Four of us dinned at Jack Tarr's recently & had a wonderful experience.We had grilled scallops, crab cakes, sirloin tips, shrimp & salads. Everyone really enjoyed the dinners they ordered. We ate on the outside patio on a lovely night. Brenden our waiter was terrific. He did an excellent job as well as being very personal. We never felt rushed.
This was our first visit to Jack Tar and only stayed for drinks as the kitchen had just closed.
A good selection of beers on tap.
Great "no frills" location in Marblehead. Excellent appetizers,salads,burgers and martinis served by friendly staff. Great outdoor dining.
I know the difference between grill marks and burnt meat. One bite was enough and I had asked it to be medium. Their answer - too well done for you. I waited for another burger but this one was also over done while the inside was bloody. Not happy.
They offer $5 pizzas from 5-7 pm each night, so if you go during that time be prepared for lots of families with kids inside. Outside seemed to be less hectic, but the rain did cause reseating, which caused overcrowding in the bar area. 

The four cheese pizza was good. The spaghetti Bolognese was fine. The basil vinaigrette was the best part of our main meal. 

The blondie with malted ice cream was very good. 

A solid restaurant.
Of the many restaurants in Marblehead, Jack Tar is one of few that is consistently good. The ambiance is high enough for a romantic night, but relaxed enough for beers after work. The bar can be a little crowded but still intimate. They have a great line up of beers on tap and a great collection of scotch. The lighting is low and the tables are close, but don't feel crowded. They make great burgers, great pizzas and Pasta Bolognese that my wife and I go back for over and over again. Jack Tar is solid.
Great bar with a good atmosphere full of friendly people . Food was well priced and  excellent value. Had to go back the next 2 nights for more.
Enjoyed eating in the garden at Jack Tar. The food was very good and the server was friendly. The location is a nice walk from Harborside House 
Inside, on the patio or in the bar ... perfect. Wife - hostess / Husband - chef. Reasonable prices ... nice selection of great menu items. $5 pizzas (5 - 7 pm). No rush dining. A little loud inside just because people are enjoying themselves. Closed on Mondays.
Consistently delicious with creative ingredients, a nicely varied menu, and great fresh local fish. The locals are in here all the time, a strong testimony to the quality.
The fried chicken is gone from the menu. I had the lettuce chicken wrap. Which was a disappointment because: I had to make my own wraps, it was messy; the dipping sauces were mediocre; the bowl of chicken and mushrooms should have been stirred or I should have been informed to stir it as the chicken was on the top and all of the mushrooms were on the bottom. My wife's cod tacos had fried cod sticks...Mrs. Paul's?

Bring back the fried chicken and we'll be back, otherwise...Ta!

To be fair, there are both positives and negatives.  Positives include some creative items on the menu like buffalo cauliflower which by the way was very good. Prices are reasonable too.  Negatives include the lack of personable service.  Our server, Becka, was very nice but on the other hand, the hostess had no idea about how to smile.  It was obvious that she was not happy to be there even when she came over to refresh our water glasses. I ordered the veggie burger which in my opinion was not so good.  Too mushy!
Good food with fun specialty drinks. Service always pleasant. Love the brick wall of the bar and outdoor seating in the summer. Can be loud in the winter. 
Nice place tucked away close to the center of Marblehead. Good mix of traditional pub food with some specialties. Good burger and sandwiches and nice beer selection on tap. Friendly staff and good service!
I have eaten here for dinner a few times, but I love this place for apps. They have a $5 pizza menu from 5-7 daily which includes a "larger-than"personal pizza with a thin crust in your choice of cheese, veggie or bbq chicken. They also have fabulous appetizers like the tuna poke (sushi grade tuna), asian chicken wings, and nice salads. A great wine list and friendly bartenders completes the scene. On a nice night, I like to sit outside on their patio. One of the best places in town!
It has been (too) a long time since we dined and we were reminded what Jack's has been around so long. The food is exceptional, yet "normal", American fare and the attentiveness of staff was commendable
I have not dined at Jack Tar's for 3 years.  The food and service was excellent.  Our group tried all varieties on the menu and all items were very good.  The Fish & Chips were fresh caught fish and came to the table nice & hot.  other had Steak tips, and flank steak.  Drinks good and waitress very knowledgeable and friendly.  The Fish & Chips was the last served, the waitress apologized and bought me a glass of wine.
Definitely going back lot sooner than 3 years.
I don't understand why a restaurant would call itself The Muffin Shop and continuously be out of muffins by 9/10:00 am! It's outdated, dirty, and overpriced for food served on styrofoam! Needs an overhaul!
On the recommendation of our BNB hosts when asked where to go for good Lobster rolls they sent us here.  Fabulous lobster rolls--large fresh chunks of lobster meat cooked to perfection-  even comes with pickles and chips
Wonderful muffins.Get there early,the best sell out fast. All day breakfast  sandwiches to die for. Friendly staff.
Located in a beautiful section of Marblehead. Great for a quick lunch break whilst shopping at local stores. We had Chicken Salad sandwiches. AMAZING. So flavorful and big. Comes with pickle and chips at a reasonable price. Cant wait to go back!
The Muffin Shop in Marblehead is a long-standing gathering spot for locals offering the best muffins in the area, breakfast and lunch. Very casual and very good!  
Simple food, sandwiches, muffins and yummy drinks will satisfy your hunger and thirst served perfectly right on the main street in Old Marblehead.
the food is great.  the atmosphere is the locals.  the lobster roll is the best in the United States period bar none

and most important the owners care and it shows
Oh my!!!! Whenever I'm home from a schedule that has me away from home a lot, I try to eat seafood whenever I can. There is no lobster roll anywhere in Massachusetts that rivals this one. Piled high, not too much mayo, and solid chunks of meat. I'll be back next month! 
It's true,  not only can you get your quality muffin and coffee but did you know that the Muffin Shop makes one of the best " Lobster Rolls " in all of Marblehead
I love the lobster rolls, I think they are the best in town. My teenage daughter meets friends for breakfast before school. The open early and close early but it's a great spot, especially if you want to take food to go and eat on a bench overlooking the harbor or to Crocker Park. Great sunrise view too!
While people say the muffin shop has the best lobster rolls, their homemade muffins have been satisfying townies for years!!!
Sampled four different muffins.  The topping part is impressive but the majority of the muffin is not that special.  All tasted the same.  Don't spend too much time thinking about the choices as it is essentially a waste of time.  The three berry muffin had about three berries in it.  Hence the name I suppose.  Two out of three visits to this place I have witnessed the owner?/manager treating his employees poorly.  I am done here.  
Just for the muffins. There is so much more. WE have yet to partake of all the goodies but each different non-muffin offering has been very good: from the panini to the sandwich to the breakfast choices. There are so many selections in each category and yet they are all, so far, very good at the least.

The only complaint I have is that it can get quite messy in the dining area after the crowds have subsided and that is a bit of a turn-off
After a few days in Marblehead and two disappointing lobster rolls.  My husband rolled down the car window and asked a couple walking by if they lived around here.  They said they lived right on the street.  His next question was where will we get a good Lobster Roll.  They laughed and said believe it or not it will be at "The Muffin Shop".  We headed right over there and "YES" it was very, very good!  We also enjoyed cookies and chocolate squares.  Excellent place to eat!
After my first visit years ago I became a weekly customer of this family owned business. The owners are outstanding in their devotion from the home made muffins and bakery goods they serve daily as well as serving breakfast and lunch seven days a week that is casual and with table service and good food. A must stop in down town, enjoy.  
Great little lunch or breakfast spot.  Name belies fact that they also have a good selection of sandwiches.  Has loyal local following - It's almost a breakfast club.  
The muffins were fine, but the slow, unfriendly service ruined the experience. The floor wasn't swept, the tables weren't cleaned, and the staff yelled at customers to shut the door (Really! Can't you just ask nicely?) 40 minutes for scrambled eggs!  Two stars is probably too generous. 
Although we are fans of the freshly baked muffins, the hidden gem at the Muffin Shop is the lobster roll.  If you are a local the over stuffed lobster roll is no secret and the long lunchtime lines reflect it.  If you visit during lunch, more often than not, you've already missed out on the huge selection of fresh baked muffins. The service is average but based upon my experience this is more a function of being a victim of their own success.
We were lucky to visit on 2 week-days before we experienced the week-end scene.  Very busy on week-ends -- I think all the locals come here.  Food is good and very reasonable.  We made multiple visits during our stay.
It seems to be a nice Meeting place for locals to have a warm cup of coffe & a small breakdast.
The owner and workers a nice & polite.
I love this place!  They offer a choice of cones or dishes of frozen yogurt in a wide range of flavors and toppings.  The prices are also very reasonable.
It tasted good, but the sugar- free chocolate flavor was very runny - not frozen. Maybe their freezer needs adjusting? It is a busy spot.
I like the variety of flavors and the toppings to choose from.  I can go light or I can go heavy.  The price is all based on your size.  The Marblehead franchise will not disappoint.
The kids had a great time choosing their flavors and every scoop of toppings I could feel my money flowing out of my wallet. Clean and friendly but expensive.
Nice wait staff, very clean, and always lots of choices for flavors.  A great place to hang out regardless if its afternoon or evening.
Too expensive!  This is a weigh your food yogurt spot and even though there are a ton of flavor options and topping options, be prepared to take out a mortgage to pay for what is considered an ice cream sundae sized dessert.  Seems excessive.  Flavor is mediocre compared to ice cream.  Not a fan.
The Orange Leaf is   a very well runned business. All it takes is ONE person to run it. All is self serve and the kids love that . They are able to serve the soft frozen yoguart themselves and take as much as they want . It's great
Perhaps it's just me - the kids like it ... but it really adds up once they fill their cup with soft yogurt, then stuff candy on top, weigh it, and WOW!
One in awhie I slip out of my office to sneak over for some sweetness at Orange Leaf.    The yogert and toppings are good, but overall, a little expensive.  The shop is kept emaculate --- so the tables and counters are never sticky.   The shop is inviting and lively and the help attentive.    
Thank goodness we dont have this in England!!! I sampled this twice in Marblehead, having had the first one, I actually waited for the shop to open on the second occasion.

We dont have this concept in England...you get your pot and you pour your own ice from the various taps, then you choose and put on your own toppings.  The price is according to how much your pot weighs at the till!!!  Be careful, it is easy to get carried away.

I loved Chocolate ice, Pinapple Ice, with Reese's pieces, chocolate chips, mango flavoured flavour bubbles (not sure what they are called but they look like giant salmon caviar)..you pop them in your mouth...wow!  And then chocolate sauce on top. Oh my......

And the young lady who served me both days was charming too.
The yogurt and choice is one of the best in the area. Price is a bit high unless of course your good at limiting your extras
A small oasis for treating the kids in a delightful seaside village which dates from the 1600s.  A bit pricy but this upscale village can afford it.  Atmosphere is simple and the high schoolers who work there are always friendly. 
Ok, it's frozen yogurt.  Simple and good with a great selection and a ample topping bar that has always been clean and fully stocked no matter the crowd on the several occasions I have stopped by.  Staffed by a young crowd this is a fun place to stop by and make a yogurt sundae with no over the top expectations.  Dairy Queen was never the best ice cream but I had a blast stopping by as a kid and imagine this is just as much fun if not more, (you can sample anything and make your own..no matter how big or with how many flavors you like) for any child old enough to be let loose at a frozen yogurt bar.  Go for the experience and enjoy good frozen yogurt!  I love the mango and coffee and the berries are always fresh and delicious, and I love that they Butterfinger and Oreo toppings are alway very crunchy!  Staff is so friendly and always ready to serve up samples or help with anything.  Have taken my my niece here and she LOVES it! Can't wait to go again and again!  Winter or summer!
Passed by many times, was intrigued by the interior and crowds when it first opened. But on night we went --we were the only ones there (it was winter, but it seemed really weird). Thought it was expensive and the yogurt was only so so. The toppings were fun. But, I didn't finish mine because I really didn't like the yogurt.
Not worth the $$.
The title says it all. But here's a tip, I WANT TO SAMPLE ON MY OWN LIKE AT ZINGA! The store was larger than others and clean, but the yogurt was lacking in flavor and substance. We found ourselves. Hungry before we even got home!
Idéale pour manger un frozen yogurt, les enfants adorent les différents parfums et les choix de topping.
Des sorbets "sugar free" pour ceux qui font attention  à leurs lignes.

Accueil sympathique et salle un peu petite mais agréable pour faire un pause.
Mais do que a comida o local convida a curtir a atmosfera de Marblehead, cidadezinha centenária cheia de história para contar. Vista linda sobre o mar, pescadores, movimento de barcos e com o lindo dia sobre a baia com o sol esquentando o mês de outubro foi maravilhoso! Curtimos e aproveitamos para comer lagosta, típico do local! Muto bom, aconselho!
On a bright sunny day in September, we had lunch here, and sat at a sidewalk table.  The owner/chef is charming, and the menu offers a dozen salads and sandwiches and some bakery choices.  For a light lunch, it was perfect!  I had a "smashed" avocado toast, and salad, and my husband had a big salad.  The café is small, but personable, and right in the middle of the Old Town, steps from the Old Town Hall.
Passed by this place and stopped for breakfast. Great cappuccino and delicious croissant.
Fast service and owner was very friendly. I definitely recommend.
Good location for your early morning Marblehead cup of joe. Good Italian coffee and a great selection of freshly baked pastries.
Loved it! Spent 4 days popping in and out for REAL English tea, fantastic wraps, all veggie and organic. A surprisingly refreshing place.......
Roaming around looking for a coffee shop in Marblehead we stumbled across Haley's.   We ordered coffee and two different quiche's.  We got our coffee and a table in the window.  The coffee shop is attached to the wine store and it is open between them.  Soon  the coffee shop was full and the line spilled into the room next door.  We beat the crowd.  Our quiche arrived and we were a little surprised at how thin the piece was, but it was a big wedge.  These were both very good and we took our time sipping coffee and enjoying every bite.
We were walking around Marblehead, having read that it was used for the filming of the Witches of Eastwick and needed a bathroom, so we popped in here and ordered a brownie to go for our Son. He shared a little of it, but not much as it was declared as the best brownie he had ever had. 
We had a lovely breakfast of an omelet, pastry, and coffee. The omelet was perfectly cooked and the pastries warm from the oven. Pretty good coffee and a happy, friendly staff as well. We watched the pedestrian traffic outside the big windows in a sun-filled room.
Guests can sit and relax, sip anything and grab a bite to eat all at once. Staff are very friendly and the environment most pleasant.
Great quality wine and beer at great prices  plus, why not sit down for a gourmet lunch with the attached cafe.  I don't think you can beat this little joint in Old Town Marblehead
Good place for casual lunch featuring homemade soups, sandwiches on good bred and salads. Nice wine shop in other part of room
Always good soups and sandwiches.  Right on lower Washington St. so handy to the shops of  the historic area.
The coffee at this coffee shop was great.  They had lots of different sandwiches and cakes too if you wanted more than a coffee.
Haley's makes a mean breakfast sandwich!  They also have rock cakes (like scones, but made with oatmeal and it as sweet) and plenty of other egg and pastry type options.  For lunch their falafel salad, homemade veggie burger or soup are all great options for vegetarians in addition to their sandwiches. Not to mention their hand cut fries are the best. They're kid friendly (the owners Paul and Julie have kids of their own who are often around).  It can get a little pricey - but it's very tasty.
This is a go-to place for breakfast, snacks, and lunch.  Innovative and traditional fare from a former caterer-to-rockstars (literally!).  The scones and rock-cakes are heavenly, and the wine store/ BYOB restaurant combo can't be beat for dinner.
I really Love the fact no matter what is IS ALWAYS open!  NO Nor Easter, Blizzard OR Anything will keep its doors closed!
I just wish they would get some Better range in both wine & price.
Never been to Marblehead before so we don't really know what's what here. The town is like a Norman Rockwell painting. While hitting the adorable shops we stumbled in Haley's and decided to have lunch. outstanding! I had the falafel salad and my husband had the fish burrito. Both were fan-frickin-tastic! And the price was ridiculously cheap for all the food we ate. Go! Its awesome!
Great soups excellent bean veggie burger.  Home made large bean veggie burger served with soup, salad or fries.  Veggie wrap panini also tasty.  Locals like this place.  I heard the hamburgers are delicious too. Scones, sweets too.  Liquor store adjacent so easy byob   Organic wines
I used to live around the corner and have been eating this pizza since they opened, though now only when I visit the area.   Tastes the same - delicious.   Not artsy, just the standards, but done so well.   
I've been going to house for the last five years when visiting my wife's family in town and it is hands down the best pizza I've ever had. The Chicken Kabob salad is another work of art with the perfect creamy Greek dressing to finish it off. This place will not disappoint, we wish they would open one in Colorado
The Greek Caesar salad with grilled chicken is awesome. Love the dressing. No olives, no tomatoes  for me extra feta and salad dressing -no problem! Always accomodating. Grill the bread before and after for my steak bomb. Perfection. Pizza 1/3 plain, 1/3 pepperoni, 1/3 mushrooms.  Everyone is happy. Consistent quality food with the tweaks  you want.
This pizza place was on our way at the right time - didn't know about it before. It doesn't look anything much out, or inside, but the Greek style pizza was really really delicious. And I am not a pizza lover as such. If you are in that area, and hungry, that is definitely the place.
The cafe offers many more choices than just pizza so guests can order sandwiches, drinks, soup, salads, etc. A cheery place to spend a little extra time and great eating spot.
House of Pizza was highly recommended to us and did not disappoint. The pizza and grinders are delicious and the service is wonderful! I would absolutely come back here again.
We love this pizza and this family owned joint has been a mainstay in Marblehead for years and years! Greek style pizza is a little different than the standard Italian and I would say that the crust is a little thicker and they are more generous on the toppings.  It can be a little greasier than the standard thin crust, but it is delicious. I don't give too many five stars.
After so many positive reviews, I was certain that this place was at least moderately good.  That is not my experience visiting last night. 

I will fully divulge that my husband and I are pizza snobs, and really like to make our own, often because we cannot find a local pizzeria who meets minimums.  

However, we are able to put things into perspective, and I like to think that we can recognize individual accomplishments of pizza providers:  best crust, best sauce, best late night option, etc.  

We ordered a large cheese for take out.  It was about 9pm on a Friday night.  It was about $12 - a fair price and on par with other pizzerias in the area.  

When I got it home and raised the box lid I got a sinking feeling that dinner was going to be disappointing and I was unfortunately correct.  

The crust was a "pan-style," and, though not my favorite ( I am really more of a Neapolitan woman), I didn't let that affect my opinion.  I can love any style pizza.  The sauce looked, and was, much too heavy, and the cheese had a rubbery appearance.  

The sauce was too sweet and the texture almost granular - the best way to describe it was that it tasted like ketchup that someone mixed with flour, and smeared on the pizza.  

The cheese was flavorless and rubbery and also somewhat granular - maybe not 100% actual cheese?  It wasn't stretchy and melty.  

The crust was doughy, and probably the best part.  It was also flavorless, except for the browned bits of cheese that creeped up off the sauced part of the pie.  My husband appropriately summarized the experience of eating a piece:  "The sauce and the cheese is so bad that while you're eating it you're actually looking forward to the rind!"

My theory is that this place used to be great, was sold to someone who was not interested in maintaining brand integrity, and who opted for the cheapest ingredients and labor to maximize profits.  

I don't relish giving negative details of a beloved, and probably once-great pizzeria.  I realize that many rave reviews probably come from folks who have been getting pizza from MHP since they were very young.  Nostalgia can strongly influence perception.  However, I feel that it is a disservice to not document my experience to unaware, Trip-Advisor-review-trusting visitors or newcomers looking for a delicious pizza.  Of course, if I should find that this pizza was an anomalous occurrence, and I subsequently have a much better pizza here, I will make a note on this review. 

There are other options (Tony's right around the corner, for example) that are much better and in the same price range.  All due respect.  
Best Pizza in the North Shore!

Whenever I visit Marblehead I have to stop in at least 1 time. 

My wife got a Greek salad which she loved and my daughter had a turkey sub which was huge. 

I was disappointed in 
The subs are incredibly delicious and the Greek salad with chicken kabobs is the best. My absolute favorite is the tuna salad sub, toasted with green and hot peppers. It is huge even for a half sub. That's where I go for my tuna salad fix.  The location though is a little bit of utilitarian...without charm. You go in there for the food. That's in. And for the people who are the best and friendliest. Cheers to my friend, Athena, who always gives me the widest smiles when we go there.
Marblehead House of Pizza has been around since I was a child visiting my grandparents here. It's the only place we ever got pizza. Their pizza is different than the others. I think it's compared more to a Greek style. The tomato sauce is a tiny bit sweeter. The crust is more cake-like rather than tasteless dough.  Some folks love it, some prefer the other type of pizza.  I'm a fan.  But what I REALLY love at this place is their chicken kebab salad.  Sliced chicken right off the grill with a nice char on it. Great salad greens, great dressing.  It's a staple in my takeout repertoire...
We were staying on Marblehead Neck and saw the sign, best pizza on Marblehead, and it was.  We had fun talking to the workers while waiting for our pizza.  It was tasty and seemed very popular by the number of locals who came in while we were there.
The dough! the toppings! Did all the Marblehead pizza places and love this Greek pizza the best, as do my grandchildren, son, niece, and others. It's been here since the mid 70s!
I think the Marblehead House of Pizza- Special is the best pizza in all of Marblehead.  It is loaded with everything from vegetables to sausages and more.   I feel like I have eaten a meal after that Pizza
Phone in for a pizza, pick up and then really enjoy. You would think that all pizza's are made alike but there is a "je ne sais quoi" about their pizza that makes it our go to place for take out
I have been a long time customer.  We love the small cheese pizzas and the veggie melt sub. This place has been a local favorite for as long as I can remember. 
Marblehead House is absolutely the best Greek pizza around.  I remember going to house way back to my middle school years!  My girl friend and I would always get a veggie grinder or sausage grinder.  Their grinders are out of this world as well.  We order from house at least once a month if not more and are never disappointed.  The staff is friendly, if you eat in it's cozy, and the prices are reasonable.  I've got my husband and sons hooked now!  Definitely recommend!!!  
Greek style pizza with great tasting crust (if you like crust. . .I do).  I enjoyed every pizza (5 of them) I had here for the week I was in Marblehead.  The only drawbacks are 1) that they do not deliver, however, it is worth picking up, and 2) I wish they used fresh ingredients as toppings, although the base is so tasty it almost doesn't matter what's on top! 
I'm used to a totally different style of pizza coming from the New York area but overall this was very good pizza.  It was tasty and there is nothing wrong with a little change every once in a while.  They must be doing something right because they have a ton of awards from the area about how good their pizza is.  We had a large eggplant pizza with a house salad and greek salad.  Very basic salads and I would have liked a vinaigrette dressing and not a creamy italian which was given to us.  I would go back.  Cash only.
Best Roast Beef Sub Period in history of the world.  I've been going for 30 years and it never disappoints.  If only others could re create the mayo and bread that go with the succulent roast beef, crisp lettuce, pickles, onions, and of course the hots!  Great people working there as well.  Enjoy!
We eat here once or twice a month. Food is reliably good; proprietor is a delight, and genuinely cares about your enjoyment of the meal.   Combination Middle Eastern and Mediterranean food; nice beer and wine menu.  Uniquely excellent baba ghanouj.  Moderate prices. Highly recommended. 
Delicious Fattoush salad with subtle lemon dressing. Tasty kibble 'meatballs'. Everything was fresh and nicely presented. The service was attentive and friendly.
Everything was delicious. The Tabbouleh was so fresh, lacking in resemblance from the stuff you get at the grocery store. I recommend the combo plate to get a taste of everything.  I will be going back again.
The food is delicious and different from the usual choices. 
The mix of Mediterranean flavors is very good, can't wait to go there again.
Cozy and spotless with very lovingly prepared food.  Three of us for lunch, we had the falafel, hummus, feta cheese rolls and chicken kebab sandwich.  Food was very good and authentic, service was professional and very pleasant.  Wonderful lunch at a reasonable price.  We will be back!
There's no need to travel into Boston for the best Mediterranean food - Marblehead's Le Bistro offers a great menu, whether you're looking to have lunch, a romantic dinner, or take out.
Le Bistro has been a favorite spot for lunch with friends for years, but the recently renovated bistro has made it a nice dinner choice as well. I've had falafel, good falafel, in many different locales, and this place beats all. The Baba Ghanouj is incredible. I never go too long without giving into my Fattouch craving - this unique salad is light and satisfying.
A few days ago my husband and I treated ourselves to a relaxing dinner here - after a stressful day, there is something about the warm greeting and the friendly atmosphere that make you exhale and decompress.
Owner Salim could not be more gracious - each step of the way, he checks in with his customers. He takes pride and enjoyment in each dish, and makes suggestions. The night we were there, I was going to try a Lebanese beer with my Chicken Kabob and grilled vegetables - Salim mentioned that he had just brought in a locally-brewed beer, Bent Water, which was perfectly paired with my meal. (Very nice IPA.)
My husband ordered the Bistro shrimp, which was like a work of art and delicious.
For lunch, a friend and I will often split the spicy Carribean wrap and a salad.I have always left Le Bistro happy that I went - I have enjoyed each and every thing I have tried there. Salim takes time to answer questions about each dish and how it is prepared.
I am still dreaming about the pistachio encrusted Baklava - try it. You'll be in food heaven.
A group of older gentlemen, clearly regulars, were seated next to us at our recent dinner. They complained of missing one of their regular weekly dinners at Le Bistro because of snow. Salim said he was relieved they were okay. It's this kind of care that goes into each dish and to each diner - Salim and his staff are delivering more than a dinner - they are presenting a gift.
The food, delicious middle eastern cuisine, never disappoints.  The owner is a delight.  Outgoing and quite friendly.  He's only topped by the food . . . Hummus, babaganoush, falafel, lamb chops . . . all excellent!
The food we had was excellent.  Cuisine is Mediterranean. Had a very good shrimp dish with spinach and mushrooms in a tomato sauce served over rice. Kabobs were also excellent.  Service was a little slow but quite pleasant.  Only drawback is that the tables are quite close together.
This is a great cute little place. Quiet romantic setting and great food.  Wee have brought the kids with us a few times (teenagers) and they feel there's a great selection for them too.  Owner is very hospitable and the prices are fair, especially since the food is so good.
The food is fresh and tasty. The hummus is home made and fluffy served with warm pita bread. The stuffed grape leaves are warm and freshly made. The Bistro Platter is an appetizer but I had it as my meal since it includes a bit of everything. My partner had the Shwarna chicken and said it was tasty. It came with choice of salad or fries. We got takeout another eve since the dining room is very small and was full. 
Mediterranean style food that is excellent.  The lamb is especially tasty as is the eggplant.  Soup not so good. Good wine list. 
Lamb kabobs to die for.  No frills, no real, atmosphere but good friendly service and food.  Portions very adequate.  Out side tables in summer.  Always GOOD.  Good take out also.
Food has been largely the same for years --- and that is good.   Everything is fresh, presented beautifully and the pricing is terrific.   Soups are made from scatch.   The restaurant (and kitchen in back) is emaculate --- and that is saying something after being there for 10 years or more.   Owners care about what they do -- and it shows
Le Bistro has pleased many of us that need a sit down for a Fatoosh salad or something out of the ordinary.  The service is great.  this is a convenient spot located in the 5 corners district.
While the name of the restaurant might make you think otherwise, this is Middle Eastern / Lebanese fare.  Everything we had was delicious, prepared with care and served with a smile.  Not sure if our server was the owner but he clearly had passion about the food and our dining experience.

Nice variety of dishes and cozy atmosphere.  Stop in and enjoy a nice meal.
Love Le Bistro. For a small town, it is the only junction in Marblehead that serves a credible middle eastern fare among the surf and turf restaurants,   Although the place is quite small, nevertheless, I'm glad that we have a healthy option.Try babaganoush and falafel...delicious.
While Le Bistro might be small:) in size the wonderful food makes up for it. I will say for us, we actually enjoyed the quaintness of its size . It is very cozy with booths and a few tables. Everything  they make is from scratch and its delicious. it's just around the corner and its our go to place when visiting .We don't need an excuse to leave the cape now, we have one:) !! thank you for giving us  great food and the perfect atmosphere for our family memories. Please try LeBistro for in house dining or take out. We called to make a reservation just because there aren't many tables and they fill up quick. It's a nice place to sit with friends and family and not be rushed out. They do a great take out business if you don't feel like dining in but i do suggest you call ahead.You'll love it!!!!
Varied menu, tasty food, reasonable prices, nice setting, but service was slow. The explanation we got was that they were breaking in a new cook. 
The appetizers are usually very good but the meals often tend to disappoint and are on the pricier side for what they are
Consistently great food and terrific service at decent prices!  So glad we can get our Mediterranean food fix right here in Marblehead!
We had dinner here after several locals and previous visitors recommended it. It was such a treat! We had skate, which we had not been able to find on a menu since leaving Ireland 9 years ago. It was perfectly prepared and fresh. The drinks were good and good value. This is a great date night place as it's a good mix of lively yet romantic. Get every course they have on offer and throw calorie counting out the window. It's worth it!!
My husband and I eat here pretty frequently. We have never ordered anything that isn't delicious. 
The atmosphere is beautiful. Staff is mostly good, very occasionally awful. 
The food is always amazing. Every single time. 
Pretty tough to walk in for a table on the weekend. You can sometimes get a spot at the bar if there are just 2 of you. 
Highly recommend. 
We love this place, food is always outstanding, especially the burgers and steak frites. Service is very attentive, and the Atmosphere is great- sophisticated with out being snooty.  Did not blink an eye that we brought kids.  Will definitely keep going back!
If you are looking for a great dinner in Marblehead, this is your place.  There are a number of OK places to eat here ( I've lived here almost 10 years).  This is the only great place, in my opinion, for an elegant meal in Marblehead.  I say this as someone with a strong love of bistro cuisine (which they do very well here).  There are other good restaurants in Marblehead (like Junji, which does very good sushi), but this is a place worth driving out of your way for.
Our first visit to Marblehead and this eatery was on our list as must-tries....and we were not disappointed. There are other quaint places to dine, but this should be your first stop.
In the middle of 5 Corners this restaurant is amazing. Very nice atmosphere from the subway tiled bar to the candlelit tables. Amazing food, great wait staff and easy to walk to. Top notch mixed drinks selection. 
I can honestly say I have never had a bad meal here.  In fact I can say each meal I've had has been really delicious.  You know how sometimes at other restaurants have off nights - 5 Corners Kitchen has NEVER had an off night.  
Service is always good.  The staff know how to balance attentiveness.  
Make the trip to Marblehead and enjoy!
Went here with another couple last night.  We try new restaurants all the time, and I was pleasantly surprised with the quality of food, professionalism of staff, and the interesting decor!  Between 5 and 6PM, oysters are $1, so we ordered a dozen to share.  The Malbecs from PEI were fresh and delicious!!!  The hot bread with butter was excellent.  I had the organic salmon with greens, chick peas, red, green, and purple tomatoes finished in a tahini sauce.  It  was one of the best salmon dishes I ever had!  My husband had the home made pasta with sausage and rabbe, which was also excellent.  Our friends had the chicken and she said it was delicious and our other friend had the pasta with pesto.  The pesto was watery, but tasty.  Our waiter was attentive and cordial.  I will certainly be back!!!
My wife and went here on Saturday night and we chose to sit at the bar.  The restaurant opens at 5 and if you want a bar seat, get there a little before 5 as it fills up fast, especially on a Saturday night.  She had the best pork chop she has ever eaten.  I had the lobster and scallop ravioli, which was delicious.  As I said in my title for this review, we never leave disappointed and this stretches back for a couple of years.  The bar service from Adam was also excellent. 
Frequent often. Creative menu, professional staff, near enough to oldtown, overall top notch dining.
My wife and I eat here once a month or so and the food and atmosphere are incredible. We feel so lucky to have such a great restaurant in Marblehead!
Beautiful lighting makes an elegant setting for excellent food. The hamburger was perfectly cooked and complex in flavor a with smoked cheddar and spicy pickles.  The mixed greens salad served topped with a herbed goat cheese was perfect. Congratulations to the owners on a great job creating a delightful and unforgettable dining experience. 
I made reservations for dinner on a Sunday night (it was a good thing I did make reservations as the place was slammed).  My husband and I sat down at the table, looked at the menu and they brought over some delicious bread which we devoured after ordering our dinner.  We were chatting about this, that and the other thing and our waiter came over and said, so sorry for the long wait, please take these as our apology and gave us a heaping plate of the most amazing french fries on the planet.  they were crispy and covered in some type of "asian "marinade"" we really weren't sure what was on them, but we could NOT stop eating them as they were so unbelievably good.  We hadn't realized it had even been so long (almost 45-60 minutes) as we had filled up on the delicious bread.  

By the time we got our meal, we weren't even that hungry..but I got the chicken (as I'd read it was awesome) oh and it was stupendous.  Very moist and flavorful and huge as well.  My husband got some type of pasta w/a meat sauce and ate every last bite, he RARELY joins the CPC - Clean Plate Club, so that has to speak volumes as to how good the pasta and sauce was.  I did try a bite and the sauce was awesome.  There was a number of pastas I really wanted to try so I told my husband we had to go back again so I could try one of the pastas.  And this time we'll be ordering the fries, although we have NO idea what they were exactly...
Met friends here for a Friday evening dinner and had a delightful time. Loved the oysters, wedge salad and burgers. Service was attentive and kind -- but fell off toward the end of the meal.
I've eaten at Five Corners about a half dozen times, but every time it's been ethereal. The bar is small and intimate, the cafe table section is perfect for grabbing drinks and a quick bite with friends, and the main dining room is the place you want to go for your romantic night out. The wait staff are all wonderful. Great wine list and original intriguing plates. The menu is overwhelming and every item on it has earned its place. Five stars.
Delicious and well presented food served by very pleasant wait-staff in a cosy atmosphere in Marblehead. Sautéed scallops to die for. Steak frites tender and delicious. Made mistake of ordering absolutely delicious seasoned French fries as appetizer only to receive huge portion with my meal. Salmon sautéed in spicy butter sauce fork tender and not overdone. Mocha mousse prepared in advance had a slight refrigerator taste. But other choices made up for it. A little pricy. 
An upscale lively, fine dining restaurant with unusual and delicious offerings and wonderful wine selections.  Very expensive but great for a special occasion although I know many people who are regulars! 
We have dined at at 5 corners several times,food is is very good despite my flank steak being way over cooked and my sons burger being extremely overcooked. The rest of the food was great perfectly cooked shrimp and lobster on the shellfish platter. We ordered my sons burner with plain with nothing on it and it came out with everything on it, we sent it back. By the time they fixed the simple issue of just changing the roll out for one that was plain we were finished with our brunch items. The service was slow and mindless, the manager handled the situation poorly as well.My son is 5 and is very patient this dining experience tried all of our patience
The food and the service were excellent!  The food came out quickly, and we were celebrating our anniversary.  At the end we were so full we could not eat the complimentary dessert, but our waiter graciously boxed it up for us to take home!  Will definitely be going back!

I do wish it was a bit brighter inside to capture the pictures of food taken for TripAdvisor ;)
For a mid-week dinner to celebrate our anniversary we selected one of our favorite  restaurants - 5 Corners Kitchen in Marblehead. We had reservations and were seated without delay. My wife saw an old friend and mentioned that we were celebrating our anniversary. Apparently one of the waitstaff heard the conversation and brought two flutes of sparkling wine - very nice touch.

Our server, Alyssa, was wonderful - offering excellent recommendations when asked; knowledgable and attentive without being intrusive.  

I chose to start with the corn chowder, a finely puréed smoked corn soup garnished with bacon and sliced jalapeño peppers which added a nice kick. This creative use of ingredients made this chowder complex and absolutely delicious.

My wife ordered the mixed green salad with almonds, green beans, shallots and radishes. A fresh starter to the meal.

My main course was the steak frites which was perfectly cooked, tender with a delicious pan sauce accompanied by Asian inspired Brussels sprouts - a nice contrast to the salty sweetness of the caramelized steak.

My wife selected the house-made pasta paired with a flavorful pesto sauce and charred broccoli. 

Food, presentation and service was flawless. What occurred after we left further demonstrated the focus on customer service. I had not finished my steak and asked Alyssa to pack it up for me. I commented to Alyssa how much I enjoyed the pan sauce and without asking she added a container of the sauce with the to-go package. I had set the bag on the floor and inadvertently forgot it. Alyssa found the bag, pulled up our reservation, found our number and called us. That is extraordinary service.


I brought a couple of friends here for breakfast and we loved the relaxed atmosphere. The staff makes you feel like family and the pancakes and syrup were incredible!! I can't wait to go back again.
I brought my kids here to see a sugar house since we live in the area. It's a nice family owned business but the interior is very well done with rustic woods and booths surrounding a beautiful glassed room containing a vat of heaven, I means maple syrup.

We helped ourselves to coffee, which was delicious and my kids thought the cocoa was great. The breakfast arrived quickly to our table and the pancake was the size of the plate. I don't eat pancakes so I ordered the french toast which was good but my daughter offered a piece of her pancake and it was amazing. It was fluffy and crisp on the exterior like a vanilla cake. It doesn't hurt that they bring their amazing maple syrup to the table warm and fresh from the boiler.

They're only open for breakfast during the sugaring season, 7:30AM to 1:00PM from Mid-February through the first of April, so give it a try if you're in the area.
Sheldon's is a local, seasonal ice cream parlor, plain and simple.  There is nothing but ice cream on the menu.  I believe it's made on site and the special flavors vary from time to time.

You can choose to eat inside (maybe can seat 20) or on the deck (which probably season about 12).  The deck used to overlook a nice spillway over a dam but due to safety concerns with the dam it has been breached which means now you can look at a small vernal pool and very small pond with nice trees.  

I believe they close around Columbus Day for the season.  From Labor Day until then the hours are weekday from 3:30 until 7:00, Sat/Sun 1:00 until 7:00.  They open around mid May ( I believe) and are on limited hours as stated above until college is out and the place can be staffed starting at 1:00.
Sheldon's has delicious ice cream, lots of flavors with lots of goodies in the ice cream. It also has a nice outdoor sitting area overlooking a little creek so you can enjoy your treat outdoors. We love it here and go back often. Don't be fooled by their size samples - the small is definitely big enough.
best ice cream in town. you have hard and soft ice cream. hard ice cream has several flavors, shakes and sundaes are also very good.
Great homemade ice-cream in an old mill on a stream.  Unfortunately the dam is being removed. Many homemade flavors.
After Dinner this was a very nice touch for the kids!  Home made Ice Cream and everyone had their favorite flavor.  I am old fashion just Vanilla and it was very creamy! 
Sheldon ' s is a local favorite particularly with Little Leagues in the area and if you don't hit it just right the two people working easily get overwhelmed. The setting is an old mill on a river which used to be nice but the water dried up last summer so it is more of a mud pit now.

My family and most people I know enjoy the ice cream but I am a little bit of a 'snob' when it comes to texture and bold flavors. The ice cream is much less dense than I like and the flavors are not strong. I sampled the Coffee Oreo but was unimpressed with the coffee ice cream base; I ended up with a basic Chocolate Peanut Butter Cup which had just a hint of peanut butter flavor. The two teens enjoyed the Brownie Batter ice cream but they will eat anything.

If you eat ice cream just to eat it Sheldon ' s is fine; if you.want to experience ice cream head to Northampton.
Great handmade ice cream, great staff , unique location.If you can't find a flavor , turn in your taste buds.
Best Ice cream in the Valley.  Especially the Sugar Free Maple Walnut ice cream. My family likes the home made ice cream.
Great ice cream and family atmosphere.  The staff is super friendly and courteous. The kids loved watching the water out back.
We love Sheldon's!  I prefer it over Tasty Top in Easthampton because it's such a pretty destination with lots of seating indoors and out.  The staff is always quick and friendly, the ice cream is good, and it's a reasonable price.  The outside deck is above a dam and it's very relaxing to enjoy the roar of the water.
The ice cream is quite tasty, creative flavors, beautiful setting. But taking the kids out for an ice cream here is an extra special treat because of the price. We go just a few times each summer.
Best homemade ice cream in the area. Great view out back looking at the water while enjoying your ice cream
Sheldon Ice Cream is in Southampton. Easy to get to from the Mass Pike. Drove out there on a drive back from Lee, MA. Found this via Yelp and decided to try it. Very good ice cream. Very creamy. Many different flavors - both hard and soft. Huge servings, reasonably priced. You will enjoy it.

In the summer, it opens at 1pm (at least this year).
Since they made the switch to making their ice cream, Sheldon's has become an even better place to go grab a cone. With the amazing view of the waterfall out back, it's a great place to bring kids or friends!
Great ice cream!  First time visitors. Wish Sheldon's was closer! Chocolate and mint chocolate chip located in an old cider mill.
After having dinner at Opa Opa (just up the street a bit) we stopped here for ice cream.  It was delicious and we sat on the deck to enjoy it.
Great ice cream,  traditional and unique flavors.  Sheldon's serves both hard and soft swirl ice cream.  The Sundaes are awesome. A great place to spend summer evenings. 
Sheldon's has delicious ice cream and a unique setting overlooking a quaint river. Sit out on the deck and watch the birdlife by the waterfall!
Great bar, excellent drinks. Food is always spot on. Friday fish n chips is best around. Burgers are great, pizza too
Have wanted to eat there for a while and finally went Tuesday night. Great selection on the menu with daily specials. The "Patty Melt I ordered was DELICIOUS! Highly recommend stopping by for a few drinks and a bite to eat!!!
I love seven B's for burgers and light meals. They have the best fish fry in the area. The owners are great, the wait staff is very friendly and efficient. There are many beers on tap a very good selection. The only downside is the bar is very noisy. Definitely worth trying if you're in the area
After a recent foursome of golf, we stopped into 7B's for a late lunch on Monday of the holiday weekend.  After some time, someone came over to let us know that they were a server down, and that service would be slow.
(This should have been our cue to find a different place this time.) But we stayed.

Yes, the service was slow (drinks arriving too), and some people in our party got a bit impatient with the hour wait to get our food (we did time the wait.)

Overall the food was good; we shared an order of wings - garlic parmesian and BBQ, I got the barbeque chicken chopped salad with dressing on the side (I took me 10 minutes to get a waitress's attention to get someone to bring over the dressing) and the salad was good. Other people in our party seemed to enjoy their food.

When we were getting ready to leave, more servers had arrived and things seemed to move along quicker for those parties. 

Hopefully we will get the opportunity to give 7Bs another try.
Stopped in for a burger. The place was packed at 5:00 PM. Nice list of burgers. They have sea food, my friend had the fried clam plate, he said it was very good. Another friend took half of his chicken parm home. Good list of beers.
Fish and chips, best ever.  Fried clams also very good and enough for lunch the next day.  Casual atmosphere.  Servers and fast and friendly.
I had the New England burger. There wasn’t quite enough cranberry sauce but the burger was so good it was hard to miss it.

The large selection of sides was outstanding. The fries were excellent, rough cut with the skins. The coleslaw was tasty.

My husband rated the burger as one of the top burger’s he’s had. The burger alone was good. The topping on the special of bacon, egg, cheese and sausage was unique and great.

There were so many beers on tap a list would be helpful!

Even though we were there at the height of lunch, the order was taken quickly and the meal arrived fast. There are plenty of tables and seating outside so it’s not just a bar, though they do make an effort to be a local-favorite bar with personal mugs for regulars.

The waitstaff was very pleasant. (A special shout out to Kelsey B!)

Instead of a mint with the check there were house made chocolate chip cookies. Excellent! (Kelsey said they bake 5 dozen every morning.)
Awesome family owned restaurant. Daily specials posted on website. Lots of community involvement with trivia nights and local musicians. Food is fresh. Never frozen or microwaved.
Ordered fish & chips and beer. Beer was good but not cold as I like it, but might be a bit biased as I have a kegerator at home, so have access to 35 degree beer on tap! Fish  & chips is the best I've had in some time & the portion was huge. I'm picky when it comes to eating fish. Will definitely be back when I need my fried fish fix. 
I won a gift certificate thru the Safari Golf League last year. Was reluctant to use it as years ago this was not a family spot. But new ownership has really turned this place into a pleasant spot for all sorts of folks with good bar menu and friendly staff at expected reasonable prices. We'll go back. Give it a try.

I eat lunch almost every Sunday during golf season. Variety of salads, burgers, appetizers and sandwiches are on the menu. There are quite a few beers on tap as well as a full bar. It's a friendly, clean place to grab some food and drinks. 
Really nice, friendly local restaurant. Good food at good prices. Staff is very friendly. Good place to stop after golfing at Southampton CC or just for a good lunch when in the area.
This place has no freezer and no microwave. The BURGERS ARE AWESOME !!  The fish is super fresh. They have a great selection of beer and the bartenders are cute and attentive.  Try it out. !👍🏼👍🏼👍🏼👍🏼👍🏼
Our burgers were awesome!!! Loved the armosphere! This is a great place to eat. Nice place to stop when you are on a motorcycle ride.
Nice bar with some great sandwiches and Friday's fish special is very good. It is a bit noisy but they do have some outside seating if you prefer a little less noise.

First experience-they deserve better than an average rating, but "very good" is a little generous. It's a knotty pine, walls covered with beer posters and television sets (and an American Flag) neighborhood sports bar. Nothing too original. It is a tad noisy, even when not full thanks to low ceilings, and music of the Jimmy Buffett and country and western style blaring from their sound system. 

The service is friendly but a bit sporadic. On the plus side, very good quality burgers and decent fries-we weren't willing to try anything more adventurous on a first try. There is a nice patio on the side, which we should have used on a pleasant Summer afternoon. A decent range of bar foods, including hints that they are proud of their roast beef, baby back ribs and pulled pork. An ample supply of beers on tap or from a can, and a basic range of wines by the glass-nothing too interesting, but this doesn't look like a wine sort of place.

My respect for a family run business that is certainly hospitable and clean. There is entertainment some evenings and it is certainly a wholesome outpost in an under served area. They advertise whole belly clams and fish and chips on Fridays and the weekends in Summer. Will probably give it another visit.
7b's is at the location of the old land mark the Purple Onion. Under new ownership, this small bar has great food and entertainment, a friendly waitstaff, and a relaxing atmosphere. Definitely my top choice for bars in Westfield, and really a place I'll go specifically for dinner. They don't have just your regular bar food- its all delicious and fresh.
This is a local pub that has excellent food. The blueberry wings are a must have. also the BBQ salad. The place  has nice atmosphere and sometimes has live music later in the evenings. I really enjoy this local pub with local owners. It is a must stop if you are in the area.
I am not one to write a review, however, I feel this time it is necessary. I work fairly close to 7B's in Westfield and the options when our group collectively plans to order take out are limited. Every time our take out order has been incorrect. Box says no onions - onions are on the burger.  Ask for M burger - get it MR. Ask for BBQ fries, says BBQ fries on box - low and behold, reg. fries in box! In my honest opinion, if I am paying $10 for a burger and soggy French fries, I expect to get what I ordered, not some sloppy, thrown together mess. I recommend if you want to try 7B's, sit down and dine in. But that doesn't change the high prices.
This place is a great improvement over the Purple Onion. The place was nearly full for lunch the other weekday, and I can see why.  Great tasting food, at a fair price and large serving sizes.  It is  a bar and grill, so the place is surrounded by the obligatory large size TV screens each showing something different on top of the music.  But I guess that is what people demand,  That said, you should try this place for the food.  My only concern is that fresh ice tea was not available and for that matter non-alcoholic beer was not on the menu.  Since it is a popular lunch place, some non-alcoholic choices choices, beside sodas, should be on the menu for the local workers taking a lunch break.
I live the hill towns and the family restaurants that thrive there.  The owner and patrons share things about their area, the roads, the trails, and especially what to eat. 

Definitely try their home made hash and eggs. Why drive miles when the grill is right in front of you!!!
Hubby and I went here for Date Night. Delicious Oktoberfest, Bloomin' Onion, steak & stuffed shrimp, fried scallops. Everything tastes good here! Hint: 1/2 price apps at the bar, I believe most nights!
I went there recently with 4 other ladies for lunch.  I chose the lunch special Ribs which were juicy and well seasoned.  They came with the vegetable of the day, mixed zucchini and summer squash, and mashed potatoes.  The veggies were totally fresh, well seasoned and not overdone!  The mashed were good but the veggies were better.

The other ladies had scrod and the rib eye and there were no complaints about the food.  Service was quick and efficient.

I had mentioned that I would probably need an extra napkin to serve as a bib and the server brought me one.  Can't complain about that.
Opa Opa is my all time favorite restaurant. The Rib eye steak is fantastic. The service is excellent as well. In the winter, the atmosphere is cozy with the big brick fireplace. Highly recommend the restaurant if you are in the area.
So we have avoided this place for while, but decided to try it with a groupon (which didn't work on the day we visited). I feel like we wasted our money on the groupon because we definitely won't come back. The salad was the best part. It was fresh, but small and boring. My husband ordered a ribeye and said it was no seasoning at all and was the toughest piece of meat he has ever had. I had the mistake meatloaf. It was weird tasting and had a strange texture. The mashed potatoes tasted like instant made with sour milk. The gravy tasted like a Marsala sauce. And our server was relatively slow. Just bad experience. 
Steak you can cut  with your fork   Opa Opa  is a casual fun steak house
Not fancy but that is not what we came for    we wanted   steak   and steak we got with delicious soups salads and  potatoes
The menu has lots of choices and maybe someday I will try something other than the steak        the people I go with often get the prime rib and the seafood  platter or the  shrimp     but the steak is so tender and tasty that I stick with that
Wait staff accommodating and friendly
The place gets busy   so if you are going for the 1/2 price on Tuesdays go early
Nice brunch on Sundays also
i've eaten at Opa-Opa many times food is excellent, good service and good portions a little pricey but you have a great restaurant in cowboy and indian decor. enjoyable experience always had good meals and large selection on menu. 
From the time we walked in through the shabby door with knew this was not going to be what we expected.  A mutual friend recommended that we stop at Opa Opa for an early Sunday dinner on our way back from a wonderful theater performance at the Chesterfield Miniature Theater but wait, that's another review. 
Given the name, we were not sure if this was a German grandfather's place (one of us studied in Germany) or a dish smashing, line dancing Greek place (one of us was of Greek descent), we were all taken back that Opa was a steakhouse.  
The steak was good,  if not great. The salad was fresh,  great gorganzola dressing. The waitress was very young,  a bit unsure but pleasant.  
But the bathroom...the hall to the bathrooms smelled of urine. They bathrooms were littered with paper, the sink hadn't been cleaned for a week or so,  and the stench of urine was pervasive on the hot and humid day we were there. 
In summary, decent food, not well maintained.  I think the owners must come from Western part of Greece because the decor is not "white stucco with light blue trim" Greek but "dark, old wood" western.   There were cowboy images everywhere and a bar seat with a saddle. No Opa dancing here,  cowboy. 
Had read reviews and was so pleasantly surprised. Food was good (burger and salad) and the beer was delightful. We ate at the bar and met the owner(manager). So friendly as were all the workers. My family really enjoyed it.  Loved the blueberry and strawberry beer!
So so, nothing great the food was not bad just had little issues (steak was good roll was hard) had about 5 small steak fries with my sandwich. I would definitely keep driving if it were me and I would not return here again unless the locals say it's improved. 
Our family decided to try the restaurant today and we're pleased!  The Southwestern Salad was delicious, as was the Camelot burger.  The kids enjoyed the Chicken Parmigiana (lunch portion was definitely plenty of food) and the chicken wrap.  The fries are quite good too.  We will be back!
Definitely do not recommend this odd place.  The food is not good and the beer is nothing special at all.  Not sure what the cowboy / Greek theme is all about, but it really doesn't work.  Worth skipping.
Service was great but the food was not.  We had lamb dishes and the meat was well cooked but could have been warmer.  The vegetables were soggy and cold and the fries were the same.  We had a blooming onion as an appetizer and it was all batter and little onion.  Cocktails were weak.

The bright spot was the desert.  I took home a chocolate mouse which was delicious.

What happened here?  Opa Opa used to be an extremely pleasant place to eat where the food was good and hot and the venue was somewhere special to go to.  Not so much any more.
Our family of 4 went for dinner. This was our first trip back in awhile but I remembered how much we loved the great meals we had there in the past. The pros: Our server was friendly and attentive and the place has a fun, western theme going for it. We had bacon wrapped scallops as an appetizer that were really great! The cons: the steak fries that were a past highlight and still on the menu have been replaced by typical fries you might find at Friendly's (and they were undercooked). Mind you Friendly fries are fine but when the menu advertises one thing and you get served something sub par it's a let down. We didn't enjoy the change to the burger presentation either. They used to be served on something like Texas toast; thick, buttery,grilled pieces of bread. This time a typical bun. Again ok, but what used to be a go-to place for a unique great burger and fries meal was like anyplace else. Also, the kids meal didn't come with a side or a drink. Seemed a bit pricey to not include something other than a bowl of mac and cheese.
The Staff is was friendly, once busy the staff was working many tables and you did not see them until the check was given.  Drinks were very good, the 4 dinners were just average if that!  Two orders of Roast Beef, if you want on fish dishes they did not off broiled only fried, the beef was not what we expected, cooked correctly but the beef had no taste.  Prices were fair, they do a very good bar business.
I live nearby and stop by Opa Opa every now and then with my wife or one of my boys.  The food is always very good.  However, I have to say that the brand new burger specials they came out with since I've last been there are fantastic.  If you stop in, try the "Juicy Lucy" Burger.  Amazing!  My son got the "Roadhouse" burger (again...off the special burger menu) and he loved it too.  They're huge and delicious.

While we were there, the manager stopped by and chatted with us and asked us what we thought of the new burgers.  Fantastic!  

I encourage you to stop by, sit at the bar, and grab a draft beer and burger.  They have a big selection and make the majority of the beer themselves.  I recommend the Red Rock Ale.
The place is a down home restaurant that offers good food and beer at fair prices.  Whether you want a simple salad or a great ribeye this is the place.  Great specials and great staff
I don't know how Opa-Opa wins accolades for best steakhouse in the Valley. In the past I have gone here maybe once a year because someone I was dining with wanted steak and to eat locally, but I will never go back again.
Salads were basic but inedible as it was drowning in the gorgonzola vinegrette. The 12 Oz prime rib was cold, dry (I ordered it medium  rare), tough and almost flavorless. Two of us ordered baked potatoes as sides and both came out hard. The sautéed vegetables, a mixture of zucchini and summer (yellow) squash was overdone. 
The worst part of the meal was watching one of the waiters sneezing into his hands multiple times and then going ahead to set tables in his entire station and carrying oil and vinegar bottles right back to the prep station ALL WITHOUT WASHING HIS HANDS. The next time we saw him he continued to work on his tables all while he was eating a loaf of bread and putting it on down on the table between bites.

We stopped to try out the restaurant because of the brewery. We were seated quickly and our waitress was very pleasant. They have a wide selection of beer and we had a few questions that were quickly answered and a sample was brought to make sure we would be satisfied.
We chose their fish special. The scrod was broiled in a dish with a lot of butter. Small portion but enough for what we wanted. Rice pilaf and summer squash were served as the sides. Everything was served hot but was not seasoned at all - very bland. The price of the meal was reasonable.
Went with a friend. (1st time there) He ordered us a round of their IPAs which were pretty darn good. Our goal was to stay for a few drinks and get an early dinner. I hadsome questions about the beer, and the bartender was really nice and let me taste a few before I decided on another beer, I believe it was the Imperial IPA, which was also good. So when it was time to order I started out by getting some sweet potato fries, and just before I could order the meal he suggested the hog wings. I told him that I was pretty hungry, and the wings were considered an appetizer. He just said "trust me". So the food came and he was right. We got way too much food. You actually get 3 wings, but these are fall off the bone pork butt looking ribs. They were truly amazing. I don't know if it was the beer or the fries, but I could only eat 2 wings. I took the other one home and ate it later that evening. These were some of the best wings (pork) that I ever had. I highly recommend this to anyone.
Had a very good meal at the Opa Opa Steakhouse-not steak, but chicken parm. My dish arrived hot and piled high with spaghetti and 2 good sized pieces of chicken. I couldn't finish it. My brother had the rib eye and said it was also very good. Our waitress, Heidi, was friendly and knowledgeable. I have 2 negatives on an otherwise great visit-it was hot in the restaurant and meal was served too quickly. I would have liked a little more time between courses.
subway is a good restaurant for grinders but same at all subways. i don't order from them much. i'd rather get my grinder from Paisano's.
Great service,,,good value...very clean restaurant...  This is the cleanest Subway that we have been in...the staff care about their service and it shows!
I was visiting my friend and she had a coupon for foot-longs at the Subway.  So, we went out in the rain and were surprised to see that we weren't the only ones at this small Subway.  We got three foot-longs, and even though there were multiple substitutions on one sub, they took it all in stride.  The counter people were particularly friendly.  They were also one of the few Subways that I've seen that have swiss cheese as a selection.
  If I'm ever in the area again, I'd gladly go back there again.
I have had food from Café Santorini many times without ever actually entering the restaurant.  We have it delivered frequently at work and they are consistently good.  Lots of good options from pizza, wraps and grinders that are all good.  I have yet to have a bad meal from here.  They offer local delivery and the drivers are always on time and courteous.
Food was quickly served by an attentive, happy young lady.  Huge, tasty portions.
Setting is a little old, outdated and worn, but will not keep me from coming back again.

NOTE: The calzone was great as a next day lefy over as well.
Restaurant is newly updated. Food remains the same good quality. Lots of variety for different tastes. Pizzas and grinders are consistently good for take out.
The last time I ate here was last March ! I vowed not to eat here again ! 
Well two things, (1) I was about a mile away ,(2) I was hungry and wanted breakfast. And I guess everyone should have a second chance ! And how hard is a cheese omelet and home fries and toast ?
The waitstaff was prompt and friendly, I ordered black coffee, white toast, home fries and an American cheese omlet. 
We'll the toast was stone cold with a half pound of unmelted butter on it ! The home fries had tater tots in them,  who the hell wants tater tots in their home fries ? The chicken did a good job with the egg, the cow did a good jog on the cheese, but the cook failed miserably. 
Don't think their will be a third chance !

and they will probably cook it. With a menu that goes to a mind boggling 12-13 pages, it is like being in a diner on steroids. Breakfast, lunch and dinner entrees overlap. It is difficult to judge a place just on one meal. Mine was somewhere in the "Good" range, better than Average but not "Very Good" in my experience. I would give them a 3.5 if I could and will also go back and try more dishes.

They deserve credit for a nice redo of the decor; still an informal place, but with some character; pretty stone walls, interesting ethnic rugs.  Speaking of character, Santorini is one of the most breathtaking and unique Greek islands, but this is no longer a Greek restaurant if it ever was. The current owners and/or cook is Turkish and that is fine with me. Greek and Turkish food overlap, the Greeks having been under the Ottomans for many centuries. Even Santorini was occupied by the Ottomans for more than two centuries-but the Turks were pushed out in 1821.

Clearly, the owners are trying to appeal to a much larger audience than those solely interested in Turkish cuisine-but when asked, they will give you a two page list of Turkish/Mediterranean specialties. My wife was very happy with her gyro (Iskenderun Kebab) and I was less so with a ground lamb meat kebab. The Mediterranean salads were so so. I suspect the vast majority of customers are dining on omelets, grinders, "Italian-American dishes, blue plate specials and the like.

Service is friendly and casual.  Prices are fair and moderate for the amount and quality of food. The restaurant is popular and a good place to know along the Westfield to the Hamptons Highway. Clean, courteous and hard working, this place deserves a thumbs up. But so far I am not convinced any particular dish will be a home run.
This place has been through a renovation and has a lot nicer atmosphere than they used to. We come here every time we are in town. Lots of semi-truck parking in back and we have never had a bad meal here. Friendly people also. Great place for breakfast, lunch or dinner. 
I realize this restaurant is undergoing a renavation, but the waitstaff needs to get their acts together, aparently when the shift changes they all congregate in a table by the kitchen door and count out their shift money, to make sure they have money to support all their customer's checks. And discuss their days issues when customers are in the restaurant waiting to be waited on ! And making a stupid statement to the customer whose waiting for servce, oh shift change sorry someone will be there to help you, meanwhile their sitting their goseping about customers and who tipped what. I think the management should get it together. These things are done behind doors where customers aren't subjected to this crap. I would have got up and left but I was Hungary,  after receiving a coke, and a "Deluxe" Hamburger, I guess what makes it a deluxe I got french fries and a the smallest container with cold slaw.
This wonderful meal cost almost $10.00.
Think I'll drive by next time to the 4 corners and have a great Burger for less,where they know what their doing.
Until their management and staff get their crap together.
Although not the best location, this restaurant does not disappoint.  The food, quantity and service were above what we expected.  Food tasted great.  Really good value.  We will definitely be going back.
This restaurant used to be very good but when new owners took over several years ago the food was bad. There has been renovations so I decided to try it again but will not go back again. The Reuben grinder was awful. I would rather pay $9 for a great 8inch grinder that is well made than a 16 inch for the same price that is really bad. There was hardly any meat on it and the roll was not good. Also I had to wait for my take out order because my order had been given to another person so I got to witness the poor service while I waited. My advise, stay away!
Really good pizza, wraps, grinders and curly fries!  Definitely nothing fancy but good value.  Delivery always timely and hot.
They have everything from breakfast to pizza.  We get the pizza a couple of times a month and it is great!  No matter who is at the house they always remark how good the pizza is.  Very fair price, fast delivery and like most diners a huge menu.  A fish sub, yep and it was great.  If you go to there to eat the dining room is kind of outdated/well worn but get past that, the food and service is great!
This restaurant serves very good food and has a very diverse menu.  You can get breakfast anytime, which is a plus.  A small place without much atmosphere, but you're going for the food....and they deliver.
never had been here before even though we live nearbye, great little spot with homecooked meals
I went with my kids for breakfast..... the booth seat was nasty and we sank into it. Our waitress was slow and rude.  We ordered scrambled eggs, bacon, pancakes, toast.  We go out for breakfast often and have never had such horrible food.  The bacon was DEEP FRIED...... my children were very upset....... they said it didn't even taste like bacon. The eggs were slimy and the toast had WAY too much butter on it..... and was gross.  I said something to the waitress about the food and she walked away. ...... I didn't even want to pay for the food....... no one ate a thing.  I left my money on the table and left and will NEVER go back.
We got delivery from this restaurant - the huge salads were fantastic (a small is more than enough for one person)!  The menu was extensive - it looked like it would have something for everyone.
ate there several times food is good. good selection on menu, mainly italian and greek food, good portions.
Sounded good  and we were on our way home from a lovely day on the water
A wide menu to choose from  but  it all seemed the same thing just rearranged on the plate with a different sah of parsley
The steak was so so       okay  it is an Italian restaurant    the wedding soup had a tomato base and no spinach      a different part of Italy ?   the  veal portion was large but just average    the sausage and chicken combo   unappetizing and my  chicken florentine  inedible     the chicken pieces so rubbery that the knife couldn't handle them   ( dinner had definitely been nuked  ) when I explained this to the waitress she said  it was an ongoing problem and she could have them remake it with grilled chicken  The waitress was the best part of dinner       the restaurant was not  busy so the kitchen was not backed up      with so many  places to eat in the area I think they should lighten up and the decor and cook dinner   not reheat the food in a microwave
Oh  when my second dinner came out the food  the plate  everything was so hot steam was coming off the course    ire of the chef or the microwave again ??
We have eaten here before and the food had that reheated leftover taste  then too   hoping for the best  this time   but 2 strikes and you are out  !!
This was our first time visiting.  We decided to try lunch and were very pleased with our meals--chicken parmigiana, pasta with a delicious sauce, salad and bread sticks.  You know that moment when you take your first bite of something new --a mix of anticipation and trepidation--what if I don't like it? What if it isn't prepared well?  What if...?

I needn't have worried. One bite and we were in chicken parmigiana heaven!  Everything was perfectly seasoned--the sauce in particular had a wonderful depth of flavor.  Portions were generous.  Service was prompt, courteous and friendly.

My only complaint is that the dining room lighting was too low--it was difficult to read the extensive menu. But don't let that stop you.  Go. Now. Enjoy!  

Excuse me while I go eat my leftovers.
Went here for lunch with two friends and had a great Italian meal. It's a casual place, but the food is excellent. I had more than enough ziti and enjoyed it again the next night at home!
A couple of things have happened at Paisano's during our last visits.  Last September, we had reserved the back room for a celebration of my Grandson's baptism.   When we arrived, the room was dirty, not set up for our event, we waited a very long time for the pizza that had been pre-ordered for a specific time.  They sent back a single server who tried his best but was clearly in over his head.  WE cleared the dirty stuff out, went out and got pitchers of soda, had to request napkins and more silverwear --- sharing out an inadequate amount of pizza until they could make more --- all around disappointing.  (and no, the facility was not particularly busy).
Then, in December my husband and I went in to have dinner with a gift certificate we had been given.  Within a five minute period, they brought out our salad, appetizer and meal -- in that order.  The waitress was trying to make room on the table for three sets of dishes.  Our appetizer was hot so we felt the need to put our salads aside (which should have come after the appetizer) in order to eat it first.  Before we had even eaten half our appetizer, our meals arrived.  When we said something, our waitress said, "I know, this is kind of quick" but didn't take them back to keep warm or anything.  To make matters worse, I had ordered a clam strip dinner (something I had ordered many times there in the past).  They were so over cooked that I couldn't break them up chewing and I choked twice.  It was like eating rubber bands.  They were dark in color and simply overdone.  By the time I was able to get the waitress's attention and say something, my husband was just about done with his dinner.  The waitress heard me out and ten minutes later came back with an older woman who tried to get me to have "the shrimp, it's really good tonight".  By that time, I had finally finished my salad and most of my appetizer and said no, just the check is fine.  She (older lady) stood there arguing with me, trying to get me to order something else.  She finally walked away.  Our waitress returned with the check and apologized, saying that she took the clams off our bill but was told to charge me for the salad I had eaten.  Whaaaa?  Poor customer service, all the way around.
Every meal is consistent. The prime rib is thin and often chewy however. Stick with the pasta dishes.
We dropped into Paisan's for lunch last week and were given a surprise when reminded by our waitress that their by one lunch from a selected menu and any other lunch item was half price. Along with that surprise reminder the lunch items we had were great. Waitress was very friendly and helpful and atmosphere was enjoyable. It was a great stop after a morning of running errands.
We enjoy eating at Paisano's. We usually are there at lunch time. The prices are fair and the servings plentiful.We recently stopped in for lunch with a family member from out of town. My sister in law stated the burger she ordered with fries was the the best. We usually have left overs that we get to enjoy at home.The salads that come with meals are large and fresh.Pizza pick ups are another way to enjoy their tasty food.
I have been going to this restaurant for 15 years or more.  Each year it goes down hill a little more. I have always enjoyed their salads because the are fresh, not something out of a bag that is fruity.  However, in the last few months I have been more disappointed than usual. First there is the cost of everything which has climbed substantially over the years. Still, we were going there several times per week because it was convenient.  The staff is a mixed bag. Some of the servers are good but some are terrible.  One night I ordered a steak medium rare.  It arrived very well done.  I was starving so I ate some of it while I waited for our server to come and check on us 20 minutes later. I politely told her that it was quite over cooked. I told her I was going to eat it anyway but I wanted her to provide feedback to the kitchen so the next person would not have the same problem. She was fine with that but returned a few minuted later with Chris (owner).  He said he was told my steak was over cooked but because I ate half of it he wasn't able to do anything about it and if it was that bad then I should have told my server about it right away. As I said, I didn't want him to do anything but his response made me angry.  I told the waitress the very moment she came to check on us (my husband had already finished his meal.). Also food quality has declined.  Twice baked potatoes are sometimes almost frozen in the middle, Scrod tastes like ammonia often. I just learned that this is a sign that the fish is old - no more fish for me at Paisano's!  As another reviewer indicated, I too get sick frequently after eating here but when I eat here at least twice a week for a few weeks in a row I don't get sick again until I cut back on the frequency of visits.  I have to say though the things that get me most upset lately are the following. My father and I go here for lunch occasionally. He typically orders off the lunch specials menu but because I have dietary restrictions I do not. Because the specials are buy one get one half off, I order the second special to go and take it back to work with me for my husband's lunch. I was told that I can't do this any longer as specials are dine-in only.  Additionally the servings at dinner are large so my husband and I would ask our server to just package our salad course to go because we couldn't eat both that and our meal in one sitting but now, get this, there is a $2.00 charge to get your salad to go.  Seriously?  They charge $18 for our entree plus our overpriced soft drink which would come with refills if you get one of the good servers and they want to charge me $2 for a box that probably costs 25 cents.  It seems as though they are adding a charge for everything now, even sour cream to go with my fries.  If baked potatoes come with sour cream, why doesn't a $5 order of French fries?  I guess I should just let go of my hope that it would go back to being the restaurant we enjoyed so much years ago. I was delusional to think that my customer feedback, no matter how pleasant I was about it, was ever going to wake them up.  Oh I almost forgot, the girl sitting up by the kitchen at the register spends most if her time flipping her long blonde hair or pulling at the ends to remove all of the loose ones.  Bon appetite!
I love this place! I've been here many times and usually opt for the chicken parm. I never even finish half of it at the restaurant! You also get free bread and salad with the dinners. The last time I was there, I got one of the day's specials- salmon salad. When I got my meal, I was shocked to see a huge piece of salmon sitting on my salad. Again- leftovers! Hope to be back soon.
Planned a party in the back room. The owners were very considerate. Everything could not have been better.....food was great and the waitress was exceptional!
My family gets take out pizza here every few weeks for the last 15 YEARS. It is consistently great. 
We drive 80 min round trip for this pizza. Have tried closer, but always disappointed. The sauce can't be beat! Try the Greek pizza w red sauce. Yum! 
This family restaurant is always super busy and they are probably overworked. Be nice. 
We were in search of pizza and found Paisano's. Lucky for us, we hit it on the Monday special, which was a buy one large pizza get the second one free offer. We ordered a meat lovers, a pepperoni, a hamburger, and a pepperoni/black olive/mushroom. They were all excellent and had plenty of toppings - no scrimping here. The iced tea was good too.
I stopped going to Paisano's over a year ago because of the food but my wife still liked the chicken ceasar salad so she kept going there.  Today she stopped in and took home a salad for lunch she has been very sick ever since.  She learned her lesson and will never be back. To bad years ago Paisano's hade great food. 
Eaten here a number of times and the last time was about a year ago, sorry to say it hasn't gotten any better as fare as their dinner meals are concerned. No wonder on Tuesday night it's buy one dinner and you get  half off the other diner.
I guess that says it all, when you need to have specials like that to get customers in it says a lot about the food.
Had the Veal saltonboco and it was just fair.
Think it will probably be another year before I'll be back, maybe !
Had read that the service was bad,  and orders were often wrong,  but decided to give them a try anyhow.  Ordered the chicken marsala to go,  drove the 20 minutes to get there,  paid the rather expensive price of $18. For the meal,  got home. ..no salad which was supposed to come with the meal,  no bread. .. just $18. And 20 minutes on the road for mediocre at best chicken marsala.
They did offer to give me my salad if i wanted to make the trip back there,  but that wasn't happening. .. nor will we be back ever!   AVOID THIS PLACE, the fact that they don't even have a menu on line to look at should have been enough of a clue,  and combined with the poor reviews i had read, I shouldn't have given them a chance.  Hope this helps the next person not to get ripped off and disappointed.
Paisano's doesn't look like much from the outside, but was very nice inside. Service was great and they offer a large menu of Italian and Greek dishes. Portions were large and reasonably priced. Would definately go back to Paisano's if I ever find myself in the area again.
Honestly I don't get what the big deal is. Mediocre Italian food in an old fashioned style dining room. Pizza is heavy on cheese, thick on crust and the sauce is sweet for my taste, but the buy one large get one deal is pretty good. Just nothing special.
Long overdue review for our New Year's Eve experience @ Paisano's. We stopped for a small bite to eat and found a set menu for the holiday. We split the steamed mussels in garlic white wine sauce, split the twin seafood stuffed lobster tails, baked potato and ordered an extra salad. What an amazing meal. So delicious!!! Rest assured we'll be at Paisano's next year as well. Our new "go to" place for the holiday.
Paisano's is a mixed bag. Some things, like the vodka rigatoni with chicken or the alfredo, are very good. The chicken gyro is also pretty decent. But the pizza and calzones are just so-so, and some of the grinders are just plain boring.

The food is usually cooked well, although the hamburgs or hamburg grinders for take-out often are done pretty rare.

The place itself is kind of dark, and although we get takeout a couple of times a month (not much choice; Southampton is a small town), we haven't actually eaten in the place itself in years.
We enjoyed their ice cream very much.  The ice cream was creamy.  I had the Black Squirrel, which was chocolate with brownies and chocolate chips.  The chocolate flavor was intense.  My grand daughter ordered strawberry in a dish and wanted 2 gummy worms on top.  I paid for my order and then she decided she did not want the worms, so I asked that they be taken off.  The girl told me she owed my 85 cents.  I thought that was a bit pricey for 2 gummy worms.

The outside dining area was clean and umbrellas and a canopy offered shade from the sun.

We will return to try some of their other flavors
This is a great little roadside ice cream stand perfect for an evening or weekend treat. They are easy to get to and have a small off street gravel parking area that is well maintained. They serve a wide verity of hand dipped "home made" hard ice cream along with soft serve, there a even frozen treats for your dog. They also have a few food items such as hot dogs. The seating area is clean and well maintained. I look forward to our next visit.
What is better on a Saturday evening than home made fresh mint-oreo cookie ice cream! Yum I asked for a small and it was huge, tasty and refreshing.The oreo's were pleantyful in a smooth green mint ice-cream.  
Got to sample  the coffee&cookie which I will be sure to order the next visit.  
There are many flavors to try worth a trip back.
My family loves the ice cream here.  Not sure if it is open yet, but can't wait for our first taste of the year.
This ice cream at Northside is some of the best I've ever had. My fav is Creme Brulee. Great stop right on Rts. 10 & 202. Friendly service.
We go out of our way to get a couple cones at Northside Creamery.  Certainly the best Ice Cream place in Westfield and far beats that chain you find down the road,  Try coconut, my favorite, and rare to find in New England.  They handpack pints and quarts, and before you complain about the cost, remember this is homemade and we are trying to provide a living wage to the servers.
Joe and Carrie have done a great job since taking on this location - now a favorite spot for kids/families after a sporting event and some great meal menus I hadn't expected. One of the best places in our area to support a local business and experience a GREAT HOT FUDGE SUNDAE!!!
Went out with a group of friends last night (8 total) - bar top was dirty & sticky, glasses appeared unclean.  We decided to eat upstairs on the deck and were placed next to where the "band" was playing, when we saw another table clear, we asked to move.  The waitress didn't even wipe down that table & moved us there.  We had just sat down and were asked to order because they didn't have enough menus and wanted ours for other patrons....we quickly ordered a couple of appetizers and gave our menu's back.  We asked for our menu's back so we could now place an order and were told that only 2 were available so we would have to share.  We asked for our check & left - went to the Westwood  Pub just down the street and we we were accommodated quickly despite not having reservations for a large party and we even got our very own menu's!!  Pretty sure alcohol is watered down at Papp's as well.  Will not recommend nor go back again.  Only cool thing is the planes coming in & taking off.
My husband and I went to Papps with friends to listen to live music and have some drinks! It was a lot of fun. Drinks were good, the place was really busy that night.
About 15 years ago when our daughter was at Westfield State we used to get lunch in the old restaurant at the airport, so last year my wife and I stopped and were surprised to see the new building and Papps Bar and Grill. We really liked it, so this year when we were returning from NY we planned to stop. We were a little pressed for time so decided to have the fried fish sandwich and sweet potato fries. It was served very quickly, was delicious, and the price was very reasonable. The service was great and before we left the chef came out to ask us if we were completely satisfied. After he talked with us he went to every patron in the place. This shows me that they really care about the experience everyone has. I would recommend this to anyone. We love watching planes come and go, and this time we got to watch one plane take off in the short time we were there. Next time I think we might sit on the outside deck upstairs, but there was a storm following us from NY so we chose to sit inside.
We went here for dinner tonight for the first time. Our waitress was great, and very attentive. We got the children's mac and cheese for our daughter. It was certainly priced higher than anything we would normally get her, it was absolutely delicious. It would be great if there were more affordable kids options. My food and my husbands food was perfect. I really like it when a restaurant has a simple menu like Papps, there's no need for pages and pages of options. Overall, I think they are doing a great job and was impressed on our first visit. We will certainly be back!
We had been to Papps in the past, but it has really gone downhill.  The menu has been cut back to only a small number of items and it is now more of a sports bar than a restaurant.  The wait staff was clueless. They brought us someone else's appetizer and someone else's drinks.  The entrees, while generally good, took an incredibly long time with only 2-3 other tables occupied.  Of the six dessert items on the menu, they didn't have three of them. The restaurant is right next to the airport runway and the views are great.
With a recommendation, we stopped at this wonderful restaurant for lunch. This place is right on the side of the runway of Barnes Municipal airport. We were very impressed when we walked in, with the clean, classy decor! With a water wall soothing the mind, and an awesome view of the mountain range, we enjoyed a cocktail from the full bar while we waited for the chef to prepare our lunch. There is a television, but our viewing pleasure was enjoyed as planes and jets occasionally graced the runway!  I can't say enough about how great our lunch was! I had a chicken sandwich on a roll, my husband had the chicken Caesar wrap, we both had chips. The chips were homemade! They were hot and tasty! So good! And the sandwiches were delicious! It was clear that our food was made to order... Fresh! Loved our meal!  And I have to thank our bartender, Mary, for being so attentive and helpful! Inquiring about bringing my 86 year old dad for his birthday, she went the extra mile and gave us the full tour! With an elevator to the upper deck, the outdoor area hosts another bar, tables, some shade, and yet a more spectacular view of the airport and surrounding area. Mary gave us a card with the phone number should we want reservations, and gave us ideas on birthday recognition! We will return, as the menu holds many desirable options that we have yet to try!
Food was fantastic! We didn't wait long at all, and the portion sizes were more than generous. Will be recommending this place in the future. 
We are very disappointed with this restaurant the past 2 times. 
The wait staff is very slow to assist you & does not seem to know what is going on. The menu has very few items on it & food was not very good. On our last visit we took our family there from out of state as visiting us & was embarrassed.  The lobster sandwich was very dry & not tasty at all. Asked for melted butter & waited 20 mins. All other plates of food were cold & not inviting. We sat on the upper deck as a nice night & it was not clean, seemed empty of restaurant items & waitstaff has to run up & down stairs outside with food. After we got one of my family members said there was a bug in his food. 
So we will not be going back there. To bad a nice location by the airport & upstairs deck could be good in the summer. 
Not sure what the situation is although won't stay open if continue to be that way. 
Signed disappointed. 😒
We flew here for dinner... the views are really pretty and we sat outside on the patio which was really nice... The menu is very strange.. nothing really makes sense or has reason of the items on the menu... the service was terrible... We had our appetizer serviced on paper plates with no silverware.. Had to ask another waitress to bring while our waitress just dropped off plates and food and went to chat with the cook in the corner of the patio... The Eggplant Tower was terrible! The skin on it, had to use a knife to cut into it.. It was like making it at home and you didn't know how to cook it.. I don't know... I think the location is great and fun... but the food and service is way off... I feel bad as the cook was very proud of his meals.. only reason I am giving this a 3 star as it would be a 1... We will not be back... just a very weird vibe....
This is a super spot to watch the 104th located at Barnes Air Force Base do their thing ~~ and yes the food is pretty good too!  
I've been there several times for lunch and a couple times for early dinner.  Staff is decent and attentive.  
If you go during lunch, the patio upstairs is only open on if the weather is good and usually Thursday and Friday...other than that you have to eat in the restaurant.  The windows are LARGE so you still get a view but not as spectacular as upstairs.

FOOD:  Burgers and their salads are good.  Soups are homemade and delish!

Sunsets are great too!
Very nice place.  The outdoor deck cannot be beat for view and entertainment, being in the airport on the runway.

Food is very good and consistent. We have been here before and always are happy with the nice staff and food.  The menu is standard fare but presented nicely and most seeming to be very fresh and good. Full bar also.
The lower level is the main dining room where the decor is contemporary yet comfortable. There's a wall of windows looking out at the runways and off in the distance the East Mountain Ridge. There's a rooftop patio that's covered and has heaters and tent walls that can be used when the weather isn't cooperating. The menu has been changed several times during the past three years. Currently the menu is casual with an assortment of appetizers, sandwiches and some simple entrees. The food is good. The service is usually very good. It's a good place to go for a reliable meal, reasonably priced and served in a timely manner. Lunch on the rooftop patio is a must in the summer to watch the F-15's.
Papps offers runway side dining and some decent food.  The bar is well stocked and the food is above average.  I have stopped in for lunch and after work on numerous occasions and have yet to leave disappointed.  The length of time for the food to be delivered has been a bit longer than I had hoped on a few occasions, but beyond that I have been impressed.  Sit outside on the deck in the summer.
Went last week with my family - very very disappointed !! 6 sandwiches took about 45 minutes and there were only a few other tables .  We eat out a lot and this is NOT a "thing" that happens at other restaurants,as the server politely tried to explain that it's normal and should be expected for a party of 6.
   Clear your schedule for the night to enjoy some of the pretty ok menu items that they offer.
   The service was awesome minus the prep time - someone needs to tell that cook that the customers can actually see what's going on back there, The guy with the chef hat I mean .
 The food was ok but not worthy of a chef hat.
Anyway try your luck , the planes are cool

  
great value, nice bar area,booths and view like no other restaurant in the area, lunch or dinner. Chief is a on hands owner.
Food is great!  Upper deck is awesome during warm weather...  Once in a while you can catch a Celebrity flying in.
Barnes Airport is a pilot's delight... good food, excellent service and competitively-priced aircraft fuel.  Chef John Slattery made a couple to trips to our table to check our level of satisfaction.  I recommend the blackened seared scallops over Caesar salad - mouth watering.
Flew in to Westfield Airport and was able to  park on the ramp in front of the restaurant. This is not the usual airport eatery. Much better. Had a wrap with sides and could not finish the generous serving. Made to order and a wonderful wait staff. I'll be flying back here again soon. 
The menu may not be cutting edge, and the decor is a little generic, but keep an eye on your plate. There is a very capable chef here that knows how to execute many standards deftly. It is a little out of the way and quirky, but that has never stopped us from looking for a superior meal. We will be back.

Chef John Slattery has a solid track record, including a founding stint at Currents in the Springfield Marriott and at Four Main Street, a very agreeable restaurant in Huntington. The restaurant's motto, "unique casual dining"  is a description in progress.  Our luncheon earned the high praise of four diners for the New England Clam Chowder, another soup and three orders of pulled pork sandwiches with slowly roasted meat. Homemade Potato Chips and Onion Rings also were spot on. On a very cold winter day, three of us opted for coffee and the fourth for hot tea. The beverages were served in generous mugs and were of premium quality. The service was friendly and attentive.

We look forward to returning to sample baby back ribs, lobster rolls, fish and chips and other dishes in his repertoire.

At the end of our meal, Chef Slattery circulated among the tables, asking his patrons how were their meals. It's a simple and smart gesture for immediate feedback and potential course corrections. All of us were happy with our fairly priced and quality food and he now has four new regular customers.

In better weather, there is a great outdoor deck for drinks and meals overlooking the runways and control tower. Barnes can turn from sleepy private airport to impressive Air National Guard base in a matter of seconds. There is ample free parking.
Drove by this place for years until some rave reviews about the French onion soup drew us in. Not only was the soup great, but so were the Bloody Marys! Food was good. VERY good eggplant parm and awesome fried golden triangles of mozzarella....
Wait staff was good, and Chef John was as personable in the dining area as he was capable in the kitchen.
We will be back!
We have five Dunkin donuts, a Starbucks, and a bunch of other coffee options around us on a daily basis. But we drive out of our way just to go to this particular one. The service is great, they get orders correct EVERY TIME, friendly staff, and I haven't had a burnt coffee yet in four years. Keep up the great work!!
Unfortunately, not 5 stars. More typical of the basic strip mall Chinese one finds all over America. 

Beige, boring General Tsao (who'd a thought?) even. Fried appetizers with thick boring crusts...again, really?

Sadly, really.
Wife was having lunch with a friend an I decided to have Chinese so I went to West Lake Gourmet. I was not disappointed with my curry chicken with onions on brown rice. They brought out hot green tea along with duck sauce and Chinese chips while my lunch was being prepared.
We order takeout regularly.  Other reviewers are accurate regarding  recent changes.  There is new ownership; very friendly, no complaints there.  The food is still delicious but when we ordered about a week and half ago there was a noticeable change with the chicken fingers ( different batter & smaller).  We also noticed the egg rolls aren't the same either.  We had tried ordering on Memorial Day and thought they were closed for the holiday then learned they're not open on Mondays at all anymore.  That meant we had to order from another local Chinese restaurant that day, which was very good, too, but we still prefer Westlake.  The other restaurant was more reasonably priced but  we're still willing to pay the extra cost for Westlake, though time will tell.  It would be nice if coupons were available.  (Love that they offer brown rice; hope that doesn't change).
Excellent food.  Family owned. Very disappointed they decided to close on Mondays. Luncheon specials served til 3.
GOOD Chinese food,  great deals on luncheon specials. Owner operated,  friendly,  best we have found in the area. .. we take out often,  our order is always correct and ready fast.... and good.
Westlake used to be a favorite stop. It has gone through some ownership changes and what I see is less food portions, higher prices and food not being piping hot.
Good sized portions for what you pay. I live in Northampton and this is one of my favorites for Chinese food.
Really love the dumplings and orange chicken. Great, funny staff that keep the night full of laughs and excitement! Awesome food but they should deliver more! Would definitely return. 
LOVE THIS PLACE!! Love the people running it, the women behnd the counter, and the waiters and waitresses. The food was sooooo yummy! One of my favs!!!
My favorite Chinese restaurant around!! Great value, especially the luncheon menu! West Lake looks like the average Chinese food restaurant from the outside, but with no msg, generous portions, and kind owners. The worst thing I could say about West Lake is the atmosphere is average, except for the chandeliers; they add a unique energy to the room.
Great food and the owners are incredibly nice. Have never had a bad meal there and the prices are great. Get the lunch specials and eat 2 full meals from them. Yummy!
My husband and I really enjoy this restaurant. My favorite is the string beans and beef. I do not care for their fried things such as the chicken fingers. However, I do think they have very tasty crab rangoons. For some reason, we find that the food always tastes better when we eat at the restaurant than getting take out. The atmosphere is average. The people/service is always very good.
Visited last week, Feb 2016, and was greatly disappointed. The meals came to the table at different times. I ordered the baked fish. The fish was good, but the peas and corn were disgusting. The baked potato came to the table well after all the other food, had clearly been cooked in a microwave, and was still underdone. The only reason I gave this 2 stars instead of 1 is because my mom's fish and chips were very good and the mac n cheese my kids ordered looked good. So I will hesitate to go back. On the plus side, our server was quite pleasant. Perhaps next time we'll just stick to their pizza. Below I said poor value because poor food is never a good value.
The husband and I have been here for luncheon at least once a month over the past year.  We've never had a bad lunch or poor service.  

There is a special dish for each day of the week in addition to the usual pizza, subs and sandwiches (including good gyros).  One of my favorites is the Chicken Alfredo with Broccoli.   A standard offering is a $.99 small cheese pizza with any entree.  Since I normally can't finish my dish I get the pizza and a "to go" dish for my lunch - voila! We have dinner for the night too.

The owner occasionally comes out to see how things are and is a nice guy to chat with.  
It's not anything fancy but I have got take out quite a few times and our family has been happy... My favorite is the squash ravioli.
I called to order pizza and lady didn't even ask me pickup or deliver so I asked if they deliver and she said yes but to pickup would take 15 mins. deliver would take 45 mins. and I was very hungry so I said I will pick up. I was there in 15-20 mins. and there seemed to be some confusion about my order and lo and behold my pizza never made it to the oven! The "owner"? came out and said he would bring to my house in very heavy accent. He was very insistent about it. Lady walks away to take care of dining-in customers and leaves me standing there waiting to pay for my order. Finally comes back and I pay for my order. Let me just say the "owner" did apologize and the lady sort of apologizes but is not very professional in handling this situation. I drive home with no pizza. Half hour later doorbell rings Different man delivers my pizza (he gets no tip). The pizza toppings were good but the pizza dough was NOT cooked all the way through. I feel like they should've offered me a free meal next time or discount or maybe a free apetizer for wasting my gas and making me wait even longer! I will not be going there again.
Not a week goes by that we don't make it there at least twice.  Love the owners, staff, great food, huge portions and we have met so many amazing people there.  It's a place where "everybody knows your name."
New owners have made this a regular on our dining out options. The menu isn't fancy, but the dishes are well prepared. Kids love the pizza, can't beat the 99 cent deal. Service is always friendly. Decor is dated mauve, but comfortable enough. This is where we come when we don't feel like cooking, but don't want eating out to be a big deal. Come eat here and spread the good word so they stay open!
Daily specials are quite the value!  For $5.99, it's a full course meal - and believe me, you'll have plenty of leftovers.  Sunday's special is Chicken Parm...which I ate for left overs twice.  Staff is very friendly.  Great family restaurant.
There is a bar section of the restaurant.  If you go after 7pm on the weekends, expect it to be a little louder than usual.  
They do have delivery and is within 40 minutes.  Their wide range of menu items will satisfy all.  I would have rated higher, but the restaurant is older and could use updated decor - but all in all is clean.
Daily specials are an excellent value ($5.99) Quick service. Keno and a separate bar area.
 Plenty of parking. All the meals are very good. Large party specials (10-60 people) 
 Catering available.
Being able to walk to the restaurant from hotel was very convenient...only steps away. Food was good as usual. Restaurant was clean. Order takers could be a little more friendly...with a smile.
Resturant was next door to a hotel we stayed at .Food was good and hot, clean, service average.

Reader
Nothing outstanding- tried some new menu stuff-- will stick with the old but was convenient to my motel- I could just walk there
We have eaten there twice, two years in a row.  Food is good, employees were very courteous and accommodating, but I think this Wendy's needs might new management, or at the least someone needs to double check their inventory orders.  Both times they were out of necessary items.  This time it was baked potatoes and it was 5:30 PM.  Also, no pecans for the apple pecan salad.  Were also out of paper goods.  Employees were very apologetic but still out of items!

We will go there again because it is so convenient to the newly renovated Quality Inn next door, but I hope they will be better stocked.  Again, employees were very friendly, accommodating, and welcoming and not having stock I don't think was not their fault.
I went to Wendys on May 28th 2014 around 8pm I waited forever in the drive-thru line it was the longest time I ever spent in any drive thru but at the end it was well worth the wait the customer service and the food was great everything I ordered was made right and very fresh and even though the girl taking order was overwhelmed with customers she was very patient and pleasant. if I can guarantee To have service and food like I did that night I would wait in that drive thru line again.sometimes you have to take the good with the bad.
First, the food is typical Wendy's.   However,  I have been here 3x (which is twice more than I should have been), & each time I have received the order incorrectly.   And, it is usually not even close.  By far the worst Wendy's I have ever been to.  Oh,  and not once has there ever been a genuine apology for the ineptitude.   It's a convenient stop before I get on the pike, but from here on out I'll either go hungry or wait until the rest area in Ludlow.
I went into the restaurant to grab a quick bite to go. I waited 10 minutes to have my order taken and an additional 15 minutes to receive it. I will say the food was good except for the strawberry tea. It was very weak flavored. I will go back there for the hot good food but the service needs a bit of work.
alot of staff but service is very very slow,i had to repeat my order 3 times
This Wendy's is average. The interior is usually not that clean when I go in but not overly dirty either. The service can be right on the ball but also terrible to the point that once a girl placed our order on hold so she could answer her cell phone and had a conversation (that one I should have reported to the manager). I never have had issues with the take out window which seems to be much faster than when you order inside. I usually stick to the .99 menu or to the salads. The salads used to be great but over time have gotten much smaller. I like the crispy chicken sandwich and if I need a quick lunch or supper, am in a hurry or don't have much cash on me that is what I would recommend. My daughter loves the baked potatoes but this Wendy's is often sold out of potatoes by suppertime.
Overall, stick to this Wendy's for take out(check your order before leaving the window) and avoid eat in.
This Wendy's is slow, and that some people in the back didn't wear hair coves.
You wouldn't expect such good food from this place.  It's located in front of a convenience store right off art 138.  Great food and they have a nice little section where you can buy Italian specialty foods.  
Alfredo Aiello is authentic Italian food, fresh and frozen.  Looking for imported Italian ingredients or a fresh sandwich, this place is for you. I have grown up on Aiello's food, and it's consistency and the friendliness of their staff is phenomenal.  It is take out, as there is no where to sit at the Canton store.  We are very lucky to have them as part of our community
if you want a great italian dinner but do not want to drive into the North End and pay to park, this is the spot!  Lasagne, meatballs, pasta, bread,
amazing sauce, right down to the candy covered almonds!  Delicious, authentic, and priced just right!  Large supply of prepared meals, frozen and ready to bake, freshly baked breads and rolls, this is awesome for working families who want to serve a quality meal rather than fast food, most meals bake about an hour  just supply the red wine and checkered tablecloth!!
This is an Italian Food Store so if you are in the area and have the opportunity to check out this store you should definitely stop in.  You can buy prepared food and reheat in your home or in some cases a hotel with a kitchen.  The food is great and the sauce divine.  The eggplant parmesan is the best I have ever had.  You can pick up some calzones - when I was there one customer walked in the door and went right over and grabbed quite a few calzones.  

You can also pick up oils, vinegars, tapenades, etc.   

If you want a cannoli made as you order - this is the place!   They also have fresh italian bread.  

The prices are not bad and if it saves you eating out every night why not give it a try!
Shepard's pie on special for lunch today, great meal, fantastic service , good company !
Plenty of parking today - great way to wrap up a day in the Blue Hills!

Hillside is a Pub in the Irish tradition, located just off the interstate in Canton. They have all the staples our expect, plus a variety of American food items. The appetizer sampler was impressive, with the potato skins being the hit. I got a pizza, which was wonderful! Everything my family ordered looked great, and I'd absolutely go back to watch a Red Sox game and enjoy some food. 
Went there for late lunch with my friends and was very disappointed,food was just OK  service was good and the price is a little bit high for what you get.also parking is limited,and the manager or owner was a little annoying
Great staff, good food and great value for your money, I have been in the area for 21 days and I have probably eat there 15 nights. Try the Fish and Chips and the Grilled breast chicken sandwich and the pizza is great. 
Very friendly service, ordered buffalo chicken nachos for an appetizer between the 4 of us and couldn't eat our meals! They were delicious!
This place is right next door to where I work so I have been here more than a couple of times 😎This place is small!! This place is LOUD!!!  The food here is consistently great!!!  This is a VERY popular spot & it gets crowded!  The wait staff are excellent!!! Best pub food I've had anywhere!! I've made a Sicilian chili for 30 years that I'm told is the best on the planet !!  The chili here gives mine a run for the money!!!  Great specials like chicken pie & fish & chips!!  Great food!!!  Not great for a first date because once again, it's LOUD!!!! Did I mention it's loud ?!! 😝
Yummy, Pizza and Turkey Club was awesome. Turkey fresh and not dry. French Fries crispy and not soggy. 

Ceasar Salad fit for a king/queen. Pizza good flavor and crispy. 

Service was good and very clean.
Had hamburgers and fries.  Hamburgers good, fries excellent.  Also a good selection of beers.  Small space and often very crowded in the evening.  Overall goo pub food
I was staying at the Homewood Suites right next door and as options are few and far between in this area, a couple work colleagues and I decided to walk down and check it out on a Tuesday night.  Surprisingly this place was packed, looks like a pretty popular place to have a drink and grab a bite to eat.

It is a small building, pretty tight inside with all the people!   We were lucky to grab a table, and immediately a waitress came up and took our order.  Our beers came out a few minutes later, most of us had Guinness which (of course) is on tap.  Our waitress kept checking back with us to make sure we were taken care of which was appreciated.

Very interesting to watch people get served - because it is a small place, the servers have to navigate narrows paths through the customers.  But they did it quite skillfully which was impressive.

If you are ever in the area, it is definitely worthwhile to stop by and check this place out.
I was kind of stuck at  the nearby hotel, so this was the only place to eat. Luckily, they did a great job! I had a burger for one meal, a club sandwich for the other.

The bartenders are nice, good crowd.

It was fun to sit at the bar and listen to the Irish accents, one of the best in the world. It was authentic and a fun place to watch a game.
I stopped in Hillside Pub when on a business trip, it was right by the hotel I was staying at. Very cool little local bar & grill, small & intimate. The service was great & food was spot on pub fare. Get the onion rings, they are thin and perfect!
Tucked amongst gas stTions you would never find this place unless you were looking for it.  Walter and Mike, the two owners make you feel like a long lost friend with their Irish hospitality.  The food is excellent and reasonable priced. 
Busy bar with good bar food.  The service was very good.  Pizza was surprisingly good,,was hoping for one of their specials, shepherd's pie or meatloaf but neither were on the menu the night I was there.
Awesome place right near the blue hills reservation. Had a burger which was excellent and their beer section was great too. Service was perfect, would definitely come back when in the area! 
I was working in Canton, MA and my coworker was ill so I walked from the hotel to the Hillside pub. It was small and quite a few people were there but it didn't feel crowded. I sat at the bar and had a couple beers and dinner. I really enjoyed the fish and chips. Very fresh and cooked just right. The people I met were friendly. The bartender was busy but still took the time to make me feel welcome. 
Friendly bar guy, beer is good but the food is just frozen stuff warmed up. Had chicken but its not a real breast, fries were re fried. Wouldn't eat here again.
Warm beer, complete lack of service. Waitress would not make eye contact for fear you want to order something. Try the Blue Hills Grille. They smiled and served us right away.
We were looking for a place to eat after our hike in Blue Hills. The beer and food hit the spot, but the cursing from the local clientele was not ideal for our 11 year old.
Great friendly place to get a drink and enjoy great pub food.  The service is the best.  One or two visits and they'll know your preferred beverage. 
Went to this restaurant because it was just down the hill from the hotel. I wasn't expecting too much as it just looked like a small neighborhood bar. It turned out to be a nice surprise, well stocked bar and some very good food too. Staff were very friendly and the service was good, prices reasonable too.
It was clean, the staff was professional and although long, he line moved very quickly.  I was greeted with a smile and was in and out in less than 5 minutes.  
When I'm on the road, I look forward to stopping at a Dunkin Donuts and the order is always the same. I specifically say, "Egg and bacon sandwich - no cheese - on a toasted English muffin - make sure it's toasted." I add the emphasis about toasting the muffin because, if I don't, sometimes it's just heated and I go back and ask again. Well the other day, I got in my car and headed up Rt. 128 with my freshly prepared sandwich. I was so disappointed when I bit in and the English muffin was lukewarm, heated, not toasted. As I drove by the big sign for Dunkin Donuts University, I knew it was too late to turn back. I wondered if they assign their rookies from the university to this particular store. I know there are millions of people in the world with no food and this is so minor. The egg and bacon on a lukewarm Eng Muffin was unpleasant to eat...but it seemed so comical that this poor service was walking distance from D&D world headquarters.
Always love "dunkies" and this one is no exception.  Located right across from our hotel made this place perfect for us.
Average fast food donut shop with good coffee!  The donuts are definitely better in the morning.  Get coffee only in the evenings.
As any other dunkin donuts this one had a wide selection of breakfast/lunch foods along with drinks. The cashiers are quick for every order but some mornings it can be slow due to the amount of customers. Have been here a lot of times and will continue to..
Of course this is like many dunkin donuts around... but of course was just as good. Donuts were good and the staff here was very quick with getting orders out and coffee poured. Check this placeout if your in the area!
The Texas toast style egg and bacon sandwich is surprising good as well as the coffee. In my area in the Western States Dunkin ' Donuts is just starting to open stores. The price was fair for coffee and breakfast sandwich. I know everyone has been stopping here for years, but I will need to give them a try in Utah. 
No probar una dona de Dunkin Donuts es no haber estado en la región. A mi me encanta la trenza glaseada.
This place has a great atmosphere. A great selection of beer and the food was great. I just wish they had a few more options for food, but what I did get I really enjoyed as did everyone else in our group. I would come back again if in the area and would recommend it to others
I went to Blue Hills late one Sunday night with my family, and came away very impressed. I got the Ahi Tuna Burger, which was seared to perfection, and covered in Asian slaw. The truffle fries were a huge hit as well. Others in my party said he Lobster Mac and Fish and Chips were also terrific. This place deserves to be crowded all the time, but we walked right in. Give it a try!
Food was pretty good. Asked for recommendations for visiting Boston. Met the owner and a few patrons.  Everyone was very friendly and helpful.
located right off the highway and close to Blue Hills one of the ares best places to hike.

Nice salads and dinners
My husband and I have eaten at Blue Hills Grille several times. We have always enjoyed our meals. Just recently we both had the blacked shrimp special. It was delicious. Prices are very reasonable. Great local place. 
I would have given 5 stars, but the waiter wasn't as attentive to refilling beverages as I would like.

Had one of the best wedge salads ever; got 1/2 portion which was satisfying.

Shrimp were PERFECT, no strange flavor and cooked to perfection.

Can't wait to return and try more of their specials.
We ate here as a group, which is always difficult for restaurants. They did a decent job and service was friendly and helpful.  The food was good, not great, but if you are looking for a laid back meal with a drink to end your day, then this is a good place to start. Prices are fair.  Enjoy!
Excellent, lobster-filled roll. Very friendly bar staff. Don't love the restaurant layout, but the food is good. Easy access off the highway a plus; it's next to Dunkin Donuts at base of Blue Hills.
Had appetizers at Blue Hill Grille one evening on the way home when we not very hungry.  Appetizers were good but too expensive for what they were.  Unlikely to return.
During a recent business trip, we did pick up at the Blue Hills Grille, it was more than decent - I had a burger and sweet potato tots and my husband had a lobster roll (which was a little on the small side) - we enjoyed our food - no real complaints.
Any restaurant that's literally attached to a donut shop makes me hesitate. However,  the reviews were positive so we gave it a try.  The pastrami sandwich & salad were Fantastic & the service was Excellent. Decor is very comfortable & not a pub/tavern feel at all. Will definitely revisit when in the area next time. 
I came here for dinner on a business and wasn't sure what to order.  Their clam chowdah is seriously amazing.  I also ordered a salmon salad which was tasty.  The salmon was cooked perfectly.  The staff is very friendly.  I had a really Nice waitress.  I will come here again.
4th star for the brownie sundae. Otherwise, average. Lobster roll was tasty but miniscule and very expensive. Had to look for the fish in the fish tacos. Artificial whipped cream on the sundae. Bar takes up 2/3 of the restaurant. Service was good on a slow day. Would be a three star rating in Boston but hey, It's Canton.
Visited Blue Hills Grille and ordered the ribs after recommendation from the restaurant. It was very tender and tasty. A bit on the spicy side which added to the experience.   Friendly service added to the positive experience.
This place had the best fish tacos I have ever had.  They are huge and flavorful.  Their salads were fresh and great as well. I'd go again. 
On my first visit I tried the salmon salad. It was fabulous. The salmon was tasty and the salad had quinoa, craisins and other healthy foods. The dressing was also excellent. They didn't overwhelm the salad with a heavy dressing.
Located nearish to the Reebok campus, the food was just OK.  I had steak tips, which I'd just had the night prior at another place and they suffered by comparison. 

Not a great beer selection either.
We moved to Canton a few months ago and have dined here before. It is a good local casual restaurant with a  bar area. When we had dinner last night they were handling a large table of children whose parents were eating at a separate table elsewhere in the restaurant. The servers were doing a great job with the kids including providing drink refills, frequently clearing the table of finished dishes, and one server even helped one of the kids get their phone or whatever it was connected to wifi. Very nice to see the staff so accommodating to the kids! 
We had the ribs and steak tips for dinner - see pics. Tips were cooked exactly to order and unbelievably tender. Hubby got them with the Thai chili sauce on the side as suggested by our sever and he loved it - different taste than having bbq sauce. Crisp tasty snap peas and delicious baked beans on the side. The baby back ribs were tasty and I liked the sauce - very flavorful.  Also had the baked beans - yummy - and the mashed potatoes. 
Our server (sorry forgot his name!) was attentive and friendly yet not intrusive. Thanks for staying on top of our drink refills without us asking - we appreciate the small details! 
This is conveniently located on Rt 138 by the Blue Hills Ski Area.   Good for a quick bite to eat but nothing special. 
Nice waiter at onset,  took order and gone after 40min , called out to him we couldn't wait longer.
A spec order of fries made. ..cool limp. Inexpensive grezzy shoe string fries with congealed cheese. ..formally melted , Avocado side was a dark grey, gone by grey. . 
Only 6 other patrons in bar 2 where at bar just drinking.
Nice waiter,  when we saw him.
Food cold...careless plating..did I say cold.
Guys at bar had best idea..just a drink place


A nice choice of specials for lunch. The food was good but not outstanding. The service was good and the prices reasonable.
Let's face it most Asian restaurants are pretty much the same.  However at My Place in Canton MA The food is tasty, quick service, fairly priced and serves great Sushi.
This is a very, very, good restaurant, family owned personal touch on all entries. Food cooked to order always hot and delicious.
Two gals out for a dinner, wanting Oriental food. I explained my food allergies and ordered with great care. My friend ordered as she desired and when our dishes came out there were mushrooms in my dish which I had communicated clearly to my server that I could not eat. I began to eat my food and noticed that there were mushrooms and called over the server. She said sorry, but that is how the dish is prepared. I was extremely upset and asked to see the manager, and she said she was the manager. I repeated my dilemma and she did nothing to remedy the situation. My friends meal was fine, so I just ate what I could and sent the rest back. I was not compensated, and swore that I would never return. Except for the good company my whole experience was a disaster. I will never return.
This was a very typical traditional Chinese restaurant.  Best to share food with a large crowd for they bring out items as they are prepared - not all at once.  If you understand this concept up front you will not be disappointed. I spoke with friends who had gone here and were unhappy with the service because all members of the group weren't served at the same time.

It was an ok but not great- late lunch
Nice waiter. ..said he was new. New waiter didn't realize menu had symbols indicating raw or cooked. ..he pointed us towards many dishes that where raw when we told him only interested in cooked.
So unaware of what was available at bar, and no liquor menu to help.
Food just o.k. everything took a long time, we where only seated customers. A few pick up take out.
Pretty sure we wont return, long wait, staff not able to serve English speaking patrons. 
Then even with nobody in restaurant plates snatched,  alot of hustle at the end, that should have been at start of meal.

We ate at the sushi bar.  Although the food was good our waitress kept coming by pushing drinks at us, over pouring our wine etc.   I felt like she was trying to get us to buy more drinks.  I wouldn't go back
Went there for lunch and had the chicken with mixed vegetables. It was fresh and delicious. Very light ,not like some Asian restaurants. The Hot n Sour soup was yummy too,
Dingy sushi places are supposed to be the best ones! This one definitely isn't… It doesn't matter how much your waitress smiles at you if she doesn't even speak English! The food was average, but the service was extremely slow, and we had to explain our order 2 times before the waitress figured it out. To top it off, the bathroom spelled like bleach. It's a shame though, cause the food was ok. 
This restaurant is down the street from our home. We've ordered take-out in the past but it's been a while.  We ordered tonight and after waiting for our food for an hour we called to check the order and were told it was on it's way. After waiting another half hour we called again and they told usit was still on its way.  After two hours our order showed up cold with a very apologetic driver but the manager on the phone  said if we didn't want the food the driver could take it back. 9:00 at night didn't leave many choices for us. The manager finally agreed to charging us only half the price. We are not difficult people, we appreciate great food, have respect for the food industry but more importantly if the manager had showed some compassion and was apologetic it would have gone further and showed better management rather than they didn't care about their customer and the service they were provided.
We frequent this restaurant often and it never disappoints. The food is always fresh and delicious. They offer great sushi as well as a variety of Chinese dishes. One of my favorites is the shrimp and thai basil fried rice along with the Nori pillows.
Consistently great food and take out or delivery service.  Very clean and lots of great choices. Ample parking too!
Not the same as when they first opened.  Had the  lamb and yet could not taste the lamb flavor.  The amount of the meat was limited. The quality was still good, but when i come to this restaurant I want the quality they were famous for.   Prices are not inexpensive, but then their combinations are worth it if they contained the amount of meat and the flavors were there as they used to be.
Food and selection abundant and always delicious here. For a small strip mall restaurant , it's a true gem for sushi, and Asian menu. Try the signature Mai Tai to get things started!
The food here is delicious and worth every dollar, I am a regular here and have not ever been disappointed the staff friendly and helpful, and the drinks are good especially the "Special Mai Tai"  and it is very clean, nice date spot or a place to link up with old friends and chat, the only con is they close early!!!
4 of us were seated in a small front room and then ignored.   The table across from us was never cleaned up in the time we were there.  I finally went to the front desk and asked if anyone was going to come to our table to take our order.  Finally a man in a shirt and tie (manager?) took our 1 small appetizer order as a starter.   Nothing was brought to us for over 15 minutes so I stood up looking for him and he asked if anyone had taken our order yet!  Maybe he realized it was him so started typing it into his computer. There is a bigger portion of the restaurant in back, why would they sit people where there's no service? By this time we had been ignored enough so we left.
I've been going to or ordering in from this restaurant since 2006. Its always been good. Never great but a reasonable choice for Chinese food in the Canton area. 

This past Sunday, 7 of us went for dinner and had a very disappointing experience. We were seated in the drafty front room even though there was plenty of seating in the nicer back dining room. Yes, we could have asked to be re-seated, but why should we have had to? 

We ordered appetizers. After the order was taken, I asked the waitress to make sure there was no MSG used. I was told that most of their appetizers use MSG. OK, this is unusual in this day  - at least from my experience. So half of our party had to avoid most of the appetizers for MSG. The rest of us had to avoid the appetizers because they were overly greasy, overly soggy, too fatty, or tasted of frying oil. 

Next up main dishes; chicken with broccoli came with enough brown sauce to bathe in even though we had requested light saucing. Steamed vegetables could have come from any steam table at any restaurant or bar. They were slightly soggy vegetables, heavily salted. Pad Thai - yup - served here - was inedible. Starchy noodles, peanut sauce that just pretended to be peanut sauce, 1 shrimp - yup one, etc.

Oh, and when only 4 of the 7 of us ordered an alcoholic beverage, the waitress was clearly annoyed and gave us an eye roll.

So, I suggest you think twice about going here. there are multiple choices in the area. No need to spend money where its not appreciated. Mai Place is not my place anymore.
Loved the pinapple fried rice.  Everyone was very pleased with their meal, light not greasy.  Going back to try the susi.  Wait staff not very friendly but the greeters at the fron desk were very pleasant.  Will go back again soon.
It's always a good sign when a large Chinese family is seated next to you in a Chinese American restaurant. Mai Place offers both reliable Chinese American favorites (e.g. scallion pancakes & meat spare ribs-on-the-bone) as well as custom-designed Asian feasts for more knowledgeable diners.
We came to visit this one more fine Chinese restaurant in Stoughton/South Canton area, and we were not disapointted. While the interior is modest, the service is great, and no one was there for Saturday lunch. We ordered sushi (it was great), and then General Gui's chicken. That general would win competition with a Colonel! There is free parking, of course. A recommensdation to the management would be to add pictures to the menu, but the serving staff was great in explaning menu items.
We got in on a Sunday night and couldn't decide what to do for dinner.  We decided to get takeout, calzone and pizza.  Calzone I give a 4, pizza a 3.  Pizza tasted good but crust a little thick for me.  Calzone was good, it was made fresh and we had meatballs, lots of them in it.  It was a short 5 minute drive and they also deliver.  Fried sampler platter sounded good, clams, moz sticks, wings, chicken.  Everything made fresh in store, nice place for a decent dinner.
We had pizza, salad, and chili delivered to our hotel, the Homewood Suites.  They came right to our door and the food was great.
We like the convenience of this place. Pizza is pretty good. Sandwiches are generous. they do subs and wraps and a decent salad.
This was our first try with Slices.  We ordered two pizzas, which were delivered very quickly.  However the pizza was not very good.  It was very thin and greasy.  I prefer Domino's over Slices.
Speedy delivery, Awesome Pizza, Stuffed Shells to die for!
Huge slices of pizza, NY style, not the silly/awful Greek style of pizza you see so often in New England. The right amount of cheese & sauce, with a real crust, and not overdone. More of a take-out place, blue collar & very old school. Good prices and fast service.
great za. big subs.
I'm not typically a chain guy - I tend to avoid chain restaurants. But Bonefish Grill is GREAT! The atmosphere is great, the food is great, and the bartenders & servers are friendly and helpful. Because my office is just 7 minutes away, several colleagues and I like to come here for an after-work cocktail and perhaps an appetizer fairly often. Last week, I had the chance to have dinner here and the fish was as fresh as what you'd get at Legal's and all my friends had equally positive reviews about their entrees. Definitely worth a visit if you're in the area!
Highly recommended, especially for fresh seafood entrees. My 4th times visiting this place. 

I have not tried anything other than seafoods, hence can't speak quality of meat and etc.

Try Bang Bang Shrimp, Ahi Tuna Sashimi, chilean Sea Bass. 
Excellent food is you love fish you will love it here.  Nice bar bright and cherrie.  My favorite is Red Snapper.  The have seasonal specials.  Make a reservation.
Bad attitude from the staff, I should have not stay in the place, I walked in on a Friday evening and the place was almost empty, that is a bad sign on a weekend night, they don't pick up the dishes from the table or the bar when you have finished your meal, I believe that they think this is not part of their job. Went once never going back.
We went on a Saturday evening, arriving around 5:30.  We were seated promptly,  the waitress was well-informed and very professional,  and timed everything well.  We have never had bad service here, have been there for lunch and dinner.   Food was very good.  The restaurant filled in steadily. 
Beautiful restaurant, nice outdoor patio and a good selection of seafood but there's a few teething problems.
Clam chowder in New England is usually white, served with oyster crackers (preferably Westminster brand) and if you go Cape Cod style, a splash of original Tabasco.
The one here was little off color, had a lot of bacon in it, and was a little thick, however, it did taste pretty good. Disappointing was the lack of oyster crackers (they gave me saltines) and for Tabasco they gave me Cholula which i like on my taco's but not really on chowder, a little too smokey.
That being said, the clams in the chowder were outstanding, very tender and plenty of them, good clam to potato ratio.
Nice warm bread served with some dipping olive oil was also good.
Grilled chicken caesar salad was a winner, fresh crisp salad and yummy juicy chicken all tossed in a light dressing.
I'm going to go back and try the fish and chips (of course) as they looked pretty good, but i think i'll eat at the bar, service in the dining room looked a little slow at all the tables i saw, including ours...
The entrance to this restaurant is somewhat tricky, at the light from the "stores" go straight, it looks like you can get in directly from Univ. Ave, but that is not the case. Better signage could help. Lunch was good, my friend really enjoyed the salad with an addition of shrimp (about 6). I had the chicken tacos, which were grilled very nicely. My only complaint was I don't like mango salsa, and that was the only option. The waitstaff tried to be very accommodating when this was discovered. Bring your sweater, as the A/C was brisk. Will return as the product is very good.
This was my second dining experience here and both times I was disappointed in the food.  The first time I had a steak and it was very fatty.  Ate around the grizzle.  Bonefish just opened that week so I never complained.  I have eaten at Bonefish in Boynton Beach, Fla on many occasions and everything was always 5*.  
This visit (on July 17th) I did complain.  I could not eat my meal as it was served rare when asked for well done.  They took it off the bill BUT I didn't get to eat.  It was going to take at least 20 minutes for a replacement meal and my guests would have completed their meals.  Management never made an appearance at the table and that was most disappointing.  I work in Waltham as an EA and have sent my boss to dinner at that location with clients BUT that is not happening again.  I even emailed Bonefish, and what a surprise, no response.
The food was OK but the service needs to get better. For the upscale pretension this restaurant needs far more mature servers especially for the prices charged.
This was our third visit for dinner. The first time we went everything was great. The second time the service was slow and some of the food was not as ordered. We decided to try it again in case the second time was the exception, and because it is a convenient location.

First, the good part- I ordered one of their "Bonefish Favorites", Alaskan Cod Fish & Chips, served with french fries, and it was delicious. Another at my table ordered Atlantic Salmon with Mango Salsa, and said it was very good. Two others ordered Sea Scallops & Shrimp, and both said the scallops were undercooked. In addition, one of them with a lot of food intolerance requested the included green beans be plain, with nothing but butter on them, but they arrived with some sort of spice on them. The other person requested cole slaw instead of beans, but got beans anyway.

However, the worst part of this experience was the very slow bar service. Our very pleasant young waitress took our drink orders and when she came back with bread she apologized for the bar being really backed up. Since there was no crowd in the bar, and although all tables were full there were no people waiting to be seated, it seemed strange the bar would be backed up. Ten minutes later our waitress returned to apologize again for the slow service, brought us more bread, and took our food orders. Fifteen minutes later our drinks finally arrived. The food took an equally long time to arrive, and all together we were in the restaurant for two hours, most of it spent waiting for drinks and food.
Four of us went out to eat at Bonefish Grill in Westwood last Saturday night.  It was 4th of July weekend and the restaurant was almost empty.  We had made reservations a few days ahead of time.  We ordered drinks and appetizers, then dinner.  After dinner, three of people in our party ordered coffee and dessert.  One ordered a glass of wine.  It took 25 minutes for the wine to get to the table.  The other three had finished their dessert and coffee before the wine arrived.  The bar was empty and restaurant was maybe about 1/3 full.  Service was extremely slow all night.  Food was good, but one can only imagine how long it would take if the restaurant was busy.  Dinner was expensive, $288.00 with tip for four people.
Great 2 entrees, appetizer and desert special for $50. Food was very fresh and service was great. Location is very convenient to Dedham area.  
Bonefish Grill was a convenient place to meet for people coming from Providence and Brookline. I have dined at several other Bone Fish Grills, but this was my first time to this location.  I ordered the crab cakes for lunch, which I find very good, for they do not have an over abundance of filler in them, The crab cakes are generous and I did not walk away hungry.. .  They  are accompanied  by the choice of coleslaw or French fries and I opted for the coleslaw.  The other two in my group ordered salmon over various salads and they both seemed happy with the choices that they made. Bread is not offered unless you request it. I found out that other locations of the restaurant automatically give you bread according to one of my friends that recently dined at another Bonefish location. Having this type of restaurant is a wonderful addition to the area.
The atmosphere and staff are great. the food is typical chain food- in my opinion.  I had fish tacos. I would go to Legal C bar any day over this.
This is our second visit to Bonefish. Our first visit was when they originally opened the Westwood  location about a year ago. 
We had said at that time we wouldn't rush back. And we didn't!

Our meals were very good. Ironically, our daughter's chicken, artichoke, spinach and goat cheese dish was better than the salmon or haddock dishes we ordered. The appetizer of bang bang shrimp was delicious, as was the fresh bread.

The service was very good, and the atmosphere was pleasant. 


Firstly, I realize this restaurant is a 'chain', but although it wasn't my choice I went with an open mind and that is where I'm confused. I know in the food service industry, restaurants have very defined procedures. Such as, greet diners within 2 minutes, or take drink order within 5. I don't know exactly, but it works somewhat like that. 
At this restaurant after the hostess seated us, the server and his sidekick immediately came over for a drink order. We asked for a few minutes to decide, he left, we picked our drinks and waited, and waited, and waited. By the time he returned (at least 10 minutes) we ordered our drinks and appetizers, but decided to wait on our main course. The drinks and appetizers came (we had to ask for side plates). The drinks good, the appetizers of calamari, and the special shrimp, I thought average at best.
Then we waited again. It took another 15 minutes to clear our appetizer plate and take our main course order of grilled salmon and a lobster tail. While waiting for the main course, we finished our drinks, at no time did anyone come by to ask if we wanted another drink, or anything else for that matter. When we received our main course, I asked the server if maybe we could get some water, which came promptly. The servers sidekick came by and gave the cursory 'how is dinner?' and that was it. We had no dessert, no coffee.......and I can guarantee they'll be on return.
One thing to bear in mind, if the restaurant had busy, some leeway could have been given to slow service, but it's telling to me that a Friday night at around 7:30 was approximately 40% empty. 
Decor nice, calamari appetizer bland and poorly plated. Main course had an interesting spin, was daily special (Haddock).  The front of house was very poor on all fronts. Lack of knowelge of bar offerings, poor attitude and lack of serving etiquette/training by wait staff set a poor tone for dinner. Being told that waitress had a feud going with fellow staff members when wrong drink was delivered by co worker was unprofessional. Training and staff management has been poorly done and this was evident in the low standard of service. Having three staff members chatting at the Hostess Desk on Saturday night when all tables  full and not working the rooms,   checking on the service neededs to be addressed by the senior management. We arrived early for our reservation, were told to wait in the bar, and then seated 20 minutes later at a bar table that had been open at our arrival. Overall, a bad experience and not worth a second chance!
Went to Westwood MA in search of the nearest Bonefish Grill since the one at Chapel View if Cranston, RI has closed. We soooo miss it!  The quality was the same, the service was good too, but we so liked the one in RI better! Less of a commute and a beautiful view of the Newport Bridge! We'll probably travel to Westwood to go again, but not as frequently as we have to RI.
I tried this place for the first time and had an appetizer of crabcakes, which were filled with crabmeat and really tasty and then  had a salmon dinner. Both the appetizer and the main dish were excellent and the portions were just right.
We've been here a couple of times now - it's fairly local and average price with some tasty dishes.

On our most recent visit, we came for Sunday brunch, 3 of us.

There's a running joke amongst us about how good the 'bang bang' sauce is. It comes in many varieties - on chicken and shrimp is how we've tried it. It's irresistible. The starter dish comes (either chicken or fried shrimp) on a bed of lettuce smothered in the bang bang sauce. Even after you've finished the shrimp/chicken, the remaining lettuce is hard not to touch.

After polishing off the starters (two dishes of bang bang chicken between us) we ordered from the Sunday brunch menu. One of us got the house burger with fries and the other two got different types of eggs Benedict. My partner got eggs florentine and I got (yes you guessed it) the bang bang shrimp eggs Benedict.

As on our previous visits, the burger was great. The sauce on the eggs Benedict (both the florentine and the bang bang shrimp) seemed to be separated, a little lumpy. Nevertheless, we ate it all as the taste is there.

Never ordered dessert on this occasion though there are again plenty of dessert dishes that look very appealing.

Despite what I've read in reviews before mine, the restaurant was almost full for Sunday brunch with couples, families and parties and the bar was also buzzing.

Service was great - we were congratulated on our engagement and got plenty of attention.

Will be back, if for anything, then it's clearly that bang bang. 
This place has the most friendly staff and their food is good. Mostly a take out place but does have tables to sit down as well. It does get busy during lunch time so plan ahead and they do deliver as well. 
The pizza was ordered for delivery, is was delivered in 35 mins., hot and in great shape, the delivery girl call when she showed up to make sure she was in the right location. The pizza was made with very veggies and had a lot of the toppings, the crust was just right and for a very good price, I will order from them again.
Now that Westwood has its own awesome outdoor shopping plaza, University Station, This pizza place needs more recognition!  Not only has it survived when University Ave was just miles of warehouses and distribution centers, it can now shine bright with its yummy pizzas, subs, and more!  More people should try this place.  They have a really good menu and offer a lot more pizza variations.  The hot dog & French fry pizza is absolutely delish!   Sounds odd but they make it extra good.  They pizzeria aromas once you step inside makes you want to keep coming back and try something else.  The staff is very nice and efficient.  Plenty of parking.  Right across from the plaza.  We're getting our Friday night pizzas from them tonight!  Love the way you can access University Station right off rte 128...exit 13 and straight down to their place.  C'mon everyone, give Famous Pizza a whirl...you won't be disappointed!
Good sandwiches, wraps and pizza. Smells awesome inside. Right on the main drag. Reminds me of a RI deli/pizza joint. 
They make an awesome Lobster Sandwich with different bread choices.
What truly stands out for me is that they do not use a lot of mayo and give lot's of Lobster.  I highly recommend that should you go and check it out.
I'm italian, and in my trip to the U.S.A i had to go to D'Angelo to test the pastrami, and it was the best i ever eat!
These are great sandwiches made to order.  Fresh bread, Quality fillings made as you request.  Wish we had them in Minnesota.
I had the #9 steak, cheese, pepper & onions,  and my Hubby had the Lobster.   We were both happy with our sandwiches and pleased with the service. 
My son and I visit every Sunday on our way to soccer practice.  Very attentive staff (but we are the only ones there) and my son is a picky eater.  The only place he'll get a meatball sub.  "This is really good Daddy."  I get the Thanksgiving sandwich w/gravy.  My favorite time of the week.
We've always been a Joe's fan but on a recent visit for dinner the food and service were not up to par.  I reported this on a previous review and was pleased to get a response from Jimmie, the Guest Relations Manager.  We decided to give Joe's another chance and we were glad we did.  I always make a reservation and we arrived on time and sat right down.  Our waiter, Matthew, was outstanding.  Friendly, courteous and informative, he had it all.  Drinks arrived promptly and the food was what we had come to expect from Joe's, well prepared and delicious.  Salads were cool and crisp, the pumpkin bisque was delicious and my southwest burger cooked to perfection.  Can't beat the peanut butter thing for dessert.  Joe - we'll be back.
I think they have finally got the groove going here at the new location.  We have been here several times and this Monday was the most enjoyable.   The new fall menu is interesting and has several healthy options.   The reservation system works well, no waiting if you reserve and the ambiance is fun but not overly loud.  Equally enjoyable for a couple, a family or a group.  The portions tend to be large so you may want to share or order accordingly.   Nice bar area, too.
We like not you average Joe's, it doesn't feel like the chain it is. Great outside seating and beautiful design inside. It is light and airy but feels warm. There were five of us and a nice booth. Food was great and loved the menu. $160 with food, drinks and tip.
I cannot say enough about how wonderful it was to have our family reunion dinner at Not Your Average Joe's in Westwood! We had some trouble finding a location for 20 people where we could be tucked away from other patrons of the restaurant and not be rushed. When I called this Joe's location a few weeks in advance, the person I spoke to recommended that we plan our event for 3:30 pm to avoid the dinner rush. We put in a reservation for our group and I explained that this family reunion included people from all over the country who would be getting together for the first time in several years. The day of our event, I received a call to confirm our reservation and number in our party. We arrived on-time and were quickly seated in the area of the restaurant that was divided by a partition. This gave us a feeling of our own private space. We had four young children in our group, and the space was perfect for them to spread out and move around. Our server, Dana, gave us all time to greet one another before checking in to see how we wanted to do our drink orders. Dana never rushed us and was very, very accommodating to everything that was going on. We ordered drinks, appetizers, and main courses for everyone in our party. Dana was very attentive to our group and very professional. The food was delicious! As we were wrapping up, we asked if someone would take a group picture for us outside. Our server was happy to help and then the general manager took over and was very patient as we all got organized for the photos. Overall, we all had such a wonderful time and would highly recommend this restaurant for group gatherings.
I'm not a big Joe's fan as the menu is not to my taste.  This Joe's however is right off the highway and is bright and cheery inside.  Nicely decorated and a little for everyone.
Been there few times, close to work, good for meeting after work.
Good drinks choices. Appetizers are pretty good, I must admit.

Outside sittings are also available.

No WiFi reception, else I would have given 4 stars.


We are fairly regular customers and usually enjoy the food.  Four of us went this past Sunday, had a reservation and sat right down.  Drinks were a little slow in arriving, no big deal.  I ordered the Southwestern Burger, medium rare.  Food took a very long time in arriving and when I cut my my burger in half I found it very well-done.  The tomato was the top cut which included the brown spot where the stem attaches.  The waiter stopped by and asked how things were.  I showed him the burger and he admitted it was not as ordered and offered to replace it.  As we had waited so long to receive out meals I told him not to bother.  Upon further discussion he admitted the kitchen and bar were "off a little" that night and took the burger off our check.  I appreciated that but the fact is there was no way that burger should have made it out of the kitchen.  Over done was bad enough but the top of the tomato, that part that everyone throws out, was inexcusable.
Servers are very good. Food is predictably good. It's a chain, after all. The atmosphere is very cool - with a well designed outdoor patio. Hard to believe that you are situated only yards from a route 128 overpass. There is absolutely no view when you are outside, but the open fire pits, pergola and comfy seating helps.  

My issue is the mood perpetuated by the restaurant manager.  He's smarmy and down right rude. He told our family that there was at least a 30 minute wait and did not offer a comfortable alternative (like, hey! We have comfy seating at the bar or outside July the fire pit!) when my elderly mom asked why the wait was so long as there were many open tables, his response was "you can sit where you want. No one will serve you for 30 minutes."  As a customer, I didn't appreciate his rudeness.  He could have explained what ever the situation was.  

I've been to this location before - eye rolling by the wait staff had been perfected behind the back of this rude individual. 


We were here when it first opened and I decided I wanted to go here for my birthday lunch with family. We allowed us to bring a cake and because I have celiac, I had a special GF lemon half moon cookie for me.  The manager Dana was super nice and took the desserts. We had 14 people and some arrived a little late so we ordered appetizers and drinks.  Our waiter, Ryan, was attentive and friendly.  The food overall was good.  Some dishes were better than others. I had the GF chicken piccata which was flavorful but a but dry and needed more sauce.  The hummus was lacking any flavor which was odd because it looked amazing.  The GF bread was amazing!!!  Glad they changed the recipe.  The meatloaf was a hit and the herb crusted haddock was very fresh and liked by the two people who ordered it.  We had a lot of requests or drinks, bread, more food and maybe could use a second waiter. Dana came by a couple times to check in which I thought was awesome.  It was when she reported to my husband that there was an accident in the kitchen where my GF lemon half moon cake was destroyed. AN employee was on something and fell off it and in doing so my dessert and other things were destroyed. Here is where they excelled.  Dana offered to send someone to Wegmans to get another one.  It was already dessert time and being a Saturday I didn't want to hold family up.  I said not to worry that it is best to use the cake for non celiac people and I will have sorbet.  She kept offering and if it was just me and my husband I would of said ok.  Dana understood how bad the situation was and it would be a story talked about to everyone who asks me how my birthday was.  She took my meal off and the appetizers and made sure my husband and I would go back and try them again. I have been in the hospitality industry most of my career and it is not the mistakes that make or break a business it is recovery of a bad situation.  Thanks to Dana, my birthday though disappointing on one level (not often do I get GF lemon dessert) she did everything in her power to help make it better.  That is why they get 5 bubbles.
Food was delicious, wait staff was prompt and friendly. Filled up on their amazing dipping bread even before the meal got to the table. Will definitely be going back 
I'm not usually a fan of chain restaurants, but we decided to stop in since it's brand-new. We were thrilled! The food was great the drinks were great, and it felt like a really fun place. We will be back!
This place is fine if you want less than a fine dining experience, but more than fast food. Their Thai Chicken Lettuce Wraps are good, although a little on the bland side for me. Their cocktails do taste a little watered down. Case-in-point is the Red Sangria I had there last week. FIlled with ice and not much taste. Works if you're meeting a group of people for lunch because they're all sure to find something to suit their tastes.
Lets face it, this chain is usually hit or miss but in this case, it was a serious miss and a horrible experience. The location sits in the new University Ave set of shopping center and it is a fairly new location which may explain the disorganized mess of a waitstaff and hostess station and the fumbling of tables and food. Friday night it was crowded but it is no excuse for bad service. All we came here for was a few drinks and appetizers and it was a disaster. Lettuce wraps were terrible and the nachos was a joke, plus the white sangria was so watered down, it tasted like ice tea and there was no way there was alcohol in these drinks. Waitstaff here could care less and the place needs to get its act together. I mean we aren't talking fine dining here, what is the problem? Your a mediocre chain restaurant for crying out loud. Skip this place and choose from the other bunch of restaurants in this shopping center!
Excellent Lunch -- about a mile each way from my client site -- so a nice noontime walk.  Interested in trying some of the other options.
The restaurant was open for about a month or so and it was surprisingly good.  I've eaten at other locations and was always happy with the food and service and I was not disappointed at the University Ave restaurant.  Service was EXCELLENT! Food was DELICIOUS!  Keep up the good cooking!
We come here for special moments. We celebrate anniversaries here. We celebrate birthdays here. The service is excellent and the food is wonderful.
This restaurant opened in 2016 in the new mall on University Ave in Westwood next to the train station.  The building stands alone, the open ceiling and buffering panels make conversation comfortable, the plethora of TV screens tuned to different channels give views to every choice, the waitstaff is well-trained and the food very well cooked.  This was our first time here, but we will be back.
Met for a farewell lunch for a colleague. Eschewed outside dining (not exactly scenic) for moderated indoor climate. 

Three of us ordered the salmon at different ranges of doneness and all were perfect. We each also tailored the accompaniments (I swapped out carbs for spinach, someone else swapped in cole slaw). NYAJ is very flexible in this way and for this, I replaced the stars I removed for the pork and the service and the deviled eggs. 

Our fourth ordered the pork tenderloin. Because it was sliced, it was easy to see that it was rare, not medium. After the food was delivered, our server never checked in with us and one of us had to physically carry the plate and find the server. She was apologetic. 

The meal arrived having been put pack on the stove for maybe 30 seconds. Still way too pink. Because the server didn't check in for a while and one of us was polite enough to have not eaten until our fourth was properly served, the fourth dug in, eating the most-cooked parts and the veggies, taking home the least-cooked parts to reheat (properly cook) later. 

For apps, we shared the watermelon feta salad because one of us has kidney issues and can only eat certain foods and he loves watermelon. There were 4 small chunks of watermelon, that's it. The watermelon should have been listed as an ingredient, not the feature. 

We also ordered the deviled eggs. They would have been delicious but some contriving crazy chef thought sprinkling tiny bits of potato chips (think: the nearly microscopic pieces you pour into your mouth from the bag, coating your shirt as well as your tongue, before you crumple up and toss the bag).

After a few minutes, the chips sogged out. Yuck. 

So, decent atmosphere, great menu, lacking service, quirky eggs.
Visited twice this month, once for dinner and once for lunch. We had drinks with dinner and all were delicious. I had the chicken caprese dish-fresh, flavor filled, my sister had the flank steak with chimichurri and a friend had the watermelon feta salad. Both reported they were excellent. 
We had a 1 year old for our lunch visit and our server couldn't have been any nicer. He brought his out as soon as it was ready and was very friendly. We had the Caribbean chicken fingers and salads (steak tip and one with grilled chicken). Perfectly prepared and presented. The raspberry lime Rickey's were light and refreshing. 
The atmosphere is inviting, warm, open and energetic. Plenty of parking and a wonderful outdoor area. Prices are reasonable and the service above average on each visit!
I expected our visit to NYAJ's to be mediocre and a 'restaurant chain' type experience. It was not! We enjoyed our meals tremendously (we both had chicken dishes and salads). The ciabatta bread and raspberry iced teas were delish, as was the desert we ordered. It is called "The Chocolate Peanut Butter Thing" and it was fantastic. We went on a Friday night around 6:00, just before it became super crowded and people had to wait for up to an hour who arrived shortly after we arrived. The outdoor patio is lovely, and the atmosphere is fun. 
Stopped in here on Saturday for a quick lunch before Wegmans' (otherwise we end up spending WAAAAAY too much at the Wegmans' hot food bar!).  I enjoyed the bacon cheeseburger, wife enjoyed the grilled chicken.  We had the fried veggies (carrots and green beans, no breading, just dipped into the fry oil for some stiffness and flavor) and were quite pleased with those, too.
Their food is good nice flavors but their hidden treasure are the milk shakes they're so good I'd go there just for them and their different flavors.
My wife and I went yesterday after I got out of work we never been here and her daughter suggested it to us so we tried to and I loved the place my wife thought it was ok when walking in I noticed that there were a lot of young kids it was a little confusing at first because we didn't know that you had to order then sit the girl Andrea or Angela that took my order was very pleasant and always smiled so we ordered my wife ordered a bacon chesseburger and I ordered a buffalo burger with a side salad and my wife got sweet potato fries  she got a diet coke and I got a beer  and it only cost me 28 bucks the burgers were cooked perfect the beer came with a frosty mug the funny thing is that I got carded when I ordered a beer they said that they check everybody's ID regardless of their age which is good but I think that the girl that brought me my beer was under 21 Witch maybe they should be careful of that but anyway bathrooms were clean and restaurant was clean great environment a bit loud  but ok we will definitely be back to try different burgers and things on the menu great job Smash burger ...... :) sorry about the pic forgot to take pic before I dove into it 
I eat here on occasion and the food is real good. However they get the orders wrong all the time. I get it to go and eat at my desk and get pretty upset when I get the wrong order.
New experience, I loved the smashed Buffalo Chicken Grilled Sandwiched with Veggie Frites. The menu is a little over whelming when you first come in. Grab the paper menu when you come in to make your choice as you are standing line. They do offer a Vegetarian Choice too. I am not a big Fan of McDonalds or Burger King but I do like SmashBurger now..... Wish there was one where I live.
My first brush with Smashburger was in Denver a few years ago.  The last two US trips were not in Smashburger territory so it was great to visit again whilst in the Boston area.  As I remembered, good freshly cooked burger with great sauces and hot fires.  Great staff, especially Eduardo, the manger, who made us very welcome.  I believe they are opening a branch in London (UK) in the near future. I expect it will be a tremenous success.  
Had the Spicy Jalapeno Burger with a side of Smash Fries. The burger was cooked medium (which is fine by me), but I was never asked what temp to cook my burger to. I  am assuming it should have been well done. Even though the burger was medium it had little to no beef flavor to it. It basically tasted like a frozen burger from any fastfood joint with no seasoning. The toppings on the burger seemed fresh and was about the only thing that had flavor. The bun is a more chewy type of bun, so if you do not care for that type of bun the whole burger will be a disappointment.

The fries are shoestring fries and they were very greasy. 

The staff was not bad, but see this place falling apart fast once the newest of the place wears out. 
Smashburger has more than just yummy burgers. First, their burgers are far superior in quality and taste (in my opinion) than those other burger places nearby. Plus, they have excellent grilled chicken and avacado sandwiches, in addition, they have fresh and delicious salads. They come in these huge salad bowls and are very tasty indeed. The fries are better than five guys by a large margin. I signed up for the smashburger coupons online because I think we will going alot this summer with the kids. Its not their fault they are busy because the way they shoved in 3 very popular restaurants (Panera, Chipotle and Smashburger) into a tight little corner of Westwood Station. Its poor planning on the developers part, no question. As to another reviewer who made some odd comparison to McDonalds is funny because they are losing major market share to places like Smashburger, Chipotle and Panera. I think the quality of their ingredients cannot compare to other lower end fast food places. Granted the prices are higher, but I am willing to pay for better quality ingredients. The portion sizes are not massive, except for the salads, but I am ok with the smaller portions. For me this places rocks and it's awesome having dining choices in this area. I just wish they would finish with the darn roads around this development. But hey, make up your own mind.
Calling this place a "burger joint" is like calling McDonald's a health food restaurant. Ordered a "Big" Truffle Mushroom Burger with grilled onions, got a half cold (even though I watched it leave the kitchen) hot and overcooked thin piece of meat (I assume) with cold toppings. The "grilled" onions may have been boiled, but they had no color from a grill and were a soggy mess. The sweet potato fries and the Stewart's Root Beer were the highlights of my meal as I went deaf from all the noise, loud crappy music, and yelling between staff.

If I was offered a free meal here, I'd give it to someone I didn't like.
First time we went, we left since the line was out the door, this was one of the first weeks they opened.  Returned mid-week when it was less hectic but still busy.  The menu was a bit overwhelming with all the choices so went with the Classic.  They deliver to the table and it was a little confusing with items arriving at different times. Overall the Classis hamburg was good, the fries were hot, not my most favorite since they were the "skinny"fries but they were good.  
One complaint was the staff seemed a bit confused and with the yelling out of orders, it was quite noisy.   Also took quite some time for tables to get cleared from the previous customers since it's not a clear off the table yourself place.   I'd go back but not on the weekends due to the high #'s.
Just another burger place that's popping up.  Burger patty was paper thin. Chicken breast was paper thin. I think they go a little overboard with the "smashing"! By the time you put the lettuce, tomato and other condiments on you could hardly see the burger. The fries were thin little strings too! Five Guys is way better.
These places are popping up like weeds in my backyard.  Shake Shack, 5 Guys, SmashBurger, Burgerfi. Tasty Burger is next...Can a Burger Lover get and In N Out up in here!?

I was excited to try this place.  The Burgers were excellent.  I still hold that I like Burgerfi in West Roxbury the best for the total experience, but these burgers weren't Burger Joint Burgers.  They were restaurant quality.  The fries were too greasy and like potato sticks more than fries.  The onion haystack was also very greasy.  The shakes were better than Shack Shack imho, but that's a matter of taste.  Next time I will get a burger and maybe try the veggies with ranch dip.  
Burgerfi, Smashburger and FIve Guys and Shake Shack in a tie for 3rd...
I got the baja jalapeno burger and smashburger fries. Taste-wise, it seemed like the burger was missing something. Jalapenos came plentiful with the sandwich but didn't provide any kick. The fries were ok, too greasy with the extra rosemary oil. My fiancee got the Butterfinger shake - tasted like vanilla with a hint of peanut butter. I think I'll stick with Shake Shack.
Their classic burger was fantastic, nice and juicy. Their buffalo chicken was a little thicker than expected given the thinness of their burgers. The fried pickles were probably my favorite of the sides, though the sweet potato fries were tasty, too. If you like cranberries, try their regional burger. Don't miss out on the shakes, especially the Oreo one.
Customized noodle dishes that runs the gamut when it comes to ethnic and flavor options. Great meal, great deal!
We recently dined at this location of Noodles & Company after arriving in town from the airport. The restaurant wasn't crowded and we placed our orders and were quickly served our food. Everything was clean and the staff were friendly. This a very family-friend dining establishment. They have lots of choices on their menu, and the food was tasty.
Enjoy the different noodle combinations.  Depending on who is behind the counter you can get a custom noodle dish or not.  Wish they had GF soy sauce. 
Ordered a large soup and they gave me the small size. Asked for less noodles and more pork and received the opposite. Flavor was decent. Very few veggies as well. Got my money back and will never return.
Good place for families to have a quick meal. Tastes very fresh. The small portions will eave the average guy hungry and the large leaves lots of left overs. 
Decided to stop in for dinner on the night of Saturday, May 14, 2016 while shopping in the area. The decision was based on a previous experience at a very well-run location in New York with excellent food. Unfortunately, this location was not only nothing like the location I've been to before, but it was an extremely negative reflection on the company as a whole because of how poorly it was run. 
Had my family's experience just been one where the service was slow because there was only one chef, I wouldn't complain so much. Sure, it wouldn't have been a five-star review in that case, but that was the least of this location's problems. 
Not only was service slow, but the staff was laughing and joking about their slow service as if they were wearing it like a badge of honor--directly in front of a full restaurant of hungry customers who were all waiting for food they had already paid for, meaning they weren't going to just walk out. Anytime anyone went to ask about their meal, they were greeted with attitude by members of the staff, and most of all, by the manager on duty. She was by far the worst of them. 
As we were sitting waiting for our food (had been about 15 minutes at this point), we saw her tape a sign she had typed up, on the doors of the restaurant, saying they were closing at 7:30 p.m. that night (hours are posted until 10 p.m. on Saturdays), with no reason given. People came to the door expecting to come in and order food and were turned away. Maybe they were the lucky ones though. 
When our food finally DID come out, after about 40 minutes of waiting, not only was one of the main dishes cold, but they came out before our side dishes. Then, two of the side salads that were ordered were wrong, and they forgot one of our soups. When we went up to ask about our soup that was missing, the manager snootily replied to us that there had only been an order for two, but she'd give it to us anyway (funny though, we saw the guy at the register ring it in three times and we PAID for three). 
We certainly weren't the only ones who dealt with this manager's horrific attitude. A family seated at the table next to us saw the adults have their orders come out, but their kids meals didn't arrive yet. The parents then finished their food, still with nothing for the kids. After an additional 30 minutes of the father patiently waiting for his kids food to come out, he finally went up and asked the manager where it was. Again the manager had a horrible attitude, replied to him with annoyance that he didn't order anything for them, and when he showed his receipt that clearly showed he did, she sighed audibly before instructing others to get the food to him. They then STILL got it wrong, and when we left, he was still arguing with them to get his food. 
Meanwhile, as noted before, the manager inexplicably put up a sign saying they would close at 7:30, two and a half hours before they were supposed to. We still did a little shopping in the area after walking out for ourselves and drove by on our way out, around 9:00. And the entire staff was clearly still inside, standing behind the counter, doing nothing. Not cleaning up or anything. Just standing there. To me, that screams employees who couldn't be bothered to continue doing work for the rest of the night, but made sure they would still stay in the building until 10 p.m. so they could be paid for their whole shifts, a.k.a. STEALING time and money from their employer. 
Do NOT go to this location AT ALL. Until the entire team that worked the night of Saturday, May 14, ESPECIALLY that horrendous manager has been FIRED, their service will be atrocious. They need to get rid of every last one of those people, and then bring in new people who are properly trained. I for one will NEVER come back when in this area again.
I recently started coming to Noodles & Company throughout the country. This no bells & whistles down to earth pasta eatery offers great tasting pasta dishes. Pasta as it should be, nothing over complicated. I had spent the summer in Rome, Venice, Milan and Florence where I consumed large amounts of pasta dishes, and eating at Noodles & Company reminds me of the pasta delights I had in Italy.
My personal favorite is the Steak Bowl.
First off, i will say the cashier could careless about customer service. Never being here before i asked to see the bowl sizes as you can pick a small or large size of your food. They had a large size bowl for me to see but no small. He said it was 4oz. I said i want to see one. No one would get one for me to see. 4oz is very small. Finally after a few minutes they found one. It was bigger than 4oz, more like 24oz or more. Time to train your staff people. 

We got the steak stroganoff small and the Indonesian peanut small. 

The portions were extremely small. Very little steak for $7.39. The sauce did lack flavor. Noodled were cooked well. But very little food. 

The other dish was $4.49. Again very small portions. Noodles were rubbery.

The small sized bowls look big but they put very little food in them. 

Basically there is no value for what you pay for.  It is sorta fast food but still. Anyway they do bring your food to your table. 

We will not be returning again. 
It was a quick, but delicious and filling dinner. The friendly staff brings  the food to your table, even though you order at the counter. You will not have to eat from disposable paper-ware either. 
The food at this casual fast-food style restaurant is strictly mediocre. The Pad Thai stir fry would be my relative favorite. 
Prices are average. 
Noodles is a chain designed for good food cheap and fast. This restaurant is in the Wegmans mall in Westwood.

There are about 10 noodle offerings and some mac & cheese choices, too, along with soups. You order your noodles a the counter, pick any add-ons like meatballs, meat sauce, etc. Take a number and find a table. Your meal is delivered to you. 
We both ordered a basic noodle dish (marinara sauce with pene, I had catapaldi (I know i got ha wrong) in a cream sauce. Both were good. Each came with either soup or salad. M wife got a tomato bisque (very good) I had thai basil (lousy). Each combo was $5.99. Not bad.

I couldn't help but wonder what $5.99 would get me at Wegman's food court. No noodles, for sure, but there is lots of other stuff. I suspect you can do quite well there for about the same price. With kids, head for Wegman's. Without, this is ot a bad place.
This place has awful service. The employees are rude and dismissive.
It's call noodles and company but they sell sandwiches and salads and soup .... We try the noodles ( super over cook ) salad with some old leaves and minimum effort!... My son had a sandwich and it was ok .... I think it taste better after he try my salad!
We are never coming back here. 
So many great options here and ability to vary the ingredients based on dietary concerns.  Love this place.
Ordered the Bangkok Curry Buff Bowl. The photo shows it full of spinach and veggies, and touts itself as twice the veggies without the starch, but it was barely one third full. In fact, I raided one of my friend's appetizer plates to put some cabbage in the bowl. Very disappointed and clearly a bait and switch thing. I would've complained to mgmt if I could have found him/ her.
Had some time before my train so decided to try a new place that I had heard about. Enjoyed a really nice lunch. Ordered the Japanese Pan Noodles. I would have preferred more veggies but perhaps next time! Lots of menu items, sandwiches, soups, pasta and of course noodles, including creating your own dish. Order at the counter and your food is brought to your table. Self serve on the sodas.
This place has only been open a couple of weeks and I was curious about what it offered.  At first I thought it was to be totally Asian, but that's not the case.  I was surprised to see the breadth of their menu plus calorie info-right up front!  Bonus!
Ordered the Pesto Cavatappi, small size and that was plenty for lunch.   It was hot, delicious with lots of mushrooms, pasta and pesto. It's nice to have a lunch that doesn't make you feel like you've overeaten.  Husband tried the Penne Rosa, thought he was going to lick the bowl.
Can't wait to go back since the menu is so diverse, I think the Japanese Pan Noodles are calling my name or perhaps the Bangkok Curry.  Too many choices means multiple trips.
By the way, the place was spotless, the staff seemed a bit frazzled but then again, they've only been open a few weeks.  They were also very friendly.
Stopped by after visiting Trillium Brewery on the advice of a friend. Glad we stopped. We only had the steak and cheese pizza but it was excellent! 
Went here on the recommendation of some clients. The place was busy as heck, but the staff were tremendous, keeping everything moving. The pizza was tremendous. Good quality ingredients and cooked to perfection. The wings were outstanding, rivaling wing joints. The char on the wings is crazy good, and they're moist and delicious. The Carmelized onions really work well with the wings. YUM!!
Good vibes in this pizza place!  They have good wings, great pizza, and TVs to watch the game.  Also have a cool outside area to sit at the bar.  The next time I'm back in canton and looking for pizza I will come back here.
Very loud inside food is good if you like pizza this is the place to go.  Right off the highway so it makes it the perfect place to jump off and on.
I went with my family, nieces and nephews.  I normally don't like chain restaurants but they have some good stuff here.  The chicken wings and cauliflower pizza was delicious!  Atmosphere is fun and the staff is friendly and professional. Worth the trip! 
Pizzatini  is strong and yummy.. pizza is very tasty... wait staff is awesome... parking is easy.. definitely  worth a stop in
Anthony's Coal Fire Pizza is my families preferred pizza spot. The pizza is a thin crust pie with a slight char on the bottom to give it some
character. Not going to lie it's great the next day for breakfast as well! They have a short cocktail menu with a great Italian margarita and a chalkboard full of local beers that fits the pizza menu perfectly. If pizza, wings, and salad is what you are looking for then this is the place for you! Bring your family and friends! The wait staff and the manager came over to talk to us about the food and dinner service which was great and well appreciated! 
Great atmosphere! Food was delicious - loved the garden salad and the pizza. Our server, Peter, was attentive and helpful! Outdoor fire pit was gorgeous- a perfect summer night! 
Far too expensive for what it was... Had an "ok" calzone -- nothing great -- took too long to get -- iced tea was a bottled product.  Won't be going back
My first visit at the request of my 19 year old nephew who has eaten here a few times.   We all enjoyed the pizzas we ordered.   The wait staff was the downfall of our visit.  The multiple twenty something waitstaff were more interested in talking with each other than waiting tables.  Not our loss, but the bar suffered due to their inattentive behavior.   I will absolutely go back because I loved the sausage and broccoli rabe pizza!
We did takeout pizza and it was awesome!  I did pick up the pizza and it looked like a very nice atmosphere and looked family friendly.
I went there with two friends.
The menu is weirdly written. You don't have a lot of interesting choices.
We ordered a meatball pizza (not the exact name) and an eggplant one with different beers.
The food was good although not excellent.
The service was fine.
The place itself is well decorated and has a nice american diner look with old pictures of celebrities.
The prices are a bit on the high end.
I would recommend if you're in the area and crave for some pizza.
The coal fired oven averages 900 degrees. That means that the pizza comes fast. It is an amazing thin crust tat is NOT sloppy. The sauce comes from plum tomatoes, hand squeezed in Italy. Our service was outstanding. Megan did a great job for someone just starting out. She is smart, attentive and charming.This is NOT a paper plate pizza shop. This is a restaurant that focuses on what they do best. The sport ambiance was not overbearing. We thoroughly enjoyed our pizza. We look forward to returning in the near future.
It was my first trip to Anthony's in Dedham.  I LOVE their pizza. Unfortunately the meal was ruined when a group came into the restaurant with a dog.  The dog was cute but I don't think it was sanitary.  The dog was on a long leash, and I noticed the people at the table feeding it scraps.  At least 3 of the wait staff stopped to scratch the puppy and then continue with their job without washing hands.  GROSS! When I complained at the front of the restaurant the waiters said, "Oh but he's so cute". Really? I won't go back there. It was a horrible way to end what started out as a wonderful pizza lunch.
I was excited for a coal fired pizza.  Wow- what  a disappointment!  The sauce/dough was poor quality and they gave us pepperoni- when we didn't ask for it (only discovered when we got home 10 min away).  YUCK
Server was friendly, explaining everything about coal fired food since it was our first visit. Also was quick to steer us to a smaller size salad when we were ordering a larger one for only two. Brought sample of wings while we waited. They were coal fired and not traditional wings but were good. The small size salad was plenty, fresh and crisp. The pizza was exceptional! Crust is thin with a slight char. The toppings, onions and peppers were also charred slightly, adding to the flavor.  The server was attentive, coming back to check in after beer, salad, wings and pizza. Also started a friendly chat about the visit. We were not disappointed with this stop (we had planned to go elsewhere) and will certainly return.
My wife and I went there tonight for a quick dinner. The service was excellent. The atmosphere is very good. They have just enough TVs to follow a sporting event but not overwhelming. The Italian salad was good and the baked chicken wings are excellent -highly recommended and deservedly so. 

We had the basic cheese pizza – it is cooked "well done" as advertised .We have been there several times since it opened last year and will be back again and often.
Located close to the Amtrak train stop in Westwood-highly recommend for dinner after getting off the train. 
The crust was very good but and it was fresh ingredients but it was kind of bland.  We had chicken wings too with the same theme.  It was cooked well but boring.  It was just plain chicken wings cooked no seasoning no BBQ sauce or any sauce.  The  onions on the side were not season or caramelized.  Very boring.  The cocktail was good.  It was okay but no yum when you bite into anything.
Anthony's lives up to its coal fired pizza claim as being hot!  Its hot, its crispy, flavorful, done right, and is what a traditional NY/NJ area pizza is all about.  We ordered the traditional tomato. mozzarella, basil pie, with extra sauce, and a mini meatball with ricotta and tomato  pie, along with an order of coal fired wings... no sauce served or needed!  Both pies were done to perfection, crisp, thin crust, and bubbly hot cheese and sauce... the four of us almost wiped out 2 large pies... if you like thin crust, well done pizza, with a variety of toppings, come to Anthony's Coal Fired Pizza.
Got out of my rig after a long day on the road in Shrewsbury, Mass, ended up @ Anthonys, & I will say the food was outstanding, the staff was absolutely superb, the atmosphere was so pleasant & relaxing, but the music that Anthony chose himself, as I was told, was just  awesome, I drive that big rig & am on my way to Orlando, where I will go to Anthonys again in Altamonte, but what a breath of fresh air, check it out ya"ll, you will not be disappointed, I promise, thank you to Jessica & all the staff for a wonderful experience, something that I never expected when I walked in, rarely do u get treated that well anywhere, 
Jimmie Bowery
This place is fast efficient and delivers great sandwiches for a reasonable price. We get their deliveries to our office and they are prompt as well as friendly. Also does good pizza and fries too. Typical old style lunch and dinner deli.
It's incredible how you can order one thing and get the complete opposite. Not only once, but almost every time!!!! Come one people! It's coffee, not rocket science. It's not even Starbucks! Terrible service. Unfortunate, because it's a great location 
bored workers over crowded over rated coffee always out of something poorly situated drive through is long narrow and rushed
It's amazing that you can ask for the exact same thing every day of the week and get something different every time. Ordinarily that would be exciting but not when you are looking to start your day out with a good cup of coffee. Sometimes it's bitter, sometimes it's awesome, sometimes it is so hot you can't drink it for 15 minutes. Other times when you ask for dark or one shot of cream, it is so light it looks like milk. 
Oh well. I will keep coming back because it is convenient. But...
Have been here many times before. The food is ok service is iffy but usually good. The food is reasonably priced and there are a lot of options. However they're very inconsistent and sometimes meals taste better at times than at others.
Service is inconsistent , some days great - others not so great. 
Food is mediocre - , reasonably clean like most corporate restaurants but definitely ready for a change up !

I have been looking forward to a hot buttered lobster roll all summer.  It was good, it was fresh, it was very sparse.  It barely covered the roll, and I came home hungry.  I will probably never order it again.
One of the worst places I have ever been ordered a lobster roll and it had nothing on it the Cole slaw was plain ,
I should have went down to McDonald's
The 99 is our go to meal that is reasonable with some good specials. Your those last minute "let's go out for dinner. We enjoy making up our mind while munching on their popcorn, at times a refill may be needed.  It is not that they are slow to serve, we take our time. I like the tips and tenders. Most customers would send them back because I like both well done.. My wife orders as most people do and it is cooked her way. At times I will order "to go" and they bring it out to your car. The restaurant is clean and many opt to ear in the bar area.
We have been to many 99's before, but this one seems to be the best around. Even though it was a Friday evening at 5:30 PM and there was a 30 minute wait we decided to eat the bar. The noise level was very high as we were next to the kitchen, but what we lacked in experience of dining, they more than made up for with our food coming out in a timely manner and my baked scrod and potato  were HOT. Other 99's have problems with hot potatoes but this one was really good and hot. Service was great and we had all the attention from the bar tender and then some. My friend ordered the baked shrimp and hers was perfect, done to perfection. They substituted 2 veggies for her potato and she was pleased with the food and the attention. Great food and great service.
This is a great spot to go for a casual dinner.  It's one of my go to restaurants.  It's been recently renovated and the bar area is huge.
Went here after the Patriot's game to get a bit to eat.  Not much else was open in the area.  The food was great.  They were very good about taking care of my food allergies and made sure the food was safe for me to eat.  We'll be back since we have Patriot's season tickets
The Nines has a very nice menu with excellent value.  We visit often and I especially like the tips and tenders combo.  Another treat my wife enjoys is the quartino size wine offerings.  The Canton restaurant has recently remodeled and things are looking good.
Within a few short weeks I visited this location twice and both times I had the hot buttered lobster roll for $17.49. I replaced the coleslaw with steamed broccoli. The hot dog roll is grilled and filled with large pieces of lobster. Nothing fancy, just good and simple food. It also comes with nice size crisp fries.

My food allergies and sensitivities are never an issue with this meal.

The first time around we have awesome service, and I'm sure it helped that one person in my party knew almost every waiter or waitress. The second time, sans said person, the server never brought us popcorn and didn't check to refill drinks.

The makeover is nice, there seems to be more room to move about. Booths came in different heights. Some are ground level while others require patrons to step up and into the booth. During both visits we opted for ground level dining.
My wife and I are always happy after a meal at the 99 in Canton. Thursday nights is trivia night in the bar but we just went for a meal in a booth in the dining room. The food is excellent. The service is great and they have recently remodeled. 
Always a great choice and a great meal.
During our vacation to Boston, we wanted to find a restaurant near Homewood Suites and during our internet searches found 99 Restaurant & Pub was located an easy two mile drive from the hotel. They had an excellent menu with lots of options in a family friendly price range. We were a party of two adults, a teen boy and a preteen boy. All of the staff we encountered were pleasant and the manager even visited all of the tables to ask how the restaurant patrons were doing.
Our server was Ryan. He was extremely friendly and quite good at his job.
Between the four of us we had the vermont cheddar cheeseburger, the country fried chicken dinner, the chicken parmesan dinner, and the chicken pot pie dinner. Our sons made their dinner into a three course meal by adding the soup of the day and a right sized dessert for 3.49. Which was quite a bargain as the soup would have been 3.99 by itself and the dessert was priced at 2.09 by itself.
The food was served quite quickly. The portions were large. My sons actually brought part of their meal home. All food was served hot, not warm, but actually hot. The chicken pot pie was still hot when we returned to the hotel and placed it into the fridge.
I have no qualms about recommending this restaurant for a family friendly meal on your trip to the Boston area.
I'm sure food snobs would put their noses up a bit here, but my family and I love the "99".  Their hamburger is one of the best in the area and their portions are huge.  It's a great affordable place to take the family as well.  They have a luncheon menu which is a hit with seniors (I know , my mom swears by it).  Nice staff and convenient location in Canton.
They have cut down on portions service is spotty really depends on the waitress
on average service from the kitchen is slow presentation sloppy and restaurant cleanliness leave a bit to be desired would give 2.5 if i could
This is my first time eating at this chain and I wasn't disappointed. The food was tasty and  and the service was good. They provide complimentary popcorn at the table which to me seems a little odd to me.I have never thought of popcorn as a pre-dinner snack but we tried it just so we could say we did, it was nothing special, just popcorn. For around $4 you can upgrade your entree and add a salad and petite dessert, I did just this and had the most delicious chocolate dessert, I am not really sure what it was but was delish!!! Overall it was a decent meal and good value.
Dropped in to the 99 Restaurant And Pub an sat at the bar to watch sports and have an app and a burger. Bartewnders on Saturday night are two ladies, Elise and Erin. (hope I spelt their names right), Elise took care of us right away. She greet us with a smile and she was very cordial and took our drink and food orders.

We opted for 2 Diet Soda with lemon along $5.18 for Both with 2 All Star Burgers which was done just right with the fries nice and crispy and hot $9.99 each For the App we had 4 Potato Skins and Buffalo Tenders Combo $10.99.

Free refills on the soda and everything was delivered fast and hot. Nice local bar with great service for the 2 ladies at the bar. Top Notch!

Tom O'Connor
The food and service were very good. Prices were reasonable and there were a variety of food to choose from. Recommend eating there if you get a chance.
Yes, it's a big chain restaurant, but I have to give it to the 99. They seem to have stepped up to the plate with tasty lunches and dinner plates pegged at prices that don't bust a budget. Servers are pleasant and helpful. Servers bring a bowl of popcorn to munch on. Look for the lunch and drink specials for extra value.
I never expected to have the best lobster roll from somewhere other than a seafood restaurant on the ocean, but I did.  I ordered the special lobster roll and got the clam chowder with it.  Best ever!!  We all had great meals and the service was great too.
We got there late. 9:30 pm so may be the cook had gone home. Person seating us assured us it was not late though. I ordered turkey burger and fries. The fries were cold. Turkey burger dried out and too brown on one side. I would have sent the meal back, but didn't have the time or energy after hard days work . Husband ordered club sandwich. He said was ok,but pretty hard to mess that up.  
Jenna's Place is an Excellent food concession in the Blue Hills reservation.  Joe and Sheila make wonderful food, including the best tomato sauce ever that they make with fresh tomatoes.  They are delightful hosts.  They serve a wide variety of menu items for a tiny place and everything we've tried has been top-notch.  We especially recommend their eggplant and chicken parmesan sandwiches and the meatball sub.  We like their food so well that we had them cater our wedding, and it was a huge hit.  They're seasonal, Spring to late Fall, don't miss them!
Great food,
Great people/service
Great scenery
Their menu is varied but if you don't see it on the menu they are more than willing  to accommodate 
The staff goes out of their way to make sure you have a pleasant experience 
Yes, the food was good.  I had a tasty veggie sandwich, although the small potatoe salad was a little odd -- potatoe bits undercooked.  And my son and our friend had large burgers and fries they said were very good.  But along with sodas, this cost me almost $37, which I think was outragious.  I feel totally blindsided, and upset about this, because I had assumed we'd be treated fairly, the cost would be no more than half this much.  I mean, that must be why we didn't see any other customers on a beautiful day at the park, which was filled with people, and when you'd normally expect for there to be a long line for concession-style food.
Blue Jays is an order at the counter sandwich shop.  Food is good.  Variety interesting.  Always a lot of vehicles here for lunch.
All u can ask for as far as local watering hole/place to eat. Comfort food with solid service and great staff and decent pricing...Job well done!
Every day on my way home from work, I drive by this place.  I always wondered about it.  And out of the blue, the Phantom reviewed it and gave it high marks.  So hubby met me there for a Friday after work dinner date.  It's definitely a local favorite as many locals stopping in for drinks and dinner.  Located just beyond an industrial park coming from Boston on a residential road.  Plenty of parking in back or out front if not too busy.  Its a seat yourself kind of place.  Wait staff very friendly.  The atmosphere jovial so it does get loud.  Nonetheless a good sign its a popular place.  The food is just as the Phantom mentioned...HUGE portions done right.  Comfort pub grub.  Menu has something for everyone.  I recommend trying the garlic bread fun-doo.  The cheese dip is out of this world!  And be aware the nachos are HUGE as well with plenty of cheese baked on every chip along with layers of toppings.  Truly a meal in itself.  Generous serving of Shephard's pie, the best around! Very affordable since you'll most likely take half your dinner home.  Highly recommend whenever you're in the mood for homemade comfort food.
The Village Manor has quickly become our local favorite. We try to come a couple times a month. We usually sit at the bar. The staff is friendly, the food is good, and the drinks are inexpensive! We love that we can play Keno here.
Been there many times, whether in large groups, small groups or couple,  service is always great.  Food is great also and menu is varied..offer great weekly specials and ongoing specials mon-Thurs like 1/2 price pizza and appts; $6 burgers, kids eat free night.... lots of TV s to watch sports or catch up on the news.
We were just looking for restaurants using our GPS, and came across this name in close proximity to the Blue Hills reservation.  (Another great spot!)

Didn't know what to expect... we went at around 2:30 so not lunch, not dinner, very quiet.  Think there was one other table occupied when we arrived.  The menu is pretty extensive -- Mexican, Italian, Asian, pub food.  Lots to choose from.

Portion sizes were huge... warm rolls & corn bread while waiting to decide... dessert was gi-normous, too!  Definitely a good portion size to share when you just want something sweet to end on.   

All the food was outstanding.  Our server, Brenda, was wonderful!  Truly a pleasant surprise.
This is a local bar with a lot of regulars.   I'll go there to meet up with some friends for a few drinks and grab a bite to eat.  Good food, great wings.   Bartenders are attentive and friendly.   Even if you are not a local, they make you feel right at home.  Very friendly atmosphere.   If you are looking for a low key night out with good food and beers, this is the place.  
The Village Manor is a great restaurant for lunch or dinner any day, the food and service is always great but I especially enjoy watching a Patriots or Bruins game here. They have great game-time food specials and the place is never over crowded so you can watch the game from any of their many big screen TVs.  Another nice touch is you will often see the husband/wife owners walking around and talking to the guest, I've always like that person touch in a restaurant. 
I have eaten here a few times - and always had a good meal. This visit I had the shepherds pie which was very tasty and came with a salad - for only 12.95. My friend enjoyed her french onion soup and salad with steak tips. The staff are all very friendly. 
A great local spot.
The only potential downside - you enter and leave through a very noisy bar area.
This was an impromptu stop while on a date:  We arrived mid Sunday afternoon so there was nobody there.

In short: the turkey tips were not dry and cooked thoroughly.  The sauce was of the bottled type I believe and rather sweet.  I ordered the broccoli and asked beforehand if it was fresh so maybe that is why I got (2) servings worth of fresh broccoli.

The only disappointment was that they have this great outside deck but are not allowed to have seating there.

For the two of us (she had the quesadilla) with a Sam Seasonal and a coke (free refill) was a total of $34,94
Had my 2nd visit to the Manor for lunch last Friday. I had the Cobb Salad and my friend had the Cesear salad with Steak tips. We were two happy customers. Both salads were excellent. Huge portions and everything was very fresh and crispy. The steak tips were huge. I really like this family style restaurant. The service was excellent also. Glad they are open for lunch on Fridays! I will be sure to vist again!!
I went here with colleagues after work for an outing we had planned. Katie was great at helping us organize the night ahead of time and the service all night was attentive and friendly.  the mile high nachos were great! I would come again for some casual drinks.
Went here on a Saturday night and it was dead, which was good because we could sit down right away but bad because we didn't want to stick around for drinks afterwards at the bar. I wouldn't suggest ordering a salad, it was basic iceberg lettuce with some shredded cheese and lumpy balsamic dressing. The quahog appetizer was actually really good and I would order that again. I ordered a scallop and shrimp casserole type dish, it was good but not amazing. My boyfriend ordered a chicken and pasta dish with mushrooms that was actually really good but I bet it had 1/2 stick of butter in it. My gin and tonic was strong so that was a nice surprise as well. I would come back and give it another try! Good value.
The Village Manor has had more than a few owners over the years. We have gone there off and on over the last 9 years and the food is good enough to make you return. The bar area is very loud and the addition of TVs to the dining area was not welcome but the staff are nice and the food is well done and fairly priced so that keeps us coming. You'll enjoy a nice meal and a pretty varied menu too.
Have been a few times once for dinner and a couple of times for drinks food was great the servers are friendly very comfortible atmosphere.
The Village Manor is mostly a pub-style bar (entertainment on certain nights)...but if you walk through the bar area to the back...there is a dining room with seating for about 50-60 people (tables and booths).  We had a very nice and efficient waitress.  One of us had the mixed grill with mashed potatoes (real mashed potatoes) and I had the broiled haddock with rice as a side.  The rice was inedible and I sent it back in exchange for the potatoes.  The waitress admitted that the rice was flavored rice from a box and that they didn't get orders for it very often.  The haddock was one of the best broiled versions I have ever had and for this alone, we will return to the dining room at the Village Manor.  It was a completely positive experience.  We were actually looking for another restaurant from years ago (in the same area) and happened upon the Village Manor...it was a great find.
What child or "young at heart" person wouldn't like this place?  It has the charm of days gone by--dining car on the railroad.  We first came here with our older grandson some 10 years ago and just took our younger grandson for this fun experience and great food.  We met the owner, Tom, who is the fantastic cook creating the great dishes such as the Railway Cafe Special consisting of homemade round fries, an 8" pancake, omelet and chourico--it was enough for two people and our grandson devoured it (don't know where he put it?!?).  This is a fun dining experience, ample portions at reasonable prices and you don't have to be a kid to enjoy it.
Small local Breakfast joint. formally a railroad dining car. Reasonably priced breakfast with a varied menu
This place is in an old Dining Cart just off 195. It is small. So get there early (might have to wait outside on the weekends...).

The food was outstanding. Big portions for about $10 a plate. I definitely recommend the "Conductor" dish. It has everything and you won't be disappointed.
Excellent breakfast....
Best pancakes in town. Always great specials and an extensive menu.
Staff is quick with service and very friendly.
Must visit.....
I liked the convenience of this restaurant, I do like the idea of eating in a "train car".  The décor is very quaint.  The food was pretty good, the service is friendly.  Very clean restaurant.
Quick seating.  Quick service.  Great food.  What a great little place. Railcar takes you back in time. Will be back when we're in the area.
So my boyfriend and I always have breakfast at Family Ties which by the way is a great breakfast spot, but today until January 2nd they are closed.We figured we would try out Railway Cafe since we had our eye on the cute place for awhile. Upon arriving the young girl who seated us was very sweet, but once at the table the two coffee mugs had lipstick marks and cloudy stuff stuck in the mugs, we had asked for new mugs for our coffee which wasn't a problem and we got new mugs with again lipstick stains and white cream stuck on the mug. The food arrived and it was just okay my french toast smelled like wet dog (I did not finish my meal). When the bill came we had asked for the coffee to be taken off, because the cups were dirty and we did not drank the coffee, the owner is brought out and makes a loud fuss in the restaurant about the coffee mugs are not dirty, but couldn't explain what was on our cups and says "I'll take it off this time, but not next" (while yelling it through the restaurant) very unprofessional, I will not eat there again. 
The food is always made fresh and the service is fast.   You can get anything from a great breakfast to a great lunch.  They usually have homemade soups in the colder months, but have specials usually every day.  The atmosphere is great as you are seated on a train.  The restaurant is very clean and the service is fast.  You also can get a gift basket made up for any occasion consisting of bagels, fruit and muffins, etc.  The price is reasonable.  Definitely a place to try out if you are in Somerset and you want a quick, good inexpensive meal.
My wife and I look forward to the weekend so we can go to the Railway Cafe.  It is actually a reconditioned railway car that has been refurbished in fine fashion.  The breakfast that we order is always done to our satisfaction.  The service is spectacular.  We even went to a special Valentine's day dinner that they had last year and it was special for us.
We had breakfast at this establishment on a weekday around 11:15 a.m.  This restaurant serves breakfast and lunch and closes around 1:00 p.m. to 3:00 p.m. depending upon the day of the week.  You can order breakfast food right up until closing time which is a nice feature.  The cafe is in an old railway car which can seat 42 guests.  Most of the tables are set up for groups of 4.  Above the tables, there are baggage shelves that contained small suitcases and other old items.  There is an old-fashioned refrigerator closet along the wall which holds the cold drinks.  The cafe is handicap accessible via a ramp at the end of the railway car.  There is not a lot of room, however, between the tables in the railway car, but I would assume that accommodations would be made for a wheelchair. The breakfast menu had a great selection and featured some items that are unique to southern New England such as chourico and sweet bread.  The prices on the menu are very reasonable. The items ordered by our group were fried egg sandwiches on sweet bread and the crunchy cinnamon French toast.  We also had side orders of the home fries and the potato wedges.  Everything was delicious and served promptly.  Although we did not have lunch here yet, the lunch menu featured salads, wraps, burgers and sandwiches.  Gift baskets can also be purchased as gifts, and they range in price from $49 to $99.  The baskets include bagels, mini muffins, spreads, coffee and tea.  We would definitely like to return to this establishment.
An old fashioned railway car. Great atmosphere. Very clean. We have been here several times, and will go back again and again.
My friend and I drove to somerset on a whim and found this on trip advisor. So awesome! Great food, great service and great atmosphere! The owner was there when we walked in and talked to us for a while. She was super nice.
What a place......
Simply fantastic !
Everything is outstanding !
The selection, taste, service, cleanness etc .......
Louis and I went to Somerset Creamery.
Address is:1931 Grand Army Highway Somerset, Mass. 02726
Telephone number is: 508 672-5510.
Starting Labor Day fall hours are: Sunday through Thursday 12:00 P.M. -9:30 P.M.
Friday and Saturday 12:00 P.M.-10:00 P.M.
Somerset Creamery has two other locations besides the one that we went to.
Prices are different depending on what You order: cones, cups, etc.
Louis and I had a two scoop ice cream sundae with pistachio and grape nut ice cream,
hot fudge topping, nuts, whipped cream, and a cherry.
Other toppings that they have are; caramel, strawberry, peanut butter, and pineapple.
We found prices higher than we expected.
The ice cream was very good.
There are places to sit outside, but no tables.
Our ice cream was melting so fast, we got some of it on our clothes.
Water and soda are available for $1.50 in a machine.
The young lady that waited on us was very nice.
Thank You.
Delicious homemade ice cream.  Don't be put off by the long lines.  Service is fast and friendly!  The only downside is it is a little pricey.
Historic place for ice cream in SE Mass! Only critical thing I can say it is time to allow payment by mc/visa, I get no Amx or DC, but for the higher price we pay, this would be fair.
Homemade ice cream!!! Nothing else compares! I love the seasonal offerings at Somerset Creamery.  My favorite is Cranberry Bog. Yumm-large juicy cranberries, walnuts and dark chocolate chunks. My other seasonal favorite is Indian Pudding. Not offered just now. May be here in September! Uniquely awesome!
Cannot go wrong here!!! Every flavor is great! 
I really don't have anything to add to the excellent reviews and ratings they get primarily  for ice cream and drinks like floats, shakes and malts.  A few years back, they added a second location about 2.5 miles away on County ST, Rt 138 to supplement their original location on Rt 6.  No difference whatsoever in the menus, just better parking and shorter waits at the County St store.  From their Rt 6 store, follow Rt 6 eastbound for 1.5 miles, turn left at 4th light (where roadway becomes divided ahead of the stretch with no exit before bridge), turn right at next traffic light (onto Read St) and left at next light onto Rt 138.  Somerset Creamery is about two blocks north on right opposite Auclairs Market.
Nuts, chocolate, and cranberries in creamy vanilla ice cream  Friendly staff, nice porch to sit on and enjoy your dessert.
It's homemade so it is so creamy.  They have lots of flavors to choose from & my favorite is Cranberry Bog.
This is the best ice cream ive ever had.The assortment of flavors are perfect from old school to new.Try the blueberry pie ice cream its amazing.
The best home made ice cream ever. The staff is always smiling and pleasant. Great selection of flavors.
Great ice cream homemade !  lots of crowds on those warm summer nights. is worth the wait. freshly made waffle cones and bowls is an added plus
Somerset Creamery ice cream is the best in the area..hands down.  Have tried homemade ice cream in several states and none compared to the richness of Somerset's product.  It's expensive but worth the price...a special treat. Like another poster I'm hooked on Cranberry Bog, LOL!
This is the best ice cream shop around. The owner has a few locations but the product is always great!
I am so hooked on the Cranberry Bog ice cream that I can't bring myself to order anything else.  I need help !!  LOL !
the ice cream is excellent and worth the price . they have a lot of different flavors hey have one place on RTE 6 at the Swansea line and the other one is on Rte 138 north
We have been here many times, and the ice cream has always been excellent. Best ice cream in the area, why go anyplace else? You know you want it, you know you will love it, ......recommended!!!
Kahlua Chip is the best. Prices are expensive but it's worth it. Long lines at times but most of the time there are plenty of staff to help. Always go to the one on County St. 
There are other places to go, they're cheaper, more well known (by name) and have big followings.  But Somerset Creamery blows them all away.  Why would I go pay $6 to get something from a carton I could buy at the local grocer?  Somerset makes their own and you can tell.  If it's a really hot day, expect to be waiting in a line, smelling the wonderful waffle cones and studying a huge menu of options.  Since the cream content is very high, this stuff melts in no time, so bring or get extra napkins and plan to have sticky fingers from some of the tastiest cones around.  There are even some sugar free flavors, though not many.  Hopefully they work on that.
Chocolate mint Is the best here. Also the peanut butter cub sundae. I really wish that they were open all year 
This is a super place if you like a wide variety of flavors.  There's often a line on really hot days, but it usually moves pretty quickly. Service is friendly.  Not cheap, but the ice cream is great!
We all know that Dels is the best drink in the Summer, so I'm very lucky that I have a store right near my house!  Georgia was GREAT !  Big smile, very polite, and got me hooked on the Dels grapefruit ...fantastic!  I'll be back, hopefully she will be working!!
This is a great little shop. Friendly staff and always very good product. Very good flavor and probably one of their better shops!!!
This location always skimps on the flavor. I'm comparing with two different Del's locations. Perhaps it's due to it being franchised, but this truly is the worst Del's we have had. No matter the flavor. You're better off driving a few miles down to Warren RI (Rt 103), and getting a really good cup! We're never disappointed at that one!
I just got married at the Venus de Milo and it was exactly what my husband and I wanted! Of course the food was amazing but on top of that, the people were kind and super helpful during the planning stages and the atmosphere is so elegant and beautiful. Wonderful ceremony outside by the water and a fun dinner and reception inside. 5 stars!
We visited on A Saturday night kind of late.  Before we could open the door a woman opened it and welcomed us in. We were then greeted by a young Gentleman Monty. He asked us if it was our first time, then preceded as we walked towards our table to give us some history. He gave us a few choices of tables to choose from, which I thought was a nice touch. We sat were given the menus and Monty let us know they had a new Chef, who revamped the menu with the exception of 4 items he wasn't allowed to touch. The House famous Minestrone Soup. Award Winning New England Clam Chowder and their famous signature Lobsters. There was a fourth but if he told us I didn't hear. Visions of Lobsters were dancing in my head!!!  

  Monty listed off some of his favorite appetizers to try and also let us know he was quite knowledgeable in wines if we needed help choosing the right one. He highly suggested The Bacon Skewers for an appetizer. As he was describing it, my mouth was watering. A very pleasant woman came to our table next. Monty introduced her as Sherry our Server. Sherry gave us some more info about the restaurant told us her favorite App was also the Bacon Skewers, said they were marinated for 24 hours and served with a Sweet & Spicy Aoili over a bed of pineapple Cole slaw. We said yes please. We ordered a cup of The Chowder which I am from New England and have had it from almost everywhere and it was hands down the best. Sherry took our drink order put in our app and gave us time to decide. We both decided to get The Baked Stuffed Lobsters Grilled Asparagus I was torn on my second choice. Sherry suggested the cheese Potatoes. Our Appetizer arrived along with some freshly baked bread that tasted like it was roasted Rosemary thyme and garlic Foccacia, served with a garlic Parmesan Cheese dipping oil. Monty & Sherry were so right the Bacon melted in our mouths. Out of this world. Our main course arrived perfectly timed after our appetizer plates were cleared. It was picturesque to say the least. The inside of our lobsters were over stuffed with lobster in a rich buttery cracker crumb blend. The asparagus were roasted just right still crisp and my cheese potatoes were amazing. There was so much lobster on the inside I couldn't even attempt to eat the claws or the tail. Sherry boxed it all up nicely and I have round two for the next day. I can't say enough except I can't wait to return. 10 stars and 10 thumbs up just simply aren't enough. Thank you Sherry & Monty for going above and beyond. We didn't feel like just diners we felt like welcomed guests!!  Highly recommend your restaurant!!
OMG - The baked-stuffed "lobsaa" was the best I ever had. A tad pricey but worth every penny. Service was excellent and atmosphere was pleasant. My date had a baked stuff shrimp dish which she thoroughly enjoyed. Sides of delmonico potatoes and snap peas delicious.
We had a table of 10 and enjoyed a good meal along with attentive service.  We paid our own checks and we had the following: 1 Short Ribs, 1 Lobster Roll, 1 glass of wine, 1 coffee, and 1 Sambuca.  Our bill came to $64.
The Venus is great. People from all over ma and ri know about the Venus. Best baked stuffed lobster and the best minestrone soup around the area. You can't get any better. It's been up and running for years and it never disappoints. Great staff always and the food is to die for 
Beautiful setting but the food was not up to par. Overpaid for overcooked lobster, and a plain prime rib. Clam chowder was good, server was excellent. 
 Only place to have baked lobster.  Have been going for years.   The house soup.  Great food all around.   Love this place.......
My parents always dined and went to functions here with the Sons of Italy and they all raved about the food and huge bake stuffed lobsters.  I always enjoyed the lobster salad and homemade lobster sauce my Italian mother would make ALL the extra lobster that she brought home.  Curious and finding ourselves in the Swansea area, my wife and I finally took the opportunity to try it out. Long and short, our food and experience was excellent and we plan to return.

It was a Saturday so we phoned from the car to check on the wait.  We were told, at the most 20 minutes.  We arrived and within 10 minutes, we were seated in a comfortable booth.  We started with a Ceasar salad... Having discussed some menu options ( the 3.5 lb baked stuffed lobster and prime rib), the waitress was nice enough to tell us to start with the small Ceasar and if we wanted more, they would make it a "large"

Didn't need more and glad she stopped us from ordering the large.  I ordered the 3.5lb baked stuffed... delicious and my wife had the Prime Rib, delicious too.  we split a creme brulee for dessert.... yummmmmmmmm.  We could not have been more pleased.
 One of the best restaurant in the area. Noted for its' baked stuffed lobster and minestrone soup it is a "Do not miss" restaurants in the ares.Great New England clam chowder.
Best baked stuffed lobster in the country. Even Emeril raves about this place. Prime Rib is out of this world. Pricy but worth it
I have been coming here for 30 yrs.once a mo.last time and this time poor.baked stuffed lobster 212 lbs . cutting way back on lobster stuffing. I tell the waiter boil the claws,they dont.bill total 140.for that price it should be a good lunch. Poor poor.wont be back ever .Larry Blacker onset.

Have eaten here for lunch and dinner many times over the last ten years.  For a long time it was always fine and sometimes excellent for both lunch and dinner.  More recently it seems to be hit or miss.  Lunch used to be a good meal and a good value.  Lately people have not been overly happy and their lunch crowd has diminished considerably.  For dinner. we usually go there for their baked stuffed lobster and that has been the best.  The remodeled dining room and lounge is attractive and comfortable and the staff fun and attentive.  Looking forward to its return to it "best self".
Venus has the capacity to put on "functions, parties, dinners, etc." and do them very well.  Unfortunately, for my family, this includes dinners after a funeral.  They are most sensitive to the family needs and truly put on a pleasant and delicious and comfortable event.  They have several well-known dishes that are always favorites.  Their vegetable soup and Delmonico potatoes need to be ordered, you'll like them.  The staff is very professional and friendly.  Yes, we do recommend it.
One of our favorites. Always a great meal! The service is as great as the food! Love the lobster saute! All the lobster, none of the work!
Was very excited to have the baked stuffed lobster I have heard so much about. The lobster, though pricey, was very good but the sides left much to be desired. The broccoli was blah...plain and the au gratin potatoes were the same, no seasoning. Service was terrible and we waited 40 minutes between our bread and our dinner. Plus our occasion was not acknowledged. Will not return, there are too many other Resturants in this area that are exceptional. Its all about flavor and quality both of which were lacking. 
Venus is a great restaurant for anything you choose.  It is great for weddings, gatherings, functions, or just for having a dinner out.  The staff is ectremely attentive and the food is always excellent!
Went for the baked stuffed lobster for anniversary  delicious  got the medium size pricey but the best lobster around good for special occasions the only thing that bugs. me is they  surcharge for the special potatoes  only 99 cents but for 58$ could throw in  could throw in a salad too! they have more reasonably priced items on a p re betty diverse menu
We have dined here several times baked lobster excellent soup either clam chowder or minestrone excellent prices reasonable for nice restaurant service very good if in area check it out you won't be sorry
Great atmosphere and service. The minestrone is soooo good my fav! The lobster is great as well perfectly done!
I recall going to Venus for special occasions (not counting weddings and other group functions) and always enjoying the soup to nuts treatment even though the dining room then had as much ambiance as a cafeteria. Now, the Empire Grille is a nicely appointed dining room but I feel something has been lost. We've been several times in the past couple of years, most recently last weekend. The Venus Soup was as tasty as usual though the noodles were mushy. My wife had the baked stuffed lobster and loved it. I had the chicken carbonara which offered more than I could finish but was nothing to look forward to the leftovers of. A nicer dining room but poorer service and overall experience is how I'd describe it.
I've been coming here for years, though not frequently. It's always a treat, literally. There is soft-serve and hard ice cream, cones and sundaes, as well as other confections. I've found the soft-serve ice cream to be tastier than most, as it's always creamy and not grainy/gritty/crystally, as some ice creams can be. Thumbs up!
I've only tried their soft serve ice cream. I'm hooked. Whenever I'm in the area, I have to stop by and get one. The ice cream texture is just so perfectly creamy. I've never had any other soft serve that comes close to their flavor and texture. I wish they had a solid coffee flavor, but the coffee & cream flavored is the next best thing. Their machine has an attachment that flavors the ridges on the ice cream twist. Once (only once), I got a hint of the previous flavor dispensed at the bottom of the cone. I've also only bought the large size and feel it is generous.

There is limited outdoor seating.
Their ice cream is very creamy and they have both soft and hard ice cream.  For a treat bring home a few ice cream chocolate pie desserts to have on hand when you get the urge!
For any occasion or just because... Get an ice ceam cake from here. It's priced right and is freshly made on the premise
Driving home on 195, and searched fast but good restaurants. This place came to right up. Nothing fancy, but Chef's Chowder House is terrific. Friendly waitresses, nice owner. They actually ran out of clams but the owner ran out for more right before we got here. Took no time at all to bring out fresh, tasty whole-bellied fried clams. Clam chowder was tasty, could have used more clams, but very good nonetheless. 
This a little resturaunt that's been around for many years and apparently does a lot of takeout business. There is also a small dining room. I have been wanting to stop in for years and today we had lunch inside. It's got a great menu for seafood and we tried the clamcakes and chowder special along with lobster rolls. The clamcakes were delishous and the lobster was fresh on a hotdog roll. What I was surprised about was the clam chowder. It was thick with clams and potatoes but had some kind of a "canned flavor" to it. I expected an award winning chowder taste and it fell short. That was disappointing to me and in addition to that, the dine in service was quite slow, but the waitress was friendly.
Based on the recommendation of a local, we tried Chad's.  We chose to eat-in.  Be aware there is limited seating, but we had no problem getting a seat.  I ordered the chowder and clam cakes as the appetizer and then had a clam roll (with bellies).  My daughter got the fish sandwich.  Everything was great.  The clams were cooked just right.  The clam cakes were moist and had good taste.  The piece of fish that came with my daughter's sandwich was huge.  No room for desert.

This was my daughter's first experience with clam cakes and fried clams with bellies.  She loved it!

I would go there again.
Little hidden gem.....route 6 little place dine in or take out. Clam cakes and chowder are the best around. Their fish and chips isn't bad either. 
We had not been to Chads in a couple of years but stopped by for supper on a Friday night. They do a lot of take out and have two small dining rooms to eat in. We ordered the Calamari with peppers and marinara on the side, Clam Cakes and each a bowl of Clam Chowder. I found the Calamari to be pretty much tasteless, the marinara sauce was pre-packaged, cold and not much help. The chowder was thick, creamy and as good as I remembered but the clam cakes were disappointing. Seems I recall enjoying the clam cakes here years ago. oh well, at least the chowder is still good.
The locals know the places to eat. Ask anyone in the local area where the best seafood is and they will say "Chads". It is located in Somerset, Ma on route 6 just off I195. They have an extensive menu or seafood ( fried clams, shrimp,scallops and fish) always cooked to perfection. Their prices are reasonable and they have good size orders. They also have a limited amount of traditional American food. They are famous for their clam chowder and seafood bisque. They have won many cook off contest in the New England area and voted BEST chowder and bisque in the entire area. The building they are in is small and most orders are for "Take out". There is limited seating. Stop in, you will not be disappointed.
The chowder and clam cakes are very good. The seafood is always fresh. The desserts are nothing fancy.
The worse part of Chads is deciding what to eat as it is all soooo good. The chowder is the best, I guess that is why they won best chowder. The scallops, fish all great. This is one of those places that if you look at it driving by you may say no it does not look good, you would be very wrong. It is top food served in a small place next to a car lot and it is worth the stop. Make sure to have chowder and if you have room the clamcakes, which I lived closer.
The last time  I ordered from here I had take out  clamcakes, (had funny taste) so gave them to my sister. While sitting at counter noticed dining area could be much cleaner and updated.
I come back to Somerset and back specifically to Chad's because of their outstanding clam cakes.  Now, everyone may have their own understanding of what clam cakes are, but as one who grew up with Rocky Point and their incredible clam cakes and chowder understand where I am coming from.  Their original (not the Portuguese style clam cakes, I am not a fan of those) are the very best and cannot be duplicated or beat.  The restaurant itself it set up a little odd, and the restroom is in an even odder location, but the food is good and, well, the clam cakes are incredible.  Their clam chowder is great also.  I wish they would remodel and make it a more standard, "normal" restaurant but it is what it is and the food is still great.
I wouldn't say its out of the ordinary but if your driving by stop in try the food, I found there fish and chips very good !
Been going there since it opened. Their clamcakes and chowder are excellent. Everything else, including their prices, is not. Prices are going up and quality is going down. Thinking maybe they are relying on their reputation a little too much. Sad.....right now I'd say Capt Seajays beats them by a mile for fish......in quality, quantity and price.
They have won numerous awards for their chowder and clamcakes but I am really hooked on their lobster rolls!
Chowder sucks,one small piece of clam in the "clam cakes"....should be called batter cakes.......they suck!
Very affordable. Seafood Bisque is wonderful; but filling. Good lobster roll. On weekend however they run out of 'baked stuffed scallops'. I really wanted that! You won't be hungry. 
The food is good, the chowder is the only great thing. I will never go back due to the owner being extremly rude and speaking down to her customers. The customers are always right do not apply here. I am just amazed on the poor service by the owner"president" of this dinner. The prices are not that reasonable either the owner told me she doubles what is cost to buy and make. 
I ate at this place because its near brayton point. I ordered a bowl of clam chowder and some baked haddock. The chowder was excellent. The fish was okay. The sides were okay as well. It was fairly busy at noon. I would cme back again. Make sure you have cash because they're not set up for leaving a tip on the credit card. 
We were going to get take-out from another seafood restaurant, but they were closed on Sunday evening, so we ordered from Chads.
They were good, but the quality and quantity is not as good as some of the other local seafood places.
Chowder was good, but not great.  Clamcakes are a bit small - try the portuguese clam cakes - with chourico in addition to the clams- they were very tasty.
The fish and chips was again good, but not great.  The portions were small based on the price.
Not our favorite, and we will likely not return.  Next time, if our seafood place is closed, we'll get pizza.
I have been going to Chads since the restaurant was located on County St.. I usually get the chowder, clam cakes and fried clam combo. The stuffies (stuffed quahogs) are really good too. . The clam cakes could have more clams, but the chowder, makes up for that. It's simple but so tasty. Creamy thick but almost light, with these perfectly cut potatoes and lots of tender clams. So good! 
Always visit this when we are in this area! Great fried clams and chowdwr
As usual this is a very good Subway. The ingredients are always very fresh which makes for a great sandwich
they say you get what you pay for. pre-sliced deli meats. very thin tasteless. even with double meat it's mostly bread so 0ver priced. with local sandwich shops in the area why would you even go here 
after the man years of stopping in especially for breakfast,, the place has closed it's doors and was bought out by Five Guys.,,,sorry folks was a very nice place, old time Rock and Roll establishment,, going to be missed.
I went back to try the restaurant based on the response from the manager.  I did notice a change this time.  The place was busy (good to see), the staff seemed new.  The menu had better selections and updated menu selections.  The waitress was friendly and attentive.  The food was not bad.  I didn't care for the home fries at all, although they were a generous amount, I left almost all of them.  They had a bland taste.  The eggs were done as I requested, the coffee was good.  All in all I see an improvement and will go back again.  I think they might need an extra waitress or two to handle the customers.  A friend of mine was there and said they were there an hour and a half , waiting for breakfast while they seated for an hour.  Thank God we didn't wait that long!
New management? New owners?  I don't know, though there's definitely some new (and interesting) items on the lunch/dinner menu.  We arrived for breakfast a little before 10:00 AM and finished after 11:00 AM.  We waited so long we had decided to pay for the coffee and leave if our meals weren't the next ones to come out.  The waitress literally forgot to take our order, so there's no way she could blame this on the cook.  This wasn't our first time there, but it has been awhile.  In the past the food and service had been timely.

On a positive note, they have definitely improved the home fries!
Stopped there for breakfast' It looks like a place in the movies of the 50's including the jukebox which can be a little load. The everything omelet was very tasty and the home fries perfectly fried. The service is OK not very friendly. 
It's an experience that you can enjoy.
I haven' been there in awhile. The reason is not because of the food or prices but because we are blessed with an abundant excellent selection of inexpensive places to eat.
  The diner is new although right out of the 50's. The inside and outside looks like chrome. There are booths and red top counter seats. The prices are not out of the fifty's but are very inexpensive. I recommend the meatloaf which is served hot with mashed potatoes and a side vegetable. There is hot brown gravy on the meatloaf and potatoes or any way you want it. On a Friday I would recommend the fish and chips. The chips are really regular french fries but since a child we ALL call them chips. The fish is outstanding as it is what New England is known for. Traditionally you also get a side of coleslaw. 
A must stop


This place has gone downhill over the years.  The prices are high for what you get.  The waitstaff is fair and the quality of food is just not good any longer.
We have always enjoyed the food at the Jukebox dinner, but their hours are difficult to keep track of, we used to go there on Friday nights for Fish and Chips. Last couple of times we went there, they were closed.
Go for the fish n chips! He makes the best. Food is always good and fresh. Very large turnover of wait staff, though. Sometimes you get a good one and sometimes you don't. Most are good. Many regulars come in weekly. Good location on Route 6.
Had breakfast here several times. We never had a complaint. What stood out was the cleanliness of everything, and this to me is very important.
Waitstaff was new, but friendly. Food was decent diner food. Unfortunately the owner (couldve been the manager) was sitting at the counter being very loud and negative towards his employees. There was a discrepency on our bill and he proceeded to argue with his staff and then basically huffed at me after he realized i had already paid via credit card. He turned to the register and then shoved $3.00 at me. Very ignorant. I feel sorry for his staff. Will not return
Local favorites and nice menu. Good food and reasonable prices. The service was good and the place was a nice 50's retro
convenient location - nothing special, typical 50s style diner but very little on charm
Nothing special, felt like any other chain restaurant, usual New England high prices, and in a strip mall. Rated at 3 stars on google and is definitely correct. Really wanted something more unique and local. 
Somerset's Papa Gino's is a great place with or without children!  The food is great and there is ample seating even though it looks small from the outside.  The staff is friendly and courteous and the food is served as quickly as possible!
This combination Papa Gino's and D'Angelo in Somerset MA on U.S. Rte 6 is terrific.  Always clean,food is always fresh.  Lobster rolls are spectacular great buy. Choice of traditional grilled hot dog roll (New England style) or wrap, pita pocket or sub roll. This is a limited time item spring to fall.  Rustica pizza is my fav, but going to try their new Margarita pizza.  Hum drooling as writing this! Grandson loves the cheesy bread sticks served with marinara sauce.
After a Night of Haunted house tours in Fall River. Our group 6 kids and my wife and I stopped at Papa gino`s on Rte 6 in Somerset. The place looked brand new and squeaky clean. The staff was friendly, helpful and prompt. The Pizza was hot and fresh like all Papa gino`s hand tossed pies. Definitely do this again thanks very much..
I arrived with my son after a practice to order dinner.  We ordered a grilled chicken and cheese sandwich with an order of cheesebread and a cup for water.  The attendant punched in numbers like she had all day, except she was pounding the screen like she hated being there.  I knew the order would be incorrect and sure enough, we were charged for a softdrink, even though all we wanted was a cup for water.  A supervisor made the correction and promptly refunded our change, because the attendant couldn't figure out how to make change.

Our order came our after about a fifteen minute wait.  The chicken looked like it was frozen and grilled slightly with virtually no cheese and it wasn't melted.  The cheesebread wasn't much better with barely melted cheese.  As I brought it to the front, one of the persons of authority said are you bringing this back?  As if it were to make me want to eat a cold meal and a poorly prepared meal.

We waited another fifteen minutes to find this one prepared properly.  No apologies, no reduction in the bill.

If this restaurant is to be successful, customer service followed by food preparation training is a must.

For a chain restaurant, I was very disappointed in their service.
Its bigger and Newer and the Management is So Awesome...
Papa Ginos and Dangelos combined...Two great New England Eateries under on roof on Route 6 in Somerset Wicked...Two Adults and Six Hungry kids gave it 8 thumbs up..Clean as a whistle...
Thank you all...
The best sandwiches in the area , number nine with mushrooms and grilled onions and lettuce and tomato,, tuna pockets,, mmmm
The Whopper was great-good beef.  Fries not so hot. Service a little slow, but a good place for a fast lunch or dinner.
Recently went there ordered a chicken parm sandwich if you want to call it that.  Two pieces of bread with a tablespoon of cold sauce on it, with a fried chicken that was cold and crumbled up cold cheese on top, and the price wasn't cheap, I will never go there again, your better going to McDonald's at least you can get hot cooked food.
Lots to pick from, everything is delicious. Always busy. My choice for ribs is Ruby Tuesday's though. Lately Chili's ribs have been a little fatty. But there are numerous other dishes for me to choose from. Service is outstanding. Brad is awesome!
I ordered the Tuesday Ribeye special was a little disappointed. It was supposed to be cooked rare and i received it cooked medium well. the manager came by to see if everything was alright and I told him that the Ribeye was not cooked to my liking. He just walked away. Its true that i had eatan half of the Steak but i could have been offered a complimentary desert at least. When I left i still left a decent tip considering but the Barman just watched me walk away not saying a work. I will not be going back to any Chilis.
Terrible snow storm, and the joint was jumping!! Many families and an atmosphere that was welcoming from kids to seniors. Food was fresh, very good, wide menu choices, great drinks. Able to conduct business with colleagues even though the place was filled. Lots of TV's turned to sports...fun place to be on a miserable night.
I stop here once in a while but have never written a review. It's near my inlaws so it's convenient. They're always packed on Friday and Saturday nights so expect to wait. The food is always good and there's lots to choose from. Good drink selection. Great place to meet up with friends for apps and drinks, and also great for a sit down meal with family.
I don't go to Chili's often  mostly because I  do not eat  much Mexican or spicy foods, but armed with a gift card paid them a visit. The atmosphere there is always upbeat and the staff friendly. Checking the menu I noticed some  positive changes including dinner for 2 specials and dinner and drinks for 2 specials, Very nice. I ordered the half rack of ribs and my wife ordered the pick 3 appetizer plate. All of the food was good with the exception of the cheese bites which really were mostly batter. Service was friendly  though it seemed to take much longer than it should for the food to arrive. No matter we were in no rush. The menu changes will certainly make me consider visiting them more often.
Just left and everything was delicious  we were a party of 11 and our server was always checking to make sure everything was satisfactory. I had steak and salmon the double entree steak was perfectly cooked. Everyone was happy with their meal.  Definitely worth going to....
The bar is always busy. If you like ribs you will love this place. They offer a variety of specials that make it affordable to go out to eat/
Great Food, Friendly staff, and awesome brews.. Always happy hour priced brew... Can't beat the deals and specials.!!!!
The margaritas and the two for twenty deal  are great! It is often crowded but you can do "call ahead" seating which shortens the wait. The staff is friendly and accomodating.
Food was great but the best part was the new kiosk that let's you reorder drinks and pay, with a tip slider. Awesome. 
Nothing unusual about the location as a Chili's. That said, the food and service have always been very good and they are always accommodating on substitutions for side order items.  On numerous occasions I have ordered several of their dual entree combinations with a swath of different side items for takeout to make a mini buffet at home with very good results.  Takeout orders have been consistently prompt for pickup in about 20 minutes.
The food is always good. No matter what i order i am never disappointed.The fajitas are the best i have ever had.  The price is affordable.They give a good size meal, I can never finish. I always have leftovers to take home. The staff is very friendly. They come by to see if your meal is prepared the way you like it. Good service, clean, fast.
My wife and I with grand-daughter Melanie went for the Wednesday Baby Back ribs special discount price. We were warmly greeted by a perky, smiling Alison. She sat us, waited on us, and served our food as well. "I do it all" she proudly said. Each of us got the original barbecue sauce full-rack of ribs. Yummy! Equally delicious was the cinnamon apple-chunks served in a separate cup with a spoon to use if needed. The chunks were sp plentiful we used a fork first, then a spoon to get the last drops of this great addition to the meal. The french fries were very good, but we didn't touch them much as we focused on the ribs and apple-chunks. My grand-daughter got a Doctor Pepper that was terribly flat in taste, but she did not tell us. I found out when I tasted it as we were ready to leave. Our very accomodating waitress Alison was genuinely disappointed that the drink was flat and that we did not tell her. Mea culpa; our fault. If all waitresses were like Alison... one can only dream. She was the best! We gave her a generous tip.
Great place to chill out. However , one bartender who name begins with the letter a refuses to fill out frequent customer reward card which entitles you to a free meal.
Chilis is always Great during the Fall... The comfort food is the best .Fresh chips and Salsa ..Fajitas are awesome.I really love the Guacamole burger . Ribs are devine and Fish Tacos Rule... Special Thanks to Maddison. Our waitress in Somerset that made everything special ... Great job..
Place was clean and Fantastic....
My girlfriend, friend and I recently had a good meal @ Chili's in Somerset. She got the appetizer trio as an entree and liked the chipotle chicken, but the regular friend chicken she said tasted like fish, and wasn't sure if it was the batter or the fryer, but it did have a fishy taste to it, which is gross since its chicken! She also felt her sliders were really bland, and I tried and agreed. My friend got a pasta dish and enjoyed it. I got the Ribeye and it was a good size and tasted good, although I asked for medium and it was more towards medium well. 

Overall it was a good meal and not super expensive!
The atmosphere was calm and not too loud, and service was really better than I expected (very friendly, sincere, good with details). The food is great, and the menu is flexible, making swaps with sides, etc. I recommend this to anyone looking for clean, polite service and atmosphere, with great food and menu choices.
Loud but fun place to eat.  Service is great and lots to choose from.
can be very busy at time but wait is reasonable and worth it.
The service here is so slow. I have complained to management before but it's still slow. The food is standard Chili's food.         
As usual, good food and service. Close to my hotel and in center with grocery. 
Good place for a quick bite.  Good place to have a few beers and watch a game.  Staff is friendly and service is good.  The kale soup is excellent!
we showed up for dinner about 6:45 at night.  the place was not busy, only a couple of tables with people in the restaurant and about a half full bar area.   We had to wait almost 10 minutes to put in our order which seemed slow but not horrible.  We waited another 15-20 for the appetizer to be served which in most places takes less than 10.   during that time, the waitress mentioned a couple of times that the food would be right out.  45 minutes after being seated, we still hadn't been served our meal.  the waitress told us a few times in that span that our meals were almost ready.  she blamed it on everyone coming in at the same time which was true -- 10-15 minutes after we arrived, not when we came in.  finally had enough waiting, hunted down the waitress and told her to ring up the bill for a soda and the appetizer.  no discount or comping of the order.  no manager in sight to address the problem.  she offered to box our meal again claiming it was almost ready but after hearing that so many times, I had little doubt the food was close to ready since she wasn't bringing to the table.

will never go back to this place again.
Good selection of beers on tap. Standard pub food, not horrible but nothing to go out of your way for. Service is fair
The restaurant had a lot of choices of good food.
We also liked that it was next to our hotel, Riverview Inn & Suites.
Good selection on the menu. The food was good and plentiful, we had leftovers.  Prices were good. My only complaint would be that the lighting made it hard to see the menu.  Our server was friendly and the wait for our meal wasn't long.  I would eat here again. 
Had lunch at the Jillian while waiting for check-In.  Shared a Ruben and big bowl of Clam Chowder.  My son had a Ruben, seltzer and FF's.  Cost was $35. with tip- Little high for a fast bite - waitress was friendly. 
Good beer and menu selection.  Food is good and wait staff is excellent.  Plenty of televisions to watch sports.
I stopped in here as they have the original Venus De Milo soup to have that and some wine.  The soup as always was great, it could have  been hotter but I just let it go, but when I got the bill $21 for a soup and 2 glasses of wine?  I could sit at a restaurant on the water and not paid that amount of money for soup and wine.  This is a sports bar not a high class place just a sports bar.  If you want a cheap beer, sports and a lot of noise, this is your place.  No class what so ever~
It was great to see a revised memo since last there in June, but the service has become less impressive then the menu and certainly seems they are wanting it to be more of a bar scene than family restaurant. Have been coming here for years and keep hoping they'd improve but the restaurant business doesn't seem to be the focus. 
A friend brought me here to celebrate getting a new job. What a great little place to just sit, have a beer and some awesome wings. Everyone was really friendly and you quickly felt like one of the gang. Very relaxed atmosphere and did I mention the wicked awesome boneless wings?
My friends and I went here for a pre-wedding day drinking session. The bartender (mrs wiggles) was awesome. The drinks are super cheap and it was a cool atmosphere. I would definitely go back, if I ever had to go back to that area again. 
While at the Quality Inn next door, we ordered twice from Jillian's and the Rib Dinners there were fantastic. We would have ordered again had we stayed longer. Girls were kind and personable. It is a great place too to dine in, very nice set-up.
Desided to give it another chance. No changes service sucks! Waitresses do not know what they are doing. I am a chef and the food really sucked this time around. I got the jambalaya poor excuse for jambalaya only half a tablespoon of pilaf rice and tons of tomato sauce and a touch of cream yuk,  its a cajun dish it needs cajun spices. My som got the chourico pizza it came out soggy and undercooked, what a shame. My fiancé got the steak tips all overcooked and and only 2 edible pieces the rest were so grissely they were inedible and the mashed was like wallpaper paste and not to mention the menu says it comes with gravy and when we asked the waitress for it she looked at us like we were stupid and then brought out some kinda of nasty sauce that kinda tasted like straight up demi glace no seasoning. Its a shame this used to be such a great place what happened? And to put things on the menu that show they are somehow affiliated with the venus is a same i would be embarrassed to be affiliated with this place. Come on get a better chef in there or get line cooks who care if they don't and bring your place down like they have get rid of them. This place needs a whole new restructure. Never ever again not until i see a sign that says under new management or bought out.
I come here about once a month.  I always try a different item and it is always very good.  I have had the burgers, nachos, fish and chips, clam cakes, chowder, Panini's.  The owner/manager is always stopping by the tables to see how everything is (a nice touch).  The only thing lacking is a possible sprucing up of the dining area.  Always a good spot to meet up with friends.  Friendly place.
This place has gone downhill... Very dirty instead of waitresses standing around talking maybe they should pick up a rag and clean......yuk come on its common sense! Food is ok but will not be back due to cleanliness.
Lots of great beers on tap, waitstaff & bartenders were great. Food wasn't terrible, but not great. Stick with the soup if you do.
Easy to over look but what a nice place. Extremely friendly wait staff. Excellent food with reasonable prices. I would recommend the fish & chips with a order of steamers to start.
Don't try the meat loaf.  Really, stay away from the meatloaf.  Aside from that, go for it!  We're here on Tuesday nights for trivia and dinner.  The drinks are good, free popcorn, and loads of fun.  Prior to coming for the trivia, we came for the food.

We've tried a bunch of different things on the fairly extensive menu and the only one I didn't like was... yup, the meatloaf.  I think there's too much filler and not enough meat.  Other than that, the pizza is very good, the chowder is very good, the ribs, and fish & chips all very good.

Service is good, the wait staff are friendly and smiling.  The restaurant side is a good place for dinner with the kids and the bar side a good place for dinner and watching the game.  I think Jillian's fits the bill for most any time out.
Sports bar with really good food.  Owner also owns the Venus DeMilo in Swansea so their famous Venus soup is featured here.  Nice bar but also dining area if you prefer not to be at the bar Good burgers . Fish and Chips are very good.
It was my first time visiting Jillian's. My girlfriend said she had been here a handful of times when she lived in Somerset and was never impressed. We were driving by and wanted something quick, easy and casual. We sat at the bar, and the bartender walked by us 3 times before even acknowledging us. I had a beer and she had a mixed drink. We had to ask for a food menu. Placed an order for Nachos with chili, but no sour cream and no olives. We also ordered there bar-b-q chicken pizza with Ham and pineapple. The Nachos here always come out with the Chili in a cup on the side, not on top of the nachos. This is a key detail for this review. Our nachos came out smothered with melted cheese but hidden underneath all that cheese was covered with olives. We didn't realize this until after we dumped the chili on top of the nachos. Immediately we called the bartender over and explained our situation. She apologized and re-fired the nachos for us. 2 minutes later we watched our Nachos that returned to the kitchen pass through window be sent out to another table with the Chili that we poured on top of the nachos be sent out. Not to mention my girlfriend and I both touched this plate and ate a chip. This is a total health code violation and makes me wonder what this kitchen looks like, and how many other dishes are sent out to tables. The worst part is this all happened in plain view of all the customers at the bar, and it didn't even phase the bartender who was also working as a server for some of the bar tables. The bartender knew all the regulars by name and gave them preferential treatment. They were never without a drink in front of them, but she had no problem walking by my girlfriend and I when our glasses were empty. The pizza was good, but we wont be returning to Jillian's anytime soon.
Went to sonic for lunch with my 2 teenagers. The line at the drive thru was very long and even though there were bays open, we decided to eat inside.
Service is slightly slow if you consider Sonic fast food.
Service is pretty quick if you consider Sonic a sit down restaurant.

Food was pretty good, certainly worth the 25 minute drive we took to get there.

My daughter had popcorn chicken which was very flavorful, though a smaller portion.
My son got the spicy chicken sandwich which was very good, and certainly spicy!
I had the double cheeseburger which was tasty and cooked just right. It was very filling.
We all ordered tots, a must have when you visit Sonic.
And just to try them, we had a small order of boneless buffalo wings. They had a nice flavor to them, and while they are a little spicy, don't shy away from them, they are not too spicy.
We stopped in for a quick bite. The service was fast and the food was tasty. We tried the chicken tenders both buffalo and garlic parm.. They were very good. We also like the fact they use crushed ice in the soft drinks. Would definitely stop in again.
the burgers,the fries and the shakes are a little better than other fast food burger joints. they are a little slow with the food,especially when it is busy. going in and getting something to go takes forever, even if it is a single quickly made item. young kids on roller skates indoors does not sound like a good idea. took my young skater 3 trips around the eating area and could not find us. i had to call him over. my number was right on the table. i liked the food but don't like the setup. let me mention  a complaint i have for all fast food places. parents that let their kids order for themselves. the lines can be long and parents waiting til they get to the front of the line and ask johnny what do you want, and he is not sure and has questions, makes everyone in line roll their eyes. how about 3 kids each trying to figure out what they want while everyone else in line just waits. know what you want. adult or kid. you are not the only family or person there.
First visit to this location and well pleased. My wife got the chicken sandwich combo and I got chicken tenders both of which were quite good as were the tater tots. We both ordered shakes VERY thick so hard getting them through the straw.Service was quick and we were checked back on. The $5 dollar meal deal looks good though we did not try it.
stopped by line was not terrible but got worse while we were there, service was slower than expected, hotdog was great burger was cold, tots were good, shakes good
This opening of this Sonic was one of the biggest restaurant events I can remember here in town.  Besides the big splash of bringing back car hop service, Sonic has a number of things that make it distinctive in the fast food realm.  Their real fruit slushies do have a good fresh fruit taste and they do have a wider choice of sides and ice cream than the typical fast food burger place.  For better or worse, nutrition wise, I am rather fond of their corn dogs.
Although a pleasant reminder of the old A & W Drive Ins besides the novelty of someone brining you your food on rollerskates it's just not A & W. I ordered a burger and fries and found it no different in taste than similar competitors. What I wanted was flavorful and was disappointed that it was just ordinary.
So much hype surrounding the newly-opened SONIC Drive-in on Route 6 in Somerset, Massachusetts, my husband was eager to try it, so we took a drive yesterday.  Very clean (brand new) and well decorated with both inside and outdoor seating.  "Car hops" wearing roller skates.  You can eat in, use the traditional drive thru lane, or park your car to be waited on by the car hops.  I must say that their milk shakes are PHENOMENAL.  Also, several varieties of hotdogs and toppings.  Onion rings were just okay.
Being a fried chicken lover this is one of my favorite places to eat.It is very clean and modern and the chicken is GREAT. It is located on route 6 a short drive from Interstste 195
Was at Home Depot around lunch time.  KFC's parking lot is accessible from the Home Depot lot without going out to the street.  Made it very easy to stop in for something quick.  I highly reccommend the Double Down, the sandwhich that uses two fried chicken cutlets as the bun.  Excellent!
I understand that grilled chicken probably isn't KFC's forte, but the grilled chicken they gave me at the drive through was inedible and should have been rehydrated before serving.
The food and beverages are always ready and hot no matter what time you get here.  The employees are very friendly and cooperative.
Dunkin Donut's is Dunkin Donut's.There's not much difference among them. Good coffee (for me it's much better than Starbucks). Their pastries - muffins, sandwiches,etc.are OK. Nothing particular about this one.
I've visited this location several times over the last few months and have always enjoyed my two Coney Island hot dogs with "the works"... a true SE Massachusetts and Rhode Island treat! Yesterday, I tried their french fries which were very good when sparingly salted and doused with cider vinegar. They even had A&W root beer and cream soda in bottles! The staff was very friendly and fun to talk with. It's a small place with just a few stools at the counter but they also have a "drive up window" where you can order from your car. They also have a few other things on the menu and Fridays they offer fish & chips for under $8. I haven't tried anything but the coney dogs but I'll be back to give the other items a try.
Fast service, Very small counter service only.  They do some other foods, but I always have the hot dogs.
If you aren't familiar with the local legends of hot dogs and you have never had a coney island hot dog then you may enjoy this place. The dogs were okay, but coney island, not so much.
In addition to a menu of good fare typical of a local diner, they have a number of somewhat unusual dishes that are very good, like the one I noted.  They are open more afternoon and evening hours than their competitor (my favorite) near my home at the other end of town.  Definitely plan to visit for more late afternoon and evening meals in the future.
Located in the south Somerset area, Roger's has been a staple in Somerset since  the 1960s. It has re entry been renovated and the new decor is fresh and stylish.  But the real reason for my review is to tell you how great the food is.  The menu is extensive.  They are open for breakfast as well as lunch and dinner.  My husband and I go there frequently.  We can depend on a delicious meal at a reasonable price.
What are you waiting for! A real local treasure. Enjoyed a Greek Salad with fresh New Bedford culled Scallops. Arrived beautifully presented and tantalize the taste buds delicious! Reasonably priced on the pocketbook. Take a chance and enjoy!!
Great place recently renovated . Waitresses are friendly and service is ok. The good is good and is great for young families.
Too hot to cook at home. So we did the next best thing and went out for a late lunch at a local family restaurant. We were delighted at the choices! My husband chose the baked scrod and I the steak tip Cobb salad. Both meals were pleasantly plated to delight the eyes and make the palate ready for the feast and we were not disappointed! We found the waitresses were very helpful and the surroundings pleasant. Take a night off and enjoy the family cooking at this delightful home away from home!
Decent place for breakfast. Nice atmosphere, decent price, and excellent service provided at Rogers. I had the veggie omelet. Fresh veggies, however, needed to spice up a little to taste. Plenty of good coffee.
While we have always enjoying the food at the pre- renovation Rogers, they have stepped up the level of their food.  Still the comfort foods, but the homemade chips are terrific.  Only one salad available though - chicken caesar.
Wow what a find!  Super clean, extensive menu  with many ethnic items, great staff, reasonable prices.  My wife went first with a friend for breakfast and talked me into going for lunch.  This place being about 15 minutes from home will be our GO TO place for casual dinning!  Keep it a secret !
Eight of us went for breakfast.  The menu had a nice selection and they were reasonable.  Nothing fancy, but comfortable seating.  We had a variety of offerings from the menu.  The coffee was served quickly and was very good.  The eggs Benedict with chourico, peppers and onions was delicious.  The breakfast specials were very good.  The home fries were tasty and the toast wasn't soggy.  The service was very good.  We all agreed this would require a return trip. 

We went there last night and the food was amazing.  House fritters were great.  Had the Scallops Nantucket that were tender and sweet in casserole dish where the sauce was light and nice flavor.  Definitely going back again.  The prices are also decent.  Also the new renovation gives a modern fresh feel to the restaurant.
We recently tried Rogers and have been back about 4 times within the past 2 months. They have recently been renovated and I cant compare because we never went before renovation, but it looks great. Very comfy place, and kids are welcomed as well. I really like that they are gluten free friendly!
The atmosphere was just ok. Food was just so so.Not on my return list. One of the very few times I did not like a restaurant.
This is our second visit since Rogers reopened and we had another great experience . The chicken Mozambique was excellent. Fresh broccoli, tomatoes and grilled chicken worked well in the light sauce. The garlic bread was decadent loaded with butter. My partner had the  Portuguese burger & enjoyed every bite. The homemade potato chips were light & tasty . The service was excellent & the dirty martini was great. We like the changes.
Waitress and owner were pleasant, handling all our allergy problems with concern and full information regarding food contents, but the fish was dry, and the clam cakes and other foods were salty. We did not finish our meals, nor bring them home for future eating.  We will not return.
Two visits for breakfast: the first resulted in a 20-minute wait for eggs, toast, and home fries. The second resulted in us walking out after 25 minutes.

The food we did receive was your basic breakfast fare, reasonably prepared and priced fairly. Home fries were good. Coffee was average. Service - when it was there - was friendly. The dining area is pleasant and looks to have been recentlt renovated. Parking out front is sufficient.
I used to love Rogers food and staff, then they decided to remodel it which the place looks nice, not as homey as before but ver y nice.  I wish I could say that about the food.  I have gone back three times hoping that it was a fluke, but no the food has gone down hill, the prices have gone up and they have some new staff which are nothing compared to their originals.  I miss the old Rogers, I don't know if they have a new cook, but I hope it gets better.
I love going here for their chow mein. It is a to do thing with my best friend.  She has the liver.  Both meals are enjoyed heartily.
This place is run down and is in desperate need of either a complete makeover or just tear it down. My husband and I went there in the morning for breakfast, I ordered Raisin Bread toast. "it was beginning to turn bad" i could taste that weird taste when bread is beginning to turn bad.  My husband wasn't very happy with his scrambled eggs, they were runny.  Total customers 3 tables and that's including us. It seemed like the old timer's go there, it must have been their place to go and are now reluctant to stop.   I do not recommend this place.
Went for lunch just after the lunch rush. There were only 2 other tables and they already had their food. service was quick but the food took a while to come out. May hace cought them cleaning the kitchen after lunch rush. We had clams, chicken fingers and a burger between the 3 of us. Burger and fingers were standard diner style food, very good. The fried whole belly clams were a surprise, hot fresh and very good. Have been here many times over the years but not recently. Enjoyed the meal enough that it will not be long before we return.
The food here is very good, we ususally eat there every Friday to get their seafood specials. They have other specials too, you can get anything from pizza there to fried clams. Good selection of food. There food is always fresh and made to order.  The service is fast, and the food is reasonable.
I came here after a cold, wet walk on the beach at Sandy Neck and was looking forward to a glass of wine and a bowl of chowder. The staff was very friendly and attentive - even with a large birthday party next door.  I ordered the wood-fired pizza which, although very good, was missing more than half the ingredients I had ordered.  The waitress was very apologetic and comped me a cannoli, which I took home for a late evening treat. Delicious food, welcoming atmosphere.
Terrific selection of creative salads and appetizers. Varied menu with the accent on Italian. Everything we have ever ordered has been good, but never spectacular. However, in the past, their beet salad and their quahog soup were the best I have eaten anywhere. It is never my first choice for dinner, but I am always agreeable to going there. You will enjoy once you get past the noise.
5 of us had dinner and the meals ordered ran the gamut from pizza to rack of lamb. Everyone raved about the food, can't do better than that. The atmosphere was very attractive, the service was attentive and prompt.
We didn't sample the Italian fair, although is looked and smelled really good, but the seafood was great!  The wood fired grill really adds a wonderful taste to fresh fish which was cooked to perfection.  The wine list is a good size and covers all the  bases.  You should be able to find a complementary bottle.  Leave room for desert - our chocolate desert was over the top and a perfect end to an first rate meal.  Treat yourself and your loved one and visit Amari! 
My wife enjoyed their wine selection and my Manhattan was mixed to perfection. My wife and I started with the mussels in white sauce, which were excellent. My wife had the bolognese, which she loved and I had the roast duck special, which was phenomenal. Our waiter was quick, knowledgeable and kind and the quality of the food, service and atmosphere warranted the bill. We will be back the next time we are in the area.
The veal parmigiana is to die for.  The presentation and the quantity was just perfect.  Good selections of wines and cocktails are available.  Desserts and specialty coffees were an added bonus.  Great place for a get together with friends for dinner.
Stayed over the road so popped in here for a pizza takeaway.  Really good pizza - 4 good toppings on an 18" pizza for just over 20 bucks

Recommended
We went for apps and pizza on our first visit. We visited again with relatives and their 3 children. Our server was fantastic with the kids and served them promptly. The adults enjoyed the great wine selection, seafood specials, and dessert!!

Caroline was our server on our first visit and we had to return the following week with family!! This was a nice find and a place we will visit again.
Our kids like the pizza here, that is the main reason we go to this restaurant. Their menu is somewhat limited. Nothing for vegetarians besides a plate of lettuce. Their Italian food is easily matched or surpassed by many other places on the Cape.
Have eaten here innumerable times in the past.  We usually sit at the bar. The food is always excellent. The bar service tonight was lacking. We did not get the usual bread & olive oil offering nor were we asked if we wanted grated cheese on our entree. We got our own cheese.  We were not asked how the meal was or offered anything else like water b we will return but after the high summer season.   Amaris you greatly disappointed us tonight!  
We came to Amari's for the nightcap of our vacation and it was a good dining experience.  There is a nice fire outside that adds to the atmosphere and the food was very good for a small restaurant tucked away in a small beach town.
We went to Amari for the first time and will definitely go back.  The hostess greeted us with a smile and our waitress Judy was very personable.  The Italian style interior was decorated nicely with dark woods and murals.  
The red sauce was delicious and not too spicy on the Veal Parmesan I had.  That same sauce was served with the warm bread to start. 
My sister had the Bolognese which was also very good.  The menu had a good amount of items to choose from and also offered a couple of specials.  
amari  serves great food by one of the most talented chefs, gennaro, in the u.s.......the waitresses are friendly and place is very welcoming....the stuffed peppers and pasta and bean soup are so good you will want to take extra orders home!!!!!! it is a little out of the way from hyannis but worth the drive for such an amazing meal......
The food and help in this restaurant are fabulous. A little pricey but, worth it!! My family of 12 enjoyed it, The atmosphere is very nice. Like a restaurant you would find in South Boston....excellent
We visited Amari's tonight and we are so glad we did!  It ended a great day in Sandwich with really delicious food.  At first it seemed pricey, but it was worth it!  We had a party of 5, and everyone had some of their meal to take home!  
Kids menus provided classic Italian meals, and great sized portions.  

The meal started with warm fresh bread.  We got shrimp fettuccine Alfredo and shrimp picatta, and the shrimp were huge and tasty.  Marinara sauce and meatballs were also delicious.

Amari also has a nice ambience and decor, and the waitress took care of all our needs.
All I can say this restaurant is a must try! We went tonight Friday night and everyone knows get there early or you wait. We went early was seated in a quaint alcove our waiter Giovanni was the best! Attentive knowledgeable and very personable! We started with appetizers my husband had the clam chowder was very good I had a Cesar salad best I've had in a long time and I had the 1/2 portion and it was huge! My husband and I both ate it and there was still some left. But first I cannot forget the rustic bread with their phenomenal marinara that accompanied it. Entrees omg! So good. I got the Ravioli ala pomodoro. Simply delicious! So much I have leftovers for tomorrow. My husband had the chicken parmesan. He said best he's ever had! We also got a side of their meatballs! Best meatballs ever. They could be a meal in themselves! We are definitely going to be frequent customers! Oh lets not forget we took dessert to go my hubby got the key lime pie he said so good and I got the house made mini cannolis. Better than than Mike's in the North end! Creamy flavorful pure perfection! Thanks Giovanni for making our 1st dining experience at your restaurant a memorable one! We will be back soon!
Awesome place for Italian food. The pizza was delicious. The only downside was the restaurant was noisy. People at the next table were speaking so loud.  It was so much better once they left. 
If you want good Italian, generous portions and great atmosphere, try eating at the bar in Amari. The bartenders are all friendly, attentive and know their mixology well. If they have stuffed peppers on the menu they are a must. All fish selections are fresh and tasty. So, OK, you can get all this at a table but try the bar for the same great food and a lively experience!
Our party of eight was seated quickly but had failed to specify that we did not want to be seated in the bar area.  We asked to be relocated but unfortunately it was not possible at that time.  Our waiter seemed annoyed when we informed him that it
was extremely chilly and asked if the temperature could be adjusted. That never occurred  The ceiling is very high and the bar is very noisy.  If you're looking to hold a conversation, avoid that area. From that point we settled in and ordered.  The food was very good and the portions are very large. I think the prices are average for the area.  I would definitely give it another try.
Three of us went to this restaurant after hearing a family member rave about the baked shrimp dinner.  One person in our party always has a difficult time making a selection, and tonight was even more difficult than usual. Many choices, and such a variety.  She chose the Haddock Al Forno, fresh haddock baked to perfection, served with seasoned bread crumbs, seasonal roasted vegetables and roasted potatoes. I did 2 Antipasti, the Spiedini which was one skewer each of chicken, beef and shrimp, marinated in a very tasty sauce served with roasted red pepper and zucchini, and the salad special of roasted beets (red and yellow) spinach, goat cheese and macadamia nuts-------wonderful!  The third dinner of lobster, shrimp and scallops served over wilted spinach, plum tomatoes and linguini was huge and superb.  The food exceeded our expectations.  Our waitress, Jen was wonderfully patient as one of us had taken so long to decide-------she came back to check on us several times, each time as friendly and helpful as the first time.  Another waiter came by and offered help to find a suitable place to store a walker that one of us has come with. So friendly, courteous and accommodating.  I gave this restaurant an excellent rating for the food and the friendly staff, minus one.  The hostess who seated us never spoke a word or looked directly at any of us. She appeared to have a bad attitude that was much bigger than the length of her skirt. We decided not to let this young twit negatively affect our dining experience because we received excellent customer service from everyone else. She should be assigned to other duties not involving being around people. Even with that being said, I highly recommend this restaurant.
Not too sure where the river view is but we sat on the deck all the same and enjoyed a lovely coffee and a cake. 

The staff were very friendly and helpful and it looked like the venue had plenty to offer in the way of food and drinks.  
After walking out of one other local cafe because of its unprofessional atmosphere, we searched and found this adorable, roomy cafe. The staff was spot on! Cathy,  clearly in charge made sure that the line moved quickly and efficiently. She took time to check in the dining room to make sure everything was ok. The bagel was so fresh that I think it has ruined my desire to ever eat store bought again. Coffee selection was plentiful and good. Thank you a wonderful breakfast experience!
We had a breakfast sandwich with ham and the belt with jalapeno infused bacon.  Both were very good and it's nice to still have breakfast options at lunchtime.  There were some great looking cookies and muffins but we were too full to partake.
I went for lunch on the way back from the cape with my wife because she insisted that I try the Riverview. While there is no view of the river (canal), she was right on about the food. We ordered the same dish when reading about the spicy BLT. The jalapeno-infused bacon and avocado did it. The crispy bacon was really infused - no jalapeno peppers visible. Yet the flavor was there, not real spicy but the jalapeno accent was very present. The sandwich can be grilled with your choice of bread.
Fun cafe experience with lovely people, delicious food and a homespun atmosphere.Enjoy free wifi and shop at the attached Thrift Store!
A creative selection of breakfast and lunch sandwiches/wraps/burritos along with pastries, coffee, smoothies. Worth visiting. I've always done takeout but often see people in the dining area and front deck. 
Tasty paninis, delicious pastries and soups, good coffee.  Nice little place with outside seating.  This cafe is run by students at a nearby school and it's great to see the students learning and growing in this business.
If you are gluten free you know how rare it is to see fresh bakery items anywhere, and this little cafe had plenty of gluten free options as well as non GF. There is nothing like a freshly made bagel with butter and cream cheese and these kids usually only get them at home so this was such a great surprise for my two children with celiac disease. Wide variety of coffee, fresh squeezed juices, smoothies, breakfast sandwiches made to order. Muffins and pastries are freshly made daily. Fruit cups and parfaits available too. Quick service and lots of happy people in a very busy spot, glad we stopped to give it a try. Will certainly be back when in the area.
This place is a gem. There are very creative items on the menu, including omelettes, breakfast sandwiches, etc -- definitely a step up from your normal breakfast fare. Everything ws beautifully prepared and super fresh. We were greeted right away, and the staff were all very friendly. What I didn't know until later was that this restaurant benefits the Riverview School for persons with disabilities, some of whom work in the store (as well as the cute thrift shop next door). It's a win-win for everyone! We loved it and definitely plan to be back.
We found going to downtown Sandwich coming from the famous sandy-neck beach . It is a pretty small cafe located along the main road. You can eat all kind of sandwich healthy and biological food, non alcoholic drinks and natural home made salads. Very relaxing and quite place with nice and gentle staff. Good for a short coffee or tea break
Great coffee and pastry, friendly staff, super clean.  An absolute gem which will become one of our regular stops when on Cape.
This is a quaint place right off 6A. The menu is small and well done. The Breakfast Strata and Breakfast Burrito were flavorful & attractive. There is an almost limitless menu of coffees & lattes as well as some refreshing iced teas (ginger peach & hibiscus to name a couple). The cookies are amazing! So are the muffins and pastries. Service is conscientious and friendly. They also do lunch and the menu looks intriguing-we will be back!
Stopped in on the way to Sandwich and the food was great. Quick and friendly service. Glad we stopped! We had chowder and egg sandwiches and the entire crew was satisfied. 
On our way to West Dennis, we were looking for a place to stop for breakfast. Arrived at 7am. The place was open and the staff is attentive and friendly.  The place smells wonderful with freshly baked pastries and muffins. The apple strudel was warm out the oven and delicious. The coffee is fresh and flavorful. We also had bagel and lox. 
I highly recommend stopping by and indulging yourself in the wonderful food  and great atmosphere.
Casual dining order at counter for take out or delivered to your table. Food was awesome all around and Hank made sure that everything was to our liking.
Enjoyed the pleasant atmosphere, the help is wonderful and the chicken salad so fresh and tasty. Will go again soon
We stopped for breakfast on our way off the Cape. The people there were extremely friendly and helpful and the food was very good! When you enter, you grab a menu, place your order and they bring you your meal whether you're sitting inside or out on their patio. The food is reasonably priced and frshly made.
Delightful ambiance, great staff, eclectic menu, and provides job skills and experience for Riverview students. I had the Spicy Sausage Sandwich (sausage, egg, cheese, salsa and chopped pepperoncinis). For 5.50, this was delicious and filling. Wait! They have great coffee and baked goods, AND a thrift shop right next door! I love this place!
Stopped for lunch on our way off the island. I had the chicken salad on their cranberry bread. Fantastic sandwich.  Chicken salad also had dried cranberries. Husband had the BLT on sourdough bread. It was good too. I highly recommend this place. Eat outside if you get a chance.
I always enjoy the Riverview Cafe. All the food I've had there has been fresh and delicious. I regularly try their special lattes and those are always delicious too. I highly recommend stopping in for a coffee and a quick bite to eat.
Had the crab cake breakfast. Great meal. Crab chowder excellent. A little quirky as many New England places. Very reasonable pricing. 
This place is really good value for money and very popular. The staff are super friendly and could not do enough to help. Everyone from front of house to the kitchen were friendly and very accommodating. We stopped by here for a late lunch and quite a bit of the menu was unavailable due to the lateness of our arrival. But no problem some great recommendations were made and we left happy! The menu had plenty of choice from local seafood to quesadillas. All well prepared and served. Its quite a basic interior, but it adds to the charm. I would recommend if you are in the area. Oh, and the breakfast menu looked even better than lunch!
Anything you could want for breakfast (or lunch). Great general menu, fast service, good food. Local place and busy in the AM. Worth the wait in summer.
On our way to Plymouth and found this little cafe for breakfast. They had the BEST breakfast sandwiches and to our surprise they had the BEST mimosas to go with them. We had a new waitress who had just started that day and she was so nice and did a great job even though she was a bit nervous. A friendly place with a quaint atmosphere, we bought a couple 6A Cafe coffee mugs to remind us of this cafe.
Went twice for a four day stay. The breakfast was terrific and the staff even better. Cannot think of a better place for breakfast
If you're looking for a place with an Old Cape Cod vibe, fantastic food and service to match then look no further, this is where you want to be :)

We were in Sandwich for 4 nights and we had breakfast here 4 times. Whether it was just bacon & eggs, pancakes or their great hash every meal came quick, hot & cooked to order. We really couldn't have been more pleased and satisfied.

The service, namely Victoria who served us each morning was extremely pleasant, informative and always took the time to check on us as well as Thank Us as we left. This world is sorely lacking in pleasant & motivated young workers such as herself, it was a treat!!  Now THAT'S Old Cape Cod at it's finest :)
We love eating here. All of your classic breakfast and lunch.   Staff is always friendly and the cooks are a seasoned team cranking out food.   Prices are very reasonable.
We stopped by for breakfast last weekend, based on Yelp reviews. The people were friendly and the food was very good. We'll be back!
We came here for breakfast and was pleasantly surprised.  The selection is wide just as you would expect and the food is pretty good here.
Stopped  by for breakfast.  Great service, great food,  great prices. We walked out with half our food as the portions were more than hardy. Quick, on the money, service, good morning experience.
We went for breakfast on a Sunday morning. Crowded but tables turned quickly. Food was very good and large helpings. Not a lot of elbow room but friendly staff make you feel at home
This is a nice little diner. We stopped for lunch and it was ok. They really seem to specialize in breakfast which they offer "all day". I had the fish and chips which I'm pretty sure was frozen not fresh and my wife had a quesadilla which was ok. It seemed even at lunch time most folks were having breakfast (which looked pretty good!). The waitress was very pleasant and accommodating. 

We stopped for brunch on our departure from the Cape along the scenic 6A to take in a little more of the Cape than you see along 6. They offer a complete diner breakfast fare including waffles, pancakes, omelettes and the traditional. Great service, plenty of coffee and a few interesting menu choices. The Gronk Sandwich was meatloaf with fired egg, lettuce and tomato with a specialty sauce - delicious and filling. 
Small friendly cafe. The food was very good. Great prices. We ate there twice for breakfast. Would go back. They are only open for breakfast and lunch. 
Stopped by on a Saturday and had lunch.  Food was good; service was good.  Lots of local folks so they must be doing something right.  
6A Cafe is always a sweet local spot for breakfast or lunch, the staff are great and the food is very dependable.  It is getting harder and  harder to find such small locally owned eateries.  We go mainly for breakfast and are never disappointed.
The space is clean and quaint.  Our waitress was friendly, unfrazzled, and responded to our requests quickly.  The food was good.  We lunched here during an exceptionally long drive in traffic off the Cape on Memorial Day.  When someone at the table next to us ordered white wine the waitress explained that they only had one type since it was a much busier day than they had anticipated.  We left the restaurant after their posted open hours had passed and they still were seating new groups. As we were leaving we used the bathroom and the staff person acting as hostess and bus person asked everyone using the bathroom to put toilet paper in the trash rather than the toilet since the bathrooms were being used so much that day.  Not a normal thing to hear in the US.  It soured my experience with the restaurant.  I think they should have closed up shop at their scheduled time rather than making this request.
We have been to Café 6A many times over the years.  The food is good, portions generous and the waitstaff efficient.  Its a nifty little place with close seating and appealing food. There's a miniature train that sometimes runs around on a track near the ceiling that is quite entertaining.
First timers here. Fairly busy for a weekday non summer visit. Service was great, food was good and portions good. Food was very tasty.
Great breakfast excellent staff just right potions not too big and the sell beer and mimosas all day service was fast hashbrowns cooked on grill
Fathers is a victim of overhype. After an opening delay and legions of devotees of the flynns bars and burgers flooding it, it could never meet such high expectations. 

But now that you can get a table with no wait I like this place a lot. I've had the ghost pepper burger on one visit and fish burrito the other. The burger made me sweat 😅 and the fish burrito was the best I've ever had. 

The beer selection is great as expected. Folks complain about price but these beers don't come cheap anywhere. 

The atmosphere can use some work. Not a lot of charm. Personally I don't care but I know it dissuades some. 

I hope fathers is a success. 
Father's is the type of restaurant I love going to. Theres a great atmosphere and they have a wide selection of beers and a decent menu. I'd go again.
I love Flynn's and so when I heard that the owners were going to open a restaurant closer to my home, I was thrilled!   Wellllllll, they messed with the menu and what we have on 6A is a distant relative to our old friend Flynn.  Doesn't even have that Irish Pub feel.  Food was OK and the service slow.  When you have a recipe that works so well, WHY MESS WITH IT??????  They also got rid of the best little bar in town
Tried this new bar which used to be the old bee hive on route 6-A in Sandwich with two other couples. The bar area is cool with a large craft brew selection and a  nice atmosphere. The bar tender was friendly but didn't look ready for a group of six plus other patrons who came in at same time. We asked for table in dinning room and wound up with two booths in the bar area. We had three appetizers and all three were excellent, we ordered our dinner after we ordered our appetizers and all the food came at the same time which made it hard to enjoy the appetizers. The food is very good to excellent, the staff is friendly and attentive to your needs. The price for seven people with drinks was under $200.00, different pub food at a great price and if you like craft beer strongly suggest you visit this pub.. The staff and kitchen needs a little more training as far as timing and communication but looked it over because food was so good!!  
Great beer selection with great pub food. A variety of brick oven pizza's and various burgers. They offer "seasonal" dishes during the summer that may intrigue to the tourist crowd into some decent seafood dishes.  My burger was cooked well and all the beers i tried were good and poured well for having so many offerings. Some of their sister restaurants seem to have dirty beer lines or long lasting kegs because they never seem to taste on point. Father's did not have this issue. I would recommend this place to families, friends couples who are looking for comfort food and great beer with friendly service.
I took some time before writing this review so I wasn't too hot under the collar, and I always try to give people the benefit of the doubt. We were a party of nine and looking forward to trying this restaurant, which is under new ownership since our visit to the Cape last year. They didn't take reservations but said they'd try to put a table aside for us. The wait wasn't too bad -- maybe 15 minutes. We explained right away that we had two gluten free people in our party (they are Celiac and are truly GF). It didn't seem to be a problem as most pizzas on the menu could be made GF. We ordered our drinks -- the beer selection was excellent, and the beers were cold, though they took a bit long to get to our table. So far, no real complaints, and our waitstaff was friendly. We ordered our meals, making sure the GF meals were just that, and we were assured they were. Well, FORTY MINUTES after we ordered, the waitress -- a different one than who had taken our order -- said the ricotta on the pizza was not in fact GF (and we've never heard of non-GF ricotta). We tried to order several items but kept getting told they weren't GF. At this point we were all getting grumpy and very hungry. We made do with plain pizzas. By the time all of our food arrived, it was well over an hour after we'd ordered and it was lukewarm. The pizza was too doughy and gooey for our tastes and everything else was pretty mediocre as well. The worst part was that no one offered a genuine apology for making us wait that long, only to figure out what we wanted wasn't even available. I do give them credit for fessing up that it wasn't GF, as it would have been far worse to just serve it without telling us, but all in all we were very disappointed. I'd go back to have a drink at the bar, but would probably not try dinner again.
Among the best burgers we have had during our three week trip of North East US. Also one of the first places here that dares to put some spices in the food. We appreciated the good selection of beer and the knowledgable staff. Service was excellent.
Ok from the outside this is very deceiving and appears to be more of an eatery than a taphouse.....BUT walk in and turn right into the glory of some of the best beers on the Cape - try a cheeseburger roll and ask for the beer cheese on the side to dip in...sit back sample some brews and listen to the locals yap it up - food is ok, it's more of a taphouse kinda vibe than anything else and one that should not be missed if you're out on the Cape..
As it was the first week of opening it was very busy. Had to wait for a table about 30 minutes. Not a beer drinker and it offers lots of beer choices. Not the greatest choices of food, more Pub like then dinner offers
This was a great meal and end to a week in Sandwich.  My favorite dinner out.  My husband and I got 2 pizzas with Gluten Free crust.  Delicious.  For once, I didn't miss the "regular" pizza crust.  The Garlic Ricotta and Sausage pizza was my favorite and would have me coming back again.  My husband loves trying new beer.  He had two different ones but, saw a flight of beer go by and wished he had gone that route so, he could try a few more.  Next time!  My daughter got a sandwich that was on this wonderful bread, dripping with cheese, avocado and bacon.  She cleared her plate.  The menu looks like pub food when you are glancing online.  It is but, with pizzazz and a lot more effort.  A great place fore everyone.  We will be back.
Came here at the recommendation of a Cape resident who says this is the best place on the Cape for pizza. There were six of us and we went on Wednesday when if you order two pizzas, they're only $7 each. So the bill for my pizza, beer, and tip just came to $13 and if was indeed a great pizza.
I found my pizza on the cape, finally! The beer selection is outstanding, similar to Flynn's, where else can you have Maine Beer Lunch?
The micro and draft beer selection was awesome, Their Pizzas are the best in the area
Try their burgers and you can't go wrong
We live close by and were hoping that the restaurant that replaced the tired Beehive would be an improvement, but no such luck!  They did clean up the place but it doesn't really have a cohesive atmosphere.  But, my primary disappointment is with the food.
A few weeks ago we stopped at the bar in the late afternoon and ordered beers and pizza.  There is a large list of beers on tap, but curiously very few amber or red selections.  The pizza tasted fine but it was served in a shallow basket and was extremely soggy.
We recently returned for dinner and were seated in a booth in the small "middle" room (which used to be the bar for those who remember the Beehive).  Unfortunately we were subjected to the wailing screams of small children both in that room as well as from the adjacent larger dining room.  Service was erratic, as we barely had a chance to settle in and open our menus before a waitress came to take our order.  She returned about a minute later.  However, about mid way through the meal I was ready to order another beer and waited in vain for someone to return to the table; by the time she did, I had finished eating.
For their fried items they use a "Black and Tan" batter which I assume is a beer batter.  This gives the fried crust a grayish hue.  The thick cut onion rings were overcooked and hard.  The cod in the fish and chips was nice and flaky, but the batter dripped grease which in turn made the french fries underneath soggy.  The fries were already somewhat cold, indicating a timing issue with the plating.  The steak tips, ordered medium rare, were somewhat more successful, if a bit chewy.
Since we pass by Father's all the time it has been interesting to watch the number of cars in their parking lot decline significantly since they opened in late winter.  This tells me everyone was eager to try the new place but perhaps many didn't find a reason to return.
I stopped in for a late lunch and was immediately impressed by the atmosphere, just what I'd want in a casual pub-style restaurant. The servers were very nice and accommodating to a couple of special requests...a place to plug in my phone, and a chance to wash up before my meal as I'd been cycling for a while. The menu was interesting and featured some house special burgers as well as a build-your-own option. They also featured a Belgian waffle and fried chicken meal that I'd definitely try if I was feeling more adventurous. I had a burger and some fries. The burger was big and juicy, the bun was tasty and unique, the fries were absolutely perfect. Highly recommended!
The old Beehive Restaurant was bought and renovated by the people who own Flynns in Sagamore. We love Flynns, and had high expectations when we walked in, and we were not disappointed. We sat at the bar, and I ordered a gluten free beer - Omission.  My boyfriend couldn't make up his mind, so the bartender let him taste (common practice) a few draft beers before he settled on Free Will Dragon (hoppy and delicious). I chose the Ghost Burger ($12.89) because it was topped with habanero relish and Jack cheese. It was crazy hot and delicious and I loved every bite. I chose the fries as an accompaniment,  and they were good too: hot and crispy. My boyfriend had the steak tips (melt in your mouth good) with mashed potatos and apple jalapeno slaw ($16.99). We had Patrone straight up ($8.75 each) for dessert, and as we sipped we were already making plans to return. 
The Sandwich area gets a much-needed addition to its restaurant alternatives with the recent opening of Father's.  The interior is divided into three sections, specifically Tap House (which has the bar and a number of tables), Snug (a very small and quieter area), and Dining (which is a more open, louder area, with a large TV at one end and better suited for kids).  For our May 2016 visit, our server was Jesse who was great -- very attentive and friendly.  Our three meals of steak tips, prime rib burger, and a cheese pizza were all excellent, with the only negative being that the burger and steak tips were considerably underdone.  Prices were reasonable and the place overall has a great atmosphere.  In short, a really good dining experience which will likely be packed in-season.
Food is pub style and delicious.   Pizza is stone fired and fun combination of ingrediance.   40 taps for beer selections!
Stopped in twice on the way home from the Cape to Boston, and both visits were a pleasure. Fresh ingredients and creative presentations - good burgers, sandwiches, interesting beers. Cozy and comfortable. Give it a try!
We went here for an early Mother's Day meal for dinner. No wait, fabulous service, great drinks, average prices and average food. My grandmother loved her fish and chips, my mother thought her veggie chili was a little too spicy and I enjoyed my caprese sandwich but found it barely had any basil on it. My mother had the chocolate stout which was delicious and I had the lavender mead which was also really tasty. Not sure I would go back as the food really did not excite me.
Whether you play golf or just want to relax....
Comfortable awaits,  grab a beer, cold drink, some lunch and look out over the green on a hot day.   Relax you will.
I play golf at Sandwich Hollows Golf Course and always have lunch here after golf. Great sandwiches, Fried fish, scallops, fried clams (when available) great service; very pleasant. Friday night is prime rib night. Excellent!
This restaurant/lounge is the best in town! My fiance and I have been here every week since we discovered it in August this year. From breakfast to dinner to an evening beer/nightcap, it has NEVER disappointed! The staff is the friendliest around and the food can't be beat. I have zero complaints! Prices are extremely reasonable, great crowd/atmosphere...we are planning on having our wedding reception here as well, it's lovely with the most amazing views!
Visiting relatives at an RV resort park, the guys were chatting about their upcoming golf match at this course. We decided we should go for supper. Good choice. I opted for the one of the specials - this one was a steak bomb quesadilla. Sounded interesting. Hubby got the last order of steak tips. Both our choices were yummy. Again, half of mine went home with me and was as good re-heated!  Good food at a decent price and good service. 
We had seen Philbrick's advertised in the Cape Cod Times as a breakfast spot & decided to try it this past weekend.  It is a bar/café located at the Old Barnstable Golf Course.  Nothing fancy and we sat at the bar on an unusually quiet Sunday afternoon.  I had the $1.99 special - 2 eggs, toast & homefries & it was a great deal.  My partner  had scrambled with mushrooms & peppers and we were both very happy.  On a nice day you can sit on the patio. Somewhat limited menu, but should satisfy most everyone looking for breakfast or lunch.  They are open till 8 pm or so.
love coming here in and out.
 parking lot I hate ! wish was bigger .
staff are great always smiling and supper friendly. 
Needed that coffee! Conveniently located more or less next door to the place from which I was headed to the beach. Saw sign and turned in right then. Glad they had a drive-through.
We frequent Dunkin Donuts almost every day no matter where we are.  Why can't the servers put the sleeves in the hot lattes?  I'm going to get scalded and drop it in the floor or on the ground at the drive through.  Plus I'm handed the scalding cup with the sleeve on the side at the same time.  I'm supposed to be able to grab them together.  They always say..they are not allowed to put the sleeve on.  Why can't they put the sleeve on the cup when they make the coffee first at the machine?   Also, they seem to think people wipe their mouths on their sleeves or pants.  Please know people need napkins included at the window orders.
DD is in my blood.  It was born in Boston, so was I, It's about the same age as me and I've loved it all my life.  Maybe there's better donuts or better coffee but I can count on the coffee to be good, hot & fresh and the d-nuts to be delicious. It's my #1 coffee shop.  It's family.
I love Dunking Donuts, but this place is one of the best. The service is exceptional, even when they are busy, and that is most of the time. It's the place to get not only great donuts, but the coffee is always hot, and fresh. The staff always meets you with a smile, and makes sure that you get what you ordered. The tables, and floor are always clean, and it is kept that way at all times. This Dunkin Donuts has some of the best prepared donuts, and those that are supposed to be filled, are filled, and not just with air.  I realize they follow the same directions made by Dunkin, but they do a better job than most stores.
On our first night of our weekend away and my first real trip to the Cape, we decided to eat here based on the pictures on their web page. I was really in the mood for an antipasto and they advertised exactly what I wanted. 

Perhaps stock pictures should be removed if what the restaurant has is a mixed greens, with some lunch meat and cucumbers thrown at it kind of salad; No olives, no banana peppers, etc... the pizza was small and average again nothing like the web page depicted. 

I am sure this place is big among the locals. The teens working were very flirtatious and loud regarding their work schedules. Service was quick but it wasn't quite what we were looking for. 
We are staying up the road and this place was recommended. Ordered a large pizza and tried to order what they call an "antipasto"
I asked if they could leave the turkey off, yes, turkey on an antipasto. And she said no! What the heck? As for the pizza, we eat alot of them where we are from. It was no big deal. Average. 
Like I say, woman at counter very rude.
Another Pizza Place?  Yes, but this one excels with fresh ingredients.  We tried this one because we were getting tired of the same old... same old. We ordered by phone and the girl was very helpful and knew her menu by heart.. She gave us the ready time (20 minutes) and when we arrived the pizza was ready.  This shop is located in a small plaza and the signage for the store is not good. (Only reason for the 4 star rating) now that I know where it is not a problem. Inside was clean and well lit.  Their website indicated take out only but there were at least a dozen tables inside. Staff was very friendly from the girls at the counter to the guys in back doing the cooking. 
When we got the pizza home.  We were impressed with the appearance, quantity and quality of the fresh veggies.  I mean fresh.  They   looked   and tasted like they were picked that morning.  Over all we were quite impressed with this little shop that could easily become our favorite pizza place in Sandwich.  An speaking of Sandwiches, their menu features a wide variety of subs, rollups, salads and goodies.
After a day of driving around eating the Cape's best seafood, we needed a break and decided to go to the Sandwich Pizza House for dinner.  We preordered our pizza and when we arrived we were greeted by the friendly staff, gave them our name and they told us to have a seat because the pizza had a few more minutes.  When the pizza was ready they brought it over to us.  The pizza was delicious just as we had remembered when we visited of couple years back.  We would definitely order pizza again from here.
Lousy ingredients, carelessly prepared. The roast beef sandwhich was made of  the kind of deli roast beef that tastes synthetic; real bottom of the barrel quality.  The pizza became edible only with tons of salt and garlic powder, and even then it was hard to get past the bad crust that had the  texture of toasted white bread. 
I'm totally perplexed how this place possibly had a 4 1/2 star rating. We didn't expect fine dining, just a cozy neighborhood spot with decent food.  What a disappointment. 
After a day at local museums, we were looking for an affordable dinner. Everything in town was either closed or quite pricey. We stumbled on this place on the way out of town, on Rt 6A. What a happy surprise. Pizza was delicious!!
This is a local eatery, everyone from the bus drivers, the firemen and the town workers eat here.
Very consistent food quality. they have a delivery service that is second to none.
We grabbed some grub for a night in during our trip to Sandwich.  We ordered a small cheese and pepperoni pie.  The pizza was good--we asked for well-done and they obliged, leaving us with a crisp, crunchy crust.  All the ingredients were tasty.  We also shared a small Steak Sandwich, ordered with extra cheese.  The roll was nice, the steak was good, but going with mozzarella as their cheese is a miss.  The cheese didn't really give the sandwich any flavor.  I just assumed it would have provolone--so if you order one be sure to ask for provolone instead.  A nice little pizza shop right in Sandwich.
This is a pretty good place for a quick pizza which is always wanted.  The service is friendly and it is centrally located to all places in this town.
Just go and order up - you'll more than likely run into the owner.  this is one of those spots you overlook but if you want some pizza around Sandwich this is a real real good lil spot to hit on a budget....yum...did I say it was tasty!?!?
We ate here for lunch one day. The pizza looked fine, but we opted for submarine sandwiches instead. They  had beef, cheese, mushrooms and onions. We found the beef to lack juiciness and flavor, so we had to add ketchup. If I had to eat here again I would try the pizza. 
Ordered takeout from here and was greeted by a friendly person on the phone and then a kind and accommodating person in store.  We ordered 4 pizzas and would not have had any issue carrying them out ourselves.  The gentleman insisted and was very chatty while walking to out car while carrying our pizzas.

The pizzas were delicious but a bit high in price for my liking.  I do not feel a large pizza should be more than 10.00.  They did give us one free small with the order!  I appreciated the generosity as we were feeding 12 children!

I would recommend this pizza place!  
Very tasty pizzas. Friendly service. Ready on time for pickup. Give it a try when in the area you won't be disappointed.
Friendly service and good tasting pizza (we got the small pepperoni pizza - perfect for two). Priced a little high, but that seems to be the area. Took our food and drove to the Canal Visitors Center where we enjoyed the view.
We have tried all the pizza places (that deliver) in the Sandwich area. We like Sandwich Pizza the best.
Picked up a pepperoni pizza to go and it was excellent  Prepared quickly and enjoyed by my entire family.
Great staff. Subs are loaded with a ton price is great for fam dinning clean and friendly. Service was quick brought food to are table
This is one of the places that men-in-trucks go for good pizza and food.  Tucked into a little group of stores, the food is reliably good.  The owners, a family, I believe, are active in the community and give back generously.  Ambiance? décor?  Its a pizza place....good pizza...YES!
The service is amazing , pizza fresh and delicious, and the place would be perfect for families friends couples and or someone on their lunch break! Every weekend I get green pepper and linguicia pizza soo tasty!!!
Yummy, old style pizza and subs.  Very friendly, efficient service at a reasonable price.  Always a smile and never any mistakes with your order.  Quick in and out.  Mark and staff will make your sandwich or pizza any way you like it and never skimp on ingredients.
I come to this DD's all the time on my way off or on Cape. The staff is always friendly both at the drive up and walk in counter. Service has always been helpful and efficient. Food has always been fresh and my coffee hot. I really love my summer iced coffee! One of my favorite stops.
Fun place to stop for a couple of drinks, especially at the weekend.  They had a band playing, and they were actually quite good and played danceable modern and popular music.  People were dancing, but not much before 10pm.

Service was fairly quick.  Drinks prepared perfectly well.  Seemed to have a good bar selection, but nothing super fancy.

We did not eat, although I know they have a popular bar food type menu, burgers, etc.  Doesn't really look like the type of place I'd order more than some nacho's or a small shared snack though.

The exterior of the building doesn't really do it justice.  Makes it look much lower-end that it should.  Plenty of parking on-site.
Lots of lottery,  food is good ,prices ok, service is up and down ,for a burger it's fine, little noise at the bar but a decent bar.
Thought we'd try again, but the lounge service was so disappointing. Had a group of 8 ... we were there for dinner drinks and the entertainment. But to the waitress and bartender, we were not welcome. I then asked, very calmly, did we do something wrong, he very coldly said, nothings wrong. We probably would've spent 4-5 hundred easily. But we left due to poor attitude. I hope Thonis reads this. He's the owner. SMH
During a trip to Cape Cod my hubby and I decided to try this restaurant for the first time and we were very happy with our choice. We had a cocktail at the bar and because we had 2 drinks (one each) we were given a choice of complimentary appetizers (happy hour special before 6PM) We chose calamari and it was very good. We enjoyed the Wednesday night pasta dinners at $10.49 each and both came with soup or a salad. We opted for salad and it was very fresh and tasty. I had the shrimp scampi and it was one of the best I have ever eaten. Hubby had the chicken parmigiana and it too was excellent. We had a great dinner. The food and the service made for a very enjoyable dining experience. We will definitely make it a "go to" place for future visits to the Cape. I would not hesitate to recommend it.
My husband and I visited this establishment for dinner, and we would easily recommend it for anyone interested in a hearty meal in a friendly atmosphere!

All the service staff were exceptionally friendly, and multiple staff (aside from our own waitress) made sure we were enjoying our meal.  Our own waitress, Jeanie, was phenomenal and an absolute sweetheart!  That, coupled with a "western" environment, makes for a great overall atmosphere.

The food itself was also great!  We ordered the 'Merica burger to split, and we loved it.  It came with a side of fries.  For dessert, we ordered the Oreo brownie, which was superb!  Another perk about this restaurant is their "half-price Tuesday", where everything on the menu is half-price.

We will definitely be returning here in the near future!
Had the Greek swordfish and it was Sooo yummy!  Love the food here👌🏼 My friend got pizza and loved it!  Excellent cocktails, too...
We go here often and its consistently good. It has more on the menu then you'd expect and there are healthy options as well as a gluten free menu. Service is good, and you can play Keno!
After an almost five year hiatus we again returned to Cape Cod. One of our Must do stops was to dine again at Sandwich Taverna. As always, the food is excellently prepared, service is always friendly and prompt, excellent drinks, great homemade desserts. 

What more can we say about Sandwich Taverna. It is, and always was, a total hit with us whenever we visited Cape Cod. Well worth the trip. You will not be disappointed with the portions, the quality, of food or drinks offered at very reasonable prices.
Delicious food, good drinks, reasonable pricing and friendly bartender. Convenient to campground and Cape Cod area.
We live in town and like to eat dinner here before seeing a movie next door.  They have a nice selection of american fare (decor is western).  Lots of specials make it a great value.  My wife and I get the date special (bottle of wine, appetizer, two entrees, share desert).  I had the fish and chips, she had the prime rib.  Both were good.  The waitress was friendly and attentive.  We will come here again.
Note that at one end is a bar with live music most nights.  Plan to be done with dinner by 9 unless you want to listen to the band.
Love going here with my son (10 years old.)  He and I will usually split an adult-sized steak with the day's sides.  The staff is consistently friendly and accommodating.

I must stress that I've seen great improvement in both service and food in the last couple/three years.  It appears that management has stepped it up.

Personally like sitting in the bar area booths.
We've eaten here before and always enjoyed it. The Taverna has a bit of a country flare with it's high beamed ceiling and pictures of Clint Eastwood and cowboy paraphernalia on the walls. The service is always very friendly, from the owner who greets and seats you, to the waitresses, and the service always timely. The food is good, the portions large, the prices reasonable. We like to get the 'dinner for 2' special which has two dinners, a bottle of wine, an appetizer to split, and a dessert all for a single low price. I had the prime rib which was perfectly seasoned, my husband got the fish and chips which was tasty and fresh, and we got fried calamari for the appetizer which was nice and al-dente, not chewy. They have bands come in on the weekends after 9:00 which are always good. We had a movie to run off to so we only got to hear the first song. Get the garlic mashed potatoes for your side dish, they're the best around.
We visited for the first time today for a late lunch. We were at a movie and the cinema is next door to the Taverna. The exterior promised "Family friendly dining" and live entertainment on certain nights. The interior has a large, open dining area with a separate bar and a large stone fireplace. The place was pretty empty at 3:30 p.m. but we were warmly greeted by the wait staff. The Taverna's theme is a little confusing, western decor, flags from branches of the military, and some beachy, Cape Cod touches. Overall it felt pretty homey. Our waitress brought menus and told us that since it was Tuesday, everything on the menu except for pizza was half-price! I ordered a glass of wine ($5.00 special). We ordered a Greek salad, fish and chips and a hamburg. Everything was good. The salad was heavy with feta and olives and was well dressed. The hamburg was fine, the french fries very good and my husband loved the fish. The bill was presented and the discount taken at the end so that we would tip our waitress appropriately. By the time we left, the place was getting busy. I noticed that certain days ( Sunday and Monday, I believe) the pizza was on special. We appreciate the strategy of special prices on certain days, and will definitely return.
Meal is always cooked to perfection, fast, and fresh. They serve tater-tots that are sooo amazing. I've eaten everything from steaks, burgers and pizza, and it's always great. My fave is the Greek pizza! 
The staff are wonderful. Ellen and Diane are great behind the bar for a good cocktail or lunch. They are friendly, personal,and professional.
the atmosphere is always friendly and fun. The weekend entertainment is always a great verity of LOCAL bands. Always a great spot. Great music is always playing in the background! 
All around its a great family business, that has the support of locals all year round, so making this a stop on your trip Down to Sandwich is a must, or swing off the highway for a quick lunch, so your not sitting in traffic on your way home off-cape!
The bar area has good apps, the atmosphere is great and the food will do.  Good for a bigger group given they have the space.  Wings are very good.  
We were given a very generous gift certificate to the restaurant so we could order pizza from the Sunday Night specials menu. We have ordered four times. Two pizzas were fairly well made. The ones we ordered this weekend were not good at all. the crust was dry and the topping was very thin. From now on we will order something simple like a sandwich to use up the gift certificates. It isn't worth trying the pizza again.
The atmosphere tends to be on the cowboy theme, lots of memorabilia on the walls, both western and sport related.  Staff is extremely friendly and attentive.  The food is excellent and portions are more than ample.  My husband had the burger (which came with the bun 'branded' - ST) and was tasty, not to mention huge.  I had prime rib (a special), which was also very good.  Sandwich Traverna also has a special offer for couples - $39.99 dinner for two, including appetizer to share, soup, salad, entree (many good choices!), and desert.  Great deal.  Highly recommend this establishment!
Trying to find something on the menu is easy with such a picky family. There is something for everyone and the staff is great. You can tell that the management has trained them to truly put the costumer first, and it's so refreshing to see the above and beyond service. I highly recommend the lunch and dinners.
Fun bar and good bar food. Dinner is over priced and service can be sketchy. Owner/ manager is not great! Treats his staff rudely. 
This place is probably good if you are looking for pizza or burgers or pub fare but other than that the menu is very limited. When we arrived we were given menus with the day's specials. The only thing special was the prices. Probably $8-$10 too high per entree. Our meals were just OK. As I said nothing special
Y
Had made a reservation, but waited forever for a table. They do not know how to handle a crowded Saturday night. Good food, but will not be back. People after us had to wait even longer as the night wore on.
The restaurant was packed with people and very noisy and bustling on the Friday evening we went. Definitely a place to book if you want to eat there. Four of us shared lobster arancini with cheesy garlic bread as a starter, there were four tennis ball sized portions of good lobster risotto but so filling that when the large main courses arrived we knew we'd not manage to finish all we'd ordered. The restaurant boxed up our leftovers, but we'd have been happy with smaller portions to begin with. The staff worked very hard but there could have been more on duty to have ensured faster service, we wouldn't normally mind relaxed dinner service but one of our party needed to get to work afterwards.
Fabulous srevice very attentive friendly helpful. The food was dreadful. Everything was tasteless. I chose Portofino Scallops. It was like eating rubber. No self respecting Italian would serve this rubbish .Portions are huge everyone was leaving with doggy bags.We did too and it went straight into the rubbish.Remember less is more!!Dont bother going .
By far the best Italian restrurant around, very clean ,great food nice service ,been there many times , never been disappointed. 
Being that this is an Italian type restaurant, I felt confident ordering pasta dishes.  On my first visit I had ravioli and chicken with a pesto type sauce.  It was good and the portion large.  My husband had veal and it was very good. Second time I had plain pasta pesto.  It was swimming in a sea of green oil.  Would not order that again.  Service was good, though it is a noisy, busy place.  Not good for a quiet dinner.
we went in for a nice dinner out with entertainment . My husband could not eat his chowder thought it had soured.. I had angel hair pasta with vegetable primavera i waited a good 30 minutes and was just awful 
Six of us went to Tomatoes Italian Bar & Grill on a Sunday evening we had booked our table a couple of days before as we were told it can get very busy.
When we arrived the restaurant was very busy we were shown to our table and our server came along in a couple of minutes to take our drinks order.
the service from the start to the end was very good nothing was a problem.
I had the clam chowder one of the best I've ever had the others ordered apps to share you should have seen the size of the meatball that came out you could have used it for football.  Everyone ordered their mains I went for the 18oz steak which I admit I could only finish half of it & had the rest boxed to take home. I think everyone except one had food to take away.
I would have no hesitation in recommending this restaurant
This restaurant came highly recommended and as we were seeing a movie later nexr door, our group of 11 women, most who have been or continue to be in the restaurant business, chose to have dinner and a few drinks here.  It went smoothly through our orders but while waiting for our dinner, several of us had empty drinks before us and our server didn't return until dinner had arrived.  It was on our waitresses return that a glass of wine was split down my back, from shoulder to seat.  I received a hurried apology and 3 extra napkins.  That was it.  No further apologies, no drink taken off my tab or discount given.  I was forced to change into a sweatshirt and continue on.  As for our meals, everyone enjoyed their orders, however the waitress wouldn't know that because she never returned to ask how everything was.  On our departure,  one of the group mentioned the incident to the hostess who quickly apologized and offered to take care of my dry cleaning tab- but the evening and experience had already soured for me.  I hear the gnocchi was great, as was the salmon and meatballs, but our service fell short and therefore my poor review.
service was the worst I have ever had,  the staff was more busy talking with a each other or a couple of regulars at the bar than waiting on customers, whoever is managing that place needs a new job in a different industry
My family and I went to Tomatoes Italian Bar & Grille for a special evening out.  I had made a reservation.  We were greeted and promptly seated.  Our bread and drinks came fairly quickly.  But we had to wait 35 minutes for our entrees.  The waitresses were very busy delivering alcoholic drinks.  When our food finally came, some was good, some was bad, some was hot and some was cold.  It was difficult to get our waitresses attention.  

This restaurant is moderately expensive.  Save you money and go somewhere else.
My wife and I had dinner with friends on the Cape at this truly good Italian restaurant. Our affable and friendly waitress provided excellent service. The food was excellent and the portions were generous. I had one of the specials - Pappardelle, my wife had spinach and ricotta ravioli and we all shared Fettuccini Alfredo - all truly excellent. The prices are very reasonable and although the restaurant was somewhat spacious, we did not have any problem carrying on a conversation. In other words, it was not noisy.
I would definitely return and recommend that anyone looking for good Italian food on the Cape should visit this establishment.
We waited probably a good 30 minutes just to get our drinks. Mind you, very straight forward. Sodas and 2 Shirley temples. The appetizer came out quick (chicken wings) but they were dry and tasteless. Then the meals?  Forget about it. Took over an hour.  We almost left. And the food id super mediocre. Our waitress was not attentive at all. Didnt offer refills,  never cleared the table. The one time she did she just took the bread from us because there wasny anymore room left on the table for any other drinks. Terrible experience. I would not reccomend it. Im sure it was an off night, but really? Over an hour when the place wasnt even packed?  No excuse for that.
We went on a Saturday evening with no reservations. We managed to get seats at the bar. The food was awesome, the menu variety was very good and the company great. Would highly recommend!
Very good Italian dishes from and massive menu. The veal scaloppine was tasty and quite a large serving. Excellent wine list though pricey. 

Good service and attentive staff. This isn't our first trip and we will return another time. 
My husband I and dine at Tomatoes at least once a month. The food is always good and reliable, the waitresses are always pleasant and we always leave feeling we had a good dining experience.  Even during the summer months!
We went to celebrate my wife's 77th birthday.  The restaurant was fully aware of the event as I made it clear when I made our dinner reservations. We were promptly seated in a great corner location. We ordered wine, Pellogrino, and a delicious appetizer (Lobtster Arancinin) and shared it as the portion was very generous. My wife's wine, a Silver Palm cabernet, was awful so she exchanged it a pleasant (less expensive) Rufino Chianti. My wife ordered the special almond encrusted salmon with spinach. Her dish was excellent. I ordered lamb chops with potato and asparagus. I was served what appeared to be a lamb (?) stew with risotto. The waitress told me that was "the special". I said that I ordered from the menu. She said that they did not have lamb chops, then looked at the menu, and offered to make my order over. I said that would take too long, that I would try the meat dish in front of me but I wanted the risotto removed from my plate(after she tried to leave it there while she went for the specifies side dish, after I repeated that I wanted the potatoes and asparagus that would have been with the lamb chop. She removed the dish and brought a fresh one with the meat dish, potatoes and SPINACH! I said that I wanted asparagus and she replied that she would have noted that if that was what I said. My wife said that she heard me specifically place the order for the lamb chop (it was one of the reasons we chose Tomatoes for the dinner) and repeated my desire for the asparagus. I tasted the meat dish. It was awful. The heavy sauce was over[powering and the meat a bit on the tough side. I was unable to eat it. At that  point my wife had completed her dinner. The waitress then asked if we would like to take the food home. AAARRRGGGHHH Why would I bring home something that I did not order or like in the restaurant? My wife wanted desert for her B'Day. we ordered her a crème brulet. She said it was excellent. Whe the waitress brought the bill she said that she removed my dish as I did not seem to enjoy it. WHAT AN UNDERSTATEMENT!
Went in on 06/16/2016 no reservation sat in the bar area bartender came over took our drink order we told her we would need menus which she gave us and for the next 45-50 min. she took other people's orders that came in after us and we were never asked if we had decided or how are we doing we asked for the bill and left very poor customer service won't be back anytime soon
This is the best Italian restaurant around! The food is amazing! I recommend making a reservation because the place is packed! The staff is super friendly and always seem to know when you need something. Great wine list, super desserts! Mark and Jeanine really know how to run a restaurant.
Not the same as it used to be. Just not good food, waitstaff less then attentive.  I had the pasta boulebaise &Veal parmesan. Even the bread was less then good. Very pricey not worth the money. I won't go back.
Best food around. Never had a bad experience. Always new and creative specials on the menus. Nightly specials. Seasonal specials. Monster martinis. 
This is one of the worst excuse for pizza I've seen.  It's nothing like a real great Italian pizza. It's a doughy, heavy crust that tastes like it was pre-frozen.  IMO, simply not worth it if you appreciate good Italian food.
We don't usually go for pizzas from large chain restaurant, but we decided to try this one this weekend. Once we got used to the format, the on line ordering was simple and we could get what we wanted as far as toppings go.  We could even get more or less than usual if we wanted.  Finished pizza was good and pick up time was accurate.
Cheap , doughy, and delivered. Can't say much more than that. It's edible but nothing to rave about.
I ordered a Brooklyn 14 inch pepperoni, mushroom and bacon on line. Special for 7.99. Picked it up and no wait - hot and tasty - I was pleasantly surprised -also  staff was nice -  will go back definitely - will order the 16" - it went so fast - I am a pizza nut and this was very nice.
Your typical Domino's Pizza. Good pizza, awesome sides like cheesy bread, and prompt service and friendly associates. Recommended for a nice quick bite to eat, with reasonable prices. 
These guys got to be kidding.  They make the lousiest pizza on the planet.  There was a time when they delivered and most others didn't so they grew the business.  Now everybody else delivers too. So why call Domino's?  Kiddingly, I ate a piece of the box.  It tasted about as bad as the pizza.  
The service is good, fast but the pizza is  barely better than frozen pizza. How do they stay in business? Good marketing?
Nothing special, burgers were good,  I'd go back.  Would not go out of my way.  Red Robin,  Flynns,  5 guys, all have better burgers.
Good local stop for a drink and a burger or chicken sandwich.

Whisky assortment is better than average.

Chicken Sandwiches are all decent and if you like one of the burgers, but would prefer it as chicken they will substitute.  My preference is the beer battered onion rings over the french fries.

The bar side has games at the tables and darts with decent tvs.
Burgers with no flavor. Thin burger that slides off the bun, The French fries are very good.  The staff was nice. Never going back there. My friend said the same exact thing about the burgers.
Tried this restaurant when it first opened and although I had no complaints, it didn't do much for me.  Went back recently and they have really reached their stride.  Great food! My friend had a hamburger and praised it at length.  I had a chicken burger and was equally happy.  In fact went back a week later and had the same good experience.  One night when being very lazy decided to try the take-out.  Ordered chicken wings, original and garlic parmesan.  Both were great, very meaty and the sauce was amazing.  So glad this place is close. Also, all the times we have gone, it has very busy.
This place is great! There is not much to do around here during the off season and this is a nice place to go for a great burger and a game of darts. We have been happy everytime we go and have gotten take-out as well.  The burgers are usually cooked to medium (a bit of pink) so if you want it well done, make sure you tell them. They also have a nice bar, some table top games, and some big TVs if you're looking to watch the game.  It is family friendly though (I have taken my 1 year old). Overall, a fun little spot to grab a juicy burger with family or friends.
My husband and I have been to JD's several times.  We have enjoyed the burgers, pastrami sandwich and the steak sandwich along with their delicious french fries.  We prefer sitting on the bar side.  The staff is always friendly and efficient.  There are dart boards to use and games at the tables - fun!!
No one at our table enjoyed their food. At best, it was mediocre. The burgers were huge, greasy messes. Salmon burger was processed, freezer section quality. You can get better salads by the bag at the supermarket. Not a quality dining experience. Stick to BBC, Chew, Mashland or Bobby Byrnes, much better food at any other local place.
Went there for my first time with a friend and they under cooked her burger, didn't fix it, the sweet potato fries that were to accompany the burger came out about 20 minutes later!  Was there for a friends birthday after a movie. Gentlemen behind the bar refused to take off the burger or try to do anything to correct situation.  Would not recommend to anyone and will NEVER go back terrible service, attitudes etc...Stay away!  Sodas overpriced and in a small mug, onion rings over cooked and about 4-6 in an order!
I have found my new favorite place.  I love a good Burger and JD's hasn't disappointed me yet.  Me and the family have visited at least 10 times in the past 2 months and always a great meal.  Burgers are always extremely fresh and fries are awesome.  Last night I tried the chicken sandwich and it was excellent.  Kids love the hotdogs and wife really likes the pastrami.  Owners and staff are very friendly and make you feel like family.  Keep doing what your doing JD's we love it.
I don't think you will find a nicer staff, friendly and smiling. The burger at a burger joint should be the best product, this one falls a bit below the mark. I am a burger lover so when I see Burger co. I get excited, this one needs an upgrade. Jd's has a lot going for it-location and staff but start with a quality patty.
It's burger's but much more than that. Great chicken, and pork sandwich's and some of the best french fries, onion rings. Salads are not bad also. Everything tastes like is made fresh. I just wish I had found it earlier, moving out of state
We were travelling after a trip to Provincetown and we decided to stop at JD's for a quick dinner. The place is nice. The menu has a very large choice of hamburgers and buns. You can also create your own burger. I really enjoyed mine...it was delicious!The staff has been really nice and well prepared.
Decided to try JD one evening while out with the wife and daughter.  I really enjoy a good burger and figured this was a good time to check out a local place.

Very friendly people and a nice newly expanded location.  Looks to be family run and staffed.

We ordered a couple burgers and a salad.

Was a little surprised when the food arrived on disposable dinnerware and plastic utensils and the salad was in a supermarket type metal foil bowl.  I was definitely let down with the obviously frozen patty burger on a nice pretzel roll without lettuce tomato or onion. For an $11 plus burger I was expecting something a little better quality.  

They have a nice place and obviously aspire to be a quality burger restaurant but they have some work to do.


Great burgers and great staff!  Will come back again.  Selection was good and for a first time visit I had trouble deciding.  Choose the special which was Pig❤️'s Cow burger and was not disappointed at all. Time for a nap!
My family and I have been here numerous times over the past few months and we have never been dissappointed. The burgers are some of the best I've had and anything else I've ordered on the menu has been delicious as well. They are opening a bar next to the restaurant that I excited to check out. It's great to see a locally owned restaurant do well
Stopped in for lunch and Wow! Great burger and fries. Prepare to get messy, I burned through 5 napkins and wanted to eat my fingers when I was done. That's gotta say something right? Highly recommended. 
We have heard a lot of hype about this burger restaurant in Sandwich. When you think burger most of us think beef..JD's calls everything a burger, beef that was CAB and top shelf, chicken, turkey, and salmon. The meal came out quickly and the staff was friendly.  It's a walk up and order during the week, but our meal was delivered to the table and half way through the cook came over and asked if the meal was ok.  It was more than ok it was excellent.  They have a good selection of beer that was bottle only.  It was well worth the drive from Falmouth.
Sandwich doesn't have many local options and it's great to have a year-round, go-to burger joint. We enjoyed our burgers - lots of variety. I tried the Steak Bomb Sandwich which I loved. Burgers and sandwiches have a nice option of either brioche or pretzel rolls served with spicey fries (or an up charge for sweet potato or beer battered onion rings). 

The beer and wine list is decent. We also tried deep-fried banana peppers as an app which were tasty and a twist on fried pickles. 

My husband's two descenting opinions were around price (he felt it was bit pricey for a burger joint) and burger quality (he felt the burgers should be hand-made patty vs. a regular pre-made burger).

However, we're going back and would send our friends. 
Large burger on a pretzel roll with fresh seasoned fries. The burger was juicy and delicious. Plenty of toppings to choose from. Service was friendly and fast. A nice choice for a quick bite. We'll go back again. $30 including tip for 2.
A welcome addition to easy eats in Sandwich, the town just hasn't got lots and lost of choices for relatively "fast food"!  Hot dog was all beef, much larger than average, fantastic and fresh brioche bun - and with a huge portion of hot, fresh seasoned fries...just a titch over 5 bucks...   A new "go-to" for me...  I was in and out in less than 10 minutes - and hadn't called ahead... I saw many orders of brugers being ordered and prepared while I was waiting - they looked really good and nice fresh pretzel rolls and some thick, hot sweet potatoe fries went by as well... The cooks (3) were clean, fast, and friendly...  The place is spotless... Special of the day was lobster roll, again - brioche...  Feels like a touch of class with a bit of a country western yet homey spin!!  Nice job...
I have eaten here several times and had one delivery.  Every time has been wonderful. The extra large Greek pizza with red sauce is amazing.  I will highly recommend this restaurant to all and will continue to return. Thanks for such good food.
Driving around after a little rainy walk trying to grab a quick lunch.  Ended up at this mini mall with a few food selections.  Tripadvisor gave this place many stars.  I love good pizza and have had my share of mediocre and good slices.  This is the best pizza I have ever had.  Crust was amazingly fresh and perfectly baked.  Lots of cheese and our toppings-burger and eggplant very tasty.  Owner(?)/hostess was very friendly and the place is full of pretty original art.  The place has won local awards for good reason.
We ate here two nights while we stayed at the Earl of Sandwich.  They deliver the Pizza was Amazing and the Calzone was delicious and was 1/2 a pizza but was so good.  The delivery drivers were great as we had 5 couples ordering and they were able to get our food to us fast and correct.
Recommended by a co-worker and the place is great. Not being from the upper Cape but needed a place to grab and go. Hubby said his steak n cheese was the best he's had in ages (including D'Angelos!) and my Italian sub was perfect. I love that when ordering a sub you have many choices of the size-not just small or large. Came back another night for the pizza. It was good but doesn't travel well if driving an hour to get home. But that isn't the restaurants fault. And, it was good pizza!  Ordered in person first time/online the second. Both great experiences. The service was terrific. Staff is friendly and efficient. The place is immaculate. Looking forward to returning soon and trying everything else. My new go to!! Thanks 2Bros!!
We had heard good things about this restaurant so we stopped in on a Wednesday evening to try.  I ordered a Mediterranean pizza with red sauce and my wife a Greek pizza.  They were very good.  Most likely the best local pizza around.  Fast service, pleasant wait staff and nice atmosphere.  Nicely done, I will return, and pass along high praise for this restaurant.
The food itself is fine but just average. The service was just so rude and unpleasant that I never plan on returning and I don't recommend this place to anyone. Its not hard to be nice I really don't understand why businesses hire rude employees.
We are in, a group of 6, and shared the family sized salad along with two pizzas. Salad was fresh and nicely presented, with many choices for salad dressing. Pizza was delicious, with a fairly thin crust, well filled with veggies. Next time I will hope to try one of their specialty pizzas! Excellent counter service. Restaurant seats maybe 25 people, and I could see they do a great take out business. Sign says they also deliver.
This is a family run cheap eats place with great food...always good! We always have fun here and the owner Jim makes you feel at home its a very pleasant atmosphere.
The food was good. There's no table service, you place your order and they bring your meal, which is served on disposable dishes. I was in and out in 30 minutes. 
Food was really good...Got the steak bomb combo which comes with fries and a drink. On their menu board it says $10.25. Ok there was a note next to it saying prices have changed ask the person who is taking your order. I figured it be 25 cents or maybe 50 cents more...not almost $2 more. Places to eat should change their ONLINE menu and their IN HOUSE menu before changing their prices officially. How do we know its almost $12.50 plus tax if there is no proof online or on their in house menu? Food comes out and the server barely says the name of whos food it is and then says it again and gets "crabby" when didnt answer her first time. Not sure I be going back there especially at those prices...who knows might change again without notice!!
Yup-  we order fairly regularly, and nearly all our guests are big fans.  Burritos with Jasmine rice -  who'da thunk it.  good stuff
Great to sit in and great for take out and delivery.   Good salads, pizzas.  Recommend the steak and cheese calzones and chicken parm!  Serve beer and wine.  Or  sit in and watch the big screen tv.  Mexican food too!
Very friendly staff,always order our pizza extra crispy crust and they always do it right!
They also deliver and the pizza is always hot.
Firstly, you won't find great pizza in Sandwich so stop looking. We have resorted to eating Freschetta or making our own. In fact, I should probably build a take away window on the side of my house because my pizza is better than most Sandwich shops. And as a native New Yorker, I can't believe how difficult it is to find a decent pizza. 

Two Bros does a lot of business, and they generously support many town events (like most Sandwich businesses), but the pizza is not great. No pizza joint should ever be buying pre-made crusts-simple as that-it's like a bakery buying pre-made cupcakes and slapping on some frosting and sprinkles, and I am pretty sure that Two Bros, like many spots in Sandwich, purchases them. I will say the husband likes the pizza, but he's British....and he also enjoys the boneless chicken tenders. We have not tried the Mexican, but I am not a fan of Tex-Mex offerings.
This place does not skimp on anything especially the toppings. This is the best Pizza in town!
Delivery is smooth food is always hot.. Subs are also good.
A suggestion to be inclusive to all potential guests....save the Fox news for your own personal consumption.  Huge TV with sound piped over speakers is not an inviting atmosphere for waiting or dining.  Never mind the face the Bruins were on !!! Had to take my business elsewhere and will not return.  Just poor business sense and there's a ton of choices very close by.
This is a great place to stop for lunch. The food is always good and service was excellent. I would definitely return again.
We have ordered delivery from Two Brother's on a couple of occassions, and have not been disappointed.  Even the drivers are courteous.  Having food allergies, I find that I can tolerate even a large steak and cheese without an allergic reaction to any preservatives... so there must not be any, which for me is terrific!  Prices are great, and menu is extensive so there is something for everyone.
It's really disappointing to order a salad (take-out) and not have the dressing or pita bread included for $12 .. This restaurant used to be really good with excellent service. 
Until 3 years ago, when we decided to focus on a vegetable based diet, we ordered regularly from Two Brothers because the food was pretty good and they are one of the few restaurants in Sandwich that offers delivery service.  Recently, after coming home to an empty refrigerator after a weekend away, we called in an order which was delivered promptly.  However, everything was cold so we had to reheat it.  The calzone was good, but the taco salad - which used to be a favorite - was terrible.  I have never had a worse taco shell than this one.  It was thin, kind of burnt, and tasted like cardboard.   Onion rings were good but an appetizer called "Southwest chicken eggrolls" was just weird.  I couldn't really detect any chicken; the filling was kind of watery and was accompanied by an equally runny sauce.  We threw the third piece in the garbage.  Disappointing that this place doesn't measure up to its former quality.
Totally in from now on. It was our first time yesterday and we went back today. It's very close to our house so is even better. Corn hash Is super delicious and the Belgium waffles are yummy yummy no whipped cream which I loved it. Fresh squeezed orange juice, that is a plus . Portion size great. We will go back again and again. 
This is my new favorite place based on a local's recommendation. Excellent martini's and food. Took my leftover chicken parm home and reheated...it was still moist and delicious. Others had the salmon, prime rib, and seafood pasta. All were very good. We were stuffed but ordered the lemon cake, homemade gelato, and creme brulee. The biggest hit was the lemon cake but all were good. Can't wait to go back.
We were looking for another breakfast place other than Marshland which we love but wanted to try a new place.  So glad we found Canterbury.  I had the hash which was great and my wife had the eggs benedict.  She raved about it.  The English muffin that is was on was delicious, very light and a little bit crispy.  Service was very good and prices are reasonable.  My only complaint is that they don't open until 8:00.  We are early risers and usually get places before 7:30.  However, it was worth waiting that extra 30 min.
The morning we went it seemed we had to wait a very long time for as slow as they were. We had a larger party of eight, but even after 25 minutes we ended up settling for two tables.  The pancakes were dry and over cooked, you had to smother in syrup just to eat. The side of potatos looked like they were trying to stretch food not provide a meal. Was a disappointing experience and would try many other cape favorites over this.
On the outside, you may consider driving right by, since this restaurant is contained within a modest group of stores.  However, for excellent food at a reasonable price and a very comfortable atmosphere, this is one of the best restaurants anywhere on Cape Cod!  We have only tried their dinners, but they have never disappointed.  Their Scrod and Sole Francase dishes are among the best dinners anywhere -- and so good that it is hard for us to try anything else on their very varied menu.  Anyone who shares Canterbury Cafe with us always asks to come back!
I have had breakfast here several times and dinner once and I am happy to share that lunch did not disappoint.  The burgers were beyond my expectation.  My husband and I ordered burgers and they were cooked exactly as requested (medium and medium well).  The fries were HOT and crispy.  Another member of our party was very happy with her spinach salad with perfectly cooked medium-rare steak tips.  We will be back!
My husband and I love this place, its family run, very clean and the food is consistently luscious. My husband says this place has the best burgers ever and I am more of a salad person. We are long time customers.
Located in a pedestrian strip mall, Canterbury Cafe is one of our 'go-to' spots either for dining in or take out. When we want a comfortable place for dinner and drinks, this is one place that always delivers. 

We like to score seats at the bar because dining outside of the bar area is not as cozy. That area could use a spruce up which is why we head straight to the tiny bar area.

From burgers to proper main dishes, Canterbury Cuisine puts out some great dishes. Prices are reasonable and portions are ample. Last time we had the coconut crusted mahi-mahi which was delicious and roasted chicken-both super dishes. 

There's a great vibe in this place-casual and welcoming.
Don't let the strip mall location or dated interior fool you.  We were so pleasantly surprised with our first dinner here.  We both had steak dinners which were delicious.  Prices are average.  Service was very friendly.  I wish the lighting were better, though.
We have had breakfast here on many occasions and tried it for dinner after family recommend after eating there several times.  We were not disappointed.  The crispest fried calamari I have ever enjoyed followed be chicken parm.  My husband enjoyed his seafood pasta dish and loved my dinner as well. We ate at a high top in the bar and the service was professional and attentive.  We will be back!
Tucked in a strip mall and easily missed but find this place. Seriously. The food is fabulous! I don't know how they do it but they are open for breakfast, lunch and dinner and every meal is wonderful. They even have a little bar too. The best breakfast on the Cape! Yummy lunches and dinners are excellent. The servers are so friendly and attentive. We just love it here!
I went out to dinner to celebrate my sister's birthday.  The meals were delicious one order was wasabi crusted ah-tuna which is fresh tuna with a panko wasabi crust ,with a ginger soy glaze and vegetables with sticky rice a big hit with b-day girl. I had the veal parmesan with linguine my favorite . Desserts were delicious and the waits staff friendly and helpful
Canterbury used to be a great place to eat but recently quality has gone down.  Food not as good, service not so great.  Hopefully it will come back after the summer is over.
Cantebury cuisine is a great place.  Comfortable bar with engaging bartenders and a pleasant, fun local feel.  Food is terrific and the tuna sashimi the best I have had in a long time.  Got to try it, you won't be disappointed.
Not my first breakfast at Canterbury Cafe and normally they do a good job, but on this day they failed miserably.  We were a party of 6 adults and 3 children.  We asked to be sat together  which I know it was going to be a challenge and there would be a wait.  Our wait was not too bad, 20 min, but when we were sat they put us at 2 tables.  When we asked if we could put them together the answer was no because of fire regulations, if there was a fire we would would have to go around the table.  We were going to have to go around the tables anyway.  Plus the exit we would have to use in case of a fire was blocked with high chairs.  Yeh maybe you think that having to sit at 2 separate tables isn't such a being deal.  Well, you have never had breakfast with 3 children that wanted to sit beside Moms and Dads.  It was not fun.  Sorry Dads, can't get that breakfast back.  Next year we will go back to Marshland that never seems to have a problem sitting our family which usually is 2 more adults.
I live a minute from this restaurant, and go there 3- 4 x month.
It is usually pretty good, but not tonight!
My son discovered a long hair in his chicken fingers.
There is nothing more disgusting than this.
I complained to the waitress  and she asked me how my food was.
I told her the steak was purple , not medium
she quickly came with my bill, and still charged me for the rootbeer and a beer that we didnt even finish.
not good business move on her part.
I would have expected a visit from the manager and an apology, but not the case.
Oh well, plenty of other restaurants to go to
I eat here all the time I call it my kitchen. 2 to 4 time a week ,when not on vacation . Food is very good , priced reasonable . Both diner an breakfast, good staff. Out of the way but worth the visit. 
Visiting the Cape and decided to give this a try.  Very nice atmosphere with good separation between the bar and dining areas.  The staff were all friendly and helpful.  Our server was very attentive without being intrusive.  I had the corned beef hash that the menu said was "homemade."  Well I tell you, it was delicious!  The corned beef tasted like it had just been cut off the roast and the potatoes made for a perfect hash that you could tell was truly homemade.  The eggs were perfect.  Overall a very good breakfast.
Canterbury Cafe is hidden away in Sandwich MA and appears to be a 1980's restaurant.  It's quiet and so it is a nice place to talk and hear unlike many of today's restaurants.  The service is very nice but it really is about the food.  This, our second trip, had 2 of us having veal cutlets, one with veal parm & finally steak tips.  All four of us loved our meals, they were both delicious and generous.  So this plain jane setting serves up wonderful food and is worth a visit.
Canterbury Cafe is a hidden jem, this is where the locals go. Menu has something for everyone and prices are fair. Quality of food and service can't be better! This has quickly become our go to place. Give it a try, you won't be disappointed.
Hubby & I ordered take out -sirloin tips for him, prime rib for me.  When he brought the food home my meal was there, but his was a turkey sandwich on cranberry bread.  I drove back and switched the wrong meal for the right meal, but when I got home, his tips had big gobs of fat.  My prime rib had a gob of fat the size of my fist (I don't have small hands) and the usually fork tender prime rib was tough as shoe leather.  This was a big disappointment as we used to love this local spot.

I MIGHT eat here again, but only " dine in" so I can complain immediately about a bad meal. 
I was delighted when I chose the pot roast dinner and they fixed the gravy. The last time I reviewed the gravy it had no taste and was runny. I'm glad to see they went back to their original recipe. The pot roast itself was delicious and tender.
American chop suey excellent. Not always on menu, but should be! Full menu options. Meatloaf and fish entrees also. Visit weekly.
We were certainly hoping for more given other reviews, but this place is just plain average.  The decor is basic, the menu is classic continental, heavy on seafood.  We went for classics, Bacon Cheddar Burger, Chicken Tenders with Onion Rings, Clam Chowda and the dish they are "famous for", their "World Famous Stuffed Quahog".  Everything was mediocre except the onion rings which were a bit above average. The chowder as overly thick and for being their claim fame, the quahog was nothing special. The service was fair.  The bottom line, there are much better places to eat on the Cape.
Ate here at the pub with family.  Food was good, nothing to rave about.  I would have liked to eaten in the main dining room, but it was not open.  The pub fare did not compare with the excellent food offered in the main dining room.  Service was good.  I will return to the restaurant to eat and the pub for a game.
We go often.  Very low key, budget and family friendly.  Nice wait staff who pay attention and we always feel we have gotten a value.

Visited late morning on 7-4-16.  There was no wait, with the restaurant not being  busy at that point.  Our server, whose name I believe was Polly, did a very nice job.  The breakfast itself, however, was another story.  Every time I order pancakes from here, they arrive at the table cold and hard, as they clearly have been sitting out for an inordinate amount of time.  Although this problem occurs occasionally at the original Route 6A location, it is an ongoing problem here.  A note to the kitchen staff/management -- sprinkling some powdered sugar on a lousy product does not remedy the problem.  The kitchen continued its awful performance by overcooking my fried eggs, while serving my wife scrambled eggs which were partially raw/uncooked.  We have given this place a number of chances, but it continues to do poorly.  Enough is enough, we are not returning.
I heard good things about this place for breakfast so we went. Corey, the waitress, was excellent, warm and friendly, attentive and super efficient but the food was not good...I had eggs and hash and fried potatoes. The hash was awful, salty and mushy, tasted like they came from a can. The fried potato chunks were soggy, not crispy. The coffee was fair at best. My friend had French toast and it was soggy, nothing special. It was very much like IHop. I heard the lunches and dinners are great so I am definitely willing too give it a try again for one of those meals.
I've had their pot roast for years now and it's usually very good. The beef is usually tender and the gravy very tasty,however, tonight I ordered it again and the gravy was so bland like they made it low fat or something. I gave the rest of my meal to the dogs. Why do they have to change what isn't broken?
Had breakfast
Both of use had bacon and eggs. Eggs were cooked exactly as ordered, bacon was nice and crisp. Coffee was great and so was the service. Price was reasonable
Wife and I plus other family members have eaten here at all times of the year for at least the past eight years. We have never been  disappointed in the food served or the service. Locals and visitors flock here (to both of two separate locations about three miles apart). One can expect to find a varied menu of tasty family style offerings plus their delicious home made, of course, pastries. A well executed expansion now includes a separate bar section.
We were staying nearby on vacation and found this place on Trip Advisor and decided to give it a go. We were really glad we did as the food was really good and the staff were so friendly. It was so good in fact we skipped the hotel breakfast and ate here again. Both meals were nothing fancy, just delicious, hearty food.
Marshland is a good, family style restaurant offering daily specials, in addition to their regular menu. The food is good, and I have had the prime rib a couple of times, over the top!

The baked scrod is usually a winner, as well as some fantastic salads.

The waitstaff varies, some are friendly, some appear to be somewhat removed from the task at hand, which is my reason for a four star rating.
Had the BLT.   bacon was great. Great sandwich.    Went during the " off season " so there was no wait.   Bartender/server was awesome. 
Great place for breakfast. Very reasonably priced. Friendly staff. Omlettes all ne price no matter what you want in it.
Also serves lunch and dinner ( have not tried yet)
Marshland's Too is a favorite in Sandwich for breakfast.  We arrived around 8:30am and were happy that a table was available.  I ordered my usual a egg white omelet with peppers, onions, tomatoes and broccoli  and my husband had eggs benedict.  Both orders came out nice and hot with a large helping of home fries. Always a good place for breakfast at a reasonable price.
Ws stopped for lunch on a very cold day and were seated in a tight booth near the bakery entrance.  Every time the door opened we were blasted with cold air.  Menu was limited and once our order was taken, we had to wait close to 45 minutes for our meal which was served luke warm.  My wife had a fish rueben  with a very small piece of fish, in fact half had almost none at all.  My hamburger was served on a large starchy roll.  We have been fans of the original Marshland for years, but Marshland Too just doesn't compare with food quality or service.  We will stick to the original even if we have to wait a bit for a seat.
You wouldn't know that it's there, tucked in a little strip mall... it appears unassuming and nonchalant...the perfect place to hide from the crowds of busy shopping plaza's and malls.  The food is great, we ate at the bar, but there is restaurant style seating w/ a wait staff.  Bartender was good, attentive and our order was accurate and timely.  Good value for the money and a nice place to meet the locals!
We frequently go to Marshland Too for dinner or lunch when we want a casual night out.   Prices, service and food are all comfortable.   
Not fancy but a good breakfast every time. Good local people and a friendly face every time. Bakery is also good.
Then this is not the place to go they don't offer much in the way of ambiance as well. However, what they do offer, is a diverse menu made of the finest ingredients and all expertly prepared "right before you're  eyes". My family has been patronizing this small take-out since it opened and have always been very pleased with their courteous service and "top quality" meals. This is a great little "gem" in my opinion...            👍👍👍
Fast service whether you dine in or take-out.  Very generous portions too.  

Large dining room at the back, not very fancy though.  We have often eaten at the tables in the bar, where they usually have sport on the TV.  

Pu Pu platter is great to share and love the little mini charcoal fire/warmer that comes in the middle of the platter.

, wonton soup was good,  dumplings,  eggfoo young all good, pu pu platter ok,  crab Rangoon typical nothing great,  will probably return for take out again
Three  years ago I would have rated Asia Garden to be one of the best take out Chinese restaurants in Mass..

Egg rolls a few years ago were large and packed with vegetables. Today they are small over cooked and without value for the price. Ribs are fatty, the Peking Ravioli is tasteless and value is forsaken for high prices and profit.

The owner from a few yers ago is not on the premises or he sold out to people that simply believe that poor tasting food is a way to win customers.

AG is average, at best, a few chairs and tables make up the dining element so you need to allow whereby this is a takeout restaurant only.
Asia Garden is the real deal, as both it's owners, and chefs all come from Chinatown. Each dish is made fresh, hot, and fast. They offer dinner combinations, with a variety of appetizers included. Their egg foo yong, and crab rangoons are superb! 
Our son ears here when he is home from school.  I am pleased with the flavor, service and prices.  It is conveniently located and they prepare to go meals to make it easy.   I will return.
Returned to Asia Garden this week for a Lunch Special and got D22 the Gen Gau with white rice and Crab Rangoon. Very unpleasant greeter/order Person........... took order and gave no receipt ..... i have heard this is common. Picked up in tenminute...... took home and Gen Gau was okay! white rice good and crab R. okay price was $11.90. By the way while waiting the floors and seating area had months of dirt/filth on floors..... no return for me! 
Takeout-got both chicken and beef, supposedly spicy.  Lo mein and fried rice. Absolutely no flavor at all.  Meats covered in a floury substance.  Hot and sour soup was just ok.  Spring roll half full. We could not eat it.
We asked the waiter what to get and he said the Asian style steak. It was delicious! We love Thai food and wanted pad thai but even though they said they served Thai food it wasn't on the menu which was surprising. The place was really clean, nicely decorated, the service was excellent and our dinners were great. Location was kind of out of the way but worth finding. We'll be back!
Asia Garden is my neighborhood Chinese restaurant.   Fresh, lightly sauced (I mean not drenched unless the sauce is interesting) and the portions are huge.   But try them yourself.   I keep going back.
This restaurant has wonderful food, freshly made with interesting and complex ingredients.  That does not mean you have to have an exotic palate to love the food here.  The pad thai and other Thai specialties and curry are fabulous.  We have become totally addicted to the palm seed pudding for dessert.  Service is attentive and friendly.   The prices are most reasonable.
Right around the corner so get take out fairly often. Food always fresh and delicious.I
It  does seem they do print up new menus with price increases many times a year,
Chinese food is not cheap! The combination plates are the best value.
Asia Garden is great Chinese take out, for Cape Cod at least. Good lunch specials, standard stuff at a decent value.
This place has an open kitchen and very fast take out service. The food is incredible and the staff is always excellent. I will not have Chinese anywhere else.
Unfortunately Asia Garden is not the place where you will find it, but if you really need a sushi fix it's there and it's edible.
I've lived in a lot of cities and small towns that had Chinese restaurants, but this has to be the worst.  Chicken with Garlic sauce - absolutely no flavor.  Crispy Beef - Coated in layers of gunk.  The beef was long and stringy and didn't taste anything like beef.  My dog even rejected it.  They also don't provide rice with your order, it will cost you extra.  Save your money and go elsewhere...
Very good "comercial" Chinese. Not like China town, but, this place can cook, prices are very reasonable, and the food is quite good
Can count on the food always being consistent.
Its not out of this world but it is always hot and good.
Small place. Better for takeout. Staff are very nice and pleasant. Food is very good. Get the crab rangoons-you won't be disappointed. Chicken wings & Lo mein  are great too. Decent value for the food.
Asia Garden is a Chinese fast-food restaurant with very limited seating. The food is very tasty, your order is complete quickly, and the service is always nice and the prices are great! They don't use MSG, so if you have allergies, this is the place. The Combination meals are a bargain, and there is always enough for a second meal! I completely agree with Ccla1176's comment - they have the best crab rangoons! Not to be compared to high-end restaurants. If you want to pay for atmosphere, so elsewhere. If you want a great meal at a great price, stop on by Asia Garden! You won't regret it!
My Husband and I wen there twice in a week the service was great and the meals where good we would go agan
The tavern features a larger restaurant area with traditional tables and booths; we chose to sit in the smaller bar room area which besides the bar had some smaller tables. We were the only tourists; the locals and bar maid were friendly as we ate our meal at the bar. The fisherman's platter which I consumed was plentiful and up to the high standard of seafood on the  cape.
They are located literally at the opening of Bryant University. This was our second visit and it was just as good as the first. We started with Buffalo wings. They were just what you would expect from a pub. I had the French dip sandwich which was really good. The roll was nice and crispy and the roast beef was nice and tender. My husband had a veal parmesan sandwich and he was hesitant about it but it was veal real, not frozen. My son had a barbecued cheeseburger that was cooked perfectly. I suggest you pay the extra dollar and get onion rings they are delicious.
We had a great experience. We had a party of 6 and everybody enjoyed their meals. Their Calamari Giovanni was yummy and very crispy. We had the fajitas, blakened swordfish and chicken parm for our entrees. I had never been but my boyfriend had been there years ago. I will definitely go back again
Hubbyhad chicken parm and it was quite good, and BIG.  I had the swordfish grilled special, quite good, I was surprised.  A VERY casual place, but good for the money. We wanted casual so it suited us.  A step above diner, so you get what you may expect. But our food was very good.
I love their onion soup, their specials, and the owners, they are always very friendly. I am never disappointed.
We've been enjoying Parente's for years now - it never gets old! Always something on the menu to suit your hunger pangs plus there's always specials! Dennis and / or Larry Parente's are always there to greet you and make sure all is right. The soups are all yummy and always served hot. You can't beat the ribs or veal parmigiana - two of our favorites! 
If your not as hungry there's the smaller portion dishes as an option.  Something for everyone!
Went with a large group for dinner. Got scallops and they were horrid. No flavor, covered with buttered breadcrumbs. Fresh but flavorless does not win folks over. Didn't try to make it right, unsure of what would be good here maybe pub food only. Hubby had a Cesar salad and it too was bland. Must be better choices in the area.
We dined here whilst staying at the nearby Hampton Inn.  We were seated straight away and our drink order was taken by the lovely waitress.
I went for the meatballs with penne pasta and a side of garlic bread, sweet potato fries and salad.  The food was superb and the portions huge.
We were so full-up by the end of the meal that we skipped the dessert. The bill came to a very reasonable $50 [£32]
Great Tavern stop. Good beer, burgers and Sea bass.
Service was prompt and pleasant. I would definitely go back
I ordered scallops & grilled shrimp which was very good. Another order the seafood combo which apparently was just okay.  The atmosphere was nice, somewhat a bar but  could accommodate large groups.
Parente's has been here for a while.  It is near one of the colleges and is a good place for families to eat.  They have seafood and Italian specialties.  Good food.
Bryant University hangout. Booths are comfortable. Wide variety of food; burgers, pasta, salads, wings, full bar.
Visited several times lately. Nice local casual place. Great deals on appetizers in the bar 3 to 6 big portions great price.  Service was good and made you feel like home. Lots of regular patrons which indicates it is good !
Visited here with Family, the food was excellent. I had two fussy children with me & they catered for them. Was very surprised at the bill I expected it to be more expensive
We hadn't been to Parente's in years. We haven't been back because it wasn't very good then but when Groupon featured it, and because it's a small, local restaurant, I thought I'd try again. I bought two certificates. The first visit was for dinner. Big mistake. The food was not good. A spinach salad which is supposed to be made with baby spinach, and which the menu specified was made with baby spinach, was served with regular, bitter, tough large leaf spinach. Most of the time you don't serve large leaf spinach raw. I complained to the waiter, and he came back to tell me they ran out of baby spinach. 

We still had one Groupon so decided to use it for sandwiches.  My husband did order beef tips which were okay but the gravy was on the gray side. My grilled chicken sandwich was fine. Hard to mess that up. Although the pickle they served with it looked like it had been on a few other plates, not eaten and then given to me. I wouldn't touch it. The ice in my drink had spots of something frozen into it. 

Which brings me to my biggest complaint, and the reason we will never go back. The place needs a good scrub. The window sills beside the booths are filthy.  They're dusty and spotted with food. The carpeting is disgusting. When I see a restaurant so dirty in the dining room, where everyone can see, I wonder what the kitchen looks like behind the scenes.
This is the definition of the local bar or pub. It is just off the beaten path in Smithfield. Ask a local and they can get you to it. 

The staff is always friendly and fun to interact with when here. There is always sports on the TV and popcorn on the bar. 

The food is traditional bar food with some Italian dishes and daily specials thrown in too. The food is always good with the burgers being the specialty of the house. The beer is always cold and drinks are a generous pour. 

Truthfully, I've been here dozens of times over the years and keep forgetting to review it until this last trip. 

It is a great place to hang with friends and watch whatever the sport is on the TV. This is a good spot for friends, couples and business lunches. 

Go and enjoy. 
The food was really good but the set up is a little cramped making it hard to have an intimate dinner
I have been to Parente's a few times over the years, the food remains
the same.   It is near Bryant College and is a go to for students and visiting parents.
Place has dirty carpet, dust and food splatter on  window sills.  We had to ask for a clean menu(had food stuck over it).  My knife has sticky substance on it.  Cole slaw was floating in mayo.  Fish was soggy and mushy, Chowder was tasty and very tomato soup like.  The fried clams were actually good.  They are in need of Robert Irvine in Restaurant Impossible.  We will not go back as there are too many other good restaurants around Smithfield.
THE FOLLOWING HOTEL REVIEW INCLUDES A NOTE ABOUT PARENTE'S
___________________________________________________________

Excellent management service.

As I have stayed at this newly renamed Holiday Inn many times, this trip I carefully reviewed the helpfulness of the management, as well as the condition and cleanliness of my room, as there has been a change in ownership.

As I am a bit older, this trip I hired a driver and black car to take me from Boston to Smithfield.  The service was excellent (Boston Limo), but I was left in Smithfield without a car for two days.  I had of course arranged a cab in advance (Smithfield is too far from Providence to warrant its own cabs, apparently), so as to compensate.

The day of my meeting, the cab did not show up.  As my meeting was important, and I had to be there early (only mile or so away), I finally had to ask the nice lady at the desk –Ashley-for help.

She understood the problem right away, and put a sign on the counter and ran me to my meeting with Honeywell.

When my meeting was finished, I was driven back to the motel by a friend.  But, I was now left with no cab to take me to my favorite restaurant in town: Parente’s.  The Holiday Inn Director of Sales, Scott Brodie, hearing of my second need for a ride, immediately offered a ride to Parente’s where I normally dine while in Smithfield.

[Side note:  the staff at Parente's, knowing I’ve diner there many times over the years, also helped out by taking me back to the Holiday Inn after two meals there.  And, the food had gotten even better since the last time there about 3 months ago.  Try their home-made soup.]

All in all, the staff at Holiday Inn was excellent in their service to a guest.  Thanks Ashley and Scott.  Well done!

Recommended.
Convenient pub food close to Bryant University.  Family owned business that has been around for decades.  Good place to grab a quick meal and a few drinks.  Service is good, the drinks are tasty.  Prices are reasonable.  Has a fun bar atmosphere with regular music performances.  Plenty of tables and free popcorn.  They even provide you with decks of cards for drinking games.

Recently had the nachos and buffalo wings, neither of which disappointed.  They offer 30 cent wing nights which are very popular.  I've also had the burgers which are good as well.
Food was just ok.  Many items seemed like they were store bought (desserts, muffins,etc).
Service was good but brunch was overpriced. Would not return.
Stopped at Stillwater Tavern with work colleagues. I had the potato skins which were dried out, yuck. Then had the teriyaki boneless wings that were overcooked and horrible. One Friend had the sole dish which he liked but other had the buffalo wings which she said were overcooked. White wine spritzer had little wine in it. Will never use this place again. Very disappointing 
They are closed.  This restaurant has been here for a long time but sadly enough, it is now closed.  Another restaurant is in its place but I have no info on that one.
We dined at the Crickets Restaurant on February 14th 2016.  We arrived at 6:00pm and were seated quickly in the dining room.  Our waitress took quite a long time to arrive.  She took our drink orders and when she returned she tried to take our order.  She asked if we wanted to hear the specials.  When we did she proceeded to fumble through her folder that was stuffed with scraps of paper.  She tried to tell us the specials but was so disorganized she had a problem giving us the information and after a few minutes of this she and we gave up.  When she brought out our soup she brought out the incorrect choices and mixed up everyone's selection.  Someone else brought out our dinners but even then no note was made as to everyone's selection.  

Fortunately our food was acceptable.  All was served hot.  We were done with dinner for about 15 minutes before the waitress sort of offered us desert.  Since we didn't want to be here even longer we declined.

This server only had 3 tables and her disorganization caused her to not serve them properly.  I may visit this restaurant but I would wait a while so hopefully this server is no longer employed here.  With the type of service we received I hope they stay in business.  I cant imagine anyone coming back after the service we received.
It was two for one burger night and we started the evening with vodka diets and buffalo tenders. Followed  by a  delicious blue cheese burger with pickled beets. Buzzed and happy. Service was helpful and accommodating. 
Had planned on checking out this place, now known as Stillwater Tavern for a while. They're website promotes 35 cent wings on Thursday nights. I wanted to take my office staff out for wings (we often do this). I called on Wednesday to make sure the special was current and was told that it was. Upon seating, we were told the "wings" were really chicken tenders. Being over 7 years old, I don't eat chicken in tender form. The chicken was ok, but I felt misled and disappointed.
2015 Thanksgiving. .Very disappointed,  the prime was cold and raw for a medium, Not cooked the same day. Thanksgiving  dinner turkey was reheated and slightly brown  and crunchy,  stuffing was terrible.  The shrimp seemed like the only decent plate that came out of the kitchen  that day. Service  was slow then nonexistent  at times. I wanted to give the restaurant  a chance because of the change of name. But apparently it's the same bad service ,terrible  food and needs a remodel, the ceiling tile have to be 30 years old and dirty.
We use to go at least once a month and the food was great for the money.  The food is still good but they seem to have cut back.  The bread was tasteless and only margarine was offered.  We ask for olive oil or real butter and waitress said they no longer have it.  Also, instead of soup or salad--you can only get soup unless you pay extra for a salad.  The portions are very generous  and the food ok for the money. 
There are too many restaurants in RI to settle for food that is just  so so.  My husband and I both ordered Kendall Chardonnay.  His was  Kendall  mine was something different.  I told the waitress.  She brought it back and came back to say that they only had enough for one glass.   Really it is 6:00 pm on a Saturday and the place does not have anymore wine selection which they offer by the glass.  Food was okay but not great.  We will not be back any time soon.  Plus the bartender should have informed our waitress that only one of our wines was a Kendall.  He tired to pull a fast one.
Pleasantly surprised with the new menu in sports bar theme. Ribs fish and turkey club were all excellent. Another friend had the prime rib also said it was excellent. Very casual in a great spot to watch sports. Plenty of parking also. 
Had dinner with several customers at this restaurant.  We arrived around 5:30 on a Wednesday and the dining area was largely empty.  We were seated right away and were greeted immediately by our friendly waitress.

The first and only negative was the small beer selection.  This might be a regional thing because everywhere I went on this trip in Providence had a very limited list of draft and bottles.  Also, for how limited the list, the waitress did not really know of anything outside the big name brands.

On the positive side, there was much to like.  The food was good.  I had the stuffed mushroom appetizer and Caesar salad dinner.  The bigger story though was what my dinner mates had.  One had a cod dinner that was GINORMOUS!  Perhaps it is only because I am from the Midwest, but I have never seen cod of that size.  It was the same story for the chicken Parmesan that another person had.  It too was very large.  Neither person finished their dinner but both said it was excellent.

Prices were reasonable.
Crickets is a favorite restaurant of my wife and me.  We go there often--especially for special occasions.   The meals are delicious and the service is always excellent.  The dining rooms are separate from the more casual bar and music/dance area and are conducive to quieter conversations.
It is an ice family friendly restaurant , food is good snd plenty..staff is nice..clean place to eat ...
There was a party of 9 for Mother's Day Brunch.   The selection for brunch was very good.   The food was hot and the service was excellent.  Mamosa and Bloody Marys go with the brunch and you help yourself.

 It did get crowded by the time we were leaving so my suggestion is to go before 11 when more people are there.
This is really a great restaurant with good service and excellent and fairly priced food.
Everything is so fresh, from the bread to salads to your meal. Portions are fairly large and nicely presented.
The restaurant is undergoing renovations but is still open and these will appeal to the younger generation as well as us older folks.
So why not give it another try.
The perfect place for a family dinner out without spending a fortune!  The staff is attentive, the food appeals to all ages without going overboard on gourmet, and the prices moderate.  Casual, fun and the perfect family outing.
Visited Crickets Restaurant for Mother's Day yesterday.  Seating was prompt.  Our server acknowledged our party immediately and provided a friendly greeting. Buffet had a great variety and was hot and flavorful.  Enjoyed the bloody mary station and the ability to make our drinks to our liking.  All staff and management was friendly and was there to please and ensure that our experience was plesant.  Great job to Crickets Restaurant.
Went to Easter Brunch. Had not been in about 5-6 years. Very disappointed. We were seated promptly. Food of course was buffet style but was on the cool side. Disappointed that make your own omelet and belgian waffle stations were not there as they are on the website. Understandable perhaps due to the fact that it was Easter and the place was packed. They did have make your own mimosas and bloodys, however, they give you a 3 ounce glass.
We saw the waitress once when we first got there and she gave us coffee. Never saw her again. Had to ask for an additional coffee later on. Also had to ask for tab. She included the gratuity, which I understand for a party of 10, but added 20% to the total after tax! I certainly dont mind tipping for great service, but to someone we saw once?
Ultimately, the place needs a major revamp; the carpet skeeved me out. Ver disappointed and will not be back.
The inside of the restaurant could definitely use an upgrade, but has a cozy feel to it.  It is always clean and the servers are very friendly.  The food is very good and they have a nice variety on the menu.  We had the baked scrod and fish francaise.  Both were decent portion size and were cooked to perfection.  They also include soup or salad at reasonable prices.  The glasses of wine are good portions.  Don't be afraid to try this place, you will be surprised.
went there tonight.over a hour wait for food and was hot but too much water on bottom.only three older 65+ age servers and three large parties. They need young staff to run the meal clean the tables.they ran out of menus.a bit crazy.don't know how many change chefs but menu is too extensive.wait was crazy slow and mngt should have called more servers.
We have been to J's many times. Food is consistently good. New items are added but the old favorites like the pilgrim seem to call you back, so does the graduate. Try their own chips , very tasty. Prices are reasonable 
This place is handy for us, however, I have become disenchanted with some of the quality!  I think the first thing that started me thinking that, was was when I noticed that the Bread for Sandwiches seemed less appetizing, too dry and tasteless!

I love a nice Italian Cold Cut Sandwich, but if the Bread doesn't taste good to you, it's not an option!
They have a huge selection of food... From healthy sandwiches to fried foods and wraps. I love their Greek dressing ! It's amazing ! Their salads are very big and good. They also have egg rolls that are great!!
Very clean and great Food presentation and quality....very clean.....great quality and taste for the price
My family loves the wide variety of sandwiches.  Everyone we ever tried was always a hit. They blondes are great too!!
Biggest problem is deciding what sandwich to order! We decided to split "The Fraternity" which is delicious chicken salad, cranberry sauce on yummy roll. We also had soup - soooo good! I had the corn chowder - rich & creamy while my husband had the red chowder - full of stock! Both were served hot and just so delicious!
We're thrilled to have J's near home!
Also appreciate the points card for more future free yummy delights!
I'm a regular at J's!  I love the Patriot sandwich. Turkey with gravy and stuffing. The rolls at J's are always so fresh and soft. I recommend there home made potato chips!  So good!!!  They also have excellent dessert items. Never a bad meal at J's.
I used to love J's Deli, but I am not so much of a fan these days. We had a 2 Philly steak grinders, one without cheese and with onions. The onions were on top, not mixed in and there was some cheese mixed in. A chicken fajita wrap was all right, a bit soggy though.  Grinders were generous sizes - enough for two meals. $ 27 for the three grinders (with tax.) which felt like a lot to me. We called in our order and it was ready and waiting. Staff were professional and polite.
I've been in the deli several times now and it's absolutely amazing. It's a little pricey but the sandwiches are big and really well made. The cupcakes and cakes in the display are definitely worth a try as well as the "J's Deli Chips". The deli cases are really well stocked and look very fresh.The staff in the restaurant are also very friendly.  The only down side is sometimes the sandwiches do take a while but I've never had and experience where it wasn't worth the wait. 
From soups, subs to hot meals and dessert it is All excellent ...no frills to eat there...but has tables and take out, generous portions...
We love this deli. It is the best around.  Great service, great prices, great food. There are many sandwiches to choose from and there is something for everyone. Also desserts and appetizers are delicious.   Worth the trip every time. 
All the sandwiches here are awesome! The bread is fresh, the fillings plentiful, I recommend this shop to anyone in the area!
Large sandwiches, very good, pricey though, service takes awhile when it gets busy from the college.
I am so thankful  that my business contact recommended J's Deli for lunch. Her words were "everyone who's anyone, goes there. It's one of the best places around." She was right. The staff was friendly and the food was wonderful. In addition to the turkey smokehouse stacked sandwich, I also tried the Italian Wedding soup, simply the best I've had in a very long time. I will be sure to stop again the next time I am in the area.
This place has the best sandwich you will ever eat. Everything is very fresh.Large variety of sandwiches. Workers are nice.Don't miss it.
More food choices here than most restaurants. Quick service and clean area. Delicious chili, beef stew, soup, sandwiches. Array of cheeses and meats to take out. Would absolutely go back.
When you don't feel like cooking and you want something quick and satisfying this is the place to go. Fortunately it is nearby and the subs and sides are substantial in size. Service is great also. Would go back.
From a basic tuna salad sandwich to whatever you desire.  You name it they have it.  Also, cold cuts and cheeses can be purchased by the weight to go.  Daily soups and different salads as well.  Usually very busy and a wait in line to order style.
I've never had a bad sandwich here.  My only complaint is when I ordered half a sandwich for a child, they charged me $5.99.  The whole sandwich was $7.99.  5.99 is a little pricey for half of a ham and cheese sandwich. 
Ordered lunch for my self and 5 others at work today. Called in the order and drove to pick it up.
When I got there, the subs were ready. Like promised.
Got back to the office and mmmmmmmmmmmmMMMMMMMMMMMMMMmmmmmm good. I've been to several sub shops in my time, this is one of the good ones. Hands down beats all the Corp sub shops.
Want a good lunch at a fair price - Go to J's. Nice people too.
The guys at Pick Pockets are a staple in any Bryant University students diet. Me and my friends who attended Bryant would make sure to eat here at least a couple times a month. Tony the owner is a great guy and is constantly interacting with customers and offering new suggestions to try on the menu. Food is very high quality and in abundance for a very fair price.
This place does a great job.  Can be a long wait time and sometimes they do not pick up the phone during busy times - maybe because they are too busy....so they can use another worker.

You won't go wrong here for a delicious falafel, gyro or chicken kebab.  My kids love the steak and cheese too.
I love this place.  Feels like a home cooked meal, not fast food.  Sometimes a long wait, like 35 to 45 minutes instead of ten, if there is a crowd.
There cannot be a more unlikely place in which to find great food.  Pick Pockets shares space with a convenience store / gas station.  If you want a drink or chips, you buy them from the convenience store side of the shop and bring them to the restaurant side.  There are a half dozen stools and four or five two-top tables.  Many people get their food to go.  So why would anyone stop in a place like this?  One reason -- outstanding food.  The owner, a character himself, makes everything from scratch.  He marinates his own meats, makes his own sauces and chops everything fresh, every day.  The result shows.  My favorite is a beef and lamb combo wrap but there is a wide range of choices ranging from falafal to cheese steaks to chicken wings.  If you like spice, and I do, he makes a special "green sauce" from ground peppers (and maybe jet fuel - just kidding) that will take care of any sinus issues.  A sure sign of the quality is the amount of repeat business by the locals.  While it would not be obvious to someone coming down nearby Interstate 295 (at Exit 8), the nearby area is home to both a university and and one of the nation's top mutual funds, in addition to a number of other businesses.  It is not uncommon at lunch time to be behind someone with a list from their office for a number of sandwiches and salads to go.  This one is worth going out of the way for and, hey, you can fill up the car at the same time.
This tiny counter-top spot is located in a gas station, but don't let that turn you off. The food is great and the menu is huge. They have grilled chicken and lamb Kebabs, falafel and vegetable wraps, and tons of other options. They even have a food challenge which includes a huge amount of food for worthy candidates. They have pictures all over the walls of their customers and the atmosphere is friendly. The cooks are nice and call you "Boss". Make sure you eat at the counter and ask for the house-made pita chips and hummus. Highly recommended, though definitely not first date food--you'll need a lot of napkins!
I hate writing negative reviews, but this experience was so poor I'm writing it in the restaurant's parking lot. Drinks came immediately. For a party of five, we ordered one appetizer, which took over thirty minutes to arrive--and only after we asked where our appetizer was. Then for about an hour more, our meals went missing. And when only four of our five meals appeared, there was no explanation, only scrambling in the kitchen. Our waitress never kept us informed about why our food was so delayed. Am giving two stars instead of one because once it arrived, the food wasn't all that bad. 
Meal was good enough.  I got a simple 2 eggs, toast, homefries, sausage.  Service was fine, except we had to ask twice for my husbands juice.  The place itself is clean, and modern.  Prices were good.
The toast is thick, the sausage patty was big (but i wasnt a huge fan of it), homefries are mixed with peppers and onions, which I liked...but the potatoes were a bit overdone.  Asked waitress if they took Discover, she didnt know...which she should know that.  (they do)
Ive had better, Ive had worse...
I went with 2 friends around 2:15 and had eggs benedict- it was fabulous!  My friends both had egg dishes and enjoyed as well.  I loved the potatoes- grilled and spiced to perfection. Not a fancy place but the food definitely makes up for it.
Had to pick up our son from a soccer tournament and wanted a quick bite and this was the perfect choice at 8:30 pm as you can get breakfast all day!  A nice light meal before the drive home.  The Portuguese burger was also delicious and was served with either regular fries or sweet potatoes fries.
Good breakfast. A lot of food. My son ordered 2 pancakes and they were huge. Fast service. A little pricey. 
After driving all day to get there, we went to this restaurant because it was right across the street from our hotel, Hampton Inn. The waitress was quick to take our drink orders, brought them to us, took our dinner order, then she disappeared for a really long time. We watched a little girl and her father come in to pick up a pizza order that the phoned in ahead of time. The father got tired of waiting and took his daughter and left. I didn't blame him one bit. 

The restaurant was by no means busy. Besides us, there were two other couples- one at the bar and one seated in the dining room, as we were. We all started looking around at each other and after a while, I asked the other couple near us if they had been waiting long and they said that they were waiting just as long as we were. I'd have to say that at least 45 minutes had passed with no sign of our dinner. When we finally saw our server, I asked how much longer dinner was taking because we were both hungry and agitated at the excessive wait time. She said she forgot to put our order in, no apologies, but she let us know what happened. Then she said it wouldn't be long. We finally got our food OVER AN HOUR AFTER WE ORDERED IT! We would've gone elsewhere, but we were afraid to find no one else open at such a late hour on a Sunday night. 

The food was ok- NOT WORTH WAITING OVER AN HOUR ON A SLOW NIGHT!!!
I had wanted to try B'z for a while and finally got my husband here for late lunch/early dinner one day recently.  There were only about 5 other people there, which was fine.  I was surprised there were hardly any veggie options on the menu and asked about a breakfast possibility but that didn't seem like an option.  We ordered sandwiches, fries and onion rings.  My husband said his burger was ok, but nothing he'd need to go back for again.  Mine was decent, but the same thing......good but not great.  And everything was much pricier than I'd expected for a small neighborhood place.

A strange one too......a bunch of guys from Bryant came in and ordered wings and beer, which weren't on the menus we were given.  Not that I wanted that.....just thought it was strange that they had different menus but were 2 booths away from us.

Basically, I'm glad I tried it but would only go back to try breakfast, and doubt I'll convince my hubby to go with me.
My son and I ate here for breakfast.  Incredible pancakes and French toast. Food came out quickly and it was nice and hot. My side of eggs were a little dry but the French toast was some of the best I've ever had. 
We came here for breakfast. The food is good and decent portions and prices. The restaurant seemed clean. The seats were broken which was uncomfortable. The bench kept lifting. The menu has a decent variety for breakfast foods.
I love their breakfast! Food is hot and fresh. Amazing corned beef hash. Friendly waitstaff. Place is clean too. 

stopped here while staying at the hampton inn. a bunch of us stopped in to watch the patriots game. we ordered beers apps and pizza. bar staff was friendly and  helpful. food was good. pulled pork nachos tasted like they had a mustard sauce which was a little weird but they were not terrible. a nice place to watch a game.
A casual spot to enjoy breakfast or a burger or wrap. The salads are also tasty and fresh. Our waitress was quick and friendly. 
Had lunch at this restaurant recently with my husband.  We both ordered burgers and fries.  Very nicely done.  Place was packed even though not the "cheapest" place for a burger.
Great neighborhood breakfast spot. Staff was  very attentive. Food was delicious and very reasonably priced. We will return.
Tried this restaurant last Saturday afternoon for the first time.  The food actually took an hour and a half to come out of the kitchen!!!!  People at tables near us came, ate and left!!!!!!!!  The food was very good, however I would never go back because of the wait time and the only apology was from the waitress, whose fault it was not!  Where the heck was the owner or manager!?!!  Too many other places to go in Rhode Island.
It was breakfast I had, fund it pricy...it was eggs bacon home fries and toast...coffee...
Service is good place very clean
Just average. Prices good, quality OK. homemade corn hash but a little salty. Scrambled eggs overcooked. French toast was the best. Service ok. Was here at 8 on a weekday and the place was deserted. Not sure if crowd comes earlier.
I have been here a few times and have no complaints about any of my choices.   They have what you would call your regular breakfast items and then they have specials.  Their burgers are also good,   The atmosphere is interesting there is an open kitchen to watch, it can get a bit loud but that is expected.  They also serve alcohol.
Burgers and beyond has token up the void created by Faial's closing. They hired two Faial bartenders, Amy and Donna, and now have three Failal cooks. The present menu has a limited selection of Faial entrees. A new menu is scheduled and will include more Faial entrees. You can dine at their new bar or sit a tables. Wait staff is cordial, service is also great. Please try this new facility.
Not sure if they changed owners, managers...but this treasure has gone down hill. The Rueben is still the best. No question there. I have always favored the fall river burger. I had it Sunday night and it lacked flavor and they skimped on the chow mein which makes it such a special burger. Lots of chow mein noodles but little to no chow mein. The restaurant is very clean and it sparkles. But then again they have ample time with so few customers. This place could be a goldmine if they go back to the basics when they first opened up.
Went for coffee. Clean. There were a ton of cars in the drive-thru so I decided to go in. Fast friendly service.
I love my Dunkin Donuts coffee and there was a DD right across the street. We walked over to get our exercise in . Very convenient.

I love my Dunkin Donuts coffee and was pleased that there was one within a reasonable distance to the hotel where we stayed.  The staff were polite and got my coffee just the way I like it!
Has lounge area & Wi-Fi. Pastry and donuts always seem fresh. Coffee has not been stale, to date.  Friendly, courteous staff. 
We met with friends at Tavalo on a Saturday. We had made reservations for dinner. The restaurant was very busy - packed at the bar with parties waiting to be seated. We stood by the door as the sitting/waiting are is very small. We were seated at around 7:15, so the timing and reservations worked out well. 

Service: Fair to good.
Food: Fair to good.
Selection: Normal for a "high end" restaurant

Thoughts: Sadly, the most enjoyable part of the meal was using the Groupon to pay for dinner. I ordered the Chicken Parm, which should be an easy home run, but the sauce was bland. The chicken looked to be breaded by hand, but the breast was  inconsistently tenderized; one side was thin and crispy, the other only slightly moist. 

With so many Italian restaurants close by, there is no need to add Tavalo to the list. Head 4 minutes into Lincoln to Trattoria, or 30 min to the hill.
We had a great meal at this location on our first visit.  Four of us all agreed that the food presentations and tastes were as good as you can get!  All present made different selections.  Our Friends had the Braised Beef Short Ribs and the Beef Filet (with a sunny side up egg!).  My Wife had the Ziti Bolognese with Basil and I had the Steak Frites with great and tasteful Parmesan Frites!

Three of the Four of us went "All The Way" and had desserts to finish!  I wanted the Bananas Foster Flambe, however no one hand was "Authorized"to handle the needed flames!  I tried for Tiramisu with no luck, So, my Wife and I had a Coffee Mocha Chip ice cream.  One of our Friends had the Chocolate Ice Cream!  All of us left pretty satiated and content!

One of the draws for this Monday Night visit was the Half Price Wine offering!  We had two great bottles including a Washington State Pinot Noir and a Cabernet!  However, I found it strange that the cutoff point for the half priced wines halted at the $75 level!  I saw some higher priced wines that we would have loved to order if there was a price break! I thought that it would have been fair if they offered at least the $35 or so that was off the $75 wines on the higher end wines!  I guess this would have been difficult for them.
Stopped by this evening with my wife. 
Nice friendly staff and nice restaurant. We started off with the Calamari, it was enough to feed four people and it was very tasty, cooked to perfection, not over cooked or rubbery.
My wife had the bolognase. She loved it, pasta was a bit under cooked.
I tried the Veal Parmesean. It was panned fried, just the way I like it, very tender with a side of Penne Pasta. I also tried the Broccoli Rabe, it was seasoned perfectly. 
We both went home with food for another day.
Our server Justin did an excellent job. We will return. Give them a try. 
The appetizer broccoli and sausage was a great and tasty start.  The chicken with porcini stuffed purses, spinach and truffle sauce was absolutely delicious. 
Highly recommended!
We went here for a team dinner. The service was quick and professional. 
We shared starters...calamari was ok. The mussels were good. 
As main course I had the sauteed shirmp. The shrimp was good and the broccoli as well, but the spaghetti was without much taste and not really warm. The concept of this dish is very nice, but it needs a bit more bite.
We discovered this place with the help of the girl at the front desk of the Holiday Inn Express.  Food was outstanding, atmosphere was very nice and relaxing.  Nice choice of wines.  The wait staff were wonderfully helpful as we had never eaten there before. The Calamari was delish, but  on the spicy side for this New Yorker!!  Risotto balls are to die for!!  If you are in the area you must try it!!
My wife and I stopped by Tavolo's for dinner after flying into TF Green from Florida. First visit and pleasantly surprised. Monday evening just happened to be 1/2 price for bottles of wine. Nice menu selection. My wife had a seafood dish and I enjoyed a great steak. Numerous different deserts are offered.
Friendly staff. Good menu. Arancini risotto balls were outstanding! Men in our party loved the short ribs. Rigatoni Bolognese was too al dente and sauce was very salty. Duck was fatty. So, nice evening but there are too many excellent restaurants in RI to hurry back.
We visited this place twice during our visit to R.I. as it was near our hotel, but most importantly, it served delicious Italian food with a great wait staff. We were pleasantly surprised to find this gem and plan to visit again when we are back in town.
Tavalo is in a strip mall in Smithfield. don't be fooled. The food there is as good as anything on Federal Hill, nice atmosphere, and god portions. We had calamari and I ordered veal marsala, my wife had salmon and we enjoyed our dishes. Other orders that went past us looked VERY appealing as well.
Took some out of town friends here for dinner based upon (other) good reviews, and I was quite pleased. Excellent food served by friendly, attentive waiter (Justin) in enormous portions. Tavolo has a friendly, neighborhood feel because that's basically what it is...I will definitely go back!
Several visits to this restaurant have made it a favorite. We like to go for lunch, and every dish has been consistently good. The fried risotto balls served as appetizers hark back to the D Carlo days, and we love them. The pizza with prosciutto and rabe is fabulous. and we have also enjoyed the steak frites, pulled beef shank, and pulled chicken entrees. Last time we ate there with a friend, and he loved his lunch special, 3 courses, and each delicious. Portions are generous, service pleasant and welcoming, and the location is convenient. We are already planning the next visit.
Great prices and a great menu. Awesome Caesar salad. The rigatoni bolognese was amazing. Not a fan of their signature spicy olive oil. 
Wine bar intrigued me.  Although they have a wine list, I am not sure if I would consider it a wine bar so much.    The waitstaff were all very nice and attentive.  The food was very good.   I do think the prices were a bit high, you could get the same thing elsewhere for less.
This was our first visit since D Carlo transitioned over to Tavolo.  D Carlo was a fine restaurant, but for some reason not one of our favorites.  Tavolo, probably will continue on it that vein.

The food is very good and service is fine, but nothing "wows" you into wanting to rush back.  Prices are reasonable for the quality of food that you are being served.

All in all this is a fine restaurant and you will likely be pleased.
It was tasty..pricey.
Our waitress was nice but slow and brought me a glass with lipstick on it.I had to ask for the bread after a half hour of being seated.
Food is very good but priced rather high for the portion they serve.  Wines are also expensive considering the quality and minimal selection.  I would've expected a better wine list for this type of restaurant.
We Went early with an elderly couple. They tried to seat us in the back of the bus. Clearly a person with a cane should tip them off. After much adieu , I had us relocated to a more suitable place. Patrons were already enjoying the bar , and seemed to be having fun. The service was fair, as were the selections of food items. The food we ordered turned out to be bland and disappointing.
My favorite is the risotto balls, I love them, the prosciutto and pea combo make it so yummy. We always get an order of calamari. I enjoy this place.
We made reservations for four on a Saturday night , and were very pleased. The restaurant was full. However we were quite surprised at the service and food. We arrived a little early for our reservation. So we went to the bar for drinks. No sooner than we had our drinks the hostess came over to say our table was ready. Then April our wait person came right over and went over the specials. We put in an appetizer order, and selected a nice bottle of wine. The wine list is outstanding with something for everyone's taste and price. We plan to go back soon. kudos to the entire staff.
Once again, the Condesa welcomes with an open, cheerful atmosphere.  Background music is pleasant, but not so loud that you cannot have a conversation with your dinner companion. Try the guacamole(sp?) made fresh, table side, by the wait staff.  The shrimp and beef entrees were excellent, with the beef cooked as ordered.  Drinks were also good, coming from the well lit , decorative bar.  Have been before and will definitely return.
Condesa is this families newest Mexican restaurant...they also own Agave in Warwick...I have been enjoying their great authentic Mexican food along with their delicious specialty cocktails for years!!...Always greeted at the door, the bar is trendy with a cool mexican swagger....the decor is modern with old world class...very inviting and offers a quaint sitting area for small quaint conversations with privacy and comfy toss pillows.....their dining room offers quick service with waitstaff very knowledgeable about their menu always willing to explain new dishes and specialize your choices to individual tastes...I love that its local and offers that much needed 'something different' in our area....welcome to Smithfield Condesa...we are soooooo glad you are here!!
This place is relatively new to our local area. We were pleasantly surprised. The staff was very friendly and attentive but not overly so. They had some different things on the menu which were more traditional than your typical. They also had tacos and enchiladas. The tacos were massive and nearly impossible to pick up and eat. I would have preferred 3 smaller ones but the food was quality. I will go back and do recommend.
Went with wife last night, took twenty minutes to get our drinks, wasn't our server's fault she was otherwise very attentive. Guacamole,  enchiladas mole and veggie enchiladas were good. Our issue is with the lack of atmosphere. It's like a barn, loud,  large empty space. Not a place to take guests for an upscale dinner. Probably would only return for lunch,  if at all. 
Very good authentic Mexican cuisine.
Good drink menu and plenty of domestic and foreign beer.
Place was clean, prompt friendly service and nice atmosphere.
Try it you'll like it
Definitely will try again and again
Both the food and service were very poor quality.  The restaurant itself is very noisy.  After ordering, we never saw our server again.  Kitchen servers delivered our food.   Our soup was delivered at the same time as our entrees.  We finally had to flag down another server to have our server get us a second round of drinks.
Saturday night choice... Usually aim for next door (Tavolo) but opted for this for a change. Great change! Excellent service, large and tasty margarita, and we split a Burrito and freshly made guac. Love the decor (a welcome change from what was here before). Will be back! 
I haven't had Mexican food that tasted this good since dining in downtown Cozumel. The use of fruits and vegetables in the dishes were spot on and complemented the spices in the dishes we ordered. 

I had the Pollo Maya, chicken breasts in a tomato based sauce over grilled veggies and accompanied by spicy garlic mashed sweet potato. The chicken was topped with a sweet jicama that gave it a lot character. 

The chips and four salsas served to the table was a nice mix of flavors to start. The margaritas were a good size and had some premium tequilas that made them worth the price. The flan was rich and creamy with a strong caramel sauce and berry fruit to help sweeten it. I was not disappointed with any of the courses.
My family took me to Condesa for my birthday.  Nice atmosphere. Food was enjoyed by all.  It is children friendly and is quite adaptable to groups. 
So authentic, genuine, fresh and just plain awesome! From the staff to the cocktails (fresh juice Margaritas...I had the jalapeño one~yum!!) to the food! We dine out a lot and I work in the industry. Maybe a little spoiled and critical as a result. There was NOTHING we could find wrong with Condesa! Priced too low, I think, but I won't complain!! You must go!
Me and my coworker go out to lunch once a week and usually try local places and in some cases return. We heard of Condesa and decided to try it today for lunch 7/14/16.
I took a view minutes to read the reviews and they were pretty good.
The place is very nice inside and although a previous patron had comments to make about the interior, it's very nice, clean, open and friendly.
Hostess seated us right away. Our waiter quickly arrived and took our beverage order and returned with chips and a selection of dips. The dips were very good.
When I try a Mexican Restaurant I typically try the Carnita's (pork) tacos with onions and cilantro, but in reviewing the online comments, we decided to try the Burrito California. I had the pork and my coworker tried the chicken. It was perhaps the largest burrito I've seen. I quickly made minced meat out of mine and my coworker had the rest of his boxed up. They were packed with ingredients, meat was very moist and would get it again. We are already talking about our next trip. Give them a try.
Been here twice with friends. Just had drinks and chips and salsa. Salsa selections are great! They have good drinks but they need to get the large glasses like other Mexican restaurants. Compared to the restaurant before It was condesa the place looks great!! 
This was our first visit to Condesa (had trouble finding it on TripAdvisor because the site has the restaurant misspelled as Condessa). On a miscellaneous Tuesday lunchtime it was not busy so we were seated right away and service was prompt and efficient. My husband and I both ordered the chicken Burrito California. It was the best burrito either of us had ever had. The roasted tomato sauce had just the right kick, and we did everything but lick the plate. We were delighted to find such great food close to home, and we will go back very soon -- although the burrito was so good, we may never try anything else!
Ate dinner here with some friends recently, and had very low expectations of it being authentically Mexican. However, as soon as we walked in, I knew it was the real thing! The smell of REAL Mexican food is something you never forget.....or tire of. And spending most of my adult life in Arizona and Texas, I feel I am somewhat of an authority on this.
As we walked in, we saw a large bowl of delicious-looking guacamole being prepared tableside for another group. So the moment we were seated, we ordered some for us. Guacamole guy was ready with the goods almost as soon as we ordered it, and he was also quick in the prep. Large creamy fresh Haas avocados, ripe tomatoes, crushed garlic, lime juice, serrano chiles, and loads of cilantro were quickly mashed and mixed into the huge mortar and hot fresh chips had already arrived. We dug in and didn't stop till we reached the bottom of the bowl. Yummy!
The chips arrive with 4 types of "salsa":  refried beans, tomatillo, mild but tasty, chile-based red, and a hotter version of the red that was about the right amount of spice for me. However, someone with a "Northeast palate" might disagree. Therefore, dip lightly at first, but do try them all.
Our group ordered shrimp taco specials, a pollo asado special, and I ordered one of my fave Mexican dishes, chicken mole enchiladas. The corn tortillas were made from white corn and fresh as could be. The mole was definitely homemade, with just the right blend of chocolate and nuts. I wished it had more red chile in it, but I understand they are trying to cater to locals who don't like things too caliente.
There was so much food left over, everyone took doggie bags back to the hotel.....and it was just as good the next day. 
Open only 5 months, the owner oversees every detail of Condessa. He stopped by each table to introduce himself and check and see what we thought of the food. We couldn't say enough good reports to him, and my only regret about Condessa is it is so far from my home. However the next time I am anywhere in the vicinity, I will be back! Even a drive over from Providence or Boston is not out of the question for this Mexican food jewel! MUY DELICIOSO!!!
First off if you have to wait for a table there is accommodations to set a relax.     Open floor plan. Chips and the 4 dip server were a plus.  Drinks were well made and looked nice.  Guacamole was served made fresh right there!  Food came quickly enough even though they were busy.  The four meals we had at our table all got thumbs up!  I look forward to going back.  Sit at the bar maybe next time.
My first time here.  Service was very good.  Margaritas were very good.  The food was ok.  The menu is limited compared to another Mexican restaurant where I usually eat.  They did not have the soup listed on the menu.  The person making the appetizer at the table, had a tip jar.  That turned me off.  If I go back it will be for the margaritas.
We visited on a Saturday night and decided to sit at the bar. We had some drinks, barbacoa tacos and a jicama salad with shrimp. Everything was delicious and fresh. The prices are reasonable. The service was friendly. The atmosphere was nice. We will gladly return.
This is the most authentic Mexican food Ive seen in New England!
 Salsas have a kick, The Michelada was perfect, and the taco salad wasnt greasy. Updated, modern twists to classics, and no cheesy sombreros on the wall! Best part yet, our service was impeccable and gracious, even with having a 2 year old and a 10 month old with us!
They have a waitress with a little cart that comes to your table and prepares fresh guacamole tableside, it is most excellent with the house-made chips!  The food portions are generous and quality is very good.  I had Peninos  for an appetizer (sliced cucumbers and jicama with fresh lime juice and chile seasoning.  For my meal, I chose the Chile Lime Shrimp over sauteed veggies.  Everything was delicious, will definitely go back!
From either outside or in , you would have no clue as to the type of restaurant this is. Only the name gives it away. Inside is somewhat chic , although somewhat drab. It does have a nice and well stocked bar. Change the name, and it could be any type of restaurant inside. The food is just fair. Some of the dishes are a higher end Mexican , which were not successfully executed. High end margaritas , were watery requiring a floater to make it tolerable. This however drove the price to over $20. Go and try it with your eyes wide open.
We arrived around 12:45 on the Friday before Columbus Day weekend. It was busy but we only waited 10 minutes for a table for two. From that point things went downhill. Our server was slow from the start. From the time we ordered entrees to the time we were served it was 1 hr, 10 minutes. During that time we received near-zero attention. About 15 minutes before our entrees arrived our server stopped by to state it would "only be one more minute". She was absent from that point as someone else delivered or meals. If this were any other restaurant we would have walked out 30 minutes in - as we watched others seated AFTER us get there food [long] BEFORE us. Sure, this could happen anywhere. But at most restaurants someone would have come by to apologize, or at least check on us now and then. The only salvation was the meal. We had been here a couple of times before and knew the chef to be fantastic. But, despite the food quality we probably will not return. It's rare to have two hours to waste on lunch. A manager came by to interrupt us with an offer of a coupon for a free app next time we visit. I left that silly coupon along with the signed bill, with the $5 tip - which was $4 too much.
Just Look at my picture - are you kidding me!!
Great location, Great people, Great Food.
Indoor and Outdoor dinning
Pork and Beef
We were visiting my son at Bryant College and decided to go to lunch near the campus. Blackie's came highly recommended. Since it had rained all day , the place was packed. We waited not too long to be seated. The waitress came and we ordered drinks. I had ordered to Diet Coke with lime and she forgot the lime, but she eventually came back with it. We ordered pulled pork nachos and buffalo chicken wings. The chicken wings were awesome. The mild were even a little spicy. They were cooked well and came with carrots and celery and bleu cheese. We didn't really care for the nachos. The pulled pork was rather sweet. I had steamed clams and white sauce. The clams were small and tender. The sauce was very very salty. They give you bread  to sop up the sauce  but it was so salty I didn't want it . One of my sons had a cheeseburger that came a little overcooked. The other son had a hot dog flatbread pizza , which I would not recommend. All in all I would say the food was just okay and the service was just OK too. The check came to over $100 for the three of us including tip.
Calamari was okay.  Tuscan turkey burger was delish!! Blackie burger was very good as well. Lots of food which was good as it was pricey. Waitress was very friendly and helpful. Atmosphere was very loud and seemed like an after work meeting place for 30 somethings...we are a little older so not our kind of place. It was a Wednesday night and very busy. Recommend reservation if going at dinner time. Would recommend food is worth it!!
Still a great meal that I can eat at home. What can be better except making it myself. The only issue is portion size it is a little different than dinning in. 
We still love Blackie's, and will return for sure - but will never order the take-out again.  

The restaurant is terrific, serving fresh, unique takes on just about everything.  They do so many things well, it's hard to pick a favorite.  Especially excellent - the hummus platter, endless paleo options, nachos, fresh salads, burgers, and fabulous Gluten Free choices.  The service is friendly, knowledgeable and efficient.  

The take-out, which started off awesome, has declined in quality, portion size and freshness.  Our first several orders were so good that we thought we had finally found a reasonably healthy take-out option.  Our last 3 orders were so significantly smaller and less appealing than what is served in the restaurant that we will not order it again.

The restaurant remains one of our favorites for a local bit, but the take-out needs to improve.
I pass by this restaurant often and it is usually packed. So, I figured must be good. After asking around con census is that's is good
I finally got there and had a great BBQ brisquet melt... Very good
Kids got hamburgers that have my name on it for next visit which I hope is soon
Overall very good .... Like I heard
Try it you'll like it
Great selection of beers on tap including several IPAs.  Fabulous salmon that was crisp and moist with a surprisingly tasty tzatziki sauce.  
I had heard so much about this restaurant and due to time of evening, we were able to get accommodated and get a late dinner. The bar scene was active and there was a singer entertaining at the time. The menu offered interesting items but what overcame me was that the place had a terrible smell. We were seated near the men's bathroom side and due to my sensitive noise found it hard to enjoy my meal with this unclean smell. I had once received take out from here that was delicious but coming in person was a disappointment. It would be a great place to dine and locals and college students make up the scene. I hope they read this review and give their restaurant a major cleaning, especially the bathrooms.
Overall, the food is pretty good here and moderately priced. I like how their menu is always changing and they also have a special paleo menu as well. It seems like no matter what day of the week it is, it's always busy and that there are things going on, which makes it a fun place to be. My only critique is that the food is very slow coming out of the kitchen. I was there last night and waited about 45 minutes for my salad and my friends salads to come out.
If you haven't tried Blackie's for a Sunday brunch you're missing out! The menu has something for everyone and then if you're like me you"ll want one of everything on it!!
Delicious. Everything here is house-made, outside-the-box. Scrumptious. Salad topped with fries, over sized burgers. Never had a bad meal!!!
I have been to this restaurant a half dozen times and have never had a dish I was completely satisfied with. Menu changes often and service with a smile. It is always busy even during slow times.
had a 'ladies luncheon' today at Blackie's.  what a hopping place!!  we had a variety of sandwiches which were all very good.  the burgers are a mile high with big fat onion rings.  yummmmmmy.  Only draw back is it takes quite a long time to get the food.  fortunately we weren't in a hurry but it might be a tight squeeze for a business lunch.
Bar is very small and packed if you are trying to just have drinks. They have a good selection of beer but the wine isn't great. Food is pretty good if you want large portions of bar type food. 
Anything I have ordered here has  been great. Highly recommend. I've gone back numerous times :) Gone with family and friends. All love it and say want to go back. You won't be disappointed.
Our first time here, and everything was delicious. We started with the nachos, and moved on to the Mac and cheese quesadillas, the pad thai salad, the stuffies, everything was out of the ordinary and wonderful.
I've visited this place twice in recent months. I really enjoyed my first visit. I liked the decor of the inside and thought it was a fun atmosphere. The parking lot could use some work. The food was good and the servers were all polite. I tend to remember prices were very reasonable for the food and drinks we got.

My second visit was not as satisfying. I guess they changed their menu to a summer menu or something so I wasn't very impressed by the selection. Some of the things I found appealing on my first visit were no longer on the menu. Also seemed like everything was pricier. I still like the atmosphere and the servers, but probably won't return until the fall.
This is our favorite place in Smithfield and we've been at least a dozen times. Menu changes season to season and a few new items get added once in awhile. Food is always great. Only downside to the place is the limited parking but the complimentary valet has eased that a bit since it was introduced about a year ago.
I have eaten at Blackie's a number of times and have yet to have even an mediocre meal.  The ingredients seem fresh, and I appreciate that they have a gluten free menu.  The burgers are excellent and the waitstaff is very good. It does get very crowded at night (for good reason), so you might want to call ahead.
Beautiful place and nice wait staff.

The food is always great .    The coffee  and breakfast sandwiches are  excellent !
Never disappointed when I come here. Food is fresh and delicious. I love their bacon, chicken, ranch bow-tie pasta salad! Excellent potato salad too. 
This place is the best! I had the most delicious meatball sandwich there:) I look forward to Fridays  at my school! We all order and look forward to it every week!!!! Love Delizioso! 
Awesome place to have a cup of coffee and lunch! Great salads, sandwiches, and pizza. The atmosphere is very inviting and fun!
The food is awesome and the illy coffee is fantastic !  

They have everything from thin pizza to pasta and chicken dishes .

Great place to eat lunch and so pretty inside.  
The atmosphere is inviting and modern with beautiful interior design. Illy coffee products are carried as well as Boar's Head deli meats. The portions are generous and prices are extremely reasonable for the quality of food.
Mon and thur are $0.35 wings nights.  Ask for them extra crispy and with buffalo sauce and get ready to enjoy!!! I've had buffalo wings all over and these are very very good!
Good beers on draft. 
Friendly staff. 
Atmosphere is fine.  Regular bar atmosphere. 
When it was Crickets we thought dark and gloomy but food was good. Well now bright and cheerful and food still good. Staff is very nice. I told my husband we should try again now that it is Stillwater Tavern. We are glad we tried again. We travel this area a lot so I am sure we will go back.
Appears to cater to seniors...and that's a good thing.  Nice atmosphere and lots of specials. Recommend you stop in. 
The place looks a bit like a banquet hall from the outside as well as the inside. Seven TVs lined up along the walls. None over the bar area. At first I thought there were two bar areas side by side, but actually there is only one with another huge roundtable. Older crowd when we there on a Friday night and not crowded at all.

Our waitress was nice at first but seemed like she got flustered by a whining older guy seated next to us. Appeared she took a bit of a mental break and we didn't see her for about ten minutes. So it took a while to place our order.

Food was okay. Portions were huge. I got the steak tips with rice. Steak was very dry. Large portion of rice which was bland. Bread was terrific, though. My girlfriend got a salad which was also huge. Prices were reasonable for what we got. May or may not be back.
First of all, I thought since the restaurant changed hands that the outdated, dirty, drab, dark décor might be updated-it was not. The waitress was clueless, did not know the menu, specials, etc., never returned to our table, waited 15 minutes for bill after we had finished eating-you get the picture.  We were charged $15.00 for drinks-my husband and I  had diet cokes with two refills each.  Obviously, they charge full price for refills on soda.  My steak was pretty good, my husband liked his seafood dinner also.  But for a steak dinner, a seafood platter and diet cokes-no appetizer, no desert, no coffee-the bill was $83.  I thought it was so expensive considering.  Much prefer Parente's around the corner on Route 7 near Bryant entrance.
Great belly clams and sole Francoise (4 huge pieces of sole) done so wonderfully with the Francoise.  The helpings were Huge!  could not finish my meal. came with soup or pasta with vegetables and rolls.
Looks like your run of the mill place from the outside, but a hidden paradise for sure. Great food , music and service....all while hanging out by a huge pool for the day.  $10 to swim and hang out for the day, but clearly a bargain.  Can't wait to go back.
I went to this place today with my wife and family.  We were greeted by a man in a wheel chair who immediately checked our bags for food because they want you to buy their food and not bring anything, and I mean anything in to the pool area. We were treated like criminals. They checked every compartment of our duffel bags. We had our 15-month-old daughter with us and we had some baby food and crackers and grapes and cheese for her that apparently was not allowed. They even charged my 15-month-old daughter a $10 cover charge for the pool area. Yeah, like she was going to swim on her own. The wristband was so big that it could fit around her neck. The whole process took at least 15 minutes for the screening. I was expecting a cavity search next LOL. Once we finally got into the pool area after going through what seemed like an ACI intake session we ordered drinks and food all of which was terrible. The food was the worst food I've ever had in my life! The heartburn started immediately and the drinks seemed watered down. Even the soda seemed watered down. The pool itself looked like it hadn't been painted in 15 years. All the sides were chipped and paint was missing and the endless list of rules they had for the pool area basically made it so that it wasn't worth even swimming. The service was the worst I have ever experienced. The girls that were servicing the pool area seemed miserable and by their behavior seemed like they'd rather be somewhere else. Keep in mind if your tab goes over 50 or $100 there is automatically going to be an 18% tip added to the bill which is truly not deserving of anyone who is miserable with their job. This is a seasonal place that is obviously in business just to make money as fast as they can during the summer months. This place truly lives up to its  name for it truly is a Last Resort for anyone that desperate to jump in a public pool, eat horrible food, get terrible service and pay $150 for a family of 4, one of which is only 15 months old for cover charge, food and drinks. Your money will be better spent at the beach.
my food was really good after i asked for it to be cooked longer than normal.
server was great & knows the group i was with.  they all like her too.  my food took a long time but it was very hot on arrival so it wasn't the waitress' fault.
very disappointed about the charge for swimming - esp when they 'close' the pool (without making it unaccessible) at sunset and there's no lifeguard.  i don't need a lifeguard, really, but the fee is all profit the way it is now.
i expected half the fun to be swimming in a lit-up pool after dark.  now i won't bother going there again - without using the pool, at sunset it's just like any other restaurant.  no reason to drive from the next county where i live.
even though we were outside, we had cig smoke in our faces frequently.  imho they should make the area to the left of the stage (facing the stage) a smoking area & have a fan to direct smoke away from the stage.
there's room for more tables & chairs but not enough furniture.
cover that night started at 8.  i was glad i called ahead to ask.
I met with a large group of friends and former co-workers for drinks.  We selected this place based on someone's past experience and it's central location for everyone.

It's a huge building with a massive pool out back.  We were hoping to hang outside, but the outdoor bar wasn't open so we stayed inside where the AC couldn't keep up and it was very warm.  They have a somewhat limited draft beer selection but they did have all the usuals.

We normally order some appetizers, but based on the overall feel of the place decided against it.  There were some people in the pool, but it definitely wasn't crowded outside and inside we were pretty much the only people at the bar and no one was seated at a table.

We stayed for a few beers and left and will not be heading back to this place anytime soon.
Nice to see a random hang out bar off the side of the road. The place is huge. There is pool, an actual pool, beach volleyball, multiple bars, and a stage. The pizza is solid! Need a bigger draft beer selection. 
It is more bar like, no frills, does have pool cost $ 10 per person ..it is clean and no kids after 3 in the pool ...
Went there to listen to the band. A Strange place. If you want an afternoon of Redneck city--this is your place.  Beer, swimming pool, and music.  Don't order wine---it was bad. Beer or hard liquor only
 Did not eat any food. Thought it was strange, we had to pay $5 apiece to walk on the patio to listen to the band too. Bathrooms not too clean.  Probably would not come back. 
We went into this place and it was empty, we should of turned around. But no, we go in. We asked if they serve food. The bartender says yes. We look at menu. We decide to eat. We order some  wings, nit a lot of sauce cooked crispy.  I ordered the Baja fish tacos and he ordered a giant pastrami on a torpedo instead of rye. The wings came in a reasonable amount of time. They were COVERED WITH BUFFALO SAUCE, we were hungry,  we wiped off the excess.  They were ok for frozen. We finished them and waited and waited and waited for our meal. We were just about to tell bartender we want our check and our meal came. IT STUNK! my fish tacos were disgusting.  They were the same fish they use for F&C's. Battered fish fried,  on a stale tortilla with get this- coleslaw mixed with dressing, Not avacado but guacamole and salsa. It was gross. I can't believe they serve it this way.  My husband pastrami looked like they reheated 3 times and the roll was asked to be grilled and they put it in the oven. It was dry and hard. The reason we stopped in tonight was we first went to a restaurant up route 7 to find it closed down, it was a new restaurant that we haven't tried.  We wanted ti give the last resort a chance. Well we gave them a chance,  and it will be our last resort to ever come back even if it was the last restaurant standing. One other thing, customers watch what goes on, there were people going behind bar getting there own drinks putting his plastic cupola right into the ice. I saw too much. Management needs to manage and get that real estate back hopping again. One piece of advice, on the bottom of your receipt,  it says try a $5 margaritas outside under the tiki bar. ITS FREAKIN FREEZING OUT AND THE TIKI BAR BEEN CLOSED PROBABLY SINCE LABOR DAY. Why not tell them to try a $5 flavored hot chocolate cocktail to warm them up instead. 
We usually eat here when going to listen to the band Brass Attack ( which by the way is a great band ) The burgers are always a solid choice as well as the fries that come with them. We have had a few of the other sandwhich items which have been good also. The drinks are decent enough as is the service. A nice little place to visit during the week after work or on the weekend if you want to listen to music or dance. They have a huge outdoor pool which is open in the summer months with music outside.
I've been here before once for food and a bunch of times for drinks and live music. I've never had a bad experience until today. It was a Monday evening, and there was hardly anyone in the place, including staff. The service was beyond terrible!!! We started off our disaster date with the waitress telling us that more than half the menu was unavailable due to a new cook still learning the kitchen. That is absolutely absurd!!! And by the way, the waitress seemed like she was on drugs, completely out of it, extremely inattentive, and very forgetful. Wait, it gets better. We ordered three sandwiches with fries, which wasn't what we really wanted bc of the very limited menu. 40 minutes later, we finally got our food. My fiance's burger was much rarer than he would've liked it, but we can't blame the cook, since the waitress never asked how he wanted it cooked! We asked the waitress that dropped the food off to the  table (not our original waitress) for utensils since our waitress forgot to give them to us, but she never came back either! My fiance' had to go track a waitress down and deliver the utensils himself! When our waitress finally came back to check on us, another 20 minutes later, we asked for the check and a box for leftovers. 10 minutes later, we got the check, but she forgot the box. We gave her a card to swipe; 10 minutes after that, she came back with the receipt to sign, still no box! Another 5 minutes, we finally got the box, and that was the LAST time we EVER go to Effin's Last Resort! TERRIBLE!!!
Friday 10/3/2008
Had heard but had not been.
Had Appertizers and Dinner Calamari was GREAT!!!!!
Our waitress was very pleasant and attentive(Jasmine)
Band was AWSOME!!!! Great crowd too.
We will be back
This hidden gem, is a wonderful Lebanese restaurant, some of the best food around! The food is better than I have had at Boston restaurants- the food was fresh, and each dish was tasty. We had tabouli, hummus, grape leaves, baked kibbee, raw kibbee, lamb, chicken, etc.- ALL was wonderful and authentic flavors.  This service was great, and a nice atmosphere. This place is about 5 minutes off of Rt. 295 in Smithfield . You won't be disappointed here- it's worth a drive from Boston!!
The service was amazing!!!!!Came here with my boyfriend on a Saturday Night after work for dinner. Wanted to try something new and we heard about how great and authentic the Lebanesse food is here at the Continental. Our friends were right!!! The Mekanek was amazing with the zesty lemon sauce as a base for the homemade Lebanesse sausages. I had the Falafel and my boyfriend had the Lamb Kabob over rice which was delicious with the grilled veggies and the Tabuleh salad. The owner came to check on us on the patio and made sure we were doing ok which was a nice touch and the CHEF HIMSELF BROUGHT US OUR DESERTS!!!! The customer service here is amazing and so is the food. We will be back for sure!!!
What a wonderful treat to visit The Continental. We had apps and dessert and loved every bite. Be sure to order the Foul Moudammas, a fava bean dish that was so tasty and amazing. Dessert was Znoud Elsitt - flavors so beautifully blended. I will be back and I'm bring friends!
Lets start by saying the owner welcomed us personally (as he always does) and sincerely.  The restaurant is clean with table linens and linen napkins.  Service is always just right - not pushy, not too distant - just right.

The food: well let me say, having been to Lebanon and the Middle East, and having eaten at restaurants serving Middle Eastern food, I welcome coming back and bring family and friends to enjoy the good, fresh and wholesome food.

The restaurant caters to anyone who would enjoy chicken, beef, lamb, and salads, that are made fresh.  *If you are a vegetarian - you also would be at the 'right place'!

Yes, I do love the service, food, and reasonable price.  Usually it requires a doggie bag, since the portions are generous.
Authentic eastern dishes.  Both of our dinners were excellent.  Large portions.  The calamari was cooked to our desired crispness and also  excellent.  Pastries were very good.   
Good variety of Lebanese food.  Served with a smile.  The owner is hands on and makes sure everything is good.
I have been going to the Continental for a while (sometimes weekly with my family)....it has excellent Lebanese food, like my Jiddo and aunts would make. Last night, I went to a rehearsal dinner there, and unbeknownst to the party, there was authentic Arabic music and a belly dancer...they LOVED it!!! All in the party commented on how delicious the food was, how excellent the entertainment and how kind and attentive the Owner was. I would give it 10 stars, but it only goes up to 5. You won't be dissapointed
i was surprised to find this restaurant on the way up to boston. this is a hidden gem in a very remote area. its easily accessible off 295 highway. anyway i stopped here with a couple of friends and it was great. we didn't know what kind of restaurant it was but when we found out it was lebanese.. we were all pretty excited. the owner was very hospitable and helpful in picking our items on the menu. the food was amazing quality; reminded me of my trip to lebanon nearly a decade ago. truly authentic lebanese. my dish recommendations below:

makenek
fattoush
chicken kabob
hummus
grape leaves
Came with a friend, had no idea what to expect (I was told it was a Greek restaurant... but no, it's Lebanese!)  I eat out -- but am careful where because I don't like being disappointed (and I'm not the easiest person to please.)  I don't need super-fancy -- good food & good service, high-brow or low-brow, rule  (though I definitely like white tablecloths when available, which they have here).  I like fresh, well and interestingly but not outlandishly seasoned, properly cooked and served food -- and pleasant taste surprises...  Our dinner here had all of that.  In addition, the welcome was just lovely.  We felt cared for, attended to, and that our happiness, enjoyment of the dinner, and presence were personally important to the family that owns and runs this restaurant. Not something that one finds with any consistency in the US, and it's a very pleasant experience.   I have to add that I had a very excellent glass of (Italian) wine, recommended by the owner.  More expensive than the house wine -- but well worth it -- that one glass was a true treat that complimented our dinner beautifully.  Thank you for such a lovely evening.  (The music was nice too!)  Oh... and the dessert... ok.  You get the picture.  This one's worth the trip.
My family came here for dinner to celebrate my birthday! The atmosphere was beautiful, and the meals were delicious.  We all ordered different meals, the kibbe was delicious, as well as the kefta, chicken, lamb and beef kabobs.  I highly recommend this restaurant  for its impeccable atmosphere and delicious food.  The mideastern salad is fresh and  crisp with a delicate dressing.  Also, try the yogurt dip with cucumbers, we loved it with our meals! The wait staff is pleasant and efficient and the host is hospitable!!!
We decided to have dinner here after my boyfriend heard a commercial on the radio.  He called to make a reservation for 6:30 on a Friday night and was told we wouldn't need one because it wouldn't be busy at that time, which I found odd.  When we arrived there were only a handful of  cars in the parking lot.   When we went inside, the first thing my boyfriend noticed was the dingy carpets.  We asked for a table outside, and were seated immediately.  We were given water and a basket of pita bread and we ordered a bottle of wine.  After about five minutes, the owner came over and apologized telling us the waitress is in training and could we tell him what wine we ordered.  We were fine with that.  He brought the wine out and asked us if she had taken our food order.  When we said no, he took the order himself.  We had a piece of pita, which we figured was what a middle eastern resaurant serves instead of rolls.  Not my thing, but understandable.  We both ordered kabobs.  I had beef with fries and he had lamb with rice.  My meal was much better than his.  The rice looked and tasted like white rice and the lamb was so bland he wasn't sure if it was even lamb.  He eventually ordered a garlic dip just to spice up his food. There was certainly a generous portion of beef, I just generally wasn't crazy about the flavor.  In fairness to the restaurant, I have never eaten at a middle eastern restaurant, so it could be me and not them.  We wrapped most if our food, ordered another bottle of wine and baklava for dessert.  When the waitress came out with the wine, she did not take away our old glasses, so the owner called her back to the table from across the patio.  He really should have just done it himself and explained it to her out of earshot of the customers.  My boyfriend really enjoyed the baklava, which the waitress said was on the house.  I'm  not sure why, but it was a nice gesture.  There were definitely some plusses to this restaurant, but we were disappointed in the flavors of the food.
Fantastic! I stopped by for lunch and what a lunch it was. I ordered the hummus, the lamb kabob, which was perfectly cooked - not too well, not too rare - plus some baklava for desert. I pilfered some of my brother's kafta kabob while he wasn't looking (don't tell him!) and it was delicious, too.
The waitstaff were friendly and attentive and the food was served on time. You can really tell how hard the management goes to please you!
If you're looking for authentic Middle Eastern cuisine, this is it. 
Sahtein! (bon apetit!)
I had a great time at the continental restaurant! the food is delicious and the wait staff did an excellent job.I defiantly would go there again and again. thumbs up 8^)
Did not know what to expect. The menu had something for everyone. We chose to go with the platter for two.  Chicken and Beef, grilled veggies over rice. Just wonderful. Melt in your mouth and seasoned perfectly.  The salads (garden and tabouli) were fresh.  The desserts were excellent.
We decided to try a large variety of authentic foods, and they were all very flavorful and fresh tasting. All of the staff were extremely friendly and helpful, helping us choose which dishes to order for the evening. When you decide to come and try the fabulous food here, be sure to enjoy the music performed by local favorites along with the food. I highly recommend this restaurant for people looking for a great experience, it is comfortable and clean inside and we couldn't have planned for a better night! Leaving was the hardest part!
The Continental is a hidden gem in Smithfield RI. This authentic Middle Eastern restaurant is family owned and run. The food, from hummus to Moussaka to kabobs is all freshly prepared from real food with delicious spices. While the ambiance is a little funky - white table cloths in what was clearly a former chain restaurant, a concrete outdoor patio - the owners could not be nicer and the food could not be better. It is generally quiet (we wish they did more business so we would be sure they will stay open) so you can actually carry on a conversation.
We have been to this restaurant a couple of times since it opened.  The first time we both had the scallop dinner.  It was very good.  The portion was very large.  The rice pilaf was delicious.  They give you a grilled tomato, pepper and onion as your vegetable.
The next time we went we wanted to try the kabobs.  I tried the lamb and beef  and my wife had the chicken.  They are served over the rice pilaf and roasted vegetables.  I was really disappointed in the lamb and beef kabobs.  They were very bland and not very tender.  The chicken kabobs were tender, but were also bland.  
The service was very good and the greeter was very nice.
We haven't been there for the entertainment yet, but it is free.
Tried this place for the first time last week.  It was nice enough out for us to sit outside we were the first to arrive for lunch but a few other couples came in after we sat.  Food was good.  Would like to go back and enjoy the outdoor bar and patio one night.
A great restaurant, great selection of  Mediterranean  food made fresh daily. Salads were delicious and good selection from bar- wait staff helpful- outdoor bistro is place to be on a summer evening with Frank Sinatra  singer although the patio chairs could be more comfortable,
Tonight we ventured out to a place we had not heard of " Terrazza"  Very glad we did ! A little of Greek influence goes a long way .  Calamari was super tender. Crab cakes were quite good , although one was slightly overcooked.  Nice spot to go . They did a great job redoing it. Very comfortable and friendly. Drinks were a little wimpy. The server was great and overcame any shortcomings.
Have been here years ago and service was terrible, but the new owners have made great improvements. Service was good and people were very friendly. We had Sara who did a wonderful job. Place was busy and they hustle. Outside dining is the way to go. There Is a nice outdoor bar with a great TV. We had antipasto and pizza, both good. Also had a singer, Tony who also made the night enjoyable. It's worth a try on a nice night. 

This place has a great menu. All the fish is wild caught and the beef is all grass fed. Excellent service. Very nice atmosphere. Nice outside patio. 
We visited this restaurant based on recommendations of two other couples we know. Wow! Food is delicious and well prepared, a lovely blend of Mediterranean and Mid-East cuisines.The restaurant is clean and well kept. The staff is friendly, professional and attentive. We got to meet the chef owner Mario, who treated us as if we were long time regulars. In short, it was a wonderful dining experience and we look forward to our next visit. Highly recommend this restaurant.
Very please with the new owners and menu.  I have been stopping about once a week for a light dinner and one to go. Works out well.   It appears they now have the outside bar / patio open which is very nice.  Enjoy !
Great place to sit outside for dinner and cocktails. We both enjoyed our meals and the service was excellent.
We visited Terraza on a busy Saturday late afternoon and asked for the outside area. We listened to live music and had an excellent meal. I had steak brisket and my wife had a salmon dinner. We also had a few appetizers. The medditeranean chicken wings were especially great. I highly recommend.
Great looking place inside and out. Great waitress,  But the food wasn't to good. Simple menu. They use way to much minced garlic dressing on the salmon and mash potatoes. Kind of gross. Chicken dinner not to good either way to much fat in the chicken. There special drinks are small and low budget glasses. For $9.75 drink they need to have a better presentation. 
My bf and I went with a groupon. It was the first time for both of us. The lunch menu is limited, but everything we had was delicious. The calamari was the best we ever had!!! It was uniform in size, super tender and I appreciated the hot peppers being put to one side of the plate since I'm not a fan. The aoli dipping sauce was also outstanding as was the sangria. We will definitely be back....Next time for dinner
Made a reservation for 7 pm for 5 people.  Had to wait 25 min.  They wanted to give me a table in the back room. That's not why I made a reservation to sit in a back room on top of other guests.  I did notice an empty table for 6 but wasn't offered to us. Apparently that was reserved for friends of theirs, because someone came out of the back to acknowledge the party when they arrived. After being very aggravated and expressing my frustration, they couldn't have been any nicer to us. Finally sat down to review the menu, and to my surprise, the menu changed completely from the last time I was there. Where is the beet and goat cheese salad? Where is the seared sea scallops with risotto?  I was looking forward to eating that and ended up with an appetizer because the only other fish was salmon or swordfish. My husband and friend did order the swordfish which they said was very good, but it was a very small portion for the price that only came with couscous and not a vegetable. Ordered another glass of wine, and was told that they ran out of the pinot noir that I was drinking. Later the waitress came over to me to let me know that she had a bottle of pinot noir that is only served by the bottle and was willing to open it to serve me a glass. I took her up on that. We were offered free dessert on the house for waiting so long. We took them up on that also. Overall, I was very disappointed in the food selection and will not go back.
After a college tour of nearby Bryant University, we stumbled upon Terrazza and were pleasantly surprised at what we found! The food was amazing, we were lucky enough to have Jackie as our waitress and she is pro, and the atmosphere very pleasant. We are trying to convince our son to attend Bryant so we can eat there regularly!  Great job Terrazza!
Went with another couple. We all left feeling underwhelmed and we overpaid...when we left. The place was clean and the patio very nice...fire pit and all. The singer was SO loud that the waiter had trouble hearing us, and us hearing him and simple dinner conversation was difficult.The bread you get is 7 little squares of flat bread with ricotta cheese. 7 tiny pieces for 4 adults...we did ask for more with dinner. We each had a glass of wine and one other drink. Our meals consisted of a meat and starch...all meat/fish plopped on top of the starch...no vegetable. AND no soup or salad starter. 3 meals came together..one "fell" we were told and would be out soon.....10 mins later... while the rest of us ate slowly. We did have dessert...ok but very small portions....and we had to ask for spoons for the sorbet...no cream or sugar for the coffee.  125.00 per couple....250.00 a table and nothing to bring home for any of us....we would have had to pay EXTRA for a veg! We paid that for a wonderful experience and meal in New Orleans! I would not recommend or go back...
This huge venue is friendly, clean, well laid out and extremely busy at dinner.  A very large patio and fireplace adorn the North end of the building making room for the scores of visitors.  Inside, most surfaces are pleasant grained finished wood as are the tables and comfortable chairs.  Often, there is Evening live music! It’s really a beautiful place!  

The food is Middle Eastern with a few Italian dishes mixed in.  We had the Falafel  which, although a little on the bland side, is quickly spiced up with the side of Tahini Sauce.  I asked if the Falafel was made on site or brought in.  They confirmed that it made on site!  

With the Falafel, I also had the Lentil Soup and a Tuna Steak.  The Tuna was great, the soup a little bland!  My “forever dieting” Wife, had a Chicken Soup and a Salad of Walnuts, Pecorino Slices and Mushrooms.  She LOVED it!

I was surprised that they did not have expected dishes on the menu such as Shish kebobs and Gyros!  However there were many Lamb dishes including Chops available.  

All in all, this is a great place for Lunch or Dinner!  I’m quite sure you will like it!!!


My food was excellent.  Scallops were juicy and tender.  The spinach salad appetizer was HUGE...shared with a friend. Service for drinks was a bit slow but our waitress was apologetic and courteous.  My friend's  chicken was a bit overcooked but this restaurant had only been open a week or so so cutting them some slack. I plan to return tonight with my hubby and enjoy the patio again.  Dessert was very yummy as well.  Overall a pleasant night, just a few kinks still needed to be worked out.
Delicious food attentive staff, and romantic! We went here for my 60th birthday, and I really enjoyed the food and the service.
My husband and I eat out often so we were excited to try Terrazza. We sat outside on the patio which was nice and spacious. Our waitress was wonderful, drinks we're coming as soon as she noticed we were low on them. The food was very tasty and great quality. My husband loved the Salmon and Risotto! Overall a wonderful dinner. The only minor setback for us was it wasn't very lively, as we frequent federal hill often, but we would definitely return!
Beautiful new dining experience with options! Outdoor patio is huge and has a fireplace for cool summer nights to enjoy the live music. Bartenders are attentive and creative with fresh ingredients, appetizers are big enough to share - the Ahi Tuna is fantastic, so is the hummus, try it with the lamb topper!
Last Friday night my best girlfriend and I met up and wanted to go somewhere to have apps and drinks in an outdoor setting.  Of course we didn't want to just go to the same places we have always frequented. That's when we stumbled upon Terrazza this hidden gem, new to the foodie scene in Smithfield, RI.  Only on the restaurant scene for three weeks ( I was a little skeptical) boy did Terrazza prove me wrong.  We sat on the patio right next to the beautiful lit fireplace, tables were scatter with other out door diners, a nice outdoor bar and fantastic music playing.  We started with a fantastic bottle of Rose- Gris Blanc, affordable too just under $30.00.  For an appetizer we had their homemade falafel OMG it was so tasty, the herbs, the pickled turnips were a fantastic accompaniment. For my main meal I chose the beef tips which came with whipped mashed potatoes. The beef was so tender I didn't even need a knife. I will definitely come back to Terrazza!  I totally recommend this restaurant.
Pizza is consistently good. We usually get delivered pizza twice a month. They offer a lot of options.
Everything we had was wonderful, and the service friendly and attentive. I highly recommend the fish cakes!
Great food with attentive staff and wonderful chef creations. Open to the public as well as guests. Casual beginning to your day.
Every entree was beautifully presented. We ate here two mornings in a row, and were not disappointed. A step above your standard breakfast fare.
Ate twice and had the great grilled daily muffin each day with the spectacular oatmeal. Many of the tables offer a view of Bass Rocks. Really good quality food.
This is one of my favorite places to eat breakfast. Everything is made on premises and everything is delicious! My mother is a huge fan of the oatmeal with the fruit toppings and a fresh fruit muffin. My aunt loves the eggs. My husband loves the omelettes. I am a fan of the pumpkin pancakes (in season) and the french toast!
This is a gem! If you are in the area you have to come here and have breakfast. Great for bigger groups as well. Delicious and we will definetely be back. 
They have menu for Gluten Free individuals.  The breads and English muffins were wonderful.  Even gave me the brand name for me to purchase on line.
Went to The Cafe and had a fantastic bacon & cheese omelet.  Muffins and stuffed french toast looked so yummy.  Relaxed and comfortable atmosphere.  Very friendly and knowledgeable staff.  The view of the ocean and the Twin Lighthouses is spectacular.   
Sort of ordinary breakfast in a spectacular setting.  Overlooks the ocean and twin lighthouses. Reasonably priced.  Good service.  Tasty food.
Great little spot for breakfast to enjoy the gorgeous view of the ocean.  We would definitely come back again when traveling to the Gloucester area.
We had breakfast here every morning. My daughter loved the cinnamon raisin toast, and every meal was perfect. No need for lunch when you have a great home cooked breakfast like this every day. I loved the Atlantis sandwich, egg, spinach, tomato and cheese on an English muffin.
Delicious breakfast, beautiful view,friendly and accommodating servers. Home-made muffins big enough to share.
I've been here a few times now and it's still all good. This past weekend I tried the Rustic Breakfast - a somewhat Italian take on eggs benedict with foccacia bread, caramelized onions, eggs any way you want them, bacon, tomatoes, cheese, and hollandaise. The hollandaise was a bit on the greasy side but otherwise, delicious.
We almost passed by this unprepossessing cafe inside Atlantis Cafe as just boring "hotel food". Boy, were we wrong! Their food is innovative, creative, fresh, fantastic and served with an oceanview from almost every table. This place is obviously someone's love project, as there is just no other reason for a from scratch restaurant to be located out in this little motel off the beaten path. The service is friendly, warm and fast. They seemed to handle big parties easily so it is the perfect place for that post wedding family brunch. There was so much lobster in the lobster bennie...sigh. They bake from scratch; the pecan rolls are mountainous. Try the fishcakes, just go there. Notice: it closes down at 11:30 am and the Sunday crowd was pouring in by 8 am.
great place for breakfast-   right on the ocean.  excellent food and lots of choices.   The service was great and it was so nice to eat and look out at the ocean.   We have eaten here for breakfast the last three years we have been in Gloucester.
We stayed at The Atlantis Oceanfront Inn and decided to have breakfast at the hotel café. What a great decision. The service was efficient and friendly, the food was delicious(the homemade muffin: exceptional) and the views awesome. The café is spotlessly clean just like the hotel. We sat right at the window overlooking the Atlantic ocean. I highly recommend having breakfast here.
My wife and I had breakfast here one morning.  We had completely different experiences with the food.  The staff was friendly and quick.  My wife had poached eggs, home fries and toast.  I had scrambled eggs, bacon and sausage.  My wife said the home fries were undercooked and the poached eggs were among the very best she's ever had.  My scrambled eggs were rubbery and the sausage was cold and tasteless.  When we left the restaurant, my wife said she would go back and I didn't see the need to.  I've seen other reviews and this one morning was a slow morning, so this experience may not represent the norm.
Whilst the Cafe at the Atlantis is a bit more expensive than most other places for breakfast in town, it's well worth it.  The view of the Back Shore of Gloucester is unsurpassed and the food is delicious as well. The oatmeal/molasses bread is so good that we ordered an extra side of it. The Backshore Omelet, with beautiful skinny asparagus, portabellas, and tomatoes [the tomatoes could have been riper but added juicy texture nonetheless] and swiss cheese was perfectly cooked and scrumptious. We were seated at a side window but the view of the ocean was good overlooking the hotel's pool. The view from the front windows is spectacular.
The restaurant is larger than I thought it would be and the tables have comfortable space between them. The service was very good.  
Highly recommended!
Had breakfast while staying at the Atlantis.  Great view, good food.  Wait staff was great.  Nice selections for breakfast at reasonable prices.
Delicious french toast!  Nice selection of entrees, fresh baked muffins, comfortable seating, attentive staff.  
Traveling in an RV from California. Stopped by for a beer. What a view from the clubhouse. Menu looks great too?
My wife and I attended a wedding on Saturday, 6/11/2016 at the Elks Lodge #892 in Gloucester, MA. A very nice place, overlooking the Atlantic Ocean with the twin lights of Thatcher Island in the distance. This venue was not what one may expect if going to an Elks lodge. Everyone seemed to have a wonderful time at a very special facility. The event planner was very considerate and made the bride & groom very happy. Food must be catered with an outside food service provider. I think the wedding party used one of the Elks recommended caterers. A top notch evening!
It was a beautiful venue to celebrate our 50th High School Reunion, but the Elks is not open for the public as a restaurant.  We had private caterers.   That night, the Elks also had an event upstairs which meant many people attending our reunion had to park up and down the street, despite the fact the Elks has a large parking lot.  But it was was worth it.  It is a beautiful place to hold a function.
My brother and new sister in law got married on August 1st at the Elks at Bass Rocks, what an gorgeous venue. Everything about the venue was amazing, the view, the staff, the food....everything! One of the best venues I've ever been to for a wedding! 
Have your event here. Period. You will be treated like royalty while looking out at the Atlantic Ocean. Won't be the best kept secret on the north sore for long....2 hotels right next door.
If you are an elks member anywhere you need to stop in here for the food and view. Both are great each day they have a special but everything on the menu is wonderful 
Freshly baked baguettes, local pickled vegetables, close to Pebble beach.
Great place to have lunch or order pizza.
Not much to look at from the outside, but inside is some terrific home cooking. Juicy meatballs, delicious 18inch pizza with homage sauce, and a variety of hot and cold sandwiches thoughtfully packaged with chips and pickle (to make it a meal).  Good counter service, friendly atmosphere, and some of the best beach fare around. Some great specials like BOGO pizza night. The food is fresh and worth trying on the way to or from the beach.  Ice cream next door.
Pretty standard sub sandwich and panini menu. The hot sausage sub was very good as was the hot eggplant. Phoned in order was ready for pick up in 10 minutes. Very convenient and tasted great for a fair price.
Only one 18" size, so this was our meal for two days.  Pizza is thin crust and is slightly charred, which just adds to the flavor.  We ordered the Vegetarian Pizza - white garlic sauce, tomato, mushroom, peppers, onions, olives and artichoke hearts.  I had asked about substituting a tomato sauce, but they explained that it would make the pizza too heavy with all the toppings.  In any case, I'm glad we stuck with the garlic sauce as it was fantastic.
Surfsides Tuesday special is a ten dollar lobster roll. Fresh well made the toas r ed roll makes the difference 
The subs here are unbeatable!! Located right across from dairy maid this pizza place is a must try!! Sub rolls are to die for!
Small place but good for a quick stop. I wanted to stop to get a cold sub. Price was a little high, but that was expected. I got an Italian sub and was very pleased with the quality of meat. Service was quick and they were very friendly. 
Huge 18 inch pizza loaded with toppings, with fast friendly efficient service. We stayed just up the road so it was convenient for us for a quick meal. Turned out to be absolutely delicious. Will get another soon!
Had the lobster roll. The toasted homemade ciabatta roll was fantastic. Great lobster, all meat, no fillers, and very light on the mayo
My sister and I stopped for ice cream on the way back from Salem. When she asked what was in a flavor, whatever she was told was not the reality. And the chocolate chip cookie dough I ordered? Tasted like mint. The lady that waited on us made sure to let us know she doesn't normally work the ice cream part of the shop, because "who buys ice cream when it's cold outside anyway??" Paying customers, honey, that's who. 
The food is greasy and overpriced. I got a BLT and the bacon was flabby and greasy. The sub itself was $9. Not worth it. Many other options to choose from in the area.
We ate here several nights during our trip because you can walk from Long Beach. This place used to have fried seafood but now it's a sandwich and pizza joint. The subs are enormous. The tuna sub for $9 could have fed a family! It was also fresh and delicious. The pizza is good, too, but one night, at only 7 p.m. (in season) they were out of slices and not making anymore, although you could still order a whole pizza. Kinda weird. Also they don't have any fries or fried food, so no chicken fingers for the short-stuffs, which is too bad because we probably would've frequented even more during our trip. The inside is pretty clean. Staff are friendly. You can order ice cream from inside but strangely they won't wait on you until the line outside is served, so you basically can't order ice cream inside and they should just take the sign down.
On our way up to Rockport from the Bass Rocks Ocean Inn where we were staying for a long weekend, we saw this place on the side of the road and decided to give it a try.  We could tell it has been around for a while and we figured if the food wasn't any good, it would have gone out of business a long time ago.  It is a place the locals frequent, and we now know why.   Our lobster rolls were amazing!  Truly delicious.  We understand that their pizza is also excellent (won best pizza on Cape Ann).  Too bad we were only in the area for a couple of days, would have loved to go back a second time.
great deal.  Lobster Roll are great.  They have amazing deal on Wednesday for a second pizza for 3 $  It was fun to do Pizza night, eat it by the sea and have lots of leftovers
If you took New Haven Pizza and East Boston Pizza threw it in a protein shaker and shook it up you would get Surfside Pizza. Most Amazing slice I have had in the Cape Ann Area. A delicious Italian style thin slice of pizza. Mouth watering. Will definitely be back.
Pretty good pizza.  Nice selection and ingredients.  Very good pizza sauce. Very nice subs, especially the meatball.  And they deliver locally!!
Great local find. Food was good just need better service at counter. A bit more knowledgable and a lot friendlier. Tried the local fave , mudiga steak, really enjoyed it and my friend had your gluten free pizza and said it could b the best one he's had !!! Just get better help at counter !!!!
While on vacation our family(10 people) puchased our food there twice.  The place had been recommened to us by a local person especially the lobster roll.  We ordered the lobster roll, the grilled chicken and the tuna sub which were all enjoyed by the family.  Would go back again...
I ordered four Lobster roll today I had a few friends visiting us for a few hours so that was a treat.
They are very tasty, the bread is just perfect and the butter just enough to be toasted and smothered with fresh lobster and mayo. Great! 
BTW Tuesday special only cost $9.99, great price. I recommend it. The place is clean and fast services. They have a variety of sandwiches and salads.
If you want a quick sub this is a welcome place to visit.  They have an extensive menu of items to take out as well as tables if you want to eat in.  Their Italian sub and lobster roll was not bad.  Service was friendly and prompt.
We stopped at the Last Stop and OMG, the owners are the nicest and most genuine people around!  The store has a wonderful mix of practical, fun, and delicious goodies. 

We had the coffee cake, the lemon cake, tuna roll, a latte, and who can forget the GIANT peanut butter chocolate chip cookie!  

I highly recommend this stop for a slice of what is good in America!  
I go here every other day all summer. Fresh sandwiches and drinks for the beach. Owner Samdy is a doll! Closes in the Fall. Situated at the entrance to the Rocky Neck art colony
The fresh made every day muffins are worth the stop! They are very large enuf for 2 ppl and many varieties, I brought some home with me they were that good!
My Grandmother lived across the street since the 70's and I spent a lot of time there over the years. The current and former owners have made The Last Stop a real gem. Always some homemade offerings.
I stopped here every morning while visiting Rocky Neck.

The muffins and coffee are to die for.  Such a lovely little spot!  
Walked down here with a local friend of mine to grab some wicked good "bacon wraps". First of all they are HUGE, worth EVERY penny, and full of good stuff including 4-5 fat strips of real bacon. We also got a side of the red potato salad that was also to die for. Very yummy, and very quick food at a reasonable price. Nice location as well!
Reasonable fare and they'll make a sandwich "your way". If they ask you if you want "hots" that means red pepper flakes. They are not trying to hit on you!
Terrific sandwiches and iced coffee. The chocolate bread is too good. Try the gluten-free macaroons. 
This is a small general store type place, with limited food options, but the service was very friendly, and they accommodated our lunch requests even if it deviated from the listed menu items. I got the impression they were truly interested in providing the customer what they wanted.
Just at the entrance to Rocky Neck, you will find this little convenience store and little deli.

Their eats are terrific!  I had the chicken salad roll.  Almonds and grapes in there...delish.  Grab a sandwich or soup and head around the corner to the Neck (or Niles Beach) to picnic.  :)
Happened upon this little place while walking towards the downtown area from our overnight stay at the Madfish Grill dock several weekends ago. I had the blueberry muffin and my girlfriend an egg/bacon english with cheese. Both were very good and my blueberry muffin seemed like it had a full pint of blueberrys in it! The muffin was also on the xtra large size so I didn't walk away hungry. We both had coffee and sat outside at one of the 2 small tables to watch Gloucester wake up as we had our breakfast. Prices were good for what we got and the other pasteries and breakfast items also looked yummy. I was told by a patron who sat with us that everything is made fresh by the proprieter daily. would not hesitate to go back there again when in the area.
If you're looking to get the best muffins, then this is the place to go! They have the best muffins made fresh every morning. Only thing I woul tell you is get there early cause they go quick!
Whether we are off to Beacon Marine to pick up a boat, or to the Gorton Theater, almost next door, we stop in here for a coffee, a sandwich, or soup and a ready prepared meal. The location used to be more of a convenience store, but is now a small cafe, with comfortable seating (some outside in the summer). If you miss the Chili Choice on Maplewood Ave., you can get their quesadillas and amazing Navajo muffins, stuffed with chili and topped with cheese!
This is a small store that happens to boast freshly made sandwiches, soups, and sweets. It's also a great place to grab a cup of coffee and read. The store does not carry as many of the essentials it used to, but most people go there for a bite to eat. It's in East Gloucester so off the beaten path within walking distance to the beach and Rocky Neck. It's a local favorite for year round and summer residents. 
Food was super yummy- try the cakes- a perfect finale to the sandwiches and soups! The ingredients they use are fresh and high quality , and showed in everything we ate
This is neither a restaurant nor a convenience store or a coffee shop, but more like a private club open to anyone, where you can be sure of a warm welcome, a great cup of coffee, excellent sandwiches, muffins, and other baked goods "to die for," as the saying goes. They also stock the sort of "last minute" merchandise you forgot to bring with you -- pet food, detergent, cereals and pancake syrup. . New management has spiffed up the place without losing the warmth and cheerfulness accumulated over a century of service. Try it, and become a "regular" in a heartbeat.
They have a good sandwich.  They don't carry very many toiletries nor do they carry cigarettes if that is your thing.  Otherwise it is good for a quick snack.
The folks that own this store have it all, friendly, clean wholesome food 
Great place to visit after a hot day on the beach. Great hot fudge sundaes or ice cream cones with jimmies are a must~

So great the kids will want to come back!
We ordered pizza and took it to the beach for supper. It was great. I have also had the chicken salad sub.  It's big and delicious, the bread is amazing. Good food, good prices
The ice cream is awesome with many, many, many flavors to choose from.  But don't be fooled they call it a kiddie size when it is a normal large and you pay the price for a large.  I would rather they call it what it is and you order a smaller normal size that isn't super sized.  We shouldn't be starting at the large and going up from there.  Ordering according to the number of scoops is better especially for our health.  I would rather not have the sales gimmick of selling everyone a large.  But on there behave I find most places in Glouster serve huge portions.  When we were there it really wasn't busy but the staff still tried to rush us when we were still just part way through their very long list of ice cream choices.  They also were out of several flavors we asked for which is to be expected but we wish they would find some way of marking on the list which flavors they are out of.  I would recommend the great hard ice cream and the soft vanilla or chocolate over the 24 soft ice cream that are really flavor injected.
Wonderful soft serve ice cream.  I should have gotten the kiddie portion because the normal portion was huge.  but oh so delicious!
As you drive around Cape Ann in search of a beach or eatery you will at some point have to take an ice cream break. Stop by this amazing place and select from a gi-normous list of ice creams, frozen yoghurts, sherbets, sorbets, frappes, sundaes and bars. They offer over 50 different kinds of soft serve ice cream. Drop by and sit in the large brightly-coloured Adirondack chairs enjoying each lick!
You won't go hungry here. The medium size hard icecream stopped me, almost. The flavour kept me going. Yyuuummmm
We stopped here on a busy day for ice cream. Waited a bit but was worth it. Kiddie sized cone is huge... I would order my cone in a cup next time. 
Portions extremely large.  Ordered 2 kiddie Soft Serve Cones.  They are so large that they began to fall off the cone as soon as I paid for them. Perhaps one should order it in a dish?  My husband and me had it all over us.  I would not return because of this.   It was delicious but the size was ridiculous!
SO good.  half kiddie is a more normal sized "small".  the perfect amount.  so many kinds.  and frozen yogurt too.  super yum.
Best place on Cape Ann to stop for ice cream.  Huge selection of both hard and soft serve with some unique flavors.  My wife's favorite was the Blueberry Pie.
Great Ice cream both hard and soft types, plus frozen yogurt and many other treats. Service is very good. Sometimes the lines get a little long.
Love Long Beach Dairy Maid. Their portions are huge and there are so many flavors to choose from. They have sundae options as well as frozen drinks. 
HUGE ice cream cones!  Even the kiddie cone was enough for my cravings.  They had a large variety of flavors - hard and soft ice cream.
Last night I had the most delicious chocolate ice cream ever at Long Beach Dairy Maid! I had a combination of chocolate almond frozen yogurt and death by chocolate - incredible! fantastic! amazing! Sitting on the comfortable chairs outside, the cone was even more delicious. My husband and kids loved theirs, too. This is the best ice cream, the most delicious chocolate in the world!!!
This is our favorite ice cream stand in the world. We stay on Long Beach every summer and love walking down to get ice creams. We've been customers for 15 years and just this summer learned you can get a "half kiddie." Believe me when I tell you that you want to. They have the most generous portions and I have never been able to finish a kiddie cone. If you can, great, knock yourself out. But for those of us who feel bad about tossing half of what we bought, now you know you can get it in half the size and finish the whole thing, score!
Ice cream is great and variety is amazing..  One desert was enough for al 3 of us..  Just a nice walk from our hotel.  Great little place ans staff is nice and friendly
Dozens of soft and hard ice cream flavors with any topping you can imagine. German chocolate cake was a new adventure and really good. Roadside shop with some waiting on warm summer nights, but most people walk from nearby Long Beach. Sit in their picnic area, walk or drive home ... but fast. A little more expensive than the old days but what isn't? GO
Great ice cream but over priced.  Portions were too large.
Subs and salads were great. Staff at both places amazingly helpful.  
There is an ice cream flavor for everyone's palette. It is a fun place to stop by after a day at the beach.
This was a great treat after a meal. Sometimes you will have to wait to get served but that's a good sign of their popularity. They are very busy in the summer, day and night.
My husband & I cannot get enough of Dunkin' Donuts coffee! We live in Michigan, and they are far and few between. We look forward to this coffee every year when we're on vacation!!
Nice people, clean place.
Was happy to find a Dunkin Donuts that made you feel like one of the family.  Great crew and great coffee!!
i  don't eat donuts cause they're fried  i dont' eat fried food it's unhealthyi don't eat fried dontus and they are fried i only eat baked good s for health reasons...
Their coffee really isn't that great, sorry, but their breakfast sandwiches are. Too bad they don't tell people up front that they have an elder discount. You have to ask for it. EMBARASSING!
Papa Gino's was very clean aND we'll maintained. The staff were very polite and even served us our meal. Great lunch.
My son and I returned to The North Shore for family business and decided to visit an old haunt of ours...Papa Gino's. Thank goodness it was one of those places you return to and it is just as you left it. Great pizza, superb service.
This is a very good option to eat a decent pizza after or before a whale watch tour.
We ate a largo cheese pizza in 4 for about 25bucks.
Love, love, love Papa Gino's Pizza. They make their pizza sooo cheesy. Always fresh and hot. A great deal on 2 slices and a drink, too. When on vacation and you need a break from the pricey (but excellent) seafood restaurants, this is the place to come for pizza.
Living in Gloucester, MA there are several great pizza places to choose from with Papa Gino's being one of just a couple of "chain" pizzerias. We really love their pizza! It is consistently delicious with a thin, crispy crust and great tasting toppings. Their salads are also always fresh. What's more, the delivery service is outstanding! We call for delivery more than we visit the restaurant and every time the person who takes my phone order is polite and helpful. The delivery staff always bring my order in the promised time frame, they are personable and really friendly. Family & friends visiting us from Germany and Ireland have also commented on how much they liked the pizza we ordered for them. I can definitely recommend Papa Gino's!
I have been going to papa ginos since I was a kid, and loved it!!! But the last half a dozen times that I have gone it has been a complete disappointment. It has been soggy! Falling apart! Just gross, so I decided after the second time of getting it this way I would order it well done, which I wouldn't order a well done pizza usually, but had to do it this way just so it would turn out like a nice and crispy pizza I would want. This last time I ordered I again order it well done, but clearly the don't even listen to you when they take your order because before I took the pizza home I looked and it was not even cooked!!!! The manager then asked if I would like him to through it in for alittle longer I said yes!!!! He literally stuck it in for five minutes maybe not even and sent me on my way, an again as soon as I got home I looked and it was soggy!!! And gross!!! I am extremely disappointed in this papa ginos and probably won't go back.  Sucks! 
Downtown Gloucester, always good pizza. Hot and cheesy, and served fast, fast, fast! Thin crust with loads of cheese always baked perfectly, and just enough pepperoni. Yummy!!! Always nice and clean there too.
I should know better than to go to a chain for pizza.  The cheese was limited and the pizza was over cooked.  We should have gone to a small pizza shop.
I'm not the biggest fan of chain restaurants of any type, but a friend was in town and wanted to grab a quick and cheap slice of pizza before walking back to the train station. Papa Gino's is conveniently located in the Walgreen's Plaza downtown. It's roomy and has plenty of seating. We sat near a giant glass window and watched the passersby as we chatted. They offer pasta, but we shared a gourmet pizza. I think they are trying to pretend to be higher end at an affordable price. The pizza wasn't that memorable. It looked good, tasted fine, but nothing stood out enough about it for me to justify returning just for the pizza. The service was just okay. Not very friendly but you don't expect great service when you're ordering at the counter. Prices were good. Everything is affordable, and the portions are pretty big (if not that good for you..). We had a pleasant time eating and chatting, and I don't have any complaints but I would recommend trying some of the non-chain pizza places scattered around the downtown before Papa Gino's if you're visiting the area.
Service assez lent. Pizzas moyennes (pâte correcte mais garniture pas terrible (macaronis …..). Salle vaste donnant directement sur le parking face au port
This is a locals place....good portions, but quality is nothing to write home about.  There is a big bar and a good atmosphere.
Service is absolutely terrible.  Sat down, waited 10 mins before we were even noticed. Pizza is the worst. Cardboard frozen dough. This is the third and last time coming here. Such a waste of a nice building. 
I'm so, so disappointed... What happened to Espresso's? When I first moved here 4 years ago we ate there all the time... the service was great and my favorite, the sirloin tips, were to die for. The last time we ate there, a few months ago, the dining room was pretty empty and I noticed the steak tips weren't as good, but we thought maybe they were just having an off night. We went there tonight thinking we'd give it another chance, since it had always been so good. Once again, the dining room was virtually empty. We were told to "just sit anywhere". We sat down and immediately noticed the table was sticky and there were crumbs on it. The waitress was... not quite rude.... but this is definitely not a good line of work for her. On the plus side, the baked potato was good as was the salad. The coleslaw, however, was absolutely inedible. My husband hardly touched his meal, and my steak tips.... well.... they were so salty that I literally cringed with the first bite and they were tough as nails....it went downhill from there. And no.... we didn't complain to the waitress... I felt it would be much better to say what needed to be said here! And no.... we will never eat there again!
Good chowder and fried haddock sandwich. Portions nice size. Menu very varied from lobster to sandwiches and pizza with many other menu items in between.   The atmosphere was fine.  Large bar area. The area near rest rooms seemed dingy and dirty. Could use some sprucing up.  
where are you  girls ( and guys) Yoo hooo! ! !
nothing else to say 
when the food came i can't remember even what i ate, or how it tasted will never go again unlessi'm forced. so sorry
 ilike east gloucester
 the owner needs btter friends / wiaters.
This is where the locals eat so food was plentiful, varied menu and excellent prices. Always daily specials and fish really fresh. We ate there for 3 nights and had something delicious and different each night.Staff friendly, efficient and cheerful.
We didn't expect much based on the reviews, but we were hungry and there wasn't anything else nearby for lunch.  I had the best lobster roll I encountered in Gloucester, and my wife's fish and chips were just right.  The service was good too! 
Well I would rate the food if the I actually waited around for it to come out. Got there at 7:10 waitress didn't take our drink order 7:20 she didn't come back until 7:45 to take out order and the place wasn't even busy. Waitress had no regard for how long she was taking to do simple tasks. We had enough and walked out by 8:10 fed up and never got our food. Horrible service,don't waste your time...literally
We were in town for a training for my husband and after he got out he wanted somewhere he could get something good to eat.  Based on a friend who had been here before, I figured it would be worth a shot.  

Bar and dining area - very nice - looked newly renovated or recently renovated.  Decent menu options - Italian and pizza - good choices.  Husband had their version of a buffalo chicken pizza - thin crust - pretty good stuff.  I had a chicken broccoli alfredo pasta dish - it was good.  The daughter just went for her usual pasta with no sauce.  

Prices were reasonable.  Portions were good.  Would go back if we were there again!
We were lucky to get in! Reservations are a must but we lucked out as a cancellation came in just as we arrived. It was for two seats at the bar that seats six and it was just fine.
Michelle was our server and was delightful, engaging in nice conversation while busy doing many things. Turned out she was from Dallas where we're from so we had lots to share.
Everything on the menu looked good but decided to go with house signature dishes. My wife had a half order of Seafood Stew which was enough given a house salad was consumed before.
I started with the Mushroom soup that was yummy. The I had the Duck Breast medium rare and it was arguably the best duck I can ever remember having. A glass of Moss Back Pinot Noir pared perfectly with the duck.
No stop here would be complete without the signature Banana Cake. You'll love it.
Don't forget to make a reservation well in advance.
Having read the reviews, we decided to take a chance & see if we could grab a table on the same evening & we were lucky enough to do so - so it's worth trying like we did. This was end of September so end of season of course. 

It's cosy inside with plenty of attentive & friendly & personable staff. 

We chose a shrimp garlic starter (fab), the lamb (excellent) & the Faroe Islands salmon with couscous & zucchini 'spaghetti' (absolute 10 out of 10 from a salmon fanatic!  Loved it loved it!  Didn't realise how well couscous goes with salmon & it was all cooked to perfection.)

Washed down with a red Zinfandel & a craft beer. No room for anymore. 

A nice chat with Ben, who was able to chat & ensure no table was waiting on anything. A true art. 

A lovely place. Seems to be popular venue for a special birthday meal for vacationers. 

Definitely recommended. We would eat here again!  
We made an early (5 pm) reservation for two to allow time to get to the nearby Gloucester Stage for a 7:30 performance. We had their Ubiquitous Bistrot salad to share, a half serving of Faroe Islands Salmon, and a half serving of sliced Leg of Lamb - all super delicious. For desert it was their scrumptious Banana Layer Cake to share.  The waitress could not have been nicer or better informed. A really delightful, enjoyable meal.
Just ate here for the second time and the food,drink and service were excellent.It's a small venue so reservations are a must.We ate at the bar and were very comfortable.Wine selection is excellent with all wine available by the glass.Entrees are full and half plates which allows you to try more items and the half plates  are generously portioned.The prices are reasonable for an upscale Bistro.The food is excellent!
Took us a month to get a reservation but so worth the wait. Place is small and very comfortable with a small bar that seats about 6 people. The food is extraordinary and very different using all freshly sourced foods. Everything is made on the premises except for the bread. The Caesar salad dressing is the best I ever had topped off with duck tenders. YUM. The lamb was also the best ever had served over fresh greens and potato's with some special squash that was so good i could have eaten and entire dish full. You can order most dishes in 1/2 sizes which are usually plenty so try that option. 

You have to try the banana cake. OMG thats all I can say.

Our server Colleen was wonderful and made us so comfortable while making suggestions that were right on. I'll be sure to ask for her when we return.  Try it you'll become a believer.
The food here was fantastic and the flavors to die for! A really cool option is half-plate portions for dinner, which allowed us to sample a variety of Duckworth's wonderful menu. Smaller inside so make a reservation! It will be worth the visit!!
It took us a year to get to dine here.When i knew that we would be going to gloucester on vacation, I made reservations for our 1st nite.The chef is not only talented but is very creative. Staff are  true professionals. I only wish that i made another reservation.
OK, it's moderately pricey, and you absolutely must make a reservation, but I assure you you've never had a foodie experience like this one. Small plates of heaven you can share. Try several!!
Everything about this little gem is worth it! But you need to plan ahead. It is a reservations place that books up. We were lucky a grabbed a table for two late in the evening. Food, wine and service were one of the best on Cape Ann.
This is really the only place for an excellent (nonfried seafood) meal in Gloucester. Everything was really good, most especially the seafood.
This was a very busy little restaurant but we had booked ahead. The waitresses were friendly and helpful. The portion sizes were large and I found that two small orders were enough for me although the men in our party had full sized meals. The scallops, seafood stew, duck and lamb dishes were all very good. The only drawback for us was that one of our party is vegan and the restaurant did not cater for vegans. The chef did not make much of an effort and only produced a plate of vegetables. However, the overall experience of dining here was enjoyable. 
In this very intimate restaurant the chef comes up with some really interesting and exciting dishes.  Many are offered in full or half portions. This is a really big plus, both for smaller appetites or for allowing you to experience more dishes.  Service is excellent.  Must have a reservation.
I like fine dining in good local restaurants where the chefs have to work on signature dishes to attract locals and visitors. Duckworth Bistrot prides itself on very good preparation and presentation of food and the staff knows enough about the wine selection to be helpful. We started with the Bistrot and Heirloom tomato salads. Have to rave a bit about the dressing on the Bistrot. Sea scallops and seafood stew for entrees were both quite tasty, well-spiced, nicely presented. And I can't say enough about the key lime pie...yes, try it if it's available.
I hoped we could get a reservation at Duckworths (where I have eaten once before) and we're able to get an early (5 pm) one on a Tuesday.  We were fortunate.

It's a small beautifully appointed space in the ground floor of an old house.  While atmosphere and food are excellent, the most outstanding feature is the staff.  Dawn was knowledgeable, gracious, and attentive and made this a special dining experience.

Duckworths is unusual in that all items are available in half portions (including wines by the glass).  We had a half dozen oysters, shared a half bistrot salad, and two half entrees.  The seared scallops were excellent, and the seafood stew was the equal to any bouillibase I've had in France.  Even with half portions, we needed doggie bags.  The complexity and intensity of flavors make a little go a long way.  Finally, a peach cobbler with salted camel ice cream along with an espresso was a perfect finale.

When we had questions about wines, we were cheerfully offered tastes.  The list of wines by the glass is impressive and reasonable.  The cava was an excellent start with the oysters.

Duckworths is more than worth a trip to Gloucester.
This is one of the top two or three restaurants in the Cape Anb area no doubt! We booked a reservation a month and advance as it's a small restaurant and highly successful. Once again the food and service did not disappoint. Each dish is a carefully crafted Culinary delight! As you might expect the portions are not large but each bite is a truly delicious one. Book your  reservation early!
We've been hearing people talk about this restaurant for years.  We've tried countless times to get a reservation.  Finally we got in the door!  The restaurant is small only seating about 30 people (guessing).  There is also a bar that seats another 6 - 8 (guessing).  But holy cow the food is out of this world.  
We tried some of everything beginning with a pirates punch!  Terrific cocktail.  Powerful! The house wines were wonderful as well.  Soups delicious.  The best mushroom soup I've ever tasted.  Around the table were salads - fresh and delicious.  Great dressings.  Soups - corn soup fantastic.  The duck breast entree "the best duck I've ever had".  The risotto "amazing".  It goes on and on like that as I asked our friends.  The service was wonderful.  Colleen was knowledgable about the menu, and the chef.  She was attentive without being in the way.  Overall an A+ for the six of us.  Thank you for a great evening!
Recently went on my third visit here taking my mother here for her birthday and it just gets better every time I visit.   Reservations are highly recommended.   This is one of those places that can make a food that you thought you did not like and turn it into one of the best dishes you have ever had.   The asparagus soup is delicious beyond words.   The duck confit dish is outstanding.  Have always ordered 2 or 3 half sized portions to try to get as many flavors as possible.   Got a spiced pickle vodka drink that was also heavenly.  Could not believe that a spiced pickle could taste so good.
Make sure you make a reservation seating is very limited.  Most of the foods used are locally grown and very good.  The atmosphere is loud because of the size.  The service is good despite the lack of space.  There is a full service bar and home made desserts. 
We parked on the street.  Would highly recommend eating here if in the Cape Ann area.
Great meal. Friendly service. Make a reservation, the place was packed on a Tuesday night! Highly recommend. Don't miss while you are in Gloucester. 
My husband and I had a fantastic dinner here on our recent trip to Cape Ann. This is a small place, so reservations are in order. We had the polenta with spinach and mushrooms, the Seafood stew and the hanger steak. It's great that the meals come in half or full portions so you can mix and match. The half size was definitely big enough for me. My husband could have eaten the full size. We had the banana cake for dessert. Yum! Definitely come here on your trip to Glosta!
We stopped by for ice cream almost every night while we were in Gloucester. The list of choices made it hard to pick so we had to keep coming back to try more. Serving portions are very large. We opted for kiddy size since we had already eaten dinner.
This shop has several amazing offers. The ice cream sandwiches are great. The ice cream  is always plentiful and the hot dog deal is great. They are a sister facility with dairy train in Rockport. Also pet friendly giving your dog a ice cream for the asking
Like it's sister location at the train station in Rockport...it isn't summer without a stop there.
Traditional ice cream spot with soft serve and great scoop ice cream with every type of topping.

We had the pleasure of eating ice cream here on a hot summer evening. The staff were really friendly. The service was prompt   The moose tracks was delicious. Thanks!
Ice cream portions good and tasty (supposedly has Richardson ice cream). Near to the Beauport Sleeper-McCann historic house. Has decent parking as compared to rest of Gloucester.
Ro's Harbor Scoop is THE place to go for really delicious soft serve ice cream. I get the chocolate vanilla twist which is incredible! The very popular Richardson's Ice Cream is also sold there. Ro offers a large variety of flavors and the place is spotless!
Delicious ice cream, masses of flavours.  The kids size is big enough portion.  Friendly staff work there too!
Healthy servings well priced.  The Georgia peach was a real hit.  Mix it with the Hawaiian coconut for a real treat.
Enjoyed a tasty ice cream of good size for the price in this area.  They young lady who served us was very pleasant.
Had breakfast here EVERY day on our vacation!!   Loved this place!    Small, cozy, great atmosphere, very popular place for the locals.  Food is awesome and the wait staff is friendly.
Didn't want to go down town and fight the crowd and parking. Stopped into this place, and was glad we did. Fish Chowder was the best a meal by itself
If you're a trendy Trip Advisor fan, this is the place for your parents or grandparents . . . or for you if it is raining, or you want something simple and real, or you have kids in tow, or all of the above.  

Haddock chowder has lots of haddock, a little potato, (and no added thickening) served in a large bowl.  My mommy cooked it that way.  Not fancy but a great pick-me-up.  Cheeks and smelts looked good, too, in addition to usual seafood fare.  Check the daily specials.  

Staff are helpful and concerned.  Other customers seemed friendly to each other.  Good, shallow ramp into the building.  

Charlie's Place is genuine comfort and genuine comfort food.
Great little diner. Portions are large. My husband and I split the fisherman's platter and a bowl of chowder.
went there for lunch take out.Friendly staff. This was our first time there. Ordered clam chowder( to die for) and fried clams. the clams were not overly breaded,came with french fries and coleslaw. It was enough for 2.We'll be back next year
Come to Gloucester twice a year for short stays. Charlie's is a must go to. A local place that never fails. Only place I know that serves Fish Cheeks. Smelts are a go to also. For the money,you can't beat it
My husband & I stopped in here when we were on vacation in the area & were pleasantly surprised by the good food we had for lunch.  We were so happy that we returned the next day.  I had a Charlie's burger both days.  It tasted like a home-cooked burger - melted cheese, crispy bacon, lettuce & tomato, etc.  My husband had fried clams, which I tasted, but wasn't crazy about.  When we returned the second day, my husband ordered the Charlie burger & was also very happy.
Seems like Charlie's has been here since the dawn of time.  It's clean, small, and friendly.  The food won't blow you away, but the prices are definitely reasonable.  Serving sizes are on the larger side.  Waitresses are pleasant, but due to the volume of customers there this past Saturday night, I'd have to say they were severely understaffed, with just two servers.  It took quite a while to be served (as were most tables).  It won't stop us from coming back, because it's more because of tradition that we stop here. 
The restaurant was cute and the waitstaff was friendly. We had fried clams, french fries and onion rings. Everything was very bland and under seasoned. We were not offered ant refills on our drinks. 
Nothing fancy, just good ole' New England seafood.  
This restaurant is very clean, with a very friendly staff and they not only have the standards like fish, scallops and fried clams    (absolutely delicious, by the way) but they have items like "cheeks and smelts" if you're in to that type of seafood:)
Get the cod cheeks, steak tip dinner or clams! Been coming here for a decade and am never disappointed! Quick and friendly service and great for breakfast too. 
The very small fried clams were SO overcooked it was like eating fried batter only. The onions rings were overcooked as well. The head witch gossiped asking the waitress if she could view the returned plate to see how many clams were eaten, then came over following this conversation with waitress to let me know "everyone loves our clams".  " We have to contact the boss to see how to handle this"... Rather than, I am sorry. The waitress felt badly and said they are going to make you pay for the clams or rings even though you returned them. (others had entrees at the table). Wow NEVER again.
We ordered the lobster bisque and it was dull, bland. We each had a different entree and by far the Caesar salad was the best., but none was excellent. The fried seafood was dull. All the seafood tasted fishy. Our waitress had no personality, never smiled and did not check on us for drink refills. We had chocolate cake and it was definitely not home made. Don't stop here. 
Very quaint and well-kept diner with attentive wait staff.  My daughter really enjoyed her lobster roll!
Good fried seafood and fast. Good selection of non-seafood items too.  We always go here.  Not a fancy atmosphere, good for families.
When we stay at the Blue Shutters Inn we walk down to Charlie's for lunch -- their fried seafood is a classic and the lobster salad lasts me two meals.  Great place also for breakfast
They have the best fried clams we have ever eaten. Portions are large and prices are low. Ate their twice while in the area. Staff is very friendly.
Found wire bread tie in omlette all the did was offer to take cost of meal off bill a little better offer might have swayed our thoughts of legal action.  This place needs help with some of the service staff and definitely the owner who was poor customer service ideas about how to treat her customers.  Just a thought these are the people that keep you in business
This is where the locals eat and for good reason. It's just a great little restaurant with good food period. It is the only place I know where you can get fried cod cheeks and tongues. 'Nuf said.
Recommend highly.   Staff pleasant.  Clam chowder and clams very good.   Locals eat here and price is right.   Home made pie    The Apple was excellent. You will not be disappointed
Because it is handy to the Stop & Shop and Shaw's supermarkets, we often stop for lunch while doing errands. There is a good array of sandwiches and always a wide choice of soups. We had tomato and basil soup and fish chowder this time, with half a tuna sandwich each, and finished with sharing the sinful oatmeal raisin cookie (thin and crunchy, due to honey as binder). The fresh-squeezed lemonade is a treat.
This is the "hang out" for the locals.   The have lots of drinks and also baked good, and service breakfast sandwiches, bagels, croissants and also serve soup and sandwiches at lunch.   They are only open until 3 pm
This is probably the only coffee shop in the area and it is better than Starbucks and less expensive.   They have a drive through and also serve breakfast items and sandwiches and soup for lunch.   Well worth your time to drive here
Prefect for what it is. Good coffee, fresh sandwiches and salads, and homemade quiche. Prices are reasonable and staff is friendly. Great place to grab food to bring to the beach or sit and enjoy the A/C. We go here for lunch every day on vacation every year and have never had one thing to complain about. Also clearly a favorite of locals.
I had never been to this coffee shop/restaurant and decided to try it.  I went in the morning and during tourist season, so you would think they would have enough staff.
First of all, the parking lot was hard to navigate.  There is a drive-thru with no room for another car to go around if there is a car at the drive thru window.  

I went inside to check it out and the place was crowded.  That was fine, but I was heading to work and was waiting in line and there was only one cashier and the person in front of me had a huge order.  There were 2 registers.  The manager was there and actually walked right by the registers and kept going.  Needless to say, I left and will not go back.  This place should be closed and a Starbucks put in their space.
I come here everyday before work ! The owners and staff are so wonderful ! The food is always awesome , great bagels and sandwiches ! Good prices and good coffee. This is why I love mom and pop places. I will always come here, must try if you haven't been here !!!!
The main reason I like this place is that they have a small patio with outdoor seating and I can bring my dog. The coffee is also good as are the cinnamon rolls and quiche.  One thing I don't particularly like is that they use melamine plates and reheat your slice of quiche on one in the microwave. Melamine doesn't like to be microwaved and if you do it too long, it melts onto the food. Since the time in the microwave is short, there doesn't appear to be any problem but you can tell that the plates are starting to get a bit wonky.
From the outside the Cape Ann Coffees building does not look like much, but step inside and you will find a really comfortable, attractive European style Cafe. It is so clean, and the staff at the counter is most pleasant. I've had chocolate croissants, the cinnamon sticks and oatmeal cookies there. Hard to say which one is the best as they were all delicious! The Chai Latte and Cafe Latte are wonderful. Fresh quiches for lunch are also available which look inviting. Truly a great place!
 I heard they had very good coffee but I wasn't impressed with the quality or price. Café Sicilia is a real Primo Italian Cafe'
Such delicious homemade soups, fresh sandwiches and pastry.  Of course all of this would mean nothing without great coffee and they have that too.  My husband is a DD guy and I prefer Starbucks and we were both very happy with our coffee and food!  Plan on making this part of your trip to Cape Ann or anywhere in that area!
Good service, stopped for morning coffee.  No line.  Near our hotel and it was earlier than the hotel breakfast so it was great to be able to find coffee nearby earlier.  
short walking distance from where we stayed.  First time visit here.  They have many items to choose from besides the coffee. 
Good service, good coffee. Good blueberry scones and latte. Nice staff, personable, quick, once you get to the window. 
CA Coffees is a true gem. When I want a freshly made salad that actually has veggies in it like red bell peppers, cukes, tomatoes, broccoli, I stop here. Best salads to go in Gloucester, hands down. Not filled with iceberg lettuce, red cabbage and basically something that was poured out of a bag. F.R.E.S.H.
Great to pick up for the beach and you can get chicken (salad or grilled), tuna, whatever on top. Also one of THE best places to get a cappuccino in town! 

Forget the chain places and 7-Eleven for junky beach food. Stop here on your way and have a really good experience with their staff and awesome sandwiches/food. You won't be disappointed!
doing errands, on the way to the beach,  the pharmacy, the super market good place to pop  in with or without friends. eat well relaxing with a great atmosphere. from new york city? or parirs franc,you'll always bump into someone you know.
I had the Irish Benedict and my husband had hash and eggs. The hash was home made. The potatoes were real. The service was good and friendly and the room was interesting. They had outdoor tables. I wish we had enough time to go back for another breakfast on another day. They had a lot of specials.
I would have given it a 4 star if I didn't have to deal with an unpleasant interaction with the kitchen re our daughter's food allergy question. My daughter has severe egg allergy, which is always challenging at breakfast places. I understand and accept that. When I went to the kitchen to check what she could eat or if the kitchen could prepare her food separately, one of the chefs was very impatient. She did not want to deal with me and said "we are a small operation, we cannot stop what we do just because you have a good allergy." When the other chef kindly handed me a bag of bagels for me to check the ingredients, she  rushed the male chef and said keep working. She added that whatever we decide to order for my daughter she would eat at her own risk since they refused to check the ingredients! I was shocked!!! We did stay for the breakfast (ordered plain bagel with cream cheese for my daughter) and the dishes the others had were wonderful (esp the lobster omelet) and the place very quaint, but I would not go there again with my daughter (or anyone with severe food allergies for that matter).  
Went with locals for breakfast while visiting Gloucester - and this place is still good for breakfast - 7 years after my first visit.  The wait staff is usually very friendly.  There are just tables inside and a few on the front patio.  The place is open early for breakfast but closes relatively early for lunch ----- 1:30 or 2 PM.

We were a party of 5 and everyone enjoyed their breakfasts.  Try the lobster omelet.  It's fantastic.
I love the authentically nautical vibe of this little place on Rocky Neck. It's great for a breakfast stop before exploring the shops and galleries. The outdoor seating deck is also fun. The breakfast is very good, nice basic choices, fresh and well prepared. The service was warm and welcoming!
Was excited to go to sailor Stan's with a friend. Learned it was on rocky neck and was even more excited. Could not believe the disappointment that awaited. The Dining room had about 15% of tables occupied. No chatter. No conversations. Sat ourselves no one offered us a menu or asked if we wanted coffee, said good morning, anything. We sat there as the two people working cleared three tables and ignored us. After about ten minutes we got up and left. 
My friend and I were so excited to try out sailor stans for the first time and I had heard great things about it. When we walked in, nobody said hello to us. The entire restaurant acted as if we didn't walk in and we were invisible. We sat ourselves and nobody came over to visit, offer coffee, drop off a menu or even said "I'll be with you in a minute". The place was not busy and we could not believe the lack of service. We waited over ten minutes before we got up and left. While leaving nobody said anything and we felt very unimportant. Very disappointed and not ever going back.
What a cute and colorful place. Couldn't help but take a picture from the outside. The inside was just as cute. Local artists work adorns the walls, with a wacky, cute, colorful atmosphere. You can eat inside or out (under a few umbrellas). Breakfast was tasty; freshly made and hot, coffee was delicious, wait staff (all one of them) was very friendly and helpful. This is a tiny little place with such personality. Pillows and mismatched chairs and tables, but a really friendly and fun atmosphere. Only a stones throw from Rocky Neck Accommodations, if you don't feel like cooking breakfast for yourself.
This is a little place out in Rocky Neck, surrounded by pretty views (though not from the restaurant) and galleries. It was around 12:30 or 1:00 and they had sold their last lobster roll. HMMMMMM. The food they did have was pretty unremarkable... the chowder was chunky with clams but did have a strange aftertaste. The waitstaff were quite nice and helpful, so maybe it was just an off day?
Two dear friends and I revisited Rocky Neck recently, and wanted to go to brunch, and decided on Sailor Stan's.  There was a very nice table waiting for us on the small, sunny deck.  Our server brought us waters and coffees,  and she was pleasant throughout our visit and had a good sense of humor.  Both my friends ordered and enjoyed the anadama bread French toast with maple syrup (on the specials board) with one side of bacon, cooked crisp but not overdone.  I also ordered a specials item: the shrimp, mushroom, spinach, cheddar omelet with home fries and pumpernickel toast: very good.   This was a relaxed, enjoyable meal, and not expensive.   Sailor Stan's has a diner atmosphere.  It is not fancy and we appreciated the lack of snobbery.  We would go back.  
Stopped in for a late breakfast on a Friday morning, and we loved every minute. Located in the artsy Rocky Neck area, Sailor Stan's offers an experience, not just a meal. On this day, the place was not too crowded, though all the outside seats were take. (There are only a handful of outside seats, and the inside is not much bigger.) My wife had eggs and bacon while I ordered the Greek omelet, and both were high quality, diner-style meals. But my favorite part of the place was the eclectic interior and the laid back staff. Here's a story that sums it up: In the corner was a young couple with three children under age 4, and instead of busying the oldest with crayons, etc., the waitress brought her a tambourine and small drum, and she had a blast! Was it a quiet place? Not remotely, and we loved it.
Artsy diner-type atmosphere.  Stools at the counter plus tables inside and out.  Nothing fancy but the food was good.  Not open for dinner.  Will go back.
The real deal.  Funky and local but several cuts above, food-wise.  They'll be open when they feel like it, but Sunday brunch in season is really where it's at.

I feel like they're getting a little tired the last couple of years, but maybe it's just me (a neighborhood but not Neck local.)  xo
We walked here for breakfast almost each morning of our stay and always had a delicious meal and a fun time with the charming staff. 
Solid breakfast in a cute location. Friendly staff. The breakfast menu carries the usual items but includes some more unusual, delicious, specials (fish cakes, beans, eggs and toast). Fair prices. 
I love this place.  The actual restaurant is gorgeous and cute mainly the outside.  
The lady that works there is fun to deal with. 
The food is your typical american diner but there is something great about this place; the ambiance, the locals etc... 
A must when awakening on a boat in Gloucester! 
I had a great experience in this little colorful place @ Rocky Neck. It was nice to have an outside table and listen to a friendly chat between locals and the lady serving breakfast. She worked alone, but had an ability to be in a few places at the same time. Service was quick, very friendly and certainly made me feel welcome. And the food - I decided to be adventurous and try one of the special omelets - shrimps, red pepper and artichoke - imagine that! It was delicious, loaded with large size shrimps. What a great start of the day it was! Thank you, Sailor Stan's lady!
Great service and decent food nut nothing to write home about. If you go you must check out the decor in the restroom.
Only open in the summer, this is a sweet spot for brekky.  They have all the usual options, and a few extras too.  

The ambiance is cute as can be.  Colorful and bright with lots of natural light, and a few outside tables too.
Not only was the food delicious - banana pancakes with chocolate chips for my husband and a Popeye omelet for me the waitress was really friendly and had a great sense of humor.  The art that is on display is fun to look at and all the bright colors made us so happy.  We will definitely be back!
Amazingly yummy homemade hash and big fat shrimp in the a.m. specials. Hokey but cool decor and a fantastic location, literally in the middle of Rocky Neck. You can sit outdoors or in, at a table or at the "bar."
This little shop has a lot of flavors and very hearty helpings. Be warned that even a strapping 10 year old could barely make a dent in a medium. 
We went based on the reviews, and were not disappointed.  My husband got the homemade ice cream with blackberries I believe and I had a moose tracks kind of number--both were amazing.  It was a convenient stop going home from the lighthouse! Give it a try if you're in the neighborhood!
Being just steps away from our room proved detrimental to my waistline! LOL but so yummy... My favorite was the peppermint, it reminded me of my childhood in Mass.
Enjoy the ice cream while sitting in the Hub or Rocky Neck
Great place to meet locals and visitors while enjoying the inner harbor 
Cute little ice cream place in the art colony called Rocky Neck in Gloucester, MA. Delicious and fresh ice cream. Outdoor seating, very casual. Very enjoyable.
A cute, funky ice cream parlor with good pistachio frozen yogurt. Always oldies playing on the loudspeakers outdoors for everyone to hear. 
We had a lobster roll (LR) for lunch and returned for lobster mac & cheese (LM&C) that evening.  Lots of lobster on the LR - the LM&C was huge - enough for 2 - steaming hot with large chunks of lobster through out - the best we had on this trip!!!
We were looking for a place with those 3 criteria and were very pleased with The Studio Restaurant in Gloucester. Located by the water with outdoor and indoor seating, they serve a wide selection of seafood including sushi plus starters, salads and soup. A good wine selection was available. We had the crab cakes, and split the beet salad plus haddock dinner. Service was prompt and courteous. Definitely a place to return to for a mother meal. Parking is a little hard to find.
At the recommendation of a Gloucester store clerk, we tried The Studio for the lobster rolls.  Absolutely great.  I should note that their “twin lobster rolls” are just about all lobster, not the lobster salad (with tons of mayo) you might be used to.  They toss the big chunks of claw meat lobster in a light dressing and then overstuff the toasted buns.  (If you want more dressing or mayo they are glad to provide).  So there we were on a sunny fall afternoon, sitting out on their deck sipping wine and lunching on great lobster rolls.  Doesn’t get much better than this!  One tip, the lobster rolls come with a side of pasta salad (which was very good).  But if you want a little crunch with your lunch, you might want to opt for fries.
Great location. The employees were very nice. The food was great and we got our meals for half price. Also sitting outside is good as we got a nice view of the water and boats passing by.
The view is amazing here! I went alone during lunch time on a weekday and I was pleasantly surprised when they told me the menu was half off! I had sushi which was ok..  I wanted brown rice to keep it a bit healthy but the waitress said they don't have that option. The clam chowder was delicious! I would definitely stop by again if I'm in the Rocky neck area. 
we stop here every year on our vacation. Its a great place to sit on the deck and view smiths cove.Food ,drinks and service dreat.
Another stop along my day out in Gloucester that was part of the boat ride around Gloucester.  Came to the Studio by way of a recommendation of a gal....Tara who was with her mom at the bar at Captain Carlos' so decided to go on the ride and stop at The Studio.  Great outside deck on the water which really was the first sign of goodness.

Sat again at the outside bar/deck to order another Bloody Mary.  Well....it seems that between the "bartender(s) at Captain Carlos and here....there is something truly wrong with them.  They all seem to have a really bad atittude and don't understand that they are working for tips. Now I understand that the summer is waning and soon they will be out of a job....BUT KEEP SMILING.  Don't just give up and make the rest of us suffer your depression!!!!  I came to you for a drink and service....NOT ATTITUDE!!!!!!
My wife and I had lunch here on 24 August overlooking the harbor in the Rocky Neck area of Gloucester.  The day was beautiful and sunny and we were seated outside in the shade.  I had a beer and my wife had a glass of white wine.  I had a lobster roll and she ordered a crab stuffed avocado and a side of corn on the cob.  I love my double lobster roll.  The lobster was abundant and delicious.  She enjoyed her entree but felt that there was not nearly enough crab.  I gave her some of my lobster as I had so much of it.  With that quibble, we would recommend it and return. The bill was $65.
We love the Studio! Great food, friendly staff and you can't beat the view! I ordered the twin lobster rolls and was pleasantly rewarded with buttered buns overflowing with chunky lobster meat! (Thanks for the chunks!!) my husband had the haddock which was plentiful, fresh and very tasty! Our skinny margaritas were perfect and the bar staff is friendly and attentive! Would have been a 5 if we hadn't waited forever for our food. 
We were greeted by a smiling hostess.  We requested outdoor seating and were shown to a hightop corner table facing the harbor.  It felt like a private table with an unobstructed view of a typical New England village.  Awesome!  Our waitress came immediately with water and took our drink order.  When she returned with the drinks, we ordered our appetizers.  She was very knowledgable and answered our questions without hesitation.  We started with the Spicey Tuna Stone with avacado, ginger and tabiko (which was like a tuna tartar, but a lot better); and Art ordered the $1 oysters.  Both were excellent!  We shared  a clam combo which was too crispy and not enough clams. We weren't rushed and had plenty of time to chat and enjoy an after dinner drink.  We enjoyed the harbor view for the next hour.  Next time we will order a different entree. We did see a lobster roll that looked scrumptious and a couple sushi rolls that looked interesting.  All in all it was a wonderful experience and would definitely return when in the area.  Staff was exceptional, friendly and helpful!
We had lunch here with a friend and for the most part, the food was good. I had the Halibut sandwich which was excellent but the pasta salad that came with it was tasteless. My husband had the marinated sirloin tips and they were excellent as well and it was a huge serving. Our friend had the fish tacos and they looked average - not a lot of fish and it was fried. The service was terribly slow but they allowed us to spend all afternoon at the table visiting with this friend whom we hadn't seen in over 30 years, so we really appreciated that. 
Two of us ordered salad and an appetizer which was more than enough.    The fish nuggetss were good - about 6-8 pieces of nicely fried fish.  The tuna tartare also was good, but a couple of pieces of the tuna weren't quite as fresh as I would have liked. One of us ordered the halibut, which was enormous. 

The service was fast.  They serve a variety of different seafood dishes as well as a few meat dishes and pasta.

One major complaint is that there were only two (newly unisex) bathrooms for a large number of people.  

On summer weekends, it helps to get there early.
Wow...they did a nice renovation a few years ago but have not matched that with either service nor good food. The new owner owns both the Rudder and the Studio, and boy have both gone down hill. As locals who love a great place to dine, this is no longer on our list. If you are a visitor, don't be seduced by the location.  You will not like the quality of the food  (how can you destroy a lobster roll or scampi?) and will wait way too long for it. Disappointing. All 6 at our table had terrible meals and the week before we had tiny portions.
After a thrilling whale watch we were ready for lunch where we could sit by the water and chat about our morning's whale sightings. We were also headed out to the light house so chose The Studio on Rocky Neck. The view was quite nice, service excellent and according to my husband, the haddock sandwich delicious. My crab cakes were a bit over fried and had more filler than I would have liked.  I did enjoy the mingling of flavors in the tomato salsa. The scallops at the next table looked delicious as did the sushi.  It's worth a lunch and a walk through the charming streets and galleries. 
I highly recommend going to The Studio in Gloucester MA. The food was sublime especially their sushi selections. We enjoyed whole belly clams(of course) and haddock. We also enjoyed some seared scallops. Now a little bit about the location of this restaurant. In a beautiful little harbor area where everything seems to slow down and the food just seems to taste better. 
Now how about a cocktail while you sit outside watching the boats come and go.
I recommend the "Rogue Wave" which is tasty rum drink that our bartender John made for us and then made us another one. Delicious and strong. If you are in this area of world go to The Studio on Rocky Neck Avenue in Gloucester.
If you want to eat outside on the water this is a great place. The food is average. The Asian calamari was fresh. My husband got the fish tacos. They were good but they put a ton of fish in the taco. It's more like a fish platter 😉. I had the shrimp scampi. It was ok. The dish didn't have any distinguishing flavors. 
Great menu, sushi is the best around.  Service is great and the views are outstanding.  I have been for both lunch and dinner.  No matter when, it's excellent!   The only reason I gave it 4 instead of 5 is because of the difficulty finding parking.  I can't walk great distances, so I have to go in the middle of the week in order to find a spot...  Denis, you ought to consider valet parking for both The Rudder and The Studio.  That would be awesome!
Went with friends to The Studio for lunch.  We opted for a window table - providing the best of being shielded from the direct sun - yet still with a great view of the water.

I started with a specialty cocktail - a "Gin-Tini" which was part Hendricks Gin and part Bombay Sapphire gin.  Very refreshing!

They have a great sushi menu at The Studio - but I opted for the Twin Lobster Roll sandwich and I was not disappointed.
We stopped in on a chilly Friday night and were immediately met by the gracious friendly owner who offered us blankets to fend off the cool air as we took in the beautiful harbor view from the outside bar.  On our return trip Saturday, because we enjoyed ourselves so much on Friday, we again saw the owner circulating and chatting at multiple tables.  Nice to see such hands on mgmt. within a such a large restaurant.  But the highlight was the sushi, beautiful preparation and unbelievably fresh.  Possibly the best I have ever had.  We saw a few different choices being served to other tables as well and they all looked amazing.  The service on both nights, we just ate at the outdoor and indoor bars, was spot on.  Friendly and efficient.  We have already recommended The Studio to others for their food and their beautiful views and we look forward to returning next year.
I have eaten here twice - once with a big group on a work outing and once with my husband. I will make sure to visit The Studio Restaurant whenever I'm in Gloucester. THe service is fast and friendly - they can't do enough for you! We ate out on the deck one evening and the waitress noticed a few people looked chilly so she quickly brought over blankets for us to wrap ourselves in and asked would we like portable heaters brought out! I have also come here simply for dessert and after dinner drinks and was treated with the same friendly service.  The food is typical New ENglnad sea fare but it is delicious and reasonable. It is right on the harbor so you can watch the sailboats go by  .  Some patrons even sail right up to the deck. The restaurant is tucked away in the Rocky Neck Artist's Colony section of Gloucester. Look for it and stop in for what will be a charming and enjoyable experience.
I used to go to Zeke's all the time until the new owner took over. My breakfast was awful, the wait time was long and prices were ridiculous. There are way better places in Gloucester that have reasonable prices. 
We visit Gloucester once a year and hit our favorite places like Two Sisters, Sugar Mags, and Lobsta Land. This year I did a quick Google search, wondering if we had been missing out on anything, and heck yes we were!!! So happy we tried Zeke's. During our trip, we visited three times. It's a wonderful addition to an already bustling breakfast scene in Gloucester. We loved sitting at the counter where you can watch your breakfast, and everyone else's, being made. It's like a chef's table, but better. So basically you're watching one, maybe two people make breakfast for the ENTIRE restaurant. I was stunned and saddened by some selfish uppity customers who left because it was "taking too long." Fine, go to Denny's or something if you can't appreciate that your food is being lovingly made over a hot stove. When you're in Zeke's, you feel like you're in someone's home. Would you treat someone in your home like that? I'll get off my box. 

The food is fantastic. There are many interesting, not run-of-the-mill items on the menu. My absolute favorite was the sourdough toast with avocado mash, poached eggs and salsa. Incredible. The french toast is probably the best we've ever had. The coffee is good too. Lots of fresh bread selections. Pretty much anything you want, they have it, if you're patient enough to wait for it, and you should! Can't wait to go back next year.
Breakfast in Gloucester doesn't get any bigger. Big portions for big appetites. A variety of homage breads for toast or taking home a loaf. Great hash and cornbread. Waffles a bit heavy. Pancakes also very large and think. Although their peach pancakes are the best around. Fresh squeezed orange juice, and daily specials to keep customers coming back.
The service was AMAZING, the food was mostly very tasty, and the wait is long (we arrived at 10:30 and didn't eat until 12pm).  If you love pancakes, omelets, wraps, french toast, and you have a little time to wait, Zeke's Place will deliver fantastic food.  Make sure you feed the kids a snack first, as they don't bring anything for the little ones while you wait and you likely had a pretty long wait before you were seated.  My daughter (9) loved the HUGE chocolate chip pancake, while my husband enjoyed a veggie omelet.  I chose the sauteed veggies and a side of one egg.  The veggies were a bit overdone and not very well seasoned, but hey - it's my fault for choosing boring veggies at a restaurant that focuses on HUGE breakfasts!  Our waitress was incredibly nice and made sure we had refills on all our drinks, however she could not accomodate our desire to have some toast or any other snacks brought over for the hungry kids.  Next time we will feed them a little first or sneak in some snacks.  Otherwise, this was great.
This little coffee shop in East Gloucester is a great choice for breakfast. They offer an astonishing selection of 14 different home baked breads, including delicious Anadama bread, which is a local favorite. The service was very prompt, competent and pleasant. I ordered poached eggs and they were cooked perfectly. The menu offers many different items as well as daily specials. There is something for everyone! I would definitely go there again.
They offer a good value and quality with their food.  It can be a bit crowded and parking difficult but worth the effort.
Zeke's is fantastic for breakfast.  There are lots of items to choose from.  The service can be a little slow.  But the wait is worth it.  I enjoyed scrambled eggs and smashed avocado on sourdough toast - accompanied by tomatoes and roasted potatoes.  Sounds strange?  But it was great
They have a whole bunch of homemade breads, which makes this place great.  It's a great little place with a diner feel, but the food is better!
I entered this very small place which was full at the time... not one of the staff ever  looked at us or any of the people waiting on line to be seated. The waitress ignored the line of people.  She could have at least  said there was a long wait or taken our names. Instead the cook and waitresses just stared  at the line of people. So we and others just left never got served.  Note the home fries on the grill looked like they made them at the beginning of the week...looked like charcoal.
we had good service but the food was awful.   pancakes tasted like cardboard.   eggs and home fries were nasty.     bathroom was right near where all the food was being cooked.   not well placed.  I will not eat breakfast here again.  
A little hard to find, but worth the effort.  Very good menu with a huge selection of homemade breads.  Unfortunately our choice of a local favorite, Anadama, was still in the oven.  Overall, the food was excellent.
We tried every thing ,well most items.
Try the grits,the best north of mason/dixon.Fish cakes in America's home of seafood are the tastiest & best prepared the New England way,seasoned lightly,huge portions and are a good change of pace of typical menu items.They also offer other Paleo items And an extensive homemade selection of breads.Also an eclectic assortment of Gluten-free items.
Poached eggs cooked to perfection.Open everyday till 1:00
We traveled from Oklahoma and went to Zeke's on the recommendation of a friend from Hawaii who had been to Zeke's the week before.  It was great!  We had brunch, which was delicious and a lot of food for the money.  We also bought a loaf of bread to take with us.  It was delicious and stayed fresh until we had eaten every last crumb.  Staff was very pleasant also.
We went to Zeke's  because we had a Groupon .  It was a very good breakfast. The specials on the blackboard all sounded wonderful. We got the French toast with peaches and cream flambé .  The waitress suggested getting a half order. Glad we listened to her--- it was huge and delicious. They make all their own bread and sell loaves. The French toast is made with thick slices of sweet bread. The home fries were seasoned just right and very good. The coffee is strong and very fresh and tasty;They had French roast or regular. We were allowed to include a loaf of bread to supplement the bill to get up to the $28 required by Groupon. Parking is difficult as there are only a few spaces in front. This is a small place with seating for about 40. The owners and waitstaff are friendly.  We will definitely return for another wonderful breakfast. They are open 5:00am-1:00pm. 
Great Breakfast choices. Not the usual, homemade muffins, breads, hash, etc. Local foods to the area. Small and quaint. Very friendly, make you feel right at home. Reasonable prices. Portuguese Sweet Bread yummy!! May have to wait, but worth it. 
Zeke's could use a little more seasoning when the ingredients are not highly seasoned (highly seasoned ingredients would be like bacon and habanero cheese). Thus scrambled eggs, for example, can be in need of salt.
HOWEVER, Zeke's has amazing omelets, such as goat cheese and asparagus, great scramble mix-ups, such as the banana pepper-chourizo option, and the most mouth-watering selection of breads you could imagine. I am not a bread person. I have an English muffin in the morning, and that's the last bread product I encounter in the day. But Zeke's banana-walnut bread, I cannot resist. The selection of breads is always at least eight, with various grains, some studded with fruits (e.g., blueberries) and nuts. Each is simply wonderful.
I've been to this place a few times now and finally felt ready to review it.

The food is good but takes awhile to come out, even when it's slow. The entire restaurant probably holds 40 people and that includes the counter. The specials menu is sporadically updated so when I've tried to order something from it (written on a huge chalkboard), I received a "Oh, yeah, we're out of that. We've been out of that. I don't know why he doesn't take that off." Not sure who "he" is, but I prefer attention to detail and I hate getting my hopes and tastebuds up and ready only to be told that they don't have "it". *Sigh* Such a simple fix!

Parking is very limited and the road it is on is busy. If you have to park in the lot across from it, it's a tough cross, so be careful.

It's fine, really, just not great.
Heard this was a terrific breakfast/lunch place for Gloucester natives. Was not very impressed with my food. Bent two forks trying to cut my Eggs Benedict English Muffin. Will not return.
Really good food, fabulous selection of breads, and a reasonable price. We stopped by after a beach walk and were thoroughly delighted by the experience. They close fairly early in the afternoon and we're disappointed when they aren't open. Service was wonderful, the food great and the price reasonable. Oh, and they had grits, a true treat for a former resident of the Carolinas. And they weren't instant grits, either. Imported, the waitress said. Well worth the stop if you have a hunkering for a real honest, stick-to-your ribs breakfast.
We come to Gloucester every year for a 3 day fishing trip.  Capt. Marciano recommended Zekes for breakfast before boarding at the Cripple Cove public dock.  From year one ... we have started our morning at Zekes, and do not intend to change as long as I am lucky enough to make the trip.  The waitress Dottie is possibly one of the friendliest folks in town and the food... is incredible.  Hint ... don't sit at the large table just inside the door ... thats where the local fishing "legends" sit .. and you know what?  They are just as friendly as Dottie.  Thank you Zekes.
Nice restaurant, good food, amazing view. We were a bit in a hurry and our waiter was very attentive to that. He brought everything very quickly. We sat outside and it was very pleasant. 
I've forgotten a pair of earrings in the restroom and came back to pick it up on the next day. They were wonderful finding and keeping them for me. I'd definitely come back
YUMMY! We sat outside and had a scallop bacon pizza! It was beyond expectations. The olive, garlic, olive oil topping for the warm bread was an unexpected delight. Going back for more tomorrow...
I've been going to The Rudder for a long time as a frequent visitor to Gloucester. I've had a great many meals there but hadn't been back in quite a while. I went with my wife, daughter and family friends (a family of five with three teenage children). To put it bluntly, I was pretty disappointed.

Drinks before the meal: I had a cocktail that was fine. My wife and one of our friends both had a huckleberry lemonade - huckleberry-flavored lemonade with vodka. They both thought it was undrinkable - too medicinal tasting. $24 of alcohol abandoned on the table. One of the kids had a virgin mule that was so sour, he also couldn't drink it. I tried it and he was right. I sent it back for some simple syrup. Did I mention we waited probably 10-15 minutes for those drinks to arrive even though the restaurant was more than half-empty?

The Food: I had the monkfish, which is served over lobster mashed potatoes with asparagus. There was nothing wrong with this dish but nothing particularly right either. Others had the swordfish, chicken Parmesan, the day boat catch and the shrimp and lobster scampi. Of all those people (eight total) and those various dishes (I've left one or two out) the only person who was genuinely happy with his meal was the one who ordered the scampi, so I suppose if you're going to go, skip the cocktails and order the scampi.

It's still lovely to sit out back overlooking the water, but that's not enough to get me back there any time soon. There are a lot of pretty good restaurants in Gloucester and Rockport. Sadly, I don't count The Rudder on this list anymore.
Went out for a very early dinner knowing how fast this place fills up.
Got a table for myself outside.
Lovely view.
Entree was absolutely yummy!
Waitstaff did not bring me a dish for the mussel shells and shrimp ails, which would have been appreciated.
Going solo to restaurants can be not fun, especially when the waitstaff seems to ignore you.
Unfortunately, this was the case this evening.
maybe the waitress was respecting my privacy.
I think she should have asked me if everything was okay before my final 2 bites.
I do recommend this restaurant.
Service, I guess, depends on something.
Not sure what
The Rudder is one of Gloucester's better quality restaurants It is on Rocky Neck a picturesque harbor section of Gloucester. The food is excellent and consistently good. The lobster cake for lunch or diner is the best I have had anywhere.
Seafood is excellent overall and the drinks are substantial .
It's our 2nd time to the Rudder, last year was great so we return this year.
Service not good maybe even bad, took long time to get the drinks and didn't ask if we need 2nd.
The eggplant appetizer that we ordered came under cook and hard, main dish- got the Salmon that came under cooked was sent back and came under cooked in a pile of oil and butter.
Will not recommend try somewhere else.
The only positive mark is the location. 
This is always one of the two go to place's we dine at when we visit the area. Not  a very big place so it fills up fast which is always a good sign !! You can have outside or inside seating as well as the bar. Nice quaint atmosphere that can get a bit loud when packed. Menu has nice raw bar, Sushi station, and daily local catches right off the local docks !!! Located in the Art section of Gloucester this is a local favorite watering hole as well. Food is very good overall but not outstanding but we keep coming back !! It is worth the trip to check it out and if you have never been to this area there are all kinds of local merchants to shop as well. Give it a try you shouldn't be disappointed !!
The atmosphere was really relaxed with an excellent view and the meal was delicious and so were the drinks.  The service at the restaurant was great.  A very interesting town to visit. Loved it!
A small group of us went here for dinner on a beautiful summer's evening.  The restaurant looks out on a small harbor and across to another shore.  There is no parking, but we parked on the street as one of us is a town resident.  Not sure if out of town cars will have luck finding on street parking.

The service was poor and the food was okay.  I had a lobster salad which was nothing special.  There was a fair amount of lobster but no tail meat and very little claw meat.  The lobster was slightly undercooked as well.  We ordered a plate of fried calamari and that was excellent.

Our waitress was inexperienced, I think.  She kept disappearing when we needed her most.  She brought us wine before bringing any water and there was a long wait for the water.  She also brought our dinners before we had finished the appetizer and then never came back to remove the appetizer plates when we finally had finished.  

I hope there are better restaurants in Gloucester because this one was not really up to snuff.
My partner and I did not have reservations on a Friday night and were not too hopeful, but fortunately they had the perfect table for us on the patio looking over the harbour!  Attentive service throughout.  My partner loved the oysters and the swordfish for dinner.  I had the haddock which was pretty good and a delicious Ruby Sipper cocktail,mmm.  A nice mix of locals and travellers, the ambiance is vibrant and the view is coastal charm.  Definitely will return when in the area.  Btw, parking is difficult, we ended up parking in the shipyard!
We arrived in Gloucester late in the day on 4th of July weekend.  Most restaurants on Rocky Neck were fully booked and wouldn't even entertain taking our name.  The Rudder was happy to oblige - and looked to be a quieter venue than their neighbor, "The Studio" restaurant.  After the quoted 55 minute wait, we were seated.  While waiting, the restaurant has a great bar - serves good martinis - and friendly bartenders.

Our table split an order of mussels - which were more than enough for our group of 5 people.  For my entree, I ordered the Shrimp and Lobster Scampi which was fantastic.
We made reservations for dinner. We arrived our name listed was not even close to what was written. Hostess was totally lost and overwhelmed. We waited almost 45 minutes for a table and that was after hounding hostess so she didn't give our table away. While we were pushed in a corner to wait for table we asked bartender for 2 drinks. We were ignored and never received drinks. Finally sat a table and had a very nice waitress who seemed overwhelmed and frustrated. She did a very good job but food took forever and we saw many plates of food being returned. Another thing to take note of is the parking is horrible! Would not go back even though food was good not great. 
This place has maintained quality and excellent service since the days when Evie Parsons ran it (long long time ago) - food is very good for the price, service outstanding and location is very fun.
Had a delicious meal at the Rudder last week.  I'm from Mass but live in Colorado and was in need of a good Seafood dinner.  With my family we split 12 Oysters and the mussels Appetizer.  The Oysters were so fresh, the perfect size and they were perfectly shucked no shell bits and the foot was cleanly separated. The mussels were in a cream based sauce with fennel and lots of mustard. While the sauce and sausage were delicious, I prefer a lighter sauce for mussels in the summer. The mussels were so tender, we ate every last one but were not able to finish the generous sausage. The Entrees ordered were Chicken Piccata which my Sister-in-law reported as very good but huge and a little salty there was about a whole bottle of capers on it so it had to be salty. Brother had the Seafood risotto which was reported as delicious, my Dad had scallops which were perfectly cooked but came out a little cool, same thing with the stuffed sole that my Mom ordered.  I had the crabcake appetizer for my entree which had a great amount of lump crab meat, came with 3 cakes and a small pile of greens.  The crab cakes had a nice spicy flavor to complement the sweet crab and a classic remoulade.  Drinks were strong and pretty reasonably priced.  $10-$12 for a signature cocktail, $6 for craft beer and $7.50 for wine. The price on the food would normally be a bit high but we lucked out and were there on a night when everything was 50% off!  I would return for sure and the location is lovely right on the water. Our waitress was amazing!! Everything was very prompt and she was knowledgeable about the menu.
Unique location. Food was average to average +, Pricing was a bit on the plus side, but the atmosphere was great. s=Smack in the middle of an artist community right on the waterfront, Highly recommended for a nice summer evening dinner,
If you can find your way to Rocky Neck, Rudders is a great stop for dinner.  The menu offers creative twists on standard menu items.  Macaroni and cheese with scallops was a hit with the husband.  My chicken piccata was perfect.  You may find yourself in the cozy bar area or out on the porch where you overlook the harbor.  Other than a slight overcrowding of tables, this was a fantastic dining experience.  Try the olive tapenade when it comes with the bread.  Delicious!
We arrived early pre season and were pleased to find the menu was half price. Our party of five ordered a variety of seafood as well as a vegetarian dish. The mussels were abundant and unique with an Asian fusion twist of fennel sausage and cream sauce. The Monkfish was served over lobster mashed potato. The tuna steak with seaweed was super as was the eggplant parm. The risotto seafood, however was a mushy mess. Shame on letting it get by the pass. View was awesome and service too.
Next to Bistrot the Rudder is our favorite place. My husband swears he ate the best salmon of his life here and that meal has been un paralleled since. We love the view and the wine and just generally how much fun it is. 
Excellent food, great service, very pleasant sitting on deck overlooking harbor.  Fish was super fresh and well prepared; the flavors were delicious and it was beautifully presented.  The Eggplant Napoleon appetizer was excellent too.
lucky we got an outside seating ,overlooking the docks.
great assortment on the menu-something for everyone-salads, tacos, mussels- great drinks- super staff- a must when you go to Gloucester
We came here with friends for a birthday dinner.  It is a very small restaurant but lovely.  The owner / chef could not be more attentive, and the food was delicious.  We had never been here before but we will be back.
This is a unique and intimate experience.  The chef/owner attends to three tables.  The menu is limited but offers delicious options that reflect Syrian traditions and spicing.  The restaurant is unexpectedly cozy for a storefront.  The kitchen is open so you can watch the preparation of your meal.  

I was here with a friend whom I do not see often, and we had a relaxed 2.5 hour meal with no pressure to eat more quickly.  Each course seemed to arrive exactly when we were ready for it. 

The only challenges here are that the restaurant can only handle a limited number of diners and it is only open on Saturday and Sunday.  You should send an email to Ahmad to make a reservation (His email is on his website).  Also, keep in mind that you cannot pay with a credit card.
Looking for a dining change and inspired by its good reviews, we gave Roksana a try. While my knowledge of Persian food is quite limited, we were pleased by what we found. The staff was helpful, the food was tasty and the portions big enough to have fed two. The only downside is that Roksana is takeout only; your food may not be hot by the time you get it home. Knowing what we now know, we won't hesitate to drop in again
My daughter and I discovered this fantastic take-out when we visited Waltham.  WE liked it so much we brouoght in foood twice in one week.  We liked the Shirazi salad and Mast O'bademja epplant dips.  They were very helpful when I got lost trying to find their restaurant in the dark during rush hour in a driving rain....stayed open until I arrived.  They could use a brighter sign.
I love this place. The food is made fresh to order, and the treats in their display case are delicious. The family that runs the place is fun to talk to. The portions are large. My only complaint? You have to careful when you order by phone due to language difficulties: chicken can quickly become salmon, and the bread you asked for might get forgotten or mixed up. Just be very very explicit and they will take care of you!
I have been a long time patron.  Since they opened I came to buy the eggplant yoghurt, the torsh kabob and the beef kubideh.  Prices have risen very fast and the amount of food one gets has been getting less and less. The beef kubideh went from $8 to 11 for less food. What I used to get for a $100-200 catering order is now about half the food which was very noticeable at my last gathering.  It is a shame to see a business do this to its customers and think they won't notice.  There are many other persian options, with an eat-in option, more food for the $, with better parking access and finally, a respect for a customer.
First: it is a TAKEOUT ONLY place. Don't expect any seating service.
For a takeout place, it is as good as it gets. Parking might be a bit hard, but if you can't find a spot along the Mt. Auburn, park on one of the perpendicular streets (a bit of walking then). 
It is as good as it gets if you're ordering a takeout for guests. Meats are neatly served over the bed of rice and can be coupled with several sides they offer.
Depending on the order it might take 15-30 min to prepare. But everything will be fresh-fresh-fresh.
There are some really nice vegetarian options (grilled veggies) as well.
I love their food  i would recommend it to anyone!its clean tasty and a faily owned restaurant the only bad thing  they dont have sitting area! try  the yogurt mint sauce!
This small place on Mt Auburn Street in Watertown has a simple menu of kebabs, rice, and salads. Meats include chicken, beef and lamb and come in kebabs or wraps. All are delicious, as are the containers of sides like chicken potato salad, mixed cucumber, tomato, onion and mint salad, smoked eggplant stuffed with they, fried garlic, onion and mint, and olives stuffed with walnuts pomegranate, garlic and spices. Also served with full plates is either basmati rice or Zereshk polo, a mixed rice and veg.
Tried this place twice so far.
The food is excellent.   I often visit another sit down restaurant in the area that I do not like anymore so have been looking for a replacement and with Roksana - I found it.

Only drawback with this one is that there is no sit down (take-out only) and parking in the area is not the easiest - But I will still drive an hour to get food from here again.
A colleague at work was kind enough to order lunch for our group of 10 from Roksana last week and it was just wonderful.  She is from Iran and knows a thing or two about how authentic the food should be and it was amazing.   The Jasmin rice was very fluffy and the different kabobs were to-die-for.  I raved about the food to my husband and we'll surely order from there when we have a special dinner with friends.
My mother and I arrived in Watertown after a flight to Boston from Los Angeles.  I left her in our rented apartment and went out to forage for dinner.  Roksana, just down the street, was a real find!  THis is a take-out place, which was perfect for us.   I was given free samples of several dishes while I was waiting for my order, and had a very nice chat with several family members.  We ordered salmon and a lamb dish and both were delicious.  I have had excellent Persian food in Chicago and Los Angeles, and this meal was right up there with the best.
This place is an authentic Iranian food joint with some great offerings.
Pros:
Authentic food
Great portions 
A friendly host 

Cons:
Only takeaway
Parking can be an issue 

This is truly a unique restaurant - it is best as a take-out place - with Persian cuisine that is carefully prepared, using super fresh ingredients and recipes that are, to say the least, creative and inspired. I've never had food like this!  Your palate will be tickled and your pocketbook will be barely dented.  Highly recommended!!
Great food served in an unassuming setting.To go only.These minor inconveniences are the only thing preventing me from giving 5 stars.We have had great success with the family platter.Chicken beef and lamb kabobs served with perfectly cooked basmati rice.Some places handle the delicate grain better than others,Roksana gets it right.They homemade bread is cooked to order and is delightful.There are several condiments and salads such as fattoush available as well.Be sure and grab some with your meal.The yoghurt sauce is similar to the Indian Raita.The general style of Persian food is related to the Tandoori style of grilled marinated meats served with yogurt.The two areas were once united by the Mughal Empire.
  This place is run by a very friendly couple who obviously love what they do and it shows with the food.Having obviously thought about it,they shrugged at the suggestion of putting in tables.They are doing what they want and are doing it well.
Simply, one of the best Persian food you can find around Boston area. One thing that I love about this restaurant is that they make their own bread which is always warm and delicious. Kabobs are absolutely fantastic. The Olive appetizer "Zeitoon Parvardeh" (Stuffed or prepared Olive) is lovely.
You'll also find variety of other specialty grocery items in the store.
It's a family owned restaurant and the owner and all the staff are friendly and nice.
You should try it if you like to try Persian food.
I love ordering take out here. The menu is classic Persian grilled food (salmon, chicken, lamb, beef). They serve the crust of the rice which tastes fantastic. And they have a large selection of additional take out items that are quite unusual (and many are very tasty) which I strongly recommend trying. 

The couple that runs it is very friendly. I recommend take-out as they have no real seating inside. They close early (I think about 8 pm) so call ahead and go early.

Also, for the price you get both a LOT of food, and high quality. Typical meal is $8 to $12 if I recall correctly.
I had heard about this place from a friend so I drove out to Watertown to check it out. It is right on Mt Auburn street next to Hair Cuttery. You could miss it if you didn't pay attention. It was well worth the trip! I have only had Persian food a few times but love it. I got one lamb wrap (almost like a kabob but better) and a Chicken and rice platter. Everything was made right in front of me and was so fresh. I also got extra bread (which they make in the window) and the yogurt and eggplant dip. Worth checking out if you are ever in Watertown, MA!
Watertown has several terrific Armenian, middle eastern and Persian places for everything from groceries, to sit down meals, to take out.  Roksana is for take out and the limited menu is more than made up for by the high quality, fragrant, delicious food, all of which is cooked to order.  Favorites are the lamb and beef skewers, served with their wonderful basmati style rice.  I also love the stuffed eggplant, which they sell by weight.
Eaten takeaway pizza from here several times - always great quality and very affordable. Would definitely recommend.
One small Cheese, one large Pepperoni (hold the sauce), one small Pineapple & Pepperoni. $32 Delivered in 32 minutes. 

Great crust, on the thin side—tender, flaky, yummy.  

Please send along a menu next time. 
Been back a number of times and somewhere between my first review and this one they downgraded their ingredients. Now it's just average Greek style pizza.
I was looking for a new pizza place as one of my go to places recently closed and quality of the pizza at the second has become spotty.

The pie was great old school Greek style pizza. Tasty crust with lots of flavorful cheese. At a very reasonable price. 

My new go to place for pizza.
I loved! I had tons of frozen yogurt but this one was super! And cheap! You can decide beside six or seven flavours (some light options too) and lots of toppings! If you prefer a normal gelato you can have spoons of real icecream in a cruncky cone! Wow
We go to Moozy's on a regular basis. My kids love it, mostly because it has the frozen yogurt bar where you can serve yourself. The ice cream is good and slightly cheaper than Rancatore's (also in Belmont). But during a pregnancy craving I did a side by side comparison of root beer floats from Moozy's and Rancatore's, and Ranc's won hands down. Sorry Moozy's, but I have to say you're second best for Belmont ice cream.

Moozy's does serve sandwiches and other food if you're looking for lunch and ice cream in one place, but I've never tried the other food.
...but not so hot for adults unless you're sticking with the ice cream. The ice cream is great and the kids love picking their own topics. Food for kids is also good: basic grilled cheese, etc. Fun to sit outside when the weather allows. If Moozy's was just ice cream I'd give it 5 stars.
This place is run by a bunch of rude and untrained high school students.  They keep the place dirty and lack basic knowledge of customer service.  The service keeps getting worse and the employee turnover is high.  It seems the only person sticking around is the rudest employee and he seems to be the one training everyone else to be just as rude.  The yoghurt is not worth the poor service.  Stay away!
Once I navigated the regional lingo everything was great!  Moozy's has awesome frozen yogurt and traditional hard ice cream.  My heart sank when I didn't see shakes on the menu but they quickly explained what a frap was and we were good to go.  Great service and a tasty vanilla shake.  Definitely a great place for ice cream & froyo.
This is a great neighborhood place. Everytime I've been, the employees (mainly teenagers) have been friendly and helpful. The ice cream is very good and we've recently tried sandwiches (cold and pan inis) and wraps.
Great place to take kids for ice cream or fro-yo.  Kids love the "do your own toppings" bar for the the frozen yogurt.The sandwiches, cleverly named after the four elementary schools in town, are meh...not great...not horrible...but I won't waste my money on them again.  Stick to the ice cream. 
Moozy's is such a nice addition to local ice cream choices.  Others might make their own slightly better ice cream, but Moozy's wins on atmosphere, hands down.  Bright & cheery inside.  Wonderful high quality seating outside.  Even has heaters for cool nights.  The place to go to get good ice cream and hang out.  They also have lots of food, like salads & sandwiches, but I've never tried any.
I'm not a huge fan of Starbucks for many reasons, one being that their baristas usually are too busy to notice you. However, I was in Watertown for only a week and some of these baristas were a friendly face each morning! Hanry, Salem, and Regina were so nice and kept conversation as they quickly made drinks for the next customers. I love that there are some seats right by the bar area, making it a great place to sit and converse.
Just an average regular Starbucks. Reliable and dependable coffee. Nothing more nothing less. If you want service and creativity go to a real café or a place like Vickie Lees in Belmont.
Such a great experience every time I go here.  My coffee is always made perfectly and quickly.  The baristas are also sooo nice!  As mentioned in a previous review, they really do make the attempt to get to know you.  They complete orders timely and effectively.  There are couches, lounge chairs, tables and free wifi.  Nice if you're studying for an exam or looking for a place to unwind and read a book.  The only downfall I would like to list, there is limited parking and because this Starbucks is SO good, it's always a full lot!
Best service I've ever experienced. The Baristas take their time to get to know you, they have your meal and drink ready for you before you've even made it to the cash register, and they're really professional. Come here on a slow weekend and enjoy your latte with great music and in a homey atmosphere.
Mi piace molto questa catena; negli Stati Uniti, dove mi sono recato per le mie vacanze estive, è davvero diffusissima! in qualsiasi zona della città ti trovi basta dare un'occhiata e uno Starbucks lo vedi sempre. L'offerta è abbastanza varia e comprende tutti i tipi di caffè, panini, yogurt con frutta e cereali, insalate, macedonie e bevande di buona qualità. Va bene sia per fare pranzo o cena, sia per uno spuntino o un break mentre si visita una città. C'è la possibilità di sedersi senza dover pagare la mancia. l'ambiente è giovanile e informale, i prezzi ragionevoli. Lo consiglio!
It might no be fair to compare this to my local Starbucks but it seems like I always have to wait a bit too long for my drink at this location. The drink quality is the same but that should be a "given" so I'm writing more about the experience. Whenever I come here, twenty or so times a year, it seems a little on the messy side but that could be as much the fault of the customers as well as the staff. Maybe I'm just spoiled by my local Starbucks.
630 pm on a Sunday, and the place looked like a dump. Mir can't be that busy that somebody can't get a broom and clean up that filthy floor.
If it wasn't a Starbucks, I would have walked out as soon as I entered.
I am new to town and stopped by Starbucks for directions.  I was greeted by initially a not overly helpful server but her colleagues picked up the challenge and went out of their way to point me in the right direction. The coffee was great - brewed exactly as I wanted and I couldn't have asked for better customer service!
This is very much a local place and full of regulars. The owner Aram is a nice man with a sense of pride in his place. Clean, decent prices and good portions. I had the spinach and cheese omelet and the kids had pancakes. If you are looking for something different get the bastrama (cured beef) and eggs. I plan to come back often. 
You'll be greeted by the unofficial "Mayor of Belmont" Aram - you'll enjoy the conversation of the day and a fabulous hearty breakfast or lunch.  You will see quickly how friendly the cozy atmosphere is with some diners at the counter or booths.

Aram is just a sweetheart - he loves cooking, talking with customers and enjoying a good laugh. The staff is super efficient and equally engaging.

It's a sizable menu with some Armenian specialities as well. We've gone countless times and LOVE it!
Can't remember how many times I have had breakfast at Aram's Cafe! Always reliable - feels like your classic local breakfast spot. Eggs awesome - made right to order. Aram is usually there - friendly warm and great breakfast. Plastic chairs etc. Don't expect a linen tablecloth but who wants one anyway? Coffee is never strong enough for me but I am a Starbucks girl - what can I say?


This is my go to breakfast place in Belmont. I always bring friends and visiting family here. The food is amazing and the prices are great. The owners are so nice and the waitstaff are all wicked friendly!!
It's kind of a "hole in the wall", but what a great breakfast: eggs florentine made with fresh baby spinach, challah French toast, and bacon brought to the table hot and crisp. The service was just the right degree of attentive. Most of the customers seem to be regulars -- I can see why!
The food is good, ample and fresh, and it's open early. We often go there when celebrating a birthday by going out to breakfast before school/work. Aram loves his work and it shows. There are many devoted regulars. 
In the 10 days we spent in Boston, in Aram's we had the best American breakfast. The diner is small but very typical. The quality of the bacon, sausage, home fries is excellent. The service is also very good. I highly recommend it, at least for a traditional breakfast!
Aram's is your local diner in Cushing Square for over 25 years...basic offerings at very good prices.  My breakfast of ham & eggs with home fries & toast was less than six bucks!  I returned the next morning to take away a box of yummy muffins from the bakery case.  

Aram welcomes you from behind the grill, and the neighbors appreciate the friendly atmosphere.  The furnishings are second-hand retro fast food, but the cafe is clean and busy.  They open every day at 5:30 am and close after lunch at 3:00 pm (1:00 pm on Sunday).  Aram's Cafe is a no nonsense spot close to home for a good meal without stretching your budget.
Nothing fancy...but nice portion size, friendly service. Seems like lots of locals here...every one seemed to know one another. We will be back. 
This is the best greek resto around us. Food is great and fresh. They serve it very quick. Very affordable. Good for dining in and take out. I always get hummus and beef kebab plate. Highly recommended!
Good Greek  and middle eastern type menu. Inexpensive and lacks any atmosphere. Not a dining destination for celebratory events (i.e. birthdays, or anniversaries). 
We found Demo's 20 years ago, and now whenever we travel to Boston area we stop in for a kebob or two.  Very simple, and very delicious, I usually order a combo, as I can never decide between the lamb or chicken.  Crisp greens, perfectly seasoned grilled meat, I wish I could duplicate this at home.  Believe me, I've tried!
This simple Greek primarily take out has been around for at least 25 years. It is simple traditional Greek food. Chicken shish kabob dinners with salad and rice, same with lamb or steak. Also mousaka (Greek lasagna) and other traditional Greek dishes. also don't forget the Baklava and rice pudding for desert. Both are worth while. Prices are very reasonable. they also do have eat in service. They also serve lunch.
The lamb and chicken kabob sandwich or dinners are outstanding. Comes with side Greek salad for sandwich and salad with rice or fries with dinner. Great health concious meals. Very affordable. You order at the counter and they deliver it to you table. Also good baklava for dessert.
For many years this has been a favorite.  The Lamb kabob is great; but don't miss the moussaka.  Very reasonable in price; but big on flavor.  Take out or eat in; always good.
I've had lamb, pork, and chicken gyros before but never beef. The meat was an odd consistency and the sauce was mediocre. I ordered hummus and they forgot to put the pita in my order. So I didn't eat that either. Not pleased.
not fancy, like eating at your grandparents
Food was  fresh and tasty
good amount of food for a very fair price
I've been here a bunch of times with my family. Demo's has some really tasty Greek food. I'd recommend the lamb kabob over rice. You definitely won't leave here hungry.

That being said, the atmosphere here is on par with a nice pizza place. Don't go here on your first date, or somethin.
We ordered chicken, lamb and beef shish kabob for a family get together. It was really good and I would not hesitate to go back there and get more, the next time I'm in the area. Tender and full of flavor.
In Greek, demos means "people" and this local restaurant is exactly that--focused on high value, no frills Greek food at very reasonable prices. The kabob dinners come on two skewers on a bed of succulent rice--enough for two people! The staff is like family. You place your order at the counter in full view of the kitchen area, sit down and five minutes later your food is delivered: wonderful, fresh, simple Greek salad, pita bread, and the main dish, always hot, always delicious. Demo's is a no-frills, special place to eat. It's the best value in good food in the area.
Demo's just keeps on keepin' on!  I cannot believe how much lamb you get with the lamb skewer plate (I took a whole skewer home).  Well seasoned and lovely.  And the rice.  Even the salad seems remarkable -- though seemingly there's nothing special about it.  But put it all together with a long-necked Bud and you have a winning combination.  Anyone who loves Greek food should get to Demo's first chance they have (and the gritty original Watertown location is much better than the somewhat antiseptic Waltham location).  There's not too much to the place, but what's there is the best!
I've been a faithful fan of Demos since the 1970's, but moved away a few years ago.  Recently got a chance to go back and was SO relieved it is still there,and still the same.  I absolutely love their meatloaf plate.  Big slices of meatloaf, rice, Greek red sauce, great salad and soft pita bread - all for $6.50!  Their gyros are the best this side of Chicago, according to my husband.  
If you're looking for a fancy place, this isn't it.  Very plain, order at the counter and sit down, and pick up your tray of food when your number is called.  But with the quality and price, who cares?  

Located on Mt. Auburn Street just outside Watertown Square, it sits among a strip of stores.  Demos is a gem.
The best gyro I've had in a long time.

Real meat, not that pressed weirdness. 
The chicken kebobs are very popular in the office as well.

I am consistently impressed by Demos
Nothing fancy about the place. Good kebabs at a great price. What more can you ask for when you are looking for something good to eat?
Demo’s is a family owned ‘hole in the wall’ tucked away in Watertown square. It is not a fancy, romantic, white tablecloth type of a place (more like a nice neighborhood dive) but a great stop for a shish kebab and a beer.

You order and pay at the counter, then sit down at a table and they bring you your food when ready.  The food is prepared to order so if you order a medium rare lamb kebab – that is what you get, mouthwateringly tender, cooked as asked with a side of fresh Greek salad and heavenly pita bread.

They do have other things on the menu  (beef and chicken kebabs and other Greek specialties)  but in the numerous times I have been there – I honestly haven't tried anything else. The Lamb is really that good! 

Have a piece of the homemade Baklava for dessert, not exactly a diet food – but well worth it.
I cannot remember the last time I had (swooned) over a lamb shish kabob. I ordered the lunch sandwich and was blown away. Tender tasty, just right vegetables, soft chewy pita bread and homemade hummus, God can it get any better? YES! The price was right: inexpensive! Someone in another review wrote "just a step up from a cafeteria", who cares?! the food was great. I tasted my wife's chicken shish kabob and it was fantastic. Demos I have been told, has been around for thirty years, maybe more, because my wife remembers it from when she lived in Belmont Ma. and guess what it looks it! No fru-fru dishes, furnishings or "Greek" decorations, just a delight that I hope will be around for another thirty years. (BTW even the green pepper in the salad had a flavor and texture that I've never gotten from the supermarket or any other restaurant for that matter.) 
Please do not go there it would be a shame if this place was discovered and my wife and I would have to make reservations to get seated!
Inexpensive, solid kebabs in a large pair of rooms. Nothing romantic but a nice option to mix in whn you are hungry and the wallet is light. 
I am a returning customer after first eating here about 8 years ago. They have a great dinner selection and excellent traditional Greek dishes. They probably make one of the best gyros I ever had! I usually get take-out, because I choose the spot for their food, not the atmosphere. The cost is very affordable and they keep the prices reasonable through the years.
Demo’s has been around a while and that’s a good thing. They know how to keep you coming back with fair prices and really good food. The chicken kabob dinner is a favorite because they char-grill the chicken, skewer it with green peppers and white onions and give you enough to take home for lunch the next day. Rice or fries with that? I always take the rice. The side salad is nothing special but I guess I just like the oil they use on it. The moussaka, as one would expect, is hearty and filling. They also have a liquor license if you wish to partake. 

Parking is on street and can be tough and the décor, although recently re-painted, will never win any interior decorating awards. Despite these details, Demo’s is still the best Greek place around Watertown and the surrounding area.
Once you've had Persian-style sweets with honey/rose water syrup (zolbi, bami) , you never look back. The Tabrizi bakery has it all, in addition to many other delicious Greek or Middle Eastern cookies, pastries (baklava, etc.), sweets, and bread and other speciality grocery items. If you're more of a European-style sweet shop aficionado and prefer napoleons, cream puffs, and similar pastries, you will find them here, too. If you are not sure, but your loved one likes sweets, trust me, you will not make a mistake by getting a small box of love here..  

Ever since we discovered this bakery, we are addicted, looking forward to the next person's birthday accompanied by a box full of Tabrizi goodies (in place of the old boring birthday cake).
My friend brought me here- I've never had Persian (Iranian) sweets before- the chickpea cookies were the most scrumptious, melt-in-your mouth cookies I have ever eaten!  Definitely addicting! I had some other cookies that were delicious and fragrant with rosewater and cardamom- so unique and tasty.  I definitely recommend people who want a lovely treat to stop by here- and enjoy the little piece of heaven!
100% Recommended.
The food is not heavy, it is clean and tasty.
I'm happy to have a nearby Chinese restaurant in the area.
The beef and broccoli, dumplings, and green beans are scrumptious. 
We have ordered the same combination every single time.
I spent a week with my wife in Boston and we found this place. We came here specifically for the spicy dishes and we loved this place! The boiled fish in chili oil was our fave. Generous portions of fish filets, super flavorful dish! We also tried a bowl of beef noodle soup. It really blew us away that somehow the taste of traditional Chinese beef noodle flavor was infused into the noodles! The broth was super tasty too! I gave this place a 5 because the good dishes we had there were truly awesome!
First, I have never been to China, but I like Chinese food and have eaten in hundreds of Chinese places from a somewhat authentic restaurant in Chinatown, New York City to a random takeout place in Anytown, USA.

The Home Place interior is not exactly something to write home about; you certainly don't want to come here for a romantic dinner. But a quick look around and at the menu, and you realize that this place is different. I am told it is authentic, and I believe it. So far I've tried a couple different dishes:  Xinjiang spicy noodles with lamb, and fish fillet with hot chili sauce, and I loved both. The fish was a bit on the greasy side (nice hot chili oil), but that's to be expected here.
They have authentic Chinese burgers so my wife had to try, and she liked them, too.

This is definitely something different, and quite tasty. If you like trying new things, here is your opportunity. And for us -- I think we found ourselves a new quick takeout.
My friends and I visited it last month! We loved it!
They have amazing food, really authentic Chinese food. Service was great! Great quality food, tastes fresh and prepared just the right way. 
Sliced Fish Fillet with Hot Chili Sauce was really flavorful. Handpulled noodles were amazing. We tried Xinjiang Spicy Noodles with Sliced Lamb and Noodles mixed with Chopped Beef. Both were great! What I can say is I will go back again soon if I live in the area!
This is not the ordinary Chinese restaurant that you find throughout the Western World. The smell, the decor, the food - everything about this restaurant reminded me of eating in restaurants in South China.  LARGE portions with amateur service but authentic food.
It was a week evening, we stopped by to have a dinner, and it was not so great. The attention was OK, but it was very fatty, and presentation was not great.  Definitely not coming back for another try.
Ordered a takeout this morning for breakfast. Got back to office only to find order was sooooooooo wrong. Ordered 2 egg whites omelette and pancakes. They gave me 2 orders of omelettes instead of 2 eggs and accused me of ordering it wrong. Then proceeded to remove the pancakes instead of the extra omelette. Included tomatoes in my omelette that was never asked for. (I have a tomatoe allergy) After being inconvenienced to driving back was rudely approached by a woman wsiting for me and she actually took all the condiments out if my bag while it was sitting on a dirty floor only to place them in my bag with correct order. Got back and no utensils to eat with!!!!!!!! Will never go back there again......
Teddy's is an unpretentious, excellent diner-style place for breakfast and lunch.  It is typically full of locals. 
A small place in Cushing Square, this seems to have a regular clientele.  It's a good place for a quick lunch.
Classic small local breakfast restaurant in Cushing Square, Belmont. Family owned and operated. Super friendly service. Great omelets and eggs. Feels like home!  Coffee isn't strong enough for me but everything else is great!
Great for families--very popular with all ages though. I get salad with chicken--and usually have to take some of the chicken home, because there's so much of it. The chicken-lemon soup is a favorite in my family, as are the hotdogs and bountiful fries. 
This is a small Greek run luncheonette that has wonderful traditional breakfast.  I stopped here after trying to find a good breakfast place and I was really happy I did.  If you like eating in a locals place this is the best in Belmont.  It appears to be a family run place and they make you feel welcome.  Where else do you get your coffee included in the price of your breakfast-I recommend for those not looking for lemon infused ricotta pancakes or some other fancy meal.
My husband ancient here our first day in town after we moved just up the street. It was good, but nothing that just blew my socks off. We will probably go there often because it is close, but will venture somewhere else to get something fantastic.
If you are looking for a quick and local place for eggs, toast and the usual breakfast fare, this works. Nothing memorable but then again nothing bad either.
The prices are reasonable and wait staff is fast.  I really enjoyed the fact the the cook knew how to cook "scrambled soft" the way it should be.  They also offered dark rye toast, which isn't an option in most of the local cafes/diners in the Belmont Watertown Waltham area.  I am so glad I tried this place and will be going back many, many more times.
Basic diner food - wicked cheap prices
Best breakfast spot.  Fast, friendly, and very reasonably priced.
solid weekend breakfast diner
Small place with only a about 10 tables and some bar seats. Fish is delicious and the service is quick. Prices are reasonable. Definitely worth it. 
We often go for lunch on a weekend with my little boys- it is great quality, fast, tasty sushi. They have a great lunch boxes, even during a weekend- includes miso soup, salad, rice, and sushi. easy parking in front with a parking meter (except Sunday). I would definitely recommend it!
The staff is so accommodating and super polite. When I go, I like to go with a group and share appetizers. The Yuzu Miso Chilean Sea Bass is buttery with a delicious slightly salty and rich glaze.The Octopus Carpaccio is silky and bright with ponzu sauce.The Yellowtail Tartar is a larger than the average portion and   is packed with gorgeous fish beautifully seasoned with a spicy sesame miso. For some drama get the Torched Toro and for a salty-sweet treat try the Beni Toro banana. 
My husband and I get sushi here all of the time.  It is so good and not overpriced.  If you live in the area, I would recommend this place.
I love this restaurant. Servers are friendly and they always greet the guests with smile and treat them well. We usually dine in Super Fusion once or twice a month and the food is always fresh and delicious. The green tea is nice you'll get refile for it too. Try the Fried Ice Cream as well it's amazing!
Fresh and delicious sushi and sashimi! Wonderful prices. Service is impeccable. Amazing restaurant! The best I have had in the Boston area.  
We normally have dinner there ones a week, food is always fresh, delicious and, very creative. Chef Sam is always happy to see us there and always coming with new dishes. Far away the best Sushi around Newton, Waltham and Watertown area. Congratulation!!!
Best wishes for this 2015!!!
Great food at reasonable prices, especially if you go with the lunch menu. Large selection sushi, sashimi and maki rolls. Good selection of appetizers and cooked entrees. The restaurant is simply decorated and service is very good.
My wife and I dined at this small restaurant on a Saturday night. It was busy but there were two open tables for four, one in the front of the restaurant and one on the side. My wife asked if we could be seated at the table on side. We were told no because there was a reservation for four coming soon.  

No problem, we sat up front. The table was actually two tables for two pushed together so I figured that if another twosome came in, they would just separate the tables a bit and seat them next to us. 

WRONG!

A few minutes later another couple walked and was seated at the table my wife asked to be seated at. Odd I thought after just being told the table was being held for four people.

We waited a while for our order to be taken which was strange given the large number of people working (or not) at such a small place. Having passed by us a half dozen times, the hostess/waitress eventually stopped and asked us if our order had been taken yet. The answer should have been obvious. Do you always leave menus sitting on the table after orders are taken?

Our order was taken and a few minutes later soup appeared.

We started eating our soup and then surprise, surprise, surprise, a group of four arrives. The hostess asked us if we would mind moving to a table for two that had freed up so that these four people could be seated immediately.

We of course obliged. We picked up our soup bowls and carried them a few feet to our new table. As we went back to get our place settings, the manager(?) came over, thanked us, and starting picking up our place settings. As part of that conversation I heard him say I will take care of you, which to me means I’ll give you a free drink or dessert or something.

The non sushi entrees we ordered were very delicious.

When we were done eating, the waitress asked if we wanted anything else.  We said no, so she disappeared The manager(?) came back with the check which was SANS any sort of accommodation. I said to my wife I thought he said he would take care of us. My wife said that her interpretation of his earlier comment was that he was going to take care of moving our place settings to the new table.

I saw little point in pursuing the point, so I paid the check and we left with me having no thoughts of returning. Too bizarre for me.
Another Watertown neighborhood spot. The sushi platter is reasonably priced and so very fresh ... if you like variety and don't mind not choosing this is a great plate. They have a lot of very interesting sushi combos as well. Service is good, the place is light and refreshing.
We love This place !!!! Delicios food, place clean,nice people,very good location,defini recomendion This place!!!
I'm not in the area anymore, but when I was, I would go here frequently. I started loving sushi because of this place. Their prices were always reasonable and I liked the "chill" atmosphere and fresh sushi. i remember loving the soup, too. 
Despite mediocre decor, cramped space, and "take order - deliver order" level of service, the sushi is so fresh, beautifully presented, and well proportioned that I just couldn't knock down the review to Very Good.  Others can legitimately argue that it should get downgraded because of those non food deficits, but when you see how beautiful a piece of salmon sushi is, for example, with the fish fully draped over the rice, you'll understand.
The sushi here is awesome quality and not expensive at all.  They are also fast (takeout or eat-in).  I usually come here when I want something no frills.  The restaurant is also a very peaceful decor - not too large either.
Friendly local sushi place with generally fresh fish. Chinese chefs make up for their lack of deep sophistication by serving HUGE portions of sashimi and large rolls catered heavily towards the American palette: mayonnaise, crispy fried components, lots of blended flavors. 

I eat here a LOT, so it is good. But if you want a step up go to New Ginza nearby, or go downtown somewhere for more authentic sushi. 
I had a slice of pizza while waiting for my veal sandwich.  Both were tasty -- though not exceptional.  I'd come back for lunch or a snack if I were in the area but I wouldn't make a special trip.  I lean toward very good instead of average because the service was very prompt.  They saw me coming in, asked me what I wanted as I was approaching the counter, immediately got the order in, and had me noshing on the pizza within 2 minutes, and the sandwich within 5.  Had I known how quickly they'd have the sandwich ready I probably wouldn't have ordered the pizza slice while I waited -- making me feel piggish.  On the other hand, the pizza was pretty damn good, and I enjoyed them both.
This Dunkin Donuts had the same offering as any other.  Prices were about comparable.  Food quality first thing in the morning was good
Sono stato in questa catena a Watertown, piccolo e grazioso centro nei pressi di Boston. Ho preso un buon caffè americano ad un prezzo molto contenuto. Il locale era molto spazioso e ci si poteva sedere comodamente senza problemi. Ho notato che si potevano consumare anche avarie bevande e panini. L'impressione generale è stata più che buona, lo consiglio!
This pizza place is great to bring kids because of the large fish tank in the middle of the seating area- great for distracting little people. As for the pizza, we have found it to be inconsistent. Sometimes great, sometimes blah. Courteous and helpful staff. 
We ordered the steak  souvlaki's.  They were absolutely delicious homemade pita tender steak delicious TZ sauce and great greek dressing.  It was mighty messy in mighty tasty a definite plus. 
This is a busy neighborhood restaurant. They have pizzas, a few pasta and various other dishes, and serve beer and wine. So there are lots of parents with their kids on Friday and Saturday nights! We placed our order at the counter and found seats (not easy). Then we had a couple of slices of pizza and two other entrees with drinks. The pizza was ok, not great yet acceptable reheated slices, but surprisingly both of the other dishes were bland. Some seasoning or even a little Parmesan would have been great... except there was no grated cheese in sight and the waitstaff was too busy running around to even ask without the food going cold first.
The pizza was great, I got the club med. it's a small gem in a hidden spot.  I went with my family of 5. Got 2 specialty pizzas, gyro, fries, sweet potato fries and drinks.  This whole meal was less than $50. The staff was extremely young, but one of the most professional staff I have seen.
The pizza is made in a special coal fired grill, but there's also a wide variety of food options, from swordfish to chicken skewers to Greek salads--a little something for everyone. It's more than just a pizza joint--it has a bar with beer on tap as well as wine choices, and has a more upscale feel than the average pizza place.
My husband and I frequent this pizza place at least once a week after dancing at Fred Astaire.  We have the same thing every time--slice of pizza, Greek salad, and wine for me, beer for him.  It has a family pub atmosphere, quick service, and good basic food.
This is a nice pizza shop in a good location. Tasty fire cooked pizza, yummy subs. Prices are in line with the area, service is friendly and quick. A nice neighborhood restaurant.
livin three blocks away, never fail chicken kabobs, salad fries. pizza from hot oven. steak bombs for the guys. meatballs or greek salad...like home cooking to me. No snob factor whatsoeva. always with the jokes. couplea beers , glass of cheap wine. heaven afterva long day's work. solid.
We often order from Mark & Tonis (formerly called Brothers. The pizza and subs are great and I especially like the thin crust. The delivery on the weekends and weeknights is fast - they don't deliver on weekdays.
I am so disappointed that Mark And Toni's basically replaced Brothers. We miss the old pizza, and the old prices! The pizza here is "fancy" which means, super thin crust, almost no cheese and a couple of whole tomatoes, skin and all, smashed all together. But don't forget the 1-inch layer of coal on the bottom (scrape it off)...
With an environment that says "relax," we have been thrilled to have Mark & Toni's in Belmont! Ask for anything and you'll get it with deliciousness for a great value. We love how friendly everyone is...like it's your neighborhood gathering spot. Unlike Panera, they bring your food and clear. We'll keep going back!!
My husband summed up our visit in one word:  mediocre.  We did appreciate the ice cold beer on tap.  The loud teenagers hanging out in the corner booth burping and smoking right outside of the front door were less appreciated.  I guess that's what happens on Friday night, though.  Oddly enough, the leftover pizza tasted better cold out of the fridge the next day.
The pizza at Brother's is the best in town, but also the most expensive.  The use good ingredients and distribute the topping evenly and close to the edge.  They have a fancy oven with a conveyor belt that cook the pizza consistently.  

The downside is that they do not deliver.

I came twice now that I have moved to the area and I really like Vicki Lee's, especially for a sit down brunch kind of meal. Good location, and a solid set of breakfast menu items. I also really like the coffee.

For pure pastries, I recommend going to KoKo Bakery in Newton -- they are real pros in the pastry department.
Consistently great food and service. I just love this place and even had them cater my sons graduation party. Our favorite is the chicken tarragon sandwhich and the quiche.
Vicki Lee's appears to have a thriving catering business. Their retail restaurant was also plenty busy today, though. The setting is clean, light, and pleasant, but seating is limited, and acoustics are rather poor. This meant that it was difficult to conduct a conversation, and on top of that, the music on the PA system was a tad too loud (even after we requested that the volume be turned down a bit). All of that having been said, the food is very, very good! The menu is varied enough so there's something for everyone, and the food is presented professionally, with solid attention to appearance. Service is fine. The general tone of the place is upscale, and both the menu items and the prices reflect that. But I return to a key theme: the food is very, very good! 
Just tremendous baked goods and so much else.  Placed a fairly large order for several different kinds of pastries and little cakes for a church reception.  Order was ready when promised, but I had some difficulty picking it up because one of what my late father called "big hat ladies" was so self-entitled that she felt it would be ok to butt in line and get her order first.  Other women will know how to deal with this type, very common at this pricey but high end place.  Guys?  Just grin and bear it, and wear your flak jacket.  They have sharp elbows.
Very comfortable place to be in. Lovely staff, great service, great food, and especially the coffee! Bravo, Vicki! You are running it with so much grace and elegance!
Thanks for the hospitality and the amazing fresh food you offer.
Delicious gourmet lunch or brunch dishes in a pleasant small setting. The sandwiches, salads, and chicken or fish entrees, are all good. Their cookies, pies, scones, and other treats are special and yummy. All available for take out too.
Stumbled onto Vicki Lee's while on a walk with my kids one Saturday. We took a few desserts to go, and everything was excellent. We look forward to going back to try more.
This place is to die for! It is right around the corner for the store I work at and I am there at least two times a week indulging in their wonderful confections.
If you want only very good food and drink try this place. Her coffee is wonderful and all the food is wonderful. Place is small but comfortable. Try her take out if time matters.
We had a birthday cake from there today. May I say it melted in my mouth?  Highly recommended!  See happy faces!
Ms. Lee bakes some very tasty treats.  The coffees here are also quite good.  They do a very nice weekend brunch and the service and prices are reasonable.  
Was at a private party and enjoyed a wide variety of appetisers as well as several nice options for dinner. 
Vicki Lee's is an inviting small cafe, great for breakfast, lunch, and takeout of fresh, nutritious, appetizing food.  The sweets are terrific.  And Vicki Lee herself is a warm ambassador.
This is a go to spot for breakfast or lunch with friends or business clients. Sunday brunch is delicious too. The menu always has local fresh food with imaginative dishes.

We've had special family gatherings here and requested special cakes which are fabulous!  I have also attended private evening gatherings in this lovely space.

They also offer weekly entrees for take out which are all delicious and listed on their website each week.

It is a small cafe and have made reservations however, I've always been accomodated if we've walked in.
Vickie Lee has some of the best food available. You have a nice atmosphere, great selection and delicious food and desserts fit for a king. Once you visit you find yourself returning often.
We found this place by mistake, but we are so glad we did. We have taken our toddler but it's really a nice place for friends too. Everything we've had is delicious. We love brunch on the weekends. Their waffles and sandwiches we great.
Looking for a birthday cake? Or any cake to celebrate?  Vicki Lee's was amazing.  Very hard to find a great bakery with yummy cake around Boston and Vicki Lee's was a find.
Vicki Lee's has mouth-watering desserts and delightful coffees and teas--but also offers home-made granola for breakfast, and lovely lunches. A bit noisy and crowded during high-peak hours, but a great place to get special goodies to give as gifts. It isn't cheap, but is worth the price. Vicki-Lee also does AMAZING catering--have had her cater a couple of parties, and the results were awesome!
The tempting delights in the bakery case would make a perfect treat for anytime.  We ordered the fish tacos (daily special) with field greens salad, and the double crab cake also served with field greens.  The fish tacos were excellent, served with perfectly spiced slaw in a browned soft tortilla.  The crab cakes had a deliciously crispy panko crust.  My latte was tasty but could have been hotter.  The limited seating in Vicki Lee's often results in lines so arrive early or plan to wait a bit.  The food was worth our 10-15 minute wait.
The food is good enough that I've been back several times, usually for lunch with friends, and the decor is attractive and fresh, making great use of the natural light that floods into the space, but I'm always disappointed by the service which fluctuates between sloppy and rude, and over officious and intrusive. I'll almost certainly go again, but I'll always have that slight hesitation. I particularly recommend the soups and salads, and my daughter was in heaven with the vlb grilled cheese with Gruyere and caramelized onions.
The best breakfast. Grand slam is incredible. It includes eggs, bacon, sausage, hash browns with pancakes or French toast. Also order an order of their scali bread toast. Wait staff friendly and fast. Always their to top off your coffee.
This is my favorite diner in Watertown. It truly feels like a NY/NJ diner and the food is on par with that promise and being from NY, I know what I'm talking about. I grew up with diners! It's packed every weekend for breakfast/brunch so go early! 
Live close by, so decided to use our gift c. From restaurant.com, spend 20.  Get 10 off! So one free. My husband ordered steak & eggs, I got the eggs, bacon& pancake special , waitress friendly food good, the only suggestion would be to give the fans & under stools a good clean!  Dust hanging from the fans, & front door needs a. Clean up, not much curb appeal, 
Nice little place. Had ham and eggs. Done perfectly. Friendly, attentive service and good prices. Great local breakfast place!
When visiting Boston the New Yorker for breakfast/brunch is a must for us.  Discovered this gem about 8 years ago and glad to say since then nothing has changed.  Excellent service, wonderful atomosphere and to top it all off plenty of lovely food at a great price.  LOVE IT!
New Yorker Diner is the local version of an IHop. We find the food is much better and the service is great. Open late night, so a good stop after you had a few drinks.
Best for late night coffee and snacks. Great crowd
I really like this place, good service, great prices but I am really put off by the seating.  They really need to get  their ripped seats fixed before I go back
Walked into a diner where everyone seemed to know each other but didn't feel like an outsider. I remember that more than the food, but it's worth saying, especially if you're not a fan of some of the over the shoulder talk at Deluxe Town Diner.
Great Breakfast!
My experience is with Sunday breakfast - this place has the best mushroom and cheese omelettes we have had - thin layer of eggs with cheese and mushrooms. The standard! Also the scali bread toast is wonderful. Simple choices for breakfast and a fairly narrow menu. The decor is typical of a diner - simple and plain. Service is friendly and the breakfast food suits perfectly.

Authentique diner ! Nous avons pris notre premier brunch aux US. Essayez The Grand Slam et repartez le ventre plein pour la journée !
I was there for take out lunch. They have a few tables to eat but this is for intends and purposes a fast food (food served in Styrofoam-like containers). 
I purchased a lamb kebab plate with one falafel. The lamb was cooked perfectly and the rice was tasty. I frankly found the falafel dry but the hummus was very good. Never mind, the salad, it's there just for show. Service was slow for some kind of fast food but very friendly and courteous.

I paid just over $17 for my take out (it was not a surprise ad prices were posted). This may be right for Belmont businesses but I get the same quality in Boston for around $10/$11. I wouldn't mind going back but I will surely look for alternatives first.
Rude owner instructed staff to serve wrong items.
Drive to down Belmont street or to Watertown and you will find larger variety of food, fresher and served by better staff.
Would not recommend.
There were 4 of us and we were welcomed in and they told us to sit anywhere.  They were very friendly.  We didn't know what we all wanted.  Everyone had an idea of what they wanted so the waitress came over to tell us that actually, they don't wait on tables but no one was there so they talked to my husband and said they would be gladly to make up a plate of different items that we were interested in.  They couldn't be more friendlier.  The service was outstanding but the food was just ok.  I guess if I was in the neighborhood I might go in.  I wouldn't make a special trip.
ANI's is our go-to for middle eastern food in the Watertown/Belmont area - and that's saying A LOT b/c there's an Armenian restaurant on every corner. Ani's has the best falafel, not try at all. Their homemade hummus is amazing, and everything you get there is packed with flavor and cooked perfectly. 
A very nice place, falafel, kibbeh, chicken wraps and other typical Mediterranean foods. It is small but there was space when we went for lunch. The prices are good and the service is fast. 
Anis is a tasty neighborhood takeaway restaurant, serving dishes such as Falafel, Kebabs, Lamejunes, Hummus, Tabouleh. They are a catering company that offers takeaway food, and also a new dining room as well as sidewalk tables outside. No alchohol is served, but they have juices and sodas to complement your meal. Easy and low key, not too fancy but the food is very tasty.
We were hungry after touring and visiting Boston. Staff were quick and polite. Food was nice and warm.
The only thing we seen was staff was a little confused on who order what, but they would not pass the food over till they got it right so nobody gets anything somebody else touched.
Our kids have this place on speed dial - we seem to order from them every week.   The food is not the greatest (although the kids think it is), but is good and certainly good enough, especially for what you pay.  The service is good and the food always arrives on time.
What do you expect--it's a Domino's.  People are very nice and friendly.  Pizza was ok, basically what you would expect from Domino's.
My hotel was just beside (street to cross)the restaurant.so after a long day in downtown Boston and a game at Fenway,  we arrived late in our room and just have to order a pizza for take out. They could also delivered in your room , if you prefer.good selections of pizza.
Pizza excellente à prix correcte avec service sympa et rapide. Juste en face de l'hôtel Super 8 ce qui est pratique
Aufgekochtes fertigessen, wabbelige Pizza mit Instant Soße, cheesesteak war nicht genießbar, so auch das chicken Sandwich. Dazu noch gesalzene Preise. Das ist selbst für fast Food nicht akzeptabel
Un' oasi nel deserto. Proprio di fronte al nostro albergo. Qui potrete mangiare la classica pizza americana da fast food.
Ho mangiato in questo locale 2 panini vegetariani, cioè con dentro solamente delle verdure, ed erano molto buoni. Il prezzo era nella media ed era molto comodo perché vicino all'hotel dove alloggiavo.
This is a Marblehead institution.  We go there for convenient dinners from time to time.  The prepared foods are good, but a bit expensive relative even to higher priced grocery stores like Whole Foods.  Nonetheless, we support them because they enhance the overall dining scene in town.  They are particularly great (and without peer) if you are looking for sandwiches and/or custom salads in Marblehead.  We use them a lot for picnics.  I can't recommend them highly enough for these purposes.
Great quality and nice people that own and run it in this combination take-out and sit down shop. Everything is fresh and sandwiches, etc made to order. Nice local place with great gift, kitchen and alcohol selections. Alcohol is not served though.
We were driving through the area sightseeing and decided to stop and get a bite.  We never expected what happened next.  At the food case for fresh entrees and sides was an array of delicious meats, seafood, chicken, and vegetables, I could go on and on.....There were 6 of us and we each chose 2 items and shared at our table.  Some of the items we ordered were the pepper crusted tuna, crab cakes, roasted cauliflower, grilled flank steak.  It was a wonderful lunch that we were not expecting.  The staff was wonderful and we even visited with the owner.  Next time I get back to the east coast/Boston area I plan to drive up the north coast and have lunch again.
Shubies is great for lunch, grabbing a few unique local pre-made food - interesting ice creams too!  They have a terrific wine selection with a very knowledgable staff.  Then they have a bakery and deli!  Soooo GOOD!  And they have a nice kitchen gifts section. 
I love the prepared foods here- and they make amazing sandwiches.  The grocery and wine department are stocked with top products.  I usually spend at least an hour shopping here.  They also carry unique gifts and unusual candles.  Shubie's is just a great little spot.  The dine-in area is small and simple- We typically take everything home or out for a picnic.  If you are in Marblehead- this is a must go if you are a foodie.
Beautiful store, great selection of interesting products and wines. Staff is (mostly) friendly and customer service-oriented. My only gripe is the prices, which range from slightly over-priced to outrageously expensive (some wines that are $15 elsewhere might be $20 at Shubies for ex.) But Marbleheaders seem to be able to afford it, and they do have some "bargain" wines, 2 for $20, etc., and the deli counter prices are in line w/Whole Foods prices.
Shubies is a Gourmet Food and Liquor Institution in Marblehead..and has been for the past 25 plus years that I have lived in this illustrious "birthplace of the American Navy"....I remember when Shubies was in the smaller space on Atlantic Ave. that is now West Marine...I saw that Carol Shube was encouraging a broader selection of gourmet foods and items even back then, and George was doing tastings and detailed looks into wines and spirits.
Today they have expanded into a full-service Gourmet with large variety of Cheeses and  Crackers,Pastas and hard to find items. I particularly like the emphasis on locally produced items.
The salads and prepared foods are better than Whole Paycheck, in my opinion.There are nice tables and a social place at lunchtime and Saturdays.
George and his staff are very knowledgable about their wine and spirits selections. I am also subscribed to their newsletter,which has specials and tidbits of information.
If its jus rock-bottom price you are looking for...then some of the very large liquor outlets have Shubies beat..by a small margin.  I feel the service and ambience and varied selections are unparalleled in the North Shore.
Nice for the wealthy. Food is so overpriced! Good variety with lots of samples. If you are looking to buy and don't care about how much you are paying then this is the place for you. 
Outstanding deli foods prepared on site with wide variety of cheeses, meats and prepared dishes. Always samples on hand. Sandwiches generous and delicious. Pastries beautifully done in French style.  Good assortment of fine wines. Some neat household goods. Expect however to pay a little more for the quality. 
Great wine and food selections.  Fabulous food, eclectic and wonderful.  You will not fine cheeses and dips and crackers and the like anywhere else.  Great afternoon freebie samples.  Don't miss this experience.
Shubies is a gourmet food and gift shop. We often take out for dinner. Delicious entrees, including several vegetarian offerings, an assortment of sides and salads and a great salad bar, soups , sandwiches and great desserts, Shubies has it all along with a great assortment of wine.
Wonderful wine selection. Unusual wines you might not find elsewhere. Helpful staff to pick just the right wine. Foods can be pricey but there's something for everyone.
Enjoyed a quick lunch from an expansive deli counter. The food was displayed beautifully making it difficult (in a good) to pick only a few items. Fun! To my delight they have many GF selections in main dishes, side dishes and deserts. Every item we selected was delicious. Try the watermelon feta salad- refreshingly complex.  
Wished I'd found this earlier in my trip - healthy to-go foods - think Whole Foods tucked into the corner of this quaint New England town. Remarkable selection for vegetarians as well as meat lovers.
Great wine store helpful people and the offering of small pieces of cheese for sale is a marketing marvel! On the other hand you might try cheeses that you would not otherwise try. Wish we had this store near our home in PA
If you are considering a picnic, ior a meal away from a restaurant, Shubie's should fill the bill. They have a range of veg and chicken and meat sandwiches -- large ones, suitablefor an informal dinner. The wine selection is very good, and selected with an eye to the inexpensive. We were well satisfied with our choice.
Can a grocery market be superb?  Yes when you combine everything yummy under one roof.  Delicious ready made organic foods, custom sandwich and salad bar, fine wines, coffee and dessert bar, all the ingredients to prepare any fabulous chefs meal, and a wonderful collection of unique gifts.  

Best part is that they delivered our picnic dinner to the MHI so we could enjoy the sunset over the harbor.  

Try the tuna melt please, staff is friendly and the clam showder is also good. Comeback soon for a second attack
Shubies is my local go-to for a GF comfort food lunch. Chicken soup, grilled cheese sandwich, and fudge brownie are usually available and always yummy. Eat-in or take-out. Oh, yeah! There's the fabulous prepared food section, wine department, and bakery.
I have been going to Shubie's for over 30 years and it only gets better.  This is a family run business with carefully selected products that are unique and elite and their own food creations are simple but elegant.
ThaiMarket consistently over delivers.  The Pad Thai and Masaman Chicken are excellent choices.  Many gluten free options.  Service has been excellent.   They also have take out service, usually order is ready in about 15 minutes.  
I've worked about a block from this place for 11 years but never would have noticed it if not for a local with knowledge of the place. The owner/ server/ hostess and her husband/ cook were the only workers. There was only one other party when we visited. The decor is clean, cute plants on each table. The lunch specials ranged $10-11 and included an entree with choice soup or salad. Appetizers were $4-7.  A carafe of lemon water was complimentary. A full bar was also available. The restaurant was a bit warm with open screen door and fan but no ac.
This was my first time having Thai. I tried the house special drunken chicken with salad and spring rolls while my dining companion had the soup, pineapple shrimp fried rice with cashews and shrimp with shrimp wrappers appetizer. The hostess had my meal made mild as it was my first time. It was still a bit spicy but not overwhelming. The vegetables and white meat chicken were lightly coated in sauce and it was a very fresh tasty dish. The rice and shrimp dish also got rave reviews. We will definitely be back. I would highly recommend.
Very nice staff and good Thai food without having to drive too far. The tom ka gai  soup was so good, we had to order more. All dishes were made to order, and they were very good about customizing ingredients and spices (how spicy/hot). We ate in, and had no problem with speed of service or for being delivered.
We've been here a couple of times, and it seems to be getting worse. The prices are high for small portions, and the taste is average (some really good, and others bad). Our Crispy Tamarind Duck was mostly dry and tough. The menu said "with vegetables", but all we got was garnish. Our curry dish was alright - nothing special. The 3 Curry Puffs (appetizer) were tiny (for a ridiculous $6), but maybe the most tasty item of the meal. Service was slow, but pleasant.
This is one of the best Thai restaurants on the North Shore.  The food is consistent and often made with fresh local in season vegetables.  They have one of the best calamari appetizers I have every had. 
Thai Market should be on everyones list to try if you want  fabulous Thai food prepared by a knowlegable chef/owner. We normally order their food to go, but have enjoyed a dinner or two there.  We just finished eating the best Tamarind Duck we have ever had! Their daughter took our " to-go"  order and suggested a delicious Poached Salmon in a sweet sauce with beautifully prepared vegetables. What a great suggestion! The Pad Thai is also our favorite here.
It is a family run business and they couldn't be nicer.
We ordered to go food from this restaurant tonight. They got the order perfect. The food was very good. It was on time. This Thai restaurant is very good and my family recommends it.
The Thai Market is one of my go to restaurants in Marblehead. The Thai family that runs the restaurant is fantastic and the husband is a very talented chef. I go here regularly and always try different dishes. I havent been disappointed with one yet. 

They seem to have difficulty maintaining staff so if you eat at the restaurant the service could be a bit lacking unless the wife is working. We mostly go there for take out but we like to eat there every once and awhile to chat with the friendly family owners and their daughter.

You can't go wrong with their food! I am going to try to talk then into running cooking lessons :)
I ordered the drunken man noodle dinner and it was so spicy I couldn't eat it. I've had this at other places it was only mildly spicy. But i could not eat this, my mouth was on fire. They were nice about it and made me another dish that was less spicy, but the service took forever, and there was no one else in the place. Disappointing experience.
Great place, plenty of parking.

If you like Thai food, this is some of the best around north shore.

Menu was great, staff was very nice, and friendly.
I love Thai food and I had the freshest spring rolls I have ever had here.  I ordered take-out and the delivery man was not your typical delivery guy.  He was a well dressed older Thai gentleman and a nice car.  He was so smiley and polite and on time.  He seemed so surprised when I gave him a tip.

They did forget to include the soup I ordered which I didn't realized until after he left.  Luckily I wasn't charged for it and the we had enough to eat with what we got.

I think the prices are quite high and the portions are not large.  They are good sized but not large.  The sauces were scrumptious and as I said the spring rolls divine!  My only complaints are the prices and the fact they forgot to include my soup.  We will definitely go back again and again and again!!!!
Everything I have tried from this newer restaurant in town has been excellent.  The service can be a little spotty since much of business is carryout, and the wine menu is unpredictable, but the food is the star.
Arrived in Marblehead, for the first time, late at night and hungry after a transatlantic flight. Dived into ThaiMarket for a take-out. Wife and I were delighted, delicious food (green curry), reminiscent of the real thing. Have been back since and would wholeheartedly recommend.
The reviews are in and this new spot is fabulous. We do take-out and really enjoy the quality and service all around. The fish specials are great paired with fresh vegetables and spicy! 
As an Asian food junkie I can say Thai Market is outstanding.  The abundance of vegetables served on the meals, and surprisingly in soups too, is unmatched anywhere.  I mean like 7 vegetables in a tofu or chicken dish...and not always the same.  Expect things like onions, carrots brocoli, chinese cabbage and greens, squash, boc choy, pea pods, bamboo shoots and even on occasion a slice of lotus root too.  All vegetables are sliced with expertise-no handfuls of green beans just heaved in, here they are carefully juliened and there is never too much of any one thing.  Lovely flavorful sheer sauces, some very spicy if you like it that way.  No liquor license yet but it's worth it.  Order a variety of things and share.  Lunches are an amazing deal, most at $8 and include a delicious soup.  This restaurant needs to be patronized now to reward the owners for their extraordinary efforts.  Be patient, your food will be prepared just for you.
there is no liquor licence yet but it is worth checking out . 
comfortable dining atmosphere .
I have enjoyed coming to Terry's for years and think Richardson's ice cream is very good. Usually I get a "small" which typically comes with two scoops as their sign's graphic depicts. However, not only was my serving noticeably smaller than before, but what they advertised as a second scoop was perhaps the equivalent of a teaspoon. When I showed the server and asked if she called that a "scoop" she said "yes." I am wondering if ownership has changed.
This spot is pretty popular with kids, but I saw lots of adults there too. Fruit Smoothies were a hot choice.
Excellent ice-cream, the shop is done out in an old fashioned 50's style, I had ice-cream and my husband had frozen yogurt both of which was great.
We love visiting Terry's Ice Cream and have done so for years! Their ice cream and frozen yogurt offerings are plentiful and delicious. 
Although the ice cream offers all kinds of toppings and varieties, it's really same old, same old, ahd mediocre at best.  That said, if you happen to be 14, or thereabouts, it's a great, local hangout on a hot summer night.
Local flavor, local owner.  A popular spot for ice cream for all ages.  Really nice service and old time atmosphere.  Convenient location right on Atlantic Ave.
Excellent ice cream treats and service!!  I couldn't live without this place! You must get Almond Joy!
Everyone has their favorite ice cream haunt and this is ours! Terry's serves Richardson's Dairy ice cream which is local, fresh and about the creamiest around! Servings are large and the topping selection is good. I wish the owner would focus on the store though, and get out of his ice cream truck a little more. the staff is usually overwhelmed and unenthusiastic. We think it is the norm now to see how miserable the help will be on our weekly visits. The amount of off the wall offerings is enough to make any employee jump ship! Would you like a cannoli stuffed by a 16 year old scooper with a line out the door? or maybe Rich's slush which is kept out back because there is no room out front. Or maybe they should invest in spellcheck and spell banana correctly. Harsh, but things any owner should listen to if they care. But, luckily for Richardson's we'll keep returning!!
What a nostalgic ice cream shop, decorated in a 1950s theme right in the heart of downtown Marblehead with the absolute best ice cream around and a wonderful selection of toppings.  Don't miss the warm cookie dough topping!  Service is always warm and friendly, and the prices are great!!!  Not to be missed.
Terry's  has the atmosphere of an old fashioned ice cream parlor with black & white tiles on the floor, metal seats with red cushions, & great ice cream.
The title says it all.  The vanilla soft serve with giant heaping spoonfuls of melty, gooey chocolate cookie dough topping is, quite literally, unbelievable.  Beyond that, though, the ice cream here is fairly mediocre compared to other places on the North Shore that make their own.
Perhaps this is a go to for locals because they would care less about visitors. Waited half hour to sit. Went to sit the rude waitress said I'm MORE concerned about the two guys that have been waiting ... they came in 20 minutes after us !!!!! She then dropped a cup when picking up a table proceeded to kick it across the floor completely unprofessional and she stated
" whatever " was how she felt today. 
Then she threw our creamer and straws on the table.  
I have never in my life NOT left a tip today is a FIRST that in itself speaks volumes.
Went here because of reviews on trip advisor. They only serve breakfast and lunch, they are not open for supper. But they do a excellent job at breakfast at a fair price. I had eggs, sausage, pancakes with coffee included for 8 dollars and the wife chose same breakfast but had home fries in place of pancakes. The food was very good and the service was excellent. This is a small local restaurant with a major following from the locals. Lol seams like we was the only out of towners in the place when we ate, as everyone was talking and calling each other by name, even the waitress greeted everyone by name and would ask if they wanted their usual. When we return to area, this will be the only place we eat breakfast
We had wonderful memories of this place after our last visit a few years ago, but this time the food was only average.  The atmosphere is still authentically funky, and the location is great, though, so it's still worth a visit as long as your expectations are not too high. The only thing I recommend NOT ordering are the potatoes that come with an egg breakfast - they were pretty nasty!
Have lunch and breakfast here fairly regularly.  Very busy in season.  Food and atmosphere make it a good place for visitors to rub shoulders with true old timers from town.  Very quaint building and small inside.  Fast service and quality food.
Had been here about 10 years ago and nothing has changed - guess that could be good or bad! Still a small, rustic house with open windows and fans for cooling on this hot day. Tight seating but found a table before the crowds started to arrive. Good, basic breakfast for us: omelets, potatoes, toast, bacon, coffee, even juice included. Just what we wanted, served hot and fresh. Two of us ate for $20, including tip. Not bad at all for this handy spot next to the water (not facing the water, though).
You know you are in New England when you come across such an authentic greasy spoon as "driftwood"

This place will take you back to the analog world, before technology was invented.  This place caters to locals, most are avid fisherman.

Don't bring your cell phone, it's forbidden!
Tiny little cottage with a long line of hungry people waiting to get inside. It is worth the wait, the food is good local breakfast  and the  waitresses really work hard to get everybody their coffee and food quickly. The corn beef hash is a must – one of the best I have ever had. The hash is great paired with the fluffy scrambled eggs.  We ate there  3 mornings in a row. 
Walked to this local place one morning and thankful to arrive before the crowd started to line up waiting for a table. Yummy yummy blueberry pancakes although my companion said the same thing about the apple pancakes which resembled a Dutch baby apple in taste. Definitely worth a repeat visit.
The last day of our vacation we decided to eat at the local dinner.  It was recommended to us by some residents of Marblehead.  It is definitely your local dinner in look and value.  Great food at a very reasonable price. 
The best breakfast in Marblehead hands down. One waitress covers the entire restaurant.
I have never seen anyone move as fast as she does serving people. Great hash with poached eggs.best value on the north shore.
We ate on Saturday morning.  The place was full of locals: families on their way to little league baseball and old timers catching up on the news of the week.  

It is a small place and only accepts CASH.  They offer basic breakfast fare at a very good price.
For some reason we can't understand. Ordinary food at best. Friendly staff and fast service. Good prices, even. Your omelet is made using non-dairy creamer (ugh!) and the onions in mine were not cooked. The rye toast was good though. I have been twice and was disappointed both times. It is a tradition here, for some reason, and the locals seem to love it.
My wife and I had breakfast the two mornings we were in Marblehead and really enjoyed the friendly staff and great food. The first day we ate early and were glad we had as it was a Sunday and when we walked by at about 9:00 following a walk there were 6-8 people waiting outside to be seated. This appears to be local favorite for breakfast and lunch.
Great place to go for breakfast. Lots of locals here to learn about what's happening in Marblehead. Fairly typical diner offerings. Seating is relatively limited so choose your timing accordingly.
The Driftwood serves breakfast all day, but closes at 2:00 so be sure to get there early. It is a sweet small cafe; staff are lovely and the food is very good.
This is a must try for breakfast and many agree because often people will be lined up waiting for a classic American breakfast.


Nothing special but then again that may be its charm.  The Driftwood is for locals and you can tell.  Its like home.  Comfy. Reliable.
The food was just decent. Popular with the locals, but the place was filthy.   The space is small, no ambiance as some small diners and there is a good chance you will be seated practically on top of other people. It was very noisy when we were there.   There are no booths, just tables crammed into the a small space. 
If you want to have a conversation with someone easily then I would say stay away.
Stopped by the driftwood last week with a guest from Oregon.  He liked the local flavor and we both had eggs and blueberry pancakes.  The pancakes were done very well and that says a lot about a breakfast place.  This place is small so there is generally a wait for space but it was a cold winter morning and we got a seat right away but the restaurant filled up fast.
They serve breakfast all day. Simple choices; omelettes, eggs any style, French toast, pancakes, choice of meat and bread. CASH ONLY. Very pleasant wait staff, quick service. Try the banana pancakes, yummy. Reasonable prices
Mino's is one of those places that has been serving roast beef for years and into the decades.  A marblehead tradition for after schoolers , families and tourists.  The food is fast , good and affordable.  They provide sit down and array of some other dishes.  Ask one of the owners about Crete
I was in town for a class reunion and had to have lunch at Minos. I had not been there in over twenty years and it did not disappoint.I had the chicken fingers and my friend had the steak and cheese. Mine was yummy and so was hers. 
The food was tasty. I love the roast beef sandwiches and Greek salads. The line gets long at lunch time. If you call ahead it will be ready when you arrive. 
A wide selection of foods beyond Roast Beef.  The new owner is outgoing and friendly and eager to please.  The hamburgers are delicious as well and salads a healthy option. 
This place has been in Marblehead forever.  Huge selection of sandwiches, subs, and pizza.  Get a roast beef sandwich here and you will NOT ask "where's the beef?"
Best roast beef sandwiches done to perfection but also great chicken kebabs and salads.  Good prices and enough tables for families with kids.  Also have pizza and burgers.
My husband always makes a stop at Minos when we are in town. The beef is flavorful adn the bread is yummy. They make other sandwiches as well and have a pretty big variety of eats for a such a small place. It's a hangout for the teens. Get your food to go.
Just love it!
Great take out and eat in joint for lunch a dinner.
I've getting food here for years - best fries in town.
The sandwiches were big, the roast beef sliced nice and thin and tender and not overcooked.  The service was fantastic and the onion rings were to die for!  If you are in the area and don't get a roast beef sandwich here, you haven't lived the dream.
2 juniors sauce cheese and mayo.  I have been ordering them for as long as I can remember.  It was a place to be seen when I was in high school 30 years ago.  The pizza is good and the salads are fresh.
One of the town's old standbys; everyone in this town likes Minos! There's a full lunch menu, take out and delightful owners. 
Small place with nice people. Good roast beef sandwich.  Chicken kabob salad is good. Give this place a try, you will like it
I love this place!  They offer a choice of cones or dishes of frozen yogurt in a wide range of flavors and toppings.  The prices are also very reasonable.
It tasted good, but the sugar- free chocolate flavor was very runny - not frozen. Maybe their freezer needs adjusting? It is a busy spot.
I like the variety of flavors and the toppings to choose from.  I can go light or I can go heavy.  The price is all based on your size.  The Marblehead franchise will not disappoint.
The kids had a great time choosing their flavors and every scoop of toppings I could feel my money flowing out of my wallet. Clean and friendly but expensive.
Nice wait staff, very clean, and always lots of choices for flavors.  A great place to hang out regardless if its afternoon or evening.
Too expensive!  This is a weigh your food yogurt spot and even though there are a ton of flavor options and topping options, be prepared to take out a mortgage to pay for what is considered an ice cream sundae sized dessert.  Seems excessive.  Flavor is mediocre compared to ice cream.  Not a fan.
The Orange Leaf is   a very well runned business. All it takes is ONE person to run it. All is self serve and the kids love that . They are able to serve the soft frozen yoguart themselves and take as much as they want . It's great
Perhaps it's just me - the kids like it ... but it really adds up once they fill their cup with soft yogurt, then stuff candy on top, weigh it, and WOW!
One in awhie I slip out of my office to sneak over for some sweetness at Orange Leaf.    The yogert and toppings are good, but overall, a little expensive.  The shop is kept emaculate --- so the tables and counters are never sticky.   The shop is inviting and lively and the help attentive.    
Thank goodness we dont have this in England!!! I sampled this twice in Marblehead, having had the first one, I actually waited for the shop to open on the second occasion.

We dont have this concept in England...you get your pot and you pour your own ice from the various taps, then you choose and put on your own toppings.  The price is according to how much your pot weighs at the till!!!  Be careful, it is easy to get carried away.

I loved Chocolate ice, Pinapple Ice, with Reese's pieces, chocolate chips, mango flavoured flavour bubbles (not sure what they are called but they look like giant salmon caviar)..you pop them in your mouth...wow!  And then chocolate sauce on top. Oh my......

And the young lady who served me both days was charming too.
The yogurt and choice is one of the best in the area. Price is a bit high unless of course your good at limiting your extras
A small oasis for treating the kids in a delightful seaside village which dates from the 1600s.  A bit pricy but this upscale village can afford it.  Atmosphere is simple and the high schoolers who work there are always friendly. 
Ok, it's frozen yogurt.  Simple and good with a great selection and a ample topping bar that has always been clean and fully stocked no matter the crowd on the several occasions I have stopped by.  Staffed by a young crowd this is a fun place to stop by and make a yogurt sundae with no over the top expectations.  Dairy Queen was never the best ice cream but I had a blast stopping by as a kid and imagine this is just as much fun if not more, (you can sample anything and make your own..no matter how big or with how many flavors you like) for any child old enough to be let loose at a frozen yogurt bar.  Go for the experience and enjoy good frozen yogurt!  I love the mango and coffee and the berries are always fresh and delicious, and I love that they Butterfinger and Oreo toppings are alway very crunchy!  Staff is so friendly and always ready to serve up samples or help with anything.  Have taken my my niece here and she LOVES it! Can't wait to go again and again!  Winter or summer!
Passed by many times, was intrigued by the interior and crowds when it first opened. But on night we went --we were the only ones there (it was winter, but it seemed really weird). Thought it was expensive and the yogurt was only so so. The toppings were fun. But, I didn't finish mine because I really didn't like the yogurt.
Not worth the $$.
The title says it all. But here's a tip, I WANT TO SAMPLE ON MY OWN LIKE AT ZINGA! The store was larger than others and clean, but the yogurt was lacking in flavor and substance. We found ourselves. Hungry before we even got home!
Idéale pour manger un frozen yogurt, les enfants adorent les différents parfums et les choix de topping.
Des sorbets "sugar free" pour ceux qui font attention  à leurs lignes.

Accueil sympathique et salle un peu petite mais agréable pour faire un pause.
Mais do que a comida o local convida a curtir a atmosfera de Marblehead, cidadezinha centenária cheia de história para contar. Vista linda sobre o mar, pescadores, movimento de barcos e com o lindo dia sobre a baia com o sol esquentando o mês de outubro foi maravilhoso! Curtimos e aproveitamos para comer lagosta, típico do local! Muto bom, aconselho!
A lovely way to experience Marblehead Harbor -- very popular and casual --obviously a favorite local restaurant
I returned to Marblehead for a high school reunion, and had lunch here with a friend I had not seen in 50 years last month.  We told the waitress the situation, and she promised the "best lobster rolls ever".  And, she delivered!  No fillers in these rolls -- just lobster!  This fun restaurant sits on the public wharf (landing).  It has outside seating, and inside seating with fine picture windows.
We always enjoy dining at The Landing and seems to reorder our favorite meals, but seafood and a lovely view! You can't go wrong !
We were staying at a B&B nearby and had looked this place uo ahead of time...on the water gorgeous!  By the time we got there is was dreary, dark, and rainy.  We still went even though you couldn't see much. Food was good.  I had the delmonico steak and my husband had the burger and lobster combo.  Server was nice and checked back several times.  They even lit the heaters outside so a couple that requested to sit out there could.    There was a wedding rehearsal dinner going on, but they kept it in the middle of the restaurant and had other patrons sit on the outside. Only down side is parking, but they actually have a lot...the whole area is street parking and many one ways and no parking area.  We drive around for 15 frustrating mins in the dark trying to find a parking space.  
Since moving to Marblehead over twenty years ago my wife and I have found The Landing to be our "go to" in-town eating establishment.

What keeps us coming back are the consistent quality of the food overall, the freshness of the locally sourced seafood items, the friendly staff and atmosphere as well as the beautiful waterfront views, especially when it is warm enough to eat on the outside deck right on the water.

The "lobstah" Mac and Cheese is a highlight but the seafood selections, including daily specials, are what sets it apart. 

Try to get there early as the parking lot is on the smallish side and the adjacent street parking somewhat limited - but these streets after all date back to the 1640's when the colorful rebel Marblehead fisherman broke away from the equally historic town of Salem, the "witch city".
Our server was awesome, he was attentive, nice, and that made the whole experience better.  The food was good, I had the haddock and my husband the lobster roll and soup.  Quick service, reasonable prices.  Here's the negative: the flies.  They were everywhere inside.  Disappointment for sure to keep swatting them away do they didn't land on your food.
We were recommended this restaurant as the best place for lobster in the town and we were not disappointed. Lively place, good atmosphere and great service.
Always love the chowder! Full... Rich... Hearty and Scrumptious!!
I enjoy pairing it with a nice Caesar Salad, as I dine on the deck at lunch time.
There is  almost always delightful staff to entertain as well as serve.
Always love the  harbor-front setting and the play of the boats and sun and clouds on the water... It is a never ending display of beauty! Natural artwork outside and photography inside!
I use the Landing like it is an extension of my home when I have guests visiting town.  "My deck over the Harbor... with Heaters for these cooler days and evenings!!"
Love that I am treated as a regular and with genuine friendliness and kindness by Sue.  She is the BEST, always goes out of her way to please.
Thank you to Robert and his Staff for such a wonderful Dining establishment in such a spectacular setting. We are lucky to have you here in Marblehead.
We visited here in September 2016. We had oysters, mussels,fish tacos, and fish and chips of course. All the food was top quality. The staff were friendly and helpful. The location right next to Marblehead harbour is perfect.
We sat on the deck and enjoyed one of the final warm days of summer.  The balmy breeze was wonderful and the ambiance was delightful.  As always, the service (Rory) was excellent and the food was very good.  Overall, it's the type of experience that keeps us coming back to The Landing!
The people at The Landing were great! Everyone was super friendly, the food was SO fresh and delicious, and we had an overall amazing first time. I am moving to Marblehead and I can't wait to eat here all of the time. :) Thanks for the best fish and chips ever! :)
It had been a few years since we were last here, so we weren't sure if the food would still  be as good as before... but we were not disappointed.  The lobster rolls were very good, with only a minor complaint of a bit too much chopped lettuce underneath the lobster. But the lobster mac and cheese could not have been better!  Lots of huge chunks of lobster in a nicely seasoned, gooey cheese sauce, topped with bread crumbs  It was a truly outstanding dish, and the one I'll miss most after returning home to the west coast.
Nice out door dining
Great atmosphere
Good selection of beers
Great bloody mary
Service kind of slow but adequate
We love The Landing in Marblehead!  The views and service are great.  And...the chowder and mussels can't be beat!!  We've had delicious fish dinners, sandwiches (try the lobster roll) and just had lobster salad over Ceasar salad.
Went on a Friday night with a small group.  We sat outside (the view is nice), and ordered our meal.  The food was okay, but the service was so bad that it wrecked the experience.  When we complained to the manager, he said that the waiter is that way.  Guessing waiter is owners uncle or some relation, as the manager seem to say I know he is rude but I can't get rid of him.  It was a shame as it was a perfect night with great company, that one nasty waiter can wreck the whole night.
Our lobsters were fabulous!  The service was fabulous!  And our after dinner drinks at the bar were so delicious - Dark and Stormy - yum!
Once again we can't say enough good things about our recent trip to Marblehead and, of course, the delicious dinner we had at The Landing Restaurant. Their new menu offers additional seafood dishes that are to die for. Enjoy! PanAm1961
Had a late dinner out on the deck.  Overall meal was OK not outstanding.  Staff seemed more interested in ending their evening, than giving great service.
we had scallops on their deck overlooking the harbour.  food was tasty and atmosphere informal and our waitress Angela was very helpful in suggesting good items


I go back to The Landing every time I visit my family in Boston. It is beautiful sitting on the water and their lobster mac n cheese is legendary. 
On a bright sunny day in September, we had lunch here, and sat at a sidewalk table.  The owner/chef is charming, and the menu offers a dozen salads and sandwiches and some bakery choices.  For a light lunch, it was perfect!  I had a "smashed" avocado toast, and salad, and my husband had a big salad.  The café is small, but personable, and right in the middle of the Old Town, steps from the Old Town Hall.
Passed by this place and stopped for breakfast. Great cappuccino and delicious croissant.
Fast service and owner was very friendly. I definitely recommend.
Good location for your early morning Marblehead cup of joe. Good Italian coffee and a great selection of freshly baked pastries.
Coffey Ice Cream in the heart of Old Town Marblehead serving Massachusetts famous Richardson's ice cream is the spot to hit when you need some ice cream on a hot summer night, or a cold autumn day for that matter!  Family run and family friendly the ice cream is delicious, portions generous and setting nostalgic.  There are a few tables inside and several more outside and in addition to Richardson's famous ice cream they also offer alternatives such as soft serve, frozen yogurt and sorbet.  We have a few dessert spots we always like to hit when we are in Marblehead a few times each year and this is certainly one of them.
Great ice cream , fun spot to relax and enjoy the sceenery!
The kids loved drawing with chaulk on the side walk too!
A bit hard to find but we eventually got there.  Fast service.  Lots of choices.  But no blueberry ice cream?  I know we are not in Maine, but we always crave this in New England.  Good parking considering how cramped Marblehead is.
We are lucky in Marblehead to have 3 ice-cream/frozen Yogurt stores to choose from, it's a little hidden away down in Old Town, by Crosby's market store. Ice cream is amazing, lots of different flavors, sizes from kids to large.  Please note small size is huge! Family run business, with friendly staff, small sitting area and plenty of parking. Make Coffey's your ice cream stop whilst visiting Marblehead, even take a stroll to Crocker Park, eat ice cream and take in the magnificent view, Enjoy!
This place gets crowded in the afternoon, but if you are patient you will be rewarded with a very good ice cream treat. They have a very large selection of flavors. In addition they have loads of toppings and many other treats and specialties.
The ice-cream is delicious and the shop is in a good location serving old-fashioned - yummy ice-cream! Gluten free choices are available.
Locally made ice cream with many flavor choices!  Coffey's is a great ice cream place.  I love the ice cream scoop collection hanging from the ceiling.  Highly recommend if you are in Old Town Marblehead!
Great choice of ice cream flavors and friendly service in Old Town. Conveniently located next to a parking lot (Crosby's Marketplace), Coffee Ice Cream is strategically located for a stroll to the harbor or a closer walk to Crocker Park overlooking the harbor. Just don't go after Columbus Day because Coffey's is closed from October to the spring.
Great ice cream, good high school staff, lovely owner overseeing it all. But the best part, is that you can get a big topping of freshly melted freezer cookie dough on top of your ice cream. Brilliant idea, we have never seen it anywhere else. Yum!!!
My husband LOVES ice cream and got their Blueberry and loved it.  I got the peanut butter chocolate and it was delicious!  They are very nice in there and conveniently located.
It was a great little ice cream shop in Marblehead!
I just walked by and she is getting ready to Open-YES!   What a lovely & nice lady the owner is. It is family run with a few teens to help.  Lovely & warm is all I have to say.
It the Crosby's shopping center.  They have managed to provide an excellent selection and keeping those scoops sizable.  I would say that Coffey Ice Cream is the best spot in Marblehead to satisfy that Ice Cream requirement
Lots of choices.  Grab a cone and head to Crocker Park to watch the boats or hang outside at one of the cafe tables.  Fun to check out the photographs from all the past years she has been in business.
We had ice cream all over Marblehead and Boston area & this was amazing!  The first night, we picked up a quart to bring back to our rental house & enjoyed with the family.  The first one was cookies & cream, which was rich and creamy!

The second visit, our son's Kayak class (from the Little Harbor Boathouse) stopped during a morning class to get ice cream.  He choose the blue ice cream with fudge ripple with chocolate covered crispies - it was perfect.  He says there is nothing better than this ice cream!

There are a ton of choices & much to enjoy!
Great little ice cream shop  in the older part of  town.  Very good selection of ice creams and a smaller selection of frozen yogurts.  We settled on the frozen yogurt.  The Heath Bar was tasty as was the Oreo cookie.  Portions are very generous and prices are reasonable.  The staff behind the counter was friendly and helpful.  There is seating inside and outside.
it is only open for the summer season! a lot of people (me) like to eat ice cream year round! great location though. 
We were in the shop at the Marblehead Arts Association and asked the counterperson if there was a good place for ice cream. She recommended Coffey. It is tucked away adjacent to a large parking lot (which I wish we'd found earlier, as parking in the town is a challenge!). The watermelon sherbet was refreshing and a real summer treat. 
I had some "only available for a short time" peach ice cream - and it was so delicious!!!  Sheila knows how to make good ice cream - and if I lived in Marblehead - I'd be trotting over on a daily basis for my "calcium" supplement!
Just returned from a trip to Marblehead visiting my sister and her family.  They took us to Coffey and it did not disappoint.  A little more reasonable than some other homemade I've cream shops locally.
Just opposite the Jack Tar tavern, Coffey's is the perfect place for an frozen dessert treat. It is extremely popular & its likely that you will have to queue for a while, especially on hot evening, but it is well worth the wait. Young & old alike seem to favour the icecream parlour. Seating is very limited inside, but there are tables & chairs as well as benches right outside. The place is light & airy & the variety of ice-cream scoops hanging from the ceiling are great fun. So many flavours to choose from there is bound to be one to please just about everyone - a couple of no added sugar icecreams for diabetics & low fat yogurt based options as well. Get a good idea of portion sizes before ordering or it may be too much to finish! Great place, lovely icecream - yum.
We went here for a birthday dinner.  It is a fun atmosphere and the food was amazing.  The ribs are excellent as were the scallops.  The kids menu was perfect.  Service was excellent!  Can not wait to go back when we return for another visit!
We ate here our first night in Marblehead. It's delicious! The wait staff is friendly and efficient. Fantastic food. Great atmosphere. Awesome draft beer selection.
Decent service, fantastic menu and food was surprisingly good. Ate here late one Saturday night and will definitely go back. Great place to have in town!
Four of us dinned at Jack Tarr's recently & had a wonderful experience.We had grilled scallops, crab cakes, sirloin tips, shrimp & salads. Everyone really enjoyed the dinners they ordered. We ate on the outside patio on a lovely night. Brenden our waiter was terrific. He did an excellent job as well as being very personal. We never felt rushed.
This was our first visit to Jack Tar and only stayed for drinks as the kitchen had just closed.
A good selection of beers on tap.
Great "no frills" location in Marblehead. Excellent appetizers,salads,burgers and martinis served by friendly staff. Great outdoor dining.
I know the difference between grill marks and burnt meat. One bite was enough and I had asked it to be medium. Their answer - too well done for you. I waited for another burger but this one was also over done while the inside was bloody. Not happy.
They offer $5 pizzas from 5-7 pm each night, so if you go during that time be prepared for lots of families with kids inside. Outside seemed to be less hectic, but the rain did cause reseating, which caused overcrowding in the bar area. 

The four cheese pizza was good. The spaghetti Bolognese was fine. The basil vinaigrette was the best part of our main meal. 

The blondie with malted ice cream was very good. 

A solid restaurant.
Of the many restaurants in Marblehead, Jack Tar is one of few that is consistently good. The ambiance is high enough for a romantic night, but relaxed enough for beers after work. The bar can be a little crowded but still intimate. They have a great line up of beers on tap and a great collection of scotch. The lighting is low and the tables are close, but don't feel crowded. They make great burgers, great pizzas and Pasta Bolognese that my wife and I go back for over and over again. Jack Tar is solid.
Great bar with a good atmosphere full of friendly people . Food was well priced and  excellent value. Had to go back the next 2 nights for more.
Enjoyed eating in the garden at Jack Tar. The food was very good and the server was friendly. The location is a nice walk from Harborside House 
Inside, on the patio or in the bar ... perfect. Wife - hostess / Husband - chef. Reasonable prices ... nice selection of great menu items. $5 pizzas (5 - 7 pm). No rush dining. A little loud inside just because people are enjoying themselves. Closed on Mondays.
Consistently delicious with creative ingredients, a nicely varied menu, and great fresh local fish. The locals are in here all the time, a strong testimony to the quality.
The fried chicken is gone from the menu. I had the lettuce chicken wrap. Which was a disappointment because: I had to make my own wraps, it was messy; the dipping sauces were mediocre; the bowl of chicken and mushrooms should have been stirred or I should have been informed to stir it as the chicken was on the top and all of the mushrooms were on the bottom. My wife's cod tacos had fried cod sticks...Mrs. Paul's?

Bring back the fried chicken and we'll be back, otherwise...Ta!

To be fair, there are both positives and negatives.  Positives include some creative items on the menu like buffalo cauliflower which by the way was very good. Prices are reasonable too.  Negatives include the lack of personable service.  Our server, Becka, was very nice but on the other hand, the hostess had no idea about how to smile.  It was obvious that she was not happy to be there even when she came over to refresh our water glasses. I ordered the veggie burger which in my opinion was not so good.  Too mushy!
Good food with fun specialty drinks. Service always pleasant. Love the brick wall of the bar and outdoor seating in the summer. Can be loud in the winter. 
Nice place tucked away close to the center of Marblehead. Good mix of traditional pub food with some specialties. Good burger and sandwiches and nice beer selection on tap. Friendly staff and good service!
I have eaten here for dinner a few times, but I love this place for apps. They have a $5 pizza menu from 5-7 daily which includes a "larger-than"personal pizza with a thin crust in your choice of cheese, veggie or bbq chicken. They also have fabulous appetizers like the tuna poke (sushi grade tuna), asian chicken wings, and nice salads. A great wine list and friendly bartenders completes the scene. On a nice night, I like to sit outside on their patio. One of the best places in town!
It has been (too) a long time since we dined and we were reminded what Jack's has been around so long. The food is exceptional, yet "normal", American fare and the attentiveness of staff was commendable
I have not dined at Jack Tar's for 3 years.  The food and service was excellent.  Our group tried all varieties on the menu and all items were very good.  The Fish & Chips were fresh caught fish and came to the table nice & hot.  other had Steak tips, and flank steak.  Drinks good and waitress very knowledgeable and friendly.  The Fish & Chips was the last served, the waitress apologized and bought me a glass of wine.
Definitely going back lot sooner than 3 years.
I don't understand why a restaurant would call itself The Muffin Shop and continuously be out of muffins by 9/10:00 am! It's outdated, dirty, and overpriced for food served on styrofoam! Needs an overhaul!
On the recommendation of our BNB hosts when asked where to go for good Lobster rolls they sent us here.  Fabulous lobster rolls--large fresh chunks of lobster meat cooked to perfection-  even comes with pickles and chips
Wonderful muffins.Get there early,the best sell out fast. All day breakfast  sandwiches to die for. Friendly staff.
Located in a beautiful section of Marblehead. Great for a quick lunch break whilst shopping at local stores. We had Chicken Salad sandwiches. AMAZING. So flavorful and big. Comes with pickle and chips at a reasonable price. Cant wait to go back!
The Muffin Shop in Marblehead is a long-standing gathering spot for locals offering the best muffins in the area, breakfast and lunch. Very casual and very good!  
Simple food, sandwiches, muffins and yummy drinks will satisfy your hunger and thirst served perfectly right on the main street in Old Marblehead.
the food is great.  the atmosphere is the locals.  the lobster roll is the best in the United States period bar none

and most important the owners care and it shows
Oh my!!!! Whenever I'm home from a schedule that has me away from home a lot, I try to eat seafood whenever I can. There is no lobster roll anywhere in Massachusetts that rivals this one. Piled high, not too much mayo, and solid chunks of meat. I'll be back next month! 
It's true,  not only can you get your quality muffin and coffee but did you know that the Muffin Shop makes one of the best " Lobster Rolls " in all of Marblehead
I love the lobster rolls, I think they are the best in town. My teenage daughter meets friends for breakfast before school. The open early and close early but it's a great spot, especially if you want to take food to go and eat on a bench overlooking the harbor or to Crocker Park. Great sunrise view too!
While people say the muffin shop has the best lobster rolls, their homemade muffins have been satisfying townies for years!!!
Sampled four different muffins.  The topping part is impressive but the majority of the muffin is not that special.  All tasted the same.  Don't spend too much time thinking about the choices as it is essentially a waste of time.  The three berry muffin had about three berries in it.  Hence the name I suppose.  Two out of three visits to this place I have witnessed the owner?/manager treating his employees poorly.  I am done here.  
Just for the muffins. There is so much more. WE have yet to partake of all the goodies but each different non-muffin offering has been very good: from the panini to the sandwich to the breakfast choices. There are so many selections in each category and yet they are all, so far, very good at the least.

The only complaint I have is that it can get quite messy in the dining area after the crowds have subsided and that is a bit of a turn-off
After a few days in Marblehead and two disappointing lobster rolls.  My husband rolled down the car window and asked a couple walking by if they lived around here.  They said they lived right on the street.  His next question was where will we get a good Lobster Roll.  They laughed and said believe it or not it will be at "The Muffin Shop".  We headed right over there and "YES" it was very, very good!  We also enjoyed cookies and chocolate squares.  Excellent place to eat!
After my first visit years ago I became a weekly customer of this family owned business. The owners are outstanding in their devotion from the home made muffins and bakery goods they serve daily as well as serving breakfast and lunch seven days a week that is casual and with table service and good food. A must stop in down town, enjoy.  
Great little lunch or breakfast spot.  Name belies fact that they also have a good selection of sandwiches.  Has loyal local following - It's almost a breakfast club.  
The muffins were fine, but the slow, unfriendly service ruined the experience. The floor wasn't swept, the tables weren't cleaned, and the staff yelled at customers to shut the door (Really! Can't you just ask nicely?) 40 minutes for scrambled eggs!  Two stars is probably too generous. 
Although we are fans of the freshly baked muffins, the hidden gem at the Muffin Shop is the lobster roll.  If you are a local the over stuffed lobster roll is no secret and the long lunchtime lines reflect it.  If you visit during lunch, more often than not, you've already missed out on the huge selection of fresh baked muffins. The service is average but based upon my experience this is more a function of being a victim of their own success.
We were lucky to visit on 2 week-days before we experienced the week-end scene.  Very busy on week-ends -- I think all the locals come here.  Food is good and very reasonable.  We made multiple visits during our stay.
It seems to be a nice Meeting place for locals to have a warm cup of coffe & a small breakdast.
The owner and workers a nice & polite.
Closed. This is unfortunate as they had the best Mai Tai drink around. They also had the most reasonably priced sushi around as well as good Chinese food.  Good bar eats.
Really enjoyed the eggplant on a recent visit with friends. Glad to see seafood on the menu, but did not like the shrimp dish as well.
Not the healthiest food with nearly everything fried. But the orange chicken is tasty as are the scallion pancakes. Reasonable price and the place seemed clean. Would go back.
We ate there this evening, based on what we read on Y*lp and other websites.

I have no inkling as to where others have eaten Chinese food, and by what measure they are rating these restaurants, but this place was an extreme disappointment.

We have eaten in Chinese restaurants all over the MA area, including "holes in the wall", and this place just does not cut it by any means.  The local folks like this place because its close to the "Neck" and "Old Town", and the drinks are reasonably priced.  The pricing, itself, is 20% higher than the other places closer to Swampscott and Salem, possibly simply due to its location.  If the cuisine was exceptional, then it would be worth the price differential.

Simply put, none of the dishes we ordered had any taste to them.  Completely bland!  Even when we tried to "doctor" the meal with their Duck Sauce and Mustard sauce, the sauces were watery and equally without flavor.

A few good things about the restaurant was that it was clean, tidy, and the waitstaff was friendly and helpful.  Their soups had some flavor, but not much.

Do yourself a favor... Eat at Yans in Swampscott.  For that matter, eat any place else.
Very fresh, tasty Chinese and Japanese food.  Always a crowd at the bar when I pick up for take out. Pleasant dining in experience as well although not overly crowded. 
Fen Yang does  "traditional" Chinese-American food, and they do it right.

I grew up in this area and remember when there were many more places like this.  All I can say is that I'm glad this one continues to thrive.  This is your parents and grandparents Chinese food, in the best way.

They are not trying to be Chinatown or SF.  If you expect that, you might feel they missed the mark.  However, if you love spare ribs, fried rice, lo mein, General Gau's, etc. you are in for a treat.  Very fresh ingredients, very aptly prepared.  If you enjoy a good tropical cocktail, or just a well poured drink, you are in for an extra  special treat.

There is a good sized bar area that is separate from the dining room.  It's a nice little escape that you will find a number of local people enjoying on any given night. ( It's a scene straight out of "Cheers".)  The dining room is very nice too, especially for larger parties and a more "family oriented" experience.  (Unless you are a member of my family, like half this town…..)  But no question a total stranger would also feel very comfortable here.

They also have a very good sushi bar.  I'll admit that I am something of a sushi snob.  I tend to prefer designated sushi restaurants for some reason.  But their sushi is straightforward, extremely fresh, nicely presented and delicious.  I've been enjoying it for years. 

If you are new to town or a visitor, don't hesitate to check it out.  It's a Marblehead fixture, for good reason.
We order to go food for about 12 people once a month. The food is great. The Chinese and the the Japanese food are both well done. There is no long wait for to go orders. Call and get some great food.
It was a very average experience for our visit.  We started off with the egg rolls which were not greasy but very crispy and well done.  The wonton soup was much more noodle and very little meat.  We had the chicken lo mein and the ginger chicken with string beans.  The ginger chicken didn't come with rice and we had to order it.  That was different.  Both of those dishes were good but the ginger chicken was better.  Portions were a good size and the prices were very reasonable.  The service was good.  My daughter told me the ladies room was dirty and needed a complete overhaul.  She mentioned there were chipped tiles, chipped toilet seats, and the sink was disgusting.
We LOVE Fen Yang. They have what I would call gormet Chinese food (after tasting the other places on the North Shore) and we often eat here when back in town. We ordered it every week when we lived here and miss it terribly.  Kid friendly. Group friendly. Most of the business is take out but there is a large dining room and great service.  They have a Japanese menu and fresh sushi/shashimi made to order in the bar area. Drinks are cheap. Food is FANTASTIC!
This is one of the best places in the area to go for Chinese food.  We like to just go into the bar, and have dinner and watch the game on the TV.

The food is great, the service is great!  Very nice people and they have almost every on the menu.
this is our go-to restaurant for take out sushi. They have a great selection and it is always excellent.
I used to live around the corner and have been eating this pizza since they opened, though now only when I visit the area.   Tastes the same - delicious.   Not artsy, just the standards, but done so well.   
I've been going to house for the last five years when visiting my wife's family in town and it is hands down the best pizza I've ever had. The Chicken Kabob salad is another work of art with the perfect creamy Greek dressing to finish it off. This place will not disappoint, we wish they would open one in Colorado
The Greek Caesar salad with grilled chicken is awesome. Love the dressing. No olives, no tomatoes  for me extra feta and salad dressing -no problem! Always accomodating. Grill the bread before and after for my steak bomb. Perfection. Pizza 1/3 plain, 1/3 pepperoni, 1/3 mushrooms.  Everyone is happy. Consistent quality food with the tweaks  you want.
This pizza place was on our way at the right time - didn't know about it before. It doesn't look anything much out, or inside, but the Greek style pizza was really really delicious. And I am not a pizza lover as such. If you are in that area, and hungry, that is definitely the place.
The cafe offers many more choices than just pizza so guests can order sandwiches, drinks, soup, salads, etc. A cheery place to spend a little extra time and great eating spot.
House of Pizza was highly recommended to us and did not disappoint. The pizza and grinders are delicious and the service is wonderful! I would absolutely come back here again.
We love this pizza and this family owned joint has been a mainstay in Marblehead for years and years! Greek style pizza is a little different than the standard Italian and I would say that the crust is a little thicker and they are more generous on the toppings.  It can be a little greasier than the standard thin crust, but it is delicious. I don't give too many five stars.
After so many positive reviews, I was certain that this place was at least moderately good.  That is not my experience visiting last night. 

I will fully divulge that my husband and I are pizza snobs, and really like to make our own, often because we cannot find a local pizzeria who meets minimums.  

However, we are able to put things into perspective, and I like to think that we can recognize individual accomplishments of pizza providers:  best crust, best sauce, best late night option, etc.  

We ordered a large cheese for take out.  It was about 9pm on a Friday night.  It was about $12 - a fair price and on par with other pizzerias in the area.  

When I got it home and raised the box lid I got a sinking feeling that dinner was going to be disappointing and I was unfortunately correct.  

The crust was a "pan-style," and, though not my favorite ( I am really more of a Neapolitan woman), I didn't let that affect my opinion.  I can love any style pizza.  The sauce looked, and was, much too heavy, and the cheese had a rubbery appearance.  

The sauce was too sweet and the texture almost granular - the best way to describe it was that it tasted like ketchup that someone mixed with flour, and smeared on the pizza.  

The cheese was flavorless and rubbery and also somewhat granular - maybe not 100% actual cheese?  It wasn't stretchy and melty.  

The crust was doughy, and probably the best part.  It was also flavorless, except for the browned bits of cheese that creeped up off the sauced part of the pie.  My husband appropriately summarized the experience of eating a piece:  "The sauce and the cheese is so bad that while you're eating it you're actually looking forward to the rind!"

My theory is that this place used to be great, was sold to someone who was not interested in maintaining brand integrity, and who opted for the cheapest ingredients and labor to maximize profits.  

I don't relish giving negative details of a beloved, and probably once-great pizzeria.  I realize that many rave reviews probably come from folks who have been getting pizza from MHP since they were very young.  Nostalgia can strongly influence perception.  However, I feel that it is a disservice to not document my experience to unaware, Trip-Advisor-review-trusting visitors or newcomers looking for a delicious pizza.  Of course, if I should find that this pizza was an anomalous occurrence, and I subsequently have a much better pizza here, I will make a note on this review. 

There are other options (Tony's right around the corner, for example) that are much better and in the same price range.  All due respect.  
Best Pizza in the North Shore!

Whenever I visit Marblehead I have to stop in at least 1 time. 

My wife got a Greek salad which she loved and my daughter had a turkey sub which was huge. 

I was disappointed in 
The subs are incredibly delicious and the Greek salad with chicken kabobs is the best. My absolute favorite is the tuna salad sub, toasted with green and hot peppers. It is huge even for a half sub. That's where I go for my tuna salad fix.  The location though is a little bit of utilitarian...without charm. You go in there for the food. That's in. And for the people who are the best and friendliest. Cheers to my friend, Athena, who always gives me the widest smiles when we go there.
Marblehead House of Pizza has been around since I was a child visiting my grandparents here. It's the only place we ever got pizza. Their pizza is different than the others. I think it's compared more to a Greek style. The tomato sauce is a tiny bit sweeter. The crust is more cake-like rather than tasteless dough.  Some folks love it, some prefer the other type of pizza.  I'm a fan.  But what I REALLY love at this place is their chicken kebab salad.  Sliced chicken right off the grill with a nice char on it. Great salad greens, great dressing.  It's a staple in my takeout repertoire...
We were staying on Marblehead Neck and saw the sign, best pizza on Marblehead, and it was.  We had fun talking to the workers while waiting for our pizza.  It was tasty and seemed very popular by the number of locals who came in while we were there.
The dough! the toppings! Did all the Marblehead pizza places and love this Greek pizza the best, as do my grandchildren, son, niece, and others. It's been here since the mid 70s!
I think the Marblehead House of Pizza- Special is the best pizza in all of Marblehead.  It is loaded with everything from vegetables to sausages and more.   I feel like I have eaten a meal after that Pizza
Phone in for a pizza, pick up and then really enjoy. You would think that all pizza's are made alike but there is a "je ne sais quoi" about their pizza that makes it our go to place for take out
I have been a long time customer.  We love the small cheese pizzas and the veggie melt sub. This place has been a local favorite for as long as I can remember. 
Marblehead House is absolutely the best Greek pizza around.  I remember going to house way back to my middle school years!  My girl friend and I would always get a veggie grinder or sausage grinder.  Their grinders are out of this world as well.  We order from house at least once a month if not more and are never disappointed.  The staff is friendly, if you eat in it's cozy, and the prices are reasonable.  I've got my husband and sons hooked now!  Definitely recommend!!!  
Greek style pizza with great tasting crust (if you like crust. . .I do).  I enjoyed every pizza (5 of them) I had here for the week I was in Marblehead.  The only drawbacks are 1) that they do not deliver, however, it is worth picking up, and 2) I wish they used fresh ingredients as toppings, although the base is so tasty it almost doesn't matter what's on top! 
I'm used to a totally different style of pizza coming from the New York area but overall this was very good pizza.  It was tasty and there is nothing wrong with a little change every once in a while.  They must be doing something right because they have a ton of awards from the area about how good their pizza is.  We had a large eggplant pizza with a house salad and greek salad.  Very basic salads and I would have liked a vinaigrette dressing and not a creamy italian which was given to us.  I would go back.  Cash only.
Best Roast Beef Sub Period in history of the world.  I've been going for 30 years and it never disappoints.  If only others could re create the mayo and bread that go with the succulent roast beef, crisp lettuce, pickles, onions, and of course the hots!  Great people working there as well.  Enjoy!
I have enjoyed Comelias for take out dishes like Pasta, Eggplant and more.  The servings are healthy and the quality is spot on everytime.   I would consider their meals for a family take out night when you want Italian and not sure you want to do the cooking
Comella's has a wide variety of pizzas and pasta dishes. It is the most reasonably priced pizza in town. (One reason is they do not deliver). Staff is friendly and courteous on the phone and in person. Limited seating inside. In good weather sidewalk ding is available.
First of all the pizza is good. Actually the picture is very good. Like ours well done. Always comes out perfectly. Two pies 16" for under $14.00 is a bargain anywhere anytime. Take out is the best way to go here as the place only has a few tables. The people are friendly considerate and get the order right every time.A bargain anywhere anytime. Take out is the best way to go here as the place only has a few tables. The people are friendly considerate and get the order right every time. All of the dishes look delicious. Considering the place looks quite busy. The food must be good.  Price only works so long if the food is not. I'll be back!
Have been here many times hoping for an improvement but unfortunately it did not happen.  This is not Italain food not even a close imitation.  It is disgusting. Mushy gloppy pasta in a tasteless sauce.  Pizza is skimpy on everything which is maybe a good thing.  Too bad because it is so convenient but I will not return.
Shhhh.. Don't tell 'em....
Sometimes you go to a place because of the price being low.
Sometimes you go to a place because the food is just too good and the price is an afterthought.
Comellas is both. I frequent the Marblehead , MA location.
Small corner store, Only a few tables for the townies, with really excellent Italian dishes for, dare I say, more than reasonable prices.
On this visit... Pizza is not a cheater size and only $5.99 ea. I order two and what we don't finish goes into the freezer for snacks during the week.
The staff is excellent to the point of opening each box to make sure the "pie" is cooked exactly the way it was ordered. We like extra crispy. Add in a antipasto and you have a great meal and the whole bill including tax is $16.00.
Normally a couple of pies are more than that.
Shhhh, don't tell 'em......
Just wasted my time, my money and my share of stomach to perhaps the worst place on the North Shore. If you're curious about dinner at Comella's in Marblehead, take my advice and don't bother. Literally a mess on a plate that tasted as bad as it looked.
Pasta overcooked to point of mush. Sauce from jars would be a vast improvement on their touted 'home made' stuff. Their mess is in edible as well as ugly. If they stay in business here they will have to do some cooking on site, not truck in frozen glop from who knows where. Really pretty awful excuse for Italian food. Encore frozen is a step up. 
We were very curious after checking out the website for "Comellas" in other areas.  My husband and I always try anything new that opens.  So, we tried the cheese pizza.  To me, the way to judge a pizza is just a plain cheese.  If they get that right (italian right) then the others should be good as well.  Basically, it was inedible. I guess it is Conveyor belt pizza (not italian) and the belt must be set to move too fast.  The dough was raw, the sauce had a tinny canned taste and the cheese was scant and not flavorful.  We will try the meatballs and perhaps a couple of other items before we make a final decision and review.  But the pizza is not an item I would ever try again.
This is part of a chain of 10 other Comellas. I am sure the original founded in 1988 by patriarch, Gene Comella, it was good. A single  outlet is far different than opening 10 more and expecting consistency with menu and recipes. in y opinion is nothing special.

The area in Marblehead outlet to dine is small and noisy. Its new so its very clean. Staff is friendly, and hopefully, they hired locals.

Food quality. Nothing special in my opinion. Sweet tomato sauce for pizza made with soybean oil??  Where is Italian olive oil??

And I question the fact that this is "homemade-in-the-kitchen" pizza dough. It's thin and cheese is skimpy. Pasta is overcooked. Eggplant seems smooshy like baby food. Alfredo sauce doesn't resemble or taste anything like Alfredo Viaggi's "alfredo sauce." Prosciutto raviolis use PUREE!

Basic 16 inch  cheese pizza starts at $5 and you can build on for $2-$6 more a topping. Problem is that after 4 additional toppings your pizza is over $13.

The "Family Messes" is an actual name. Family Messes according to their website a mystery recipe.....yeah...And it is a mystery to me to even bother.

Four sizes. A Single for one person, a 1/2 Bucket serves 3-4 people for the price of 3, a full Bucket serves 6-8 people for the price of 5, and a Double Bucket serves 20-25. 

If you are looking for authentic non chain Italian food. This is not your place. Really. Simply don't go. Italian last name only thing authentic.

If you want buckets of food. Don't care about legitimate Italian cuisine?....This is your place.
Loved it! Spent 4 days popping in and out for REAL English tea, fantastic wraps, all veggie and organic. A surprisingly refreshing place.......
Roaming around looking for a coffee shop in Marblehead we stumbled across Haley's.   We ordered coffee and two different quiche's.  We got our coffee and a table in the window.  The coffee shop is attached to the wine store and it is open between them.  Soon  the coffee shop was full and the line spilled into the room next door.  We beat the crowd.  Our quiche arrived and we were a little surprised at how thin the piece was, but it was a big wedge.  These were both very good and we took our time sipping coffee and enjoying every bite.
We were walking around Marblehead, having read that it was used for the filming of the Witches of Eastwick and needed a bathroom, so we popped in here and ordered a brownie to go for our Son. He shared a little of it, but not much as it was declared as the best brownie he had ever had. 
We had a lovely breakfast of an omelet, pastry, and coffee. The omelet was perfectly cooked and the pastries warm from the oven. Pretty good coffee and a happy, friendly staff as well. We watched the pedestrian traffic outside the big windows in a sun-filled room.
Guests can sit and relax, sip anything and grab a bite to eat all at once. Staff are very friendly and the environment most pleasant.
Great quality wine and beer at great prices  plus, why not sit down for a gourmet lunch with the attached cafe.  I don't think you can beat this little joint in Old Town Marblehead
Good place for casual lunch featuring homemade soups, sandwiches on good bred and salads. Nice wine shop in other part of room
Always good soups and sandwiches.  Right on lower Washington St. so handy to the shops of  the historic area.
The coffee at this coffee shop was great.  They had lots of different sandwiches and cakes too if you wanted more than a coffee.
Haley's makes a mean breakfast sandwich!  They also have rock cakes (like scones, but made with oatmeal and it as sweet) and plenty of other egg and pastry type options.  For lunch their falafel salad, homemade veggie burger or soup are all great options for vegetarians in addition to their sandwiches. Not to mention their hand cut fries are the best. They're kid friendly (the owners Paul and Julie have kids of their own who are often around).  It can get a little pricey - but it's very tasty.
This is a go-to place for breakfast, snacks, and lunch.  Innovative and traditional fare from a former caterer-to-rockstars (literally!).  The scones and rock-cakes are heavenly, and the wine store/ BYOB restaurant combo can't be beat for dinner.
I really Love the fact no matter what is IS ALWAYS open!  NO Nor Easter, Blizzard OR Anything will keep its doors closed!
I just wish they would get some Better range in both wine & price.
Never been to Marblehead before so we don't really know what's what here. The town is like a Norman Rockwell painting. While hitting the adorable shops we stumbled in Haley's and decided to have lunch. outstanding! I had the falafel salad and my husband had the fish burrito. Both were fan-frickin-tastic! And the price was ridiculously cheap for all the food we ate. Go! Its awesome!
Great soups excellent bean veggie burger.  Home made large bean veggie burger served with soup, salad or fries.  Veggie wrap panini also tasty.  Locals like this place.  I heard the hamburgers are delicious too. Scones, sweets too.  Liquor store adjacent so easy byob   Organic wines
We eat here once or twice a month. Food is reliably good; proprietor is a delight, and genuinely cares about your enjoyment of the meal.   Combination Middle Eastern and Mediterranean food; nice beer and wine menu.  Uniquely excellent baba ghanouj.  Moderate prices. Highly recommended. 
Delicious Fattoush salad with subtle lemon dressing. Tasty kibble 'meatballs'. Everything was fresh and nicely presented. The service was attentive and friendly.
Everything was delicious. The Tabbouleh was so fresh, lacking in resemblance from the stuff you get at the grocery store. I recommend the combo plate to get a taste of everything.  I will be going back again.
The food is delicious and different from the usual choices. 
The mix of Mediterranean flavors is very good, can't wait to go there again.
Cozy and spotless with very lovingly prepared food.  Three of us for lunch, we had the falafel, hummus, feta cheese rolls and chicken kebab sandwich.  Food was very good and authentic, service was professional and very pleasant.  Wonderful lunch at a reasonable price.  We will be back!
There's no need to travel into Boston for the best Mediterranean food - Marblehead's Le Bistro offers a great menu, whether you're looking to have lunch, a romantic dinner, or take out.
Le Bistro has been a favorite spot for lunch with friends for years, but the recently renovated bistro has made it a nice dinner choice as well. I've had falafel, good falafel, in many different locales, and this place beats all. The Baba Ghanouj is incredible. I never go too long without giving into my Fattouch craving - this unique salad is light and satisfying.
A few days ago my husband and I treated ourselves to a relaxing dinner here - after a stressful day, there is something about the warm greeting and the friendly atmosphere that make you exhale and decompress.
Owner Salim could not be more gracious - each step of the way, he checks in with his customers. He takes pride and enjoyment in each dish, and makes suggestions. The night we were there, I was going to try a Lebanese beer with my Chicken Kabob and grilled vegetables - Salim mentioned that he had just brought in a locally-brewed beer, Bent Water, which was perfectly paired with my meal. (Very nice IPA.)
My husband ordered the Bistro shrimp, which was like a work of art and delicious.
For lunch, a friend and I will often split the spicy Carribean wrap and a salad.I have always left Le Bistro happy that I went - I have enjoyed each and every thing I have tried there. Salim takes time to answer questions about each dish and how it is prepared.
I am still dreaming about the pistachio encrusted Baklava - try it. You'll be in food heaven.
A group of older gentlemen, clearly regulars, were seated next to us at our recent dinner. They complained of missing one of their regular weekly dinners at Le Bistro because of snow. Salim said he was relieved they were okay. It's this kind of care that goes into each dish and to each diner - Salim and his staff are delivering more than a dinner - they are presenting a gift.
The food, delicious middle eastern cuisine, never disappoints.  The owner is a delight.  Outgoing and quite friendly.  He's only topped by the food . . . Hummus, babaganoush, falafel, lamb chops . . . all excellent!
The food we had was excellent.  Cuisine is Mediterranean. Had a very good shrimp dish with spinach and mushrooms in a tomato sauce served over rice. Kabobs were also excellent.  Service was a little slow but quite pleasant.  Only drawback is that the tables are quite close together.
This is a great cute little place. Quiet romantic setting and great food.  Wee have brought the kids with us a few times (teenagers) and they feel there's a great selection for them too.  Owner is very hospitable and the prices are fair, especially since the food is so good.
The food is fresh and tasty. The hummus is home made and fluffy served with warm pita bread. The stuffed grape leaves are warm and freshly made. The Bistro Platter is an appetizer but I had it as my meal since it includes a bit of everything. My partner had the Shwarna chicken and said it was tasty. It came with choice of salad or fries. We got takeout another eve since the dining room is very small and was full. 
Mediterranean style food that is excellent.  The lamb is especially tasty as is the eggplant.  Soup not so good. Good wine list. 
Lamb kabobs to die for.  No frills, no real, atmosphere but good friendly service and food.  Portions very adequate.  Out side tables in summer.  Always GOOD.  Good take out also.
Food has been largely the same for years --- and that is good.   Everything is fresh, presented beautifully and the pricing is terrific.   Soups are made from scatch.   The restaurant (and kitchen in back) is emaculate --- and that is saying something after being there for 10 years or more.   Owners care about what they do -- and it shows
Le Bistro has pleased many of us that need a sit down for a Fatoosh salad or something out of the ordinary.  The service is great.  this is a convenient spot located in the 5 corners district.
While the name of the restaurant might make you think otherwise, this is Middle Eastern / Lebanese fare.  Everything we had was delicious, prepared with care and served with a smile.  Not sure if our server was the owner but he clearly had passion about the food and our dining experience.

Nice variety of dishes and cozy atmosphere.  Stop in and enjoy a nice meal.
Love Le Bistro. For a small town, it is the only junction in Marblehead that serves a credible middle eastern fare among the surf and turf restaurants,   Although the place is quite small, nevertheless, I'm glad that we have a healthy option.Try babaganoush and falafel...delicious.
While Le Bistro might be small:) in size the wonderful food makes up for it. I will say for us, we actually enjoyed the quaintness of its size . It is very cozy with booths and a few tables. Everything  they make is from scratch and its delicious. it's just around the corner and its our go to place when visiting .We don't need an excuse to leave the cape now, we have one:) !! thank you for giving us  great food and the perfect atmosphere for our family memories. Please try LeBistro for in house dining or take out. We called to make a reservation just because there aren't many tables and they fill up quick. It's a nice place to sit with friends and family and not be rushed out. They do a great take out business if you don't feel like dining in but i do suggest you call ahead.You'll love it!!!!
Varied menu, tasty food, reasonable prices, nice setting, but service was slow. The explanation we got was that they were breaking in a new cook. 
The appetizers are usually very good but the meals often tend to disappoint and are on the pricier side for what they are
Consistently great food and terrific service at decent prices!  So glad we can get our Mediterranean food fix right here in Marblehead!
Just landed in MA yesterday and drove to the beautiful Marblehead to chill for three days before going in to Boston. We were shattered after 19hrs travelling and decided to just have some appetisers and a couple of beers before bed. So we chose Maddie's bar. 

The place is clean and well kept. The clam chowder was creamy and full of flavour. My wife had the lobster bisque which was also first class. The mussels were fresh and the mariniere sauce was spot on. 

The worst thing however is that it is primarily a drinkers' bar. Consequently, on our night, two customers decided to blast the rest of us with rap music on the jukebox. To be fair, the waitress asked us if we were bothered by it (mainly the swearing). But hey, it's only "music", the meal was inexpensive, the service was great, and we were very very tired. So I'm not marking the place down for that. Just take heed though if you are looking for a quiet pub meal. 
Since I was born and raised in Marblehead, I'm very familiar with Maddy's.  I've been coming here forever and highly recommend it to all for great drinks, food and service.  The drinks are generous and potent and the food is great.  The downstairs is a terrific local bar with booths and the upstairs has a bar and dining area with booths and tables.  

It's a very popular place and doesn't take reservations.  You might have to wait a bit for dinner but it's worth it.  I was visiting Marblehead and stopped in for dinner with my wife and some old friends.  I had swordfish and she had a lobster roll...both excellent.  

It's a bit noisy, but the service is great and you won't find a better local place in your travels!
I had heard about the lobster roll and had to try it. Sure it comes on a simple bun that was okay, it was loaded with large chunks of lobster and not over-powering dressing. For the money one of the better lobster rolls + add an inexpensive PBR and this was a fantastic lunch.
We LOVE Maddie's!!  Who doesn't?!  It's comfort all american food.  I love the ravioli over butternut squash and grilled chicken in a cream sauce.  My husband loves the ribeye.  Always great!  As far as the booze - be prepared.  They are strong and full.  The glass of wine comes filled to the brim, the mixed drinks are super potent.  What's not to love about this place?!
We have visited here for dinner and drinks on every visit we have made to the Harbor Light Inn Marblehead and were again not disappointed.
Great food and a large selection of cold locally brewed beers at this popular Locals Bar/Restaurant
Went to Maddie's with 2 friends who were visiting from out of town. Two of us had the BAKED haddock  sandwich . It came with a buttered,  toasted roll. I had mine on the side. They let me substitute a salad for the fries for $1 more and gave us delicious tartar sauce. My other friend had the fried haddock sandwich  and loved it. We noticed they had lobster risotto on the menu and decided to share it. There were actual chunks of lobster in it. Yum! We will return SOON.
We had one night in Marblehead before the start of a sailboat race and roamed around looking for a place to eat.  I've been to Marblehead many times, but have only eaten at The Landing and The Barnacle.  Both overlook the harbor and had the usual summer crowds..  

We ended up at Maddie's, which I only knew of as a local sailors bar, a half block up State St. from The Landing.  We took a chance and tried out the restaurant upstairs above the bar.  What a great place!  They have a separate bar from the one downstairs and we chose to sit at a corner window table in that room.  The waitress was extremely nice and efficient.  The cocktails were generous and mixed just right.  I ordered the warm spinach salad, which is their take on a cobb salad.  Lots of bacon, 2 hardboiled eggs, fantastic dressing and other tasty bits. My wife got fish tacos which were fresh and flavorful.  They were pan seared, not fried.  We left very happy we took the chance on trying something new.  We will go there again on our next trip to Marblehead.
This is the place to go for a family style meal -- lots of families are there too prove it. Basically seafood, though thewre ate other choices. Goof food, good service.
It was our favorite place to eat while in Marblehead.  Great food and great customer service.  It had lots of character and I could tell it was one of the locals favorites. 
We had an early dinner while going thru Marblehead on a road trip. They could serve dinner before 5:30pm and the downstairs atmosphere was very local. Food was great and cheap and wine was poured to the top of the glass (unusual). No wine list but we asked for a Sauvignon Blanc and a Cab and they had both- only one option for the white, two for the red. I had the pan-seared haddock over mashed potatoes and spinach (so good) and husband and son had pasta dishes - all very good- we asked for bread and bread and butter were served at no cost. Very friendly service - small place so dunno if it gets crowded fast but at 5:30 we were the only ones eating - was very special for us
I have been coming to Maddie's for over 40 years (and I'm only 36).  Have been there through the long initial period of stability then the flurry of turnovers around 10 years ago, and now into the return to stability with Loretta's ownership.  The menu is excellent, food quality is consistently first rate, and the drinks are amazing.  Two of my favorites are the pan seared haddock (best haddock dish ANYWHERE, EVER!) and the scallop dish.  Great staff, lots of locals, and everybody's always in a good mood (upstairs at least).  Who wouldn't be with such awesome food!
A classic water-town watering hole. Great as a very local stop for a drink, but the bar-pub menu is nothing to celebrate.
Had not been there in years due to the multiple ownerships. My wife and I went for a casual dinner and were pleasantly surprised by the quality of the food and the reasonable price. The beers were unbelievable and cheap. Will definitely return.
Maxie's is a Marblehead institution, but has never lost its rustic and nautical charm. Staff are helpful and relaxed. Stop by for good food and fun.
Maddie's is one of those local restauraunts that has poured sizable drinks and offered quality food for history.  The locals have always provided this place the traffic it needs.  It also is known to be a night spot for the local youth.  
This place is a legend.  The menu is diverse and the drinks are not only consistently good but strong. They make an outstanding hamburger that is moist and flavorful.
One of my favorite places in Marblehead, hands down. I have tried the haddock, the swordfish, and the scallops and all were fantastic. Amazing onion rings too, and surprisingly good risotto, considering it is not an Italian restaurant. The only dish I would not re-order was the wedge salad, which was actually pretty bad. But it's harder to make a good swordfish steak and that is where it matters most. Maddie's is known to have a strong pour, so don't order a dark & stormy unless you can weather the storm! The dining room is our preferred venue, it is above the pub. The pub is fine too but I am 47 and the average age seems to be 22 so it's not really my scene. But on a quiter night, it's the same menu and works just as well. I love Maddie's!
It was difficult to decide what to get here because there were many choices.  We enjoyed what we ordered although the lobster risotto on the side of my scallops was disappointing.  The service was attentive but not hovering.  I'm sure the place can get rocking on the weekends or on evenings when it's not so snowy and cold.  We enjoyed the meal but the atmosphere is pretty bare bones.  Great location on State Street.
They have great fresh mussels and oysters, and incredibly moist salmon and swordfish. A consistently well prepared meal and great service and huge cocktail and beer service. And prices are not too bad either!
Three of us were visiting the area for a mini-getaway and decided to go to Maddie's to have dinner before playing trivia there.  The service was great and the food was delicious!  We ordered lots of appetizers, and they were all really yummy!  It was a fun place for trivia and we all agreed that we were glad we decided to eat there.  
We had dinner here after several locals and previous visitors recommended it. It was such a treat! We had skate, which we had not been able to find on a menu since leaving Ireland 9 years ago. It was perfectly prepared and fresh. The drinks were good and good value. This is a great date night place as it's a good mix of lively yet romantic. Get every course they have on offer and throw calorie counting out the window. It's worth it!!
My husband and I eat here pretty frequently. We have never ordered anything that isn't delicious. 
The atmosphere is beautiful. Staff is mostly good, very occasionally awful. 
The food is always amazing. Every single time. 
Pretty tough to walk in for a table on the weekend. You can sometimes get a spot at the bar if there are just 2 of you. 
Highly recommend. 
We love this place, food is always outstanding, especially the burgers and steak frites. Service is very attentive, and the Atmosphere is great- sophisticated with out being snooty.  Did not blink an eye that we brought kids.  Will definitely keep going back!
If you are looking for a great dinner in Marblehead, this is your place.  There are a number of OK places to eat here ( I've lived here almost 10 years).  This is the only great place, in my opinion, for an elegant meal in Marblehead.  I say this as someone with a strong love of bistro cuisine (which they do very well here).  There are other good restaurants in Marblehead (like Junji, which does very good sushi), but this is a place worth driving out of your way for.
Our first visit to Marblehead and this eatery was on our list as must-tries....and we were not disappointed. There are other quaint places to dine, but this should be your first stop.
In the middle of 5 Corners this restaurant is amazing. Very nice atmosphere from the subway tiled bar to the candlelit tables. Amazing food, great wait staff and easy to walk to. Top notch mixed drinks selection. 
I can honestly say I have never had a bad meal here.  In fact I can say each meal I've had has been really delicious.  You know how sometimes at other restaurants have off nights - 5 Corners Kitchen has NEVER had an off night.  
Service is always good.  The staff know how to balance attentiveness.  
Make the trip to Marblehead and enjoy!
Went here with another couple last night.  We try new restaurants all the time, and I was pleasantly surprised with the quality of food, professionalism of staff, and the interesting decor!  Between 5 and 6PM, oysters are $1, so we ordered a dozen to share.  The Malbecs from PEI were fresh and delicious!!!  The hot bread with butter was excellent.  I had the organic salmon with greens, chick peas, red, green, and purple tomatoes finished in a tahini sauce.  It  was one of the best salmon dishes I ever had!  My husband had the home made pasta with sausage and rabbe, which was also excellent.  Our friends had the chicken and she said it was delicious and our other friend had the pasta with pesto.  The pesto was watery, but tasty.  Our waiter was attentive and cordial.  I will certainly be back!!!
My wife and went here on Saturday night and we chose to sit at the bar.  The restaurant opens at 5 and if you want a bar seat, get there a little before 5 as it fills up fast, especially on a Saturday night.  She had the best pork chop she has ever eaten.  I had the lobster and scallop ravioli, which was delicious.  As I said in my title for this review, we never leave disappointed and this stretches back for a couple of years.  The bar service from Adam was also excellent. 
Frequent often. Creative menu, professional staff, near enough to oldtown, overall top notch dining.
My wife and I eat here once a month or so and the food and atmosphere are incredible. We feel so lucky to have such a great restaurant in Marblehead!
Beautiful lighting makes an elegant setting for excellent food. The hamburger was perfectly cooked and complex in flavor a with smoked cheddar and spicy pickles.  The mixed greens salad served topped with a herbed goat cheese was perfect. Congratulations to the owners on a great job creating a delightful and unforgettable dining experience. 
I made reservations for dinner on a Sunday night (it was a good thing I did make reservations as the place was slammed).  My husband and I sat down at the table, looked at the menu and they brought over some delicious bread which we devoured after ordering our dinner.  We were chatting about this, that and the other thing and our waiter came over and said, so sorry for the long wait, please take these as our apology and gave us a heaping plate of the most amazing french fries on the planet.  they were crispy and covered in some type of "asian "marinade"" we really weren't sure what was on them, but we could NOT stop eating them as they were so unbelievably good.  We hadn't realized it had even been so long (almost 45-60 minutes) as we had filled up on the delicious bread.  

By the time we got our meal, we weren't even that hungry..but I got the chicken (as I'd read it was awesome) oh and it was stupendous.  Very moist and flavorful and huge as well.  My husband got some type of pasta w/a meat sauce and ate every last bite, he RARELY joins the CPC - Clean Plate Club, so that has to speak volumes as to how good the pasta and sauce was.  I did try a bite and the sauce was awesome.  There was a number of pastas I really wanted to try so I told my husband we had to go back again so I could try one of the pastas.  And this time we'll be ordering the fries, although we have NO idea what they were exactly...
Met friends here for a Friday evening dinner and had a delightful time. Loved the oysters, wedge salad and burgers. Service was attentive and kind -- but fell off toward the end of the meal.
I've eaten at Five Corners about a half dozen times, but every time it's been ethereal. The bar is small and intimate, the cafe table section is perfect for grabbing drinks and a quick bite with friends, and the main dining room is the place you want to go for your romantic night out. The wait staff are all wonderful. Great wine list and original intriguing plates. The menu is overwhelming and every item on it has earned its place. Five stars.
Delicious and well presented food served by very pleasant wait-staff in a cosy atmosphere in Marblehead. Sautéed scallops to die for. Steak frites tender and delicious. Made mistake of ordering absolutely delicious seasoned French fries as appetizer only to receive huge portion with my meal. Salmon sautéed in spicy butter sauce fork tender and not overdone. Mocha mousse prepared in advance had a slight refrigerator taste. But other choices made up for it. A little pricy. 
An upscale lively, fine dining restaurant with unusual and delicious offerings and wonderful wine selections.  Very expensive but great for a special occasion although I know many people who are regulars! 
We have dined at at 5 corners several times,food is is very good despite my flank steak being way over cooked and my sons burger being extremely overcooked. The rest of the food was great perfectly cooked shrimp and lobster on the shellfish platter. We ordered my sons burner with plain with nothing on it and it came out with everything on it, we sent it back. By the time they fixed the simple issue of just changing the roll out for one that was plain we were finished with our brunch items. The service was slow and mindless, the manager handled the situation poorly as well.My son is 5 and is very patient this dining experience tried all of our patience
The food and the service were excellent!  The food came out quickly, and we were celebrating our anniversary.  At the end we were so full we could not eat the complimentary dessert, but our waiter graciously boxed it up for us to take home!  Will definitely be going back!

I do wish it was a bit brighter inside to capture the pictures of food taken for TripAdvisor ;)
For a mid-week dinner to celebrate our anniversary we selected one of our favorite  restaurants - 5 Corners Kitchen in Marblehead. We had reservations and were seated without delay. My wife saw an old friend and mentioned that we were celebrating our anniversary. Apparently one of the waitstaff heard the conversation and brought two flutes of sparkling wine - very nice touch.

Our server, Alyssa, was wonderful - offering excellent recommendations when asked; knowledgable and attentive without being intrusive.  

I chose to start with the corn chowder, a finely puréed smoked corn soup garnished with bacon and sliced jalapeño peppers which added a nice kick. This creative use of ingredients made this chowder complex and absolutely delicious.

My wife ordered the mixed green salad with almonds, green beans, shallots and radishes. A fresh starter to the meal.

My main course was the steak frites which was perfectly cooked, tender with a delicious pan sauce accompanied by Asian inspired Brussels sprouts - a nice contrast to the salty sweetness of the caramelized steak.

My wife selected the house-made pasta paired with a flavorful pesto sauce and charred broccoli. 

Food, presentation and service was flawless. What occurred after we left further demonstrated the focus on customer service. I had not finished my steak and asked Alyssa to pack it up for me. I commented to Alyssa how much I enjoyed the pan sauce and without asking she added a container of the sauce with the to-go package. I had set the bag on the floor and inadvertently forgot it. Alyssa found the bag, pulled up our reservation, found our number and called us. That is extraordinary service.


We've been here several times, and will keep coming back.  The staff is always friendly, the beer is always good, and the frequent rotations keep it fresh.  Always something new to try.  The food has been consistently good as well, especially the fish tacos, pork tacos, and salads.
The craft beer selection is well selected and perfect for those wanting something different and locally sourced. The inclusion of a bowl of tater tots only enhanced this fine brew experience. Check it out.
I love the Burgers, its a real gastropub.  I haven't tried anything else because the burgers are so good.
Had a casual dinner her with family.  Nice selection of craft beers on tap.  Fried avocado was interesting.  Sliders read well but were pretty average.  Good service.  Was '80s theme night which was fun.  Solid local hangout.
Their burgers are exceptional, especially the farmhouse burger. They have great selection of beer on tap. However, I am not a huge fan of the salads or wines, and find the ambience to be lacking. But for a super casual night it can really hit the spot.
The burgers are awesome.  Everything else looks great.  It is very casual, but a nice walkable location right down town.  

But every time I go here - mostly for lunch on the weekends -  it seems like they are an employee short.  To the point where it's pretty noticeable once they are even close to half way full.  If they get even a small rush, there is usually only the bartender out front, which just plain isn't enough!  

Anyway, I hope the owners will take this as constructive criticism.  Food-wise you are the best occupant of that space since Jake Cassidy's.  (Hence my four stars).  But  I think you need to step up your game with your staffing.  Keep it in line with the quality of everything else and you will be 4+ stars in my book!
Love this place.  They have the BEST beer selection in town - The Left Hand Milk Stout on the nitro tap is amazing - Make sure you ask for the correct glass - Make the world of difference.

The burgers are great - the tots are amazing and they also offer the option to swap out the fries or tots with the Avocado fries - Try them you can not go wrong.
There are some things you miss when you have to give the old wheat and gluten-oriented grains a miss for health issues. Besides donuts, I miss Big Macs. Well, the Manny Mac at The Barrelman satisfied my longing which I never thought possible. And, I'm sure this burger is made with more care and superior ingredients, than its fast food counterpart. 

I deem this restaurant as a great burger pub on the food level, and has a local feel, not upscale, but welcoming.
Great Hamburgers and drinks, located in the center of Downtown Marblehead.  Usually, there are no waiting to get in.
We are always impressed with the specials menu created by the chef.  He pairs the most amazing things together.   I had the turkey burger stuffed with pear and goat cheese, it had a wonderful sauce lightly drizzled over it, topped with arugula.  The desserts are homemade and always delicious.  They burgers are outstanding.  Love the avocado fries.  It is a warm, cozy place to go.  The servers are attentive and friendly.
My friend and I arrived in town late on a Friday night.  After a day of traveling we were looking for a good, quick dinner.  The service was very friendly and the burgers were wonderful!  My friend in gluten intolerant and they had a gluten free bun option for her burger that she said tasted like real bread.  That's high praise!
I'm a local resident and wanted a take out order...I had a glass of wine and ordered appetizers to take home...I asked the kitchen gentleman and went with his suggestions...The Bar attendant was very weak in his attending to the customer... I questioned his rudeness...When the bill and take out came I had left a $10.00 tip.... I took the tip back because he told me he didn't want my money....His name was Lonny, Sunday Sept. 21, 2014  ... Not to worry I will never be back !!
Stopped in here for a late lunch and received a friendly greeting from Christopher who was the host, bartender and our server.  He was the only person we saw working there (presume a cook was out back).  

My partner went with the Fish Tacos which she felt were good, but not the best she has ever had.  I went with the Gourmet GrilledCheese Sandwich which I do believe might be the best one I have ever had.

The good food and the great service we received from Christopher made it a very pleasant eating experience.  We would go back.  
Not impressed with the revamp or menu. This is a tough location in  which many restaraunts have come and gone. I think it is the new family place in town, kids running everywhere on our visit. Which is ironic, it being a burger and beer joint. Burgers were average as well as the fries, nothing to write home about or worth a second visit. Just to many better places in town.
We stayed at the "Pink House" B&B in Marblehead, MA. We asked for recommendations for dinner and she suggested another place , that I'm sure would have been great! BUT it's cold out and this place smelled like delicious hamburgers! So we ducked in out of the briskness and had a great meal of "sweet potato chile & lime tortilla soup" & the fresh pizza with avacado, chicken, cheese, bacon, onion, oh I dunno a bunch of yummy stuff, both from the specials. We had 2 PBRs each at 2.50 per, cannot beat that price! Our server Nicole was sweet! We would come back if we didn't live in Florida!
We went on a Saturday evening and they were pretty busy but there were a couple tables available. We waited by the hostess stand for several minutes before being acknowledged. Then we were told to wait several more minutes. When we were seated we waited several more minutes before getting menus or a drink order. We finally ordered burgers and the fish tacos. The food was very good and hot when we got it. Burgers are around $12 and come with fries that are also tasty. I hope they hire more help so I can return.
Bon p'tit resto bien sympathique, accueillant et conviviale. Très bonne nourriture faite maison. Pas cher. Discussion intéressante avec la barman
Miraculous home-made pasta. Miraculous home-made mushroom & chilli sauce (beware: it packs a punch). Miraculous service. 

A lovely Italian-American family own this restaurant and the personal touch is abundant in everything they cook and serve. The lighting too is perfectly ambient and romantic; and the seating classy and spacious. 

The cold-meat starter was the only a la carte item we had, our entrees were daily specials. So I recommend doing as we did: be bold and let the excellent chef serve you his signature dishes for that evening. 

This is a gem of a restaurant and we are so glad we chose it above higher ranked places. 

Tip: the cold meat or veggie platter appetisers for "one" easily satisfy two people. 

Tip: a side dish of pasta is an option with the meat and fish entrees. So ask for the home-made fusilli as an accompaniment instead of the usual salad side. 
The most amazing Italian I've ever had. The owner and his wonderful staff don't just stop with the food, service to please. Everything about this establishment is first class. I highly recommend repeat visits!! Looking forward to my next visit to Marblehead, MA just to come eat!! Thank you!!!
We had the pleasure of visiting this restaurant with friends that we were visiting in Marblehead Mass.  So inviting.  The people are so friendly and welcoming.  Menu was so great.  We tried the octopus which is actually more of a salad but incredible and the spicy salmon was the best ever!  Perfectly flavored and NICE PORTIONS!   Had the stuffed veal which was also amazing and being gluten free they had gluten free pasta that tasted like real pasta!!!!   The sauce was the greatest as well!!!   Desert was a 10 as well but all the dishes were incredible.  I want to come back to Marblehead just to have dinner there again LoL.  Thank you !!!!  Perfect and great menu !!!
It really was a lovely restaurant to be reunited, I had not seen my daughter in a week and it was perfect! The service, food, and venue were impeccable l!
Had dinner here with my wife and sister/brother-in-law.  Wife's octopus salad was stunning in taste and presentation.  My charcuterie was well excecuted and a bit unusual, with pickled eggplant and eggplant croquettes.  My wife's entree of seafood pasta was very good and my Calabrese pasta with pork ragu was excellent.  I would get the same meal again without hesitation.  My sister and her husband split the "mini" calzones, which came as three, which together would make an entree sized calzone.  They were only average.  My brother in law was not a fan of his porkchop,  OK wine selection and OK cocktails.  The guy next to us raved about the pasta carbonara.  We are not local but if we were, this would be a regular stop.
Arrived late at the bar and enjoyed several appetizers. Of outstanding note was the eggplant rotini. Not sure how the sauce was constructed but the freshness and sweetness of the tomato dressing was amazing. Portion size was perfect. 
White table cloths and candles add style to this friendly small restaurant .Good food overall, but the Octopus appetizer salad a stand out. My linguine in oil and garlic was OK. Clams fresh but sauce a little bland. Great cocktails. Ask for a seat in the window if you want a bit more room. Will go back.
Just moved to Marblehead, was walking around looking for a place for brunch.
 Several restaurants saw us looking in the windows but did not acknowledge us because we were a bit early.
 We happened upon Casa Mia they were very welcoming gave us menus to look at, and welcomed us with a smile.
We had an incredible brunch!
 The food was fresh, the service was great and welcoming!

 We then went to Italy for two weeks and the next day we were back for Father's Day brunch which was incredible again!  Almost like we were back in Italy it was that good!

 So happy that there is an excellent Italian food restaurant in Marblehead !  This really is a must try.
I highly recommend it.
Excellent family-owned Italian restaurant in the heart of Marblehead.   My wife had the authentic Sicilian salad which was the first course winner.  The pasta special of homemade fusilli with shrimp, cauliflower and tomatoes was outstanding, as were the strawberries with whipped cream, balsamic vinegar and pepper.  Service was very friendly and attentive.
The service was bad - inattentive, robotic. We waited 30 minutes for our meal. We asked the busboy how much longer we had to wait. The server was busy chatting with friends. We were not offered a second drink or the wine list. Dirty glasses remained on the table long after the drinks were finished.
Lukewarm, overcooked roasted potatoes, bland fish dish.
Casa Mia is a small Italian restaurant in the heart of Marblehead. The food is very good; we particularly enjoyed the vegetarian appetizer plate and the two salmon dishes. Service was friendly and helpful, though a bit slow. The biggest drawback is that the restaurant is extremely noisy, although on balance, this is a nice dinner option.
We brought my mom here for brunch on Mother's Day.  A bit of a risk since we'd never even tried it here before, but it paid off.  Everyone enjoyed their meal, and the service was excellent.  

Starting with drinks, the Bloody Mary was excellent with just the right amount of horseradish.  The Bellini had real strawberry pieces in it and a wonderful sweetness.  For our meal, my mother had a frittata, I had a  vamp on eggs Benedict, (with prosciutto), and she had a salad.  As were very good and everyone was happy.  For dessert, we had the house made spumoni made with gelato and encased in a rich dark chocolate shell.  It was a wonderful finish to a really good meal.  

Throughout brunch, service was excellent.  We never felt rushed nor forgotten.  Our server was pleasant and the team delivered promptly and professionally.  Events such as Mother's Day can be tough because they are so fraught with expectations, but Casa Mia was up to the challenge.  We are glad we took the chance and came here.
First time here and had been sooo looking forward to it.  What a disappointment!! Food was good as was service, until a very large and VERY NOISY RUDE group of young girls came in.  They completely ruined our dinner with how loud they were as we, as well as others dining, couldn't even hear ourselves talking.   What was worse is our server told us that they couldn't say anything to them!!!  Not sure if they knew the owners but they obviously were more important to the owner and staff than the others dining.  Wouldn't go back because of this.  Totally unacceptable that management or owner of this place couldn't be a REAL manager or owner !!! If you want a nice quiet meal, DON'T go here !!! (and this was early evening not late!!)
Limited seating means you really should book a table, but if you go very early you may get lucky.  We enjoyed the excellent service almost as much as the superb food.  The house-made pasta was like silk, and the flavors were intense (in the very best way).
On an overnight to Marblehead this week, our innkeeper highly recommended Casa Mia as a dining option. Thankfully, we were in the mood for Italian or we would have missed out on this charming little Italian restaurant. We eat out a lot. And by a lot, I mean A LOT! And if we didn't live 100 miles away from this place, we would be frequent guests at this establishment. We had one of those meals where flavors linger and you don't want it to end! When it did, we topped it off with some delicious  (and homemade) limoncello. Wonderful experience! Excellent wait staff, too. Hope to get back there someday soon.
We've eaten here often with out-of-town guests. They are always impressed by the delicious food, even commenting that it's the best food they've had since going to Italy! Always happy with quality, taste and service.
Very good Italian food but they do pack a lot of people in and the service on both occasions was marginal.  A bit slow and a bit forgetful.
We loved the food and the service was very good.  Can be noisy, especially on the "porch", but only if a large group out there at one table.  Otherwise, a lovely place  with a nice wine list too.
Friends told us there was a new Italian Restaurant in Marblehead. On arrival we were pleased to find a vibrant energetic dining room with drop-ins waiting for a table. In spite of the line our reservation was honored immediately. The service was timely and the staff helpful. The menu although limited provided a variety of options. The food advertised as made to order and authentic Calabrian was plentiful, tasty, and arrived fresh and warm from the kitchen. The fish was excellent and the risotto spectacular. Wine and food prices were moderate.

Can't wait to return
The food reminded us very much of meals we have experienced in Southern Italy.  And the service was extremely friendly and helpful.  They allowed us plenty of time to enjoy some good wine prior to ordering.
I used to live in hull.Every few years I get back. For 50 years whatever kid they can get to run the fryer at this shack, produces perhaps the finest whole bellied clams anywhere. It's nuts how great their product is. This is beach food at it's best. Worth a trip to the end of the world just to taste the fried clams again. unreal
This is the type of place you crave to go back to.  They have ever great burgers, callous, onion rings, etc.  I have never had bad service or food.  Ther are only a few seats, all outside and casual.  The views are amazing, right on the water.  I highly recommend them.
What a fantastic view. Grab a burger, hot dog fisherman platter or ice cream.  Sit outside walk to the pier or wait for the commuter boat. Go early closes early.
Morning breakfast on the go or at one of the tables.  At lunch you can get great burgers, sandwiches and fish to go or out at the picnic tables next to the water.  Beautiful vistas and great vibe.  Convenient to the ferry to Boston. Or enjoy a lobster dinner on a summer night!  On weekend morning when the sun is out - expect a bit of a wait.  Relax and enjoy watching the boats go by!
If I said Pemberton Bait & Tackle was one of my favorite stops for lunch, folks would laugh.  But is is - when we're kayaking on Boston Harbor and need a great place to pull up for a rest.  Land just below Hull Gut on the beach (The enormous wind turbine makes it impossible to get lost) and right there at the ferry landing is Pemberton Bait and Tackle.  There's covered or open  outside eating in a casual and fun environment, or take your food to the beach. They serve inexpensive  burgers, sandwiches, seafood and excellent french fries.  Veggie options are few but there are some, like a grilled cheese.  Restrooms are clean.  Service is  polite and about average for speed.  They close up shop pretty early, so don't plan on dinner there.  
Enjoy a fine lunch by the water  - no, they don't serve you bait!
Every time I come to Boston / Quincy, I have to visit L Street Pizza for my fix of steak 'n Cheese.  I have had them elsewhere but no where near as good.
It's a true local food place, down to raising funds for the local sports teams.
I had not ordered ahead an had to wait less than 5 minutes for my food at a busy time.
We often order a variety of tasty pizzas delivered to reward our volunteers.  Recently a team of volunteers worked late and we came in for dinner and loved the gyros and the garlic bread.  There was a constant stream of people coming in to pick-up their take-out.  Great service too in their clean and inviting shop.
Great piZa, and other food is really good too.  It's really more of a take out place or a place for sit down lunch.etc, but very good quality and value.  And they deliver!
This place has a very good menu, so you can find most anything you might want for lunch. I chose the veal grinder and it tasted great.
Listen weather your on the beach or home
This place is a good pick they will del to the beach 
The pizza is good there subs are good 
Listen it's a sub shop and there a good one
I've been here twice this season and the food was very good.  Service was good.  A little pricey, but you must consider the location... best view in Hull/Nantasket.  A nice overall experience.   Parking along the bayside is recommended if you have trouble finding a spot..
Stopped in for a coldy...slow service,semi flat beer,etc...slacking staff ( low socializers )& a vibe of snobbery towards local folk....appetizers need Major expansion,better,Lower prices....did organized mgmnt,scheduling of ANY minor form of entertainment...the C-note,Daddy's,Barefoot Bobs,red parrot or even the steakhouse across from the hotel are Better...heck,I got Vastly better service at the carousel & creamery !!!!
Meal was good but expensive.  Waitstaff friendly, owner not.  You are told immediately that where you sit is where you stay no changing tables.  Long wait for food.
We went here for lunch and sat on the outside deck, with great views of the harbor and Boston skyline in the distance. We had the fish sandwich, it was very lightly fried cod and very very fresh. Some people sitting around us had salads and said they were good. The service was quick. We will go again for dinner.
One of the best views around the South Shore of Mass.  Overlooking Marina and can see city of Boston and islands.  Its beautiful before you even order.

Menu is casual lunch menu with good selection of sandwiches, salads, and seafood.  Good drink selection with different tropical drinks.  We tried the Aloha Betty which was great.  We ordered the ahi tuna salad.  It was huge with 2 big pieces of tuna along with the greens.  Perfect.  I had the chicken pesto sandwich which was very large and tasty.  Others both had the adrienne sandwich which was chicken tenders in a wrap and it got raves reviews.  Limited dessert menu as there were only two options.  We went with the Chocolate mousse which we all shared and was a perfect ending.  Service was good.  Highly recommend for drinks or casual lunch/dinner on the south chore.  Entrees averaged about 15.00 with drinks at 12(beers 6)
After a long the at Ocean riding a boat me some friends stop.at the Art's Restaurant. We all have complements the food was good and fast and the staff was very friendly .
Keep up the good work.
Thank you 
Daniel Dantas 
Went to Art's on a family member's good revue and was not disappointed.  My husband had the seafood platter and raved about each and every ingredient.  The side of coleslaw was the best ever.  The place was very busy and I thought we were in for a long wait but our meals came very quickly.  I had the beef tacos which were excellent and so filling I could only eat 2 of the 3 served.  Excellent coffee which our attentive server over heard us complementing and told us it was Italian.  Can't wait to return.
Beautiful ocean view.  A great way to end a beach day.
My chicken was crispy and delicious. The tuna and scallops also tasty.  A place we will return to when we are in the area. Great service. Enjoyed the sangria.
So great! !  Awesome food and service.  Sat outside, great view.   Good drinks.  Ahi tuna salad and blistered peppers...sooo good.  This place is great...you won't be disappointed.   Will be back! !
The food was very good but extremely overpriced, no kids menu. I got charged $4 for soda water that other restaurants charge $0. There was my daughter & I  6yr old, 1 2yr old. The bill was $150. Seriously!!!!! My daughter got a strawberry daiquiris and it was mostly foam. That was a rip off for sure. I must say the fried clams and fried fish we had was delicious but if we had gone to Jakes we would have had double the portions for a little less money. This place won't make it unfirtunately because the local people will not pay these prices.
We had supper on a Thursday night, busy restaurant, but was well manged with the sitting and very pleasant staff.
Staff were all friendly and willing to assist from the menu to the service.
Service was quick and very efficient, Food was excellent and affordable.
Hidden Gem.....in Hull.
After a beautiful day at the beach, we changed up and walked over to Art's. We had a choice of inside or outside and we went out for the air and the sea.  It was hot and the umbrella's helped but oh well, we made the choice.  The food was very  good and service was attentive and quick.  The bar is quick and the beer was cold!  We will definitely come back.  If you are driving, the lot gets full quickly but they have an additional parking lot on A street behind the condo's -- barely a 2 minute walk away.  After your meal, you can walk out on the pier and enjoy the views close up!!
Having been regular customers to their previous endeavor, Arthur and Pat's in Marshfield Ma we wanted to visit their new restaurant Art's located on the water in Hull.  Understanding it was a Thursday night and the summer time, we arrived early, at 6:00pm and were immediately seated outside on their deck with a GORGEOUS view of the Boston skyline and the Hull marina.  FYI number one, they do not take reservations so if you want an outside table get there early or be prepared to wait.  Parking is plentiful with a over flow lot located across the street.  Just like before, Art does the cooking and his sister Dee works the front of the house.  It was great to see her again as I love her bubbly personality.  She runs a tight ship which does not agree with everyone but I love!  Her sense of humor is one of a kind!  She makes dining there a true event.  They have a full bar with specialty drinks, wine and numerous craft beers on tap and in bottle.  Unfortunately my favorite; Pabst Blue Ribbon was on the tap system on the third floor and closed at the time of our visit.  We started our meal with grilled oysters for me and a big bowl of big juicy mussels for my wife.  Both delicious.  My wife followed that with the New England classic lobster roll with french fries, $28.00(market price).  I chose to go hard with the fried lobster with french fries and cole slaw $32.00(again, market price).  Both were absolutely delicious.  First time I have ever ordered fried lobster.  Light, flaky batter covering all claw meat.  French fries were hot and crisp.  My wife ended the night with the world famous Linda's Life altering coconut cake!  This is also a carry over from the old restaurant and is a must have when you dine here.  Warning, its huge!  All in all a great first visit to our friends new spot.  
The menu consists primarily of fried seafood platters, tacos, sandwiches and burgers with two broiled entrees also available, sea scallops and haddock plus nightly specials.
Being a casual restaurant with the type of menu they have some people have rated them poorly as expensive, too many rules etc.  There is a price to be paid for the spectacular view one has on the deck.  Find out for yourself that dining at Art's is an experience not to be missed.  There is no better view at sunset of the Boston skyline.
My sister and I just returned from lunch at Art's......his clam chowder is uniquely his.......and I still love it!!!!
We shared a seafood platter which was more than enough for two.....nicely done.....good seafood.....good service ( and it was our waitress' first day!!!)
Good to see De and a Art.....and we will be there again!!!
We had great time here with my son's in-laws and grandparents in-laws. The food is great, enjoyed them so much. the service is top of class and the setting is nice too, lots of arts and crafts. Plus the ocean view is unforgettable.
If you are lucky enough to score (they dont take reservations) a table on the outdoor terrace there is quite a view of the Boston skyline and the sunset.  

The food is nothing spectacular - we had fish and chips. and, we ordered a Mexican ear of corn which cost $7.00 - a total ripoff - we should have known better!!!

Their dessert claim to fame is the "life changing coconut cake" - which could be quite "life changing" since it is mounded with frosting that (my guess) is pure shortening with sugar - great to clog your arteries and guaranteed to change your life for sure if you eat too many of these cakes!

The indoor setting is like a beer hall and quite noisy - so do not plan to eat there if you are looking for quiet intimate setting.
Went for dinner Saturday evening. While waiting for a table, sat at the bar and ordered a margarita and red sangria. Had to request another drink - the margarita as it was bitterly sour.  

After a long wait, we ordered dinner at the bar but we're shortly thereafter told that our table was ready.  When we went to claim our table, we told the hostess that we would like to transfer our bar order to our table. We were told that we couldn't transfer the tab and would have to give up our table. 

After a prolonged discussion with the hostess who doesn't know what customer service means, the bartender was helpful and transferred the tab and we went to our table outside. 

The location, views of Hull Harbor and sunsets are the reason to go to Art's. 

The food was mediocre. We had a lobster grilled cheese sandwich and a scallop, bacon and cheddar sandwich - okay but nothing special. At $20 a plate, it's overpriced. Desserts were limited to three. We chose the chocolate mousse - it was probably the best part of the meal. 

The staff service was mixed - bartenders and our waitress were good but the issue with the hostess offset that service. 

In summary, the owner and management of Art's really needs to get their act together. I won't return for dinner. I suggest you go only for the sunsets, beer and wine. 

P.S.  Attached is a picture of the view and picture of the "rules of the deck" for sitting outside that was on our table. The view is great but the rules are indicative of the need for the owner, management and staff to have a training in customer service. 
Came here for dinner with my family. Service was good, people were friendly, but unfortunately the food sucked. Horrible clam chowder, disappointing fish tacos & less than desirable cocktails. We will not be back. 
Run by the former owners and operators of Arthur and Pat's restaurant in Brant Rock Marshfield - regular annual winners of Best of Boston. The new restaurant in Hull is on its way to becoming again one of the best and this time with an amazing view.  Art's is a much bigger restaurant than the former Arthur and Pat's in Marshfield and so it comes with some growing pains - Arty can't cook ever meal himself, so he is working to train and transfer his craft to his assistants.  One thing  that hasn't changed is the amazing lobster soup - a must try.
This is our second time at Art's. Disappointed once but we like to give a second chance. Tried one of the specials. It was over cooked and very dry. Barely ate it. A server asked if everything was ok replied "no". They took it away and not even offer another plate. 200 dollars for four people go to Bridgemans for that money and you will not be disappointed.
Most people probably don't bother to review a dunkin' donuts but everyone here was so curious and in the four days and probably nine visits here not one mistake was made with our orders. Whoever did the hiring in this store did a great job.  Wonderful crew of young adults. Thanks
Within walking distance from the hotel. Everything that you expect from Dunkin. Parking available, drive through, Friendly people...
we went to the drive thru  around 8 at night after my daughters wedding to get some donuts for the trip back to Rochester NY in the morning they asked for our order at the speaker we asked for a half dozen assorted and they said were out of donuts. I just sat there for a couple of minutes not even knowing what to say. asked why they were open and was told they had coffee.  Don't like their donuts anyways.long live Tim Hortons
right across from beach.  clean and staff is friendly.  has drive through.  all kinds of food offered as in other dunkins
I had been walking the beach in Nantasket [part of Hull] and wanted ice tea. Simple, right? First, I had to drive around the one-way traffic patterns of the area to figure out where to get into D&Ds. I have a Dunkin Perks card that I activated recently because so many Dunkin sales associates in other stores encouraged it. When I checked, I had a virtual coupon for a .99 cents iced tea...any size. Perfect. I asked for the tea and presented the coupon that was on my phone app. The app that I was told to activate at another D&D. Well...the sales associates were very nice and very helpful. It took four of them to figure out how to get the iced tea. What was not nice was the group of three older men who clearly did not want to wait while the sales associates figured this out. I was so embarrassed, I was almost crying. I said I'd just leave and get nothing. At that point no glass of iced tea was worth the ranting going on behind me. I quickly discovered that it was only one of these guys and the others were embarrassed by him. 

Once I had my iced tea and was leaving another customer in the store came over and empathized. She said no one should be treated like that. It did make me feel better. 

I do recommend that if D&D is going to offer a phone app for perks and encourage you to use it, all D&D employees should be trained in how to use them.
This quick restaurant is always consistent and obliging. Great American Chinese food. Would love what the owner does with more traditional  Asian foods... pork intestine is one of my favorites and there is always room for tripe and and turnip
We ordered food from Hull jade in hull ma.  It took an hour we live a mile away and it had been refried who knows how many times the first bite cut the top of my mouth .  I called and explained she said hold on then hung up.  Here is a pix of the food. 
Hull Jade serves up perfectly decent American-style Chinese food.  I don't think there's any AMAZING Chinese food out there, so if there's a Chinese restaurant where I haven't had a bad experience, it gets four stars.  (I'm still waiting for the one that knocks me on my butt to use that fifth star/circle up there.)  I've never regretted an order at the Jade, never felt queasy later, never had a bad experience there.  The service is great, delivery is fast, and the price is right.  It's our solid, go-to Chinese place.  Far better than Imperial Terrace over in Quincy lately.  Food is about the same level as the Cathay Pacific, but lower prices.  I love the crab rangoon and spring rolls, and the pad thai is actually decent.  My husband says all the chicken options, the boneless ribs, and the beef with mushrooms are tasty.
Sometimes you just want some Chinese food.  Hull Jade has recently improved in both take out and when we decide to eat lunch at one of their 2 tables.  We turn down the TV and have some tea and the inexpensive, tasty hot lunch specials are delivered to our table.  The gruff smoking man was replaced by a taciturn youth woman and now by a very pleasant younger man.  Is he why the food tastes better now?  The cooks always look up when someone comes in.  Maybe they do a better job when you nod to them.  Whatever it is keep it up!
As good as you'll find and reasonable enough pricing.   Never had a bad dish from here.   Strictly take out... Too bad, but like I said the food is just fine.
We were unfortunate enough to order a take out meal from Hull Jade last Friday night.  It was the worse take out I have ever eaten.  We ordered 5 different dishes between 3 of us - which cost $60 (plus tip).   The food was delivered to our house.  The driver refused to allow me to take the food bags from him until he had  counted the money.   Where was I going to run to????    I ordered a starter of Fried Jumbo Shrimp.  There were about a dozen shrimp in the bag - each one similar in size to half a worm encased in a thick soggy batter - the size of a doughnut.   The oil oozed out of them when we prodded them.   We couldnt eat them at all.  There were 4 chicken or shrimp main courses - we found a few tiny stands of meat/fish (equivalent to a tablespoonful) between all 4 dishes.  The cartons were packed full of celery, half raw carrots and onions.  The sides of rice were inedible.  I would say 98% of the food went into the bin.  Do not eat here if you can help it.

So,  Jade Hull - you take the honour of being the worse take away I have ever eaten anywhere in the world.
As residents, we often get takeout from Hull Jade.  The House Fried Rice is particularly good, and the Thai menu items are a nice change from the usual Chinese Restaurant fare.  The food is fresh and the service is quick.
This non-descript, run-of-the-mill-looking pizza shop in Hull, MA makes some of the best pizza we've had (sounds wacky, I know!) The crust is thin and slightly charred. It is simple, yet delicious! The staff are not too friendly, but go for take-out pizza.
pizza is great, all types of sandwiches and seafood, have delivery which I love or I call in for pick up.
The restaurant was pleasant.  Employees where pleasant and accommodating.  The food is not that great.  It is an easy short cut after a cold day on the beach and late in the evening for quick bite to eat.
We returned to NewEngland for a graduation.  The fried clams with bellies are hard to find  in the south  (New England transplants miss them) but we found them at Jake's and they were delicious.  The service was friendly, the beer was cold and the atmosphere beachy.  Who says you can't go home again?  We had a fantastic time !
Run by brothers who really know how to cook. The place is big on take out with a few seats. Fried seafood dinners are excellent. big and delicious. Sandwiches are packed full of your favorite stuff and made to order just the way you want them.
Good choices for coffee. There had to be about 10-12 different kinds. There was hot and iced. They have quite the selection on bakery items. They all looked so delicious. We got bagels and muffins. The place had a bit of a line but moved quickly and worth the wait. 
The best cafe in town always busy and always fresh. the italian pastries are to die for as good as any from the North end in BOSTON, sandwiches and coffee. 
Stopped by for a snack which turned out to be the best stop of our family trip so far...had a turkey pesto sandwich which my husband and I shared...the rest of the family had muffins and my son had a grilled cheese...pretty tasty!  Had the lemon cupcake and it was the best I ever had.....the cupcake was so moist...and the lemon fill...just perfect!!! My very fussy son had a cookie and I knew it was good bc he ate the whole thing in minutes!
Sending my husband down tomorrow for another cupcake! Who cares ....I'm on vacation!!
A local hangout and affordable alternative to the beachfront places in Hull. Excellent bagels with all of the standard toppings plus a few surprises. Classic sandwiches made to order with side pickle. Old time bakery treats - all the classics. We visited Weinberg's every day during our week in Hull this summer and would do it again.
Most mornings we biked from our rental house to Weinberg's for awesome bagels and iced coffee. This bakery was a true highlight of our vacation. So glad we discovered it!
I live in Hull and always enjoy their take out sandwiches and single desserts.  recently I had to order something not on a typical menu for  a luncheon wedding cake.  Our cake order was discussed with their in house baker,a lady that was so accomodating to every idea we had..Not only was the Shell cake different,but fabulous and easy to serve.
Try the delicious pastries, my favorite is the lobster claw, or their cinnamon round bread. Fresh bagels, half moons, brownies, cookies, great to pick up for the beach or breakfast or desserts.
Weinbergs has the best bagels, great variety.  They make a round bupkee with cinnamon and raisins that's my favorite. Their challah is soft and delicious. They have all kinds of pastry. But the birthday cake which can be vanilla or chocolate or both is moist and just the best! They have seating inside so you can enjoy a cup of coffee. They also make sandwiches, check their board for all the different kinds, and sit outside on a few tables they have in front of the bakery.  Great help and the best place to go for bread or you sweet tooth!! 
great family owned bakery friendly and delicious!!! I highly recommend the lobster claw filled with delicious cram and the bagels are fantastic.
I've always loved this Bakery. Since I was a little boy and my parents would send me there in the morning to pick up fresh bread and pastries it's been a favorite of mine. I highly recommend it.
My family and I last year would walk over to the bakery for breakfast most of the mornings to get some great food like pastries,sandwiches,bagels,etc.  It is a family run business and everyone is nice and will help you at all times. My family enjoys the food a lot and we still go their whenever we go to Hull during the summer. Recommend place to go to and I would go their again.
On a three day trip (Friday to Sunday) we stopped at Weinberg's Bakery three times. Once Saturday morning for coffee/creamed horn, later Saturday for drink stop while bike riding and again on Sunday for coffee, drinks for the kids and creamed horn. 

Nice bakery - full service, sandwiches, but great pastries and coffee. Outdoor tables, plus a couple of benches in the Hull downtown area.
Sandwiches and wraps are always fresh. The prices are reasonable. I always get a pastry for after lunch, and I am never disappointed.

My husband likes the coffee here, but I don't drink coffee, so I have to trust his judgement. The turkey basil sandwich is good (very good), Caesar wrap and Mediterranean wrap are also good. They serve a nice deli pickle with the sandwiches. It's not a New York deli style pickle, but it fits.
been visiting this place off and on for nearly 60 years, nice to see it still going strong in the same location. was pleasantly surprised by the quality of the baked good. try thr black and white cookies
Some of the Italian pastries are better here than in the North End. Our young grandson turned his nose up at supermarket bagels after having Weinberg's bagels. 
this is one of our favorite places to get pastry.  Always fresh and so good.  Recommend the bagels, cream puffs, muffins, lobster tails, and cannolis....You can't go wrong
In the Kenberma area, is weinbergs which has the best bagels around. Their pastry selection is also top notch - we often get desserts to bring to parties. Great coffee selections also!
Great place to stop for a bagel on the go - definitely the best bagels you'll get in Hull - delicious.  Very limited seating and most of the time the seats are occupied by townies hanging out for an extended breakfast to gripe about everything in town - it's actually charming and gives the place that added small town flavor - wouldn't change a thing.  Nice breakfast stop
Read the reviews for this place and decided to try it while we were staying at a hotel at the beach.  We ordered bagel sandwiches for breakfast.  OMG the bagels were fantastic.  My kiddo had a bagel tuna melt and it was huge with a ton of tuna on it. The adults had bacon egg and cheese on a bagel so delicious. The homemade ice tea was really good too. There are long lines but totally worth the wait.  We even took a dozen of bagels home with us too!  Cant wait to go back this coming summer!
A trio of attributes that is not all that common.  The staff is willing to listen, and then prepare your order as requested.
The owners of this establishment make Lebanese cooking an art. All day long you can watch them prepare their dishes as you browse the deli case. I have a personal relationship with the owners and eat their food on a regular basis. You can buy their product in many local markets. Do not miss out!
Not really a "dine in" restaurant but wonderful Middle Eastern homemade dishes fresh and frozen.  You can buy them at their store location or at the Fruit Center in Hingham and Milton as well as many farmers markets on the South Shore.  Unusual combinations and very fresh delicious ingredients make this a real winner.
Having grown up with Lebanese parents and a mom and extended family who made this food at home, I found eating out in restaurants or take out like this one unappealing.  That ended with this restaurant.  It's just like mom used to make.  Definitely a treat.  If you're used to authentic Lebanese food, try this and you'll come back for more
The tastiest hummus, couscous, beet salad, falafels, cucumber salad, lentil and bean salad that you will ever eat!  The owners are friendly and courteous.  They also cater and I brought of pan of grape leaves to a party and it was a big hit!
Hull jade has good Chinese food. It is a take out only. They do deliver. The food is good. They give you good portions. I can eat for three days on the amount I outset for two people. The soups are good and not over salty which is good for me. Their appetizers are delicious. Everything tastes fresh not overly greasy. Not too expensive. Reasonably priced. 
The only decent Chinese food in Hull. Always easy to place an order. Food is always ready in a reasonable time. Centrally located in the shopping center of Hull. They deliver late.
This primarily takeout Chinese restaurant is our favorite for this type of food.  The cooks don't speak English but someone is always there to translate.  They'll cook special orders if you don't like something on the menu.  Their House Special Wonton Soup is the best I've ever had....including Chinatown!  The vegetables are always fresh and crunchy.  Not too much MSG either.  They deliver too!  Try it you'll like it!
Good chinese food, they deliver or you can take it out. Plenty of food , you will not go hungry. Good hot and sour soup, and good wonton soup filled with pork or chicken and lots of veggies. delicious fresh dinners.  
With two small booths this restaurant is mostly take out. Very convenient for most of Hull, either near home or on the way home. The inconsistency here is maddening. When they are good the food is very good but when they are not you will know it. Any and every time one goes here they roll the dice hoping for good quality
Want to get a good breakfast not far from the beach? Close enough so you can walk to the beach walk and all the way to the other end of the beach. Have a Fitbit? A round trip will get you10,00 steps. It was Sunday morning around 9:30AM so was quite delighted that it was just a 5 minute wait. They are on the wait list honor system that does allow for some inline cutting.  Now Diner offer a very reasonable, consistent quality and quick service. However, if ambiance charm is what you seek you may be disappointed. It is a good functioning diner that hold to the fast food tradition that existed before fast food restaurants existed.  Breakfast was the standard faire eggs, pancakes, omlettes. Pricing was very reasonable. And the key question - Would I go back - absolutely.
We could not have breakfast at our hotel, so we went to the Saltwater Diner.  Good food, decent prices very friendly staff.  This restaurant is open until 2pm only.  The portions are generous.
We love breakfast. Stopped in for a late breakfast. We had a great meal. Good size portions. The restaurant is clean and bright. While we were there we got a look at the food people were ordering for lunch which also looked good. We took notice of the onion rings and had to get them. We love thin crispy rings. These were the best we have had in a long time. We will go back soon for lunch.
I was delighted by the local flavor, the generous plates, the specials, the reasonable prices.  I had the fish and chips, which were as good as anywhere.  The burgers looked great from across the table, and the corned beef special a few weeks ago was bountiful.

It's very nice to site in a diner where it seems the owner knows most people.  Most people eating there knew someone else.  The owner visited the table, and likely will know me when I go back.
Very nice local spot. Great food. Pleasant staff. Fast service and everything was great. No complaints. Just a good home cooked meal.  
Reasonable prices,... Always have had good service..for good food.   
Just wish they would clean up the upholstery on the booths.
Let me start with this - I love diners. I believe that they are keys to maintaining the character of a town, especially in New England. The Saltwater Diner is a classic reflection of this longtime beach destination. The ceiling is the original pressed tin, the local patrons at the counter greet you with a friendly nod or hearty 'Good Morning', and seating choices are booth or counter. The waitress has a wide smile and coffee ready to pour. The food is hearty and plenty, arriving quickly off the grill, and very reasonably priced. I had breakfast here two days in a row, sitting at the counter on Friday early morning solo and on Saturday mid-morning in a booth with my husband. The service and food was equally good both days, despite it being very busy on Saturday. 

If you are in the Scituate area, I highly recommend having breakfast or lunch here at least once. There are no views and it isn't fancy. It is a wonderfully real, 'working' diner, that is frequented by locals because the food is good, people are nice, and it is comfortable. 
We went off season for breakfast. There were 3 of us and we ordered ordinary breakfast item; eggs, coffee, breakfast sandwiches. The food was OK, but service was a little bit off. The waitress made a slight mess on our table when she spilled something, and one would think she would have wiped it up, but we were left to wipe her spill ourselves. She was young, maybe that was the problem.

I'd eat there again, but just wouldn't expect anything fantastic
The Saltwater is a great local business and the people's breakfast spot.  If I wake up craving eggs that are perfectly cooked with a quality side of home fries, this is the place.  It's in a cute spot in the Kenberma "downtown" stretch of Hull and opens at 6 for the early birds to get an affordable, well-made first meal of the day.  Neither the decor nor the menu is fancy or special, but the restaurant is clean and pleasant, and what they do is done well.  If you make a habit of walking around with your nose in the air, you'll be happier elsewhere.  We don't make it there for lunch often, but I've never been disappointed by their simple & serviceable sandwich options and sides.  Good cup of coffee, too.
This is a lost opportunity because this place could be FABULOUS and serve a community that needs an amazing local spot !!!  Great name, great location!
This is an all american diner!!!...And I litterally ate off the food twice!! The portions are large and filling...food is very good. I had the french toast with eggs bacon and sausage it was enough for Barry and I to share...And does not put a dent in the pocket at all...reallyenjoyed :)
A nice variety of tasty diner food with daily specials.  You can have breakfast at lunch time when you want.  Very pleasant and experienced staff. Willingness to prepare your food just the way you want it!  Reasonably priced.  Open for breakfast and lunch.
If you are looking for a good plate of eggs, served with a smile, this is your spot. Comfort food and hot coffee served under an antique tin ceiling. Seating is booths or old-fashioned stools at the counter.
Food had no taste to it. Chicken fingers meat was tough n taste funny, vegetable lo mein had no taste duck sauce made it better.. Long wait. No napkins..
Since my last review said they were still closed I thought I better correct this since they have been back in operation again for a couple of months now.
Every so often this restaurant goes dark while the owner starts a new restaurant in another community.  When he is done he will reopen again.  I look forward to when it opens again as the food and service are good.
Good flavor for a standard combo.  Rice was cooked perfect and i liked the sauces for the boneless ribs as well as the teriaki sauce. Combo was around $7.  
All I can say is what we ate here for lunch rivaled the lunches we had in town.  And we could eat on the beach!  So top that, Boston.
Right across the street from where we stayed (Nantasket Beach Resort). Everyone was so friendly. Food was really good! Reasonably priced! Everything we ordered was great! My daughter (3 yrs old) had a little tantrum because she wants PB&J 3 meals a day... The cashier heard her and went out of her way to walk over and asked my daughter if she would like a PB&J! She totally didn't have to do that, but it made my daughter so happy!!! 
Short walk about a block from the beach, and enjoyed a really delicious lunch in nice cafe setting.  Had an amazing roast lamb sandwich on fresh, hot ciabatta roll with onion and pickles, served with salad and chips on the side.  We also ordered the flatbread with roasted vegetables.  Flatbread came really hot & crispy, and the vegetables were incredible.  The flatbread does take a few minutes (about 15) but well worth the wait.  We'll definitely be back the next time we're in Hull.
We've been told the food is "pretty decent bar food for what you pay", so on an off-season night my husband and I decided to stop in, hoping to sit at the bar and talk to some people while eating low-key food and having a couple drinks.  We walked in, and the bar didn't have two empty seats together, so we poked our heads into the "dining room" (really just an area with tables, only separated from the bar by a low wall), but it was completely empty, not a waitress or patron or hostess in sight, not to mention dark and uninviting.  We hovered around the bar for a few more minutes, but the bartender didn't so much as look up, and nor did any of the very somber regulars seated there.  Ten minutes of zero acknowledgement - despite circling the bar twice and looking obviously questioning and hesitant - and we finally left.

I was sad about it since a few locals have been advocating for the place on one of Hull's local FB pages, but they should worry more about hiring an attentive staff who cares about the future of the business.  We're locals ourselves and want to keep as much business in Hull as possible, but I'm not going to waste my time or money at a place that doesn't even greet customers and let them know where to sit.  If you want a convivial local bar atmosphere with good food, take your money down the road to Schooner's, where we ended up having a great meal that night and good conversation with neighbors and friends.
We live nearby and have been meaning to go for awhile. This restaurant operates in a long established local watering hole and offers daily specials as well as a decent menu. We ordered homemade handcut onion rings that were easily the worst I've ever had. The membrane part near the stem of the onion that should be discarded were dipped in batter and brought to our table. No one seemed to notice that we left more on our plate than we ate. The pizza on the other hand was better than average, well worth getting in the future after our favorite pizza place closes for the winter. This place is clean, well lit and roomy and our waitress, Jamie was vrry nice and amicable.  There were items on the menu that we would like to try so we will go again but for me its two strikes and you're out. This place could easily become somewhere i would only go for pizza.
food is good, drinks are cheap and the people nice and friendly. I like sitting at the bar and chit chatting with the locals and finding out what's happening in Hull.
There's not much room in this place; in fact, it's all deck. I'm not sure how they do it when it gets crowded, but we went off-hours. I suspect the younger crowd loves it when it gets crowded outside, and I know they offer live music later in the day.  The food was FABULOUS. Really. All kinds of fish tacos, and we enjoyed it that we could just purchase one -- if that's what you want.  Onion strings -- yum. And a BIG glass of wine. Friendly, comfortable service. If you find yourself in Hull, you MUST go to Hull's Kitchen -- a great name, by the way. But don't drive fast, you might miss it!  So DON'T MISS IT!
We have eaten here many times with family and friends over the 2016 season. The food is fresh, delicious and a menu variety that will satisfy any beach food pallet. The atmosphere is relaxing with live music and a fabulous view of the Atlantic Ocean. A great place to drink, eat and people watch from the front deck. 
We had a great time and look forward to next season. We are sorry to see Hull's Kitchen close on Labor Day but Thank Jane and Jeff for a wonderful experience. 
See you next season 
Great music, right on the beach! The food was all delicious! The cocktail sauce that came with the shrimp cocktail was awesome! Pulled Pork Sandwich was really good! Lobster tacos were great! Kids loved it! Nice casual beach vibe! Would definitely go back!
We went here with friends and sat on the front porch on the bar stools overlooking the ocean.  Service was great!  The host was very helpful (didn't catch his name).  There was a 20 minute wait, but he took our number so he could call when our table was ready.  It's a casual (expect disposable utensils and wine in plastic cups) fun stop.  The view is gorgeous, assuming you sit where we did.  They also have tables in the back where you can listen to live music.  The lobster roll was very good.  I wish it came with a side of fries, but not a big deal.  I probably could have ordered them separately.  Everyone else (we were a party of 4) ordered the fish tacos.  No complaints -- smiles all around.  I learned they are closing for the season this Labor Day weekend.  I wish they would stay open at least through September.  We'd definitely go back.
We ate a delicious dinner here! We liked our waitress very much and the food was fabulous, although it took a long time to receive it. I mentioned that I was starving to our very lovely waitress and a minute later an angry and sweaty owner/cook/woman scolded me for my impatience in a way that almost made me walk out of this cute restaurant. I was glad I didn't, coz the food was yummy but really? I felt embarrassed and mortified to be spoken to that way. Bummer me out 👎🏼👎🏼
After spending some time in Costa Rica at the beginning of the summer and eating fish tacos almost everyday I was in need of one by mid August! I hadn't been to Hull's Kitchen in a couple years but remembered that I really enjoyed there food. 
Happy to report that their fish tacos are still great and my craving was satisfied!!! My son had the foot long hotdog on a toasted hotdog bun....it looked delish! 
We took our food to go and ate it across the street on the beach but I'm sure we would have really enjoyed eating it there also. There was some live music and the atmosphere is relaxed and friendly.
Play boardgames while waiting for your food. Relax on the deck to soft music. Enjoy a selection of unique dishes. Hull's Kitchen has a limited number of seats under a covered deck and the remainder on an uncovered deck. There is no inside seating. The dishes are expensive and in some cases small. I had the seafood and chorizo special, which left me hungry and I am not a big eater. However, the waitstaff is top and atmosphere nice and relaxed, so it is worth the visit.
Service was excellent!! Drink was good very small for 10.00. I ordered shrimp and fries the shrimp were very plump and the shoestring fries were greasy. 6 shrimp and greasy fries 16.99 def. not worth that amount of money.
My husband and I enjoy this delicious little spot after catching some sun and waves at the beach. The fish tacos are very good; I dream about them during the winter! Definitely worth a trip! Nice selection of beer and drinks. The view from the deck is great too!
After a swim and beach walk, we sat down for Hawaiian beer on tap and delicious fish tacos. very friendly staff.
The bar is located on the main strip of Nantasket Beach.  There's a little deck on the side / back of the restaurant.  The food is mainly fried seafood, good, but not great.  The thing that made this place good when we visited was the fantastic service.  The prices were high for a fried food place and the food was in cardboard trays.Good beer selection.
After spending most of the day on the beach, we were looking for a spot to grab drinks and food that didn't require us to change out of our beach cover-ups.  We stumbled upon Hull's Kitchen and found the perfect spot! The food and drinks were very good.  The fried seafood is perfectly battered and not overly fried.  Everyone in my party kept commenting about the fact that it wasn't too greasy or overly battered.  The service was fantastic.  Our waitress was incredibly friendly and very helpful!The entire restaurant is outside and has great ocean views!  We will absolutely be coming back!
3 of us went for mostly seafood; fish tacos, fish n chips, chicken-cheddar sandwich(me).  Sat outside on raised seats at table, nice breeze.  Food ok, good outside atmosphere.  live guitar music in background nice.  the bill for the 3 of us with drinks was $76.
Most disappointing was the fact that they use plastic silverware and cups.  This place must generate a mountain of trash every year.  I hope they recycle...

The location is great, and the live music adds a lot, but it wound up being a $50+ dinner that didn't feel worth it.  I got one of the specials and a cocktail, and my husband got a beer and one of the grilled seafood baskets.  Both entrees were tasty, but were long on starch and very short on actual seafood (6 medium shrimp in my case, 6 quarter-sized scallops in his).  It didn't feel worth $20 apiece to me.  The cocktail was tiny, weak, and mostly ice, which again, was disappointing.

That being said, our server was friendly and everyone around us seemed thrilled with the tacos, so I would imagine if you came for a beer and some tacos you'd be a happy customer.  Just skip the higher-ticket items and soak in the ambiance.
Cheerful service. Great view. Good selection of food and spirits!  Cheers to Hulls Kitchen!  Chowder was one of the best I've ever had. 
We stopped hear for dinner after an afternoon of exploring the South Shore. It was a rainy day and unfortunately they only have outdoor seating, but it is covered and they turned on the heat lamps so it wasn't that bad. The food was very good. The lobster roll was delicious. I also tried the swordfish and fried soft-shell crab tacos. Both were well-prepared, though I found the sauce too spicy and overpowering. The prices are consistent with other seafood restaurants- not overpriced but not cheap either. Overall, a worthwhile stop if you're hankering for some ocean-fresh seafood.
We LOVE this place, I was hooked on the fried shrimp for years but last week I tried the soft shell crab taco and have been dreaming of it since....
Owners are onsite & very friendly & hands on. Great fresh food with a view of ocean! Must try. Had the beef & chicken  tacos. Delish!
Lunch on the beach is always a great treat and close by are a few eating establishments. Hull's Kitchen offers a wide and delicious assortment. Our favorites include wonderful clam chowder and awesome fish tacos. 
One of our summer favorites!  Hull's Kitchen has a wonderful Caribbean beach vibe from the colorfully painted building to the house specialty tacos.  The chef Jeff and his wife Jane are warm and welcoming and the food never disappoints.The clam chowder is the best I've ever had. Hopefully they will extend their season into the spring and fall!
Yesterday, my daughter & I had our final summer beach day on Nantasket Beach.  Nice it wasn't crowded since most kids are back to school and summer vacation over for another year.  Yet some of us still can enjoy summer beach moments.  As most beach goers, its standard to pack your own snacks.  Yet sometimes its a treat to enjoy take out places along the beach.  Daddy's Dogs is the perfect place.  Nothing fancy, just good yummy beach food fried up the right way.  My daughter had a hankering for a corndog.  Daddy's doesn't disappoint.  For $2.95 you get the tastiest doggie on a stick.  Nothing beats food on a stick at he beach!  And to go along with it, we had a HUGE fried soft pretzel with powdered cinnamon sugar.  I know not health.  But we strolled several miles up and down the beach to work off this treat.  Nantasket Beach is a great place to walk off those beach calories and enjoy the ocean!
Friends and I went there for a beer and burger....I can't remember the last time I had a cheeseburger that was so good....moist,tasty,thick....great fries also! 
I was very impressed and have raved about it to others! Good prices,friendly people....!! Casual atmosphere....go!! You won't regret it!!!
Pizza and nachos are amazing.  Staff is friendly and the restaurant offers a gorgeous view of the ocean.
We have gotten a few things here..but our favorite is pizza and nachos.  Everything they serve here however is typically very well made.  
Whether it be your first date  or your 50th anniverj andsary go dining and dancing on weekends. Weather permitting dine overlooking the beach on the deck.  You can also enjoy dinner inside either in the dining room or Surf Lounge.   If you go Sunday to Thursday the restraunt offers nightly specials. The  Surf Lounge  has   $.25 wings 7  days a week from 5 to 7 pm.  The restraunt is open for all three meals. Weekday day specials  are quite reasonable around $12.00. Other  meals are moderately hairy priced. To really impress that special someone  spend a night or two in one of the  hotel's fireplaced rooms,  The hotel is very popular .
If you are visiting Hull, and you should (especially during their endless summer event), the Paragon Grill is the place to go. The goat cheese salad was soooo good that we went back for it a second night. We had the lobster dinner one night, which included a large lobster, fingerling potatoes and a plentiful supply of delicious steamers. The lobster was so sweet that no butter was needed.  On top of the great food, the waitstaff and hostess were consummate professionals. There was also live acoustic music in the bar area on Friday and Saturday night. Loud enough to hear in the dining room but not overwhelming.  Thanks for the great time and great food. 
We had breakfast every morning at Paragon Grill.  Excellent Omlets!
Prime rib was good too at dinner but wished we said medium rare.  We said medium not their fault.
Because we stayed for 2 days in the hotel Nantusket Beach Resort, of which the restaurant is part of, we had breakfast twice and dinner once in the restaurant. Service and food are both average. The table was not cleaned when we sat at it, my eggs were done the wrong way and there were more inconsistencies. Nothing really worrying, but enough not to value this place above average. 
Ate three dinners and one lunch here. Lunch was tasty (burger). Dinner, one night out of three was ok. 
Last night was prime rib night and I was looking forward to it. No taste, very bland. 
Service all times, they were average times to get order and bring food and then each time I seemed to have been forgotten. Sat after eating for ages, close to half hour on prime rib night. 
Had breakfast at the Paragon Grill both days was in Hull. Food great. service a little slow. But, I think they might be short of help. Signs outside "Help Wanted". Be that as it may, the coffee was good. The Western omelet tasty and they got the dry ray toast just right. Would eat there again when I'm in Hull.
Had lunch in the lounge overlooking Nantasket beach while watching the storm. My wife and I were spoiled by Lisa who hooked us up with drinks. My wife's pineapple mango sangria was excellent. We had cheeseburger sliders, blue cheese wedge salads, and a fantastic rueben sandwich, made perfectly with golden fries with the skins on. The have a great lunch menu and everything is fresh.
 
https://www.tripadvisor.com/ShowUserReviews-g41620-d218569-r415047915-Nantasket_Beach_Resort-Hull_Massachusetts.html#
Love going there on Thursday after 5, they have Prime Rib for $10.95. Great value and good tasting. Comes with a 2 sides as well.
The breakfast buffet on Sunday, the food was good but the cost was nearly $50 for three people. Juice isn't even included with breakfast.
Food was generally pretty good.  Nothing to really complain about but nothing that I would write home about either.  Service was pleasant but perhaps a little slow.  
We always eat at the Grill when we stay there. The food is excellent whether you want a full dinner or bar food. Breakfast is fantastic. You can eat inside or out and the food and service is great. You can liok right at the water from where you sit. The prices are great too
We were staying in the Nantasket Beach Resort where the Paragon Grill is located.  Surprisingly good food.  Service was a little slow, but it was late afternoon, and before dinner time, so they were understandably understaffed at the time.  Haddock Tacos were fantastic.  We also shared nachos which were very good as well.  My wife had a goat cheese salad, which was great.  Daughters had a cheesesteak sandwich and chicken fingers.  Also good.  Recommended, but expensive.  
had fish for the two times we ate there and went back for breakfast try the eggs on the crab cakes for breakfast they were perfect
We stayed at the hotel here in Nantasket.   We had the shrimp cocktail,  bib blue cheese salad and the lobster plate.  All very good and priced reasonably.  
If you like eating outside they have an outdoor area.  Although,  being adjacent  to the main street isn't a plus.  The Margarita  I  ordered was average.  We ordered the lobster Rangoon.  It was also average. Small amount of lobster.  We ordered fried clams and fish tacos.  Both overcooked and the oil in the fryer needed to be changed.  The experience was good,  average at best. 
Delicious pizza.  The waitstaff was great.  The bartender John could use a little attitude adjustment!
We have been there a few times and the food is always good but last night it was the best. There were six of us and all the meals were good. We sat outside, not rushed, good service, good food what more do you want.
The atmosphere is pleasant.  The waiters are friendly. They could work on their Caesar salads. The lettuce was  not fresh and the dressing was served on the side.
nothing like a live band and dancing music!!!  We had cold beers and apps. It was so much fun to hang and mix with locals and share laughs.
I fight it every year but gave in once again and went to lunch with my wife on a beautiful day last weekend. Last year it was looking at the grease puddles under my fish. This year it was looking for my fish in the fish tacos. Are they serious? They give you 3 tacos and a slim cylinder of fish. Maybe try 2 tacos with more fish. If you're lucky like an old friend of mine who showed up, you get seated in the corner near the bldg where they stack empty beer bottles. I had offered my table cause we were finished but he had already ordered. Bottom line is the place is nothing but a parking lot with plastic tables, so so food and a place to get a cold beer at a lame outdoor bar. Thank god the beach is there across the street. Gordon Ramsey tried to change it. Maybe I'll go once again next year.
Great Pizza, especially when the owner or Nancy is cooking. They do a thin crust with a super tasting sauce. Usually get the small one, with just sauce and cheese. They also have great French Fries as well.

Perfect for a rainy evening at the beach. Wonderful pizza delivered. Adults and children very happy. Thin crust and oval shape were unusual for us and we loved it! From an 11 year old, "Who knew square pizza could be so good?"
Seriously good pizza!  New Haven style for sure.  We happened upon a special where the small cheese pizzas were $5.  We added a couple of toppings and got 2 pizzas and it was plenty for 4 of us.  Tons of toppings,and the crust had great flavor.  Bravo!  Good drinks, too!
We were in Hull for two nights for a wedding at Nantasket Beach Resort. Since Daddy's was right next-door it was the perfect place to wind down both nights. The waitress was one of the best I've ever had and never let my drink go empty. The wings were some of the biggest and most tasty wings I've had in a while. The band made you have to dance. Great people watching from the window.
We stopped in Daddy's Beach Club for pizza.   The restaurant wasn't busy, our service was excellent!  

The two pizzas came out on the oven trays they were baked on... We liked the originality.  

Nice view of the beach... Can't beat that! 

The waitress was very nice and accommodating. 
The alcohol drinks are good, food is fried and fairly limited menu with mostly fried foods.  The food is really basic with limited offerings and average taste.
Classic hole in the wall bar.  We were 2 out of 12 people in attendance.   I would guess that the other 10 were locals since they were whooping it up at the bar.  

Service was ok and price was reasonable.  

They have a delicious looking Neapolitan style pizza that they serve on large metal trays.   I would go back to try the pizza.  It looked marvelous.  
At least in the off season Daddy's, which is located across the street from the beach, is a locals bar. The Pizza is average at best. The service was good. Big Daddy's was clean.

I probably would not go out of my way to go back again.
I ordered a pizza via GrubHub, and there was some confusion about the process, so it didn't get made until after I arrived.  However, the fellow making the pizza bought me a beer (PBR on tap!!) while I waited.  I met some good folks and enjoyed watching a little basketball on the flat screen.  The pizza was pretty good.
As a visitor to Hull, I went there after the Drowned Hog polar plunge. It was a really fun bar with good pizza, live music and an ocean view. Service was really friendly. We had a blast...
Daddy's is known for their pizza and rightfully so. Located at the beach it is a hopping spot. The bar staff is friendly and welcoming the atmosphere is good the views awesome. The menu is limited as far as food but just get the pizza and a cold one. They also live music regularly. 
We hung out here during a rainy beach day. Fun place to drink and eat great food. The wings and pizza are the best. Not a stuffy restaurant like some other places in the area. Very friendly staff and good atmosphere. 
We've been to daddy's a number of times.  We prefer to get when its off season as it can get very busy in the summer months, though we have been a few times this summer.  The pizza is great and is only $5 Monday through Thursday.   Plenty of draft beers to choose from.  There is live music weekends and weekdays in the summer.
Daddy's has excellent thin crust pizza and is a super casual, kind of grungy spot.  go for a pizza and a beer and you won't be disappointed!
If your looking for a little more life than sitting and have a quiet meal Daddy's could be a go to. Live music almost every night and the Pizza is New Haven Style, delicious and a great deal. Cold beverage is a constant and the old style seaside beach pub feel is right on. During the day and early evening kid friendly, but after the sun goes down a great place to kick up some dust. Tuesday nights there is a Bluegrass Jam for a bit of a twist, but a lot of fun.
Next to Nantasket Beach Resort Hotel. We ordered takeout and brought back to our rooms. Pizza was delicious.
New Haven style pizza.  Very tasty but too expensive.  I did take out so no experience eating in the bar.
On our first night at a neighbouring resort we felt too tired to travel any further out to eat, and walked along to this place with high hopes.
On first entering I thought it was a bit noisy and was considering take away, but thankfully found the back area and stayed for what was a wonderful meal. 
Great service, some of the best (and biggest pizza) I have ate in a long time and all reasonably priced with wonderful, friendly staff. 
Sadly we didn't get to go back for a second night on our trip, but will no doubt return in the future. 
This is such a fun place with great food and drinks.  Weather permitting dine outside on the patio directly across from the beach.  You will feel like you are on vacation even if you are not.  The menu offers a lot of delicious choices from appetizers to entrees. The clam chowder is wonderful and was this year's winner of the chowderfest.  Shrimp cocktail had ten shrimp!! Terrific. All of the seafood was market price but average prices. The fried food was golden brown cooked perfect.  Broiled Schrod was very moist. There is a children's menu that includes a fountains a drink and a hoodie.  The beer is ice cold and  a large choice. of speciality cocktails are offered.  We enjoyed a magnificent sunset.
Live music , terrific outdoor seating, charming beachy decor, good food,  wonderfully friendly staff, very relaxing after a long day.
We ordered onion rings that were the best we have had.  They were crunchy but not oily at all.  The buffalo chicken wings were also very good.
We were outside on a beautiful day.  I must say it does not look like much of place but the food was very good.  It's worth it.
This time of year the go-to beach spot has to be Nantasket, and any grub spot that has beachside tables (albeit across the street from the beach) has value.  The food, well it serves its purpose to fill you up, but it's nothing worth raving. I gave this joint a 3 rating for the beach view and the breeze, otherwise it would be a 2.  That's why - just order the beer!  The better spot is on Nantasket Blvd - will review that next.
Beach grill- casual atmosphere good place to meet with friends for a related time near the beach. Check it out next time your here.

Good food and drinks after a day at the beach. The service was nice and friendly. Good casual but tasty. 
outdoor seating- across from the beach - seafood was great ! we had fried clams and scallops- average price $23 plate - worth it. Good drink selection, and about 1/2 dozen beers on tap.  
We had the fried clam strips (light batter, no bellies, delish!), pulled BBQ pork, Baja chicken roll up. Really,  the only complaints we had were the people smoking next to us and the fact that a bus girl tried to take our plays before we were done and didn't seem to understand that we were still eating. I'd go back in a heart-beat, outside only though. There was a funky smell inside. 
We enjoyed Barefoot Bobs so much we went there both nights! Beach Party is a great drink. Appetizers we good, mostly efficient staff. Friendly. My friend didn't like her drinks so they made her a different one, the bartender delivered it and checked to make sure that she liked it.  
Service was friendly and efficient.  We got drinks - which were great and my friend ordered a snack which was huge.  I'd DEFINITELY go back next time I'm in the area.
We were hungry after having a breakfast at 6:00am, we saw this place driving to our hotel which was a 2 minutes walk.  We waited for over fifteen minutes before our waitress came, she was very courteous, the food was so so.  The location is good but our experience was not great.
Great place! Portions are large, too large actually. The weight staff is fun and down to earth. Really nice people all around. Our bus girl was a riot! The weekend drinks crowd smokes outside, making it impossible to enjoy a meal. But during the week, it is just a fun, laid back, family-friendly place.
I did not expect a place named barefoot bobs to be so darn good. The clam chowder was exceptional, and my wife said the Alfredo sauce was some of the best she ever had. We didn't expect a beach shack to make better Alfredo than expensive Italian places!

Overall, a great place to eat in Hull. Reasonable prices, amazing food, great location.
Love, Love, Love!!! The staff was amazing! The Bartender made me the yummiest Tropical Drink! I ordered calamari and clam strip and a order of fries. Delicious not greasy everything was perfect!!
Beer and fish tacos on the asphalt next to the motorcycles. We have gine here three times, mostly for the fish tacos which are good and a beer.
Good food and restaurant would visit again when back in MA. Beyond that not much to say apart from keep going.
If you want a bar to do shots or drink beer, then it is an OK place. but they can't make a cocktail as they don't stock bitters or mint. I had to settle for a vodka and flat soda. 

My daughter wanted ribs but they were sold out, the onion rings appetizer she ordered came out with the meal, our water glasses never were refilled. I definitely won't return. 

That said, my wife liked her fish tacos and my mother in law liked her stuffed clams. Hence the 2 stars vs 1. 
I heard they have good lobster rolls. I have the special of the day which was the steak tips. The meat was a little tough but has good flavor. Everybody else seemed to enjoy their hamburgers. The clam chowder had too much bacon in it. We just couldn't figure out where that recipe came from. Maybe it was their special one from way back when.
Went to Bobs and enjoyed some good food.. Dined outside so we had the ocean breeze and view of the boardwalk.. Had the cajun steak tips- cooked perfectly and the bbq ribs-fall off the bone.. Live band was playing some good tunes.. Large beer selection-had Red Stripe.. No problem with service she was very nice..
We had food and drinks and enjoyed them all. Pulled pork was very good and the fish and chips were tasty as well. Ate outside and it was nice seeing the beach as we enjoyed our dinner. Waitress was very friendly. Would eat here again next time we are in this area.
Tried this place for the first time last week.  It was nice enough out for us to sit outside we were the first to arrive for lunch but a few other couples came in after we sat.  Food was good.  Would like to go back and enjoy the outdoor bar and patio one night.
A great restaurant, great selection of  Mediterranean  food made fresh daily. Salads were delicious and good selection from bar- wait staff helpful- outdoor bistro is place to be on a summer evening with Frank Sinatra  singer although the patio chairs could be more comfortable,
Tonight we ventured out to a place we had not heard of " Terrazza"  Very glad we did ! A little of Greek influence goes a long way .  Calamari was super tender. Crab cakes were quite good , although one was slightly overcooked.  Nice spot to go . They did a great job redoing it. Very comfortable and friendly. Drinks were a little wimpy. The server was great and overcame any shortcomings.
Have been here years ago and service was terrible, but the new owners have made great improvements. Service was good and people were very friendly. We had Sara who did a wonderful job. Place was busy and they hustle. Outside dining is the way to go. There Is a nice outdoor bar with a great TV. We had antipasto and pizza, both good. Also had a singer, Tony who also made the night enjoyable. It's worth a try on a nice night. 

This place has a great menu. All the fish is wild caught and the beef is all grass fed. Excellent service. Very nice atmosphere. Nice outside patio. 
We visited this restaurant based on recommendations of two other couples we know. Wow! Food is delicious and well prepared, a lovely blend of Mediterranean and Mid-East cuisines.The restaurant is clean and well kept. The staff is friendly, professional and attentive. We got to meet the chef owner Mario, who treated us as if we were long time regulars. In short, it was a wonderful dining experience and we look forward to our next visit. Highly recommend this restaurant.
Very please with the new owners and menu.  I have been stopping about once a week for a light dinner and one to go. Works out well.   It appears they now have the outside bar / patio open which is very nice.  Enjoy !
Great place to sit outside for dinner and cocktails. We both enjoyed our meals and the service was excellent.
We visited Terraza on a busy Saturday late afternoon and asked for the outside area. We listened to live music and had an excellent meal. I had steak brisket and my wife had a salmon dinner. We also had a few appetizers. The medditeranean chicken wings were especially great. I highly recommend.
Great looking place inside and out. Great waitress,  But the food wasn't to good. Simple menu. They use way to much minced garlic dressing on the salmon and mash potatoes. Kind of gross. Chicken dinner not to good either way to much fat in the chicken. There special drinks are small and low budget glasses. For $9.75 drink they need to have a better presentation. 
My bf and I went with a groupon. It was the first time for both of us. The lunch menu is limited, but everything we had was delicious. The calamari was the best we ever had!!! It was uniform in size, super tender and I appreciated the hot peppers being put to one side of the plate since I'm not a fan. The aoli dipping sauce was also outstanding as was the sangria. We will definitely be back....Next time for dinner
Made a reservation for 7 pm for 5 people.  Had to wait 25 min.  They wanted to give me a table in the back room. That's not why I made a reservation to sit in a back room on top of other guests.  I did notice an empty table for 6 but wasn't offered to us. Apparently that was reserved for friends of theirs, because someone came out of the back to acknowledge the party when they arrived. After being very aggravated and expressing my frustration, they couldn't have been any nicer to us. Finally sat down to review the menu, and to my surprise, the menu changed completely from the last time I was there. Where is the beet and goat cheese salad? Where is the seared sea scallops with risotto?  I was looking forward to eating that and ended up with an appetizer because the only other fish was salmon or swordfish. My husband and friend did order the swordfish which they said was very good, but it was a very small portion for the price that only came with couscous and not a vegetable. Ordered another glass of wine, and was told that they ran out of the pinot noir that I was drinking. Later the waitress came over to me to let me know that she had a bottle of pinot noir that is only served by the bottle and was willing to open it to serve me a glass. I took her up on that. We were offered free dessert on the house for waiting so long. We took them up on that also. Overall, I was very disappointed in the food selection and will not go back.
After a college tour of nearby Bryant University, we stumbled upon Terrazza and were pleasantly surprised at what we found! The food was amazing, we were lucky enough to have Jackie as our waitress and she is pro, and the atmosphere very pleasant. We are trying to convince our son to attend Bryant so we can eat there regularly!  Great job Terrazza!
Went with another couple. We all left feeling underwhelmed and we overpaid...when we left. The place was clean and the patio very nice...fire pit and all. The singer was SO loud that the waiter had trouble hearing us, and us hearing him and simple dinner conversation was difficult.The bread you get is 7 little squares of flat bread with ricotta cheese. 7 tiny pieces for 4 adults...we did ask for more with dinner. We each had a glass of wine and one other drink. Our meals consisted of a meat and starch...all meat/fish plopped on top of the starch...no vegetable. AND no soup or salad starter. 3 meals came together..one "fell" we were told and would be out soon.....10 mins later... while the rest of us ate slowly. We did have dessert...ok but very small portions....and we had to ask for spoons for the sorbet...no cream or sugar for the coffee.  125.00 per couple....250.00 a table and nothing to bring home for any of us....we would have had to pay EXTRA for a veg! We paid that for a wonderful experience and meal in New Orleans! I would not recommend or go back...
This huge venue is friendly, clean, well laid out and extremely busy at dinner.  A very large patio and fireplace adorn the North end of the building making room for the scores of visitors.  Inside, most surfaces are pleasant grained finished wood as are the tables and comfortable chairs.  Often, there is Evening live music! It’s really a beautiful place!  

The food is Middle Eastern with a few Italian dishes mixed in.  We had the Falafel  which, although a little on the bland side, is quickly spiced up with the side of Tahini Sauce.  I asked if the Falafel was made on site or brought in.  They confirmed that it made on site!  

With the Falafel, I also had the Lentil Soup and a Tuna Steak.  The Tuna was great, the soup a little bland!  My “forever dieting” Wife, had a Chicken Soup and a Salad of Walnuts, Pecorino Slices and Mushrooms.  She LOVED it!

I was surprised that they did not have expected dishes on the menu such as Shish kebobs and Gyros!  However there were many Lamb dishes including Chops available.  

All in all, this is a great place for Lunch or Dinner!  I’m quite sure you will like it!!!


My food was excellent.  Scallops were juicy and tender.  The spinach salad appetizer was HUGE...shared with a friend. Service for drinks was a bit slow but our waitress was apologetic and courteous.  My friend's  chicken was a bit overcooked but this restaurant had only been open a week or so so cutting them some slack. I plan to return tonight with my hubby and enjoy the patio again.  Dessert was very yummy as well.  Overall a pleasant night, just a few kinks still needed to be worked out.
Delicious food attentive staff, and romantic! We went here for my 60th birthday, and I really enjoyed the food and the service.
My husband and I eat out often so we were excited to try Terrazza. We sat outside on the patio which was nice and spacious. Our waitress was wonderful, drinks we're coming as soon as she noticed we were low on them. The food was very tasty and great quality. My husband loved the Salmon and Risotto! Overall a wonderful dinner. The only minor setback for us was it wasn't very lively, as we frequent federal hill often, but we would definitely return!
Beautiful new dining experience with options! Outdoor patio is huge and has a fireplace for cool summer nights to enjoy the live music. Bartenders are attentive and creative with fresh ingredients, appetizers are big enough to share - the Ahi Tuna is fantastic, so is the hummus, try it with the lamb topper!
Last Friday night my best girlfriend and I met up and wanted to go somewhere to have apps and drinks in an outdoor setting.  Of course we didn't want to just go to the same places we have always frequented. That's when we stumbled upon Terrazza this hidden gem, new to the foodie scene in Smithfield, RI.  Only on the restaurant scene for three weeks ( I was a little skeptical) boy did Terrazza prove me wrong.  We sat on the patio right next to the beautiful lit fireplace, tables were scatter with other out door diners, a nice outdoor bar and fantastic music playing.  We started with a fantastic bottle of Rose- Gris Blanc, affordable too just under $30.00.  For an appetizer we had their homemade falafel OMG it was so tasty, the herbs, the pickled turnips were a fantastic accompaniment. For my main meal I chose the beef tips which came with whipped mashed potatoes. The beef was so tender I didn't even need a knife. I will definitely come back to Terrazza!  I totally recommend this restaurant.
I hate writing negative reviews, but this experience was so poor I'm writing it in the restaurant's parking lot. Drinks came immediately. For a party of five, we ordered one appetizer, which took over thirty minutes to arrive--and only after we asked where our appetizer was. Then for about an hour more, our meals went missing. And when only four of our five meals appeared, there was no explanation, only scrambling in the kitchen. Our waitress never kept us informed about why our food was so delayed. Am giving two stars instead of one because once it arrived, the food wasn't all that bad. 
Meal was good enough.  I got a simple 2 eggs, toast, homefries, sausage.  Service was fine, except we had to ask twice for my husbands juice.  The place itself is clean, and modern.  Prices were good.
The toast is thick, the sausage patty was big (but i wasnt a huge fan of it), homefries are mixed with peppers and onions, which I liked...but the potatoes were a bit overdone.  Asked waitress if they took Discover, she didnt know...which she should know that.  (they do)
Ive had better, Ive had worse...
I went with 2 friends around 2:15 and had eggs benedict- it was fabulous!  My friends both had egg dishes and enjoyed as well.  I loved the potatoes- grilled and spiced to perfection. Not a fancy place but the food definitely makes up for it.
Had to pick up our son from a soccer tournament and wanted a quick bite and this was the perfect choice at 8:30 pm as you can get breakfast all day!  A nice light meal before the drive home.  The Portuguese burger was also delicious and was served with either regular fries or sweet potatoes fries.
Good breakfast. A lot of food. My son ordered 2 pancakes and they were huge. Fast service. A little pricey. 
After driving all day to get there, we went to this restaurant because it was right across the street from our hotel, Hampton Inn. The waitress was quick to take our drink orders, brought them to us, took our dinner order, then she disappeared for a really long time. We watched a little girl and her father come in to pick up a pizza order that the phoned in ahead of time. The father got tired of waiting and took his daughter and left. I didn't blame him one bit. 

The restaurant was by no means busy. Besides us, there were two other couples- one at the bar and one seated in the dining room, as we were. We all started looking around at each other and after a while, I asked the other couple near us if they had been waiting long and they said that they were waiting just as long as we were. I'd have to say that at least 45 minutes had passed with no sign of our dinner. When we finally saw our server, I asked how much longer dinner was taking because we were both hungry and agitated at the excessive wait time. She said she forgot to put our order in, no apologies, but she let us know what happened. Then she said it wouldn't be long. We finally got our food OVER AN HOUR AFTER WE ORDERED IT! We would've gone elsewhere, but we were afraid to find no one else open at such a late hour on a Sunday night. 

The food was ok- NOT WORTH WAITING OVER AN HOUR ON A SLOW NIGHT!!!
I had wanted to try B'z for a while and finally got my husband here for late lunch/early dinner one day recently.  There were only about 5 other people there, which was fine.  I was surprised there were hardly any veggie options on the menu and asked about a breakfast possibility but that didn't seem like an option.  We ordered sandwiches, fries and onion rings.  My husband said his burger was ok, but nothing he'd need to go back for again.  Mine was decent, but the same thing......good but not great.  And everything was much pricier than I'd expected for a small neighborhood place.

A strange one too......a bunch of guys from Bryant came in and ordered wings and beer, which weren't on the menus we were given.  Not that I wanted that.....just thought it was strange that they had different menus but were 2 booths away from us.

Basically, I'm glad I tried it but would only go back to try breakfast, and doubt I'll convince my hubby to go with me.
My son and I ate here for breakfast.  Incredible pancakes and French toast. Food came out quickly and it was nice and hot. My side of eggs were a little dry but the French toast was some of the best I've ever had. 
We came here for breakfast. The food is good and decent portions and prices. The restaurant seemed clean. The seats were broken which was uncomfortable. The bench kept lifting. The menu has a decent variety for breakfast foods.
I love their breakfast! Food is hot and fresh. Amazing corned beef hash. Friendly waitstaff. Place is clean too. 

stopped here while staying at the hampton inn. a bunch of us stopped in to watch the patriots game. we ordered beers apps and pizza. bar staff was friendly and  helpful. food was good. pulled pork nachos tasted like they had a mustard sauce which was a little weird but they were not terrible. a nice place to watch a game.
A casual spot to enjoy breakfast or a burger or wrap. The salads are also tasty and fresh. Our waitress was quick and friendly. 
Had lunch at this restaurant recently with my husband.  We both ordered burgers and fries.  Very nicely done.  Place was packed even though not the "cheapest" place for a burger.
Great neighborhood breakfast spot. Staff was  very attentive. Food was delicious and very reasonably priced. We will return.
Tried this restaurant last Saturday afternoon for the first time.  The food actually took an hour and a half to come out of the kitchen!!!!  People at tables near us came, ate and left!!!!!!!!  The food was very good, however I would never go back because of the wait time and the only apology was from the waitress, whose fault it was not!  Where the heck was the owner or manager!?!!  Too many other places to go in Rhode Island.
It was breakfast I had, fund it pricy...it was eggs bacon home fries and toast...coffee...
Service is good place very clean
Just average. Prices good, quality OK. homemade corn hash but a little salty. Scrambled eggs overcooked. French toast was the best. Service ok. Was here at 8 on a weekday and the place was deserted. Not sure if crowd comes earlier.
I have been here a few times and have no complaints about any of my choices.   They have what you would call your regular breakfast items and then they have specials.  Their burgers are also good,   The atmosphere is interesting there is an open kitchen to watch, it can get a bit loud but that is expected.  They also serve alcohol.
Burgers and beyond has token up the void created by Faial's closing. They hired two Faial bartenders, Amy and Donna, and now have three Failal cooks. The present menu has a limited selection of Faial entrees. A new menu is scheduled and will include more Faial entrees. You can dine at their new bar or sit a tables. Wait staff is cordial, service is also great. Please try this new facility.
Not sure if they changed owners, managers...but this treasure has gone down hill. The Rueben is still the best. No question there. I have always favored the fall river burger. I had it Sunday night and it lacked flavor and they skimped on the chow mein which makes it such a special burger. Lots of chow mein noodles but little to no chow mein. The restaurant is very clean and it sparkles. But then again they have ample time with so few customers. This place could be a goldmine if they go back to the basics when they first opened up.
Went for coffee. Clean. There were a ton of cars in the drive-thru so I decided to go in. Fast friendly service.
I love my Dunkin Donuts coffee and there was a DD right across the street. We walked over to get our exercise in . Very convenient.

I love my Dunkin Donuts coffee and was pleased that there was one within a reasonable distance to the hotel where we stayed.  The staff were polite and got my coffee just the way I like it!
Has lounge area & Wi-Fi. Pastry and donuts always seem fresh. Coffee has not been stale, to date.  Friendly, courteous staff. 
We met with friends at Tavalo on a Saturday. We had made reservations for dinner. The restaurant was very busy - packed at the bar with parties waiting to be seated. We stood by the door as the sitting/waiting are is very small. We were seated at around 7:15, so the timing and reservations worked out well. 

Service: Fair to good.
Food: Fair to good.
Selection: Normal for a "high end" restaurant

Thoughts: Sadly, the most enjoyable part of the meal was using the Groupon to pay for dinner. I ordered the Chicken Parm, which should be an easy home run, but the sauce was bland. The chicken looked to be breaded by hand, but the breast was  inconsistently tenderized; one side was thin and crispy, the other only slightly moist. 

With so many Italian restaurants close by, there is no need to add Tavalo to the list. Head 4 minutes into Lincoln to Trattoria, or 30 min to the hill.
We had a great meal at this location on our first visit.  Four of us all agreed that the food presentations and tastes were as good as you can get!  All present made different selections.  Our Friends had the Braised Beef Short Ribs and the Beef Filet (with a sunny side up egg!).  My Wife had the Ziti Bolognese with Basil and I had the Steak Frites with great and tasteful Parmesan Frites!

Three of the Four of us went "All The Way" and had desserts to finish!  I wanted the Bananas Foster Flambe, however no one hand was "Authorized"to handle the needed flames!  I tried for Tiramisu with no luck, So, my Wife and I had a Coffee Mocha Chip ice cream.  One of our Friends had the Chocolate Ice Cream!  All of us left pretty satiated and content!

One of the draws for this Monday Night visit was the Half Price Wine offering!  We had two great bottles including a Washington State Pinot Noir and a Cabernet!  However, I found it strange that the cutoff point for the half priced wines halted at the $75 level!  I saw some higher priced wines that we would have loved to order if there was a price break! I thought that it would have been fair if they offered at least the $35 or so that was off the $75 wines on the higher end wines!  I guess this would have been difficult for them.
Stopped by this evening with my wife. 
Nice friendly staff and nice restaurant. We started off with the Calamari, it was enough to feed four people and it was very tasty, cooked to perfection, not over cooked or rubbery.
My wife had the bolognase. She loved it, pasta was a bit under cooked.
I tried the Veal Parmesean. It was panned fried, just the way I like it, very tender with a side of Penne Pasta. I also tried the Broccoli Rabe, it was seasoned perfectly. 
We both went home with food for another day.
Our server Justin did an excellent job. We will return. Give them a try. 
The appetizer broccoli and sausage was a great and tasty start.  The chicken with porcini stuffed purses, spinach and truffle sauce was absolutely delicious. 
Highly recommended!
We went here for a team dinner. The service was quick and professional. 
We shared starters...calamari was ok. The mussels were good. 
As main course I had the sauteed shirmp. The shrimp was good and the broccoli as well, but the spaghetti was without much taste and not really warm. The concept of this dish is very nice, but it needs a bit more bite.
We discovered this place with the help of the girl at the front desk of the Holiday Inn Express.  Food was outstanding, atmosphere was very nice and relaxing.  Nice choice of wines.  The wait staff were wonderfully helpful as we had never eaten there before. The Calamari was delish, but  on the spicy side for this New Yorker!!  Risotto balls are to die for!!  If you are in the area you must try it!!
My wife and I stopped by Tavolo's for dinner after flying into TF Green from Florida. First visit and pleasantly surprised. Monday evening just happened to be 1/2 price for bottles of wine. Nice menu selection. My wife had a seafood dish and I enjoyed a great steak. Numerous different deserts are offered.
Friendly staff. Good menu. Arancini risotto balls were outstanding! Men in our party loved the short ribs. Rigatoni Bolognese was too al dente and sauce was very salty. Duck was fatty. So, nice evening but there are too many excellent restaurants in RI to hurry back.
We visited this place twice during our visit to R.I. as it was near our hotel, but most importantly, it served delicious Italian food with a great wait staff. We were pleasantly surprised to find this gem and plan to visit again when we are back in town.
Tavalo is in a strip mall in Smithfield. don't be fooled. The food there is as good as anything on Federal Hill, nice atmosphere, and god portions. We had calamari and I ordered veal marsala, my wife had salmon and we enjoyed our dishes. Other orders that went past us looked VERY appealing as well.
Took some out of town friends here for dinner based upon (other) good reviews, and I was quite pleased. Excellent food served by friendly, attentive waiter (Justin) in enormous portions. Tavolo has a friendly, neighborhood feel because that's basically what it is...I will definitely go back!
Several visits to this restaurant have made it a favorite. We like to go for lunch, and every dish has been consistently good. The fried risotto balls served as appetizers hark back to the D Carlo days, and we love them. The pizza with prosciutto and rabe is fabulous. and we have also enjoyed the steak frites, pulled beef shank, and pulled chicken entrees. Last time we ate there with a friend, and he loved his lunch special, 3 courses, and each delicious. Portions are generous, service pleasant and welcoming, and the location is convenient. We are already planning the next visit.
Great prices and a great menu. Awesome Caesar salad. The rigatoni bolognese was amazing. Not a fan of their signature spicy olive oil. 
Wine bar intrigued me.  Although they have a wine list, I am not sure if I would consider it a wine bar so much.    The waitstaff were all very nice and attentive.  The food was very good.   I do think the prices were a bit high, you could get the same thing elsewhere for less.
This was our first visit since D Carlo transitioned over to Tavolo.  D Carlo was a fine restaurant, but for some reason not one of our favorites.  Tavolo, probably will continue on it that vein.

The food is very good and service is fine, but nothing "wows" you into wanting to rush back.  Prices are reasonable for the quality of food that you are being served.

All in all this is a fine restaurant and you will likely be pleased.
It was tasty..pricey.
Our waitress was nice but slow and brought me a glass with lipstick on it.I had to ask for the bread after a half hour of being seated.
Food is very good but priced rather high for the portion they serve.  Wines are also expensive considering the quality and minimal selection.  I would've expected a better wine list for this type of restaurant.
We Went early with an elderly couple. They tried to seat us in the back of the bus. Clearly a person with a cane should tip them off. After much adieu , I had us relocated to a more suitable place. Patrons were already enjoying the bar , and seemed to be having fun. The service was fair, as were the selections of food items. The food we ordered turned out to be bland and disappointing.
My favorite is the risotto balls, I love them, the prosciutto and pea combo make it so yummy. We always get an order of calamari. I enjoy this place.
We made reservations for four on a Saturday night , and were very pleased. The restaurant was full. However we were quite surprised at the service and food. We arrived a little early for our reservation. So we went to the bar for drinks. No sooner than we had our drinks the hostess came over to say our table was ready. Then April our wait person came right over and went over the specials. We put in an appetizer order, and selected a nice bottle of wine. The wine list is outstanding with something for everyone's taste and price. We plan to go back soon. kudos to the entire staff.
Once again, the Condesa welcomes with an open, cheerful atmosphere.  Background music is pleasant, but not so loud that you cannot have a conversation with your dinner companion. Try the guacamole(sp?) made fresh, table side, by the wait staff.  The shrimp and beef entrees were excellent, with the beef cooked as ordered.  Drinks were also good, coming from the well lit , decorative bar.  Have been before and will definitely return.
Condesa is this families newest Mexican restaurant...they also own Agave in Warwick...I have been enjoying their great authentic Mexican food along with their delicious specialty cocktails for years!!...Always greeted at the door, the bar is trendy with a cool mexican swagger....the decor is modern with old world class...very inviting and offers a quaint sitting area for small quaint conversations with privacy and comfy toss pillows.....their dining room offers quick service with waitstaff very knowledgeable about their menu always willing to explain new dishes and specialize your choices to individual tastes...I love that its local and offers that much needed 'something different' in our area....welcome to Smithfield Condesa...we are soooooo glad you are here!!
This place is relatively new to our local area. We were pleasantly surprised. The staff was very friendly and attentive but not overly so. They had some different things on the menu which were more traditional than your typical. They also had tacos and enchiladas. The tacos were massive and nearly impossible to pick up and eat. I would have preferred 3 smaller ones but the food was quality. I will go back and do recommend.
Went with wife last night, took twenty minutes to get our drinks, wasn't our server's fault she was otherwise very attentive. Guacamole,  enchiladas mole and veggie enchiladas were good. Our issue is with the lack of atmosphere. It's like a barn, loud,  large empty space. Not a place to take guests for an upscale dinner. Probably would only return for lunch,  if at all. 
Very good authentic Mexican cuisine.
Good drink menu and plenty of domestic and foreign beer.
Place was clean, prompt friendly service and nice atmosphere.
Try it you'll like it
Definitely will try again and again
Both the food and service were very poor quality.  The restaurant itself is very noisy.  After ordering, we never saw our server again.  Kitchen servers delivered our food.   Our soup was delivered at the same time as our entrees.  We finally had to flag down another server to have our server get us a second round of drinks.
Saturday night choice... Usually aim for next door (Tavolo) but opted for this for a change. Great change! Excellent service, large and tasty margarita, and we split a Burrito and freshly made guac. Love the decor (a welcome change from what was here before). Will be back! 
I haven't had Mexican food that tasted this good since dining in downtown Cozumel. The use of fruits and vegetables in the dishes were spot on and complemented the spices in the dishes we ordered. 

I had the Pollo Maya, chicken breasts in a tomato based sauce over grilled veggies and accompanied by spicy garlic mashed sweet potato. The chicken was topped with a sweet jicama that gave it a lot character. 

The chips and four salsas served to the table was a nice mix of flavors to start. The margaritas were a good size and had some premium tequilas that made them worth the price. The flan was rich and creamy with a strong caramel sauce and berry fruit to help sweeten it. I was not disappointed with any of the courses.
My family took me to Condesa for my birthday.  Nice atmosphere. Food was enjoyed by all.  It is children friendly and is quite adaptable to groups. 
So authentic, genuine, fresh and just plain awesome! From the staff to the cocktails (fresh juice Margaritas...I had the jalapeño one~yum!!) to the food! We dine out a lot and I work in the industry. Maybe a little spoiled and critical as a result. There was NOTHING we could find wrong with Condesa! Priced too low, I think, but I won't complain!! You must go!
Me and my coworker go out to lunch once a week and usually try local places and in some cases return. We heard of Condesa and decided to try it today for lunch 7/14/16.
I took a view minutes to read the reviews and they were pretty good.
The place is very nice inside and although a previous patron had comments to make about the interior, it's very nice, clean, open and friendly.
Hostess seated us right away. Our waiter quickly arrived and took our beverage order and returned with chips and a selection of dips. The dips were very good.
When I try a Mexican Restaurant I typically try the Carnita's (pork) tacos with onions and cilantro, but in reviewing the online comments, we decided to try the Burrito California. I had the pork and my coworker tried the chicken. It was perhaps the largest burrito I've seen. I quickly made minced meat out of mine and my coworker had the rest of his boxed up. They were packed with ingredients, meat was very moist and would get it again. We are already talking about our next trip. Give them a try.
Been here twice with friends. Just had drinks and chips and salsa. Salsa selections are great! They have good drinks but they need to get the large glasses like other Mexican restaurants. Compared to the restaurant before It was condesa the place looks great!! 
This was our first visit to Condesa (had trouble finding it on TripAdvisor because the site has the restaurant misspelled as Condessa). On a miscellaneous Tuesday lunchtime it was not busy so we were seated right away and service was prompt and efficient. My husband and I both ordered the chicken Burrito California. It was the best burrito either of us had ever had. The roasted tomato sauce had just the right kick, and we did everything but lick the plate. We were delighted to find such great food close to home, and we will go back very soon -- although the burrito was so good, we may never try anything else!
Ate dinner here with some friends recently, and had very low expectations of it being authentically Mexican. However, as soon as we walked in, I knew it was the real thing! The smell of REAL Mexican food is something you never forget.....or tire of. And spending most of my adult life in Arizona and Texas, I feel I am somewhat of an authority on this.
As we walked in, we saw a large bowl of delicious-looking guacamole being prepared tableside for another group. So the moment we were seated, we ordered some for us. Guacamole guy was ready with the goods almost as soon as we ordered it, and he was also quick in the prep. Large creamy fresh Haas avocados, ripe tomatoes, crushed garlic, lime juice, serrano chiles, and loads of cilantro were quickly mashed and mixed into the huge mortar and hot fresh chips had already arrived. We dug in and didn't stop till we reached the bottom of the bowl. Yummy!
The chips arrive with 4 types of "salsa":  refried beans, tomatillo, mild but tasty, chile-based red, and a hotter version of the red that was about the right amount of spice for me. However, someone with a "Northeast palate" might disagree. Therefore, dip lightly at first, but do try them all.
Our group ordered shrimp taco specials, a pollo asado special, and I ordered one of my fave Mexican dishes, chicken mole enchiladas. The corn tortillas were made from white corn and fresh as could be. The mole was definitely homemade, with just the right blend of chocolate and nuts. I wished it had more red chile in it, but I understand they are trying to cater to locals who don't like things too caliente.
There was so much food left over, everyone took doggie bags back to the hotel.....and it was just as good the next day. 
Open only 5 months, the owner oversees every detail of Condessa. He stopped by each table to introduce himself and check and see what we thought of the food. We couldn't say enough good reports to him, and my only regret about Condessa is it is so far from my home. However the next time I am anywhere in the vicinity, I will be back! Even a drive over from Providence or Boston is not out of the question for this Mexican food jewel! MUY DELICIOSO!!!
First off if you have to wait for a table there is accommodations to set a relax.     Open floor plan. Chips and the 4 dip server were a plus.  Drinks were well made and looked nice.  Guacamole was served made fresh right there!  Food came quickly enough even though they were busy.  The four meals we had at our table all got thumbs up!  I look forward to going back.  Sit at the bar maybe next time.
My first time here.  Service was very good.  Margaritas were very good.  The food was ok.  The menu is limited compared to another Mexican restaurant where I usually eat.  They did not have the soup listed on the menu.  The person making the appetizer at the table, had a tip jar.  That turned me off.  If I go back it will be for the margaritas.
We visited on a Saturday night and decided to sit at the bar. We had some drinks, barbacoa tacos and a jicama salad with shrimp. Everything was delicious and fresh. The prices are reasonable. The service was friendly. The atmosphere was nice. We will gladly return.
This is the most authentic Mexican food Ive seen in New England!
 Salsas have a kick, The Michelada was perfect, and the taco salad wasnt greasy. Updated, modern twists to classics, and no cheesy sombreros on the wall! Best part yet, our service was impeccable and gracious, even with having a 2 year old and a 10 month old with us!
They have a waitress with a little cart that comes to your table and prepares fresh guacamole tableside, it is most excellent with the house-made chips!  The food portions are generous and quality is very good.  I had Peninos  for an appetizer (sliced cucumbers and jicama with fresh lime juice and chile seasoning.  For my meal, I chose the Chile Lime Shrimp over sauteed veggies.  Everything was delicious, will definitely go back!
From either outside or in , you would have no clue as to the type of restaurant this is. Only the name gives it away. Inside is somewhat chic , although somewhat drab. It does have a nice and well stocked bar. Change the name, and it could be any type of restaurant inside. The food is just fair. Some of the dishes are a higher end Mexican , which were not successfully executed. High end margaritas , were watery requiring a floater to make it tolerable. This however drove the price to over $20. Go and try it with your eyes wide open.
I want to know why people who live in Rhode Island pick venues like this one and the other two I wrote reviews about. Another school function, more pink dried out chicken, pasta in red sauce and a wilted salad drenched in white goo, they call salad dressing. Why do consumers in Rhode Island put up with such low quality products for their hard earned money. I will say that the celebrants of this event middle school kids had a good time. As someone who knows the value of money this caterer, is making a killing if he can get away with serving food this poorly 4 nights a week to school groups at $25 a head. At $5,000 on what would be a lost night he can  has his staff do better and serve a better product.
We went here for Easter brunch. There were 8 of us. The brunch was very bland. No manned carving station, just some ham left there. The choices were few and not as  I would expect for a $20 holiday buffet. There was a touring bunny for the kids which was nice. The baked fish was good, however the pasta (only one type) and limited breakfast food was disappointing.No unique pastries or anything special. The dessert selection was better, but overall not a good experience. We were there at the main hours, not at the end. Service was OK however I got the feeling they were rushed and there was no one there coordinating the efforts.
I went to a group function at Twelve Acres.  Parking was very convenient and we were warmly greeted by the hostess who took jackets.  She handled them with care and when she left the area, she secured the coat room.  She has been a regular there over the years.  The soup was outstanding and deserved the number of compliments.  Generous amount of chicken along with veggies and escarole.  We had fresh cod with veggies, chicken  and eggplant parm, oven roasted potatoes, and pasta.  Very good. The staff there were all pleasant and tried hard to please.

Tip:  They have a gluten free menu and those items were nicely prepared and appreciated.
Joe and his team do an excellent job. Facility is beautiful very clean and updated. I've been in numerous times both inside and out and I have always enjoyed it. 
We recently hosted a 50th Anniversary party for my parents here at Twelve Acres.  Everything was wonderful, guests were very complimentary.  The staff was great, very knowledgeable and friendly.  The food and décor are mid-range but you won't find better for the price.  We looked at many locations and are very happy that we went with Twelve Acres.
I have been here for a number of different occasions.  Brunch, a wedding, and a class reunion to name a few.  All venues were different and the menus were good for all of them.  The reunion was in the tent outside which was really nice.
Our company decided to do something different this year and host an employee clambake at Twelve Acres. This is not the first time we have had an event at Twelve Acres, but the first time we had an outside event such as this. I say outside, but we were under the pavilion - a wonderful open-air dining experience, which protected us from the elements.  It was so much fun. The food was great. We had a choice of lobster, steak or chicken to go along with all of the fixin's. The clam cakes and chowder were fantastic and a big hit! There was plenty of food and great service for a good price. The food is always consistent, the same with their sister company, Spumoni's of Pawtucket, who has handled many of our company catering events at our headquarters.

They also supplied us with outdoor games to use, horseshoes, volleyball etc. which many of the employees took part in. It was a perfect time and the weather couldn't have been better.
We went for our childrens school event back in the late spring. First I will start with the postives, the kids had fun. After that the food sucks! Who ever plans these menus is cutting corners. The dinner served was sometype of chick that was pink and dry, pasta, fries and some salad dripping in some type of white goo for a dressing. The food is served family style and all you can eat, one time arouond was more than enough it was so nasty. The meal was so unappealing. We left around 9:30-10 went to McDonalds to get something to eat.
We attended an event here, outside under the tent. It wasn't our first time being disappointed here. Hamburgers & Hot dogs were cold. Dry Chicken strips smothered in barbeque sauce. New England clam chowder wasn't very good, Tomato soup with clams & potatoes lacking flavor. The 1/2 ears of corn was very good. Watermelon was good. Alcohol was overpriced, served in plastic cups. The wait staff was unfriendly and were like vultures waiting to clean up before we were done. My aunt got up to go the the restroom & when she returned her chowder was gone. I would not recommend this establishment for any function at all. Whoever took it over has no clue on customer interaction & satisfaction.
Reservations were being accepted from 9 am to 3pm.  Ours was for 11:30. Being this was our first time here we were surprised that the restaurant was not full. The brunch consisted of cut up fresh fruits, scrambled eggs, french toast, sausage, bacon, home fires and breakfast pastries, The hot meals being served were chicken Marsala, mac & sauce and perhaps one other hot item that I didn't try. They had a server cutting fresh roast beef and ham (excellent). The soup was chicken escarole which was very good.  A nice variety of desserts were offered and coffee or tea was included.

Everything was very good with the exception of the chicken Marsala. The Marsala sauce did not taste like there wasn't any Marsala in it so it was very bland. The roast beef and the ham was excellent and next to that they offered with Au jus and gravy.

Our waitress was quite slow to bring out the regular coffees and decaf. When she did return there was not enough half & half containers for everyone in our group of 7 adults. My husband ordered tea and it took several requests to get one cup. The second cup requested had 2 requests for her to comply and by that time we had run out of half and half containers again. She never noticed and it did take some time for her to clean the dirty plates off our table. 

The price for this brunch was $16.95 plus 20% gratuity and tax. I don't think we will be retuning here next year.

One more note: when we left around 1pm, there was still a lot of empty tables.
Probably some of the worst food I've eaten ever.  This place is a traditional wedding factory that takes NO pride in its food.  We attended a 25th wedding anniversary recently.  I would have asked for my money back if I were the host of the party.  The stuffed chicked was as dry as cardboard.  It was stuffed with overcooked WHITE rice.  Who stuffs chicken with white rice?  The vegetables were overdone canned peas and mushrooms.  Even the bread was stale.  The bruschetta appetizers tasted like frozen pizza bites.   I had better dinnerware in college.  The decor is from the 1980's and probably the cook too.
The guys at Pick Pockets are a staple in any Bryant University students diet. Me and my friends who attended Bryant would make sure to eat here at least a couple times a month. Tony the owner is a great guy and is constantly interacting with customers and offering new suggestions to try on the menu. Food is very high quality and in abundance for a very fair price.
This place does a great job.  Can be a long wait time and sometimes they do not pick up the phone during busy times - maybe because they are too busy....so they can use another worker.

You won't go wrong here for a delicious falafel, gyro or chicken kebab.  My kids love the steak and cheese too.
I love this place.  Feels like a home cooked meal, not fast food.  Sometimes a long wait, like 35 to 45 minutes instead of ten, if there is a crowd.
There cannot be a more unlikely place in which to find great food.  Pick Pockets shares space with a convenience store / gas station.  If you want a drink or chips, you buy them from the convenience store side of the shop and bring them to the restaurant side.  There are a half dozen stools and four or five two-top tables.  Many people get their food to go.  So why would anyone stop in a place like this?  One reason -- outstanding food.  The owner, a character himself, makes everything from scratch.  He marinates his own meats, makes his own sauces and chops everything fresh, every day.  The result shows.  My favorite is a beef and lamb combo wrap but there is a wide range of choices ranging from falafal to cheese steaks to chicken wings.  If you like spice, and I do, he makes a special "green sauce" from ground peppers (and maybe jet fuel - just kidding) that will take care of any sinus issues.  A sure sign of the quality is the amount of repeat business by the locals.  While it would not be obvious to someone coming down nearby Interstate 295 (at Exit 8), the nearby area is home to both a university and and one of the nation's top mutual funds, in addition to a number of other businesses.  It is not uncommon at lunch time to be behind someone with a list from their office for a number of sandwiches and salads to go.  This one is worth going out of the way for and, hey, you can fill up the car at the same time.
This tiny counter-top spot is located in a gas station, but don't let that turn you off. The food is great and the menu is huge. They have grilled chicken and lamb Kebabs, falafel and vegetable wraps, and tons of other options. They even have a food challenge which includes a huge amount of food for worthy candidates. They have pictures all over the walls of their customers and the atmosphere is friendly. The cooks are nice and call you "Boss". Make sure you eat at the counter and ask for the house-made pita chips and hummus. Highly recommended, though definitely not first date food--you'll need a lot of napkins!
We have been to J's many times. Food is consistently good. New items are added but the old favorites like the pilgrim seem to call you back, so does the graduate. Try their own chips , very tasty. Prices are reasonable 
This place is handy for us, however, I have become disenchanted with some of the quality!  I think the first thing that started me thinking that, was was when I noticed that the Bread for Sandwiches seemed less appetizing, too dry and tasteless!

I love a nice Italian Cold Cut Sandwich, but if the Bread doesn't taste good to you, it's not an option!
They have a huge selection of food... From healthy sandwiches to fried foods and wraps. I love their Greek dressing ! It's amazing ! Their salads are very big and good. They also have egg rolls that are great!!
Very clean and great Food presentation and quality....very clean.....great quality and taste for the price
My family loves the wide variety of sandwiches.  Everyone we ever tried was always a hit. They blondes are great too!!
Biggest problem is deciding what sandwich to order! We decided to split "The Fraternity" which is delicious chicken salad, cranberry sauce on yummy roll. We also had soup - soooo good! I had the corn chowder - rich & creamy while my husband had the red chowder - full of stock! Both were served hot and just so delicious!
We're thrilled to have J's near home!
Also appreciate the points card for more future free yummy delights!
I'm a regular at J's!  I love the Patriot sandwich. Turkey with gravy and stuffing. The rolls at J's are always so fresh and soft. I recommend there home made potato chips!  So good!!!  They also have excellent dessert items. Never a bad meal at J's.
I used to love J's Deli, but I am not so much of a fan these days. We had a 2 Philly steak grinders, one without cheese and with onions. The onions were on top, not mixed in and there was some cheese mixed in. A chicken fajita wrap was all right, a bit soggy though.  Grinders were generous sizes - enough for two meals. $ 27 for the three grinders (with tax.) which felt like a lot to me. We called in our order and it was ready and waiting. Staff were professional and polite.
I've been in the deli several times now and it's absolutely amazing. It's a little pricey but the sandwiches are big and really well made. The cupcakes and cakes in the display are definitely worth a try as well as the "J's Deli Chips". The deli cases are really well stocked and look very fresh.The staff in the restaurant are also very friendly.  The only down side is sometimes the sandwiches do take a while but I've never had and experience where it wasn't worth the wait. 
From soups, subs to hot meals and dessert it is All excellent ...no frills to eat there...but has tables and take out, generous portions...
We love this deli. It is the best around.  Great service, great prices, great food. There are many sandwiches to choose from and there is something for everyone. Also desserts and appetizers are delicious.   Worth the trip every time. 
All the sandwiches here are awesome! The bread is fresh, the fillings plentiful, I recommend this shop to anyone in the area!
Large sandwiches, very good, pricey though, service takes awhile when it gets busy from the college.
I am so thankful  that my business contact recommended J's Deli for lunch. Her words were "everyone who's anyone, goes there. It's one of the best places around." She was right. The staff was friendly and the food was wonderful. In addition to the turkey smokehouse stacked sandwich, I also tried the Italian Wedding soup, simply the best I've had in a very long time. I will be sure to stop again the next time I am in the area.
This place has the best sandwich you will ever eat. Everything is very fresh.Large variety of sandwiches. Workers are nice.Don't miss it.
More food choices here than most restaurants. Quick service and clean area. Delicious chili, beef stew, soup, sandwiches. Array of cheeses and meats to take out. Would absolutely go back.
When you don't feel like cooking and you want something quick and satisfying this is the place to go. Fortunately it is nearby and the subs and sides are substantial in size. Service is great also. Would go back.
From a basic tuna salad sandwich to whatever you desire.  You name it they have it.  Also, cold cuts and cheeses can be purchased by the weight to go.  Daily soups and different salads as well.  Usually very busy and a wait in line to order style.
I've never had a bad sandwich here.  My only complaint is when I ordered half a sandwich for a child, they charged me $5.99.  The whole sandwich was $7.99.  5.99 is a little pricey for half of a ham and cheese sandwich. 
Ordered lunch for my self and 5 others at work today. Called in the order and drove to pick it up.
When I got there, the subs were ready. Like promised.
Got back to the office and mmmmmmmmmmmmMMMMMMMMMMMMMMmmmmmm good. I've been to several sub shops in my time, this is one of the good ones. Hands down beats all the Corp sub shops.
Want a good lunch at a fair price - Go to J's. Nice people too.
Food was just ok.  Many items seemed like they were store bought (desserts, muffins,etc).
Service was good but brunch was overpriced. Would not return.
Stopped at Stillwater Tavern with work colleagues. I had the potato skins which were dried out, yuck. Then had the teriyaki boneless wings that were overcooked and horrible. One Friend had the sole dish which he liked but other had the buffalo wings which she said were overcooked. White wine spritzer had little wine in it. Will never use this place again. Very disappointing 
They are closed.  This restaurant has been here for a long time but sadly enough, it is now closed.  Another restaurant is in its place but I have no info on that one.
We dined at the Crickets Restaurant on February 14th 2016.  We arrived at 6:00pm and were seated quickly in the dining room.  Our waitress took quite a long time to arrive.  She took our drink orders and when she returned she tried to take our order.  She asked if we wanted to hear the specials.  When we did she proceeded to fumble through her folder that was stuffed with scraps of paper.  She tried to tell us the specials but was so disorganized she had a problem giving us the information and after a few minutes of this she and we gave up.  When she brought out our soup she brought out the incorrect choices and mixed up everyone's selection.  Someone else brought out our dinners but even then no note was made as to everyone's selection.  

Fortunately our food was acceptable.  All was served hot.  We were done with dinner for about 15 minutes before the waitress sort of offered us desert.  Since we didn't want to be here even longer we declined.

This server only had 3 tables and her disorganization caused her to not serve them properly.  I may visit this restaurant but I would wait a while so hopefully this server is no longer employed here.  With the type of service we received I hope they stay in business.  I cant imagine anyone coming back after the service we received.
It was two for one burger night and we started the evening with vodka diets and buffalo tenders. Followed  by a  delicious blue cheese burger with pickled beets. Buzzed and happy. Service was helpful and accommodating. 
Had planned on checking out this place, now known as Stillwater Tavern for a while. They're website promotes 35 cent wings on Thursday nights. I wanted to take my office staff out for wings (we often do this). I called on Wednesday to make sure the special was current and was told that it was. Upon seating, we were told the "wings" were really chicken tenders. Being over 7 years old, I don't eat chicken in tender form. The chicken was ok, but I felt misled and disappointed.
2015 Thanksgiving. .Very disappointed,  the prime was cold and raw for a medium, Not cooked the same day. Thanksgiving  dinner turkey was reheated and slightly brown  and crunchy,  stuffing was terrible.  The shrimp seemed like the only decent plate that came out of the kitchen  that day. Service  was slow then nonexistent  at times. I wanted to give the restaurant  a chance because of the change of name. But apparently it's the same bad service ,terrible  food and needs a remodel, the ceiling tile have to be 30 years old and dirty.
We use to go at least once a month and the food was great for the money.  The food is still good but they seem to have cut back.  The bread was tasteless and only margarine was offered.  We ask for olive oil or real butter and waitress said they no longer have it.  Also, instead of soup or salad--you can only get soup unless you pay extra for a salad.  The portions are very generous  and the food ok for the money. 
There are too many restaurants in RI to settle for food that is just  so so.  My husband and I both ordered Kendall Chardonnay.  His was  Kendall  mine was something different.  I told the waitress.  She brought it back and came back to say that they only had enough for one glass.   Really it is 6:00 pm on a Saturday and the place does not have anymore wine selection which they offer by the glass.  Food was okay but not great.  We will not be back any time soon.  Plus the bartender should have informed our waitress that only one of our wines was a Kendall.  He tired to pull a fast one.
Pleasantly surprised with the new menu in sports bar theme. Ribs fish and turkey club were all excellent. Another friend had the prime rib also said it was excellent. Very casual in a great spot to watch sports. Plenty of parking also. 
Had dinner with several customers at this restaurant.  We arrived around 5:30 on a Wednesday and the dining area was largely empty.  We were seated right away and were greeted immediately by our friendly waitress.

The first and only negative was the small beer selection.  This might be a regional thing because everywhere I went on this trip in Providence had a very limited list of draft and bottles.  Also, for how limited the list, the waitress did not really know of anything outside the big name brands.

On the positive side, there was much to like.  The food was good.  I had the stuffed mushroom appetizer and Caesar salad dinner.  The bigger story though was what my dinner mates had.  One had a cod dinner that was GINORMOUS!  Perhaps it is only because I am from the Midwest, but I have never seen cod of that size.  It was the same story for the chicken Parmesan that another person had.  It too was very large.  Neither person finished their dinner but both said it was excellent.

Prices were reasonable.
Crickets is a favorite restaurant of my wife and me.  We go there often--especially for special occasions.   The meals are delicious and the service is always excellent.  The dining rooms are separate from the more casual bar and music/dance area and are conducive to quieter conversations.
It is an ice family friendly restaurant , food is good snd plenty..staff is nice..clean place to eat ...
There was a party of 9 for Mother's Day Brunch.   The selection for brunch was very good.   The food was hot and the service was excellent.  Mamosa and Bloody Marys go with the brunch and you help yourself.

 It did get crowded by the time we were leaving so my suggestion is to go before 11 when more people are there.
This is really a great restaurant with good service and excellent and fairly priced food.
Everything is so fresh, from the bread to salads to your meal. Portions are fairly large and nicely presented.
The restaurant is undergoing renovations but is still open and these will appeal to the younger generation as well as us older folks.
So why not give it another try.
The perfect place for a family dinner out without spending a fortune!  The staff is attentive, the food appeals to all ages without going overboard on gourmet, and the prices moderate.  Casual, fun and the perfect family outing.
Visited Crickets Restaurant for Mother's Day yesterday.  Seating was prompt.  Our server acknowledged our party immediately and provided a friendly greeting. Buffet had a great variety and was hot and flavorful.  Enjoyed the bloody mary station and the ability to make our drinks to our liking.  All staff and management was friendly and was there to please and ensure that our experience was plesant.  Great job to Crickets Restaurant.
Went to Easter Brunch. Had not been in about 5-6 years. Very disappointed. We were seated promptly. Food of course was buffet style but was on the cool side. Disappointed that make your own omelet and belgian waffle stations were not there as they are on the website. Understandable perhaps due to the fact that it was Easter and the place was packed. They did have make your own mimosas and bloodys, however, they give you a 3 ounce glass.
We saw the waitress once when we first got there and she gave us coffee. Never saw her again. Had to ask for an additional coffee later on. Also had to ask for tab. She included the gratuity, which I understand for a party of 10, but added 20% to the total after tax! I certainly dont mind tipping for great service, but to someone we saw once?
Ultimately, the place needs a major revamp; the carpet skeeved me out. Ver disappointed and will not be back.
The inside of the restaurant could definitely use an upgrade, but has a cozy feel to it.  It is always clean and the servers are very friendly.  The food is very good and they have a nice variety on the menu.  We had the baked scrod and fish francaise.  Both were decent portion size and were cooked to perfection.  They also include soup or salad at reasonable prices.  The glasses of wine are good portions.  Don't be afraid to try this place, you will be surprised.
went there tonight.over a hour wait for food and was hot but too much water on bottom.only three older 65+ age servers and three large parties. They need young staff to run the meal clean the tables.they ran out of menus.a bit crazy.don't know how many change chefs but menu is too extensive.wait was crazy slow and mngt should have called more servers.
We arrived around 12:45 on the Friday before Columbus Day weekend. It was busy but we only waited 10 minutes for a table for two. From that point things went downhill. Our server was slow from the start. From the time we ordered entrees to the time we were served it was 1 hr, 10 minutes. During that time we received near-zero attention. About 15 minutes before our entrees arrived our server stopped by to state it would "only be one more minute". She was absent from that point as someone else delivered or meals. If this were any other restaurant we would have walked out 30 minutes in - as we watched others seated AFTER us get there food [long] BEFORE us. Sure, this could happen anywhere. But at most restaurants someone would have come by to apologize, or at least check on us now and then. The only salvation was the meal. We had been here a couple of times before and knew the chef to be fantastic. But, despite the food quality we probably will not return. It's rare to have two hours to waste on lunch. A manager came by to interrupt us with an offer of a coupon for a free app next time we visit. I left that silly coupon along with the signed bill, with the $5 tip - which was $4 too much.
Just Look at my picture - are you kidding me!!
Great location, Great people, Great Food.
Indoor and Outdoor dinning
Pork and Beef
We were visiting my son at Bryant College and decided to go to lunch near the campus. Blackie's came highly recommended. Since it had rained all day , the place was packed. We waited not too long to be seated. The waitress came and we ordered drinks. I had ordered to Diet Coke with lime and she forgot the lime, but she eventually came back with it. We ordered pulled pork nachos and buffalo chicken wings. The chicken wings were awesome. The mild were even a little spicy. They were cooked well and came with carrots and celery and bleu cheese. We didn't really care for the nachos. The pulled pork was rather sweet. I had steamed clams and white sauce. The clams were small and tender. The sauce was very very salty. They give you bread  to sop up the sauce  but it was so salty I didn't want it . One of my sons had a cheeseburger that came a little overcooked. The other son had a hot dog flatbread pizza , which I would not recommend. All in all I would say the food was just okay and the service was just OK too. The check came to over $100 for the three of us including tip.
Calamari was okay.  Tuscan turkey burger was delish!! Blackie burger was very good as well. Lots of food which was good as it was pricey. Waitress was very friendly and helpful. Atmosphere was very loud and seemed like an after work meeting place for 30 somethings...we are a little older so not our kind of place. It was a Wednesday night and very busy. Recommend reservation if going at dinner time. Would recommend food is worth it!!
Still a great meal that I can eat at home. What can be better except making it myself. The only issue is portion size it is a little different than dinning in. 
We still love Blackie's, and will return for sure - but will never order the take-out again.  

The restaurant is terrific, serving fresh, unique takes on just about everything.  They do so many things well, it's hard to pick a favorite.  Especially excellent - the hummus platter, endless paleo options, nachos, fresh salads, burgers, and fabulous Gluten Free choices.  The service is friendly, knowledgeable and efficient.  

The take-out, which started off awesome, has declined in quality, portion size and freshness.  Our first several orders were so good that we thought we had finally found a reasonably healthy take-out option.  Our last 3 orders were so significantly smaller and less appealing than what is served in the restaurant that we will not order it again.

The restaurant remains one of our favorites for a local bit, but the take-out needs to improve.
I pass by this restaurant often and it is usually packed. So, I figured must be good. After asking around con census is that's is good
I finally got there and had a great BBQ brisquet melt... Very good
Kids got hamburgers that have my name on it for next visit which I hope is soon
Overall very good .... Like I heard
Try it you'll like it
Great selection of beers on tap including several IPAs.  Fabulous salmon that was crisp and moist with a surprisingly tasty tzatziki sauce.  
I had heard so much about this restaurant and due to time of evening, we were able to get accommodated and get a late dinner. The bar scene was active and there was a singer entertaining at the time. The menu offered interesting items but what overcame me was that the place had a terrible smell. We were seated near the men's bathroom side and due to my sensitive noise found it hard to enjoy my meal with this unclean smell. I had once received take out from here that was delicious but coming in person was a disappointment. It would be a great place to dine and locals and college students make up the scene. I hope they read this review and give their restaurant a major cleaning, especially the bathrooms.
Overall, the food is pretty good here and moderately priced. I like how their menu is always changing and they also have a special paleo menu as well. It seems like no matter what day of the week it is, it's always busy and that there are things going on, which makes it a fun place to be. My only critique is that the food is very slow coming out of the kitchen. I was there last night and waited about 45 minutes for my salad and my friends salads to come out.
If you haven't tried Blackie's for a Sunday brunch you're missing out! The menu has something for everyone and then if you're like me you"ll want one of everything on it!!
Delicious. Everything here is house-made, outside-the-box. Scrumptious. Salad topped with fries, over sized burgers. Never had a bad meal!!!
I have been to this restaurant a half dozen times and have never had a dish I was completely satisfied with. Menu changes often and service with a smile. It is always busy even during slow times.
had a 'ladies luncheon' today at Blackie's.  what a hopping place!!  we had a variety of sandwiches which were all very good.  the burgers are a mile high with big fat onion rings.  yummmmmmy.  Only draw back is it takes quite a long time to get the food.  fortunately we weren't in a hurry but it might be a tight squeeze for a business lunch.
Bar is very small and packed if you are trying to just have drinks. They have a good selection of beer but the wine isn't great. Food is pretty good if you want large portions of bar type food. 
Anything I have ordered here has  been great. Highly recommend. I've gone back numerous times :) Gone with family and friends. All love it and say want to go back. You won't be disappointed.
Our first time here, and everything was delicious. We started with the nachos, and moved on to the Mac and cheese quesadillas, the pad thai salad, the stuffies, everything was out of the ordinary and wonderful.
I've visited this place twice in recent months. I really enjoyed my first visit. I liked the decor of the inside and thought it was a fun atmosphere. The parking lot could use some work. The food was good and the servers were all polite. I tend to remember prices were very reasonable for the food and drinks we got.

My second visit was not as satisfying. I guess they changed their menu to a summer menu or something so I wasn't very impressed by the selection. Some of the things I found appealing on my first visit were no longer on the menu. Also seemed like everything was pricier. I still like the atmosphere and the servers, but probably won't return until the fall.
This is our favorite place in Smithfield and we've been at least a dozen times. Menu changes season to season and a few new items get added once in awhile. Food is always great. Only downside to the place is the limited parking but the complimentary valet has eased that a bit since it was introduced about a year ago.
I have eaten at Blackie's a number of times and have yet to have even an mediocre meal.  The ingredients seem fresh, and I appreciate that they have a gluten free menu.  The burgers are excellent and the waitstaff is very good. It does get very crowded at night (for good reason), so you might want to call ahead.
Mon and thur are $0.35 wings nights.  Ask for them extra crispy and with buffalo sauce and get ready to enjoy!!! I've had buffalo wings all over and these are very very good!
Good beers on draft. 
Friendly staff. 
Atmosphere is fine.  Regular bar atmosphere. 
When it was Crickets we thought dark and gloomy but food was good. Well now bright and cheerful and food still good. Staff is very nice. I told my husband we should try again now that it is Stillwater Tavern. We are glad we tried again. We travel this area a lot so I am sure we will go back.
Appears to cater to seniors...and that's a good thing.  Nice atmosphere and lots of specials. Recommend you stop in. 
The place looks a bit like a banquet hall from the outside as well as the inside. Seven TVs lined up along the walls. None over the bar area. At first I thought there were two bar areas side by side, but actually there is only one with another huge roundtable. Older crowd when we there on a Friday night and not crowded at all.

Our waitress was nice at first but seemed like she got flustered by a whining older guy seated next to us. Appeared she took a bit of a mental break and we didn't see her for about ten minutes. So it took a while to place our order.

Food was okay. Portions were huge. I got the steak tips with rice. Steak was very dry. Large portion of rice which was bland. Bread was terrific, though. My girlfriend got a salad which was also huge. Prices were reasonable for what we got. May or may not be back.
First of all, I thought since the restaurant changed hands that the outdated, dirty, drab, dark décor might be updated-it was not. The waitress was clueless, did not know the menu, specials, etc., never returned to our table, waited 15 minutes for bill after we had finished eating-you get the picture.  We were charged $15.00 for drinks-my husband and I  had diet cokes with two refills each.  Obviously, they charge full price for refills on soda.  My steak was pretty good, my husband liked his seafood dinner also.  But for a steak dinner, a seafood platter and diet cokes-no appetizer, no desert, no coffee-the bill was $83.  I thought it was so expensive considering.  Much prefer Parente's around the corner on Route 7 near Bryant entrance.
Great belly clams and sole Francoise (4 huge pieces of sole) done so wonderfully with the Francoise.  The helpings were Huge!  could not finish my meal. came with soup or pasta with vegetables and rolls.
They are located literally at the opening of Bryant University. This was our second visit and it was just as good as the first. We started with Buffalo wings. They were just what you would expect from a pub. I had the French dip sandwich which was really good. The roll was nice and crispy and the roast beef was nice and tender. My husband had a veal parmesan sandwich and he was hesitant about it but it was veal real, not frozen. My son had a barbecued cheeseburger that was cooked perfectly. I suggest you pay the extra dollar and get onion rings they are delicious.
We had a great experience. We had a party of 6 and everybody enjoyed their meals. Their Calamari Giovanni was yummy and very crispy. We had the fajitas, blakened swordfish and chicken parm for our entrees. I had never been but my boyfriend had been there years ago. I will definitely go back again
Hubbyhad chicken parm and it was quite good, and BIG.  I had the swordfish grilled special, quite good, I was surprised.  A VERY casual place, but good for the money. We wanted casual so it suited us.  A step above diner, so you get what you may expect. But our food was very good.
I love their onion soup, their specials, and the owners, they are always very friendly. I am never disappointed.
We've been enjoying Parente's for years now - it never gets old! Always something on the menu to suit your hunger pangs plus there's always specials! Dennis and / or Larry Parente's are always there to greet you and make sure all is right. The soups are all yummy and always served hot. You can't beat the ribs or veal parmigiana - two of our favorites! 
If your not as hungry there's the smaller portion dishes as an option.  Something for everyone!
Went with a large group for dinner. Got scallops and they were horrid. No flavor, covered with buttered breadcrumbs. Fresh but flavorless does not win folks over. Didn't try to make it right, unsure of what would be good here maybe pub food only. Hubby had a Cesar salad and it too was bland. Must be better choices in the area.
We dined here whilst staying at the nearby Hampton Inn.  We were seated straight away and our drink order was taken by the lovely waitress.
I went for the meatballs with penne pasta and a side of garlic bread, sweet potato fries and salad.  The food was superb and the portions huge.
We were so full-up by the end of the meal that we skipped the dessert. The bill came to a very reasonable $50 [£32]
Great Tavern stop. Good beer, burgers and Sea bass.
Service was prompt and pleasant. I would definitely go back
I ordered scallops & grilled shrimp which was very good. Another order the seafood combo which apparently was just okay.  The atmosphere was nice, somewhat a bar but  could accommodate large groups.
Parente's has been here for a while.  It is near one of the colleges and is a good place for families to eat.  They have seafood and Italian specialties.  Good food.
Bryant University hangout. Booths are comfortable. Wide variety of food; burgers, pasta, salads, wings, full bar.
Visited several times lately. Nice local casual place. Great deals on appetizers in the bar 3 to 6 big portions great price.  Service was good and made you feel like home. Lots of regular patrons which indicates it is good !
Visited here with Family, the food was excellent. I had two fussy children with me & they catered for them. Was very surprised at the bill I expected it to be more expensive
We hadn't been to Parente's in years. We haven't been back because it wasn't very good then but when Groupon featured it, and because it's a small, local restaurant, I thought I'd try again. I bought two certificates. The first visit was for dinner. Big mistake. The food was not good. A spinach salad which is supposed to be made with baby spinach, and which the menu specified was made with baby spinach, was served with regular, bitter, tough large leaf spinach. Most of the time you don't serve large leaf spinach raw. I complained to the waiter, and he came back to tell me they ran out of baby spinach. 

We still had one Groupon so decided to use it for sandwiches.  My husband did order beef tips which were okay but the gravy was on the gray side. My grilled chicken sandwich was fine. Hard to mess that up. Although the pickle they served with it looked like it had been on a few other plates, not eaten and then given to me. I wouldn't touch it. The ice in my drink had spots of something frozen into it. 

Which brings me to my biggest complaint, and the reason we will never go back. The place needs a good scrub. The window sills beside the booths are filthy.  They're dusty and spotted with food. The carpeting is disgusting. When I see a restaurant so dirty in the dining room, where everyone can see, I wonder what the kitchen looks like behind the scenes.
This is the definition of the local bar or pub. It is just off the beaten path in Smithfield. Ask a local and they can get you to it. 

The staff is always friendly and fun to interact with when here. There is always sports on the TV and popcorn on the bar. 

The food is traditional bar food with some Italian dishes and daily specials thrown in too. The food is always good with the burgers being the specialty of the house. The beer is always cold and drinks are a generous pour. 

Truthfully, I've been here dozens of times over the years and keep forgetting to review it until this last trip. 

It is a great place to hang with friends and watch whatever the sport is on the TV. This is a good spot for friends, couples and business lunches. 

Go and enjoy. 
The food was really good but the set up is a little cramped making it hard to have an intimate dinner
I have been to Parente's a few times over the years, the food remains
the same.   It is near Bryant College and is a go to for students and visiting parents.
Place has dirty carpet, dust and food splatter on  window sills.  We had to ask for a clean menu(had food stuck over it).  My knife has sticky substance on it.  Cole slaw was floating in mayo.  Fish was soggy and mushy, Chowder was tasty and very tomato soup like.  The fried clams were actually good.  They are in need of Robert Irvine in Restaurant Impossible.  We will not go back as there are too many other good restaurants around Smithfield.
THE FOLLOWING HOTEL REVIEW INCLUDES A NOTE ABOUT PARENTE'S
___________________________________________________________

Excellent management service.

As I have stayed at this newly renamed Holiday Inn many times, this trip I carefully reviewed the helpfulness of the management, as well as the condition and cleanliness of my room, as there has been a change in ownership.

As I am a bit older, this trip I hired a driver and black car to take me from Boston to Smithfield.  The service was excellent (Boston Limo), but I was left in Smithfield without a car for two days.  I had of course arranged a cab in advance (Smithfield is too far from Providence to warrant its own cabs, apparently), so as to compensate.

The day of my meeting, the cab did not show up.  As my meeting was important, and I had to be there early (only mile or so away), I finally had to ask the nice lady at the desk –Ashley-for help.

She understood the problem right away, and put a sign on the counter and ran me to my meeting with Honeywell.

When my meeting was finished, I was driven back to the motel by a friend.  But, I was now left with no cab to take me to my favorite restaurant in town: Parente’s.  The Holiday Inn Director of Sales, Scott Brodie, hearing of my second need for a ride, immediately offered a ride to Parente’s where I normally dine while in Smithfield.

[Side note:  the staff at Parente's, knowing I’ve diner there many times over the years, also helped out by taking me back to the Holiday Inn after two meals there.  And, the food had gotten even better since the last time there about 3 months ago.  Try their home-made soup.]

All in all, the staff at Holiday Inn was excellent in their service to a guest.  Thanks Ashley and Scott.  Well done!

Recommended.
Convenient pub food close to Bryant University.  Family owned business that has been around for decades.  Good place to grab a quick meal and a few drinks.  Service is good, the drinks are tasty.  Prices are reasonable.  Has a fun bar atmosphere with regular music performances.  Plenty of tables and free popcorn.  They even provide you with decks of cards for drinking games.

Recently had the nachos and buffalo wings, neither of which disappointed.  They offer 30 cent wing nights which are very popular.  I've also had the burgers which are good as well.
Pizza is consistently good. We usually get delivered pizza twice a month. They offer a lot of options.
Looks like your run of the mill place from the outside, but a hidden paradise for sure. Great food , music and service....all while hanging out by a huge pool for the day.  $10 to swim and hang out for the day, but clearly a bargain.  Can't wait to go back.
I went to this place today with my wife and family.  We were greeted by a man in a wheel chair who immediately checked our bags for food because they want you to buy their food and not bring anything, and I mean anything in to the pool area. We were treated like criminals. They checked every compartment of our duffel bags. We had our 15-month-old daughter with us and we had some baby food and crackers and grapes and cheese for her that apparently was not allowed. They even charged my 15-month-old daughter a $10 cover charge for the pool area. Yeah, like she was going to swim on her own. The wristband was so big that it could fit around her neck. The whole process took at least 15 minutes for the screening. I was expecting a cavity search next LOL. Once we finally got into the pool area after going through what seemed like an ACI intake session we ordered drinks and food all of which was terrible. The food was the worst food I've ever had in my life! The heartburn started immediately and the drinks seemed watered down. Even the soda seemed watered down. The pool itself looked like it hadn't been painted in 15 years. All the sides were chipped and paint was missing and the endless list of rules they had for the pool area basically made it so that it wasn't worth even swimming. The service was the worst I have ever experienced. The girls that were servicing the pool area seemed miserable and by their behavior seemed like they'd rather be somewhere else. Keep in mind if your tab goes over 50 or $100 there is automatically going to be an 18% tip added to the bill which is truly not deserving of anyone who is miserable with their job. This is a seasonal place that is obviously in business just to make money as fast as they can during the summer months. This place truly lives up to its  name for it truly is a Last Resort for anyone that desperate to jump in a public pool, eat horrible food, get terrible service and pay $150 for a family of 4, one of which is only 15 months old for cover charge, food and drinks. Your money will be better spent at the beach.
my food was really good after i asked for it to be cooked longer than normal.
server was great & knows the group i was with.  they all like her too.  my food took a long time but it was very hot on arrival so it wasn't the waitress' fault.
very disappointed about the charge for swimming - esp when they 'close' the pool (without making it unaccessible) at sunset and there's no lifeguard.  i don't need a lifeguard, really, but the fee is all profit the way it is now.
i expected half the fun to be swimming in a lit-up pool after dark.  now i won't bother going there again - without using the pool, at sunset it's just like any other restaurant.  no reason to drive from the next county where i live.
even though we were outside, we had cig smoke in our faces frequently.  imho they should make the area to the left of the stage (facing the stage) a smoking area & have a fan to direct smoke away from the stage.
there's room for more tables & chairs but not enough furniture.
cover that night started at 8.  i was glad i called ahead to ask.
I met with a large group of friends and former co-workers for drinks.  We selected this place based on someone's past experience and it's central location for everyone.

It's a huge building with a massive pool out back.  We were hoping to hang outside, but the outdoor bar wasn't open so we stayed inside where the AC couldn't keep up and it was very warm.  They have a somewhat limited draft beer selection but they did have all the usuals.

We normally order some appetizers, but based on the overall feel of the place decided against it.  There were some people in the pool, but it definitely wasn't crowded outside and inside we were pretty much the only people at the bar and no one was seated at a table.

We stayed for a few beers and left and will not be heading back to this place anytime soon.
Nice to see a random hang out bar off the side of the road. The place is huge. There is pool, an actual pool, beach volleyball, multiple bars, and a stage. The pizza is solid! Need a bigger draft beer selection. 
It is more bar like, no frills, does have pool cost $ 10 per person ..it is clean and no kids after 3 in the pool ...
Went there to listen to the band. A Strange place. If you want an afternoon of Redneck city--this is your place.  Beer, swimming pool, and music.  Don't order wine---it was bad. Beer or hard liquor only
 Did not eat any food. Thought it was strange, we had to pay $5 apiece to walk on the patio to listen to the band too. Bathrooms not too clean.  Probably would not come back. 
We went into this place and it was empty, we should of turned around. But no, we go in. We asked if they serve food. The bartender says yes. We look at menu. We decide to eat. We order some  wings, nit a lot of sauce cooked crispy.  I ordered the Baja fish tacos and he ordered a giant pastrami on a torpedo instead of rye. The wings came in a reasonable amount of time. They were COVERED WITH BUFFALO SAUCE, we were hungry,  we wiped off the excess.  They were ok for frozen. We finished them and waited and waited and waited for our meal. We were just about to tell bartender we want our check and our meal came. IT STUNK! my fish tacos were disgusting.  They were the same fish they use for F&C's. Battered fish fried,  on a stale tortilla with get this- coleslaw mixed with dressing, Not avacado but guacamole and salsa. It was gross. I can't believe they serve it this way.  My husband pastrami looked like they reheated 3 times and the roll was asked to be grilled and they put it in the oven. It was dry and hard. The reason we stopped in tonight was we first went to a restaurant up route 7 to find it closed down, it was a new restaurant that we haven't tried.  We wanted ti give the last resort a chance. Well we gave them a chance,  and it will be our last resort to ever come back even if it was the last restaurant standing. One other thing, customers watch what goes on, there were people going behind bar getting there own drinks putting his plastic cupola right into the ice. I saw too much. Management needs to manage and get that real estate back hopping again. One piece of advice, on the bottom of your receipt,  it says try a $5 margaritas outside under the tiki bar. ITS FREAKIN FREEZING OUT AND THE TIKI BAR BEEN CLOSED PROBABLY SINCE LABOR DAY. Why not tell them to try a $5 flavored hot chocolate cocktail to warm them up instead. 
We usually eat here when going to listen to the band Brass Attack ( which by the way is a great band ) The burgers are always a solid choice as well as the fries that come with them. We have had a few of the other sandwhich items which have been good also. The drinks are decent enough as is the service. A nice little place to visit during the week after work or on the weekend if you want to listen to music or dance. They have a huge outdoor pool which is open in the summer months with music outside.
I've been here before once for food and a bunch of times for drinks and live music. I've never had a bad experience until today. It was a Monday evening, and there was hardly anyone in the place, including staff. The service was beyond terrible!!! We started off our disaster date with the waitress telling us that more than half the menu was unavailable due to a new cook still learning the kitchen. That is absolutely absurd!!! And by the way, the waitress seemed like she was on drugs, completely out of it, extremely inattentive, and very forgetful. Wait, it gets better. We ordered three sandwiches with fries, which wasn't what we really wanted bc of the very limited menu. 40 minutes later, we finally got our food. My fiance's burger was much rarer than he would've liked it, but we can't blame the cook, since the waitress never asked how he wanted it cooked! We asked the waitress that dropped the food off to the  table (not our original waitress) for utensils since our waitress forgot to give them to us, but she never came back either! My fiance' had to go track a waitress down and deliver the utensils himself! When our waitress finally came back to check on us, another 20 minutes later, we asked for the check and a box for leftovers. 10 minutes later, we got the check, but she forgot the box. We gave her a card to swipe; 10 minutes after that, she came back with the receipt to sign, still no box! Another 5 minutes, we finally got the box, and that was the LAST time we EVER go to Effin's Last Resort! TERRIBLE!!!
Friday 10/3/2008
Had heard but had not been.
Had Appertizers and Dinner Calamari was GREAT!!!!!
Our waitress was very pleasant and attentive(Jasmine)
Band was AWSOME!!!! Great crowd too.
We will be back
If you're looking for something unique for breakfast, stop into Karen's Kitchen and try their world famous Hot Weiner Omelette.....it is excellent!  It's a quaint little breakfast diner where everyone is friendly and the waitstaff treats you like family :-)
My husband and I recently tried Karen's Kitchen a couple of times after having lived in the neighborhood for a few years.  We were intrigued by the "world famous hot weiner omelet" mentioned on their sign and decided to try it after many weekend mornings wasted waiting for a table at higher end breakfast restaurants.  The first thing to note is that Karen's Kitchen is not a place for those favoring pretense.  There is a rooster (country) motif that lends itself well to the quaint charm of a stereotypical grandmother's kitchen with dated furnisings and mismatched dishes/mugs/etc. completing the "hole in the wall" atmosphere.  Don't let looks deceive you though.  This place appears plenty busy with customers from all walks of life.  The prices are reasonable and competitive for the area with absolutely massive portions that make this place a true find.  The service has been pleasant so far; however, we did notice on one visit that getting change for two twenty dollar bills was difficult despite our waitress walking by the table at least 3 times (leaving us with no choice but to tip only 15% with the dollar bills we had available instead of the 20%+ we would have given had we been given change).  Noteworthy is that this restaurant does not accept credit/debit cards, it is cash only.  Luckily there is an ATM in the convenience store in the next parking lot over (easily walking distance).  The hot weiner omelet is absolutely mammoth in size and is exactly how it sounds (sliced hot weiners, seasoned ground beef, raw onion slices and celery salt on top of a plain omelet) with awesome flavor if you don't mind "gaggers" for breakfast.  The homefries are some of the best I've ever had and the homemade corned beef hash has great flavor and much better texture than the canned variety typically served by smaller breakfast places like this.  The pancakes are huge..easily the size of a large dinner plate and that includes the ones you get as part of the breakfast specials - easily a meal in their own right.  Bacon is a thicker cut and served crisp, perfection!  Overall, this is a nice little spot to grab a quick breakfast with no fuss.  They also are open for late night breakfast on weekends, which I look forward to trying in the near future!
Was on a visit to Twin Rivers Casino and located on our a GPS a place for breakfast called Karen's Kitchen. WOW! Great food, service and a real homey atmosphere.
 Obviously a choice of the locals folks but extremely friendly to out of towners as well.
 Portions were huge and the Monkey Bread is to die for!!
 It is a true breakfast delight you must try when in the Smithfield area!
Unless you are going to a PF Changs, your expectations for Chinese food to resemble some sort of gourmet dining experience should cease; then again, I can't stand PF Changs (and I have tried different locations, different dishes).  If you are hungry and have a craving for Chinese food this restaurant will be just as good as any.  I ordered the Hunan shrimp combo w/shrimp roll, and my wife had shrimp & broccoli with fried chicken wings.  The Hunan was not as spicy as I expect it to be, and my wife was not too wowed either; but then again, it was Chinese food, and we ate it, as we should have. If it was really bad, we would not have eaten it. Considering its proximity, I will be back. If you haven't been in a while, go back and try them again. 
Have tried this restaurant a couple of times and now I'm done. The food at best is average and that is being generous. The free delivery is OK as long as you're willing to wait double the stated time. My advice is to go somewhere else.
This review is disappointing for me to write, considering that my parents have ordered from here since l was in elementary school (I am a third year college student now), my s/o & his family orders from here, and I order from here, and I've always received good food and good service, and I always made sure to leave 3-5 dollars as a tip. But this order was ridiculous. 

I made a  call for delivery at 6pm last night. I ordered a pint of crab ragoons, a pint of beef lo mien, and a general tso's chicken meal for my sibling. The man on the phone repeated my order, told me my price, and hung up. Everything was fine when they delivered at seven. My crab ragoons were delicious, and my sibling was enjoying her meal. I was in the middle of watching a movie, so around 7:15 I reached into the bag to retrieve my lo mien. Instead, I found that I had beef with broccoli and a smaller package of white rice. 

I called to inform them of the error, and whom I'm guessing was the owner was put on the phone. She informed me it'll take 30 minute to receive the pint of lo mien, and that she would give me that same meal free on  my next order. I then called back around 7:30pm because I forgot to mention that this wasn't my house (I was babysitting) and she assured me that I would still receive the discounted meal, regardless of the location I ordered from.

So I waited for my lo mien and around 8:30 I called again, this time asking for a refund, because by now it's been two hours since I put in the original order. She claimed I "misunderstood" and that I would only get the discounted meal, not the delivered meal. I was so upset by then, and told her the refund, and in a threatening tone she told me "You want a refund? Come and get it!" repeatedly over and over. So now I have to go out my way to get a refund that shouldn't have happened in the first place. I hope that they get their act together; in the meantime, I'm going to order from the Lucky China or Ginger root from now on.
This Chinese place is just okay in my opinion and that comes from a combination of the price and quality of the food. We ordered the 21 Fried Shrimp, crab Rangoon, fried wontons, Mongolian beef, General Tso, beef fried rice, and egg rolls. Over $40 worth of food and it did not come with a free soda, sauces or forks. The crab Rangoon taste like nothing but cheese, the fried wontons were hard and disgusting, the egg rolls were cold, and the beef fried rice had about three strips of beef in it. The beef strips were medium size but I am paying extra for beef that's not there. My son who had the General Tso threw up later that night even though he said the general tso was good so I do not know what to think about that and my husband had the Mongolian beef which was the best out of everything we ordered. Depending on what we have the taste for we may or may not order  There are better Chinese places in East Hartford.
Just spent $41 on the worst Chinese food I've ever had.  The soup broth tasted like water.....the pupu platter was inedible and obiously not fresh.  The 2 meals were also a disaster.  On the flip side - the pork fried rice had no flavor, so that was ok.....oh, and the  bottled soda we got was top notch.  There was NOTHING free about the delivery.
Very good basic chinese
We went for a late lunch and had pizza and a veal parmigiana dinner My wife chose to come here just because she liked pizza in the past and she didn't care for it. I had a veal parmigiana dinner which was salty and overcooked
The chef must not taste anything that is prepared because there is much too much salt in the food.  We ordered the shred salad and two small pizzas, a clam pizza and a foccacia pizza.  Pizzas were very salty.  The cheddar potato soup was very good as were the salads.
I frequent Procaccini's, as I work nearby.  The wait staff (last visit was Chris) was super friendly and very attentive.  Their pizza is fantastic although my personal favorite for lunch is their hot capacola grinder (with everything, of course).  Grinders are served with chips and a half grinder is MORE than enough for lunch.  I always go back to work happy and satisfied.
Procaccini's has a very good selection of traditional italian as well ands daily unique menu items.  The menu also includes grinders,calzones, and pizza. Pizza comes in a choice of 4 sizes - mini, small, medium, and large with a wide selection of toppings or spending is combinations.
Our family started getting pizza at Gino's many years ago.  We moved to Florida and found that the business had become Procaccini's.  We now live in North Carolina and have continued to search for the best pizza using Procaccini's as the standard.  Whenever we get near Connecticut, we must get to Procaccini's.  We made it last week with friends and family.  The twice baked pizza, delicious (and abundant) sauce and terrific toppings serve to remind us...Procaccini's is simply the best.   Others are very good, but nothing truly compares.
I am 8 years old and I LOVE Proccacinis! I went here twice for dinner and went last night. The staff is so friendly and they are very quick. Their pizza and salad and garlic bread and pasta are superb! But go there at night or suffer the line!
My cousin and I have been coming here for years.  We had dinner there on 6/19, and had a wonderful evening, and great meal.  I had the baked rigatoni, and Stacey had a mini pizza.  We both had the pasta fagioli soup, but we did order the freshly baked chocolate chip cookie with ice cream and whipped cream.
I can understand the comments about slow service and the like, I have seen it and commented to the owner on this.  He is working to correct it.  He has several new young wait staff and they need to learn the proper way to work in a place like this.  Luckily we had Maya, who is home from college, and was an outstanding server, like Taylor and Kelly are.
We have been enjoying Procaccini's pizza for years.  Good old style Italian pizza, with nice tasting sauce.  We always get it with black olives and onions.  When we eat in, we always enjoy the chopped salad.   The only negative is that the TV's are on too loud, makes it hard to relax.  This is a nice comfy neighborhood restaurant and if you are looking for good pizza at a reasonable price, this is the place.
I've never had a bad meal here. Today the pasta fagioli soup was delicious as was the chicken cutlet grinder!
Food is fair and owner cuts corners wherever he can
Cut backs you can see make me worried about cutbacks behind kitchen doors 
The wait staff is nice and beer reasonable
Overall experience was poor and I would never go back
A bunch of us decided to go here for dinner on Saturday night for dinner. Everything was great the server was on her game and the service couldn't have been better. There were 8 of us and the food all cam out at the same time and was hot. The food is always good. You can't go wrong!
A group of us decided to try this Italian restaurant because of it's convenient location, on Main Street close to the highway. We arrived at 6pm and the place had a few booths filled, busy but not crowded. We were allowed to seat ourselves. This restaurant boasts your normal Italian restaurant feel with the decor, there were both booths and tables. The floors did have food on them, like one review already stated -- and it didn't seem like anyone was concerned enough to take care of it. Not being familiar with the menu it took us awhile to order. There are very few items under $10.00 and those are kids meals, mini pizzas, and some appetizers. We ordered quite a selection -- from appetizers and sides to pasta and grinders, everyone got something different. While the presentation was okay the taste, quality, and care was lacking. Nothing that was suppose to be hot was hot, room temperature at best, even the soup. One hamburger was completely raw inside and when it was pointed out to the server all that was said was "Oh My". The fried dough we ordered was made incorrectly, folded over during the cooking process, which made it raw in the middle. Any sauces/dressing came in small take-out containers with lids, like another review mentioned, and you needed multiple ones for a salad. There was nothing that we had that we commented "Wow, this is great!!" or "We have to come back for this!". We could have overlooked the food had the service been over the top or even good. We saw what appeared to be some regular customers. If your a regular, the servers seem to be more friendly, even talking to their customers -- lingering at the tables. We didn't get the same friendliness. We very rarely saw our server, at one point no server was on the floor for 10 minutes. She took our order, someone else brought our food, and she brought us our check. We saw her more from the time she brought the check until we paid it than we did the whole time we were there. (She kept coming back to see if she could take the payment yet.) Overall for the food, price, and service your better off going somewhere else -- like a chain restaurant where you know what your getting and any issues will get you more than an "Oh My".
The pizza is disgusting and awful. The only time it's decent is when the owner is working there on a Sunday. How do you screw up pizza... they do appearently. Go back to your hole in the wall at the old Gino's location... the food was better there. I've been eating their pizza since 1975... yes 1975. (I'm 43 years old) DISGUSTING food. When my family says where we going to order pizza from... I say "Not Procaccini's".
My mother in law who is very generous, treated us to a meal at Procaccini's. She raved about the food. Reminded my husband and I that we were all there about 6 years ago for an anniversary. It came back to, so I thought it would be a good eat!.  The seating area- food on the floor with no one in the booths or tables- it was 1:00p.m. Smell of old, instead of Italian food cooking. That told me "something is not right." Ordered a chicken salad, came on iceberg lettuce, with tomatoes and a few other things in it. Dressing on the side in a plastic container. that did it for me. My husband ordered an antipasti salad and was very disappointed. It was presented with not - well bland.  As if some one open a can and assortment of "things" along with a package of lunch meat.  He did not finish his food. I don't remember what his mother ordered, however, she took her food home. All I could say it went down hill.
Very  good Italian food. It's family run and has a friendly staff. I like the pizza and Linquini with red clam sauce
The sweet potatoe fries with garlic and basil are heavenly.  Try dipping them in blue cheese dressing for an added bonus.  The  poppy salad was a special and was so good I went back a few days later and had it again this time with grilled chicken.  Plenty for 2 to share but I like the leftovers.  Will be making this one of my new favorite places to go!
Over a year has gone by since my last visit and boy did they ever become popular with the home crowd.
Before they did a pretty good take out business with their pizzas and only about 30 percent of their sit down part was full at 6pm. Now they are running 90% full and lines forming to sit down. Their basic entrees have taken a new flair with large side salad ($2 up charge) or free soup.

The bread basket was upper class with many different types to choose from. The pastfagoili soup was the homemade and the best I have ever had with lots of sausage.

The word has gone out so expect locals packing the place at 6 pm

I'm going back tomorrow noon just to get some of that soup for takeout.
I had the pleasure of dining with friends on June 5th with friends at Pocaccinis Italian Restaurant in E. Hartford Ct. the callimari was fabulous and the eggplant sticks were just as good. We also ordered a shredded salad and it was very good and we fed 9 people with it. We ordered 2 large specialty pizzas that were the best ever and we had plenty to take home with us. If you ever visit that area of Ct. I highly recommend going to eat at this restaurant. You will be extremely glad that you dd. The service was great and the staff friendly and attentive. Don't miss eating at Procaccinis in E. Hartford Ct.
Best pizza I have ever ate.Have eaten with family and friends and always get pizza to go.Recommend this restaurant for all occasions. I live in Fl.now and when I travel to Conn.always have pizza at restaurant .
We always order pizza from here because it is available in all sizes and varieties. Our picky family ends up with a couple of small sand a large half and half. The cheese is rich and plentiful, the crust thick and chewy. It is an old-fashioned family run place. Not much atmosphere, so we always take the food home.
Take out is ok, however don't expect to get what you ordered if you grab something to go. I have ordered things multiple times and if you request to not have a certain fish in the lunch or sushi meals they will still put it in.
This is a small family run restaurant that I've chosen as my go-to chinese take-out place. The steamed veggie dumplings are good, along with the vegetable lo mein and broccoli with garlic sauce. Prices are very reasonable for the amount of food that you get.
I rarely revisit restaurants because there is that chance that it will ruin your last experience and very rarely have they outperformed my last experience. Service may differ, but food only changes dramatically if there are different chefs on different days or time of day. Now that you know about me, let me tell you about Ginger root. It was great. Been there before and the food was good. Went this time with hubby and the lunch buffet had a great variety of Thai, Chinese, and Japanese dishes, sushi, fruit and dessert. And it was only $8.95. You cannot go wrong with that. The seats need redoing from the overweight people that often visit buffets and I saw a few there too. But otherwise the restaurant was clean, the hostess was accommodating, not necessarily friendly or over the top, but not mean or rude, either. The restaurant was fairly full which is a sign of good food usually. I was happy with my meal and got to try some new dishes and enjoy my lunch date. Definitely go visit. Remember I said very good not excellent, so manage your expectations! Do not take your romantic partner there for an anniversary or significant event. But a lunch date is thoughtful and ideal!
We picked our dishes off menu sheet in our motel room. Food was delivered promptly, hot and delicious, not greasy and priced great at $8.00 per. We were impressed. 
I've been ordering take-out from Ginger Root for years but yesterday I decided to try the Monday-Saturday $8.95 Chinese / Japanese lunch buffet.  It was absolutely delicious!!  The egg foo young, shrimp dish, and fried scallops were so good!  At the Sushi bar I loved the spicy tuna and the seafood sushi!  Yung and Kim are great hosts and make you feel like you're part of the family (their daughters help out at the restaurant)!!  Try it out - you'll love it!!
Food is okay but customer service is horrible! Take out may be okay! My family and I went to this place for a family dinner and were stuck with nasty attitudes! The supervisor even raised his voice at us and scared my children because there was a confusion in an order and he had an extra egg role! Food was okay but not worth the frustration! First and last time at that place! 
This place is horrible, the delivery sucks I placed an order and didn't get it delivered untils hrs later and when I called the restaurant no one picked up so I called the delivery man and he wanted blamed me dude I called you you never called me about my order. After hours of waiting for my food when I finally got it I found a fried cockaroach in my chicken can you believe that worst place ever never again
DELIVERY ORDERS BEWARE!!!!!!! Most horrible experience ever! First when the food was delivered, order total was 29 dollars and change, my husband only had 2 20.00 bills. Delivery driver had no change and instead of going to get change or coming back he took it all and said "no change"!!!! So needless to say paid an extra 10.00 for a horrible delivery experience. Ordered (2) house special fried rice's and received 1 and a house special lo mein, never got the miso soup, and the japanese salad w/ginger dressing that is 5.00 was a handful of lettuce and some shreds of carrots and NO DRESSING! So I nicely called to let them know and said they would bring out the soup, salad dressing and exchange the lo mein for the rice.  Keep in mind I placed my order at 8:00pm, they close at 10:00pm. I received the food at 9:10pm and called them at 9:15pm. Also said they would bring out spring rolls for the inconvenience. So as the food is getting cold and we are starving waiting for the delivery man again, it passes 30 min (945pm) and no one has showed up or called. So my husband calls, and the guy on the phone tells him to keep the lo mein instead of giving it back to the driver, and that the driver is on his way, BUT at 10:00pm (in 15 min.) no body will pick up the phone b/c they will not be at the restaurant, so if he doesn't show up, he is sorry but doesn't know what to tell us!!!!! SERIOUSLY ARE YOU KIDDING. So it is 10:45pm no food showed up, paid 40.00 for nothing and I have been calling since 9:54pm and no one answered. DO NOT WASTE YOUR TIME NOR MONEY HERE!
I've been coming here with my infant daughter (now a toddler) for 3 years now.  It's very family-friendly.  The sushi is phenomenal and fresh!  The food is also wonderfully cooked.  This is a family run business and they make you feel at home.  Grandma/grandpa cooks in the back (so it's pretty authentic).  It is a smaller/cozier place so it was great for me to keep an eye on my baby at the booth while I went and got food.  

Gingeroot has lunch buffets from Monday to Saturday for $7.99 which is an AWESOME deal for the great sushi and Chinese dishes.  I come here like every week.  It's also the only place my daughter pigs out and finally actually eats some food.  The menu food is also great.  I had Peking duck here and shrimp and walnuts and it was great.  The other thing is you see quite a lot of Chinese people eating here (I'm Chinese too) - the secret of knowing if the Chinese food is good is if you see a lot of Chinese people there.
I should have known better.

After a long day at work, I wanted to stay warm and relax at the hotel. I found a restaurant catalog down at the lobby and decided to have it delivered to my room. The prices were extremely cheap and the pictures in the menu were tempting.
I ordered a dinner combo which included ham friend rice, general Tso chicken, and an egg roll. They had no cokes by the can so I had to order a 2 liter bottle. Believe it or not, I chugged it down that same night after all that sodium in the food. 
After placing my order, the food was at my hotel room door in exactly 45 minutes. The food was bundled up in the same container except for the egg roll. The rice was OK but nothing like fried rice I have ever tried. The General Tso chicken had a frozen not fresh taste at all. The egg roll was crispy and seemed like it was just fried. About the only thing that went well with me.
Next time I will take the walk or drive somewhere else and pay a little extra for good fresh food.
Sushi was very good & a great value.  Pieces very good size.  sushi rice was mushy.  Salad dressing was watery & miso soup yucky.  Delivery took one hour - a little slow!
This place is three for three!  The last three times I've had lunch here, I've had the green apple quick step within 90 minutes.  That's not coincidence.  I normally have a cast iron stomach, but whatever kind of slop they are serving here makes me sick.  Stay away unless you have a porta-potty towed behind your car.  Go here if you are in need of a colonic.
I'll be honest, I had several tacos for lunch and paid for it all afternoon.  I won't go back.  You get what you pay for.
It's Taco Bell.  And although the food is standard fast food, I still feel the need to review this restaurant based upon the service.  Every time we go there I am absolutely blown away by the employees.  I have NEVER had bad service here.  We are greeted with a cheerful salutation and asked how we are.  Sincerely asked.  They always have smiles on their faces and seem to thoroughly enjoy their jobs.  My kids and I are constantly amazed by the employees here.  Seriously, you need to go through the drive thru to see for yourself.  You will be pleasantly surprised!!!!
Taco Bell is a great value. I can stop in and grab a whole meal for less than $5.00. The staff is very friendly and treats you like a person rather than just trying to rush you through.
It's a Taco Bell what more can you say decent food cheap and it's not bad, I really like it instead of a burger once in a while.
The food at this taco bell was pretty average. Consistancy is what you want when you go to chain restaurants though. The actual customer service wasn't bad either, nothing particularly outstanding though. I think this is the first Taco Bell that I've gone to in the past 4 years which has not messed up something, which gives them high marks. When I opened up my bag everything I wanted was there and they gave me a wet-nap and a mint. Never seen this before at a Taco Bell, and I think all of them should do it.
I have been to several Nardelli locations and this is a "must go to" place if you want a grinder.  I am glad they are expanding their locations because now I can visit a Nardelli's more often.  All the ingredients are fresh and the overstuffed grinders are top-notch.  Think authentic italian grinders.  Don't go to one of those mass market chains.  This place is the real deal.
Love the new grinder shoppe! Fantastic customer service and an even better meal, stop here frequently and will continue too in the future! 10/10
I frequent the Nardelli's in Southington as I live in the area.  I work close to this one and it's as awesome as any of the others.  The Italian combo is to DIE for, as is the stuffed pastrami grinder.  The prices are awesome as well.  I mean, where can you get an OVERSTUFFED grinder for under $10.00?  No where !!
I stopped here for the first time, never having been to any of their other locations, and was very surprised at how big the menu was and how good everything in the case looked. It was hard to decide what to order.
I went with the tuna, which was ok. I say that because although it was good, there is another place in town where I like their tuna better, but that's just my personal preference. Its not a reflection on their tuna. I was still very happy with my food. The prices are about what you'd expect and the portions are not skimpy. I will definitely patronize this establishment again but I will try one of the other items instead and I'm sure I won't be disappointed.
I really loved this place! I was looking for a place to stop for lunch. We saw the sign for grinders. I haven't seen a grinders sign in years, probably because I do not live in this part of US. My wife chose the sausage, onions, and peppers. My son and I chose  the stuffed pastrami. My granddaughter had the kid's mac 'n cheese. We also decided to try the lobster bisque. it was one of the first times that I actually had lobster in the soup that was large enough you didn't need a magnifying glass to find it. The rolls for the sandwiches was fresh and delicious. To finish off our lunch, we bought some cannolis. They also were quite good. I only wish that I could find one closer to me than CT. Oh, well I will be back. thanks for such a nice surprise.
Nardelli's is a must-try if you even somewhat like deli-sandwiches. Sandwiches are customizable, but there are around 15 different combinations of meat to choose from. My favorite part about Nardelli's is the quality of the ingredients, everything comes together really well. It is a little more money than subway, but a half is as filling as a foot-long since these are packed with meat. After coming here, Subway and other fast food sandwich chains seem so much worse than they used to, and are not even considered when there's a Nardellis around (not just my opinion but also the opinion of my coworkers as well).
WOW WOW WOW...went there yesterday for the first time to get a pulled pork sandwich (around $9.00) and it was AMAZING! HUGE HUGE portions! and we also got some kind of cheese cake cannoli (LOVED it) I highly recommend this place. And the amazing choices of cold cuts and desserts are out of this world.
This is the first time I've been here and it won't be the last. I've eaten at almost all of the grinder shops in the area and I'm glad to say that Nardelli's is the only place I'll be getting grinders from now on,..   Had the Italian Combo and it was great. They actually use enough meat on the grinder that you can not only taste it but you can see how much they put on it. Give it a try 
Dunkin is the only coffee I drink.  I make a lot of it at home. When I am out and about, this is my Dunkin.  The service is always quick, friendly, and helpful. The store is clean. It's relatively small but always has a nice place to sit. There are a lot of Dunkin's in Glastonbury.  This one is busy from daybreak through dinnertime.
This Dunkin stands above the rest because the staff is friendly, and they get the order right, without having to repeat it multiple times while ordering.
I get my coffee every morning from the drive up window.  Most mornings the service is quick and  pleasant. Usually, Tatti is my server and she always has a smile and remembers what I usually like (like Splenda packets with my coffee).  Once in a while the order gets mixed up and I end up with something I did not order, however, the few times this has happened I have gone back later in the day or the next day and have been credited for whatever was wrong.  It's hard to start my morning now without the stop at this Dunkin Donuts drive thru.
Like the breakfast sandwiches and donuts, especially the ham,egg and cheese on a toasted plain bagel
Walked in on a Monday afternoon with the intention of buying a latte. Saw Fox News was on their TV. Walked out without purchasing anything.
I love the chocolate glazed donuts, but what donuts don't I like?  Well, Jelly, but that is it!!!  I love to eat there.  I especially love the bacon egg and cheese sandwiches.  YUMMY!! 
everything was cold, the people were not friendly, could care less. order was correct but fries were cold. we were so tired it didn't matter
Horrible to get to - just like every other 400 year-old city in the Northeast. Charming...NOT?
Best fast food salads in the business, though.
food was just like any other wendys-so that's good.  just be careful in that area.  doesn't seem to be the safest.  Not sure I would go there after dark!
глютаманатность средняя 50 на 50 все зависит от крепости вашего желудка. но химия присутсвует и в ощутимом количестве так что выбор за вами но может и поплохеть
We stop for lunch very clean and service was wonderful our server was very good.I love the popcorn its a great beginning. All our meals were done just right .We got there and we were not rush to order .The food was well done.Our server was very helpful.Its not your normal chain restaurant.I would good again.You get the same great service at any of the 99s
Went for a late lunch. Had to wait almost 10 minutes for the server to show up, and the place was not crowded. Lunch was good the food was fine when we finally got it. I ordered the lobster roll. It was good but for $17.95 not worth it. It was the smallest one I've ever had. Overall lunch was OK but the service leaves a lot to be desired. Very slow and forget trying to get one to come by after they serve your meal. Even had to wait almost 15 minutes for the server to bring the check.
I stopped in with several friends.  First complaint was that 6 adult men were shoehorned into a booth that, obviously was designed for 4.  We took it upon ourselves to remove the divider to the other booth to get comfortable.  The hostess seemed a bit annoyed that we did, but too bad.  She should have taken our comfort in mind.
We've eaten here before so there were no surprises with the menu selections. And I have to say that there has never been a problem before. Of course I was the one with a problem with the chicken caesar salad. Very dry, lacking in the amount of dressing as well as cheese. And while eating, my front tooth felt like something was stuck to it. Thought it was some lettuce but when I got home I discovered I had a chipped tooth. Not something I would expect from a salad. In retrospect I should have mentioned this to the staff. Will still return but will avoid that entree.
Average food but good for a local place.  Always eat in the bar.  TV's, popcorn, etc.  Extensive menu and they offer summer fare during those months.  They have Karaoke on Thursdays and always have something going on in there.
We go here often as a family. The food is good and reasonably priced. My kids love the free popcorn.
We were tired, and hungry, so we wanted fast service, and comfort food.  We found a wait, that was short, and the food delivered in time.  It was tasty, good, and the price was right.
It's been awhile since we've been back after poor service the last time. I should have known better. The food is still OK but the service is worse than the last time I was there.
Okay. Maybe I am a bit of a snob about restaurants sometimes. And admittedly, I never tried this place because I had a preconceived not-so-good idea about it. But I learned my lesson about putting the judgement before the experience.

Tucked in behind Burger King, it has ample parking and a low-key but pleasant atmosphere. We were greeted and shown to our table by a gracious and personable host. While our server was in-training, she needed no direction from anyone as she did a great job throughout our meal.

Again, snobbery would have kept me from ordering salmon here, but a friend had told me it was excellent and she was right. With a balsamic and herb marinade, it was cooked perfectly with mashed potatoes and broccoli. A friend had fish tacos and not only did we enjoy our meals, but had plenty left to bring home. 

The price was extremely reasonable and even with wine and soda our tab came to a mere $41.

This place is worth checking out. I will be back.
Consistent good food. Service persons are very pleasant. You can call ahead seating which is great especially with children 
We came at dinner hour, but a little later, and only had to wait about 10 minutes for a table.  The staff were friendly and helpful.  The food was pretty good, and presented well.
I love the Ninety Nine because they offer something different than many restaurants. They always have pop corn as a free appetizer, and they offer so many unique dishes like Macadamia Encrusted Chicken and some of the best nachos around.
Very good service and food for a very reasonable price.  Especially the 2 dinners for $20 are well worth the trip for a quick meal.  Very family friendly too !!
I ordered the Tips and Tenders combo which I enjoy in my home town in Massachusetts so I was interested in trying it here in Glastonbury. First let me say the staff was very nice but sadly I was not happy over all when I was back at my hotel. when I ordered my meal I told the girl I like ketchup on my steak and chicken so can you make sure there is a lot of ketchup and in joking i said "A TON" she said sure no problem (she gave me 3 packets those tiny ones you see at McDonalds) with that aside later that night I got very ill feeling and it continued into the next day where I was worse sadly I will never eat at this one again
After  hearing  the  ads  on the radio and tv my wife and I  decided  to  give  the prime  rib  a try we ordered  2 18oz  steaks  baked  potato  and  corn . The rib was dry , gray in color and    the  outside  was  like  shoe lather  with   no  seasoning ! let me put  it  this way  the dogs  ate well  that  night . The  rest  of  the meal  was  ok but  nothing  great . From a national  chain  i don't  expect  much  but  edible  would  be  nice . The is always  friendly  and  helpful but  that  can only  take restaurant  so  far !  Needless  to  say  we  will  not  be  eating  there  again  anytime  soon .
We have visited this restaurant many times and always come away with the same thoughts. The food is good but the service sucks. It doesn't seem to matter what time we go it's always the same, servers that are doing you a favor taking your order and bringing the food to the table. And don't try to find one if you should need something after the food is served. With so many 99's around it's better to go to another one.
For a national chain that does not specialize in steaks, the prime rib at this location was outstanding. Very nice flavor, excellent service. Didn't have a long wait when we dined but the place grew as we were leaving. Couldn't have asked for more (well, maybe more popcorn!). A job well done, Ninety Nine.
everytime I have been to a 99 I have not been disappointed.  Service is always better and friendlier than Chili's or similar chains.  Very fairly priced.  Ample food, great to go and a delicious chicken pot pie.
Although we had a reservation, and were told it would only be another 5-10 min , we ended up waiting an additional 30 minutes when there were plenty of tables open. (at least 6 were available)
It was a busy Saturday night and it was so frustrating to see all these open tables and customers not being seated. I think the hostess needed some time off,as she appeared very stressed and discombobulated.  Meanwhile the wait  got longer and longer. 
We finaly got seated and our waitress was great (Brittany). She managed to get all our special requests-perfectly! The portions are generous so its a good place for families with children. For example, we ordered the side Caesar salad and it was large enough for an entree. Also, if you are ordering the Chicken/Broccoli /Mac n cheese dish it is large enough for two to share and was good, but need some spices as it was a bit bland.  Overall the food was ok and if they can get their seating issues corrected  or hire some busboys then maybe we will return.
This place is good for people with dietary limitations as it seems everyone can find something.  The menu is varied, all items well prepared and a good value.  Nice place for a night you don't want to cook...
We got the chili gogs & onion rings....everything was delicious. We cant wait to go again next time we are in East Hartford
Fast service, great quality and value for your dollar.  This place has been around  FOREVER and is a favorite for Pratt & Whitney folks as it's a simple walk.  Chili dogs are great and one of my personal favorites.
Just had the fried "Special" Shrimp dinner with fries & a very tiny cup of Cole Slaw that was about a tablespoon - total cost = $10.00. Just being descriptive for readers, not criticizing.  I think a little high compared to other places at $7.99.  Not a lot of food in my opinion, but fresh & tasted good.  Everything is basically fried or burgers on the grill. The order counter when you step in runs the length of the restaurant & you get your food either To Go as many seem to do OR you sit at "Old School" Diner Stools facing out large windows to the street.  I ate in & again it was good & the service is what I know has kept people coming back for years.  I understand it is now 4 generations keeping this place going so they know their regular customers & a Papa is on the Fryer.  It appears that many locals love the Hot Dogs & Burgers that apparently made this place famous.  Many years ago I was here & nothing has really changed except much higher prices.....naturally.
Apparently there are too many people that don't know what a good chili dog taste like. I remember visiting augies in the late 60s and early 70s. So i understand the nostalgia. Get a milkshake and call it a day. If you want the best chili dog go to the ranch house in hartford/windsor line. Theres no better chili in the usa and believe me, ive had many of them augies needs to forget hot dogs.
I think they have the best chili dogs.  The chili is a bit spicy but good.  The rings are great,  thin and crispy.  Their good at what they do here. 
My friend brought me here for the first time ever!!!   ;)  All I can say is WOE!!! NOT IN A GOOD WAY. THE GOOD was the Staff. THE GUYS WERE VERY NICE . THE FOOD; especially our hotdogs, were tiny and had absolutely no flavor whatsoever.... My hotdog had chili on it. Omg @^&%;$!!! bland and gross...no flavor and didnt even look like chili. Looked and smelled like the food I feed my DOG. REALLY ?? Was it bad timing?? Was it the wrong food choice ?? Idk. I felt terrible because my friend recommended this great place. oh yes and it was "NATIONAL HOT DOG DAY" SOOOOO why were there NO specials FOR EXAMPLE::: 2 for $6 or something?????? Get it together cause its just a matter of time before NOBODY comes inside. Thicken your hotdogs!!! Get a footlong dog!!! Chili should be HOT FRESH AND THICK. SHAME. I want to try another trip in future BECAUSE my friend claims it wasnt the way it is everyday ...hmmm i would consider with some pull on your end. We paid almost $10 for two skinny hotdogs. I wasn't impressed at all but we would Maybe Reconsider a return. I work in a restaurant and I want to RAVE ABOUT YOUR RESTAURANT!!! YOU GET IT???  make your customers happy...or not ......your choice. Thank you for your time . Please consider our opinions . I really eant to enjoy a delicious fair priced, fresh hot dog....  8608106393.  NICOLE
Augie & Ray's offers more than most burger fast food joints. In addition to tasty burgers, dogs, fries and my personal favorite, fried clam strips (they have full belly too), you can expect friendly service and even get a history lesson while waiting for your order. They also serve breakfast.

You'll find outdoor and indoor seating. Inside l and is set-up like a high tops at a diner and limited. Plenty of picnic tables to dine outside. While you wait for your order you'll see photos and news clippings that  highlight their support of local teams and the restaurant's footprint in the community. They even have books for sale and proceeds go to charity.

If you go for lunch, expect a bit of a wait, but don't worry the staff works fast. My only complaint is they close at 6:30 p.m. 
Providing the best in fresh, tasty and hot food for 65 years. Good food, reasonable prices and quick service are hallmarks of this fine establishment. Try it one time and you will be back for sure.
I grew up going to Augie's with my Dad. We were from Glastonbury and would head over for either a pepper egg breakfast sandwich, chili dog, or a cheeseburger. My personal favorite was the chili dog - with everything on it! I would add sauerkraut, mustard, ketchup, relish, onions, etc. Anything I could find at the condiment bar. It wasn't a completed lunch without onion rings and a coffee or chocolate shake. You could sit at the counter inside and look at all the cool sport pictures (There is one of my Uncle Paul on a football team there) or you could sit outside and watch the seagulls attack you & the out of commission airplane field.
This is probably the best place in town for a simple burger and some onion rings. There is nothing fancy here - just a classic drive-in.  It is sandwiched between a main road and Pratt & Whitney - you don't go here for the view. The outside seating is ample and nice in most seasons. The service has always been friendly.
Augies has been around since I was a kid and my dad would bring me. This used to be one of the best hot dogs going along with great whole belly fried clams. The place has changed hands and like so many other establishments has gone down hill considerably. The once excellent hot dogs are not much more than a fatty, salty tube of disgust. The once excellent meat sauce for the dogs has been reduced to some sort of red grease with little meat. If you want an excellent hot dog you'll do much better at Doogies on the Berlin Turnpike or The Clam Digger/Doogies in Manchester.
Best dogs, onion rings, bellies, milk shakes. I have been going here since I was a kid in the 60' s.
It is a special treat to go there.
An East Hartford dining institution! Feeding hungry P&W aircrafters since the 1940s, it’s appearance from the outside and inside as a typical lunchtime snack bar is deceiving; because the food was atypical. As in the fashion of older snack bars, it has perimeter seating around 3 sides of the interior.

I had been craving a chili dog for a while, and Augie and Ray’s is a perfect place to fulfill that craving.
I ordered the dog with a side of onion rings; and I wasn’t disappointed!
The chili dog was on a toasted roll with a mild chili. To enhance it, I added a little mustard, onion, and relish from their relish bar. The onion rings were a large, individually made, order of lightly battered, and fried rings.

As a work day lunch time stop, I recommend it. I’ve have been here a few times since being introduced to it a few weeks ago. I will definitely revisit Augie and Ray’s the next time I’m in town.
I’ve heard about this place for years from my father (he grew up in East Hartford during the 50s and 60s).  I took him back this week for a visit, and he wanted to take me there, so we went here for lunch.

It’s not much to look at, but it does have that old-fashioned drive in feel to it that my father says is fairly close to how it was the last time he was there.  It’s very clean and the people working there were quite friendly and efficient.  There’s a few stools to eat at the bar inside, and picnic tables outside.  The prices seemed fair for the area.

We both had hotdogs and fries – they were excellent, probably the best hotdog I’ve ever had at a restaurant.  My father was overjoyed; he said while everything else in East Hartford has changed since the last time he was there (1976), this place had not.  If you are in East Hartford and are looking for something decent to eat, I’d recommend them.  I wish they were closer to where we live; I’d love to go back.
I had the opportunity to try Augie and Rays Drive In while visiting Gastonbury Ct. this month. I had heard about Augie and Rays from a friend who grew up there and bragged constantly how great that their hot dogs were. Well I have to agree that the Augie Dog is the thing to order when going there to eat. The chilie that they put on it is unique and has a taste of its own. It was big and had plenty of taste. All the other items on the menu looked just as good. Be sure to make Augie and Rays one of your stops.
This place has been in East Hartford for years. In fact my father worked there after WWII.  I am a fan of the burgers and the milk shakes. When I come to town I like to stop here for my lunch when visiting family. There is an outside section for the nice weather, you can eat in your car or at the stools inside.  Great food, Great prices and friendly staff.
I got food poisoning the last, and I do mean last time I ate there. A hot dog with chili sauce.  The chili sauce was luke warm, a breeding ground for bacteria.
Went there last night. Ordered dogs, fries, rings. The guy behind the counter, while putting my food on the grill actually scratched his head with his bare hand, then proceeded to continue to put my food on the grill. I rather emphatically told him to go wash his hands, and he stormed off to the back and, I assume, did that, because he came out wiping his hands on his shirt! And THAT prompted another outburst from me. So he went and washed his hands again, then took what I assume to be a clean towel and dried his hands. All I can say is the owners better teach their employees PROPER hygiene in the food service industry. I'm NOT going back!
Breakfast sandwiches are cooked to order on ultra fresh hard rolls. Everything is fresh and homemade. The Hutt family treats you like their family. Famous chili dogs(ask them to drop one in the Fryolator-yum), great fresh fish and Bogner's burgers char broiled. Why anyone goes to the Wendy's across the street is beyond me.
Augie's has been here over 60 years...looks almost exactly the same. Locals know this is the BEST drive-in food and old-time place you can go to....a MUST stop for breakfast, lunch, or an early fast food dinner with an old-fashioned touch.  Chili dogs are GREAT (smaller than 40 years ago, but same great food.  Chili fries.  Whole belly clams.  Great breakfasts. Don't miss it when going through East Hartford!
It's a chain, so the food tastes like most other BKs. The service was good, but the staff wasn't super friendly. I'd eat here again.
The restaurant was shut for a couple weeks while under renovation and just opened a few days ago. You'd think they'd want to keep it clean to encourage people to spread the word, but that wasn't the case. Every table except for 2 were dirty - meaning they hadn't been cleaned from the previous person that used it. Some were wet from drinks. Some had food crumbs on the tables & chairs, and others had wrappers and napkins on them. Many had the chairs pulled out and scattered all around.

The restaurant itself is nicely done. It's modern looking and some neat features like an automatic lid dispenser so you get only the one lid you need instead of a stack of 10. They have a large play area for kids, and the parking lot and drive thru are big and roomy.

The food is typical fast food, so my rating has nothing to do with that. If you go here, you know what you're getting, which is fine when you want it. I'm just really surprised they didn't have someone cleaning the tables as soon as someone, or at least a couple people got up.
I went here at lunch time to try the new all day breakfast.  I had the hot cakes with the new chicken sausage and in my opinion the new chicken sausage will be a real hit for McDonalds.  It has a much better taste than their old pork sausage had and it was no where near as greasy. 

This is a really busy location and although I had to wait for my order because it was lunchtime and they were backed up, considering the number of people waiting, the wait time was not that long.
You want fast food?  Go to Whole Foods up the street and get something pre-made to go. I saw a science experiment with a year-old McDonald's burger and it looked THE SAME after sitting out for a year. What does that tell you?  Why doesn't it rot or mold?  Go find some real food!
The service here is always friendly, and the food is always fresh. Most of the time there is no wait and you can be in and out quickly. Everything is very clean and well-maintained looking, plus every Tuesday night in the summer there is a car show here with old muscle cars, which is really fun to attend. For those with children there is a large, indoor play scape.
I only go through the drive-thru at McDonalds up and down the east coast because of being disabled. I have left the line in more than one location simply because of rude, inept order-takers. This place was the total opposite of every poor or downright bad location I have been in.  It was outstanding from beginning to end.  The order-taker was cheerful and polite, never interrupted and always asked for clarification if she was uncertain about something at the end of our placing our order. They always asked if the order was correct on the screen.  If we ordered something left off or added on, the excellent service continued because it was off or on according to our preferences.  The food was always hot and fresh regardless of time of day which resulted in us visiting serveral times more than we normally go to a McDonald's. Excellent customer service starts with management and training and this location has obviously taken the time to get it right.  They should be very proud because I am absolutely in love with this location and would go there every day if I lived in the area. 
Whats to say. It's fast food/ I like their new chicken club on a pretzel roll. I also like their fries the best.
What to say. Order was delivered quickly, hot out of the cooker (whatever they use). Great for a fast breakfast to get out on the road home in a hurry.
They are usually always consistent with their service and of course the coffee is outstanding and it doesn't matter what time of day you go.  They are efficient and friendly.


Recently remodeled but service still top notch. Family friendly atmosphere. Workers are friendly and orders always correct and served quickly. A model for other Dunkin Donuts
Been to one Dunkin' Donuts, been to them all.  Have to say never had a bad donut.  Safe for peanut allergic people - even the peanut donuts don't have real peanuts.  Check the website to be sure, but I'm glad they are artificial because we don't have to worry about cross contamination.
It's great it made me so happy and it's nice cause they have a convenient  drive through with all the items listed for first timers they also have coffee and enforce a positive environment  
Dunkin' Doughnuts is one of my favorites.  Love the coffee and the breakfast sandwich for a quick meal.  So glad to find one near the hotel in Glastonbury, CT.
Good.  Variety menu and good food. Service friendly. Live music can be loud. I'll be back  parking can be tricky
I went to this restaurant this evening due to the close proximity to the hotel I was staying in and the desire for a reasonably quick meal and a short walk to / from the meal. I arrived and waited to be seated, asking for outside seating if available. I was seated in an area with no other patrons and I asked the hostess to make sure that I wasn't 'forgotten' by the wait staff (due to my seating location).
10 minutes passed with no one addressing me, so I picked up and sat at the bar inside. I told my story to Nicole (one of the awesome bartenders) and she quickly assisted me with a beverage and dinner order. The manager then appeared, comped my drink, and took immediate action with the wait staff to address the issue.
The other two bartenders working (Sarah and Lauren) were equally amazing, always checking to make sure everything was OK with my meal and to see if anything else was needed. The work ethic of these three women was amazing, I haven't seen that level of commitment to their craft in quite awhile.
The food was acceptable, but nothing over the top. The beer selection was great, and the  menu extensive. Without a doubt the bar staff definitely made up for all the other waitstaff issues, and the manager's responsiveness was greatly appreciated.
I will give them another chance the next time I am in town, but only due to the efforts of three wonderful women -- Nicole, Sarah and Lauren.
I loved it. Been there twice. Went for lunch and ordered executive lunch. One Sandwich and soup. The portion size is good therefore you dont feel hungry for quite some time. Reasonable rates.
With a menu that weight a couple of pounds, it is hard to imagine that you can't find a dish to eat.  There is a full service bar with many (too many to count) beers on tap.  Large roomy booths  to enjoy your friend company at.  Noise level good, you can carry on a normal conversation.  A fun place to go and relax.
Food is good, drinks plentiful, and outdoor seating very nice. Lots of menu choices. In the evening the fire pit is romantic. Desserts are delicious! Fun to bring family friends or just your significant other! Love the glowing cubes! 
Good beer and food.  Place was pretty noisy but kind of expected that.  Had the French dip.... thought it was very good.
This restaurant is first class. The décor and ambiance is perfect for families, friends & work associates.  The food is outstanding. Grass fed cows, no antibiotics, freshly prepared to perfection. We only ordered the clam chowder, cheeseburgers, salads & milk shakes and I was blown away. The burger was the best I ever had, seriously. Everything was super fresh and prepared perfectly. This restaurant is a must try when you visit central Connecticut.  Friendly service, clean, happy, great food. Even the bathrooms are clean as a whistle.
We did not like it here at first.  It reminded us of Cheesecake Factory:  big menu and prepared food. But then we went back.  We have all found favorites.  The meatballs, the lettuce wraps. Kids like the s'mores dessert. Now we go there fairly often.  Nice outside dining. 
I go to Maggie McFlys for the bar experience. Quick food great beer great hosts and hostess. Can't go wrong here. Oh and the tvs, great for any games. 
I love the big booths and semi booths for when I have the family. The extensive menu and wine list is something to experience. 
Nothing memorable about the meals, which doesn't say much since there were six of us. The prices are high enough to warrant memorable meals, but since they have a large menu, maybe we just didn't order well. With all the area restaurants, I'd skip this one next visit and try one of the many others.
Maggies in Glastonbury is usually very good if you ca n put up with the parking hassell.  Another annoyance has been their running out of some special menu items.  The lobster special is very good but you may not get it toward the end of the period it will be available.
Maggies has a fairly diverse menu so it is great for families with finicky diet desires.
I was in speaking in town and stopped here for dinner after my event. They have a great "bar bites" menu that is snack sizes of their appetizers. The brussel sprouts were great (they had bacon). They have a huge selection of whiskey and bourbon which happens to be my favorite. I also had the street tacos which were great. You get three and get to choose from a bunch of different kinds. Lobster, ahi and pork were all very tasty! Bartender wasn't super attentive, but very pleasant. The menu was huge, almost too much.
We have been wanting to go to Maggie McFly's for years now and have heard good things about it.  We went on a Sunday evening.  It wasn't that crowded (evidently the Glastonbury location has quicker seating than the Manchester location).
Well, the menu was like reading War and Peace!  The first 10 pages was mostly cocktails, beer, wines, etc.  The food menu was a little overwhelming - too many things to choose from!  We were not that impressed - nothing spectacular. (I have heard  that the Manchester location has better food.)  Probably would not go out of our way to go back again.
This restaurant is located in Glastonbury near Max's Fish restaurant.  Once inside, I could have been in a Chile's or any such chain when it came to the food.  The luncheon menu was a good selection of items served in luncheon portions.   The service was fine though an error was made on the bill in my favor which was quickly corrected.  My cesar salad with chicken was fine with greens being fresh and the chicken breast warm.  The greens were well chopped but I prefer whole pieces. The bathroom was clean and handicap accessible.  Nice place for lunch but nothing really of note.
This place is very busy so expect a wait. Also you can almost expect to valet your car if you don't walk. 

The menu is about 2 inches thick. Really it's way too big. I ordered the porterhouse steak with green beans for $30. Even though it was very good, it's not worth that much. 

Service was good and so was the food. 

Recommend
Went there once. Service was good and the atmosphere was of a typical bar/burger place. Although I must say the outside patio is nice. I ordered a veggie burger with fries. The fries were great but the burger not so much. It was falling apart had little flavor and all I could taste was cilantro. It was not done properly. Not the best experience not to mention the waiter didn't know anything about the burger. Also a bottle of ketchup exploded on me but luckily I was able to clean it up and the manager handled the situation well (she was very nice). She also gave me a free complimentary red velvet cupcake, which was yummy. Overall, fries awesome, service well done, veggie burger bleh. So don't order it, but definitely try something else. These things happen, just check it out.
I had dinner here with a friend and we each had French onion soup and the wedge salad. The salad was delicious and fresh. The soup was good, but could have been a little hotter and was missing just a tad of that onion flavor. The drinks were very good and the service knew when to come over to us and when to leave us alone. It was a good value too.
Located across the street from the HGI & Homewood Suites in Glastonbury.  Convenience was the theme of the day.  This is obviously a "happy hour" destination.  The bar was packed, the restaurant less than half full.  Being a single I usually choose the bar which may have been a mistake.  The service was spotty due to the crowd and the bartender was not engaging at all.  The menu is EXPANSIVE with many choices...maybe too many.  I chose a lobster grilled cheese off their special summer menu.  I had high expectations but the sandwich fell short.  the lobster had no flavor, nor did the cheese.  I would have stayed for another drink but I couldn't handle the noise and slow service so I took the opportunity to pay my check.  Lesson learned.
Visiting with family and the hunger pangs kicked in... off we go to look for a menu to satisfy a bunch of our cravings. .. what a great place.   Started with a wonderful Cucumber Martini  with mood lighting ice cubes, fun in a glass!!!  Wine selection not too shabby I might add.  Lobstah roll,  Fish n chips to die for.  But have to tell ya if you are a fan of Fried Ckams, ya, it's "strips only " but the way it was fried it is a new fave, a must have next trip back to see family.  Thank you my Cousin! !!
We dined here while staying at nearby Wethersfield, CT. The restaurant was a bit loud, but the two of us had great meals. My scallops were sweet and tender, and the accompanying sauce was amazing. My husband had the lobster Cobb salad, which was very good and loaded with good stuff. 
Clean, spacious and excellent meals would be how I would describe this Bertuccis. I have visited this location many times and it's a favorite for me and my clients. Must try the sampler!!!
I love the hosts, so graceful and polite.
Friends asked us to join the for lunch at Bertucci's for lunch. Had a wonderful time the meals were great and the only thin better was the service. Their $19.95 specs I can't be beat. 
I have always loved the bread at Bertuccis, it has been years since my wife and I ate there.  Not disappointed, food was good, portions were huge, service was great.  They don't offer "specials" like Olive Garden or Mangianos, but prices were reasonable in comparison to many smaller Italian restaurants.  Worthy of visiting Bertuccis in my local area when we return home.
My wife and I were on the road today.  We decided on Italian and we remembered we passed Bertucci's some time in the near past.
From being greeted with care and seated,
it was a very positive experience.
Our waiter met every need and his enthusiasm was top notch!
We chose the $19.95 3 course meal, excellent and the portions enormous.  We both have a second meal.  Even the coffee was great.
Many specials, saw a pizza delivered.  We know what we are going to try next visit.
Although we couldn't actually find the pepperoni on our large pepperoni pizza, the roasted peppers and onions were very good. And the other three pizzas were enjoyed as well. So no complaints here!
So this place was right by my hotel and after reading reviews I wasn't going to eat here. But a storm came through and the 4 other places I drove to all had their power knocked out so by default Bertucci's it was. 

Went in with pretty low expectations. Wasn't wowed with the front or the hostess. The hostess station was a disorganized mess which wasn't a good first impression but they sat me right away. 

I ordered the 3 for $19.99 and chose a Caesar salad,  two Maryland crab cakes which came with green beans and potatoes for my entree and tiramisu for dessert.  

Croutons in the salad were stale and the lettuce wasn't the freshest. But they served fresh bread with oil and pepper flakes. Very tasty. 

My entree was cooked in a brick pizza oven which added a nice char and taste to the green beans and potatoes. I was impressed with the whole entree. 

Dessert was taken to my hotel and I could have left it at the restaurant. Wasn't very good. 

Would I go back? Probably. The other food looked good and it was cheap. 
This is the kind of place you go to when you want a safe bet at good, but not amazing Italian food. I have been here a few times and it doesn't disappoint. Just do not expect to be blown away by quality.
Stopped in for an early lunch. The Antipasto appetizer along with the meatball appetizer were fantastic!!! Service was attentive and friendly!!! Roasted chicken was moist & flavorful. 

All Bertucci's are the same, so there is comfort in knowing exactly what you are going to get.  The portions are small - I got the chicken broccoli penne and had no leftovers.  That never happens to me.
We were even given a complimentary salad.  
They were very generous with their warm delicious dinner rolls!
We dined here recently and had an enjoyable visit with family including a little one. Food was delicious and the menu was the standard fare. If I could mildly complain, the service could have been a bit quicker, especially with the little one with us. Will still return again.
I go here about once a year for my Mother's birthday. For some reason, she likes the place. I cringe when we go inside, because she hates bad service. About 90% of the time, we get back service here. Then she spends the whole mean complaining about it. The food is OK, but the pasta's always WAY too hard to even chew. Not great, especially for the high price.
We did return even after a bad service and bad food experience and I am glad we did.  The wait staff were excellent, the food prepared as I had wanted,  was very good and a terrific portion
I have been here often and I'm never disappointed. I typically get the all you can eat soup and salad...fresh and budget friendly
We dine here often so we know what to expect - great food and beverage selections and outstanding service. My favorites are the pepperoni pizza as well as the pasta dishes. Wait time to be seated is not usually very long. Will return with friends again.
Good food, good service, we will return. Came for lunch as a party of 7. The pizza and salad were fresh. Bread rolls are excellent.
Had dinner at Bertucci's. The food is very good and our waitress was very good.
However the noise level was so loud.  The restaurant was not full and most of the noise was not coming from other diners, but from the kitchen.  Maybe some plexiglass should be installed so it can deaden some of the kitchen noise.
Service was good, but I wasn't ordered a replacement meal for spaghetti and burnt meatballs. The bad taste of the burnt meatballs over powered the whole dish. One meatball was so bad I had them replace it and so what did they do? They gave me another burnt meatball. Really and this is supposed to be an Italian restaurant?
Love there rolls chewy crust soft on inside , served hot with olive oil and herbs. Lunch serves unlimited salad and rolls with meal. Lunch menu priced from $10 - $14 good selection of tasty Italian cooked in wood brick oven. Big portions, we usually have leftovers to bring home for a second meal.
We dined here recently and had a short stay as the service was very prompt and the food was excellent. Not that we were rushed. We knew straight off what we wanted, ordered and ate. Always dependable and delicious.
We used to like this place but haven't visited for a while.  Decor is uninspiring.  It looks like a chain restaurant;  it's always very busy and consequently noisy, on this visit the service was efficient but not personable.  We had a pre finer glass of house sparkling wine which was terrible. We had an excellent field greens and dried cherry salad. The entree was baby back ribs which were tender but too spicy. Au gratin potatoes were spiked with hot peppers and were vert, vert spicy.  Green beans were barely blanched and essentially raw. The least expensive entree was $28 and any were over $30 which makes a mediocre meal quite expensive. We will not rush back..
It's an expensive steak house but it's the best in the state!  Steak was awesome, service was great and the sides were very creative and delicious
Our dinners were wonderful! I had the filet and crab cake combo, absolutely wonderful, outstanding filet (with blue cheese butter, soooo tasty!).  Great service too!  I highly recommend!
Excellent! I'm here on business and don't know the area so I chose somewhere close to the hotel with decent ratings. I asked the waiter what's good on the menu and every thing I pointed out he said was awesome. This could just be another waiter saying what I want to hear. BUT he was right. Everything was excellent.

Started with the chicken tortilla soup which has excellent flavor. It didn't have the fattening cream but excellent flavor & not skimpy on ingredients.

The jumbo crab cake was my entree and was very filling. I had an excellent meal and if I didn't live on the other side of the country I would certainly come back! 
Excellent as always..the food and service never disappoint! Scallops and crab cakes are delicious!Favorite restaurant in town!
Whenever we, (my family) want to go out for a special meal or event, this is the place to go.  Always treated to the best service and great food.  
Maybe it was just us having an off night but, for the first time, our weeknight dinner here just didn't feel special. The food was as good as it has always been but something was off with the service of the young hostess and waiter. 

We didn't love our table and the high school aged hostess insisted the table was fine, it would all be fine, it was a great table, etc. The waiter did his job, in a competent way, but all felt "off". Of course we'll go back; Jgilberts is a favorite of ours. It's an expensive night out but we've always gotten great bang for our buck. 

Really, management of all restaurants needs to be mindful of the personalities of those First meeting customers as they walk in the door. The first interaction sets the tone for the rest of the evening. 

There are many wonderful restaurants in the area; customer service can be a deal breaker as diners choose their restaurants to frequent.
For a weekday dinner my friend booked a 6:15 dinner reservation. The place was full on a Wednesday evening. I found out why. Great atmosphere, friendly staff right from the start. And of course the aromas associated with a great steakhouse. Our plan was simple. No appetizer, a drink or two, and get to the entrees. Our waiter helped us on both counts when he told us about the 52 day dry aged ribeye special that wasn't on the specials sheet. I was hooked. We had the bread and anticipated the steak as well as the wild mushroom risotto and sautéed spinach sides I had ordered. All arrived and my hopes for an exceptional meal were fulfilled. The steak was done to perfection and if you have had a dry aged steak like this you already know - it was like heaven. The sizzle on the fatty parts and slight char on the meat, cool red center hit all of my omnivore buttons. All I could say to my friend was "oh my g*d! wow". Need I say more? Risotto was super, spinach was sautéed with shallots and a balsamic reduction, terrific. Topped it off with a coffee and our night was complete. Can't wait to return.  I know I haven't discussed price. I prefer to discuss value.  I was treated to a great meal that balanced my "value equation".  Enjoy! 
Prices are a bet high, but good food. Had an issue with the steak being over cooked and the waiter gave us a free dessert. I called the manager the next day and he said I should have been given the choice to have another steak cooked. He did send me a certificate to try the restaurant again. The bread is awesome. We will return. My husband loves the ribs.
I have been to J. Gilberts many times when I lived in CT 12 years ago and just recently went back for the first time in a long time. It was just as good a I remembered! We got started this time there with the freshly made iced tea, sourdough bread (which is compliments of the restaurant), and the amazing tortilla soup. All delicious! The soup is so unique with grilled corn and bacon, which you might not think would work for a tortilla soup, but it is fabulous! We then had steaks and side dishes, all delicious. I highly recommend this place!
Happy hours are the best! Order great appetizers and fantastic drink choices! Sam the bartender always there to keep  the libations flowing!  Great atmosphere and very competitive pricing for the value. Love the sliders and the shrimp Durango! Don't forget to try the specialty drinks!
The service wasn't all that bad except for the fact that the server did nothing to accommodate us because the steak ordered tasted awful.  It had a taste of vinegar and when we told the server about it, we were told that we just didn't like their Mongtreal seasoning.  The steak tasted old  w/vinegar flavor.  He made no compensation nor offered another entree.  Would never go there again, overpriced and overrated for the quality of the food!  We have other relatives that will no longer go there for other issues.
Sat at bar, staff extremely well trained and accomodating.Daughter enjoyed a blackberry cocktail. Started with 3 gorgeous ice cold blue point oysters accompanied by cocktail/horseradish and mignonettee sauces.warm bread was offered with regular and pastrami butter(yum!) followed w 16 oz steak-perfectly cooked w nice char , not a speck of fat. Sides are SOOO good. I chose the mushroom risotto and poblano roasted potatoes.($49 for entire dish). Daughter had perfect 8oz fillet w roasted asparagus and risotto. both fine meals!!!!
Wher stopping n for drinks and happy hour foods, or partaking in dinner as we did this weekend, the food, drinks and overall atmosphere are well worth the price.  If you demand quality for a special occasion then you won't be disappointed here.
Last week we met on a Tuesday night for a college farewell dinner. We arrived and got seated immediately with reservations. We began with drinks and a few shared appetizers . The apps deserve a good but not great rating. The may tag chips were slightly burnt with no blue cheese. The Durango shrimp and onion rings were good.All meals come with their wonderful crusty sour dough bread and accompanied with flavored butters. The waiter removed the cost of the chips from the bill and was very obliging . Our main course arrived in a timely fashion . I ordered the 10 oz sirloin with baked potato and  green beans. The steak was cooked to absolute perfection,the salt encrusted baked potato was fluffy and the green beans small and sweet. My sour cream on the potato was missing but not a big mistake. This would be a dying mans chosen  meal headed to the gallows. It was delicious !  It's very likely you too will not be disappointed . We had desserts which also pleased. This steak house fills up fast even on a Tuesday night. It's no wonder. If you are sensitive to noise either get there early or avoid it . The acoustics amplify their always full house. Bon appetite !
Quality food.  Sophisticated atmosphere.  Great date night or special night out with the family.  Food is very good and always have fabulous specials!
In my view, this is the best restaurant in the area...and we have a number of great restaurants. The steaks are outstanding and the sides are great. Try the onion rings. You cannot beat the service and the way you are treated by management and staff. Make sure you have a reservation, because JG's is very popular. You will not be disappointed.
WOW ! Top to bottom perfect. Went with my son who is a food and wine conniseur (sp?) on a Monday night. The place was packed, so we sat at the bar. They have Happy Hour 4 to 6:30 PM Sunday thru Friday. 1/2 Price wine bottles on Mondays. Our bar waiter outstanding. Raymond, reserve selection,  Napa Valley 2013 cabernet sauvignon
We've had the pleasure of dining at J Gilbert's several times over the past few years but I'd have to say no often enough!
We celebrated our anniversary there and a quick note on a Open Table led to a great table sprinkled with hearts and the servers congratulating us. Appetizer of Shrimp Durango was fabulous and we split a wedge salad with my wife saying blue cheese was her favorite part while I had to vote for the bacon. Entrées came out right on time and cooked to perfection. You can see how popular this place is because it was packed on a Tuesday and well worth the trip. 
I really like this restaurant. If you order a steak you get your choice of two delicious sides. You don't have to pay another $7 for each side like some steak restaurants.  The restaurant is classy but not stuffy.  
We discovered double punch Tuesday this week.  That is double reward credit.  Panini selection is pretty big with choice of small, medium, and large.  Sizes are a little deceptive as you see bun size before pressing, which makes them a bit larger.  Fillings of steak, chicken, various cold cuts, etc are available.  Various salads and soups complete selection options available.
interesting concept.  Hot panini sandwiches.  I wish there were more option for sides instead of chips.  Perhaps a side salad, fruit, pasta.  I got the BBQ chicken - it was very good.  My son tried the mac and cheese - he wasn't a fan, I tried it and also did not like it so he will stick to sandwiches next time we visit.

service was fast and friendly.  I feel like it's missing something...but will still stop by for sandwiches on the go.
I was surprised to see how upscale this place was compared to what I thought prior to stepping in.  Delicious food and great service! 
Love Hot Table sandwiches!  They come in 3 sizes but I usually get the large so there is enough for lunch the next day. You can choose from any of the standards or you can make your own.  They are more costly than Subway but you are getting a way better sandwich with fresher ingredients. The bread is also fresh.  They also will make any type of salad and have some good soups. 
Three different sized sandwiches s, m, l.  Prices comparable with other specialty sandiwich shops. The chicken with salami and pesto was fantastic!  Bypass the iced tea with raspberry.
This place is like a Subway, but twice the price because they put it on a grill. They rush you along, and get rude if you take too long to pick toppings. Not a great experience, and the paninis are so small I was still hungry afterward, but spent over $25 for two paninis and a soda. Yikes.
Quick and easy sandwich.  Always delicious.  
When you enter the restaurant, you will be treated multiple times by warm and friendly workers.  
Although I have a favorite, southwest chicken, their salads and soups are delicious too!
Not gourmet food but a great sandwich.
I enjoy the steak and cheese Panini.  Very nice staff.  Good spot for a quick lunch.  They have fantastic bread.  Both Ciabatta and the homemade bread.  
Hot Table panini offers a change of pace from burgers, Chinese, Tex Mex,  and pizza.  Panini is the sole Food du joure with a fairly good set of choices with the potential of a soup or salad side order.  You have a choice of small, medium, large, and panini wrap alternatives.  
Service is speedy.
I have been here a few times and have never been disappointed. As other reviewers have said, it's a little bit pricey but I would rather pay a little more and have a really good sandwich than go to Subway.  Recently, I had the Caprese panini on ciabatta and it was delicious.  My son got the steak and blue cheese panini on ciabatta which he said was very good. We ordered our food, paid, got our drinks then the staff brought our sandwiches to the table when they were ready. Definitely a nice alternative to other "fast" food places in town.
Tasty panini for a reasonable price. I had the classic veggie small for $6.29. Very healthy and good ingredients, fresh mozzarella and pesto mayo was amazing

We have tried many different paninis and they were all good. Love that you can also get a great salad.  They seemed very nice when asked questions if there nuts in dishes.(tree nut allergy in our group.)
Hot Table is a very nice alterantive to Subway, which is also in the same plaza.  On Tuesdays they give double punches in their frequent guest cards.
What I like is that you can completely customize your sandwich or salad with a great variety of items. There are also some baked goods available for dessert if your sweet tooth strikes. The items are fresh and tasty. 
There are several places around that will make a panini but none come close to this new "chain" restaurant. They have three sizes of paninis, a wrap alternative, and a wide selection of fresh ingredients. Individualizing is encouraged. The result is a delicious sandwich. They offer decent salads, good drinks such as ice coffee and nice desserts. Seating is casual and is adequate. I found the help to be very competent and polite. The place is spotless. Preparation is reasonably fast. No negatives so far to report. 
I've been a customer of Hot Table for a long time in Springfield and recently had a chance to visit their new location in Glastonbury.  This store is awesome!  We were greeted by a friendly staff member when we walked in and were made to feel welcome.  I ordered one of my favorite panini...Steak & Cheese and customized with roasted mushrooms and peppers.  Your can customize your panini for no extra charge.  Hot Table has done a great job in replicating their original stores in MA.  Worth a visit if your in the area.
Went here on a lark on a Thursday, to try the new place in town.  Loved it! So we got take out on Friday and Saturday...and would've returned Sunday but it's closed!

It's the quality of Panera or better (everything looks great, very fresh), but the set-up is like Subway where they have certain set sandwiches but you can customize....or just make up your own combination.  I loved the steak/peppers, steak/horseradish, and Sundried Tomato/Chicken.  My wife had the Southwest Chicken, Tuna Artichoke and Italian Combo and "each was better than the next."  The bread is terrific and portions are fine (well, the side soup with a sandwich was a bit small for $3).

Others say it's pricey...small sandwich is $6.29...medium is $7.69 and a large is $9.69, so you can decide.  We think it's worth it.  The large is the best deal.

Also, I must compliment the staff which is universally friendly beyond anything you've encountered....you are greeted by at least 1 or 2 workers behind the counter when you walk in (by day 3 I was recognized), the manager checked on us at our table the first day, everyone was very focused on their job and asked questions as they made our sandwiches, to make sure it's ok.

There's a lot of quicky lunch places in G-bury center...I will write most of them off my list now that I know this place.  I assumed it was a national chain...can't believe there's only five of them, mostly near Springfield, Mass.
I have now been to this place twice. Each time was great. There are friendly employees ready to take your order with very little waiting. They even made accommodations like giving me a small thing of pickles on the side and one of the sandwiches I asked to have an extra piece of salami put on and they did. Both times I was greeted at my table by either the manager or a supervisor ( I'm not sure ) which I thought was a nice touch. They seemed to genuinely care what our opinion of the food, customer service and overall experience was. I will visit there as often as I can since there are so many great choices and employees. 
I always like to say "you get what you pay for" and while this place has great sandwiches in good portions I can say that it's very expensive (that was MY main reason why I don't go  to Panera's anymore) I just got back from having a late lunch with my partner and for two sandwiches, a bag of potato chips (which was only like 60% full) a drink and a chocolate chip cookie that total was $24.00. Will I give this place a chance, yes because the meal was good but I would suggest in lowering the prices.
We've been in a few times for dinner but on the earlier side (5pm or so). Even with nobody there the place runs slow since each sandwich is custom made and then put on a press. Everything I've had there has been delicious and worth waiting for. It's a little pricey, but the sandwiches are made to order, hot, and there are tons of ingredients to customize any sandwich just the way you want it.
Stopped in to grab a sandwich. My first visit, although I'm often at the plaza where Hot Table is located. Service was excellent. I ordered a small, and it was more than plenty for me. Ingredients seemed fresh, and menu is very versatile. You can order one of the listed sandwiches or create your own. I actually combined 2 to customize it. Will go back to try a breakfast pannini!
Our server, Rachael, gave us outstanding service, as did the hostess. They both visited our table frequently to check on us, but they were not intrusive. Rachael knew the menu well and offered excellent meal and wine suggestions. Our meals were very good with the exception of some over the hill green beans. They were dry, stringy and starchy. Upon learning this, Rachael offer a comp dessert. She definitely went above and beyond to keep her diners happy. I'd definitely recommend Max Fish to others.
From 4pm to 6pm each afternoon, there is a lively crowd at Max Fish' semi circular bar and the tall bar tables/stools.

The restaurant has an excellent reputation for seafood, which is quite pricey, unless you visit during Happy Hour, eat in the bar area and have a drink (minimum 1 $5 drink), a requisite to get the very low appetizer prices: Clams $1 ea, Cheesburger $3.50, Fish and Chips $4, Buffalo Shrimp $6, Calamari $5, Clam Chowder $3.
Dinner with friends here was great. The dining room is tasteful and relatively quiet so conversations didn't get lost in the chatter. We were seated in a cozy booth for four. The service was excellent and our meals arrived so quickly that it really surprised us.  Everyone enjoyed their meals very much. I can speak to the sea scallops a la plancha - they were fabulous. The bed of chick peas, quinoa, and salted sesame brittle over roasted pumpkin hummus was a real treat for the taste buds!
Great date spot with unique entree choices. Oysters were perfect! Seated at a small side booth table, but the lighting and table were cozy and made for a great date atmosphere. 
There are two things I can count on when dinning at a Max group restaurant. Delicious, fresh food and outstanding service.  Came here for dinner and ordered the pesto crusted cod.  Outstanding!  The menu is always changing depending on the fresh catch of the day.  Our server was attentive without hovering.  As usual ambiance, food and service were right on target.
Very pleased with the meal and excellent service. However, the drink prices were insane. $4.95 for "still" water (meaning from the tap), $3.00 diet coke (small), "specialty" drink $11.00.
I'd like to try the sunday brunch but fear what it will cost for a round of 4 bloody Mary's.
There has not been a time I have gone here and not had a great experience. I love the ambience, the food and the staff. Excellent!
I will have MaxFish Anyway, Anyday
We have been to a lot of quality restaurants, and this place has great service, elegant atmosphere.  The food was not worth the price.  When you pay $32 for a dish you expect a wow factor, wasn't there.  We have been to some of the group's other restaurants and we were very pleased!  We went to the Max's Downtown and had the 5 course meal for our anniversary and that was amazing.  Your paying for the name in this place.... not a place that I would want to go back to.  That is why I gave it a 4 star..... appetizer was better than my scallop plate.
Food s relatively good as is atmosphere.  Love their happy hour menu and offerings which is my primary reason for going there.  Although dinners good as well, feel they are a little overpriced.
Had such a great meal here! The service was great, and the food was some of the best seafood I've had in the area. We ordered a sampling of oysters for an appetizer. They were cleaned well and our server was very knowledgeable when explaining the different types. For dinner, we got the grilled octopus and striped bass special. Both were seasoned great and cooked to perfection! Definitely coming back!
It's been a while since we've been to Max Fish and, thinking about it, it was a quiet Sunday night the last time we were here when we had a wonderful experience. Friday, on the other hand, seems to jam-packed, loud, and not at all conducive to conversation. If you are lucky enough to get a booth, it might be a bit better, but if you get one of the teeny tiny tables for two, your server will struggle to get everything arranged without things falling off the table. The food and the service were wonderful, but this turned out not to be the place to celebrate a special occasion, at least on a Friday night.
A group of us went for a girls brunch because we heard about the Bloody Mary Bar. We secured reservations with only a few days notice, which was great. The staff was very friendly and courteous. They could tell we'd be there chatting for a while and never made us feel rushed and they chose appropriate times to come over and check on us. Only one person ended up getting Bloody Mary's and the rest of us opted for other brunch-type drinks. The food and drinks were fantastic, especially the applewood smoked bacon that came with my Brioche French Toast, which was a very reasonably priced brunch entrée. Probably the best bacon I've ever had. And they even had some gluten free options (as all Max restaurants do) for one of our friends. The atmosphere is nice but not stuffy and there seemed to be plenty of space, even as brunch got more crowded. Overall, you get what you pay for, and I would highly recommend Max Fish for brunch.
I travel all over the country and have a chance to enjoy some really great restaurants. Some are great for the food, or the service or both. Max Fish gets it on both levels. This was my 3rd visit and was consistently amazing. The service was spectacular, not rushed, but not slow either. It was what you would want and expect at a more upscale restaurant. And I could tell as soon as sat down that the management and staff have a high attention to service and detail. 

The food was awesome. First ordered cocktails - a sazarac for me (can be a challenge finding these outside of New Orleans area) and my wife had a Pomegranate martini. Both drinks were excellently done. We ordered the some raw clams and oysters and the Baltimore style shrimp, peeled and boiled shrimp, chilled and dusted with Old Bay seasoning. My wife loved them and now I have to cook shrimp at home the same way. Then we selected entrees from the specials menu. I included a picture of it. I was able to get most menu options served Gluten Free, which is another plus. While the specials can change daily, they told us if they have the ingredients, they can make them even if not on the current menu. I had the Alaskan Halibut, cooked perfectly and was delicious. My wife ordered the Gulf of Maine Haddock and practically licked the plate clean. Her words "this has become my new favorite restaurant". We also enjoyed a glass of the white wine special. Great recommendation. 

It seems the primary negative comments I have seen have been regarding the cost being high, but the I find the cost is very reasonable for the value you get. Serving seafood as fresh as this is more expensive, and I am always willing to pay a little more for great food and service. All things considered, we had 4 drinks, appetizers, and entrees for just a little over $100. I haven't found anywhere that offers this quality of service and food for close to that. We will be returning...   And very soon. 
I've eaten at high end restaurants all over the country and I have never witnessed such rude and inconsiderate mannerisms from not only the waiter but the manager as well! Please do not eat here the staff is not friendly and personable. If you have a question or concern they will belittle you and make you feel as if their poor work ethic is your fault. I found it quite sad that such an establishment is serving the public!!!!!!!!
Even though the restaurants prices can be high, trust me when I say you get you money's worth. You get great service every time, excellent food, great atmosphere,and they get a lot of local ingredients. I had their chicken dish and a caesar salad with fresh anchovies on top (trust me its fabulous). Our server was so nice and recommended the chicken dish to us. It is a must try.
The food was good, the service was ok, and the dining room was a little crammed for me. Personally I like a little more privacy when I'm eating and the tables are very close together. The food was done perfectly, but the portions were small and the choices were a bit odd.
When in town, we look for great seafood and a nice atmosphere. Max's surpassed our expectations! We had appetizers of peel and eat shrimp, grilled octopus and New England clam chowder. I enjoyed one of the specials, grilled haddock with fingerling potatoes, Swiss chard and corn lime salsa. Delicious ! My colleagues loved their dishes as well : boulabais with shrimp fish clams and mussels; and Hawaiin Ahi tuna, which was seared to perfection. We ate al fresco on a beautiful night
I love everything about Max Fish! The food is outstanding l, the drinks exceptional, they service friendly and efficient.
Oyster bar is my favorite place to sit enjoy oysters and coctails.   The fish is always fresh!  Favorite lobster salad than anywhere!
The Max group seem to know what they are doing and do it well and this restaurant is no exception. The restaurant is tastefully appointed and for lunch very quiet and perfect for conversation.  Since we were dining a little late in the afternoon, the restaurant was about half full.  Our server, Wendy, was very knowledgeable and her descriptions of various entrees proved accurate.  The grilled monkfish was superb, the scallops perfectly seared and flavorful, and the lobster roll exactly what a lobster roll should be.  Max Fish allows some leeway with sides as you can switch out potatoes or other vegetables, if you do not what the 'Chef's preparation/ presentation".  Lunch menu is also much more reasonable priced as compared the dinner menu. Only complaint heard - by one of our companions - a bit pricey.  All in all, a very delightful experience and one to be repeated in the future.
Chili's has a wide selection in an menu that largely features tex-mex food.  In a addition there is a seasonal menu as well as featured limited time only and daily specials.
The Chili's rewards program is a valuable resource supported by a smart phone app and connectivity to a Ziocx device at every table.  Email specials come almost weekly.

Burgers are decent, but then again it's a chain restaurant, so you're pretty much going to get the same thing regardless of which one you go to.
Chili's is a chain so you know what to expect. On this visit I took my 11 year old and her 12 year old friend. I have always found the service at Chili's to be excellent, which is ironic because they have the machines on the tables where you can play games, order food and pay as well. The kids like this and it is a nice novelty. 
I am a vegetarian who doesn't eat grain and I can always find something on the menu. I find for a chain the drinks are not bad either. 
If you do have great service, you should do the survey on the table machine and give you server an excellent review. I understand that those who get the best reviews are given the best shifts and most hours on the schedule.
I will go here again.
I know in my last review I said I'd never go back to THIS Chili's but I did -- it took me awhile but I found myself hungry and Chili's was the closest restaurant that was open. Again, Chili's is your normal chain restaurant. I consider them American Tex-Mex. You go to one and you know what to expect for food choices and atmosphere. As with any restaurant, especially this one, service is either a hit or miss -- lately I've been having good luck with both the service and the food.
I have become really found of their lunch specials, they are reasonably priced and served rather quickly. I will say the quantity of food, especially fries, differs at each location. I know some of the lunch specials are suppose to be smaller portions, but I think this Chili's can afford to give you more than 15 fries with your burger. 
I have to remember that, even though this is a chain restaurant, my experiences -- with both service and food quality -- will differ every time and I have to ask myself if their chips and salsa (and even the salsa varies in taste and consistency) are worth the gamble.
Again, it's a chain. Used to be really good at one time. Burgers were greasy, salty and on a stale bun. The sizzling hot fajitas are a thing of the past as well. Wasn't a good choice.
Meh...it's a chain. I felt extremely ill the rest of the night...my stomach can't handle all the greasy cheesey stuff
here's another family-after-gymnastics stop over with another gymnastic family and friends.  I hadn't had the fajitas in a long time...no reason, just probably been distracted by burgers and salads.  Wow, was I glad I ordered the fajitas...steak and chicken.  Simply tops.  Yes, it's a bit on the salty side but that kinda' goes with the territory (but doesn't take away from it...worth mentioning though in case it can be ordered with less salt (?) for someone who prefers it that way).  Others around the table had the Classic Sirloin which always seems to be consistently good (we join these friends at Chili's a number of times during the gymnastics season...and at least one of us always gets this), Santa Fe Chicken Salad (also excellent), Burger (yep, excellent), grilled cheese sandwich (yep, same story)...and the Skillet Toffee Fudge Brownie that passed around the table...oh, you just have to try that one.  Our server was terrific...attentive and friendly.  Like our last visit to Chili's (different location I think), excellent.
Just what you'd expect.  Service was quick, food was good.  Easy on and off from route 2, which was just what we needed! 
When this location opened a few years ago, it was one of the better Chili's around, but the service has gone down hill over the past year. Once, after being seated we got up and left because it was dirty, with napkins all over the floor and a poorly cleaned table. Called the manager the next day to let them know, and they apologized. They seemed to have improved a bit the past couple times we've been in, but it's still not up to the high quality when they first opened.
Coming to Chili's for years - different locations, always consistent. Great happy hour selections. Varied selections, always changing menu.
We love to go to Chili's for Presidente margaritas. However, now you have to ask to have the cuantro added where before it was part of their recipe. Love their steak or chicken fajitas and the homemade tortilla chips. Priced right and fun place for families if you like Mexican food.
We enjoyed our dinner here except for the service. Our waitress appeared to take care of other tables promptly but when it came to us, she was oh so slow. Food was excellent. We'll give it another shot in the future to see if the service improves.
Used to enjoy coming here for a margarita or two, but the last time it seems to be going downhill. Not sure we will return any time soon. 
This is located close to the two Hotels in Glastonbury so the location is good. The staff was very friendly. Also the happy hour specials can't be beat.
I have been a chilis fan for over 20 yrs. So I was surprised at the way we were treated at our last visit. The music is always loud at the bar area. But this time it was deafening. We politely asked if it could be turned down. The waiter even agreed that it was too loud. Well things got continuously worse after that. I was only given a portion of what I ordered. we were served the wrong drinks, the hamburger was actually soggy and fell apart, the waitress was so snotty, I couldn't believe how rude she was...then the manager was shown the hamburger and made no effort to replace it. Only said, Oh, Im sorry and walked away...............??????? I am truly shocked at how they treated us. I work with the public everyday and I know it can be trying. But we would have been happy with them applying very little effort to right the wrongs. Shame on you Chilis.....and Goodbye after 20 yrs.
Took my 17 year old granddaughter there for lunch. We were provided menus when we were seated and decided on what we wanted within two minutes. We each decided on a soft drink and meal. The server arrived and took our order. The food and drinks arrived shortly thereafter. It was exactly as you would expect. Both her salad and my entree had too many different items on them. There were a number of servers on duty. We were never offered a refill of our drinks and the food is spicy which made us thirsty! The table had a small game console on it that cost 1.99 to use. I told my granddaughter to use it. She chose Celebrities as a Trivia category. Within two minutes she found two errors on it. It had a singer born in Kenya as having been born in Mexico and Prince William rather than Prince Charles as the successor to the crown in England. This same console presents your tab and you slide your credit card to pay for both the game and the meal. It did not "spit out" my receipt. We had left over food which we wanted to take home. Getting our server to come back to the table.... she never did show. Another server accommodated us.
We live here and periodically make the mistake of try it again.  Complain all you want, they don't care. Always bad service, ants in our corn dog, take out is nothing but a hassle, and if you complain to management, YOU are the idiot in their eyes.  I asked why they do not provide curb side service.  The response, " we have young girls and it is too dangerous in the dark."  The DARK? they go out to the same sidewalk the patrons use, 6 feet from the door with a camera filming everything.  Too dangerous for employees, ok for patrons.  Chili's, you are the school lunch of restaurants in Glastonbury.  Give up and let a real restaurant that cares about customers take your space.
I love their fajitas. They have great flavor, I wish they would give a bigger portion. Atmosphere is pretty good to. Staff is very friendly.
It's Chili's, so what does one expect, but the food was lousy. Meat on nacho's wasn't really meat--a bit dog food like. Never again.
I'm a constant there and never had any issues, everyone is always nice and the food is always good. Service can be a little slow at times but other than that I recommend it to anyone.
I have to say that we are not really into the cupcake craze but we were always big fans of Maggie's Corner when they were open so gave this a try.  These are the best cupcakes around and one of the few places where they are well worth the price.  If you are lucky they will also have some of their amazing scones.  Highly recommend this place.
I travel up to the area a lot of will now only drink Marylou's.  When in town I stop at least 2x a day for coffee and always bring a few bags home with me.  There is a ton of options, the staff is always happy, friendly and helpful and the prices are good.
Not fancy, but always reliably good food. Nice meals and sandwiches. The pub area is more of a sports bar atmosphere with TVs and a bar. 
Jamie's pub is the best. Real home cooking and large portions, always a doggie bag needed! Nice neighborhood feel, friendly and relaxed, casual dress. Great for kids too. Offers keno and other lottery games.  Also has takeout menu.
In a word, slipping! We went all the time but lately the food is not as good as it once was.
The place is, well, dirty!
With out Jamie walking around, talking, checking on you, it has not been the same.
Sorry to see this because it's close and was a good meeting spot.
Looking for a quick meal before a concert at a nearby venue, we found Jamie's. It felt like a "Cheers" restaurant - a neighborhood pub where the locals gathered. Service was very good, menu was varied, and our choice of meal (broiled scrod) was excellent. The tab was very reasonable for two drinks and two meals.
The last time my lady was there according to her it was old and needed some TLC.  When we walked in she stated is was completely done over.  New bar and flooring.  The waitress was pleasant and told us that the renovations happened over two years ago.  They had a nice menu dinners and pub food.  My lady had a great burger which was juicy and cooked just right.  I had the lobster roll, it had no fillers and plenty of lobster.  Not overwhelmed with mayo it was perfect.
We will be back.
Have dined for all 3 meals here and none have ever disappointed.    Eggs, sand which or an entree all have been great.   Always great service at the bar.   
This place isn't terrible by any means but it's also not that great. I'd rather eat just about anywhere in scituate. Pizza is a good deal when they do two for one, but otherwise I'd skip Jamie's and head anywhere else really
They used to have a wonderful Oktoberfest menu foie one weekend. The last cost the food was in edible, processes and over salted. The server was clueless on what we ordered and how bad it was when we finished and our plates were full. Used to be good food and good value. Don't walk run away!
Went for a late lunch with my family. Burgers were great. My wife and sister in law had the pastrami and weren't thrilled. The waitress was attentive at first then forgot about us and it wasn't busy despite the playoff game. The sweet potato fries are great.
Food is average but consistant!
Good pizza, apps and specials.
Nice to have a local place to go and have a pint and appetizer:)
Reliable, delicious, and affordable.  One of my favorite places fora urged, chicken dinner or pizza.  Outstanding derive- outstanding value- highly recommend 
Service is awful. Waitresses are very slow and more concerned about cigarette breaks than customers. We went there on a Sunday morning and had to wait almost an hour for our food. Apparently there was a mix up and then one of our plates was dropped before coming out to us. We watched other customers come after us, get served and go. Our waitress was very slow, and although barely apologetic she would avoid making eye contact every time she walked by us. When we finally got our brunch, food was okay. Definitely not coming here again.
Sunday morning.  No coffee machine no problem.  We stay anyway. We are the ONLY customers.  5 of us.  Ordered blue berry pancakes - they forgot the blueberries.  Ordered steak tips and eggs.  Tips burned so bad could not eat however the egg was still raw.  Omelet had tomatoes which should not have been there and so overcooked before folded you needed a knife to cut it.  Soooo disappointed that I actually said something.  The only response was "no worries I didn't charge extra for the blueberries".   My suggestion is to just stay away 
Stopped by for the two-for-one pizza night.  The pizzas were average, but I was surprised by the great salad.  Would return for the salad alone.
Looking for the best burger in town check out Jamies Pub in North Scituate. Real homie type of food with Meatloaf, Pot Roast on menu. Great  breakfast as well with corn beef hash and home made cornbread offering.
There is nothing fancy about Jamie's, and the service is slow. But the food is very good and modestly priced, and it is steps away from the train station.
A year ago we went to Jamie's and the food was edible, but the service was terrible.  I always give a restaurant a second chance.  We recently visited there on a Saturday night and once again service was beyond terrible and the food was just passable.  How long does it take to get 2 beers, 1 wine and a margarita?  About 40 minutes!!  We knew how long because we had checked time when order was placed as we had tickets for an event later that evening. The food arrived 3 seconds after our drink order.  They messed up the margarita, but at this point, we didn't want to wait another 40 minutes.  Lobster roll was tasteless and the onion rings and french fries were lukewarm.  The so called "veteran" bartender was  training another.  On a Saturday night?  The "inexperienced" bartender knew what was going on better than the person training her.  People actually walked up to the manager and asked where their drink orders were?  When they delivered the food we asked for the check so we wouldn't have to wait around to pay the bill.
We will not be going to Jamie's again.
Ive been 6 times in 2 months, consistently great food. Fresh, great value,  excellent menu choices, easily best food around. If you want to look at boats go sit on the seawall, if you want great seafood eat here. 
Jamie's Pub is in the heart of bustling North Scituate and is a perfect solution to the IDFLC syndrome. ("I Don't Feel Like Cooking") The food and atmosphere is all comfort and the prices are easy on the budget. 
The standard fare has been wonderful each of the three times we've visited and the specials have never disappointed. 
Jamie's is sometimes crowded but we've never felt rushed. Service is friendly and casual, no one will swoop in and remove your plate before you tackle that list bit of meatloaf or its tasty gravy.
This place has been around for a long while and I'm guessing it will remain for a long time to come.
Very nice neighborhood pub with good food of hearty portions and priced right. Have specials every night and a good varied selection on the menu.
Cosmos always has the bet fresh veggies for pizzas or subs - even in the middle of the winter, they have the best tomatoes!!

The staff at Cosmos Caffe is very friendly and the service is good. This is your typical pizza / sub / salad joint. I have eaten here a few times and gotten take out on numerous occasions. The food is reliable and I would recommend it to anyone in the area looking for that type of meal.  
Great take out menu.  The food is consist and fresh.  A great bunch of guys work hard here, lunch and dinner.
I find Cosmo's to be one of my go to joints for a quick take out.  I love the salads with grilled chicken.  It is probably best to call ahead... but ordering when you get there allows you to enjoy a cold beer while you wait.  
When you end up stopping at Cosmos Cafe you know you will end up getting a good sub!  They make one of the meanest steak and cheese subs around!  Great hot subs, good pizza, and the place is clean.

I would give it 2 thumbs up.
I come here for the steak and cheese subs and their buffalo chicken calzone. Good stuffed shells and manicotti as well. Nothing fancy, just solid good food at a reasonable price. 
This place offers good, FRESH, tasty food, best in class service - all at a very fair price. Recommended: bacon / chicken / ranch pizza, steak tip dinner, buffalo chicken calzone, spaghetti & fantastic meatballs dinner (ask/pay for extra meatballs), Greek salad. Not recommended: the pastry dessert - not great.

Cosmos = a true example of a successful, gracious, family business that gives back and has an integral place in the community.
Greek pizza and salad place. My wife loves their salads. Service is very fast and polite and you will always leave full. Pizza is ok but not great but the heroes are better as are the salads
I love cosmos. Just moved to Scituate and have gone here a handful of times. 
Service is always exceptional. They are extremely friendly, flexible ( they'll make whatever you'd like ), and fast!
The food is perfect for what it is; great subs to take to the beach, Friday night pizza ( although a little too much grease, nothing a napkin can't solve ), or a last minute complete dinner. 
Nothing fancy, but that's more what cosmos is for. 
I WISH they would deliver. Although how extremely lazy would I be to not drive the 2 miles to get it.  ;)
Thank you Cosmos!!
I have loved Cosmo's since we moved to Scituate in 2001.  Their sauce has excellent flavor, they never skimp on the toppings and unlike many places, if they tell you 20 minutes, that is pretty much when it is ready.  The staff are friendly and courteous and I will keep going back until I die or move out of town (and then I still might come back :>).
Pizza, sandwiches, etc - good food, fair prices, seating or take out and very friendly staff.  The owner calls everyone "my friend" and I think he means it.  Salads are fresh and the pizza very good.  Would recommend it.
Actually, the name of the place is Cosmos Caffe - like the universe! It's one of my favorite places for takeout ... huge, fresh chicken caesar salads with lots of fresh chicken grilled to order, red onions, bacon, croutons and yummy dressing ... very good toasted subs ... and tasty Greek-style pizza. This is a family owned restaurant, and everyone works so hard! They're always friendly and polite, even when the place is going crazy (most weekends, for sure!). And to top it off, they are very, very supportive of community organizations (especially kid-related events). Good food, good neighbors - and very reasonable prices. What's not to like?
I wrote an earlier review of Circe that lauded its wonderful sandwiches and friendly service.  There is one thing I did not mention.  Circe does not allow its customers to use its restroom.  I was surprised by this -- always figured if you had some seating it was pretty much required but apparently not.  So if this is an issue for you -- or those you are eating with -- be advised.
I didn't realize when we went to Florida this past winter how much I'd miss the salads and sandwiches at Circe's. To say nothing of the alway friendly staff. The avocado BLT is worth a special trip as is the roast beef that is always done right. I eat there whenever I can but try to get in before 12:15 to beat the crowds

The food here is imaginative, well prepared, fresh and top shelf. Great for take-out to the beach. But there are consistently (over years & recently) more downsides than positives: tends to be expensive, does not take credit cards & does not openly note that, does not answer the phone, a killer - VERY slow service and/or long lines at busier times, sometimes indifferent staff, and awkward/tight parking.
Circe's makes the best sandwiches in the area.  They are made with quality ingredients and the selection is diverse.  They also have fantastic deserts.  The chocolate chip cookies are a must try!
This place is a unique sandwich place that has a nice variety of fresh and tasty sandwiches made to order. They do a nice selection of paninis, and have a nice soup of the day usually. they also do salads. The sandwich board changes occasionally.

This is a good spot for a nice lunch, I highly recommend it, rustic, and has a old world feel.
I always have to stop by when I'm in the area! Sandwiches are always made with the freshest ingredients! Staff is great! Try the baked goods, if you get there at the right time you may score a warm chicken pot pie and cooked to perfection chocolate chip cookies!
Circe's Grotto - a cozy place to enjoy some of the best salads, sandwiches, soups or cup o' something with a homemade muffin, cookie or to die for brownies (and blondies) Just try to eat one coconut cupcake.  That is, if you're lucky enough to get there before everyone else does.....
Every sandwich we have tried has been very good. We love the Portabello Mushroom sandwich. It is always busy, a testamonial to its local popularity.
From the awesome bread to all the fresh produce they use to the baked goods for dessert, Circe's is a must try for lunch. My favorite sandwich is the BLT. Sandwich's are done Panini style. Yum
I could eat these sandwiches time and time and again. My favorite is the California BLT with turkey, though the Mendocino for breakfast is a close second. Best chocolate chip cookies around!
Circe is a small restaurant with a big heart and memorable menu.  The folks who work there offer an array of very good sandwiches, drinks and pastries.  Indoor and some outdoor seating is available but is very limited.  We usually get our stuff to go.  This is a place to enjoy again and again.  Be sure to try one of their amazing chocolate chip cookies.
Best Sandwiches...grilled wraps, fresh salsa...fresh bread!!
Small shop but amazing quality!! Like their soups too!
We have depended upon Circe's for fabulous (not great…more than that) sandwiches for a few years now.  Made to order, fresh and better than Mom makes, Circe's sandwiches and wraps are forever a treat.  Grab a chocolate chip cookie still warm from the oven; whether you like the crispy edges best or the soft melty part in the middle, you will long for another.  Yes, the bill is a little bigger than expected but no place around sets the best example of you get what you pay for.
Best sandwiches--made to your specifications--everything very fresh--to go.
Made on premises bars and brownies are severe temptations.
Everything is healthy and fresh.  Grab everything and head for the beach.
Delicious sandwiches, ridiculously amazing cookies, and very friendly staff! We order take out often from here and are never disappointed!
You can't beat Circe's. The food is so fresh I don't ever mind spending an extra dollar or two on the sandwich. 
Can never say no to Sue's cookies. I literally dream about these wraps!!!!!!!! 

But you must try the panini's...
I don't know why we keep giving this place another try over and over. The food is good and they have amazing baked goods, but it's way over priced! You can't call a head to place an order b/c no one EVER picks up the phone and the young girls make you feel like you are some how  an inconvenience to them. I really like a good veggie wrap or goat cheeses option but, it's just to frustrating. 
Everything tastes awesome- the Pesto Pasta is the best- but it's all crazy expensive! I just wish they'd drop the prices seeing as the food just isn't worth it for $10 for a sandwich...
This place is so overpriced its crazy, I'm sorry but I went in the other day to grab lunch  for a friend and myself. I was not expecting it to cost over 20 dollars for two drinks and two Sandwiches. It was later in the afternoon High school students do a rather fine job ignoring you. When I finally spoke up and said excuse me after waiting for ten minutes the girl seemed very annoyed.I got two chicken wraps. Lets just say I paid top dollar for the lettuce as it was lacking chicken. I WILL Not be going back again!!!
This is a small place in North Scituate that has very limited seating. In the Summer this place can be very busy on weekends. The breakfast sandwiches are great, I love the Mendocino with avocado and egg and a nice sauce. Their lunch sandwiches are also very good. They have artisan bread from a local bakery that is to die for. 

I believe they take cash only so be prepared.
My daughter and I stopped here for the first time  this evening for dinner.  She had heard that they had good pizza from some friends at school and wanted to try it.  We walked in and  realized that you order from the counter.  Ok, no problem, so we ordered a large pizza with pepperoni on all and mushrooms on half.  The surly man behind the counter did not greet us or interact at all other than when I said I would like to purchase to beverages from the cooler he said he needed to know exactly which two because they had different prices.  When I paid, the receipt had a place for the tip so I entered one because I assumed that they would bring the pizza when it was ready and clear the table after.  I was WRONG.  When the pizza was ready, the man behind the counter yelled "pepperoni with half mushroom" and put two paper plates on the counter and the pizza on a metal tray and walked away. Keep in mind there were nine people working and we were the only people in the restaurant. The pizza itself was ok, nothing special.  We each ate a slice and my daughter went to the counter to ask for a box so that we could take the rest with us. After waiting for someone to acknowledge her, someone gave her a box, but no one ever asked her how the pizza was, instead they said you can throw your trash in the garbage and put the pizza pan on the counter.
There is no reason to return.  If we want mediocre pizza, we can go to many other pizza places with better service. 
I've been going to Victoria's for about 18 years now. I have never once had a bad meal there. The pizza is always coked to perfection. I had a lg chicken parm sub and it was loaded up. When you pick up the pizza box, you know there is no skimping on the ingredients. I love  the Linguiça pizza (it's the forgotten meat.) try it. Cohasset is a small town but they have about 5 or 6 pizza places. That is a lot of competition and I think Victoria's rise to the occasion.
This is a great place that has good food, fairly priced.  I am surprised by the negative reviews....we're not taking Boston or L.A.  This is a small South Shore Pizzaria and it's fine, actually, a good place to go - take your family, call for takeout, etc.  Whenever I'm not in the mood to cook, summer or bloody winter, all I have to do is call Victoria's and place my order, and it will be delivered at no charge.  This is a GREAT service, at least to this household. 
The food is fine, not gormuet, not awful.  Good.  Pasta dishes are actually really good - great.  Pizza is fine, not the worst and not the best.  I wanted to give a good review to this place, that has saved our family many times over many years.  Thanks for your service, your good food, and you delivery service!
My husband and I have stopped in here a couple times lately for a quick lunch.  Their pizza is so good!  It's nice thin crust, huge slices.
Great pizza, subs, and pasta dishes! Chicken Parm is wonderful! 
Good salads!Wish they would bring back old recipe for turkey tips..quality and taste not the same...They deliver...even to the beach!!!
stopped getting take-out here after many years due to cleanliness - very poor. Food was always good and great value but the cleanliness issue finally got to me.
this place has medium subs and pizza but the crust is soggy. for the kids the reeses pieces candy dispenser is broken so with out putting money in just twist the knob and a piece comes out.
Food is always good / consistent.  Not fine dining -- but you are not paying for.
A coupon came in the mail, so I checked their web site - thin crust pizza - it said. It should have said soggy, undercooked with far too much topping. Pizza shops in Hingham, Boston, and Rome have nothing to fear.
The Cohasset location has the most condescending and rude bully of a manager. (Balding, goat tee, glasses) He screwed up our order and was stomping and throwing food  and cutlery like a little child.  My friend has a gluten allergy and he was an insensitive classless jack***.  He got mad when she told him she couldn't have croutons on a Greek salad. Yes a Greek salad, due to their mistake.  He mocked us instead of trying to correct the error.  He is a spineless weasel that likes to bully young women, probably because he got beat up in high school or something.  Don't give this place your business. Believe me, you don't want the harrasement as a paying customer anyway. Heed my advice and STAY AWAY!
one of my favorite places to go great food
The food at Victorias is really good. I'm never disappointed with their pizzas, subs, or salads. They are always just mouth watering. However, the service is very inconsistent. Some days they are very quick, others it could take an hour for two sandwiches! It all depends on who's working. If you aren't that hungry and don't mind a wait, go for it.. if not, Pizza Zone is right up the street and I've never had to wait for their food!
Thankful there is a Starbucks not too far from Scituate.  Nothing fancy or special - it's your typical drive-thru Starbucks. Reminder:  drive-thru customers have priority, so it might take a bit longer to get your drink order if you walk inside to order.  
What more is there to say other than it's a Starbucks. Consistent coffee and pastries. Staff is top notch.
Not only great shellfish, lobsters and fish, but great add ons to make a memorable meal.
They often display sesame crusted tuna, and Asian marinated salmon.  They are full of great ideas, not just the raw product.  Place is clean,has easy parking, and a pleasure to drop in.  Quite a contrast to the sorry seafood department in the grocery chain across 3A.   

Give em a shot.
Mullaney's was recommended by a relative.  Being from Virginia, I wasn't sure what to expect and have had lobster meat on a variety of occasions in the Washington DC area.  I thought, "lobster.... what's the big deal?" But I knew I wanted to get it right.  Plus, I was shopping for a family dinner including 10 adults and my 84 year old mother in law.  We'd come from all over the United States to see each other.  It had been years since we'd all been together, so I wanted this to be special and memorable.  Paul, a true New Englander, was incredibly friendly and I obtained all the lobster meat they had available.  I even went to the Scituate Harbor location to purchase more!!  Without question, this was one of the best food purchases I've ever made.  Now, I'm a believer!!!  The meat was fresh, succulent, delicious and, by far, the best lobster I have ever had.  The meal created memories we will all cherish and I can't wait to go back for more!!
If you want FRESH seafood, this is where to come. They have another store as well in Scituate Harbor. 
The fish is amazing and the help is always ready to give you recipes as well.
And, they also sell great wine. So it is one stop shopping!
best fish store on the south shore, everything is amazingly fresh, their marinated salmon is out of this world!
Went in to get some fish for dinner and got a whole lot of fish tales for our visit.    Analakia was extremely helpful and gave us a lesson in shucking a scallop.     She was fantastic.   We got the freshest swordfish cut to order and the stuffed clams for an appetizer.   She even posed for a pic for our posting.    We will be back.   
The store has great product at a reasonable rate. Stop by and see Anna, she is wonderful at customer service and assisting you with a purchase that will delight you and any guest who eats with you.
Very fresh seafood...love the crab cakes too! Nice that they sell wine and side dishes too! Pricey but worth it!
Bought fresh seafood here to cook at home.
Excellent staff to help with packing for travel as well as to give tips for how to cook it.
Why would you buy fish at Shaws or even the Market in the Harbor when you can go direct to the guys that caught it?  While the place is not fancy, it's a fish market after all!  Go for the freshness, go because it is the right thing to do.
Went to see my favorite band.  A bit difficult to get there - Scituate in general - but is a really neat place.  Great venue for a show!
I happen to love soft serve and JJs is superior to DQ.  I always order the vanilla so I can compare flavors.
JJ's is only open during the warm months - so pretty much like April to Labor Day approximately I think. You never really know until you see it open I feel like.

Their prices are SO affordable. It makes it actually reasonable as a family of 4 to enjoy a treat. My brother and I can both get ice creams for under $5 total. I'll be honest, that absolutely increases the amount that we visit.

I've only had their food a few times - but the grilled cheese and hot dogs are also well priced and totally fine. 

My favorite thing on the menu? vanilla soft serve in a cup with peanut butter dip and crunch coat. A kids size comes in at $2.10! Seriously a bargain.
JJ's Dairy Hut is located off 3A and is a fun place for some cheap eats.  The big attraction - the soft serve ice cream.  They are huge so I always go for the kiddy or small size as any bigger and you are dealing with drips all eating long.  Get the crunch coat topping with is a bunch of crunchy yummy stuff that looks like captain crunch cereal.  I know, sounds weird - just try it.  Serves hot dogs, etc - but its ice cream that is the star.  The tables outside are always messy so we eat in our car overtime.  The entrance on and off the road can be dangerous so watch the kiddos.
On a warm sunny day this is a great out door dining choice for a clam or lobster roll with French fries and a white wine makes a wonderful lunch meal with a million dollar view.
This place is open three months in there summer. It features a nice menu of lunch-type items and everything we've ever had here is very good. We love the setting was it is right on the water beside Cohasset's small but pretty harbor. One can watch the lobster boats come in and follow their product right into the kitchen at The Salt Box. This is a great lunch stop for people following the coast.
Sandwiches and simple fare adjacent to Cohasset Harbor. Good for a drink with friends. Indoor also. Watch out for mosquitos.
My wife and I were excited to finally try the Older Salt House. The view is amazing, the waitstaff was attentive, the food was subpar. I have never sent back food until going here. The burger was extremely over cooked and dried out. Will try again next season to see if things turn around and improve.
The view is the best part of this restaurant.  The food is good, but the menu is a bit limited.  If you are looking for a place to grab a sandwich or burger outside this is a good option.  Depending on time of day expect there to be lots of families with young children.
We had guests in from Kentucky so we took them there for lunch. The day was beautiful both the food and the service took it over the top. Eveyone enjoyed their meal.
My wife and I were doing some sightseeing around Cohasset and came upon the Olde Salt House. It was right on the water overlooking the marina and the magnificent Roy Estate across the way. We were seated without delay on this sunny afternoon. We ordered seafood appetizers, "Rhode Island calamari", and the fish taco. Both were very good. The fish taco came with sweet potato fries and the portions were larger than my wife could finish. Fortunately I was able to help. 

A perfectly pleasant outdoor, on-the-water experience for a spontaneous lunch choice. We stayed for over an hour before meandering down the coast. We would certainly do it again when we are in the area.
They've adopted full Cohasset prices.  I paid $28 for a "half and half" fried platter.  Half belly clams, half scallops. Lots of fries, a scant set of clams which were mostly crumbs of batter from the fryer and maybe 6 scallops, though I think only 4.  This was at lunch too!  The dab of coleslaw was small and terrible.  How do you make bad coleslaw!  It's on the harbor and a nice place to sit outside and eat and I've had better experiences in the past.  But I will never return - I seldom feel completely taken advantage of as a customer and I did here.
You are paying for the setting.  Go for a beer and forget the dinner.  We sat outside and tried a mixed plate of fried scallops and haddock. $28.  It was ok.  Also had a forgettable focaccia with a spread of some type of cheese and some sautéed veggies. The cole slaw was very creamy but flavorless.
This is my first review ever but the experience was miserable so I was compelled to write it. Beautiful location. Tourist trap mediocre to terrible overpriced food. I just had lunch here. A burger was 14. with a side of "greens" .  It came with choice of cheese and I chose blue. The greens were beautiful but soggy with some sort of Italian type dressing. The blue cheese was actually blue cheese dressing which dripped all over and saturated the entire meal. It oozed into and combined with the other dressing. They put a newpaper under my food  as fried food is usually served it was so soggy. I never would have ordered blue cheese if it was dressing and would have had the other dressing on the side. The medium burger was very pink.  The service was slow, the wait staff was all under 18. During the meal an umbrella blew over ( it wasn't that windy) because it was improperly anchored and nearly decapitated the older woman next to us. None of the umbrellas are anchored. They then put them all down and we roasted in the sun. 25. dollar bill each for a terrible lunch, and we picked the cheapest items on the menu. Tip- Go to TKO malleys in Scituate Harbor. It is a sports bar, unpretentious, on the water, fun, and the burgers are really decent, and they cost half as much. Or the Fairview in Marshfield overlooks the ocean and has a very nice reasonable menu. I am a local. Never again.
Went in for dinner, Pub type food nice outdoor eating area however Mosquitos were almost unbearable(bring bug spray). Was told Lobster Roll and Lobster BLT were the popular meals and couldn't miss as a first experience. 
Service was a bit slow, actually got our appetizer before our first drink. 
When the meals came I got the Lobster BLT and my girlfriend got the Lobster Roll. Both meals combined were $58! Unfortunately for us, in both sandwiches, we probably got $15 worth of lobster. A lot of mayo in each as well. Not a great choice and not even close to a $58 value venture.. 
I would go back for the nice venue but would do drinks and stick to the burgers which looked good as I saw others eating. 
Stay away from the lobster dishes and stick to the basic pub meals. 
This is our "go-to" place on a summer afternoon/evening!  But only if you want great service, excellent food - and a wonderful view overlooking boat traffic on the harbor.  The setting is fantastic with great views.  The food is wonderful with many choices from fried seafood to wonderful and tender "Lobsta".  And the service is always prompt and efficient.  We both enjoyed our "secret pleasures" and ordered the fried seafood ... and it was delicious.  If you're in the mood to enjoy a lobster salad try the Diane II ... it's outstanding !
First time at Olde Salt House.  Atlantica restaurant looks awesome but we were just passing through so could not eat in the dinning room.  Went out on deck which was great but because we just wanted drinks they stuck us at a table with no umbrella.  Busy Sunday by the ocean so we took the table.  A few table empty at times and I understand they needed those for people ordering food.  I asked about spare umbrella but that was broken.  After a bit they offered us a table with umbrella which was very kind.  After a few drinks we decided to order food which was OK.  Our server Caitlin was great and she received a 28% tip.  I appreciate that they hire local kids but they should have a more experienced person running the show.  Both Hostesses useless.  Would, however go back because the location is pure New England!
This restaurant has one of the post peaceful and prettiest locations on the South shore of Boston, but the food is very mediocre.  Nothing inventive on the menu and nearly all the fish is fried.  The French fries are obviously frozen and poorly seasons.  The cocktails are light and fruity for hot summer days.  The prices are also very steep for what you get and for lunch.  Almost nothing is under $20.
Yearning for the lobster blt, we rushed out to the dock as soon as the Olde Salt House opened for the season.  On a clear blue day, a cool chardonnay in one hand, the lobster blt in the other....our Summer began.  The young staff does the best they can, given the distance to and from the kitchen.  We didn't spot last years manager on this first day but things were moving along just fine.  Bring you sunglasses and patience and enjoy what living on the South Shore is all about.
The calamari was greasy and over cooked - couldn't eat it. Ended up getting shrimp cocktail to be safe.
As someone who used to race sailboats, I've eaten in my share of both bad and great harbor and dockside pubs.  This one missed the mark but has enormous potential, so I'll try it again.

Pros

Beautiful quaint location right on the water.  It was a gorgeous sunny, low humidity day and it doesn't get any better for a casual dockside pub.  The shrimp cocktail was great.

Cons

The white wines by the glass are bad yet pricey.  Avoid and order something hard.  

The fried calamari was the worst we've ever had.  Deep, deep, deep fried until you couldn't find the calamari underneath.  Wicked bad.  

Summary

All three of these side-by-side restaurants (Atlantica, Olde Salt and Brisas) love to focus on fried food menus.  That doesn't fit with the real estate.  You can get MUCH better fried fish all over the South Shore and the Cape (New England, actually) and you don't need to pay $$$-$$$$ for it.  These 3 Cohasset restaurants all deserve healthier/tastier menus, better wine, and better food quality.    

Still -- you can't beat the locations!
Have been here a few times. great spot in the summer for drinks and apps but poor food. Each  times the dinners or either overdone or cold.

Regarding service, I appreciate it when businesses hire local kids, but clearly these kids need a little bit more guidance. Maybe if they have some experienced staff to set the tone, it would set an example. 

That said, it is a beautiful spot. Great sunsets. Have a drink and an app, then move inside to the attached inside restaurant.


Pricey but the view is amazing...right on the water...love the salads, oysters ......Can't wait to visit in the summer!

Such a pleasant experience to sit out on this deck suspended in the water right by local lobsterman bringing in your lunch. Best Arnold Palmer in the world,.
There really isn't too much you can say about a Dunkin' Donuts.  The coffee is good, the donuts are fresh and tasty as they are at just about every DD I've been to; however this one was special.  You received a warm friendly greeting at the drive up microphone and a very pleasant greeting and thank you at the window where you pick up your order.  What a difference a pleasant, friendly employee can make!.
This was a gem of a find but it was more than just the food, the service and the view; Brisas totally saved an otherwise miserable afternoon on the Massachusetts coast. The day started with a trip to Nantasket Beach near Hingham - a beach I recommend avoiding at all costs - but more of that in another review. After we escaped Nantasket we headed out for an early dinner and a lucky wrong turn took us to Cohasset. It was a Sunday afternoon so there weren't many choices but it didn't matter, the moment we saw Brisas we knew we had a winner. The restaurant has a lovely view of the water and the staff couldn't have been more friendly and inviting. Throw in the Sangria, the Brussel sprouts, the short rib sliders, the garlic shrimp, the blue sky and the live music and everything was once again right with the world. There is an inside seating area but the best place to sit is outside provided the weather is favorable.
Brisas doesn't cut you short - these are generous portions for a tapas restaurant. Everything was cooked properly, served hot and best of all, served with a smile. So next time you're driving to or from Cape Cod, do yourself a favor and take a short side trip to Cohasset. Brisas will be standing ready to make you feel comfortable and serve you some great food at a nice price.
They have a long way to go this season. Our experience was poor to terrible from the beginning.First it took almost 10 minutes for a waitress which she did after the hostess told her she had our table. Once she knew she was our server she did her best to make up for the rest of the staff. We ordered the only bottle of Cava on the menu and did not get it until we were mostly done with our meal. The waitress kept coming back to the table and apologizing for the delay in bringing the Cava saying the manager went to get it. When they finally found it she informed us it was not chilled so we asked for the Proseco. The bartender then came over to explain the Proseco was not chilled but the Cava was "Did we want that?"! Blaming the delay/mix up on new bar staff still in training. No excuse --- they opened two weeks ago!! The food this year was also disappointing -- very mediocre and too expensive. We decided to stay and finish our Cava after our meal rather than taking the bottle home (a block away) because the location was so beautiful right on Cohasset harbor on a clear evening. Yet again the staff dropped the ball --- never clearing our plates or coming near our table to be asked. We watched as most of the staff (college kids) cleared other tables or stood around in the corner doing very little and the manager chatting it up with friends. All the young staff were pleasant just not doing their job very well -- again poor management. The venue is beautiful but not worth the short walk down the street --- we will not be returning.
Live in Cohasset and had friends visiting from out of town.  Have always enjoyed Brisa in the past. Was served a glass of sangria with a bread bag closure in it.  No manager came to apologize and still had to pay for the drink!  Waitstaff also brought the wrong flatbread to our table 3 times.   Emailed the establishment and still haven't heard back!  Will not go back and will tell all my friends.
Great location for Al Fresco tapas dining in Cohasset, can't beat the view, but there is better tapas in the area.  Go to Hola's in Marshfield if you love tapas.
The atmosphere was family friendly with an upscale casual feel.
The servers were friendly, the sangria was tasty, the food was fresh and delicious
I think even if the food was mediocre, this place would still do well because of its' location.  Set waterside, it sparks conversation that would flow all night.   Brisas doesn't take reservations, and they could do a really good job at the bar, while people are waiting, how ever it was impossible to order a drink while we waited.  It seemed very disorganized.  Once we sat down, the service was really nice and smooth.  The flatbread pizzas were delicious, especially the fig and balsamic.  The short ribs were so tender.  The only thing that was really disappointing, were the fried brussel sprouts.  Doused with mayonnaise and way too big of a portion, made them very unappetizing.  All in all, sitting at Brisas, with a delicious cocktail, would be reason enough to stop by.  But the good is worth ordering as well!!!!
We wanted a light supper and wine to end a great summer evening and this was perfect. The menu offers many varieties of wine and has a helpful map to show you from which regions of Spain the wine originates. The tapas menu had traditional favorites, a wonderful paella, and scrumptious Brussels sprouts. The outdoor patio with the heat lamps made this place special because you can really enjoy all the best parts of summer--being outside. Toward the end of the evening, though, the mosquitoes were a bit hungry.
I have to say what an unexpected but very nice surprise it was when Brisa's open the summer of 2012. It is a very good Tapas restaurant directly on Cohasset Harbor with seating outside on a lovely deck, plus last year they renovated an indoor room fitted with sliding doors making it open to the patio seating area. Good Tapas dishes, sangria, etc. Not what one would expect but it is a really pleasant spot for dinner on a summer night on the harbor. 
Yep, that’s what we had Tapas and Wine on several evenings.  The service was great as well as the Tapas.  Could have opened a little earlier for the view.  Could have had an expanded menu for those who would like to eat at the Inn.
Well appointed outdoor tapas bar.  Selection is reasonably large and some items like octopus, ceviche, and spicy shrimp were prepared very well.   Flat breads were well covered with interesting toppings.  Prices were a bit above average for amount of food served.

Parking is tight at the hotel but there is a nearby mooring if you're lucky enough to come in by boat.

Very friendly staff!
Stopped by for mid morning coffee
and pastry!!!!
The best almond croissant I ever
had!!!!!!!!!!

Wonderful variety!!!!

If I lived closer. I would be there daily!!!!!
The bakery appears run by girls, many under 16, maybe 13.  They try hard, but we spent $30 and had food delivered at different times, undercooked, and in general just unprofessional.

The chocolate tort is quite good, as are the macaroons. The coffee never got hot.

Too bad.  There are individual products worth purchasing.  
Great for getting a quick and tasty breakfast or lunch. Great breads and pastries and specialty chocolates. Think hostess gift!
This bakery is worth the trip just for the almond croissant - delicious! I also tried the spinach and cheese which was equally wonderful.  Loved the authentic french tablecloths on the tables - felt like I was back in France.
Finally made it to try the almond croissants. They were awesome; buttery, flaky, and with lots of almond filling!  Their other items look fantastic including a huge assortment of tarts, pastries and baked goods. Very cute shop, really friendly and efficient staff and surprisingly reasonable prices. 

Viva la France!
This is a great place to relax, sip a cup of coffee and have a french pastry. Newspapers and friendly folks, will greet you every day. The bread is so french and pastry and cakes are a great treat to take home and share with family and friends.
I have been going here for years. It is a distance away so my visits are sporadic but I average about once a month. The owners/bakers are French and cook using the French restrictions on ingredients, so the products are truly French and are made of basic, 'real' ingredients, not mixes and preservatives that you get in commercial bakeries. It is one of only four bakeries that I patronize and it is the one that I trust the most to use only basic ingredients. The goods are made to be eaten fresh when they are at their best and are delicious. The croissants are to die for and the desserts are made with cream, fresh fruits and the best chocolate. As you should expect the products are not cheap but the portions are large for the most part and definitely worth the price if you appreciate quality. The products range from dainty to robust, and between macarons, various tarts, French breads, rolls croissants and imported candies etc.. I have never left there empty handed. If you are into foods made with real ingredients made in the classic French method, you will love this place

Nice bakery. Their tarts were lovely. The spinach and cheese quiche has just come out of the oven and had a delicate pastry that I very much enjoyed. Other pastries were average at best. My husband had a pecan bun that was quite soggy and chewy, maybe because of the humidity. Lastly I was told they had no restrooms by a gal at the counter, who sent me across the street to a gas station. I didn't question it but  it seemed so odd. 
I wanted to try this bakery after reading some of the favorable TA reviews and I was happy to make the drive over from Canton. I took home almond croissants (per other reviewer recommendations) and they are buttery and delicious! I sat and enjoyed lunch in the bakery - even though it was in the 80s outside, after a friendly staff member let me try the mushroom soup I had to do the half sandwich (BLT) and the soup. Both were delicious - fresh ingredients, terrific flavor, and a lovely ambience in this small locale. I'll be back with my husband and will be recommending to friends! 
This busy place is a treat to have in the town in which we live. It features a wide array of very good bakery and sandwich items. I like to bake but the croissants here are so good that there is no point in my making them. Service is friendly. The owner often displayed a wide collection of military uniforms that he has acquired.I really excellent place.
Great place to take your family.  The owner remembers your favorites and thus it really does feel like France. The pastries are of good quality, the decor needs work but it is quaint.
Staying with some friends in Hingham. From Texas and ran the Boston Marathon.  Our friends suggested this place for a light lunch snack.  What a great little bistro.  Small, quaint and full of ambience.  To much to pick from and I wanted to try everything.  Ended up with a small ham and cheese croissant and a mixed fruit pastry which was excellent and very reasonable.  Wanted to go back the next morning but was not sure if they were open for breakfast.
Every pastry, bread, quiche, candy, croissant is delicious. I feel like I am in Paris. It is usually hot, crowded and full of children, persevere!
Lovely sandwiches (their bread is outstanding), soups and salads ... delicious pastries ... I have a tree nut allergy, so my pastry choices are limited, but the staff is very diligent about making sure I can indulge safely! Ordered two Buche de Noel this past Christmas (a traditional chocolate and a Grand Marnier) ... they were quite beautiful, yummy, and the hit of the dessert table. Also of note- this year's raspberry Valentine heart cookies ... perfect.
This is the place to get something that is a close replication of French breads. Owned by Frech expats.
I'm with the other reviewers on this one. The almond croissants are the way to go for first timers. Decent coffee and other tasty treats make it our go to on the weekend.
This our go to place for croissants in the area, and they have good coffee. It's a great family place.  They also have a selection of nice cakes and tarts.  We have never been disappointed.
Perhaps I am spoiled by having French Memories so close to home.  The pastries are very good, but over the years I found that there is some inconsistency to the quality of their products.  The almond croissants are overly sweet and heavy, while other pastries can be dry.  Nonetheless, a visit to French Memories is still a wonderful way to begin your morning, so stop in and find out for yourself.  By the way, the baguettes are superb!
I studied in France. I've travelled in France. Truly French croissants are simply the best and definitely different than any reproductions I've had in the U.S., and I try them in many places I travel. French Memories makes the best croissants of any I have had outside of France, and rival the ones I've had in France. They are just the right amount of flaky, they are buttery and you can taste that no corners have been cut, and every care has been taken to make each and every one perfect. I think we had plain, almond and chocolate almond. All amazing. The coffee was also good. I would try any French pastry from this bakery. If you are near Cohasset, it's definitely worth going out of your way to stop here. Yum!
Delicious!!!!!!  There is a line on Saturday and Sunday mornings to get in here. Great place. Owners are from France.
Typical Chinese with nice buffet option and Sushi bar. Very clean and nice service. Room for private party, but they may put more than one in there if they are too small.
I especially loved the shrimp, teriyaki and boneless ribs but everything was very good! The Chocolate Gelato Bear for dessert was scrumptious and very good quality Gelato! Too Cute too.
Some of my kids and I stopped in here today for the lunch buffet. They have egg drop and hot and sour soup by the buffer to start. Other options were egg roles, boneless spareribs, dumpling (peekers), beef with broccoli and lots more. They have a discounted rate the on kid's size buffet. A quick good lunch for short money.  
Just lame karo syrup based mail it in Chinese food.  Some tastes ok, but nothing original, or authentic.  

I know that I'm running upstream when I give this place a poor review, but I'm fussy about Asian/Chinese food and regardless of what others say, I was very unhappy with it. I had pot stickers. The dough is very thick and the filling tasted very strong. The Sweet and Sour Chicken had a sauce that was an unhealthy color of red and it lacked any semblance of what that dish can be when it is done right as it seems so seldom done these days. Also had on another visit Sesame Chicken and could not finish it. I wish it were better. To add insult to injury it is quite expensive. 
I read the reviews and saw that it had quite a mix of opinions.  However I had a number of people say only good things about the restaurant, so when I got a craving for Chinese food I really looked forward to the experience.

My issue was strictly with the recipes for the Sechuan chicken and beef (I had to try both).  They have found a way to make both very mild and essentially forgettable.  I love the hot-spicy taste associated with both of these dishes and was quite disappointed.

One and done.  The rating of 3 was based essentially on non-food factors.  Decent place for fans of blandness with good service.
If you don't mind roaches in your food, maybe just ok. I would look for another place to eat if I were you. This restaurant definitely needs to clean up its act.
We stopped in for the buffet lunch, as we do about 4 times a year.  Its is a nice size buffet with some sushi, couple of soups and probably 25 different Chinese dishes.  The food is good, just not great.  The salt and pepper shrimp are my fave.  I keep going back - is it msg-addiction?
I keep trying to like Feng Shui.  It was OK when it first opened, but it has continued to go down hill over time.  It consistently disappoints me.  The food is just not good.  I literally have to ring out the eggrolls in a paper towel every time I get them, but I can't seem to learn my lesson, eggrolls are my guilty pleasure. I am afraid that it is the only game in town, so I keep repeating my folly!  Feels like Ground Hog Day, stay away.  Man, do I miss KoKo Island.
I visit this restaurant  3 or 4 X a year since it opened as mid point meeting place with old friends. One of the nice Chinese restaurant  that has a great variety of food, obviously
freshly made. Seating is comfortable and good place to have a pow-wow with friends or family. We can eat as much or as little and one does not feel rushed. Thank you
We ordered take out. Had to wait 15 minutes beyond the promised time . .  no problem. Sometimes these things happen. Got the food home and then the real disappointment(s) presented themselves. The egg rolls were nearly dripping in grease. The touted scallion pancakes were characterless. Ah but maybe, just maybe the place could redeem itself through the entries. Not happening. They were bland despite being requested spicy, lacked flavor and were just bad. Adding insult to injury there were only two packets of soy sauce (and we were out) plus, despite requesting extra rice we only one serving of rice versus the three we were expecting, which meant we ordered take-out but still had to prepare a basic part of the meal. I suppose that things could have been worse . . .  but aside from getting ptomaine I am really not sure how.
We used to order out from this restaurant, and thought the quality of the food was quite good. No longer. the last couple of times, the food has been loaded with MSG and nevertheless has been tasteless and gluelike. It's a factory atmosphere at the takeout counter, and they obviously are coasting on the reputation they made previously as well as the fact that there's no local competition. Give this place a wide berth! It's deteriorating.
 I went there on Saturday night with couple of my friends, we ordered the general Gao chicken, the sauce taste so wired, then we talked to our waitress, she said she need to talk to manager,and the manager came over and said this was our taste problem , not their problem,we wanna he took it off from the bill,but he refused it with rude attitude, we never back again.
This Asian food restaurant is good with a wide variety of the usual choices.  They make a delicious scallion-rich scallion pancake and satisfying Shanghai pan fried noodles.  The chicken with Chinese eggplant is a favorite - spicy, rich and slightly sweet.  The entrees don't automatically come with rice so don't forget to order something as a foil for the heat.  And don't miss the opportunity to have a Mai Tai - the best cocktail I've had anywhere - bar none - and that includes  many a fine drink here and abroad.
We like Feng Shui for a couple of reasons. The sushi is very good ( according to my husband. I am not wild about it), and the menu is large enough that you can order either or both along with many Asian entrees. They have a lot of fish on the menu, which is delicious. We have been there several times and have always had a good meal there.
Omg. Best little quiet bar, serving great rum concoctions was better than i'd hoped, but then ordered food and was even more impressed . Fresh crispy veg, house rice with shrimp and various deliciousness general Tso
chix, ( or however spelled)  just insanely good. Prices very very reasonable, clean as could be, bartender wicked nice as well as skilled, highly recommend!  You will not be disappointed.
Miss having Ian at the bar and wish the food was up to standard :) fried apps are fine but sushi quality seems lower. Just want a high quality asian food locally:)
We enjoyed a number of good meals here with no problems. Good and fresh food, until I brought a group of 6, and we ordered a shrimp dish off their specials board.  The shrimp were rancid and SPOILED, and the manager agreed, and whisked it away, offering little to no apology. I suggest this was a cultural misunderstanding but the way this was managed was embarrassing and awkward! When our bill arrived the shrimp dishes were still on it and the whole experience was yucky- their was NOTHING GRACIOUS OR CUSTOMER SERVICE ORIENTED here! Unpleasant and awkward and rude!!!!
I've been here for the Chinese buffet at lunchtime numerous times. The food is consistently fresh and tasty.  We order of take out for dinner and their entrees are ways hot, with fresh ingredients and  meat or seafood proportional to veggies and noodles.    The staff is courteous and prompt.   
Can't believe I haven't reviewed this restaurant before! We've been going there for years. The food is always good, very fresh and beautifully presented. The staff is pleasant and accommodating. And the lunch buffet is, hands down, the best on the South Shore. There's an excellent selection of traditional Chinese dishes (appetizers usually include shu mai, peking ravioli, boneless ribs, crab rangoon, chicken wings & teriyaki, egg rolls, scallion pancakes and tempura vegetables; main dish offerings feature salt & pepper shrimp, sauteed string beans, kung pao chicken, beef with broccoli, pork with scallions, garlic eggplant, veggie lo mein and veggie fried rice, general gau's chicken and more), plus a good selection of sushi (prepared in small fresh batches by Feng Shui's expert sushi chefs), as well as fresh fruit, asian salad, two soups, and some cakes and cookies - plus ice cream. All you can eat, $9.95. Heaven on a plate - or three! 

The restaurant is spacious and contemporary, has a nice lounge and a separate sushi bar. The dinner buffet has a few more options - often king crab legs and lobster chinese style - for, I believe, about $17. And there is an extensive al la carte menu, which is slightly pricey but the food is worth it.

Enjoy!
This breakfast and lunch store is a busy place in the morning and noon because the product is so good. Bagels are hard to do correctly  and the further one gets from the city the worse they seem to get. Atlantic Bagel is the exception! hey offer a good assortment of bagels and cream cheeses. Service is very good and one cannot help but be pleased by their main product. 
First off- these bagels rock. Perfect texture and taste and a nice variety of options beyond the obvious sphere with a schmear. The olive oil & rosemary bagels are lovely; the olive pimento cream cheese is stuffed with big fresh chunks of Manzanilla; the egg & cheese plus bacon or sausage breakfast sandwiches are filling and tasty. Plus, you can get anything in a wrap, including lots of lunch selections, and there's a small selection of freshly baked muffins and sinful cinnamon twists. The coffee here is very good too.
And the staff is friendly and fun ... but the highlight of any visit is engaging in some banter with the shop's owner, Steve, whose unlimited collection of sarcastically-inscribed T-shirts is especially amusing. Yeah, I love the place, and visit as often as I can.
This place isn't much to look at and you could pass it if not paying attention. We needed some real bagels for a family brunch. They have just about every type of bagel you can think of made right in front of you. There are tables to sit if you like and they take credit cards. Bagels were a hit and try some of their cream cheeses.
Love coming here before my morning walks! Fresh Bagels are to die for. They have perfect texture. Best ones Ive ever had. I love there Front fridge display, you can get some homemade items on the go as well.
The bagels are awesome and the staff couldn't be nicer or more accommodating. Service with a smile always. And never a bad meal. Breakfast fast or a healthy lunch daily.
I love the bagels here, some of the best, if not the best in the area.  Very popular with the locals and area teens.  Good bagel/breakfast sandwiches.  Not crazy about the coffee.  They used a different vendor many years ago when they first opened on 3A.  I liked the coffee then, not now, too weak for my taste.
The prices were good, and there were plenty of choices, but the service was poor. We ordered two bagels with cream cheese and the girl that waited on us asked us three times to repeat our order. (It wasn't terribly busy) Our bagels were barely warm and thin on cream cheese. We are half a bagel and headed to Brueggers instead.
Seriously the best bagels to be had on the south shore of Massachusetts..cinnamon sugar can't be overlooked.
leckere bagels, super nettes personal.
typisches amerikanisches essen. ungesund, aber gut. 
man muß sich das angebot durch durchlesen und evtl. nachfragen, damit man weiß, was alles mgl. ist. für nicht amerikaner nicht alles selbstverständlich.
I've been going to Papa Gino's before it is privilously from allington Island from cohasset Papa Gino's pizzacam delivered current audit again pizza was cold I would never ever recommend cohasset House of Pizza stay away to know what use it as a last choice you will be very unhappy
Delivery is awful. Almost 2 hours for one pizza fairly close??? This is ridiculous at 6:50 I ordered a buffalo chicken pizza and at 8:50 it's still not here? That's awful and wrong and I should get some money back. Then they say it's on the route in the car on the way to the house and it's still 20mins later no pizza. Awful awful 
Bia bistro is located in building that once was a unique Book store, so there are several nook and cranny dining areas.  Service was outstanding and the food was excellent.  We enjoyed the offering of what they call "SPLITS" on selected items that are reduced in quantity.  The escargot was marginal in lack of defined garlic.  Would visit again.
This favorite never disappoints with great local seafood specials and homey classics!
The seafood stew can be ordered as spicy as you like and the local scallops with lobster/potato salad was a treat on this hot summer night.
Having traveled from chicago and Munich to Cohasset, we were starving. Although later, we came to discover Bia. What a delight. Fun staff, accommodating and delicious food. Turned out to be a great evening. 

Sat outside.  Service good. Clean.  Food only fair- had $34 rib steak which was the special.  Very tough and overdone.  Used bug spray on guests while they and others were eating !!!!!!!!!!!!!  Not safe.
Had dinner there last night before going to a concert nearby (3 minutes from south Shore Music Circus!) We ordered escargot, mushroom risotto, a salad special and a pizza. All were delicious. Service excellent. Great menu and ambiance. Would recommend, definitely.
In the sleepy village of Cohasset, on the south shore of MA is the charming Bia Bistro. A cozy restaurant with a lively bar and some of the best food I've had in a long time. We stayed in Cohasset for a show at the Music Circus, and as it was our anniversary weekend we came for 2 nights. The restaurants onsite at our hotel were closed, so we were forced to venture into town. Best mistake ever! We loved Bia Bistro on our first night so much, that we came back on Saturday as well. Exceptional food with a spotlight on the freshest ingredients available. We dined at the bar both evenings as is our preference. Truly memorable dinners, creative cocktails, and great service from Joey, Lynn and Janice at the bar. From appetizers and fresh salads, to the outstanding entree's we enjoyed, we were blown away! Kudo's to the chef and excellent staff who shined even as the dinner rush set in. This place is a must, if you're looking for dinner in the area.
Been in town two years before I finally made it in for dinner - boy, do I have to make up for the lost time.  Service was outstanding, and the food excellent, from the salad through to the great seafood I ate that evening.  
If you're in the vicinity of Cohasset Village, Bia Bistro is a very pleasant place to dine.  The entire staff was friendly and looking to please!  Our waitress was delightful.   The menu is varied and the dishes creative & very tasty in what I would call a combination of American & French Fusion.  The Duck Pate' was light and flavorful.  I ordered a side of veggies, as well, which were braised and flavored with a light sauce.  It was delicious.  One "special" was broiled haddock with pureed parsnips and a winter selection of sauteed veggies & sauce.  It too was delicious.  My wife's braised short rib was lean, perfectly prepared & savory. It was served in a delightful light sauce. The wine pours were generous, and everyone was offered a sample of the wine selections before the pour.   The dining rooms on the left side of the bar are comfortable & tastefully decorated, although there is nothing to absorb the sound, so private conversations should be postponed until after departure or  kept quiet.  We were very pleased to rediscover Bia Bistro & we'll be back!
We have been going to this place for over six years. The menu is interesting and the food is very good. A highly convivial place to go to with another couple. It jumps a bit later in the evening. I've had very good service and service that was not as timely as one would expect of a place like this. One can eat outside when there weather is good. We like the place a lot.
This is a small casual dining venue - great location in Cohasset.  The atmosphere is pub-like with a large wrap-around bar and small bistro-like tables.  The service is moderate but the food is absolutely delicious.
My husband and I go there most Friday nights.  There is a good range of food and great salads.  Atmosphere is casual and cozy.  And if you live on the South Shore, you will most likely run into someone you know.
We have been to Bia Bistro a few times and have never been disappointed!  The quaint, New England atmosphere, the service and especially the food is "to die for."  The mussels can't be missed and are the most plump, savory muscles we've ever had.  Entrees we have tried include the duck breast, short ribs, hanger steak, salmon...all fantastic.  A great place a cozy winter evening's meal, a special date night  or even a date with your husband of 47 years!
This is a popular local restaurant with a fantastic menu and great service. They always have a special based on what is fresh, and some go to dishes.  There steak frite and short ribs are both our go to dishes, and we have never been disappointed with the specials.  The cocktails and wine list are very good, but the bar area is very small.  Outdoor seating in nice weather is nice.
Cozy, with a very varied menu, seafood, duck, beef, but favorite is the chicken with mushroom risotto. Good beer and wine selection and nice staff. 
I've been to Bia many times.  The bolognese is very good.  The specials are great.  Parmesan truffle fries!  Love those.  They could maybe change up the menu a bit but with the specials, there's always something new to consider.
Never had a bad meal here.  very enjoyable.  Burger always a great call- but the hanger steak is legendary.   Go!
Excellent food, wine and service in a warm and friendly atmosphere. The cuisine is imaginative and tops other local choices by a mile. For an enjoyable evening Bia Bistro is great value and a great experience.
We had a nice dinner here, the food was good, not great - kind of average offerings, the pizza with arugula was nice, the veal meatballs were so-so....
We had an outstanding waitress named Merrick, definitely ask for her if you go there.
We typically visit Bia Bistro at least once a year to enjoy the ambiance and food.  Tucked away in an upscale community south of Boston, you won't stumble upon this restaurant by accident.  In past years we have thoroughly enjoyed the service, ambiance and food, but this year we found the food to be less than anticipated.  I had a lobster risotto dish that was disappointing.  Some of our friends ordered the escargot and were unhappy with the tomato sauce which is a bit unusual.  My salad which was the special of the day left a lot to be desired.  I am not sure if this was just a bad night or if in fact the chef has been replaced, but we won't rush back.
Food is very good and the wine list extra long and service is excellent Service is always nice 
prices are strong mid range
I drove several miles to get there but learned that it was a fast-foof restaurant. I think reviews should be real and should not be misleading. I did not eat there. So I will give an Average Mark. 
A good place to grab some Chinese food. ... Panda Garden has a  regular menu with your average price and items.
 Its only for take out , so dont plan to sit and eat. 
This is your basic Chinese takeout -- fried and little greasy Chinese.  Would only recommend in a pinch - would be nice to see a fresher approach to Asian food
If you are lazy and live near Crystal Lake, then you already know how much of a savior this place really is. SUPER fast staff, enjoyable chinese classics, and right around the corner from the lake. Give it a shot, you can't go wrong with their combo plates and some chinese donuts for dessert! Slightly overpriced, but given it's location, I'd gladly drive two minutes and pay a bit more, rather than drive into Ellington Proper.
Average bodega. Fox News on the TV every time I go in there, surly staff, locals sitting around discussing how Obama is destroying the country. Bible T-shirts. Thinly veiled racism. You're better off going to Ellington Depot down the road. At least they are nice to you.
the owner is very rude and the girl making the sandwich's acts like it's a bother to make you something,,would not recommend this dive to anyone..they should sell it to someone that cares about people!
I just read the previous review from last February, and I have to agree that the breakfast sandwiches are great!  I always get the "Western with Ham" on an English Muffin, and it's always fresh...and, unlike Dunkin Donuts, comes with a good amount of eggs...
I stop here when I'm on the go, so much better than Dunkin breakfast. And they serve Kevins Coffee...love it
My wife and I stopped for lunch and ordered whole-belly clams and a BLT. A little before noon, the place was quiet, but our waitress was friendly and took good care of us. The portion of clams was plentiful and done well. I was disappointed that the coffee was more than $2.00 a cup, though. Otherwise the prices seemed reasonable
Hands down the best restaurant in Ellington, so I wish it wasn't the last one I'd tried. The lasagna we had last week was amazing, and tonight we were astounded by the pizza. Friendly service, too, so this is now our go-to restaurant in Ellington.
Holiday pizza is a small local Restsurant in Ellington. Their pizza is average and dependable for the area.
Don't drive by this place because of it's appearance. It's one of those places that deserves a try. Trust me. When you walk in don't walk out because of it's appearance. We almost did but we would have made a huge mistake. The pizza is without a doubt the best pizza in the area. We were so full after devouring a large pie but we ordered another to go for later on. Something about the sauce is rather addicting. It's homemade and so good that we asked for a cup on the side for crust dipping. The food is fresh and clean and so delicious it has become a family favorite. Oh and the servers, friendly and professional on every level. We have returned again and again.
ordered a few pizzas here for a family birthday party. one was cheese and it was fine. the one with all the meats on it was better. 

see the pizza picture i took with this review

we would probably order from here again
My husband and I have been visiting the Hidden Still since they were in their last location. When they first moved, we were leery of the "largeness" but after some growing pains things seemed a lot better. Recently however, we were beyond disappointed! Perhaps this was because we came during Happy Hour I really want to find a reason. We were pretty much ignored at the bar. After finally getting in our drink order I have to say my vodka and soda was without doubt the weakest drink I have ever tasted, I mean seriously. I really should have complained, but my bad, I didn't. Waiting for a second round was painful, when the order was finally taken I'll admit my second drink ( not a vodka this time) was much better. The wings were excellent, as usual. So, although this visit was a big disappointment we are not ready to give up on the Still. We are hoping this was just an off night for an otherwise excellent bartender. We want this to go well......
Living in town this is a convenient place for is to go. It is primarily a friendly bar atmosphere but we go just to eat. The menu is limited but the food is very good. They have super good chicken wings with a long list of toppings. My personal favorite is the garlic Parmesan. 
A place that has different and traditional foods. All I have eaten has been great. Beautiful decor inside. Great moonshine.
The hidden still is a little gem in Ellington that is just what we needed. So many pizza places, no variety of of restaurants, so it's great. Of course they have moonshine, but they also feature local breweries, and have an excellent wine selection, my favourite, William hill chardonnay!  Specialty sandwiches with exotic sauces, brings the menu up a notch or two, and the wings are wonderful. The still has been completely renovated from the last restaurant, and the decor is freshly modern, yet comfortable. Some nights they have various activities and entertainment. Great choice! See you there!
I had a diner and a lunch at the Hidden Still. The Cajun burger I had for diner was outstanding. I went back for lunch and had a Buffalo Chick Wrap, also very good. 
The fries are also very good. I think they are fresh cut on site.
I was not thrilled with the beer selection. I am a lager person and there was not much of a selection, I ended up with a Yuengling. Being from the Pottsville area - no big deal for me. I was looking for a small Craft Brewery beer. The seem to have a lot of ales.
The Hidden Still is an amazing place for drinks and a decent variety of food.  They have a nice variety of on-tap beers from around the CT area, not to mention different moonshines from Onyx Moonshine which is also near by.  I highly recommend the pretzel stack, served with house-made beer cheese that is made with a different beer and cheese every time I go (and I go often!). Also recommend their wings, and they have a extensive variety of (also house-made) sauces & rubs for the wings!  Try it. You won't be sorry!
Nice relaxing lunch on the patio.  Our server was great as was the food.  Signature cocktails including moonshine of course. Would go back any time.
Great menu with a nice variety.  The wings were excellent as was my burger.  The service was great, we never waited for refills or extra napkins, the servers were very attentive.
Friends and I recently went to a show, and coming here was the perfect choice. Although already after 11 pm, we were able to enjoy some delicious apps with our drinks. We will definitely be back!
Went out with a bunch of guys and had great food ,good brew, and the atmosphere was a buzz, if ya want to enjoy a small place with with good friends than this is the place for you
Great chili bowl, bacon cheeseburger..Best of all, giant gin and tonic.
Fast service.
Patio shaded and cool.
Stopped in for a quick lunch and was greeted with a smile and served a fresh sandwich. WIll add this place to my list and will try it for dinner sometime.  Thanks! :)
Great experience and love the patio. Good food from salads to burgers, great service for dinner and drinks. Enjoy the wide range of beers and moonshine cocktails.
The menu items have a flair, and seemed well prepared.   Sweet potato fries are a plus.   Good selection for draft beer.
Besides the great moonshine drinks, they host trivia which is a big hit.  Also food is excellent.  They are always added new items to their menu.
Thursday night was a good night to go. Weekend's are very busy. We've been here before, and this business just as good.  
Bourbon Manhattan great: date's Cosmopolitan was perfect. I had the Sundae, a mix of pulled pork, mashed potatoes, corn etc. Great taste.. Date had shrimp Po-Boy..only complaint was the size of the bun..Had to eat with  folk, otherwise delicious.
Wil return, but always on week days.

We love this place.  We started going here the very first night they opened...then they moved and we followed like puppies!  Great food, great atmosphere and terrific servers!  And they server Tater Tots!  Very inventive and great drinks too!
We have eaten at this restaurant a few times. The first time ever it was excellent, great burgers, great drinks. The last 2 times I haven't been as impressed. This past visit our wings were over cooked (almost to the point of burned). And the nachos we chewy (microwave chewy). The drinks were ok, but nothing to exclaim about.  They flavors were muddled but the overwhelming burn of lower quality alcohol.   
This restaurant has delicious food. They actually have something on there menu called The Anti-Salad. It has one piece of lettuce and the rest is all meat and shrimp. It's delicious. There's also a Carolina Burrito that has pulled pork, cole slaw, cooked onions, something they call West Ashley sauce that's delicious and on the outside they put bourbon cheese sauce, YUM, is all I can say and I order extra on the side. It's sooo good. They have drinks that they have made up there, so ask what they have, they are also really good.
The bartenders have such an attitude there? The place was full and really busy and they they seem to have no sense of that and slowly filled orders with no personality. I got my beer in a plastic cup? And beers are super expensive. Food is just OK, nothing special. Might go back in the summer as they have a nice patio that could be fun. 
Wow this was delicious...three of us got 3 different breakfasts and they were all great.
Fluffy scrambled eggs, bacon, home fries and toast.
Omelet, bacon, toast, home fries and coffee
Loaded homefries, bacon and iced tea

Can't beat the price...the loaded home fries were to die for..not greasy..just yummy

We were there to catch up with each other and we were not rushed at all. Nice waitstaff ....
The restaurant had been there for many years. It is convenient for Ellington residents. Great breakfasts. Also open for lunch. A haven for early morning hunters and fishermen in their respective seasons. 
Let's just say it has been well over 20 years since I was here & my Fresh lunch yesterday was lovely.  I had 3 Homemade salads on a plate for $8.99 - Chicken, Potato & Tuna.  I thought later when I had first walked in & saw a Huge portion of Cole Slaw being served & noticed on the menu that a side is $2.50 - Why on earth my 3 salad plate was not at least $7.50?  The math says it should have been at least that.  Oh well, service was terrific, although I personally would NOT want to pool tips as they have to do here.  All 3 servers were excellent, personable & full of home-town niceness.  I'm sorry I did not get their Stuffed Cabbage Special yesterday that I did not know anything about until I overheard it being announced to some other customers.  Next time for sure!  They close at 2 p.m., so get there early, because they are a Breakfast & Lunch place that is always busy.
Good Food and Good Service - we went there for breakfast and the line was out the door, but we didn't have to wait long     --  they are quite efficient at getting people sat down in a timely fashion
Make sure before you go that you have cash. There is an ATM inside but it is more convenient to bring cash with you. The breakfast here is great. There are lots of locals and it is always busy! I had the apple cinnamon french toast on wheat bread and it was great!  
Great breakfast and lunch menu.  You get a great amount of food for your money.  Food is excellent! Highly recommended.
Stopped in for a quick breakfast yesterday, and despite the large crowd everything was prompt and hot. Eggs, bacon and toast were all as expected. Hash browns were dull (unseasoned and no onions, just plain potatoes), but I don't need the extra calories! They kept my coffee cup full, which is the most important thing.
They have excellent breakfast foods, everything,doesn't matter what you order. The bacon and eggs taste unbelievably fresh. The service is also very fast there.
Long-time Ellington residents rave about the Chuck Wagon, so after many months of hesitation I finally stopped in for breakfast. The corned beef hash was as dry as the Sahara. Toast had blackened edges. Hard to get a coffee refill. And cramped. It's just a below-average local greasy spoon. I see no reason to recommend this restaurant unless you live nearby and have no mode of transportation to get to another restaurant, and you've no food at home to eat.
A friend and I had breakfast here recently.  This place is a favorite of the locals who live in this rural community.  Breakfast portions were so large that we couldn't finish.  I had eggs scrambled, toast and a side of corned beef hash, while delicious - it was enormous.  She had french toast - several large pieces with fruit and syrup.  The staff were very friendly and coffee and tea refills were graciously offered several times.
This place is always packed but it's worth the wait.  The food is good and their specials are always good.  I have dined in and taken out, both are easy to deal with for wait time. There is a nice little older fashioned counter with stools if you want to drop in and there are also booths for a more relaxed feel and tables if you may be bringing a customer for a little business lunch.  The afternoon is noisy so if it's quiet your looking for this is not the place.  The only thing I don't like is they only take cash and in this day and age most people do not carry a lot of cash so you have to pre-plan for that. The staff is extremely friendly and accommodating.
Large portions. Fast friendly service. Home Fries were mushy. Omelet was filled nicely however the egg was transparent.
The outside of Chuck Wagon doesn't do justice to the space available inside and the comfortable, friendly, traditional diner type atmosphere. The waitstaff were lovely and called out to many of the customers by name. The food was good and reasonable. Great local place to eat in Ellington.
Food and service is great, staff very friendly and attentive.  Small-town cozy and attractive décor, family owned.  Love going there!
Okay, so its not a secret any longer but it is a gem of a place in our small New England town of Ellington, CT.  Food is very delicious, meaty omelets are meaty, service is top notch, coffee is always kept filled, toast is toast, not warm bread.  I only eat breakfast here.  Its always busy yet there is always a place to be seated!  Great place. Always satisfied.  keep in mind debit and credit cards are not accepted.  Bring cash.
Great breakfast and lunch restaurant...bright, clean and friendly.  They are always there to warm up your coffee so you can finish the large portions delivered.
I've been going to the Chuck Wagon for many years now and realized I've never reviewed them. It's your typical local breakfast joint - crowded and bustling with activity every weekend morning. Sometimes there is a wait but it's not usually that long and there's really nowhere else to eat in the vicinity, so you might as well wait. The service is always quick and friendly. It's been predominantly the same staff as far as I can recall since I started going there 8 years ago. A lot of the regulars sit at the counter which leaves the tables free for when we go. It's usually crowded so it's hard to squeeze a high chair in for our daughter without feeling like we're in the way so sometimes we wait to get a table in the corner or out of the way. There are always specials and the regular menu has plenty to choose from too. The coffee is always weak, but that is no reason not to go. Prices are very reasonable and the food comes out quick. And it's noisy so no one minds our daughter babbling away or banging her toy on the table. 
Very good local restaurant.  This a small restaurant, not like Ihop.  We only go here for breakfast.  The service is great and fast.  We've never had a bad meal.
Great local restaurant! Speedy friendly service but if you care to stay and chat over coffee that's OK too! Very relaxing atmosphere with a home town feel!
we have been here several times and never had a bad meal.  The best by far was the Rueben Omelet last weekend.  The hash is good - not out of a can.  Portions are good and service is fast.  Just what you want for a good breakfast spot.
I have to preface this review by saying that everyone is entitled to a bad day.

Hometown Pizza has been my wife's go to place for eggplant Parmesan for the past couple of years. She uses this restaurant as a guide to judge other restaurants. And she will say things like "oh their eggplant is good but it's not as good as Hometown Pizza."

A couple of things about this place, I think they are mostly a delivery or carry out restaurant because they seem to do a good business but there are really people eating in the restaurant when we are there. The restaurant can comfortably seat about 16 people. Normally when we go here we are the only two or three.

So last night when we got there our table had been taken. A minor inconvenience but survivable. But things seem to go south from there. Service was slow for no apparent reason. They said they were very busy but there were only two families in the restaurant and we only saw a couple people come in for carry out orders. 

This restaurant changed hands in August so we understand that you have to give the new crew a chance to get their routines down. But this is our fourth or fifth time since the new owner took over and we have received much better service than we did this time.

And I believe that the one person preparing the food may have been new or just clearly doesn't know what he's doing.  He and the one waitress looked and sounded busy the entire time we were there but we really didn't see a lot of production.

Having said all that, here's the bottom line. We were there an hour before we received our food where it normally takes them 20-30 minutes. There seem to be a miscommunication with part of our order and we didn't receive what we expected. My wife did say that the eggplant Parmesan was good but then it didn't have enough sauce.  This time I got a small pizza and I thought it was good. My daughter got a ham and cheese grinder and said it was good.

So for this visit we Will give the food a rating of 4 and service a rating of 2.

When we left my wife said she wasn't sure she would ever come back... but since this is not a one mistake world we will probably come back again. But if it doesn't get better than they will lose some good customers.


We are locals and got it delivered. Used the menu from the internet....pricing was wrong, not listed that they charge extra for delivery, it took just over an hour and the pizza was not good at all.  It was obviously not fresh,  not hot, and there was no flavor! We got a medium split in half, mine hawaiin, my husband's hamburg, onion and mushroom.   All I could taste on my side was pineapple and sauce, my husband's hamburger was overcooked,  with no flavor.   The crust never rose. When I called to ask why the difference in price, was told why, but not offered a refund considering I got the price right off thier website. I also told them it was not good, sorry was all I got. We will never waste our money here again.
I have been going to Hometown for years.  Their pizza is great, prices reasonable and service is excellent. The restaurant is a bit small.
My husband and I have been going here ever since we moved into town in 1988.  We go here a lot for cheese steak sandwiches. We've also had their pizza which is very good. Teddy, the owner, is very friendly.  There a few booths as this is not a big place.
We love the Fra Diablo pizza - I've never had better. Everyone is always friendly, service is fast and the prices are good. Whenever we've asked for split ingredients we've been accommodated. Don't know what JLP is talking about butter flavor - I just can't imagine where that came from - the crust is great!
Whether you're eating in or getting it delivered the pizza is always hot and delicious. They'll make any combination to accommodate your taste. Always a very friendly staff. Setting doesn't do justice to the food served within. 
New to Ellington, my wife and I set out to find great fresh pizza -one of our staples,  in our environs. Thus we came to Hometown Pizza during an early evening on a recent Saturday. 

We sampled two different pizzas. The pizza's unusual and strong butter-flavor permeated and overwhelmed all its other flavors. Both tasted strongly like popcorn! Upon inquiry we were told that butter is the dough's signature ingredient. -Thus results. While I'm not exactly a traditionalist, I expect great pizza to have 'heart', and taste like pizza at it's core, not like popcorn. We did not finish the pies - for us an indicator of 'like' or 'dislike'. 

Bottom-line: 
Flavor was disappointing. Not a good value. Will not come back.
Years ago I ate at hometown pizza and I thought the crust was  to hard. I started a new job a few years ago and we ordered pizza for lunch. It was excellent, I said where is this pizza from? They said Hometown Pizza. I have repeatedly ordered the pizza many times in the last few years and it is excellent. I am glad they got a new recipe for crust and that we now have a good pizza shop in Ellington. Also I love the meatball grinder :)
Ellington Subway is a good place to get good food at a good price.  The workers there are always polite and attentive to you as they quickly make your sandwich correctly.
When I try a new take-out Chinese restaurant, my only expectation is that the food's not terrible. I've eaten at China Eagle a few times now and the food has never been terrible. I wish I could say the food was inspired, delectable, and savory, but I can't. So it's a reliable choice to fill your belly for under 10 bucks in under 10 minutes, but just keep reasonable expectations. Staff is friendly, I should add.
there is not much choice as far as Chinese goes in our small town of Ellington but this place is okay for most things. I always order the basics of house fried rice, egg and shrimp rolls, mei fun and boneless ribs to my satisfaction.  had the Generals and didn't care for the sauce one bit.  The lovely young lady always working when I go knows I skip the onions in my rice orders before I even get to the counter.  I find this place to be good enough to keep going back!  I just wonder when the fortunes will ever be updated in the cookies.......
When we received our food the fried noodles were stale -every bag of them!!!  The fried rice was not that great.  Would not go back
I really love this place. Good prices and here they load the lo mein with whatever kind you order, it's the most veggies iv'e ever had in my veggie lo mein! never had a bad meal 
I have eaten here twice.  Both times enjoyed a fresh tasting burger.  Beef comes from local farms in the area and you can taste the freshness.  Farms are identified on blackboard in main dining area.  Restaurant is located in a small strip mall, in a town/area with limited restaurants.  The entire floor of the dining room was sticky on both visits.
We met here with friends for the second time. Always have a good selection of beers on tap. Good atmosphere with plenty of sports memorabilia to look at. We all ordered burgers and we all ate everything. Pretty good for a restaurant hidden in a strip mall.
So This was my 2nd time here considering its in town and I heard good things I said why not I will try it again even though I didnt like it the 1st time. I ordered a specialty burger and when I got it it was well done when I ordered medium. They said they cant cook their burgers to order/temp which I found insane and I have never heard of before in my life. I had to send the burger back and the other couple at the table also didnt really like the food. The beer was good and the waitress wasnt bad but overall it was terrible and we will NEVER go back. IF you want a good burger you will probably have to travel to Plan B or something similar.
It is a sports bar and family restaurant with really good burgers. I enjoy there full bar and usually enjoy a game at the same time. 
This was our second trip, although the first time they ran out of Corona beer (liquor store next door?) it was an overall good dinner. This time like last time we called ahead to be placed on the waitlist however the guy answering the phone said they don't do that even though the night before we were told they do and did it our first visit. Anyway we got there at 8:15pm and was told it was a 30-45 min wait. So we asked the host to call their sister restaurant down the street to see what the wait was. The host called and talked to the owner which told her their not taking any more customers???? There were six of us, a lot of money gone. So we waited in the bar where there was a bug in one our martini's not a big deal but the bartender seemed annoyed when it was sent back. Then a waitress where my wife was resting her wine on had to place menus so that she had to hold her wine. This was extremely rude so when she did it again I asked her is that the only place those menus can go. She responded rudely, "That's where they usually go." Couldn't put  them anywhere else so that a paying customer can place their drink on? Not  a person that should be in customer service. The meal, it took a very long time to finally get our meals, and at 9:30 pm the dining room was 2/3 empty.  My haystack fries were cold, my burger was way overcooked. In fact all 6 burgers were overcooked but after waiting a long time no one was willing to send back their food. I live fairly close to this establishment but after this horrible experience I will drive the extra miles to Plan B or Max Burger for a gourmet burger with better service. I've been to all three Lepri restaurants and after this I won't be going to any of them!!!
Went there with my wife early on a Friday. It doesn't look like much from the outside but it's nice inside. We sat in the dining room. It is a small room so it can get pretty loud. The bar area looked nice so we will sit there next time. They have a good selection of beers (including Lagunitas on tap). We had some reuben style appetizer that was delicious...we wanted more. I had the fajita burger with regular fries and my wife had a bacon cheese burger with sweet potato fries. It was all very delicious and the price was reasonable. There's no other burger place in the area (besides wood n tap but their food bores me) so I hope they thrive!
Though the location (in a small plaza set back from the road) could be better, the food and service were amazing. We sat in the bar and were served by the bartender. The beer selection was great, and the unique burger combinations were intriguing. I ordered the fajita burger and  my husband ordered the steak burger. Both burgers were excellent. The sweet potato fries were the best I've ever had and my husband's potatoes were great too. The server/bartender was very attentive and it was a great first experience. We'll go back soon. 
Good burger place, the wait is a little long. Atmosphere is nice typical burger place setting. Worth trying. 
The food is great but the service lacks attention - we've had to ask for refills on beverages & our order has been wrong more than once - and I don't think it was the kitchen's fault, more like misinformation from the server.
I have been here 4 times and have had a good experience each time. The staff is very friendly and down to earth, the atmosphere is comfortable and peppy, and the food is unique and delicious.
Good burgers but everything else is just okay.  Noisey and not a comfy place to go.  
Have loved Monet's table since discovering many years ago. It's like eating at your special Aunt's or Grandma's home. I enjoy eating things I don't make regularly and Monet's always has fresh, unique, healthy  food that never fails to satisfy. The atmosphere is relaxed and lovely whether you dine indoors in the winter by the fire or outside in the flower garden during the nice weather. Yummy specials should not be ignored nor room made for an amazing dessert.  A special place. Don't miss it. 
Held a special function with a wide selection of unique foods. We are a local non profit business wanting to support our local restaurants. What a great choice! It was a special event for a special colleague. Would highly recommend Monet's Table for any event. Deb, the owner, is so wonderful to work with. She has a wonderful place with incredible food. Thank you and enjoy!!!
You may never have been to any place quite like Monet's table. You can see their commitment to excellence in decor, service and, of course, the food. 
Everything is delicious and unique. Surprising combinations of ingredients, healthy, often organic and locally grown.
If you're looking for a quick meal, forget Monet's Table. But if you want an unforgettable dining experience, call for a reservation!
Unique menu, unique building. One of a kind place.  Take the time to have a wonderful Saturday brunch.
Monet's table my friends took me there for lunch on my anniversary get away with my husband. This place is filled with old world charm. The staff is exceptional. The history of the house is intriguing. so cozy and inviting.my friend is quite a regular there .and it is her favorite place to go for breakfast.so if you go there for breakfast try the carols special. And all their food is made from scratch no additives or preservatives' must go for the Tolland traveler. They also carry art work for purchase. And I understand they change it out for a new artist once a month. I looked at some of the art its beautiful. And I understand at one time the had Monet art there.
Perfect! Great food, inventive menu, vegetarian and vegan choices, fresh ingredients, excellent service, inviting staff, warm and gracious ambience. No more deli stops for me when I travel through Connecticut. I chose a garlic and Parmesan encrusted grilled cheese sandwich on homemade bread. A simple concept with a delightful twist. A dessert shared with my husband: chocolate cake with raspberry filling. Instead of the jam filling I expected, the moist cake layers were frosted with a rich and smooth raspberry Russian cream and topped with a thin layer of chocolate ganache. This is my new "go to" place when traveling. Wish I lived close enough to make Manet's Table a regular part of my routine.
We have been here for dinner and catered affairs. The staff is quite nice and accomodating. The food is very good. We have never been disappointed here and would readily go back. If your travel schedule allows you to stop in while traveling down I84, by all means stop in . They have limited hours, so check with them first.
If you get a chance try the food here... deliciously delightful in every way... As you will see by the photos I eat here quite often...
Beautifully welcomed, inviting atmosphere, wonderful menu selection and careful presentation- I'll return to this restaurant often now with friends & family.
Warm and cozy restaurant, with a little different, out of the ordinary menu. Fresh produce, organic products used.  Not a large menu, but everything sounds great if you like eclectic.  Will  go back soon, can't get enough of relaxing atmosphere, friendly wait staff, delicious food.  And those desserts!
I went here recently with 5 other friends for a birthday celebration.  The food choices were limited and the portions were not very large for the price.  BUT the chocolate-coconut (Mounds Bar) cake was to die for and worth the trip!  The gardens are lovely and the dining area was sweet with lovely reproductions on the walls.  Overall a very enjoyable experience.
Wow!  It has been years since I found a place like this in CT.  I loved the atmosphere created by the house location- cozy, comfortable and quiet.  The fireplace in the middle of the first floor was a bonus.  Of course we know that a restaurant can't survive on atmosphere: the food has to shine to make you want to return.  No worries there- Monet's table excels! We were a party of 3.  One ordered the hearty breakfast of eggs with sausage and potatoes.  Two of us ordered the special: a salmon and shrimp crepe in a creamy lemon dill sauce.  I consider this a risky dish-- there are so many ways it can fail.  Was the sauce lumpy, thick or over-seasoned? No! It was smooth, light and delicately flavored.  Was the crepe sticky or overcooked? No- it was thin and fresh.  Was it stuffed with the cheaper salmon with some miniscule pieces of shrimp? No! There was a generous amount of fresh shrimp. It was served on tender spinach leaves that were also worth eating.  We sampled the scone and the apple walnut bread and both were good.  Did I mention the apple flavored coffee, locally made?  Also wonderful.  It is out of my way, but I'm already planning how I'll return with another friend. It's the perfect "girls' day out" place, but I also saw a young family and a couple. Here's to hoping it will one day expand to include dinner so that my husband and I can enjoy it together.
Don't like this question best meal I have in a restaurant but it is close.  Delicious.   Upscale and worth it.  Décor is peaceful, serene atmosphere, service great.  Food great.
Just found this great little place. Rural and casual. Eclectic wholesome food is touted on the menu and it is. We were there for lunch. Delicious green salad with sliced peaches. Light dressing. My guest had light and tasty crab-cakes, elegantly served with sliced cucumber salad. Iced berry teas were great!. Delightful luncheon in a pleasant atmosphere on a hot summer day. What is not to like!
Great approach to culinary excellence and relaxed dining.
On a sunny winter Sunday, we hosted a baby shower/brunch at this restaurant in a beautifully restored old farmhouse.  The staff were all smiles, gracious and attentive; the set-up was lovely and the food fantastic - assorted homemade breads, fresh fruit bowl, HOT scrambled eggs, hot breakfast meats and home fries and wonderful crepes. This restaurant, usually open weekdays for lunch as well as Saturday brunch, is not to be overlooked for a quick, well-priced healthy gourmet lunch by travelers and by locals.  It is located at the junction of Routes 74 and 30 (1/2 way between Exits 67 and 68 on I-84).
As soon as you enter you know this is a local place. Everyone seems to know everyone else, but newbies are welcomed! Friendly service, good drinks and pretty god food make this a good choice
The food is really good. A bit on the noisy side worth it for the food. Great local spot right on Route 83. Ample parking.
 This continues to be the best local spot for food and drinks.  This is a great spot for families or adult nights out.  Gotta love the Chili Cheese Fries, Quesadillas, wings, etc.
Excellent Mexican night ,service is great as are drinks,reasonable prices, always exceeds expectations ,
Great food and good service, lunch, dinner or just drinks you won't be disappointed ,great place to take the family or meet friends 
Every time we eat at Casey's the food is excellent --- staff is friendly and courteous and the food always comes in a timely manner.

We love it there.
large bar that is usually full and noisy with the locals.  Very large selection of draft beer is a plus.  The food is mostly fried and very average in selection and quality.
If you want a respite from your day, sit outdoors at Casey's, have a drink, some great food and watch the people on the putting green or try it yourself.  Great food, specials excellent service and prices.  Cobb salad is my personal favorite,  but apps to full dinners, it's great!
Recommended by a local business directly across the street. What a find. A very unassuming non descript road side place. Five of us decided to try it based on the recommendation and were pleasantly surprised. The place was much larger inside than the outside appearance suggested. The menu was extensive with something for everyone. The portions were large and the food was delicious. Everyone was pleased with their selection. The waitress was pleasant and efficient. After the meal, we remained at the table for more than an hour discussing business and were never encouraged to leave.
This is a great little restaurant in the country just about a 10 minute drive off of I-84 just east of Hartford. 
NOTE ***** The Radio Bullets below would not allow more than an "Average"  Rating which I find to be very unfair since I tried to rate it a "5".
We live in Ellington, and haven't been to Casey's in years.  We were looking for something close and hopefully, good.  We decided on Casey's.  We were not disappointed.  We sat on the patio, nice hot, Wednesday night.  It was pasta night, but we both decided on sandwiches.  I got the chicken cordon bleu, my husband got the Monterey chicken.  Both were very happy.  Fries, pickle, potato salad were all soo good.  My husbands dirty martini was ok, but my chocolate raspberry martini was yummy.  We were very satisfied, I took half my sandwich home because for me, with the pickle and potato salad, 1/2 was enough.  Service was good, and it was busy.  It's not the nicest looking of places, but it seems clean and everyone is nice.  The parking lot was full when we drove up, but there was still plenty of seats available.  And what an eclectic group of people eating there!  Young, old, families, bikers, girls in pretty dresses, anyone is welcome and no one doesn't fit in.  Come and try it out.  We are definitely going to go back soon for one of their other specials.  Sunday BBQ is super interesting!!
Casey's has great food and atmosphere.  Great place to go with friends.  Love sitting out on the patio in the warmer weather.  Great inside during the colder months with the fireplace.
Great place to come for a comfortable local atmosphere and good food. 

Very reasonable priced and able to sit outside and enjoy an summer evening.
First time coming here. Definitely wont be my last. Came on wednesday. Which is pasta night. Me and my family got to create our own unique pasta dinners. 
O. M. G. Delish. You pick your pasta. Toppings and meats. 
The alfredo sauce is amazing.  Would be nice to have alittle garlic in it. But thats my personal preference. 
We also had cheesy garlic bread. Yummy.   
Great atmosphere. Outstanding service. 
Cant wait to come back.  
Casey's has pretty good food, standard kind of pub fare. The atmosphere is friendly but the place needs an update décor-wise.  
Great food, friendly people, nice atmosphere. Great place to have a good time. Food is very good. Bartenders Rock!
The service is great and the atmosphere is jovial and loud at times but fun.  Weather permitting you can sit outside which is nice.  It is more of a bar so I wouldn't bring little ones there.
Ate here for the first time with some friends. Service is good and the staff is helpful and friendly. We all enjoyed our meals. The portions are good and the pricing is very good. We'll go back again. Seems like a good home town place.
Stopped in on a Friday evening around 6PM for dinner, party of 5. The place was crowded but orders in around 620PM but took 45 minutes for the meals to come out. Also had ordered soups but those never made it. The food included a number of sandwiches and salads all good. Overall consider average but the menu has a number of nice selections and will likely return at a less busy time.
Stopped for lunch beers and warmed up at Casey's while on a chilly fall motorcycle ride. They scooped up our group, took our orders and brought are food quickly accurately and all together. Waitress was friendly & had fun with our jokes. Many & solid/typical menu choices, good prices & food.
Casey's has a great menu, with all the fav's! Plus wonderful specials. But the nice thing about Casey's is the fun, relaxing atmosphere! The outside dining area, is a big hit, everyone wants to eat there in the summer.They also have a cozy fireplace, entertainment occasionally, t.v.s for the sports fans, great food, what more could you want?
This is a very clean and well run Micky D's - The fare is pretty much the same at these franchises. Not too busy, right on Rt 83 in a country setting, in front of the big Y. 
I have been to this McDonald's quite a bit as I live here in town-I must say this has got to be the worst McDonald's-I have been to Vernon and Manchester which are quicker and better.  This McDonald's is always slow service doesn't matter if they are busy or not-2 cars in the drive through seems to be too much to handle-ice cream machine always broken-food is cold a lot of the time.  Not what I would call FAST food at all.  Do yourself a favor and go a few more miles to Vernon
I love the pizza at DaVinci's!!! By far the best quality and selection!! Amazing and interesting pizza choices, many other great menu options also available. The staff is great, very friendly and welcoming!
My boyfriend and I found a Groupon deal for this place and decided to give it a shot. We started with the garlic bread with mozzarella and a chicken caesar salad. We each got a panini, I tried the tomato basil and he tried the chicken bacon ranch. Mine was really good but between the tomatoes and the balsamic glaze it was incredibly messy to eat what with everything sliding around. We ate at the restaurant (we live a bit of a drive away) so the only silverware we could find was what might possibly be the cheapest plastic pieces of garbage I have ever used. Those knives didn't cut through anything and the fork couldn't penetrate the bread without breaking off some pieces. The garlic bread was fantastic. I can't speak for my boyfriend but I do believe he liked his meal. There's certainly enough in our meal to fill us right up! Between the appetizer and the panini (and the side of chips they come with!), we were both filled right up. The restaurant really doesn't look like much from the outside and I honestly never would have noticed it had I not been looking for it but it's worth a shot. It may not be the best pizza/food around, but it does have its redeeming factors-- such as the fact that the parking lot (if you can call it as such) is nearly never full and the one dish I have tried has actually been pretty good. If only they could find a way to decrease the messiness factor.
Love their pizza, wraps and subs.  Their pizza is thin crust.  Meatball subs are amazing.  Highly recommend DaVinci's.  Owners very involved with the community as well.
Went there for takeout after reading all the good reviews. Was somewhat disappointed when we got it home. Although OK, I expected a better tasting pizza. A little pricey. Have had better pizzas at other local restaurants. Won't bother going back.
This isn't the place to go if you are looking for the best bang for your buck. If you want quality pizza for a reasonable price, this is your place. The staff is VERY friendly. The pizza is the best I've had in the area. When we are looking for a bunch of pizzas for the kids and their friends we will go to a local chain for a bulk deal, but when it's family pizza night, we will order from DaVinci's and we are never disappointed.
We ordered take out just after returning home from our vacation.  The food is normally very good, but this time... well, we were disappointed.  First, a 6 inch Italian Combo grinder was the worst that I have gotten from them.  One piece of each type of meat???  One small piece of lettuce? Bread was overcooked when heated up?  Just awful.  I will get my grinder/sandwiches from somewhere else.

Next, a Tomato Basil pizza...  where was the basil?  just a bit spread in the center of the pizza with none on the outside rim area, my wife was disappointed.  

Next, a Bacon Cheeseburger pizza...dominated with American cheese, which hid all the other flavors, my son said he would not get another again, as he voiced his concerns of the lack of beef, no pickles, very little bacon and with the overpowering of American cheese, where was the mozzarella?  

The only pizza that was good was the pepperoni, but then you can screw up a single item pizza.  

We have always had very good luck with DaVinci's... but now, we will think twice.
They have an excellent gluten free pizza. their other pizzas are good also, especially the veggie pizza
This is a great pizza place located in the small town of Ellington. We recently ordered pizza for take out and were pleasantly surprised with both the staff and service and the quality of the pizza. The cheese pizza alone is great and very tasty!  By far the best pizza in Ellington!
I'm very impressed with the friendliness of everyone I've talked to at this small pizza joint. The sandwiches and pizzas have been excellent as well. This is one of our go-to places. Ellington is lucky to have this little gem.
I stopped by yesterday expecting the typical pizza experience, which would have been fine with me. They were very friendly, and i opted to go with their recommendation of a panini styled sandwich. Best. bread. ever. Wow, it was SO good. They use pizza dough with asiago cheese for bread, and it is a thing of beauty. I am actually sad that I was just passing through and may never be back. It's a great place! 
DaVinci offers a different sort of crust that many pizza places in the area. Not much of a eat in place, most folks take and go. Careful parking as the lot is tiny and you can get wedged in if another driver is less than considerate (which seems to happen frequently in New England). I have visited many times for take out and a couple times eat in when I lived in the area. They may still offer a "permanent" coupon for X dollars off the order for a small price. Worth the cost. Also they have yummy Italian desserts.
Great pizza! The parking isn't the best when it is busy but the pizza certainly makes up for it! I had bacon on my pizza and it was great big pieces not the little bits some places put on 
Got two specialty pizzas and they were the best we've had in years - anywhere! And everyone there was so friendly and nice. They even made up a new pizza for us by combining the scallops and meatzilla! That got everyone's appetite going! A Surf 'n Turf Pizza!! We'll be back often!
The staff is friendly, helpful and very supportive of Ellington schools.  The food is excellent and they are very willing to make what you like, dietary restrictions and all.
We always get a DaVinci pizza. The sauce is just right, not to sweet and the crust is thin and crispy. Never a bad pizza at DaVinci.
The thin crust pizza has the perfect amount of sauce, spices and cheese. Always yummy!
We eat pizza all over the country and this is the best pizza ! We get a large pizza every Friday.  Great thin New York style pizza. The crust is crispy with just the right amount of sauce.  The staff is great especially Scott the manager. 
A little skimpy on the toppings; pricey for the size of the pizza
There's no shortage of pizza nearby, but they make the best! Thin and crispy with creative and fresh toppings. Take out only, though-very limited seating
For a small town this restaurant has a big city flavor.The menu is not your everyday run of the mill Italian but rather a departure from the very predictable boring list of common well known items that so many Italian restaurants offer. All in all it has pleased my wife and myself consistently over the course of several years.  
Consistently high quality and delicious food!! The food is locally sourced and prepared perfectly. One of my favorite places to eat!! 
We frequently dine, watch Chefs Table on Nextflix, and consider ourselves to be extremely appreciative and somewhat critical of the culinary arts. We love to go out and have an experience not just a meal,  that is exactly what happened when we ventured into Trattoria da Lepri for our first time.  They are hidden in a tiny strip mall in Ellington CT.  Hidden to the rest of the world but not to those who have had the opportunity to eat there before, because you can't find an empty table. (Definitely suggest a reservation) . Our Favorites: THE BOLOGNESE, with fresh pasta.  Seriously, I can't stop thinking about it, the fresh mozz & heirloom tomatoes... creamy, dreamy.  Antipasto platter with all the meats, roasted peppers, cheeses... caramelized onion cheese..yes there is such a thing only there you will find.  We were treated as if we were family from the moment we walked in until the moment we left ~ can't wait to go back.
My cousin recommended this restaurant to us, and we finally ventured there (about a 35 minute drive). It was 100% worth it. The food was awesome - so fresh and so tasty. The service was wonderful - very professional and knowledgable. 
Although the restaurant lacks appeal from the exterior appearance, the inside is quite nice. They had good music playing at a nice volume. 
It was one of the best meals my husband and I had in a long time. We will definitely be returning when we get the opportunity. 
Food is good, can't complain there...it is VERY pricy and the overall time spent at your table from sit down to when you leave....VERY LONG!
You would not expect such a high quality meal in a strip mall in Ellington, Connecticut....but let me assure you that it is one of the best meals I have ever had.  From the warm greeting to the generous desserts, all aspects of this dining experience were outstanding.  The fried calamari were perfectly cooked, nicely seasoned and lightly breaded.  The lemon aioli was to die for...made me want to lick my plate.  My scallop dish with lemon risotto was wonderful.  My dining companions had fra Diablo and chicken, and were equally wowed with their entrees.  Desserts are definitely worth saving room to enjoy.  The ice creams are not only delicious, but quite large portions.  However, that did not stop us from eating them all in their entireties.  We had the opportunity to meet the chef and congratulate him on his expertise.  The atmosphere is cozy and music is soft in the background - easy to have conversations.  This place is not to be missed, and we will definitely be back.
You truly don't expect this level of service, quality and atmosphere in a strip mall!  Yet, here in Ellington you'll find it at Trattoria de Lepri!  Wonderfully creative food and some of the best service you'll find anywhere!  Great place and a go to for that romantic special dinner experience.
Trattoria da Lepri has amazing food.  Each time we have gone I tried something different.  Very good.  Great atmosphere.
The food is always delicious! I highly recommend their cheese board and try the bacon jam!! Great service, great food, great cocktails and wine. Good pick for a romantic dinner. 
This is a wonderful restaurant.  We were greeted by a very pleasant gentleman and were seated promptly.  Our server was very focused and attentive.  On Tuesday and Wednesday they offer a fixed price menu and a bottle of wine for $35 pp. Our dinners were amazing. Everyone was so pleasant.  We are looking forward to a return visit. 
We have never been disappointed in anything we've tried at this restaurant.  Like may of the best restaurants, the appetizers are the best.  We've ordered the beets with goat cheese and pistachios more than once, and its a great dish.  This time we ordered the calamari, and I don't think I can describe how excellent it was.  The calamari was very tender, but the combination of flavors, especially the arugula, was just perfect.
My wife had the salmon, which was terrific.  I had the cod wrapped with prosciutto.  The prosciutto was the best ever, but cod really isn't the tastiest fish.
Crème brulle is the desert of choice.
Wines are very good, and service is just right.
Four of us went for dinner the other night, and again the food and service were fantastic. Two of us began the meal with a duck confit in a puff pastry which was so delicious, and not a bit heavy or greasy. Another in the party had the beet salad with gorgonzola (she always gets whatever beet appetizer they have), while the other had a house salad, For the main course there was a lamb shank over risotto which was great, a 72 hour braised short rib in a balsamic reduction, a bolognese rigatoni pasta and finally homemade raviolis stuff with pork in a red cream sauce. We shared two bottles of wine and of course kept asking and receiving more of the homemade bread. We ended the meal with a bread pudding made with croissants, bourbon and chocolate, which was so light and excellent. Can't say enough good things about the service and food quality at this restaurant. They have a fantastic Prix Fixe Menu on Tuesday and Wednesday that we have to try on our next outing. Bon Appetit!
This restaurant is tucked into a corner of  a small plaza. The food id excellent, the wait staff helpful. It's not the place for an average dinner- we went to celebrate our anniversary. Well worth the meal.
Best restaurant east of the River!!
 Debbie Lepri has created a unique gem.........upscale with a small town feel.

I have eaten at this dining establishment on numerous occasions and each time I have been delighted.  The service is very professional - attentive without being intrusive- and the food has always been excellent.  They use very fresh ingredients and the flavors come alive on the palate.
You can tell that Trattoria da Lepri has trained Chefs in the kitchen due to the quality of the menu items.  Fantastic flavor combinations and great creativity! The prices are reasonable considering the freshness and high end product they use in each dish. We frequent this place because they are constantly changing with the times and what is fresh in season.  The atmosphere is comfortable and elegant at the same time. The staff is knowledgeable and friendly, especially the gentleman at the door. The owner is constantly out on the floor checking to make sure everyone is enjoying the food.
Everything was pretty darn good. Communication could have been better...party of 5 20% tip tacked on have never seen that for a party of 5 usually party of 6 but in any event they tell that up front. I felt like they switched to zone offense when our server got busy and later I was told here's the 20% tip not cool. They even hand wrote in the 20%...If you add in the I called ahead for B Day candle they dropped that too this was not a good performance . Food was great, antipasto wood platter awesome. Was here a couple of weeks ago much better. Going to come back but I need to get past the disappointing service
We have eaten here many times and tonight's meal was a bit off.  The waitress was not attentive. We had to summon her three times for refills.  She never came back to ask about our meals.   The roasted beet salad seemed skimpy and our two entrees were kind of swimming in sauce.  Usually the meals are rich and flavorful but somehow our dishes were just ordinary.  The pan seared scallops and the cod fish special were overpowered by the sauce and both tasted the same.  We will be back as Lepri usually offers outstanding meals, so hopefully the kitchen and waitstaff will be back on track next time.
The food is made to order and really delicious.  I took my family there for dinner and they really loved the food.
Went there for the first time last night and will certainly be returning. Very courteous wait staff and our waitress, Lynn, could not have been any more helpful. We began with the beet salad with goat cheese and pistachios which was great. I had the carpaccio with onions and capers which was also perfect. My wife had the riggatoni bolognese with three meat sauce; cooked to perfection. I had the tagliatelle with braised beef in a dark sauce which made with home made pasta. They try to source locally for most of their ingredients which was apparent since all the ingredients were very fresh and tasty. The large blackboard explains how everything is prepared and a nice touch to the dining room.I highly reccomment this establishment.
We visited this restaurant on Saturday evening.  The atmosphere is very nice, with cloth tablecloths and napkins, but it's very reasonably priced.  We've tried many things from the large menu, and have never been disappointed... Tangerine chicken, Beef with Broccoli, and the Lai Chi Chicken off the Thai menu (my new favorite) are all great.  The service is top notch.  It's set back in a plaza behind another building, across from Agway in Ellington on Rte. 83.
First time visiting.  Restaurant is dark,  glasses appeared cloudy, only received one knife for three people.  However the food was excellent 

Delicious food. Very nice people. They are probably scaring people away with the tv on the wall though. Very nice clean place. They give you so much food for the money. Great place.
Haven't had Chinese food this good for a long time. Surprised to find it in Ellington. Everything was excellent, really top shelf. Definitely will go back! Worth giving a try, you have nothing to lose and everything to gain. It was a real surprise for us really excellent food.
This is the only chinese/Tai restaurant we go to. Our entire family is always happy and they often throw in a special gift.
I did not catch the ownership and name change until recently so my wife and I decided to try it out.  We were pleasantly surprised as we were warmly greeted and quickly seated early on a Friday evening. We were asked if we wanted tea and it and water was quickly brought to the table. The menu is extensive, filled with a variety of Asian cuisines.  We started off with Spring rolls, well filled with shrimp and vegetables.  They offer Sesame Noodles hot or cold and we enjoyed the cold version, that were properly cooked and seasoned.  For entrees we had the Sesame Chicken from the Chinese section and the Hot Pot from the Vietnamese.  Both contained ample meat and the Hot Pot had bamboo as one of the vegetables, something I had never had.  Its texture was similar to thick cabbage and had a pleasant taste.  We will definitely be back to try the many other dishes on the menu.  The Chinese restaurant we usually is in for some serious competition.
We've tried Szechuan One a few times and have never been satisfied. The meat dishes include too little meat, the noodles and wontons are under-cooked, and the service has never been friendly.

When you find a restaurant in a small, rural town trying to offer Chinese, Japanese, Thai, and Vietnamese, you should expect the food of each cuisine to not be very good, and so it is with Szechuan One. If you want Szechuan ood that's authentic and savory, then just drive a little further to Sichuan Pepper in Vernon.
This is the best Chinese food to get without having to go into a bigger city Chinatown. Like the other reviewers I was wowed by the General Tso's chicken. The hot and sour soup is excellent. Pork dumplings a little too doughy, but still tasty. I haven't tried anything from the thai menu, but my partner gets sushi here frequently and has given good reviews. Always fresh but nothing too fancy. We almost always get take out because the dine in area is... well. Bland. But the service is always attentive and polite. And they give you a warm wet hand towel to begin, which is very nice. We really don't go anywhere else for Chinese.
They really have a good selection of Asian food: Chinese, Thai, Japanese served with beautiful presentation. We were pleasantly surprised by very attentive and friendly service, white table cloth, and complimentary food (tea, snack, and surprise at the end). The prices were also good. Amazing to find such a great place in a small town.
We live in Ellington and go to PF Changs when we want Chinese food. We did not feel like driving to Farmington so we decided to take a chance (after reading reviews) on this establishment. I am glad we did!!

We told them about my son's food allergies (eggs and nuts) and they were able to accommodate us. We ordered the chicken and broccoli and both of my boys enjoyed the dish. The flavor of the General Tso was delicious. Plus, they used battered chicken breast... yes, chicken breast. The Pho was very flavorful as well. The  lo mien was bland. 

Our experience was very pleasant and we will add their number to our contacts. I am glad we took a chance and gave them a try.
We have been here several times and it never disappoints.It sits back from the main road a bit,but don't let that fool you.Drive in and try it.The food is worth it .Not your run of the mill chinese food.
Try the general tso chicken;very tender pieces of chicken with fresh veggies.
It's worth trying this place.
I will admit we mostly do take out but this is hands down our favorite pizza! WE have never been disappointed and in an area that has more pizza places then imaginable that says a lot. When we have dined in we are amazed at the variety of foods on the menu. We have tried several and they are all good! The bar area is a little sketchy, but the dining room is great !!
they usually either forget something, make it wrong, or they burn it or cook with bad oil. Live in area so have gotten delivery many times
Great food, great service. They have the best pizza. I ordered the newly introduced white breakfast pizza with scrambled eggs, bacon and ham. BEST PIZZA I EVER ATE, DEFINITELY TRY THIS PLACE.
We stopped in this dimly lit shopping strip on the way home from Boston and had a large cheese pizza. It was relatively inexpensive at just over $14. Service was pleasant and fairly quick.
Half the business seemed to be a sit down restaurant, other half had several pool tables and a bar. Area itself not the greatest- I kept an eye on my car- but I would return especially earlier in the day.
My first date with my match.com date was here. Awesome pizza! Love it. It is located on Main Street. Do not overlook this restaurant. It is very casual but the food is gourmet!
We stopped here for a bite while passing through. They seemed to be doing a brisk takeout business, a good sign. The waitress, though busy, was very friendly.  The food was good, hot and plentiful.  I like a nice comfy booth to sit in, which they have.  I also really need the floors, restrooms and tables to be clean and they were.  I also noticed that the waitress used hand sanitizer between handling money and handling plates.  THANK YOU.
Best Chinese food around. Generous portions & reasonable prices. The staff are friendly and the service is good.
If your looking for great Chinese food ,China taste is the place, has been open for along time ,same owners same great food ,hasn't changed after all these years,  dinner in or take out , you won't go wrong here
We ordered a Hunan chicken lunch with pork fried rice and wanton soup. Chicken was very tasteless, rice was dry and had to pay $1.00 extra for pork fried . Soup again no taste, the wantons for the most part were not whole but broken up. Curry chicken lunch again tasteless, not even a spark of curry taste. Portions were good size, but without any flavor, that did not matter.
We have been going to China Taste for several years and always have a good meal. LOVE their wonton soup and their lo mein. My kids love the teriyaki beef sticks. I've always done take out and orders are always ready on time and hot. Staff is very quick and efficient.
What's not to love about their food!  They have the best egg rolls and beef and broccoli - tender pieces of beef and fresh broccoli.  Our grandkids love their sweet and sour chicken - pieces of breaded chicken to dunk in a sweet duck sauce.   The pork fried rice is also very good.  Most of our orders are takeout but we have taken the time to eat there as well.  This restaurant is conveniently located at the intersection of Routes 31 and 30 in Vernon and just a couple of minutes off I-84 (currently Exit 67 (although the exit number will be changed in the next year or so.))
Been enjoying the food for years! Glad we found them, was giving up on chinese food all together til we found China Taste.
If you are seeking a fix of Chinese food this place will fill you up at a reasonable price. Staff is friendly and helpful. Menu has the standard Chinese dishes. We had lunch specials that were gigantic! Go for it!
Very good kung pao chicken.  Very tasty and not heavy.  The beef and broccoli was also very good with fresh broccoli and the beef was tender and not over cooked. 

Overall pretty good for a small neighborhood restaurant.
Oh they have the best! and there service is great. one of there meals you get shrimp And beef for under 9$. OH how can you go wrong with that!!
Our "local" chinese restaurant, appears that we have bypassed this this local gem! The name was changed a few months ago, so we forgot this restaurant! We happened to dine yesterday early evening, and the Wonton and Vegetable soups were delicious, on a cold day! For main course,
we had Shreaded Pork Mei Fun and Chicken Moo Goo Gai Pan, with Egg Rolls. It also have the feel of the working people's restaurant. The place have the ambience of pleasant, peaceful family and clean restaurant. The wait staff is very friendly and effecient, the prices are very reasonable. We enjoyed the skills of the Chef! Highly recomended!
We order take-out from China Taste at least once a month.  It's close enough to our house to walk to pick up our order and it's always ready on time, piping hot, and delicious!  The crab rangoon is amazing and the General Tso's chicken delicious with just the right amount of spice.
We've been ordering there for years & have never been disappointed - fast delivery service too! The restaurant has recently undergone extensive renovations & looks better than ever!
Filthy, obnoxious and rude just start me out, and I only went for an iced tea! The drive through line was very long, spewing fumes into the clear Cape Cod air so I went in to get a large tea for $1.00.  There were only a few people inside the shop, but the cashier was busy texting so I had to wait. When I got my cup and went to the DIY drink station, it was appallingly filthy. There are many other options in this area, folks. I told a server the drinks station is filthy, she said, "okay."
Convenient location to grab a bite of fast food and make a pit stop. It's McDonalds, right? There's a Tesla charging station nearby for all you Tesla owners who eat fast food :)
Not to impressed with this franchise.  Most McDonald's are prompt, but this one always seems to be very slow inside.  I have used the drive-up and it is much quicker.  Maybe their focus is the drive-up.
Just stopped for coffee. Good coffee, great price, good service, fast and the product was quality. Place was clean, and staff was friendly.
Been to this McDonald's many times and always the same results.The sevice here is extremely slow, whether it's thru the drive-thru or walk-in! The food is inconsistent as far as being hot or not. The dining room when I've been here at night is not so good. Dirty tables and some in disrepair  cosmetic repairs are needed.
Has to be the worst run McDonalds anywhere.  Trash all over the parking area, tables dirty, everything sticky and the floor disgusting including in the cooking area.  Takes your appetite away!  Always understaffed and slow.  Management please wake up!
Ran in for quick dinner and it was dirty. Floors in kitchen and restaurant area had trash on them.  Tables needed cleaned and drink area was dirty as well 
We got coffee at the Sagamore Dunkin daily while camping down the road at Scusset State Reservation. It was usually very busy, being right off the Sagamore rotary. Sometimes service was excellent and sometimes, particularly before 7AM, it was slow and crabby. The coffee, donuts and bagels were consistent with any other Dunkin. They kept the inside pretty clean considering the amount of traffic.
About average for the franchise, nothing special or unique.  What makes this location unfavorable is the location of the exit in proximity to a traffic light.  Getting out during certain times of the day and season can be frustrating.  Good in a pinch.
Dunkin' is a hometown favorite for visitors to Cape Cod so this one just off the rotary near the Sagamore Bridge is well-placed. Its familiar sign beckons those who have endured the drive on or off the Cape with a promise of very good coffee and great donuts. The expanded menu means a larger selection of breakfast, lunch and dinner combinations so even a big family will find something just right for everyone. But it is hard to pass up the donuts no matter what time of day. Sometimes the demand is too heavy so the staff finds itself trying to please too many customers. The management is good overall so patience is a virtue, particularly with long lines.
My very simple order was messed up. The girl closed the window on me while I was trying to clarify my order. Then the next person opened the window and when I said. ..Doesn't anyone listen in there?  She says "don't be talking to me. I didn't take your order!" And in a condescending tone she says: "you have a nice day." Not going to threaten to take my business elsewhere because that doesn't mean anything to a high volume business like that.  Instead I'll continue to go there and teach these people customer service and insist they get it right.
Prompt service, good variety, many choices added to the typical doughnut menu. Tried the new sandwiches, was pleasantly surprised by taste and quality.
It's Dunkin Donuts.  Consistent, comfortable, good coffee, good service INSIDE.  Drive thru can be slow and VERY crowded on the weekends.
Sagamore Bridgeを渡るとすぐあるので、いつもCape Codからの帰りに寄ります。
場所柄いつ行っても混んでいますが、トイレも利用できるので便利です。忙しい時間帯はドライブスルーだと注文通りの品が来ないことがあるので、わざわざ店内で注文し確認しています。
Stopped here for ice cream a couple of times while at Scusset Beach. It's the typical Friendly's; they had a cheap cone deal and their ice cream is always good. I loved a coffee Fribble and also a classic hot fudge sundae. Service at the take out window was pretty poor, though, from the younger staff. Twice we had all the kids walk by and say "Somebody will be right with you" and then go talk to each other in the kitchen, which is clearly visible from the take out window. The more mature ladies were the ones who would say "Have you been helped yet?" and when we said No, they'd take our order. I wouldn't go there in a hurry; getting a Fribble and a cone took 20 minutes. 
The last several years we've made it a point to stop at this particular Friendly's for breakfast on our way home from the Cape. On pretty much every previous visit, we have encountered incredibly slow service and waitstaff who for the most part could care less about their customers. This time unfortunately was no exception. While the restaurant was nearly deserted, I kid you not, it took exactly one hour from the time we were seated until I paid the bill and left. There is absolutely no excuse for any breakfast establishment, regardless of how busy, or in this case how slow, to have breakfast service take that long. The only saving grace was that they were running a 50% off promotion and even then I felt it didn't justify how terrible our experience was. Next year we will try a different breakfast spot as we are through with Friendly's.
Stopped in for s after dinner dessert with the grandson. Quick friendly service. Ice cream was great prices were a little high. Would return. 
As a adolescent and teen one of my favorite places to dine was the local Friendly's.  The "Original Big Beef Burger" with cheese and grilled bread was to die for.  Lately, the quality of their food is more like something that you'll die from.

They say that the definition of insanity is doing the same thing again and again and expecting a different result.  With that in mind, I will point out that I've given this restaurant several chances and each time they seem to disappoint me even more.

I went into the venue this past Thursday with the intention of having a quick late lunch.  This location is conveniently located off of Route 3 next to the Sagamore Bridge so one would expect this prime location to have good service and great food.  Not so much.

The restaurant was nearly empty when I arrived and while there were two waitresses fliting about the dining area, neither looked up and acknowledged that I was there.  A kitchen worker, hanging out behind the ice cream counter and apparently escaping from what sounding like a party in the kitchen did shout over a message that someone would be with me shortly.

Shortly is apparently a subjective term as, in this definition, it meant more than 10 minutes.  When a server finally did grace me with her attention, it was limited to whisking me to a table and then disappearing, never to be seen again.  Perhaps she was abducted by aliens.

I sat at the table with my menu neatly closed in front of me for another 10 minutes.  Servers would enter the serving area occasionally with no particular urgency and maybe drop something off at a table only to quickly disappear back into the kitchen area.  Clearly the good stuff was happening in the kitchen area.

When my frustration reached a climax, I went back to the hostess station and flagged down a server who, in retrospect, was likely clocking out.  I expressed my dissatisfaction in having been in the restaurant for 20 minutes and not having received so much as a glass of water, let alone my food.  To her credit, the server, MARIA, made it her responsibility to reseat me, take my order and check on my progress throughout the meal.  She said that she had actually gone off duty but seeing my predicament, wanted to make sure that I was taken care of.

Partway through the meal another person, whom I thought was a manager but advised me that she wasn't, came over to further apologize.  No manager showed their face.

I blame these issues on bad management from the top down.  While I'm not sure if Friendly's is still in bankruptcy it's clear that upper management has stopped caring and trying.  Standards have dropped and basic premises of how to handle guests have been forgotten.

Given what I saw in the serving area I can only imagine what the kitchen and their standards are like.  A walk by the salad prep area on my way to the men's room did not make me feel warm and fuzzy, though some of the lettuce might have been.

Friendly's should either shutter their restaurants or sell them to another chain, such as Perkins (also recently in bankruptcy) that does at least know how to run a restaurant.  It is sad to see how far their restaurants have fallen.

As a side note, when I left the restaurant I was motivated enough to try calling the corporate customer service line to relay my observations.  It was 3:45 in the afternoon when I called but I got a recording saying that they were out of the office until 3:45.  I got this message on multiple attempts to reach them until about 4:30 when I got a message that they were on another call but if I had a restaurant comment to call a different number.  When I called the "restaurant comment" line I got an automated answer that only let me punch numbers into the phone to give responses to questions that really didn't address my concerns.  Clearly corporate has given up and isn't even going through the motions of trying to run a welcoming family restaurant.

Avoid.
I called ahead to order three Fribbles. When I arrived I went into the shop to pay at the register and was told to go out and wait at the take out window's long line. The order had never been made which I was told after they took my money. The ice cream make station was slathered in filth as was the entire floor covered in slippery mess. The manager was right there and when I said it was a health and safety issue she said, "I know." 
I always thought of Friendly's as an ice cream place. To my surprise I had an excellent meal at the Sagamore Beach Friendly's. The service was great the food was even better and they now give a senior discount which I wasn't aware of that includes a free Sunday with your meal
Wife and I visit the Cape twice each year, and each time we start the trip home early on Friday morning to get over the bridge before the traffic starts.  So the Friendly's at Sagamore Bridge is a great place for us to sop for breakfast.

Generally, we are pleased with the quality of the food, the prices, and the service.

but out most recent visit was very disappointing.

We arrived shortly after the restaurant opened - there was one other customer in the store at when we got there.  

the first problem was getting a table.  The sign says 'wait to be seated' but since there was only one person working the dining room that morning, and she was in the kitchen, it was a long wait.

Eventually, we were seated, and the waitress asked if we wanted coffee.  YES!  She brought out two cups, and said that the coffee was still brewing and out be out shortly.  OK - it was early, and that can happen.

A few minutes later, she brought out the coffee and filled out cups.  When I started sipping my coffee, I noticed a couple of stains on the inside of the cup.  The more I sipped, the worse those stains got.  Eventually it became obvious htat the cup was filthy.  I asked the waitress to take away the half empty cup and bring a clean one - which she did.  But she didn't bring any more coffee to replace the cup full that she took away in the fouled cup.  

The food was fine, the waitress was friendly, but the experience was not good.
Who knew going to get ice cream would turn into a 2 hour fiasco. From the moment we walked in the door the staff didn't even bother to acknowledge us. Then when we FINALLY got seated our waitress told us " she'll be with us in a while" she wasn't lying. Who ever is managing this place needs to teach their staff proper customer service skills. You would think the place was full. There were only 2 tables in the whole restaurant. Our server kept making excuses as to why she can't serve us right away. Probably the WORST dining experience I have ever had in my whole life and all we simply wanted was ice cream. We will not be back
a very good place for family's to go for a meal or just ice cream. I like the burgers and fries with a chocolate shake .  I do go here also for just a sundae which is really a nice size and I ask for extra hot fudge. they have a nice varied menu and the kids will love it. good parking, good service,very clean.
We have been to this Friendlys several times after kids games. The food isn't bad for basic family fare, but the service is extremely slow and the place is filthy. There are splatter stains on many of the walls and the booth was sticky. 

The egg sandwiches are really good though. 
My wife and I have gone to this friendly's several times in hopes that the next experience will be better. We have been disappointed every time. We have dined in and have done walked in for ice cream. The counter for the walk-in is always in disarray, It is a complete mess ice cream and jimmies and all sorts of other droppings are every where. I feel sticky when I leave there. I can't figure out why cleaning the surfaces after preparing the ice cream is so difficult. The dining room is very slow and food is average.
One of our friend's said it best: "If you want to visit and don't mind waiting for your food, go to Friendly's." The service was glacially slow and the food was okay.
Well positioned just the other side of the Sagamore Bridege for the tourist crowd for breakfast after a hectic morning on Route 6 getting off the Cape or for lunch after being stuck in snarled traffic getting onto the Cape. Nothing special about this restaurant other than the Friendly tradition of good food, good service and great ice cream. The breakfast menu is expansive with options to meet everyone's taste. The lunch menu is at its best with burgers, sandwiches and fries. Save room for an extravaganza of ice cream specialities.
We stopped here for lunch on our way to the cape. The place was dead. Maybe 3 full tables, although almost all the empty tables were still in need of clearing. We waited for anybody to greet us for at least 20 minutes. We finally asked if we should seat ourselves. There were at least 5-6 employees I saw hanging around not doing much. After finally getting seated it took another 15 minutes to get a waiter, we finally ordered and when the food arrived we had no napkins or silverware for ten minutes or so. I was very disappointed in this Friendly's. Will never go back.
Got a big ole Jim Dandy ice cream sundae at the ice cream window. As good as ever, server was very nice.
We had traveled to the Cape very early and took us 3 1/2 hours to get there. We were all starved. So we went to this Friendly's for breakfast. It was pretty empty. But the waitress tried to seat the 8 of us at one booth. It took about 15 min to get a menu and coffee. The food took about 1/2 hour and was awful. No taste to the pancakes at all, eggs were runny even though ordered over hard. The one waitress was very slow and not very attentive. Waited 20 min for coffee refills. And by the time the waitress brought extra milk the coffee was cold.
I thought it was just a bad visit, but this Friendly's dining room  is consistently the slowest, least accurate service I've ever experienced.  Servers take forever to greet you, kitchen is slow, orders are consistently wrong.  Ice cream take out window is fine, but I wouldn't recommend actually sitting down here for a meal unless something significant changes.
Say what you want about friendlys but in my opinion they have the best damn burgers around. Great sundaes and shakes. I love this place.
I feared that stopping here we would be subjected to "typical" slow Friendly's service. We were pleasantly surprised. Our waitress understood we wanted to eat quickly and get back on road. Food was good, ice cream was amazing. Fries weren't that flavorful but nicely cooked. 
This place has decent food; nothing special.  Prices are fairly reasonable. But the service has always been slow.  Maybe the new owners intend to staff the places properly and stop treating the business as a cash cow.
The food was superb , friendly service , very clean , really fresh ! We love a quick treat and this hit the spot my son and I were on the way to hyannis ferry and didn't have much time and this was superb!!
A Friday night staple!  Their calzone is delicious and will feed several people.  The staff is very friendly and they remember their repeat customers, which I love.
New Management
Atlantic Beach Pizza used to be OK when it first opened up about 7 years ago and as time moved one the service and quality of the pizzas and sandwiches became less and less desirable. The cost was increasing as well.  I have to say that even the best pizza shop has a bad day or two. This place appears to have more than its share of bad food. Freshness is not one of the establishment’s good qualities. Go elsewhere in Buzzards Bay.

We make it point to stop here when traveling off the cape or back onto the cape. The shop sits opposite of Dunkin Donuts/Commuter lot in Sagamore.

The pizza is outstanding -- crust/sauce and ingredients are homemade daily; crust is crisp and airy, sauce is authentic and sweet, and the pie is not greasy at all.

Do yourself a favor and stop in here - order two large pizza's (one for the moment and one to take home and reheat).

As a side note - the subs are also very good, and if you get take out --- drive down to scusset beach and eat by the water.

A++
When we moved to the area 10 years ago the thing we missed most was a really good pizza.  Well, our quest was over once Mr G's moved in and we have t looked back. Their pizza is the perfect blend of cheese, sauce and crust.  Our grandson insists on it when he comes to visit. If on the area, give it a try - you won't be sorry!
Bought a few grinders for lunch on the way to Scusset. The veggies, turkey and Italian meats were fresh and pretty generous, and the hot Italian peppers jazzed them up nicely. Not a big fan of the grinder rolls, which were huge but not very tasty; just like enormous hunks of Wonderbread. But service was fast and the price wasn't bad.
Being new to the area it was nice to find. Not going to call is a sub shop or a pizza shop (though both are delicious). The veal parm dinner is really good. Ever time my brothers  come down for a visit they want to stop for a meatball sub. Sauce is homemade by the owner who takes a lot of pride in food. 
We ordered two pizzas. One mozzarella and one chicken BBQ. The mozzarella was not good. It was dry and tasteless. The BBQ chicken was better, but not great. I'd avoid this place. 
Courteous, efficient and tasty - crust on the pizzas are crisp- sides are really tasty with plenty of options for the entire family.

Tasty sauce and cheese. Plenty of toppings one SLICE had six pepperonis!They use fresh mushrooms too! Crust is thin and pizza is not greasy. Fast service at 6:15 pm.
Always a good quick meal when I'm too lazy to cook.  Steak tip and grilled chicken salad always delish.  Owner and son very nice people.
Nothing home made as described in their menu. Overpriced, undercooked and tastes like cardboard.
We ordered a meatball sandwich with extra sauce. Got frozen dried up meatballs on a stale roll with little sauce.
This is just a little pizza and sub shop, great for carry-out.  The pizza is excellent and so are the subs! Highly recommend!
My family likes this place, but I don't care for it that much. The Pizza sauce is not that great. I don't think the the oil is changed  or their overcooking the food in the fryolator, not sure which one.
Very good pizza for New England..  Comparable to New Jersey pizza. 
Crust was good not too thick, sauce was tasty, and cooked perfectly. 
Service was fast and friendly. 

We are new to this neighborhood and really love this place. It's the only pizza place in Sagamore, but it gets 5 stars from my family! The pizza was delicious. Their Italian subs are wonderful. And they deliver too. We lucked out!
I have enjoyed Mr. G's in the past. It's not great pizza, but for the area, a good solid choice until this week. I ordered a cheese pizza to go. when I got home and opened the box I found an old shoe-leather pizza that should have been thown out hours ago. You know the kind that get's left over in the box until the next day... They hadn't even done a decent job of reheating it. It was nearly cold! I don't think I'll run the risk of repeating this incident again. Beware. Open your boxes before you leave.
Good pizza and quick service. Then it was good taste and quality. The workers were kind and patient with us as newbys. I think you would like it. 
I can't comment on the pizza, but the subs were great.  The place was packed on a Sunday.  Lot's of folks had the same idea we did to grab subs on the run.  I was unfamiliar with the "bomb" concept.  The chicken and steak bombs meant the addition of great grilled onions and peppers.  Hot, juicy and tasty.  I will certainly try them again if ever in Sagamore.
I'm a native New Englander, but after living in the NYC area for 25 years, I've always been underwhelmed by local pizza after moving back here 8 years ago. Until this place within walking distance of our home opened under its present name a year or so ago. As Atlantic Beach pizza, it was average for the area, and better than most of the Greek style places like Nick's and Buzzards Bay House of Pizza. But now, as Mr. G's, it produces pies that may not be quite NY standards, but are pretty darn good. Try their vegetable pizza with fresh peppers, onions, and garlic (roasted garlic, not garlic powder or granulated garlic).
We are, plain and simple, pizza freaks. And this is the real deal in the Boston/NY pizza tradition. Great crust that is soft, crispy and has a little chewiness. Fresh mushrooms and ground linguica...it is near Fall River after all...good cheese and sauce. This is a great pie...thanks!
We eat here a couple of times a month. Food is always delicious and consistent. Steak & cheese calzone is incredible. Best pasta sauce I've ever had in a restaurant. Don't pass up this great little place.
Fresh dough. I love it!  This unassuming pizza parlor delivers a solid product. It's a joy to find real food. 
We had three different pizzas including the Manager's Special and a white pizza. All made with fresh ingredients delivered quick and hot. You could smell the fresh basil on the white pizza. I've had a lot of pizza in my time and this may have been the best ever. 
I've been there four times now and must say that the egg rolls are the best ever; hardy and only $5.50 for 2 egg rolls and a soda. Great deal.
I have had take out from this on several occasions, have never been disappointed! Located in a small strip mall in sight of McDonald's and Dunkin Doughnuts.
We order take-out from Chen's about 5-8 times a year.  Though we have other favorite places to order from, they aren't nearly as convenient to our location. The food is good and the service is prompt. From time to time our order is incorrect, but they are always willing to fix the situation.  We all have our favorites and can count on them being consistent.
Another hidden gem. We usually get Thai food when we do Asian food as it is usually fresh and made to order. Well Chen's was a great surprise. Food is fresh, hot, and perfect. Without question as good as I have ever had.
I buy food from here almost every week! I especially love their spicy chicken wings...out of this world I tell ya :) Unlike many other Chinese takeouts, their food aren't that greasy or salty. The staff are all very friendly and helpful. It's a convenient place to stopover for food on your way to or back from scusset beach. I have been eating here since the time I moved to Sagamore Beach, which was in July 2012.
Chen's Kitchen is located in a strip Mall near Sagamore Bridge. I had driven past it many times until a local told me that it was worth a try....and it was the best chinese food that I have had ever.
The small restaurant can accomodate a few parties but usually patrons go for the take out. The kitchen is in full view of the counter where you order and I will tell you that I would eat off the floor in this place. The staff are friendly and efficient. I told her that it was my first time there and she said "you will love it, we are the best" and right she was. They add no MSG and everything is fresh looking and tasting.
We got egg rolls, fried chicken wings, mushi pork and shrimp low mein. EVERYTHING was freshly prepared and unbelieveable...no need to cover up the taste with duck sauce and hot mustard....the order came to under $30 and for the 2 of us lasted several meals.
Whether you are traveling to the Cape and want to pick up dinner on the way,  visiting the Canal or feel like going out for a drive this place is a winner!
I have been back many times since October and have never been disappointed.
When we are touring and travelling we like to do a quick lunch. We were near here at lunch time and decided to stop. Great choice. We both had BLT's and fries. excellent and filling. Nothing fancy but a great place to eat.
Best burgers and pizza. All the food is good actually because they have a great cook. Friendly folks. Great prices. A local fave.
If you're looking for authentic seafood on your way to Cape Cod, then we have a treat for you ... But be prepared to step into a time warp.  Canal Cafe is no more than 400 square feet of a gritty seaside bar with a few tables, that is straight out of the 1960s.  Mostly locals inhabit the bar stools as well as the high tops.  Don't be put off by the 35 minute wait for your meal or the occasional vulgarity from the locals.  Instead focus on some of the freshest, most amazing seafood on the entire Cape.  My boyfriend had the paella:  the little neck clams were decent, but the scallops were broiled to perfection.  They truly tasted like they were just caught in the back of the restaurant and brought in.  They were exquisite.  The oversized shrimp were just as tasty, and the whole meal was surrounded in a rice and pepper contraption that made it an incredibly hearty meal.  I had the Captain's club:  fried cod, bacon and cheese, with lettuce and tomato.  The cod was fantastic - fresh and lightly breaded.  The bacon was cooked perfectly (crispy).  In my opinion the cheese didn't add much and in fact detracted from the cod.  But other than that, the sandwich was delicious.  The fries that came with the meal were uneventful.  At a price of $36 (tip included), it was well worth the trip!
Local hole in the wall, let Whitney and the Canal Cafe start or end your trip to Cape Cod.  The fried fish sandwich was Gastro-Delish...don't ask for the Crazy Ivan but the Cape Cod Ivan!  Fried cod, rye bread, coleslaw and russian dressing for $9 bucks! Don't let the size or outside decor scare you...its old school Cape Cod, great meal and atmosphere...get out traffic and Enjoy!
Always a warm friendly group here , year round. Great Motorcycle Stop! Small and comfortable , very old fashioned but in great shape, clean and very good service even when it is busy!
Great selection of food , always made fresh and served promptly. 
Lots of history to this cafe, Predominately a local group but visitors always welcomed!
Parking is at premium , but across the side street is plenty.
If you drive by this small red building you will be missing some of the best food in town! The bar is small, the parking is limited but once through the door you will find one of most friendly bunch of local and vacation folks you could ever find. BUT that's not what you came in for, it's the food and drink. The food, is always fresh, cooked to perfection, and served in quantities that almost always require a doggie bag! The drinks, well you just have to see for yourself. 
We were looking for someplace to grab a drink and a late dinner. We were not disappointed! We (Midwesterners) had no idea what linguica stuffed Quahogs were. Now we know! (a clam stuffed with spicy Portuguese sausage). They were delicious, as was the pizza. If you're in the area, stop by for cold drinks, great food and a little local flavor.
Local "watering hole" in the neighborhood. Small but with adequate seating. very inviting to locals and tourists alike. the food is very good, fresh and a lot times local as well. I would suggest both eating in and takeout. I must say that this is not family friendly due to size of the restaurant. very quaint and cozy but my living room is larger......
What a great place to visit for a couple of drinks and great meals by Grazzy the cook ! Great bartenders and a funny clientele .
              
I've lived on the Cape for 30 years. I've never been to the Canal Cafe until today. This is by far the best fish n chips I've ever had anywhere. When the waitress bought the plate to my table I was shocked. 3 huge pieces of fish, enough for 2 people maybe 3, piled on top of a mound of really good fries, and a side of homemade cole slaw. The fish was fresh, cooked perfectly, nice and flaky. Great batter, crisp and light. At only 12.95 it's a steal. It's a dive bar for sure, not the best place to bring the kids but the people were friendly enough. You may hear a few F bombs flying from time to time so if your offended by dive bars don't go here. If you want the best fish n chips on Cape Cod, this is your spot. It didn't hurt that my bottle of Miller Lite was teeth rattling cold either. Cold beer and great fish n chips make for a good day. I'm just mad I didn't try this place sooner. I'll be back! I gave the atmosphere 5 stars because I like dives.
very small old time Cape Cod Bar the new owners kept it mostly like it was in the 1969 with modern touches great place to relax with a cold beer and a good sandwich
I'd like to give this place a bad review so the tourists stay away, but it would not be fair! The chef is Brazilian and has a very decent menu. The cafe is small (about 8 tables and a bar that seats 8(?)) but when we were there, several families came in after "sports Saturday" games were finished, and there were several regulars at the bar who made us feel welcom on our first vist. We were impressed with the menu, but we all ordered fish-and-chips since we had seen a terrific review In a local paper. The food was fantastic...only two beers on tap and a very small cafe, but worth a visit. We'll definitely go back for another try!
This is a very small and easily missed bar. I think this is on purpose. The locals know this is the go to place for incredible cooked to order food. You can sit at the tables and watch traffic build up at the Sagamore Bridge every Sunday as the tourists all go home. This is the place to meet friends after a day on the boat or the beach. This is also the place to go when you are looking for the freshest seafood around. Service is friendly and prompt. Don't forget to grab a Last Beer on Cape Cod t shirt on your way out!
if you anywhere near Bourne this summer you got to stop at Barlow's Clam Shack  just remember there only open on weekends during the summer months .. great food for the whole family not just seafood .. but I got a plank which is a medium size platter of Clams and French Fries .. theres the Clam roll and a full platter omg I was so full good proportions for the Plank .. the clams melted in my mouth and the wait wasnt bad either for the order .. its the Place to go ... Loved it
Stopped here on the way home. Been driving by for 30 yrs. I ordered the lobster roll and it was reasonable and delicious.  My wife had the oysters which were some of the best if eaten, she even had to take some home it was such a good portion. The waitress was the owners mother and was excellent. 
The only drawback is trying to get out of the parking lot. I highly recommend it. 
First visit this season and the food was excellent as always. Tried the fried oysters and they were scrumptious. Nice that you have a choice of fries or onion rings. Batter is light and golden...not oily. Also have the choice on several items for a smaller portion, which is nice. All my friends loved their meals...clams and clam strips, respectively. The staff is so friendly and their food hygiene practices are great. Well worth a visit.
We stopped here for lunch after visiting the canal visitor's center.  You have the option of eating in or outside.  We ordered our food from the counter and went outside. Most of the menu consisted of friend seafood, although they did have burgers.  I had the friend shrimp platter (the small one which was more than I could eat) and my husband had the fish and chips.  The french fries (or chips) were string potatoes and nothing fancy.  The fried seafood was light and the batter wasn't heavy at all.  My husband said the fish was light and fluffy and very good.  My shrimp were the same.  For the two meals with drinks we paid around $30 with tip.  It is definitely a heavier meal and one that I don't think we could do all the time, but nice for the fact we were on the Cape.  They also sell ice cream which seemed to be a big hit that day.
Barlow's isn't a pretty good place to stop for a quick bite either leaving the cape or going on the cape. Their lobster rolls are pretty good. You can sit inside or outside. They have ice cream too.  
our second visit and so glad we stopped.  facilities are quaint, clean, and enjoyable.  Service was gracious.   Lobster roll is best  in the area, highly encourage one to stop
Overlooking the canal. Convenient location. Perfect place to stop on the way home from the beach.  I had the Fried Oysters and they were AWESOME! I recommend it. My friend had the fried clams which were also yummy. Good portions too.
The best seafood ever! We got the fidh and chips,the fish sandwich and the scallop plate. Enough food to take home enough fish for 2 meals. So fresh. The restaurant is a family owned place and was very comfortable. Everything we go to the cape we will be stopping there.
I have grown up passing this place for many, many years, and never once stopped in. This time we did, and what a treat! A family run business for many years, they serve up the freshest seafood in the area! I had the Fried Clam strip plate which was served on a bed of shoestring french fries (not a personal favorite) the strips were fresh, not chewy and tasted like the sea! My daughter had Fish and Shrimp. Generous portions and reasonably priced it was such a treat! They also have a small gift shop on site, and an antique section of fun items from days gone by. Stop in on your way over the Sagamore Bridge, you will be glad you did!!!
Excellent menu selection and great walk up window service too! Clam Fitters are the best this side of the Canal, large portions and fresh, lightly battered seafood is great!...Outside seating is ideal but plenty of room and quiet ambiance inside too!
Tasted like the oil may have needed to be changed. Not the cleanest place but will maybe try again to see if it was just an off day
Great place to satisfy your urge for whole fried clams, and other great seafood. This restaurant is right across from the Cape Cod Canal. They have a menu with great appetizers. We had the homemade hand cut onion rings. Which are so sweet and lightly battered. Also had the whole belly clam roll which is market priced but worth every penny. Also the service is very friendly and helpful. We will be back again
We stopped here for lunch on our way home from the cape. I had the Clam Fritters and Clam chowder, the chowder was good but the fritters were the best that I've had anywhere. This will definitely be our new place to eat on our way to or from the Cape. The prices were very inexpensive for a seafood restaurant.

Loved the clam roll.   Thought the price was high but when I got the sandwich.   It was like a dinner plate on top of the roll.   Plus the menu said it came with chips but they gave me French fries for no extra charge.    Would definitely stop here again.   Quick and fresh.     
Delicious clams and the lobster rolls are loaded with meat. Great if you like your lobster roll with out mayo or you can add your own. Clam chowder was tasty too. We will be back next time we are close to Buzzard's Bay!!
I went here recently to reward myself for working hard to stay healthy, and eat healthy. But you have to spoil yourself once in awhile. I got the fried clam plate which was really good and huge. The friends were not greasy or soggy like a lot of seafood places can be. And I love their coleslaw, it is always very fresh and taste very good. We usually hit this place a couple of times during the summer, the view is great on nice days.. Downfall no inside seating if weather is not nice. But worth putting on a sweater if needed and eat some very good seafood.
We try to stop here on our way home from the Cape for lunch.  We always get the lobster roll with fries.  Roll comes filled with lobster meat and nothing else.  They give you a packet of mayo so you can use it if you want.
In door or outdoor dining.
Have been by here a thousand times but never stopped in. We went to the beach early in the morning and left about 1:30 that afternoon. The place was busy but we got a parking spot right away. Glad we stopped here. Nice people, quick service & good food. My wife & daughter got the lobster roll. Was suprised to see it had no mayo on it but they did give packets on the side so you could mix it in if you wanted to. Have had bigger & smaller lobster rolls in my travels. My wife & daughter were happy. My son had a cheeseburger, my daughters boyfriend had the fish & chips and both were happy. I had the fried oyster plate. It was fresh, cooked to perfection and very good. The portions could be bigger, but overall it was a good experience.  If they gave bigger portions, this place would be packed with customers all the time.
Seems this is the first review in 2014 - the centennial for the Cape Cod Canal! Located right on the canal, it is quite appropriate to stop here for a truly fine respite when enjoying the celebration. The pleasant  atmosphere as well as the tasty and generous food is a delight for visitors from all over who want to have a ' Cape Experience'. You will not be disappointed.
Great Fried clams.  Barlows has fresh product and you can tell they cook the fries in a different vat of oil, because they don't have a fishy taste.  Friendly people, and quick service.
Love this place, especially the one in Cedarville. The variety of beers and mixtures of them is great, and the Mead, refreshing, not too sweet. The parmesan garlic wings are my favorite! They have great burgers (so I'm told, I don't eat beef) I've had the veggie burger and the pulled pork, both amazing! I've always been too full for dessert.

Friendly staff, good service and great food. I go every couple of months. 
Good food, terrible service.   The fish and chips are plentiful and delicious.   The fish was flakey and enough for two to share.  The hamburger with bacon was very good, cooked correctly.  The place is small so it can be fun, depending on the crowd.  The bartender needs to get a personality.  He is too dry.  He doesn't even crack a smile.  Probably won't go back because we didn't feel comfortable.  It was hard to engage in a conversation with him.  There are a lot better places to spend your money.
Nice relaxed spot on the Upper Cape. Opens at 4 Pm and people are waiting for the doors to open. Reasonably priced. Drinks are good, great beer selection. I've been to Dublin and Flynn's has a legitimate Irish vibe.
We go Tuesdays to enjoy the two for 12$ hamburger specials. Only place on the Cape I'll eat a burger. Big fat and juicy!
Fun and pleasant wait staff.
More beer options than you can ever imagine. Many good huge sandwiches. Good quality food at reasonable prices. Can sometimes be so packed you can't get in
Huge selection of craft beers. Best burgers you'll ever have. Love the Bobby Mac on the pretzel roll. Tried both Sagamore and Plymouth locations and love them both. 
The food here is GREAT! Everything that we ordered was delicious, hot and promptly served.  There are so many appetizing options, it was difficult to decide. The fact that Flynn's Fingers (chicken tenders) are marinated for 12 hours before breaded and fried helped us chose them.  A small serving is 5 4-5 inch tenders, deep fried to a perfect crispness. The child's "Chicken" Quesadilla was seriously lacking in chicken, but as a Cheese Quesadilla, was buttery, crisp goodness.  The fries are battered, full of flavor and nicely crispy. The highlight of the meal however was the Boyne Burger. If you have read any of my other reviews, you know my family LOVES bacon and this burger was bacon heaven. The menu specifically says "If you love bacon, really, love bacon, then this is for you!". This is a beef patty topped with a 4 oz. bacon patty (bacon fried into a crisp patty), bacon jam and bacon aioli on a pretzel bun. The bacon jam and aioli are both interesting and delicious and what can I say about a bacon patty? This is one fabulous burger! The Black and Tan Onion Rings are perfection. The taste of stout is prominent, adding a depth of flavor and a subtle sweetness. They are fried crisp and the onions are tender.  If you are looking for excellent pub food, head over to Flynn's for a great meal.  They also have an extensive drink and beer menu (42 taps) and support local brewers.
Shepherds pie is very good.   One of the few places on cape to get into some very good beers on draft.   Burgers are good too...   Fun spot.  
Awesome place for a burger or sandwich and a beer.  Very generous portions and plenty of beer choices.
hubby ate healthy with a wrap...I got a burger...great beer menu...perfect relaxing dinner...even though there was a line party of 2 got right in....waitress was attentive and asked before seating a big party next to us
If you cannot find beer or food you like here, you will not find it anywhere! Loved quiet quaint atmosphere for lunch, but I understand it is quite busy later in the day especially on weekends.
We have been to Flynn's a few times and every time the food was phenomenal!  This past time, it was on the Sunday of the July 4th weekend and we had the place to ourselves, it was awesome!  Despite the quietness (which is unusual for this place), we had awesome choices for the menu and many specials.  I had the prime rib pub sandwich and it was TO DIE for!  It came with au jus and horseradish sauce and it was amazing.  The onion rings are also incredible - the food at Flynn's is awesome, I highly recommend going there!  Oh, and they have really cool t-shirts for sale as well. . .   A total 5 star restaurant. . .
Wow! The burgers were amazing with the pretzel buns. Fries were great too. And a ton of beers on tap. They even had live music when we were there. Smaller place but good for any group of people. 
Good burgers and fries.  It's a small establishment so you may have to wait for a table but it's worth the wait.  Nice bar.
We've only been to Flynn's a couple of times, both for their excellent hamburgers, served on big pretzel buns. Very good burgers and a nice selection of draft beer here. Very limited seating so get there early or expect to wait. Live music some nights.
Don't let the "commercial" exterior stop you from entering this great little pub. Clearly the locals love this place but the bartenders and wait staff help everyone feel welcome.
MANY beers on tap, fresh and served at the appropriate temperature. The menu largely features typical bar fare, however, Flynn's puts their own special flare, taste into almost every item. Spicy fried pickles, specialty burgers, grilled cheese sandwiches, lots of options.
Happily, my third visit is scheduled for two days from this writing. Simply, a good time with good beer and friendly people.
Better than any other pub trying to claim to be an Irish pub.  Great wait/bar staff.  Burgers are out of this world.  Reuben Spring Rolls are the best appetizer or meal.  Beer club and flights are top notch.
Great little pub ,with great food and drink.
If your are heading to the Cape you have to stop in for a pint and great burgers
I had been to Flynn's before, but my sister had not. We went on a Friday at 1:30, which was perfect--avoided the crowd & the noise--and allowed us a long visit. We indulged & shared the Reuben Spring Rolls--hand-rolled daily and stuffed with corned beef, sauerkraut & Swiss cheese. Served w/Russian dressing (10.49).  My sister had the Shepherd's Pie, with a mix of peas, corn, lean ground beef with gravy, & topped with  a thick layer of creamy mashed potatoes (12.49). I wish I had not chosen the Panko herb covered beer-battered fish & chips! The fish was over-cooked and too dry. I will go back & choose Corned beef & Cabbage!
Traveling alone and passing through town and saw this little place on Tripadvisor.  It didn't look like much from the outside but the reviews seemed decent.  Sat at the bar and had one of the best burgers I've ever eaten.  The young lady working behind the bar was polite and attentive as well.  There were at least 40-50 beers on tap too.  This place really met my needs for a quick, excellently prepared and great tasting meal.  Great job!
Nice Irish pub but small with limited seating. Must get there early. Pub food was good and the price was average. Service was ok. Popular drinking spot for the locals. The spacing between tables is tight. Overall a good experience.
I stop for the fried clams every time I pass through the area. That is about fifty times. They are the best I have eaten in the area, including Cooke's and Baxter's in Hyannis. I haven't been to Ipswich for a long time, so I can't make that comparison. 
We've driven by this place 100 times and never stopped, maybe due to the traffic.  This past weekend we decided to give it a try.  Our first impression was that the grounds were extremely clean and neat.  Given this finding, we expected the food to be good and it was.  We ordered fried clams with bellies and some clam chowder.  Both were prepared well and tasty.  Next time I'd like to try a lobster roll.  This is a good place to stop to and from the Cape for a quick seafood meal.
Love this place!!  Scenic view of Cape Cod Canal, plus incredible fried seafood.  Crispy and seasoned perfectly.  We love the clam strips, fish n chips, onion rings, chowder THE BEST COLESLAW...and this was the first year I had the lobster roll...it was amazing!! Very fresh!!  Ask for the lobster roll without may and they'll give you some drawn butter on the side. We live about an hour away, and we will make special trips just for the food....it's that good.
Stopped on way home and had Cicken Salad on roll that could have fed three and so fresh.another had strip dinner and finally a plate that wasn't all fries. Also delicious. And the onion rings were home made thin crispy ones that were great. I'd go here again in a minute.  Try it out.
Stopped here on the way home.  This place is a "go to" treat for us.  Nothing fancy, just good food and very handy to those coming off the Cape and headed to Providence or beyond.  Lots of lobster.  Fries.  Yeah, they charge for it, but it's pure comfort.  
We stopped here on our way over to Cape Cod for the weekend and were quite hungry and ready for some great seafood - we were not disappointed! My fiancee had fish and chips while my mom and I split a fish sandwich and shrimp plate. Everything was so delicious and were fried to perfection. The sides (coleslaw and fries) were also delicious. We loved that it was right next to the Canal so we could watch all the boats. Awesome find! Definitely will stop again in the future.
My friends and I stopped by on the way back from bike riding to eat. The Fried Shrimp Plate with fries was really good. The shrimps was crispy yet still moist. Fried Clam Roll (Bellies) and the Fried Chicken Finger Plate was another good dish.  The Fried Scallop Plate was disappointed. The scallops wasn't crispy.  While the food were good, it was pricey.
Usually don't stop at roadside stands but Seafood Shanty was highly recommended so we gave it a try and continue to eat there and thoroughly enjoy all we've ordered.
Best and most generous portion of lobster in a roll we've ever eaten.
Footlong hotdog is wonderful as are the fries and onion rings.
A most stop to make heading to or from the Cape.
This is my go to lobster roll. Delicious always and lots of lobster. Very safe bet for lobster roll. Cash only but there is an atm:)
I have been stopping by this location for a long time. It's right along the Cape Cod Canal with a great view. The food has always been pretty good. But on a recent stop I found the prices sky high and the quality and quantity slightly disappointing. Sadly not as good as last years visit.
The place is very clean and well maintained. Lots of picnic tables to use. Some with umbrellas. Some not. The line and diners move along well. I have to agree with another reviewer that I'll try another place when I next want fried seafood.
We were coming off Cape heading home and it was convienient and on the right side of the road. Prices very high even for the cape fried clams 24.00 a fish sandwich 9.50 at a take out window. The chowder and onion rings were good. It was ok because we were hungry and there it was. There are so many places to choose from on Cape Cod we will try somewhere new next time.
....and I've lots of good ones.  Tons of fresh lobster meat.  Can't wait until this summer when we spend our week in  Plymouth this July and go back for one, two, or even three.  Not fancy, cash only.  But fantastic find!
I went here recently to reward myself for working hard to stay healthy, and eat healthy. But you have to spoil yourself once in awhile. I got the fried clam plate which was really good and huge. The fries were not greasy or soggy like a lot of seafood places can be. And I love their coleslaw, it is always very fresh and taste very good. The wife and I usually hit this place a couple of times during the summer, the view is great on nice days. Can sit at tables and see boats going thru Cape Cod Canal. Downfall no inside seating if weather is not nice. But worth putting on a sweater if needed and eat some very good seafood. The portions are more than adequate. I accidently reviewed Barlows down the road, for this place. Go here instead the food and view is much better.

Visited May 2015
We are fortunate enough to be able to go to tai once a week. We call it fried food Friday ! Best fried fish sandwich you have ever eaten, crisp and moist, clam strips are excellent, and the hand cut fries.... Don't forget the onion rings. We sit outside and watch the traffic in the canal, just a great evening. A true piece of Cape Cod, even if it is on the wrong side of the canal
Scallops are the best in Cape Cod !!  I've done 2 trips to Cape Code for the last few years, and every time I try find good scallops in Cape Cod. I have tried many different restaurants, but still this one is the best. Funny that it is located outside Cape Code  : )))   However, it is exactly on the way to and on the way from Cape Cod, so it is pretty much convenient. Also, their potato fries are very good too. The price is as same as everywhere in Cape Code - almost $20 per dish (as far as I remember, the dish has 12 scallops).
Best clam strips I have ever had. We stopped in after a long day on the water and found wonderful food and ice cream treats! Wish I could stop in again for the clams and cole slaw! 
Nice clam and lobster roll shack. Outside seating and a park across the street. The lobster roll was delicious- mostly lobster! Price was high but food was worth it. Cash only! We would go again!
Living in Arizona you don't get clams with bellies. Back in MA for two month visit and having clams everywhere.  Yesterday, I had the best fried clams with bellies ever. They were even better than Maine's!
Went here on a Tuesday evening after reading favorable reviews. I was in the mood for fried clams and not their much raved about lobster roll. I will start with the good. The chowder was different but in a good way. Plenty of clams and potatoes in a nice light broth. It was the highlight of the meal. Next up were whole belly clams. Portion was good and the clams were not the biggest I've had but not the smallest either. I struggled with every bite to find a clam that tasted like a clam, or anything else for that matter. Just bland washed out nothing, clean but flavorless. The other issue was the slaw. Someone went real heavy on the sugar part of the recipe, it was like eating candy. All in all not a great value and I don't think i would stop here again
I was told by my daughter this was a wonderful place to get really good seafood fast. Didn`t mind the fast part, just wanted some good seafood. We walked up to the cookhouse & ordered Lobster Roll with french fries, onion rings, shrimp & of course their Chowder. We were not disappointed. The lobster roll was to die for & the onion rings were some of the best we had ever had. Three of us ate on the lobster roll, devoured the shrimp pretty fast, & wolfed down the onion rings. They were very close to closing time when we got there, so we were lucky to have caught them open. If you want some good, fast & fresh food, give them a try!
The Whale is a must go to bar here on the Cape, every type of person come into this place. The best place to get seafood and drinks at reasonable price. Stu runs the bar, knows everyone coming in and if he doesn’t know you will make you feel welcome. Everyone is welcome and I mean everyone, Black, White, old, young, straight, gay, leaning to the left or right (no politics please). Let me be clear this place is mostly locals, it’s a dive/joint, everyone that comes into this place respects everyone else that in there, no fights or you can be banned and the winters are long down here so think twice before you throw the first punch, it will be your last in the Whale.
I love this bar. Cheap drinks, nothing but locals, and a great fried seafood menu. Its decorated -and maybe even held together - with right-leaning bumper stickers, so no political chatter, just game watching. There's a slight feeling of danger in the air, and I have to say, I sort of like that. 
A whole in the wall local place.  But fun down home spot on your way home from dinner.  They make a mean white russian!
Some of the freshest and best fried clams I have ever had! And at the most reasonable price you can get! This is a local hangout, so if you're looking for snooty mainland rich people with attitude please go somewhere else .... there are far more places that cater to that crowd! Now leave me alone I'm bringing my son there for dinner tonight!
this is the place in Sagamore for fried seafood!! the locals have known this secret for some time now. the atmosphere is small and has the feeling of being in someone's living room but remember that this is a small local gathering spot and not meant for tourists yet at the same time very welcoming. I would also suggest take out.
Its a lot more fun when the locals are there and they start an argument . Everyone  joins in to give their two cents. No fights but lots of fun.
Excellent fried clams. Great value. Suggest take out. Atmosphere not at all fancy. Fish and chips fantastic at only $8.00! Friday night a must. Not sure if food is available during week.
This restaurant was just right!!!! We were looking for clam chowder, Pepsi and dessert. Service was great and with a smile. Thanks making our evening!
Fried belly clam roll - yummy. Light batter, not greasy at all. Good service, everything made fresh. 
Went on a long golf weekend and some of the crew suggested the Sagamore Inn (having been there before). It's a trip back in time as the place is dated but the food was great, the drinks were well poured, the service was excellent. Will go back!
Had driven by Sagamore Inn many times but never stopped.  This time decided to give it a try and I'm so happy we did.  Casual atmosphere with wood tables and booths, perfect for our party of 5.  

The menu has a lot of options and in my opinion, for a really good price.  Started with the basket of bread, sliced Italian with butter.  Really good bread.  Great for dipping in sauce if you select an Italian entrée.

Our group went with a couple of tuna rolls, tuna club, chicken parm, and eggplant parm.  The meat sauce was a hit and the eggplant favored over the chicken (though the chicken was good, just eggplant edged it out).  I had the tuna roll and found it to be the best tuna I've had in a long time.  And this wasn't a tiny roll either, it was a tall hotdog type roll, toasted perfectly with a generous serving of tuna.  I had the coleslaw which I really liked but sampled the fries and those were really good too.

Service was good and our server so nice. I was just pleasantly surprised by our whole experience.

My only disappointment is I don't live close enough to go more often.
We tried the Sagamore Inn for lunch and were pleasantly surprised with the friendly and efficient service.  The lobster rolls were excellent as were the sandwiches and salads served.  The waitress was very nice and made us at home.
This was our first time at the Sagamore Inn.  The service and greeting is friendly.  The atmosphere is very comfortable, a casual older home ambiance.  We ordered the Seafood Platter and Fried Clams.  The Seafood Platter presented well and was delightful.  The Fried Claims, not as delightful.  A glob of fried clams over sweet potato fries.  Stingy on the clams and should have used a more professional breading procedure.
Deceptive from the outside...but once inside....very charming and comfortable. My guest and I had an incredible breakfast.....an omelet, and a fried egg sandwich on a croissant. Both were cooked perfectly. Great service as well.
As usual Susan accommodated our bocce club for our annual
Dinner. We all sat in the private room with the tables in a U-shape so we could all talk to one another. Great service and Cheryl, our waitress, was outstanding as she was in years past. Thank you!
We have gone here for decades and this summer we have gone once a week for lunch.
The place is friendly and the food great!
All the waitresses are professional and you never need to ask for anything.
Have NEVER had anything that was not delicious.
Their fried food is fried in the freshest of oil and to perfection and their Italian is perfection as well.
I love their chowder
Both clam and fish.
They have great bread and you can buy a loaf of bread and sauce to take home if you desire.
Desserts are yummy and their cocktails should be award winning!
Great Bloody Mary's and Martinis.
There are also wonderful luncheon specials.
You will enjoy this place.

AWSOME ,took friends after a great weekend at our houses or breakfast there ,and they were so impressed at the service and the great food!
Almost on the Sandwich line on Route 6A, Sagamore offers good food in a relaxed atmosphere. The menu includes the usual seafood items ( lobster rolls, etc) found in Cape Cod restaurants and a good assortment of salads, sandwiches, etc. We have eaten at the Sagamore a few times and the service has been good every single  time. Sagamore also has a separate bar room.
Sagamore is a good place to break the journey to places like Chatham. Immediately after going over the Sagamore bridge take the exit for Rt. 6A towards Sandwich.
Driven by the restaurant for many years. Started going there for breakfast this year (really great idea). Finally tried the dinner menu. I have been back several times since. Always try something different from seafood casserole to chicken pot pie. Specials are always a good idea. Myself and everyone I've gone with have loved our meals. Great home cooked food with friendly staff. 
Two thumbs up!
We have driven by the Sagamore Inn for decades and never stopped. Finally did this year and what a treat! You walk into this rustic feeling restaurant and you can just feel the history this place has had.It reminded us of places we visited as children in the 1960's. Our waitress was friendly and fun - just the type you hope to have in a place like this. The food was amazing. I had the Cape Cod Rueben and my husband had fish tacos. Being New Englanders we know good seafood and this certainly was. The fish was so fresh it must have been swimming in Cape Cod bay the day before! The portions are very generous and just what a weary traveler wants on travel day to the Cape. We will add this to our list of favorites and now stop every year. Next time I'd like to share an entree and save room for one of their amazing desserts.
The food was great. I am on a bland diet and the waitress and kitchen worked with me to find something I could eat. My mother said her meal was excellent. 
The Sagamore Inn is not only a classic eating establishment with fun wait-staff and a super history; it is also a great find with regard to their menu and food.  Prices are reasonable, portions are generous, and the quality of food is commendable.  The only drawback is that it can get very noisy, so the best times to go are off-season, mid-week, or very early to avoid a crowded dining room.  If you like good chicken, veal or eggplant parm, you will not be disappointed.
Homey atmosphere and scrumptious food.  Went there on Father's Day during our vacation at the Cape.  Awesome, friendly service and fresh seafood.  A must stop when visiting the area. 
Visited The Sagamore Inn at the advice of a local gentleman who said "I eat there at least 50 times a year. " No ambiance, no view but excellent, friendly service and delicious food.  My 19 year old son had the seafood casserole and said " this is the best thing I ever ate." The fried clams and seafood platter were delicious as well. 
Excellent service, great food, good value. Friendly atmosphere. The food came out quickly, hot and delicious. Our server was very pleasant, interactive, and very welcoming.
We have been eating there for years,have never been disappointed . My wife says the egg plant is the best on the cape. I always have the chicken parm which I can only eat half because they give you so much. The Mississippi mud pie is AWSOME when Sue makes it .For us it's one of the best restaurants on Cape Cod!
This is the seafood restaurant of my youth -- old-fashioned booths and knotty-pine walls. The seafood here is excellent. I grew up working in seafood establishments and know a thing or two about fresh fish and coleslaw! This place is the real deal.
I would go here as a child with my family . 
I bring my kids here all the time . staff always smiling and very friendly prices are not bad at all ! they have changed things when I was a child but still looks good. 
It was my first time here on my off the cape. I needed that one more summer dessert so I drove in. Plenty of flavors to pick from, but for me the coffee and chocolate chip was the one. I loved the dark chocolate chips in a creamy coffee flavored ice cream. Good portions too.
Great choice of flavors, very fresh and with huge portions.  This is an excellent choice for ice cream when you are in or near Sandwich.
We had already been to Sandwich, but were too full that day for ice cream.  We road tripped from Hyannis one night and were not disappointed.  It was delicious....would definitely road trip it again.
We've eaten lots of ice cream this summer & returned here many times.
The best vanilla malt I've ever had and the peach last month was outrageous!!!!
Great chocolate chip mint. We're all happy here & the window staff friendly. Please tip,they work hard.
Absolutely loved Twin Acres.  Ice cream was delicious and portions huge.  Picnic tables to sit and enjoy.
We stopped at Twin Acres Ice Cream at the recommendation of a friend before heading off Cape and wasn't disappointed. Twin Acres has more than 45 flavors of hard ice cream, sorbet, and soft serve. I was so excited about my Mocha Almond Fudge (with whole almonds, and lots of fudge) that I ordered a cup instead of a cone. My daughter polished off a dish of vanilla (seriously, with all of these flavors?). Also sampled chocolate peanut butter ice cream. With the large variety and range of flavors, such as rum raisin, ginger, I wish they offered a tasting flight -- a couple of tablespoons of several flavors, for the indecisive and calorie conscience.Totally unpractical as far as staffing, moving the line along, and profit, but practicality is overrated! Friendly, accommodating staff. Definitely worth the detour of of route 6 (especially when there's traffic). Ample outside seating in beautiful garden surroundings.
Once you go there, you will want to return often. So many flavors to choose from- that's why you will want to return to try different ones. This year, my favorite was white thunder- vanilla ice cream with strawberry swirls with whit chocolate candy cups with strawberry in them. SO YUMMY!!
Twin Acres is great.....neat as a pin and awesome soft serve ice cream a nice place to stop for desert. We highly recommend this establishment.
Twin Acres has one of the most lovely settings of an ice cream stand that I have visited, and this significantly influenced my 3 star rating. They have a generous selection of ice cream flavors (40+), sundaes, etc. The servers are friendly and helpful. The ice cream, which is the main draw, is just good, nothing special. Additionally, the serving size is quite small compared to other ice cream shops.  The scoops are the size of a tennis ball, the Kiddie is 1 scoop and the Small 2 scoops. The setting is very lovely, but there are better places nearby, specifically Ice Cream Sandwich minutes away.
We stopped on our way back to Providence  and it was a fantastic break. There were so many great ice cream options and the staff was friendly. Furthermore, the location was great and you can eat your ice cream in the shadow of beautiful trees. 
So far I am not at all impressed with the sandwiches. Last month I visited with my daughter and ordered a chili cheese dog. It was not what I was expecting. I wasn't happy with the chili, the roll was too small and the cheese they used was gross. Today I went with my husband and ordered a grilled cheese and tuna, my husband also had one. The bread was burnt,and the tuna was bland, I brought the rest home to feed to the dogs. I think they should stick with ice cream.
There is a flavor for everyone. Ice Cream is delicious. Parking is tight. This place is usually crowded so plan for that.
Some of the best ice cream on the Vape.  We stop after the beach almost every weekend.  It can get busy but the line moves fast.  One a the few places around with Coffee soft serve,
Every year, we make the hike from Barnstable up to this family run ice cream shop.  They have tons of flavors and give huge servings. A great stop while driving along the 6A. Its a gem of a find.
After riding the canal bike trail it's nice to stop and get a cone. They have good ice cream. I've never tried their food.
This place is always busy . . . and for a good reason!  The place looks like new.  The young ladies serving up the ice cream are friendly and efficient.  The ice cream choices are plentiful and varied.  What more could you ask?  
It's right off of Rte. 6A on the edge of Sagamore.  
Super cute location. Friendly servers, delicious icecream with generous portions. Well worth the trip every time!  I'm a local and eat here as often as I can make it.  
Best Ice cream place in Sandwich. Large portions for reasonable prices. Haven't tried the food yet. Great service. Lots of space for hanging out and eating 
A welcoming and quaint ice cream shoppe, unassumingly sitting aside Route 6A.  Yet, after a first family visit, we will return.  The workers are friendly, and the ice cream is great.  Absolutely loved the coffee/vanilla twist soft serve!  Although there are so many ice cream opportunities on the cape, we have found our favorite in Sandwich.
spent weekend at the cape driving from Va. Got lobster rolls on the way to Chatham and whole belly clam rolls on the way home. Outstanding for both stops. fast friendly service
Great place to stop when leaving the Cape for a quick bite. The Lobster Rolls are the best in the area, full of chucky lobster meat.  Also great fried clams, and fries. Friendly staff, clean with great outdoor picnic tables for dinning.  Highly recommend.  Pete
There are some things that I'm just glad to know. Lobster rolls and clam shacks are two of them. This place is worth the drive and not because of the decor (nor the price). It's truly a drive-in shack, where you order fried food (or lobster rolls) that are delicious because - well, just because. Plentiful. Well executed. Good fries. Homemade tartar sauce (yes it can make a difference). Picnic tables away from the road, with a view of big tugs wandering down the canal. Young people behind the window. 

Yes, seafood has gotten incredibly expensive ($19 for fried scallops, $21 for clams with bellies) but this is a treat, where we don't want to overfish our welcome. 

The scallops, btw, did not have the heavy breading, they were perfect. The place also serves $6 burgers. We didn't have one but they looked good.

The noise of the road while you're waiting for your food is pretty loud but the back picnic tables are surprisingly quiet.
The service and pricing here are both poor. Food forgotten and had to run after the staff several times to remind them.
You order give your name & wait but no service for bad food is still bad food.
Still waiting for the ears of corn that came with the lobster.
The child's hot dog ice cold we asked for a replacement & it was never received.
So we stopped to the Seafood Shanty while waiting for traffic to move through towards 495! The food was great, my mom and I had a burger, while my stepdad had a roast beef sandwich! Great prices! Great views of the Cape Cod Canal! Next time I want to try their fried clam roll- although they are known for the Lobstah Roll! 
Stopped here on the way to the cap for the weekend. What a perfect meal to hit the spot. The fish and chips was delectably fried and the tarter and coleslaw were to die for! Definitely stopping again
Located between the two bridges on route to the Cape and overlooks the canal. I start to salivate two weeks before our annual trip for the best lobster roll ever. This year we arrived earlier and we're in luck the open flag had just been put out. I would have waited until the shack opened. The roll is big enough for two people but I was having the whole thing this year.. While you wait there are some pretty cool photos of celebs that have visited. Good variety on the menu. 
The lobster roll was amazing! One of the best we've ever had. The whole belly clams were just ok. The home made tarter sauce was not great and the cole slaw was unusual since it was heavy on onions. The onion rings were ok.  A lot of them and of the thinner variety. Nice portions but a bit pricey. 
Favorite stop when camping at Scussette beach.  Best lobster roll around and for my non-seafood spouse, the Shanty roast beef is the bomb. Topped off by the home made ice cream sandwich, shared of course. This place is spot on!
Seafood Shanty is our go-to spot for a lobster roll when leaving the Cape. Best clam shack in that area and our favorite just behind Arnold's in Eastham. 

Lobster rolls are very generously portioned. Meat is sweet and fresh and consistently good. Little more mayonnaise than Arnold's and more of a mixture of small and large pieces, but definitely heftier!

Whole belly fried clams are also reliably excellent - large clams, lightly fried in fresh oil. 

Highly recommend! If you have time to spare, you can picnic across the road overlooking the canal. 
 Just had some fried clams that were soaked in water wsy too long, huge mushy, tasteless whole clams here last week. I was very disappointed and did not eat most of the bellies.
This place has been my favorite seafood, especially fried clams on southshore for a few years.
My family took me here and I am so glad! I ordered a homemade ice cream sandwich and split the lobster roll. It was delicious! The best lobster roll I have had to date! The coleslaw was good and the fries weren't bad either. I will definitely return when I am in the area.
The Seafood Shanty has the best lobster roll on the Cape. Full of delicious lobster meat, very little mayo, and perfectly toasted bun. 

My in-laws live in Plymouth and I've driven past this place for years and never ate at it until this past August.  I've been missing out!  I ordered the clam strips and they were the best I've ever had!  The breading tasted good, they weren't overcooked and chewy, and they were sizable pieces of clam.  I can't wait to go back and try some of their other stuff.

The added bonus is the pretty views of the canal.  A perfect spot to eat a casual dinner on a summer evening.
Don't waste your time or money. With a name like shanty, you come in with low expectations. However, after eating at this shack they actually dropped lower.. Portions were small for the price you pay. Ordered clam and fish plates, which left my wife and I hungry . 

The other dish I was close to ordering afterwards was their lobster roll . However I smartened up, left the $20 in my wallet, and went home to see what was in my fridge.
Incredible food!  Even Henry Winkler ate here and loved it!  Outside dining only, and the seafood is to die for!
It doesn't get any better than this if you are looking for a lobster roll.  Huge portion of fresh lobster.  Fries and onion rings were great too.  Take out only to eat on the picnic tables.  They also have ice cream.  Make sure to bring plenty of cash because it ain't cheap and they don't take credit.  A real rest room instead of that nasty port a potty would have been nice.
This is a roadside stand where you order at a window and eat at a picnic table. We were in heavy traffic leaving Cape Cod and decided to pull over for lunch. I did not expect much, but what a surprise. This was some of the best fried seafood that I ate all week. It is very fresh, we saw the daily delivery truck. The food was ready very quickly.The fried clams and scallops were very good as were the French fries.  There was no greasy taste at all. They have a very unique tartar sauce. Also the lobster roll is huge. For seafood that tasted this good, the prices were low. So for great tasting seafood at a very good value stop in to the Seafood Shanty. We have been driving by this place for years. Who knew!
There are numerous places that offer lobster rolls but leave it to a Shack to impress!!!  The rolls are overflowing with lobster meat and chunks. The flavor was incredible and it was also substantial,  nothing skimpy. Highly recommended 
The lobster roll was big and fresh and reasonably priced.  I'm not a French fry girl but ate them all. Not greasy, crispy outside soft inside.   Already been back for another.  Everyone is nice.  Only problem was they had just washed the tables and benches, I wiped them off but there was so much bleach in the water, it ruined my new shorts.  Should have warned us.  
I usually like their pizza, however, on this night there was hardly any cheese and barely any sauteed onions. For the price, I should get ample toppings. I was not happy.
Stopped here for an early lunch and we weren't impressed.  Ordered salad with questionable 'blackened' chicken  and fish and chips which came with coleslaw and topped with 3 onion rings.  The chicken turned out to be slightly breaded and pan fried with no discernable spice (pick grilled chicken it has to be better).  The salad itself was fine.  The fish was a real disappointment - the greasiest fried fish I've ever had.  Usually fried fish on the cape is great - this was not.  My husband tried the coleslaw and left the rest.  The French fries (chips) though were absolutely addictive.  Having said that great fries aren't a good enough reason to go here.
Stayed in Sandwich for a couple of nights needed somewhere to watch game. Sat at bar good service   TVs not the greatest but ok. They have game day wing special. Great deal.  My husband got clam chowder and I got onion soup. Chowder was cold and I didn't care for the onion soup. 
seating in bar immediate 6pm Friday
meat loaf outstaning ditto pizza
service fast servers pleasant
excellent draft beer selection
a family friendly place
Enjoyed the food and drink. Friendly staff. Right next to the Sandwich Lodge, where we stayed. 10% off if staying at the lodge.
I ate lunch here with a large group of people from work (about 30) for a colleague's going-away party.  We were seated in a large back room, which was perfect for us.  Upon arrival, water pitchers and plastic cups were already waiting for us!  Our waitress, who did an excellent job despite serving our group of 30, took drink orders right away.  I didn't personally drink any beer, but I was impressed by the size of the menu.  

Next, our server took food orders, and again, I was very impressed by the size of the menu!  The menu has everything you could ask for - salad and soup, pizzas, burgers, sandwiches...you name it, it's probably somewhere on there.  Note: on Tuesdays, this place has a buy one, get one free deal on pizzas.  The pizzas are large and can comfortably feed 3-4 people, so the BOGO deal is awesome.

Despite there being 30 of us, our food was prepared and served within 15 minutes...for everyone.  Again, impressive!  I ordered the simple macaroni & cheese, and it was great!  I also love the old New England pub atmosphere...very comfortable.  I'm definitely planning on taking my husband here on our next date night!
British Beer Company seems to me more of a lunch place than for dinner.  The food is just okay, and it would be best to stick to simple things like burgers and salads.  Service is friendly and quick.  You can enjoy it just don't expect too much.
Atmosphere and great food and service what a combination

Four of us went here for an early dinner having been out and about all day Glad we came early as there were many people waiting for tables when left The fish & chips was very big and I couldn't finish it NOT normal for me
Only thing missing here is the British accent.  Menu reflects authentic options.  Try the pot pie options.  Fabulous beer list.
Very good meal. Arrived before our hotel was ready and this was next door. Nice, calming decor and the food was fantastic. 
Always crowded for lunch and dinner.  Stick to the sandwiches and pizza as we've found other items too salty and expensive for what you're served.
We had dinner one night and returned the next for drinks at the bar.  Dinner was excellent, my children were satisfied, and my husband was impressed by the extensive craft beer choices on draught.  Service was excellent.  The night we came for drinks there was a band which was a lot of fun.  
Very impressed with this restaurant I've been to other ones and have not gotten the best service. I was a little Leary going in because of the bad service I've gotten at different locations but was pleasantly surprised to find this experience to be great! The staff was great and friendly. We even got a voucher for being at the resort next door! The food was really good to and we will be back again cant wait!
Had fun danced live music got food ate left got lucky good time chicken wings and assuage rolls were good ppl n staff were all nice got 
Very cool place. Great beer selection and they have Fullers on tap. It does have that British pub vibe. The food was very good and the Shepards Pie was very good. The meatloaf and macaroni and cheese were also very good. The Mahi Mahi tacos are just ok. Overall, I'd go back. 
The fish and chips were very good as it was almost a whole filet instead of fish sticks. The beer can be a little pricey but the selection is good.
Decked out in a British style but with an American slant, this is a nice bar/grill which has a very extensive menu. We had a fish-wich, which was perfectly cooked in light batter with just the right amount of cheese and bacon. The fries were also good. We'll worth a visit.
Great food, great service and Great location. There is a big selection of things to eat on the menu selection.
We ate here with a party of 10 on a Friday night and everyone had a good time and enjoyed the food. We had made reservations ahead of time and they were all set for us when we arrived. Our server was friendly, helpful, timely and took great care of us. There was a definite pub feel to the decor and menu as one would expect. All the portions were large. I had the blackened mahi mahi tacos which were delicious and huge!  Others at the table had shepard's pie, ribs, steak tips, steak salad and mussels. Everyone loved their meal. Unfortunately none of us had room for dessert. I would definitely come back here again.
We stop here twice a year but on this time the fish and chips and the steak pie were both overcooked and dry. The dining room is also very dark. However the british beer was just fine, but we'll probably stop coming in the future because the food quality has gone down over the years.
During late July I had the pleasure of having several good meal, drink and fun times at the BBC. I have visited this restaurant many times over the years and always find it consistent with friendly staff, great food and wonderful liquid refreshments. I look forward to visiting again. We enjoyed my daughter's 23 birthday dinner and everything was awesome!!
We've been coming here for years. The food is always good, especially the multigrain pizza. Plenty of beer choices including craft and micro's.  Music on weekends as well. Nice, casual Cape establishment.
The food and drinks are excellent.  The waitstaff is friendly and fun.  But we go as often as possible on Weds. nights to do trivia night with Cubey.  It is a blast, and we always get a group of friends, family, (or when a crowd comes for a day visit to the cape), and we make a team.  We have so much fun.  Cubey is so entertaining, funny, and supportive and warm.  This is a must do in all seasons.
After a movie we needed a quick bite.
Did not disappoint. The waiter was very attentive and efficient, even though he also had a large party to take care of.
Loved my multigrain crust pizza and beer . My husband lived his pizza too. Thought it was good value for the money.

A great place, always busy, good food and good service. Locals and tourists both go and it attracts customers of all ages but a younger crowd at night. It's a chain but definitely worth stopping by for a beer and burger.
I'm not a fan of chain restaurants but the BBC in Sandwich is a great place to stop when all other places have a wait.  

It's right on 6A and is clean.  The food is great and the drinks are cold.  The service was fast and friendly.  

My only gripe is that it is pretty dark and there is nothing that notes you are located within steps of the ocean or Cape Cod.  Hence, the chain restaurant thing...
Well, my BBC expectations were set based on multiple visits to the Falmouth Heights BBC location. Got to say apart from the beachfront location the Sandwich BBC is better. it starts with ample parking/seats for a June Saturday night family of 8. Waitress was very prompt, friendly and knowledgable. Menu fairly straight forward with appetizers, salads, burgers, and roast beef sandwiches. Main menu included fish and chips, bourbon steak tips, salmon and a pasta dish. Menu prices all in the $10 to $19 range and beer in the $5-$6 dollar range. Now different burgers different grilling instructions but most csme back well done, not ideal. Overall a very family and date friendly Saturday night locale.
Always a favorite to gather with family or friends. Love the food and atmosphere. Always a good crowd here with the locals.
British Beer has several locations in SE Mass, but this one in Sandwich is our favorite. Best hamburgers in the area. Tons of British food choices not found elsewhere, too. Nice atmosphere, a bit on the dark side but we like that! Friendly servers. One of our GoTo places in the upper Cape area on a regular basis!
BBC is a great restaurant in Sandwich Mass for American Food. It has a large selection of Beer and a cozy bar with entertainment. The decor is that of England. I highly recommend this as a family restaurant.
We have been to this BBC many times and enjoyed it. However, on our Aug 14th visit, my boyfriend, who   has been eating Thai food for 30 years, made the mistake of ordering the "Thai Red Curry Noodle Bowl." Red Curry must normally be accompanied by coconut milk to offset its extreme spiciness and make it more palatable, but the chef did not add coconut milk. Luckily, my boyfriend did not finish the dish, because he later had a good dose of indigestion. Sorry to have to give this negative review, but feel that we should warn others. It's not a question of whether he could handle the heat, because he can, but of very spicy food prepared incorrectly, causing uncomfortable health consequences.

How can you go to Sandwich and not eat a sandwich. 
This is a nice English style pub. The feel and decor are authentic as is the food. Had pastrami which was pretty good. Service was decent and prices are reasonable.
Great Atmosphere and Food, and the GF pizza is great! Service always good, and always a great selection of beers, and cocktails!
Travel from Florida to Sandwich once sometimes twice a year to visit family.  This is an absolutely must visit place for us.  Best French Onion Soup ever, and actually everything on their menu is top notch.  Love it!!!
our server was very good, knowledgeable, and friendly. Food looked good but could have been a bit warmer. I like a lot of things about this place but it seemed to be a dollar or two higher then it should be.
Heading out of teh Cape back towards Boston we decided to stop off at BBC for Lunch. Id seen a couple of these around previously but being a Brit had steadfastly avoided them believing they would be a poor mockery of British pub. Seems I was wrong!  To be clear its a straight out American bar with 'some' British touches. 

Food was really really good, standard American fare, from Burgers, ribs, Pizza plus a few English touches (English food hmmm dont see that often) such as steak pie etc. We pretty much stayed on the American classics and were not disappointed. 

Beer selection as you'd expect very good. 

Service excellent.

Decor ok.

Will definitely revisit.
A recent mid week dinner turned out very enjoyable despite the noise created by large families, young children, busy bar traffic with a trivia contest open to all. But the food is very good and the service is excellent - the waitstaff will carry 6 or so filled plates to the table enabling all diners to start eating at the same time, no easy task! Huge selection of beers on tap; wine list about average and on the pricey side. Some very British desserts like Sticky Toffee Pudding will end your meal on a high note! You can seat in the Pub (cozy with fireplace) the bar (noisy with hightops) or the dining room (busy with families) so look around which one you would prefer. Ample parking and right next to the Sandwich Lodge and Resort. Guests from this hotel get 10% discount on food when showing room-key.
My husband and I went here for dinner and had a great time. Service was great and the food was awesome. My husband had the steak tips and I had the eggplant parm, both were great! We were here two years ago for a rehearsal dinner and also for lunch. Both then were excellent as well. I don't recommend it for small children, music may be loud for their little ears. 
This is a pub, not a five star restaurant, so if you go in looking for a great beer selection and pub type food you will not be disappointed. Only four stars because I think it could be a bit cleaner... Darkness hides it at night, daytime more evident,
In the middle of our meal the waitress  walked through the dining room with a long haired dog, when my husband complained, she said the dog was the owners.... Sorry but dog don't belong in the dining room... Although the food was good my husband who is allergic to dogs will not be back!
I took my mother to Fishermen's View for her birthday. Water views all around and the best scallops either of us have ever had. We both enjoyed the scallop platter - the scallops were gently breaded & fried to perfection - sweet and tender. Hope to return soon.
Three of us stopped here mid-afternoon on a weekday in October.  As might be expected we were seated immediately, but even with that timing at least half of the seats, inside and outside, were filled. 

We started with an outstanding crab/artichoke appetizer.  Size wise there's enough there for 4 people, but by the end of the meal we had managed to finish it off.  We ordered Ipswich clams, fish and chips, and the Knuckle sandwich.  The clams were plentiful and "sweet" as one would expect of Ipswich clams.  The fish and chip order was large, and we ended up sharing it some. If you favor a crispy beer battered fish, as we do, you'll love this order.  The Knuckle sandwich, as someone noted earlier, has too many ingredients so the delicate lobster taste gets lost.  Picked out a few pieces of the lobster meat and found them good, not great.  Probably wouldn't order that meal again.

As for the restaurant itself, a nice sparkling environment at a great location.  It is noisy, probably some because of the metal ceiling, but not so much that it hampered our conversation.  Not sure what it would be like in-season during the evening, which is one of the reasons that we went when we did.

It will be one of our go-to places on the Cape.
Went for lunch , chowder as just ok. After waiting quite awhile for our food the fish and chips came out uncooked under heavy batter and the grilled cheese and apple sandwich was cold. Service was ok . Definitely wouldn't go back or recommend to anyone else.
This new restaurant was recommended by friends who live on the Cape.  It was a warm October afternoon so we opted to sit outside.  It was great since we got to watch all the boat traffic and get away from the loud music inside!  Fresh fish was excellent.  We had the lightly fried scallops and the lobster sandwich.  A generous amount of food washed down with a good draft beer.  Can't beat this location and quality of the seafood.  Then we went behind the restaurant to the shop that sells all the fresh seafood.  That's not to be missed if you want seafood for another meal at home!
First time visit to Fisherman's View since it opened this summer.  It is very busy so if you're looking to go for dinner, I would recommend before 5pm or after 7pm.  This restaurant sits directly on the Cape Cod Canal with spectacular views of the Cape Cod Canal and the entrance to Cape Cod Bay.  Dinner was exceptional.  Prices were middle price range.  Service needs some improvement but they are newly opened so the wait staff is still "iffy".  Cocktails were also good.  Will be going back tomorrow for lunch.  Highly recommending this one although noise is an issue.
Got a new restaurant for my TA friends to check out - Fisherman's View in Sandwich, MA. It's built on a wharf on the eastern end of the canal and it just opened this past August. Great restaurant and a great fish market all in one. We tried a couple of the appies, calamari and Korean octopus and then bought a beautiful piece of cod to cook for dinner. Definitely worth a ride to take in the scenery and get a good meal!
We on a Friday at 5:00 pm. Sat in the bar in the chairs opposite the bar. It wasn't too crowed most of the bar seats were taken and we were the only people sitting in the chairs opposite the bar. Sat there 10 minutes no one helped us. We went to the hostess station to get menu. Sat another 10 minutes none of the 6 bartenders (most standing around) did come over. We walked out. 

If you want to be on the same par with The Lobster Trap you have a long way to go. 
We are local residents and want you to be successful.
I have been waiting for Fishermans View to serve lunch! I brought my sister in law for a birthday lunch and we were pleased that they had introduced a new luncheon menu. We enjoyed a cup of clam chowder and it was delicious....great bacon flavor and thick! We both opted for the"knuckle sandwich "  and it was awesome! Great value! We sat by window and enjoyed view...loved the crisp, clean atmosphere.....our waitress,Ashlyn was pleasant and answered questions with a smile! Best part of the day was to see cousin Deans lobster boat travel into basin and unload days catch! Will be back!
Busy and noisy bar scene . Excellent oysters. Only $1 each. Good corn bread on the side. Fun place full of friendly people. Full menu available at bar.  Had a great lobster sandwich.  View is fabulous.
Good draft beer. We will be back!
This is a new restaurant in Sandwich right on the canal.  The views are wonderful.  We had heard from friends...and read reviews...that the restaurant is loud.  We were there early...about 5 pm...and although the restaurant filled within 1/2 hour, the noise level was not that bad.  That being said, there were not too many people in the bar area.  When we left, there was a wait at the door and the bar was filling so we can see that it could get noisy.  Our dinners were both excellent and our server was great.  She made suggestions, checked back with us, and was very pleasant.  The fish is fresh and there is a fish market on the premises.  Fisherman's View is a nice addition to the town and we wish them success.  We will return.
This restaurant opened up at the end of the summer and has become an instant hit with locals. I have eaten there twice and the food was excellent each time with large portions, good taste and excellent presentation.  They offer a number of food options but fresh fish is their specialty. 

On both visits  I started out with a salad- their roasted beet, with quinoa, kale, corn and peppers-practically a meal itself.   On the first visit, I had the Narragansett Calamari and the second time  I had grilled swordfish steak. Both were tasty with large portions and reasonably priced. 

They have a large wait staff that seem to serve no more than five tables - they were friendly, quick,  attentive and there were no long waits for the food. 

The place is good sized  with a relaxed atmosphere. The main dining area has a about 25 tables and the outside deck has another 10 to 15 tables. They have a good sized bar that seats around 12. It is  located right along the canal with great sunset views

The first time I ate there was on a Thursday. I arrived at 5:30 and had to wait about 30 minutes. Those that came after 6 had to wait up to an hr.  There was a local musician playing near the bar that made that area particularly noisy. The next time I came was on a Sunday at 3 and there was already a line waiting to get in.  They will be offering reservation capability soon- I hope so. 

As someone who lives on Cape Cod and familiar with many of the local restaurants, I  know we are always on the look out for a good place to eat. I can easily recommend this one. In my opinion, this new restaurant has already become one of the best in the area. 

For those that do not like long waits and loud music near the bar, I suggested  they go elsewhere and maybe, just maybe  the lines will not be so long.
Lobster and crabs galore!  Even choices for non-seafood people.  Wonderful service and large portions.
The newest restaurant spot in Sandwich is Fisherman's View, located on the Cape Cod Canal.  It opened this past summer, but the crowds were overwhelming.  We did try to go a few weeks after it opened, but there was a long wait.  We visited for lunch a couple of days ago with two friends.  On the plus side, the building is brand new and it sparkles.  It is located right on the canal and the view is great.  It almost feels like you have a window table on a cruise ship. However, that doesn't make up for its drawbacks.  First, as others have noticed, it is very loud.  There are hard surfaces everywhere, including the ceiling, so the noise is relentless.  I can't imagine the din during the dinner hour on the weekend.  Now, the food...  Both my wife and I ordered the lunch fried scallops.  The size of the order was disappointing...  only about 5-6 scallops.  At another restaurant today, they were serving 10-12 for the same price.  The scallops were tasty, but nothing to rave about.  It was served with french fries, cole claw, tarter sauce, and ketchup.  The fries were a disappointment.  They were pretty greasy.  One of our friends ordered the Knuckle Sandwich.  It looked pretty good.  Very large portion.  But there were drawbacks.  It was almost had two many ingredients and the various tastes were in competition with each other.  I tried the lobster, and that was my biggest issue. The lobster was sautéed in butter.  Even though I hail from Connecticut and that seems to be the standard down there, I really don't like it prepared that way.  I much prefer lobster meat lightly tossed in mayo.  But that's just me.  Lastly, our fourth person ordered the fish & chips.  It was a large portion and he loved it.  So, bottom line...  there are other restaurants that I would go to instead of this one.  That being said, there is a nice patio area that might be great during the summer, so we will be back to check that out next year.
6 of us met for dinner. They don't take reservations (yet) so two of us arrived early to get on the list. Worked out well, we were seated after about half an hour, nice timing for a drink in the bar, and the rest of our party got there just in time. Our table, at the far end of the restaurant along the wall, had little view but as it quickly fell dark we didn't mind too much. The CCT showing videos of fish unloading on the docks below was a nice touch. But it was too loud in there for me to hear the conversation at the other end of the table. I guess this is part of the "ambiance" but it was annoying to us.   Food was good. A vegan diner at our table was able to order a special platter of stir fried and boiled vegetables that was plentiful and very good. The fish and chips featured a huge piece of fish and was tasty. My boiled lobsters' shell was brittle which actually made it easier to crack. Delicious. 
Copy of a letter sent to the Fishermen's View.
My family, consisting of wife, daughter, grandson, son-in-law and sister-in-law had the opportunity to dine on the deck of your new Fishermen’s View.  From the entry, having been greeted by two staff members, to the exit, having been good-bye(d) by the hostess, the experience was exceptional.  
The wait staff was attentive, patient, and totally helpful.  We tried a variety of plates: the nachos, buffalo cauliflower, steak, ahi tuna, striped bass, lobster roll and F/V burger.  All plates were presented beautifully and in a timely manner.  We shared each other’s food; I really liked the burger---nice blend of flavors.  My family all agreed that the food was excellent.  Our waitress checked on us often and the manager came over to see us.  It was great that Bobbie and Denny came by too.  For me, I really enjoyed seeing the staff as I have known many of the servers as they were my students from Sandwich High School.  That kind of local color is great.
The place is beautiful!  The location is fabulous!  That image is greatly enhanced by the obvious enthusiasm of the entire staff.  Each staff member showed pride in being on the ground floor of a real adventure. This will go a long way to getting people through the door and getting them to return.  I now look forward to the opening of the fish market…this is a real package!  
The total experience was a highlight of the summer for us all and we will talk it up and return soon.
Thank you for last night and may you all enjoy success in this undertaking.
Sincerely,


We went for an early dinner on Tuesday at 4 PM. We were seated right away at a corner table with views all around us. Our wait person Audrey was very pleasant and knowledgeable. We ordered calamari, crab/artichoke dip, fried clams and the Mahi Mahi. All was very good. 

The down side as most everyone has commented on is the decor and acoustics. The dining space has a very cold, stark feeling. Use of some fabrics, plants, pillows, carpet to warm up
the space would make a huge difference. The dining chairs also are uncomfortable. This sounds harsh, but the space has been compared to eating in a mess hall!

We will be back eventually, but hopefully some interior design help will be utilized in the near future.
First time -last time= Arrived at 7.00pm for dinner was seated very quickly very very noisy not a place to sit and enjoy a nice quiet dinner  next my order was taken right away  it had taken twenty minutes to get a bowl of clam chowder which was exc,  I had the fried clam platter Cooked way too much and it all came out at 3am stomach cramps all day ,my wife had fish and chips she said was okay... would not recommend for a nice quiet evening dinner......
Stopped for the first time not knowing what to expect- found great food, great service, and wonderful bar ambience. Salads are far from skimpy, salmon to accompany was cooked perfectly and far from skimpy, Caesar with lobster salad not too much mayo and good portion. New, clean, nice artwork and model boats accent walls etc. Windows galore overlooking wharf from bar and canal from dining room. I felt more cozy in bar area though. Met a new friend and shared stories over drinks and great food. We'll be back!
A new restaurant on the water in Sandwich, MA. We ate on the outside porch and had great view of the harbour, and the coastguard station.We had the lobster dinner and everything tasted wonderful. The lobster was fresh and the friend who lives locally and brought us here said the owner is a lobster fisherman. We also ate early (got there around 4:30 PM) on a Saturday, but by the time we left around 6 there was quite a wait line. Our service was good and we had not complaints on the food. However, our friend ordered the stuffed lobster and although it looked delicious, she said she likes the steamed lobster better. When and if we return we will eat here is the wait is not too long.
For a boat to table restaurant on Cape Cod, why do these wannabes serve Fried Ipswich clams? That pretty much sums up these great imposters. 
They don't accept reservations, but why travel from Hyannis, Centerville,  Osterville, Yarmouth Etc.,to be told there is a one and a half to two hour wait. We played their game once, but never again. Let's see what their attitude is in January-April. Maybe by then, these fishermen will have discovered Barnstable or Chatham clams while they try to serve swordfish from southern waters. Good luck to all who put up with these pretenders. I will take the Pilot House across the boat basin anytime.
We stopped in this joint for breakfast, and left right after. There signs about how to choose a table, and when to order and the place seemed micro managed and confusing. So we left. Maybe the locals like to go there cause they know how to do the previous. My  thought if you want to tell me how and where to sit .... hire a hostess. 
We had lunch at this cute little place.  I had one of the specials (a park bahn mi) and my partner had a chicken bacon panini..  The bahn mi wasn't typical - they used some typical flavors and made it their own and it was yummy.  Lots of people were ordering late breakfasts too and every plate looked scrumptious.  Would definitely return. Oh and the sandwiches were ready super fast.
We thought it would be a hoot to stop in Sandwich for a sandwich as we traveled to our destination in North Truro, and I'm glad we chose Cafe Chew. This is a cute, casual cafe with a good selection of sandwiches for both vegetarians and meat eaters. The bread and ingredients were fresh on all of our sandwiches, and the service was fast. I would recommend it for a quick, reasonable (by Cape Cod standards) and tasty breakfast or lunch. (They're not open for dinner.)
Without a doubt the best quiche I ever had.  Everything here was fresh, perfectly prepared, and served with a smile.   Treat yourself to the best meal around
This is a great place for lunch.  The food was good and the service was friendly and quick.  There are interesting shops in the plaza to visit as well.
We have visited Cafe Chew many times over the years and have found it to offer many different breakfast selections. No matter what your liking, Cafe Chew has it for you! From muffins to bagels to full breakfasts and sandwiches you can't go wrong. It also has a wide variety of coffees. It is well worth the visit.
The draw is just too great and this place has excellent sandwiches. It was fairly crowded when we arrived; you stand in line to place your order and then they bring it to you. But this place is obviously accustomed to crowds and moved everyone through very briskly. At the same time, you never felt rushed and the service person was very attentive. 
Very cool decor.  Unusual flow, as you go up to order and then have it brought to you, but it definitely feels like it should be a sit-down place.

Egg sandwich was a bit bland.  Pancakes were good.  Coffee was good.
We came across Chew by accident whilst driving around the area. The cafe/restaurant is on a small retail area. The basic tenet is of self service. Own menu, order at the counter but delivered to your table. We had the Greek yoghurt with granola and honey and a sandwich with egg, bacon and cheese. We also had a coffee and a tea (of which there are lots). The food is well cooked and plentiful, the price is very reasonable. Should I ever fall across it again, I would gladly eat there.
We stopped here on our way to Chatham and got a sandwich and a salad, both were great! I would definitely recommend this place for healthy and gluten-free options as well! For the road, we ordered a small coffee and an apple bomb which was absolutely incredible! If you go, you must try the apple bomb! So worth it! 
Stopped here for lunch after driving all morning  and  finally crossing the Sagamore Bridge on to the cape.  About 5 minute detour off Rt 6.  Small place, grab your seat before you place your order.  The sandwiches are delicious and huge.  Comes with chips and a pickle.  Leave with a smile and a full belly.
This cafe is excellent for both breakfast and lunch. The food is fresh and delicious. The portions are very generous. A very friendly atmosphere. VERY efficient service, especially given the amount of people who come in. While there was a line for service when we were there, the line went quickly and there was not a long wait.  My only regret is that there is not a cafe like this near us.  A great find and highly recommended!
Food is fresh, and of fine quality, servings are more than ample (most things enough for two).  Staff is pleasant and helpful.  Indoor and outdoor seating available.  Grab a table before you order - this place gets Really Crowded!
Ambience is fun - eclectic decor, good music, and happy customers.
excellent!!! great food, small, charming. Friendly personnel. Very good cappuccino. Super breakfast place
Wonderful breakfasts with healthy options and a variety of pastries and sandwiches.  Coffee is delicious!  At lunch there are many salads and sandwiches to try.  Helpful staff and a favorite with the locals.
Café Chew offers yummy sandwiches at affordable prices! And they come with Cape Cod chips too! I really enjoyed the tuna salad sandwich I had here. It tasted better with a bit of salt and pepper! 
This Cape Cod cafe has it all -- friendly, homey atmosphere; impressive variety in very tasty food; and did I mention how delicious the food is?! This is a great place to get breakfast, lunch or snack. The pastries and baked goods go from cookies, to muffins, cakes, scones and more. Their pancakes are incredible -- and I know my pancakes. Great coffee, too. To top it off -- fast, friendly service! Be sure to stop for a hearty breakfast or lunch before or after heading over the bridge!
Met family there for lunch. It was really busy, but the wait for food wasn't long at all. Very diverse menu, and all of it was really fresh and tasty. Great coffee! Outside seating too.
Had breakfast at the chew and it was awesome. Cooked while you wait. Long lines, but worth it. Great staff!
Some of the best sandwiches around, with an imagination (think Banh Mi). Breakfast is a close second.
My husband and the kids enjoyed every bite. The best thing to eat during a hot summer day. Location is great.
I got a sundae for my birthday. This thing was HUGE. Great creamy tasting ice creams. We all loved them. Service was excellent. Parking was easy and some tables to enjoy. Even had corn hole set up. Great place. 
For years my family and I have gone to a different ice cream place in Sandwich, and due to a bad experience we decided to try shipwreck. We had heard great things about it from friends, but eating there was even better. The ice cream is fantastic, the area is big with space for kids to play in along with a game of corn hole, and its filled with turtles and rabbits which my kids loved. We will definitely be making this our new go-to place!
Great ice cream,no shortage of flavors.Inviting outside atmosphere with a new bunny cage for a few rabbits and few different man made ponds for some turtles. It also has a lot of good outdoor seating. 
Greg takes pride in his ice cream.   I'm a diver turned ice cream eater since Greg opened the ice cream shop.   Slightly off the beaten path it's worth stopping by to see the turtles and rabbits.  
all the ice cream here is awesome and for a good price.  the service was pretty nice always a smiling face and so many options to choose from!
Many, many, flavors.  Old favs as well as creative types.  Good sized scoops.  Picnic tables in the grass.  Peaceful.  Just off the road.  Friendly and efficient staff.
A nice treat ... Very local.  When you want delicious ice cream where the locals go.  Open late which makes it an ideal place for the late night ice cream cravings 
Great location near the Cape Cod Canal.  Lots of delicious flavors.  Picnic tables are available if you wish to enjoy your ice cream on the premises.  We like to drive to the Canal and enjoy it there.
This was my first time at "Shipwreck Ice Cream" and will definitely be my last.  I ordered a small dish of cake batter ice cream.  As I was waiting to pay, I glanced down at the ice cream and noticed a hair in it.  Needless to say, I gave it back to the girl who was working there and told her what I had found.  Instead of apologizing, she just grabbed it out of my hand and threw it into the trash with frustration.  She gave me a new one, I paid, and sat down with my friends to eat it.  After several bites (which tasted nothing like cake batter), I found ANOTHER hair in my ice cream!  I couldn't believe it.  I was so disgusted that I just threw it away and didn't bother to ask for my money back.
My husband and I stopped here after a walk along the canal. Quite the variety of favors! The shipwreck almond was great! A great place to bring the kids next time. They have a little fish pond with fish and a turtle and a rabbit hutch with a few rabbits. A great place!
We've stayed in Sandwich lots of times but it's first time we've been to shipwreak, the ice cream was great with a large choice of flavour.
The staff we're also really nice. 
This is a terrific little gem for ice cream in Sandwich. It is located close to the canal and off of rte 6A. The ice cream is terrific with large portions. Try the "shipwreck almond"!
The ice cream list is extensive (they have frozen yogurt too!) and they have an obvious list of toppings which I love. I enjoyed my ice cream and so did the other people in my group. They also have really cute bunnies in a hutch out back. Very cute place, definitely my new place.
The chocolate peanut butter cup ice cream was fantastic after a long bike ride.  Peach flavor was good, too.
Good ice cream, and with the bunnies, turtles and fish, as well as a lot of space to run around, my grandchildren love when we bring them here.
There are not many Starbucks around Greenfield.   Th is is a wonderful option.  French Roast or Toasted Coconut.  Yummy
Excellent Cold Brew Coffee, and pasteries. There was also an excellent collection of whole bean coffees to purchase by the pound. This is an excellent way station for those along the Mohawk Trail for outdoor activities.
The coffee drinks here are plentiful and excellent. The breakfast sandwiches are freshly made and delicious. There is a LOT of variety here, too, both in coffee offerings and breakfast goods. The baked goods were nice, and ther is a patio for outside seating, as well as tables inside. We picked up a growler of cold brew coffee on our way out of town, and spent some time at the Chip 'n' Putt golf course next door. 
Located on the beautiful Mohawk trail, you will find the Shelburne Falls Coffee Roasters directly off of Route 2. 

Opening the door, you will instantly take in the feeling of good vibes, and the mocking of an original coffee shop experience. Smiling faces, fresh delicious smell of hand crafted coffee, they even have there own bean room to buy there locally made coffee. 

If your a coffee drinker, you hit the jackpot by stopping here. You can be bland and have your self a regular but delicious cup of hot or iced coffee, or you can get creative and try there wide range of espresso beverages made to order. 
My favorite coffee is there sugar maple nut and no no flavor shots here. It's how the coffee beans are made. 

Not a coffee drinker? 

Good thing they have frozen teas, freshly squeezed juices, hot chocolates, and smoothies! 

I find myself here as often as I find the time too. The music is defiantly a plus, songs you wanna here in a coffee shop that remind you of the older days, were you enjoy a cup of Joe and read the newspaper no computers or wifi. 

Overall delicious beverages, yes they also have fresh bakery treats too. 

Stop here for your next coffee break, before exploring (or after) the beautiful Historic Mohawk  trail 
I've stopped in at the Coffee Roasters several times when in the area.  I'd heard great things about their coffee ... all of them true!  It is a tasty blend and accompanied by one of their in-house bakery items makes a great pause in a day of travel or if out for a short jaunt.
The counter staff are very kind. The selection of coffees freshly brewed (about 8) is like a banquet.  Good baked goods    (cookies , cakes , danish)  
Conveniently located right on the Mohawk Trail. Shelburne Falls Coffee Roasters offers a great selection of coffees from around the world. Their breakfast sandwiches are excellent and made fresh to order. They have a decent selection of pastries and baked goods. A great place to stop if your looking for a quick coffee or bite to eat before work. 
Early in the day they have a nice selection of muffins/pastries to go along with the many choices of coffee and tea.
Local business supplying us with great coffee. They are also generous to local charities. The folks are friendly and they know what they are doing. If you love really good coffee and don't miss this. Way better than Starbucks and Dunkin.
On a recent trip to Shelburne Falls, I stopped at the Shelburne Falls Coffee Roasters on Route 2.  It's in a converted small farm house, with two rooms for seating on either side of the central entrance/coffee area.  The young woman working there was very welcoming--she set such a pleasant tone that rather than just grabbing a coffee and leaving, I decided to sit and sip.  I also added a slice of their coffee cake to go with my coffee.  It was delicious--a moist cinnamon swirl coffee cake.  That with a cup of their black coffee--and it's a treat to be savored.  If I lived closer, I'd be a regular!
So convenient, right on route 2, and so fast, you can get in and out in a flash.  I stop at the Shelburne Falls Coffee Roasters whenever I'm going to a meeting and need something that will wow everyone.  The coffee cake, scones, muffins, and pastries all get high marks.... and the coffee is great.
The review should be for their store on King Street in Northampton, but that location isn't listed in trip advisor. 

The coffee (triple-shot Americanos) was really exceptional. That alone would make it worth many repeat visits; but the muffins that they served were top-notch bakery quality. 

I'll definitely return to any of their locations. 
This is a frequent stop along the road traveled to our families 2nd home in West Dover VT. It is a ritualistic and conditioned as a caffeinated pavlovian response upon our arrival and departure. Like a carrier pigeon returning home on instinct our tastebuds start to water as we get close to the right hand turn off Mohawk Trail and head up Cohlrane. This organically brewed, fair trade coffee roaster has honed their craft to perfection. My personal favorite is a Hazelnut and French Roast Mix. Also on the personal favorite list are the brownies and scones. Flavors and varieties vary. It is a minimum two lb stop on the way home.
Love grabbing a drink and snack at this place. Service is always nice and helpful, pretty consistent in what they do here. Bagels usually disappear pretty fast here because they are so good, with cream cheese or as a breakfast sandwich. All of their pastries are pretty fresh and taste great too. I don't have a specific favorite from this place because all if it is so good. Iced or hot, they tend to get it right.

We visit family in Health and stop at the coffee roasters going up and down the mountain.  GREAT coffee and lots of choices says my husband.  Wait staff is friendly and helpful.  I'm a tea drinker and always find a great pastry to accompany my selection of chai.  Take advantage of their buyers cards if you are stopping often.  If you have the time to sit enjoy the atmosphere and local chit chat.  If the weather is good play a round of pitch & putt in the back.  Just watch out for the migrating geese!!!!
Remember the Chock Full of Nuts slogan? It seems that that's been taken up by Shelburne Coffee Roasters. Great coffees & pastries. 
While the baked goods here are excellent I often have found that the coffe in the pump dispensers is lukewarm. The staff will reheat it for you if you ask but I can warm over left over coffee at home for free. Good baked item, so so coffee. Best thing is that the location on Route 2 is handy for commuters.
Lots of choices of good coffee and pastries in a fun little country spot.  My favorite is the white chocolate dipped biscotti with almonds.  Most people do take out but you can also find a quiet corner to read a newspaper.  Love it.
Great pastries; excellent coffee with many choices; relaxing comfy places to sit with your coffee (inside or out)
I always eat here before the Bridge of Flowers 10K. The food is always good. Get the French toast and hash.  Coffee if good. 

My only complaint is orange juice. It's served in a bottle and warm. Although they do give a glass of ice.
Bonnie, who runs the show here, takes your order and then cooks it up herself (at least at slow times.) We were here late morning on a weekday, so past the time many are eating breakfast, but she woke up my husband with a great cup of coffee and made us some very tasty food. I had the special omelette (Greek) and he had pancakes, and the price was definitely a good value. We had been camping in the area and just needed a break from cooking on the fire. This hit the spot! It's very convenient from Route 2, and the service is friendly. Bonnie also sells things like local maple syrup and baked goods to go!
We ate breakfast here last week. Everyone was very satisfied with their order. The staff is welcoming and informative. The breakfast options were vast. We definitely intend to keep Trail TOC Diner in our plans next year when we revisit the area.
If you are in the area and hungry for classic breakfast or lunch, you should go here.  The ingredients are farm fresh.  The owner/cook Bonnie not only caters to her customers, but is a caterer as well.  The breakfast was great-omelettes, blueberry pancakes, bacon, etc.,  all pleasantly served by our waiter Chris.

And allergy suffers/celiacs, etc. should take comfort in the care taken by Bonnie/Chris to assure customers enjoyed their meal without problems. The home fries were cooked separately by Bonnie to assure no cross-contamination, and Chris wore gloves when serving the gluten free orders that were requested.

Well worth the stop-enjoy
Everything about my breakfast here was enjoyable. The food, the atmosphere, my dining companions. I have been back once since my first time, and I certainly do plan to return again! The real maple syrup is a great extra touch :) Thanks Bonnie!
Driving from PA we made a special stop here to see Bonnie and have a great breakfast.  It was a few days before Christmas and Bonnie let us in on a secret, she was surprising families staying at a local hotel with a hot Christmas breakfast.  Hats off to her!!!
Stopped in for breakfast and was pleasantly surprised. Great food and prices. ( unlimited coffee included with many breakfast choices) Eggs Benedict, corned beef hash, home fries, creamy eggs and crispy bacon......just some of the most delicious breakfast items that we tried and loved. Would definitely return.Very pleasant and friendly staff as well. Do not miss this one!


Sweet diner with good prices and good food.  The whole family (two teenagers and their parents) ate every bit!  They even had specials that used fresh local produce.  Make sure to ask about the rubber duckies that are all around the place - it's a fun story.  When we were there they were accepting cash only, so come prepared.
Read a review raving about the homemade bisciuts and sausage gravy offered at the Trail Toc and had to try them. We arrived around 10:00am and found a cozy family diner. We were greated warmly and coffee was served. Had a great variety of breakfast options on the menu. I , of course, ordered the biscuit gravy plate. Scumptious! Hubby had their homemade hash and was also delish. Staff was great! Will return if in the area.
This is my favorite place to stop and get a rubin. I seriously have yet to find another restaurant in town that makes one better. Fresh thick slices of rye toast and homemade corned beef. If you're in for breakfast get the fill em up. It's reasonably priced and will leave you stuffed. Not to mention the corned beef hash is homemade and absolutely delicious!  
I love coming here for breakfast. They have the most delicious chocolate chip pancakes. We've had other excellent breakfast food as well and you can get real maple syrup instead of the other stuff. This is a great place to stop for a bite to eat- better than what you will find in Greenfield (especially for breakfast).
As I said in my previous review, we did stop back in Dec.  We tried dinner which you can only get on a Fri. nite.  Bonnie & staff out did themselves.  Dinner was wonderful, only a few options(which is nice).  Great comfort food on a cold Dec. nite.  Thank you again Bonnie. We will see you next year.  I hope everyone who reads these reviews takes  the opportunity to stop in.
Awesome little diner! We have been a few times, and she has gone above and beyond for our finicky 6 year old son! Food is delicious, and the service fast and curtius! Nice gem on Route 2!
Love the quick and courteous service, sweet potato fries and turkey club sandwiches! The place is clean, food is fresh, and experience is thoroughly enjoyable. a dependable quality diner experience, and good value for your money!
We found this place on the Mohawk Trail while driving to NH from PA. Breakfast was wonderful , we actually stopped on our way back to PA for a hearty breakfast to get us through the long drive. Bonnie (owner) & staff couldn't have been friendlier, their hospitality was above and beyond.  We are returning to NH in Dec. and guess where we are stopping on the way up!
This is the best diner I have tried in all the Western Massachusetts. Traditional good American food at a reasonable price. Kind and efficient service. Also the surrounding environment (Mohawk Trail) is nice. The place is perfect for a Sunday brunch.
The pancakes are the best I have ever had in the USA.
Great breakfast!  Excellent pancakes, real maple syrup, superb omelettes, homefries, large portions.  Quick and friendly service.  Owner on site all the time.  Open for breakfast and lunch seven days a week.  Free wifi.  Breakfast for two for under $20.  Great place.
This is our second time at this unique restaurant. The food, the service, the views and the customer service is absolutely wonderful. The restaurant suggestion  for breakfast is the Finnish egg bake. All four of us ordered this wonderful breakfast with some fresh sausage and as I was with a table of coffee "experts" they were all so very impressed by the level of taste in the coffee. The waitress and the host and hostesses really go out of the way to welcome you. 

The restaurant is about 2 miles off Route 2/ Mohawk trail. Follow the signs -a unique, full Maple House with a past a present and a delicious future!
Take the family, go solo - go try their food.
Couldn't believe my luck when I found out Davenport Maple Farm was open for business in the summer time Saturday and Sunday from 8a-3p.  Yay!  I visited on a Sunday around 10:45 am.  They were busy as several large parties had the same idea I had to come in for a late breakfast on a lazy Sunday morning.  Even though the place was packed, we were seated with smiles and served quickly considering the crowd.

I love coming here for the great food and of course, their amazing maple syrup.  We usually follow up our meal with a hike to the fire tower to get some fresh farm air and great views of the Pioneer Valley.  The farm is a great place to wander around.

You can come here in sugaring season to see the sap boiling and you can come here in the fall to enjoy the autumn colors.  Now you can also come here in the summer to soak up the warm sunshine.  Breakfast and lunch items galore are on the menu.  A small jug of their maple syrup is their gift to you when you order pancakes or waffles.  Plenty to drizzle on your breakfast and even some left to take home to enjoy later.  
Food is very good here..relaxed atmosphere , friendly.Rustic interior..
VERY expensive we thought but we're locals  and it just seems very expensive for breakfast..
This very out-of-the-way place is open only a few weekends until Easter.  They have recently added dates during fall foliage season.  Their breakfasts are enhanced with their own eggs and maple syrup.  Maple products are sold on site, and you can go down below the restaurant  and watch syrup being made.  This is a working farm, selling, among other things, eggs, produce, and hay.  The staff is very friendly and efficient.  Be prepared to wait for a table--and it's well worth it.
Sunday's in Late February and March in New England have been a traditional drive and experience for maple sugar houses. Davenports is in the western part of the state as are many other sugar houses. This has been owned and operated by the original Davenport family. The breakfast is served until 3PM weekends until early April. The menu is usual breakfast fare with a few different things like Finnish Pancakes. The wait was exceptionally long and the food was OK. Nothing special except the inclusion of pure maple sugar products. If you are sensitive to odors and poor ventilation, consider not going inside. The space is small and imagine what your house would smell like with no ventilation and cooking pancake's for hours...
The evaporator is downstairs and the family member tending to it is quit friendly and knowledgeable. A good experience for kids of all ages.
The view from atop that hill is absolutely stunning and worth the drive by itself.
Sometimes the best finds are by sheer accident.

Biannually, since we were children, my family - this time just my mother an me, go to a well known sugar house early just to get a place in line. This time, fate was not on my side as we arrived and there was already a long line ....but then again, fate was on my side; we found Davenports Maple Farm and Sugar House Restaurant. What at spectacular find!

When I "googled" "breakfast in Shelburne, Massachusetts", Davenports Restaurant popped right up. So we were game and since we knew nothing except it was close, we went.  The building is unassuming, the road to the restaurant filled with curves and beautiful views of the Berkshires and the clientele as friendly as if we were all cousins at a family reunion. Davenports really is one of those rare places that everyone must journey to- but call ahead for a table!

Warmly greeted at the door of this pristinely clean and small restaurant, we put our names in for a table and after a short wait where we got to see the sugaring process abs a six day old calf, we were seated with a party if six. We immediately struck up a conversation and got even more suggestions on what to eat. The maitre'd had suggested the Gluten free waffles with chocolate chips which looked amazing but the family we sat with said in unison "we must try the Finnish pancakes!" OH MY GoD- heaven on a plate, hot, fluffy, eggy, a hint of sweet - this is goose bump food.

The scrambled eggs, The sausage was light, flavorful and moist. The home made wheat bread toast- an award winner morning bread. If all this wasn't enough,  the bill came and it was ridiculously cheap. 

The farm store in the restaurant was too much to bear so we ended up buying some wonderful homemade delicacies that made everyone at home, jealous.

Davenports is that rare place  where terrific food, friendly staff and superb excellence exist. Get in the car now and get there before the close for the season in 3 weeks because you will have to wait until Labor Day for them to reopen. Bravo! Bravo!


We decided to go to Davenport's when the sugar house we usually go to had a super long wait. The atmosphere is exactly what you want for a quintessential fall trip in New England with beautiful views and family friendly welcome but we were disappointed by the food. Once seated we waited for a very long time (an hour) and when we finally got our pancakes all of them were burnt. We had waited so long for them that we didn't want to send them back and looking around it seemed everyone in the packed place had super dark pancakes too. I love to support local family owned business but I'm not sure I'd try them again. I did enjoy the coffee and sausage and wandering around the farm but not the pancakes. 
Every year we truck up to Davenport's for maple syrup and pancakes with a view. In years past we had small kids and seeing  the animals was an important part of the visit but now it's just adults and we still sample the syrup right from the boiling tank.We still are amazed at the size of the pancake platters (although we always manage to finish every morsel). And the view. It's spectacular!
Headed out to Davenport Maple Farm for the very first time today.  They are open for a limited number of days and hours in the fall and early spring.  So comfortable and casual and the food was terrific.  Fluffy pancakes, homemade strawberry-rhubarb jam, and made-to-order omelets...yumm!  We tried a Finnish pancake- totally delicious.  

The maple syrup is amazing.  Everyone who orders food gets a small bottle of Davenport's maple syrup to take with them.  I have never seen another place do this.  We enjoyed their syrup on our food and then got to take the rest home with us to enjoy later.  Sweet (literally!)

Check this place out if you haven't already.  Just a few miles off Route 2.  The drive is beautiful.  They serve breakfast and lunch.  We're going back next weekend to eat one of their burgers made from their own grass-fed beef.  We're going to hike up some of the trails around the farm if the weather is good.
Every year we visit Davenport Maple Farm restaurant for their delicious fresh maple syrup breakfast.  It's a long way up the hill, but a nice view when you get to the top.  Get there before 9 if you don't want to wait.  We arrived around 10 we had about a 40 minute wait.  You go into the front entrance to put your name on a list then go down to the sap room to see them boiling in action.  It's great for kids and it smells wonderful!  They have syrup and  other assorted maple candy items for sale.  It's $20 for a Quart, which is reasonable and you're supporting a local business.  They also have cows on the farm for kids to go see while waiting or for walking off your breakfast.  I enjoyed 1 large blueberry pancake... they give you each your own small maple syrup bottle to use and take home your leftovers if there are any!!  The sausage is great and the finnish pancakes are delicious too.  It's a great place to create a family tradition.  They are open limited seasonal, so visit their website for hours, directions, etc... Open Weekends Feb 28 thru April 5 8:00AM to 3:00PM
This place is fairly hard to find. It is off Rte 2 heading towards Shelburne Falls. Once off the highway, you go on a winding road that as one friend said "several Steven King novels start like this". The road pretty much ends at the Davenport Maple Farm. And in addition to being hard to find, it is only open six weekends per year. Six. March to April. That is probably the most exclusive and limited selection of dining times I have encountered. 
Once inside, seating is at large dining hall tables, you will be sitting with other guests, but this isn't really a problem. The decor is early 70's wood paneling, each coffee mug on your table is  a different design and different origin-a nice touch. Since they make Maple syrup right on site (directly under the dining room to be exact), the main draw is pancakes, waffles and french toast. (Burgers-large and fresh, and hot dogs are also available). The prices might be a bit high for some ($8.50 for one pancake), but there is a catch. Each order comes with a small jug of their own maple syrup, which is yours to take with you when you leave. These jugs are for sale at four bucks a pop, so the high menu prices are ameliorated by this treat. Pancakes and waffles are very fresh, a little mealy in my opinion, but unique. Regular breakfast items like eggs and bacon are also on the menu. I'd go there again in a heartbeat, but good luck finding it again, and call ahead to see if they are actually open. Twelve days a year,  that's it. Good luck!
If you are looking for an authentic sugar house with a great classic menu, it's worth a trip off Route 2 up Little Mohawk Road to Davenports Maple Farm. A great location and view, with fresh eggs from the farm and local bacon and sausage. Dining area overlooks the boiling room, and if Russ is there you can tap the wisdom of his 80 plus years of farm experience.  Try the Dutch Babies for a change of pace, and take home maple candy treats, fresh eggs and of course syrup. Can be pricy for a large group, but great for a special treat. Open only a few weeks during sugaring season, so call to be sure you can get in, but don't miss it.
We bypassed the popular Gould's Sugar House on Route 2 and drove a few miles up the hills, through the orchards and fields to Davenport Farm and Sugar House, on Tower Rd.  A warm Sunday in mid-March, we waited an hour for our spots at one of the tables, but the wait was worth it. Each pancake or Finnish Pancake (like a Dutch Baby) breakfast was served with a little take-home bottle of Davenport's maple syrup. The Sugar House is only open for dining for a few weekends during sugaring off. While we waited, we watched the maple sap be turned into maple syrup, picked up some fresh eggs, and checked out the animals at the farm. The homemade breads,  maple sugar candy and maple candied peanuts.  were also worth nabbing. A great  little adventure.
We had Smokey Bro's cater an event and it was fabulous! Any leftovers were gone next day! Better than Charleston BBQ, not sure how better ti compare....
Not to be missed. Premier roadside BBQ  joint at its very best by superior pit master. Only regret Smoky not open year round and only from Friday to Sunday seasonally. Excellent pricing and generous quantity.
best bbq  I've ever had. Huge portions and super friendly. Can't wait to go back and try some more. They change the menu all the time. You def won't be disappointed.
We had to drive to this place but it was worth it. The beef brisket plate size was great and brisket was both juicy and delicious. Cole slaw and corn bread sides should have been made there, because they were fresh. The picnic tables near the road are cute. But note that they are only open Friday to Sunday.
Their meat is very moist, smoky and flavorful. The sides are good too- mac and cheese, beans, coleslaw and cornbread were great. They serve big portions so you won't leave hungry. They have a few picnic tables so you can eat outside.
Nice hole in the wall bbq stop.   Picnic tables to eat on.   Outside smoker giving off mouth watering smells.   Best bbq ribs we ever had.  Staff was great.  Prices great.   Homemade mac and cheese ok.  But this is the place for smoked meats.   Ribs chicken pork roast beef.   Right next to a Mohawk trail souvenir store.   Loved it.  Will stop for ribs again on next road trip.
Smoke master with great food at fair prices. Best ribs anywhere, unfortunately only open Fri-Sun and seasonal. Well worth the trip up Rt 2.
We have been going to Gould's for years. It was the atmosphere, the gift store, the maple products. What a shame so many things have been let to pass. 

We went to Gould's late last spring - so disappointing. Very little in the gift store, that set the tone. The food was not what it used to be - portions had dropped, quality was "eh" but the friendliness of Mrs. Gould is amazing. Someone should speak to the kitchen - it is not what it was.

Pancakes were not mixed well and the eggs were underdone. There were two of us and yet we both loved the place we were surprised by the lack ot attention to detail. Prices do not match the food.
We left our hotel early to make the drive. Oh what a disappointment it was closed. It was 8:00 am. I thought this can't be today is a holiday.... well I don't know what made me call I just wanted to hear the recording.  And to my happy surprise the recording said they open at 8:30. So we had a good laugh..drove to town and came back 20 minutes later. 
And there was a line all the way from the door to the parking lot.
The pancakes were amazing and I'm so thankful they were open.
Gould's Sugar House is located right on the Mohawk Trail (Route 2 in Massachusetts) and is a must-stop for our family whether we are leaf-peeping in the fall, traveling to a powwow in the summer, or enjoying sugaring off in late winter/early spring. We have never been disappointed!

We are far from Gould's only fans, and we know to plan for a long wait. Fortunately, they have a lot to see and do: There's a video of the sugaring operation. There is the evaporator which, in season, is keeping the lower level nice and warm and smelling great. There are maple ice cream cones (a bargain at 25 cents!) There is a nice gift shop with handmade and carefully chosen items at reasonable prices. Depending on the season, one can buy cider, cheese, apples, pumpkins and of course, maple products. In spring there may be ducks on the pond and the folks at Gould's will give you food to feed them. This year there were Morris dancers performing in the parking lot!

When your party is called, you will be seated in what seems to be the upper story of a very old barn, at rustic wooden tables and benches. The menu is pretty basic: pancakes and waffles with bacon or sausage, eggs, toast, and a few lunch items such as burgers. The main attraction, of course, is the maple syrup. And the dish of pickles that is brought to your table when you sit down - proving that this is an authentic New England sugar operation! The sausage and bacon and generally their own and quite tasty. These are the best pancakes I've had anywhere; I say this every time I eat there - even better than the ones I make! And the dairy products all shine - after all, Gould's sells milk to Cabot!

Gould's has been a family operation for several generations. The restaurant is in addition to all the other farm and sugaring chores. I have never encountered anyone who seemed tired or out of sorts, no matter how large the crowds may have been. Everyone who is working there seems glad to see us and happy to help us to another great experience.

I don't remember the first time I ate at Gould's but I know it was well over twenty years ago. I bring my children and their children fairly often, and they all look forward to it. If we don't do anything else on a Mohawk Trail trip, we MUST eat at Gould's!
Let me start by saying we technically have never been to the Sugar House while they were open. But our friends served us Gould's Syrup while visiting and we couldn't go home without taking some with us. Luckily we drove by the Sugar House, which is currently close for the season, and the owners were outside so our friends (who knew the owners) stopped and we were able to purchase our own bottle! I don't typically like real maple syrup, I usually like the fake supermarket type but this stuff is SO GOOD! Grade A and light amber! I am in love! 
We have been going to Gould's for 40+ years!  Best pancakes imaginable!  Only open during Sugaring Season in March and Fall Season starting Labor Day weekend.. Don't miss it...
I must begin by saying that I am a complete fanatic when it comes to pancakes. I drive across the U.S. at least once or twice a year and seek out the best of the best pancake places. Until now, there have been two that were tied for first place (Pamela's in Pittsburgh, PA and Pancake Pantry in Nashville, TN). 

But now it's a 3 way tie. Gould's was amazing! I have passed the place many times and never stopped when I saw the over-filled parking lot and lines out the door, but I was in the area last week, not in a hurry, and decided I wanted to try it. The pancake gods smiled on me because I was alone, and despite a huge wait list, there was a single high seat at a counter overlooking the kitchen and my name was on it, so I was seated in 3 minutes flat and surveyed the chefs making armies of pancakes and frying up eggs, sausages, and bacon.  I had a short stack of the plain pancakes and some bacon, topped of course with real maple syrup. At the first bite, I knew these were special pancakes, but the more I ate, the more I realized that this was indeed a new contender for best pancakes in the USA. The place is closed much of the year and does not have an extensive menu, but if you like pancakes, this IS the place.
We have been making the trip to Gould's Sugarhouse for over 50 years. At least once in the spring when they are making the maple syrup and once in the fall to look at nature's color book in the mountains.
What better way to stop than having a plate of the most delicious lite pancakes with REAL maple syrup! Just wish it was open all of the time and not just a short time in spring and fall.
We were on the Mohawk Trail, looking for breakfast as we had set off from Albany that morning without. After almost giving up on finding anywhere, we whizzed past a red building that advertised breakfast pancakes. I told my husband to go back, as I knew he wanted pancakes. What a great place for breakfast, and good coffee too. (I hate it when restaurants serve weak dishwater for coffee). The waitress brought us a small dish of sour pickles (which I guess were to compensate for the sweet maple syrup?) They were crunchy and some of the best pickles i have eaten. They were made on the premises, and when I asked if we were able to buy some, she replied that they had sold out of them within the first week!
I ordered the eggs, sausage and toasted English muffin. It was perfect. The sausage, delicious (apparently made off site but to their recipe). My husband had the blueberry pancakes with a side of sausage. I had to try a bit of his pancakes. They were fluffy, light, full of blueberries, and they melted in the mouth. The Maple syrup was also delicious. (I know I'm using the word "delicious" a lot, but it's the only word I can think of to describe the food.).

After breakfast, the elderly lady who runs the place visited each table and spent some time with the customers answering any questions and telling us the history of the place. We left the restaurant, and went to the gift shop where they sold maple syrup flavoured icecream cones for 25c. All I can say is "delicious"! That's my review summed up in one word...delicious.
First, this is not really once in MY lifetime as i am from this area but i am sure that there are many of you who have never been to a REAL sugar house.  Gould's has been open for 55 years and Mrs. Gould, now a widow for several years, still greets customers as they enter.  the "restaurant" is basically a barn that has been covered to a restaurant.  it is only open during the season while the maple sap is running which is the beginning of march to the end of april.  we went during their last weekend for the year which was april 25.  this is a working farm, and in the spring they tap the maple trees on their property and transport the sap to the barn when they boil it down to maple syrup in a large metal pan over a wood fire.  needless to say, it smells wonderful.  it takes about 40 gallons of sap to make one gallon of syrup, and believe me, there is nothing like having fresh, warm syrup over your pancakes or waffles.  the restaurant only services breakfast--pancakes, waffles with bacon or sausage.  they have sour pickles to eat with the meal to neutralize some of the sweetness from the syrup.  sounds crazy but it works and is really good.  nothing fancy here but REALLY GOOD.  so throw on your overalls, and stop by in the spring.  dress warmly.  there is a small gift shop attached and they still have maple flavored soft serve ice cream cones (if you have room) for $.25!!  you can also buy fresh syrup--$50/gallon for this year.  try it out as it will not be around forever!!
This is the peak of the sugaring season here in New England and because of the heavy snow, the sap run was late!  We stopped here for lunch, pancakes and sausage with Gould's own maple syrup.  Wonderful!  The pancakes are very large, plate sized, and unless you are very hungry, don't order the 3-stack!  They make their own sausage also, and it is delicious! They have a very limited menu, mostly breakfast items, but most people come in for pancakes or corn fritters with maple syrup.  It's a little pricy and you always have to wait for a table.  We waited almost an hour, but the food was great!
We've been going to Gould's Sugar House for something like 50 years now. My first visit was when I was probably 7-8 years old, and we still try to get there every year. It's still family owned and operated. The antique timber frame barn setting is as genuine as you can get, the food is excellent, the coffee hot and robust, and the people are warm and friendly. We went again this morning, a Wednesday, and found no waiting at all at 10AM. Often times the wait can be lengthy, especially on weekends, but when they are boiling sap it is fun to watch. There is a small gift shop to browse as well. I always have the waffle and and sausage, served with their syrup and sharp dill pickles it can't be beat.
I once kept a postcard of Gould's taped next to my bed as a touchstone for the perfect maple syrup experience. In March it's the only good thing that happens: pancakes, maple syrup, homemade sausages.....and pickles. Late morning, sitting at a wooden table in an old barn, snow melting outside, smoke rising......nirvana in New England. It doesn't get any better than this.
Went here for breakfast one morning on a local recommendation.  The best part was the maple syrup.  Not that there was anything wrong with the food or atmosphere and the service was good but the prices seemed far out of line with the rest of the world.  2 blueberry pancakes plus coffee for two of us came to $28+ (tax and tip included).  Everything was a la carte.  The area was beautiful with fall colors, the gift shop was typical.  The best part was the maple ice cream cone for 25 cents!  What a difference from the restaurant prices.  Bring your wallet if you go.
Not only is the maple syrup fantastic, but they have perfected the pancake! Sausage was delicious, and the pickles! Who knew it was ok to have pickles for breakfast? Our waitress explained that they cleanse the palate after the sweet maple, and Mrs. Gould makes them herself. Reasonably proved, great atmosphere with lots of history on display. Make sure you stop by!
All been said before. Best Pancakes I've ever had, and I'm no rookie. Plan for an hour or two wait.  My only excuse for waiting over 50 years to come here is it's an hour away...worth the trip, worth the wait, Won't miss coming next fall....

BTW..there are many more reviews for Goulds under 'attractions'
Darling cabin style restaurant right off the Mohawk Trail (Route 2). Loved trying authentic Maple syrup with great, personal service. Must try breakfast stop if staying in the area.
You want a great experience and a part of what New England is. Maple Syrup is as New England as gets! They only open during the season and usually you will see them weighing deer for the hunters out in the parking lot in the fall as well. Maybe that's not for every one but it's a part of our heritage of working the land, farming, hunting, fishing, etc. the staff here are nice honest people and the food is good. 
赤い壁のカフェです。駐車場は車でいっぱいで、入店まで　ならびました。カフェでは　美味しいパンケーキがいただけました。こちらのパンケーキはバターの香りがたっぷりで、食べごたえがありました。デザートに　ソフトクリームをいただきましたが
メープルのフレーバーでリッチなコクでした。
We stopped for lunch and had onion rings and French fries that tasted awful, I suppose from cooking in bad oil.  Also gave me an upset stomach.  I've always liked this place as it is pleasant and nicely sited, and generally looks clean and tables not too close together.  BUT several times I've been bothered by flies in the dining room and now I know why:  there are uncovered trash barrels outside swarming with flies.  So I regretfully will not eat there again.  I will still purchase apples and goods from the bakery section which seems to be okay.  I love their off-beat little gift shop too with so many locally made products such as honey and maple syrup.  Too bad about the restaurant.  Oh, and they have installed a very loud buzzer for when the outer doors open which blasts away constantly and is unpleasant.  What a downer.
New cooks who need lessons!  My mother ordered a Western sandwich....came with a fried egg on burnt toast and onions and peppers on top of the egg instead of in it! We are locals and eat there often in the past but this really was quite an eye opener! No longer bake their own breads which was the reason we went there. They use store bought bread now. Who's brilliant idea was this? Cut corners and lose business. Apparently the restaurant is not important anymore. Hired some young girls who know nothing about cooking and you get a place where even the locals don't frequent and unsuspecting out of towners won't come back either at least not to eat. Otherwise local apples and baked items are good.
stopped there with a co-worker for breakfast this morning. never asked us if we wanted coffee. okay we gave her our order, i had pancakes, he had steak. i was very surprised when he received his steak FIRST...then was told that the pancakes were almost done...WHAT???. obviously the cook could not make more than one breakfast at a time. i finally got my pancakes..with a shot of syrup on the side. we never saw the woman again until she came and asked if i wanted to take the other half of my pancakes home with me...i said NO....i would have liked to have more syrup while my pancakes were warm. so we wasted an hour and half for crappy service...thanks but no thanks
Pine Hill Orchard is a great place to go for a country drive.  They sell their  own apples, also have a separate room for beer and wine and another room for produce, apples and dairy products.  Then there is the main room for all sorts of goodies.  The restaurant is in the back.  It has several tables most with a view of the pond and geese.  The prices are reasonable and the food is good.  The lunch menu consists of sandwiches, burgers, dogs, soup, etc.  I would highly recommend continuing up the road which goes into Vt.  It's very scenic.
I love the many varieties of apples and apple related products. Try the cider with a cider donut. Yum.  And don't forget to say hello to the bunny. 
On a Sunday morning drive, we stopped here for breakfast.  The combo breakfast menu was hearty and complete and listed all the favorites so my husband ordered his favorite - the two eggs, bacon, fried potatoes and toast. The sides menu listed Corned Beef Hash which sounded good to me so I ordered that with one fried egg, over easy.  The bright sunny dining area with windows to the ceiling along one wall was full and very busy with one very nice lady doing all the waiting on the tables.  She could certainly multi-task!  We had a cup of coffee while we waited, but we did not have to wait for long.  The breakfast was served hot and spot on.  And she kept our coffee mugs filled, too.  The corned beef was really corned beef and not a minced up mystery meat - delicious!  And the egg was done properly as well and not served upside down as often is the case.  We will be going back!
If not the worlds best blueberry pancakes, close enough. Great breakfast, lunch, pies, and fruits. They also sell meats from local farms. 
A local gem and a must stop if you are taking the shot cut between exit 27 off I-91 and Wilmington VT. Restaurant is open for Breakfast and Lunch 7 days a week for eat in or take out.  The food is good basic fare priced right with delightful service.  Fresh baked pastry, pies and bread to take away and - of course - wonderful New England Apples grown in their own orchards.
Very good American food for breakfast and lunch and the best breakfasts in the area.  Food is generous, well-cooked, pleasantly served in a spacious, clean dining room connected an interesting gift shop and apple sales room.  A favorite stop.
This is a jewel. Seating very few people, the atmosphere is a little Paris bistro. Michaelangelo cooking in the kitchen is like watching an artist at work. The serving staff is always friendly and professional. Wine list superb, and the menu is always creative and offers a vegetarian, beef, fish and chicken dish. Duck confit appetizer is a favorite. And the chocolate pot de creme for dessert never disappoints.
Great place to eat.   Gourmet food, imo, reasonable priced.    The food is fresh, the management is interested in the customer, and this small restaurant is just cool.
The menu has several different meals and our group was very pleased w/ the food.
My wife & I stopped at the Bridge of Flowers on a trip to Lee, MA. We went into the Gypsy Apple for lunch. The food was absolutely wonderful. The service was excellent. The price was good. We were very comfortable.
So happy that our original first choice was full...this was so fantastic!!  Our waitress, Ivy, was so welcoming and personable! The menu is limited, but that is certainly no minus since everyone's entrees were delicious!  Steak, chicken breast , salmon all beautifully done and presented. Interesting wine list as well as good beer selection.  A tiny gem in a unique little town...go😘
My son dined at the Gypsy Apple in fall, 2014 and hasn't stopped talking about this meal ever since!  It is a small restaurant with one waitress serving all of the tables. He consistently states that this is the best restaurant he has EVERY visited.  He rates it higher than a 5 star restaurant we visited in Virginia.  
We stopped there for lunch in May, 2016.  The asparagus soup, salad, and mashed potatoes were delicious.   The chicken and omelet were good, but not great.  However, the cheesecake for dessert was worth the wait! Overall, a delicious lunch experience.
My wife and I wanted to share our diamond in the rough with this excellent bistro.. We visited our favorite place yesterday seating at table 7 which has had multiple memories in the past to celebrate our anniversary...Food, wine, service, and atmosphere was superb as always with our gracious owners Amy(waitress) and Mike (chef)...The restaurant seats approximately 20 in total but if you want the very best do yourself a favor and travel to Shelburne Falls, MA and visit this excellent bistro.. You will not be disappointed!! Thanks to Amy and Mike for making this a special day!!
This tiny restaurant in the village of Shelburne Falls is a gem. The chef, Michaelangelo, iß indeed, an artist. The food is absolutely delicious and the ambiance is lovely. Reservations are recommded.
What Michaelangelo and his wife Amy have created is an experience best described as wonderful chemistry. From the softly lit and well-appointed, cozy dining room, with an eclectic selection of jazz subtly playing in the background to the graceful and warmhearted service - that is just the beginning.  Then comes Michaelangelo’s dishes which you hear him preparing beyond the glass block wall that separate the dining room and kitchen.  His craft produces dishes that represent a passion, individuality, boldness and amazing skill - inventive but still within in the confines of the familiar.  I have an appreciation for everything from the food truck scene in Austin, Texas to world-renowned Michelin-star restaurants, and much in between – but I have never experienced a restaurant that brings all components so naturally together as the Gypsy Apple does.  I have had a number of memorable meals there and while the food, service and ambience provide a wonderful backdrop, there is a fourth component which can only be described as a great ‘vibe’ or chemistry one experiences with the place.  An establishment that has and continues to raise the ‘culinary bar’ in the region and sends patrons away with fond memories and a wish to return.
Lets get this out of the way.  The space is small, with only a few dozen seats.  Tables can be a bit close. The menu is limited - not page after page of options. BUT the food, service and did I mention the food? All five stars. 

I'm not going to ding a Bistro for being true to its name in atmosphere so this gets the full five. The lighting and decor are delightful and perfect for the space. The service was impeccable and the wine pairings we were recommended were spot on.  The olive tapenade and fresh bread were the perfect opener. My steak was done exactly as ordered and the sauce was delicately flavored. Just enough to let the meat sing with every bite. 

One recommendation is to call the afternoon before to get a reservation. The place is small and we saw walk ins turned away.  (At first we thought this was odd as there were two tables open at the time and they stayed open for a while, but a party came in about 45 minutes later and filled them up.  I really appreciate a business that doesn't take a chance on having a true reservation wait just to squeeze in another seating for the evening.)
This restaurant is a small gem.Delightful service, fantastic and imaginative restaurant ..what a delight.Looking for a special evening out,this is it.
Gypsy Apple is an hour from our house so we go there for special occasions. My birthday fell on Sep 24, so off we went. It has about 24 seats including the outdoor patio. When we arrived, we were greeted by the absolutely delightful server, Ariana. We decided to get an appetizer as well as a main. My wife ordered the meat ravioli in mushroom broth while I ordered the duck confit. The ravioli was astonishing. The chef-owner, Michael Angelo, produced a confit that was delicious but also was without any greasiness. Her main was seared halibut on lobster/scallion mashed potato while I had the beef tenderloin with green beans and onion marmalade. Delectable.
On the drive home, we agreed that if Gypsy Applecwas closer to our house, we would be regulars. Go there. You will not be disappointed.
Gypsey Apple is our Favorite restaurant in Shelburne Falls, a funky little artsy village on the Deerfield River.  We have been enjoying this Bistro for years and visit 3 or 4  times a year, for anniversarys, birthdays, etc.  Chef Mike is talented beyond compare.  The Filet Migion is always perfect and the sides beautifully presented. We are always warmly greeted by Amy, partner, hostess and waitress and treated like we are their favorite dinner guests (as I am sure they do with all of their diners!)  Don't miss this little jewel of a place!  
this restaurant has remained my favorite in the Berkshires.  As a work or art is to an art lover, this restaurant is to the palette.  every dish is a delight to the tongue. The choices for each course are lovely, a variety of flavors, textures and aromas.  Coming to Gypsy is an opportunity to delight in a food experience, take time to savor each dish and be waited on  by the most attentive staff.  this is a MUST when you are in the area.
ALWAYS a treat and an adventure.  The food served is masterfully combined and created.  The seating/atmosphere is friendly and cordial.  The space is small -- and that is the only thing small about Gypsy Apple Bistro.  It's one of our favorite celebration venues.
Very small bistro on the main drag of a picturesque New England town - recommend reservations although there were only three parties there the night we went. (website says they open at 5 but sign on the door said 6 pm). We had asparagus soup (excellent), salad (very small for the price), salmon, and a seafood risotto, followed by coffee and one shared chocolate pot au creme for dessert. The service was good and the food quality excellent. Cost for two, with 2 glasses of wine, was about $130. Good for a splurge, I guess, but with a very limited menu, no need to go back there.
We had been wanting to try this place for a while, and we just happened to be visiting Shelburne Falls as the restaurant was opening for the evening. Squealing with delight, I pulled my husband over to Gypsy Apple's unpretentious front door and in we went.
We did not have a reservation, and this is a popular spot, but the server was able to seat us outside in a charming courtyard. Bonus!
We ordered a bottle of white wine and appetizers. I had the local asparagus soup, which tasted fresh and green and lovely. My husband went for the house-made pate which he enjoyed with fresh bread - toast rounds and hot rolls.
For my main course, I ordered the shrimp and scallops provencale, which came on a bed of risotto and had crunchy, caramelized leek strips on top. The portion was perfect - not a huge plateful, which I find very off-putting.
My husband had a filet mignon which was cooked a perfect medium rare, with mushrooms and asparagus on the side.
The wine list had some very reasonably-priced selections, and was obviously chosen with care.
We shouldn't have ordered dessert but we went for it anyway and shared a very nice peach cobbler.
Service here is in the unhurried European style, with no one coming over and asking "are you still working on that?" which drives me crazy. However, our server (who was pleasant and knowledgable) knew we were from out of town and had a long drive ahead of us, so she was prompt with our check, which was surprisingly reasonable, considering the quality of the food.
We would definitely go back, maybe in the winter after skiing.
Haven't had the time to write anything but, posted to there Facebook page when was theire; This is a jewel that is hidden! The best service from Amy & her sister. The food was outstanding, words can't describe you have to go eat and see for yourself the chef/s are truly gifted. Loved everything about the food and service, charming little place. A must to come back time & time again.
M.A. always works with the freshest ingredients keeps a limited menu but it seems to be always different. Its a true bistro. We have never been disappointed.
My husband and I had the pleasure of visiting the Gypsy Apple Bistro again last evening to celebrate his birthday. We love dining here, it is quite intimate and very cozy. It was nearly zero outside, but warm and toasty inside! We had made an early reservation for 6, were seated quickly, and given our choice of the available tables. They offer bottled microbrew beers (we are sophisticated beer drinkers) and we made our choices, which were served to us instantly and we studied the menu. While we were contemplating, a selection of delicious, warm breads, butter and a coarse tapenade were brought to accompany our drinks. We ordered the escargot with herb garlic butter, and the homemade meat ravioli in mushroom bouillon with white truffle oil and shaved Parmesan. These were so amazing--never in my life have I tasted escargot which were this delicious! The ravioli was quite rich and meaty, and the truffle aroma wafted up to greet us! We decided to share a Caesar salad which was dressed with rye breadcrumbs and white anchovies--again, outstanding. Our mains: I chose filet mignon (very rare and over 3" tall) on a bed of seasoned mash with a wild mushroom and red wine demi reduction, and roasted Brussels sprouts. My husband chose rack of lamb, (three pairs of Frenched ribs in a tower) over sautéed spinach, with a port wine demi glaze beside a square slice of gratin potatoes. We were both delighted with the flavors of these. We shared a pot de crème for dessert, which was also delicious, and just the perfect amount! We love the presentation, the professional service, and all around welcoming feel that Gypsy Apple Bistro extends.  We will return!
This is probably my favorite restaurant in western MA.  The place is small, and a reservation is highly recommended, so it’s best to plan ahead.  The food is prepared beautifully, and no matter what we’ve ordered there, it is always prepared to perfection. Wish it were closer to our home!
This place is great and accommodating. All sorts of one of a kind treats. Coffee is great. They also offer gluten free options
Good coffee and nice selection. Beautiful area near the Bridge of Flowers in Shelburne Falls. Close to the pot holes as well. 
Coffee was good but expensive. I only go there as a treat. Maybe three or four times a year. They have a small selection of food too. Good as a snack or lunch stop for travelers
If you need a little java in this very cute town, this is a good place to get it. Our coffee beverages were really good. Skip the pastries, though: ours tasted like ingredients instead of something that had come together. Very nice atmosphere and friendly staff.
Wonderful spot for a quick beer, delicious iced coffee, or sweet and savory snacks !! Check out the board for rotating micro brew selections!
This local coffee shop / cafe / local acoustic music venue is a charming stop -- a must -see if you are in the area. Great coffee and home made scones etc.  Locals all seem to know one another here, and they host excellent live local artists.  

We stopped in on a hot day to check out this classic little coffee house on the main drag. It was too hot out for hot coffee, but after inhaling the most wondrous freshly roasted coffee aromas as soon as we set foot inside, we had to get something. (No, the roasting aromas permeated every pour of our bodies for full airborne caffeination. We probably didn't NEED to get anything!) 

We had cold brewed iced coffee and it was, in the words of Teri Hatcher, spectacular! Counter service was very friendly and they had lots of other treats that looked impossibly good. They could easily charge more for this coffee. It's quite a bargain. Memorable counter scene: two sweaty women behind us who looked liked they just came off the Tour de France (judging only by their racing apparel and gear—do you really need all that stuff to go on a friggin bike ride?) searching the menu board for nitro shots. "Don't you have nitro shots here?" No. This isn't Williamsburg, ladies. Better get back to the Tour.
I regularly visit here. The hot and cold drinks, cakes and service is always consistently great. Very welcoming and good quality. Nice atmosphere and a lot going on for a small place. 
A cafe with an impressive coffee drink menu as well as smoothies and other healthy drinks.  Something for everyone. I don't usually go for those big cookies but we had a chocolate chip cookie that was fresh and tasty, really good.  But the best was the staff person who was so friendly and made a special drink that was really delicious.  I will definitely visit again when I am in the area.  Worth the small detour from the highway.
But the Oatmeal cookie was excellent! Café needs a little bit of sprucing up, but was okay for a quick coffee & tea. Not much to do in this tiny town, but it was a beautiful day and the flower bridge was in full color and not too crowed.
Stopped in for a cup of coffee while touring this quaint town. Was a bit disappointed with the lack of welcome and indifference from the individual behind the counter. Coffee was adequate. Decor is comfortable, shop is cute. If I was in town I might stop in again but I would not go out of my way. 
This place has great organic coffee and excellent baked goods.  They have entertainment every Friday and they also serve beer.
Great little coffee shop with organic coffees, wonderful pastries and breakfast sandwiches and crepes.
A bit unorganized , flavors not visible and just okay. Had the pumpkin spice which was just okay. Prices average. Service average
What a comfortable, relaxing and delicious stop on a fun, fall afternoon. Great coffee, many options and choices with smoothies as well.  Healthy options also.  Expect a line but it will be worth the wait.
Awesome stop for sweet treats and a great cup of coffee. Beautiful Shelburne Falls is like going back in time. GREAT motorcycle ride to spot. Plenty of things to see close by.
We went for a Saturday afternoon ride and stopped at Mocha Maya's for a coffee.
The best coffee I have ever had!! I have had a few good coffee's but this was the best.
Do yourselves a favor and if you are in Shelburne Fall get a coffee
This place is a great all-around place to chill. It serves very good espresso and our barista/bartender was very friendly.

We came back again later in the evening for live music and beers! They also have a great selection of wine and desserts.
Walked in to get a latte not expecting a café/playhouse/concert venue/poetry reading room, etc that also serves beer and wine! Wow!
Shelburne Falls figured prominently in the making of the film The Judge starring Robert Downey Jr and Robert Duvall and I bet more than a few quick cups of java were picked up for the set from here.  Also great folky entertainment, among the best locals to catch, Ray Mason or The Lonesome Brothers. Rustic uncomplicated and genuine.
We had butternut soup, a truffle, a brownie and a nutty ball of deliciousness in dark chocolate.... all of these were very tasty indeed. Eco friendly ethos and plenty of healthy menu choices could make this place seem a bit 'worthy', but it was actually great fun with a nice atmosphere and REALLY delicious treats. Portions are nice- you feel you have eaten a sensible amount, and because they must use good ingredients only, you also feel you have not over indulged, just eaten something really tasty but also good for you.
Great & wonderful food with beer on tap! Just a great place with a fantastic vibe! Very healthy stuff but extremely tasty. Just go and support local local folks going great things! The folks working there are also wonderful! Wish I had this in my home town. 
This was our first visit to the restaurant's "home base" in Shelburne Falls. Having indulged in their food truck offerings at several events and loving them we knew this place was a good bet! The staff were very friendly and the food was excellent as usual! SUCH great veggie options and we love the fact that the owner only uses local, in season ingredients. You get a warm feeling all over when you know exactly where your food is coming from. My husband and I had the bbq tacos and they were amazing. My sister, who isn't a vegetarian had their bbq tempeh plate and veggie tempura and LOVED it. Our 7 year old daughter requested the Indian curry and inhaled it, and our usually picky 4 year old had the squash soup and cleared her plate, barely coming up for air. I'd say that was a good bet :). I also love the fact that they served organic beer and ginger libation at a very reasonable price. We will come back for sure!
We were SO pleased that we chose this wonderful cafe for lunch on a quiet Sunday. We ordered fish and chips, falafel salad, and house made kombucha. The fish was by far the best I have ever had. It was fresh, the batter was light and crunchy, and it was served on a bed of mouthwatering french fries with a delicious house made tartar sauce. The falafel was crispy and light, and served on a bed of fresh crunchy vegetables and assorted lettuce. I can't say enough about how well they have combined a philosophy of locally sourced food with high quality deliciousness.
This place is IT!!! A much needed and most welcome and deliciously healthy and hearty place to eat. Very warm and welcoming staff. We'll definitely be back.
I grabbed lunch here with coworkers while in the area for work. I had the vegetable tempura. It was great! The other members of my group had: gazpacho, falafel, and curry dishes. Everyone enjoyed their meals. The staff was helpful and the food came quickly. I highly recommend stopping in! The iced green tea was great too! 
On the ride home from a bike ride on the Ashuwillticook Rail Trail (Pittsfield to Adams, MA), I was hungry and stopped at Hearty Eats. It''s a small, cozy restaurant (with 2 sidewalk tables as well).  The line was long but the wait was worth it.  I ordered the Far East  Bowl (Shiitake ginger sauce over  seasonal vegetables, fried tempeh, brown basmati rice & scallions) and it was tremendous.  I was tempted to order the Onion Rings because the looked really crispy and tasty.  I'll save that for the next trip.
The staff was great and I loved the atmosphere.  After my meal I strolled over to look at the falls for which the town is named.  If you are travelling on RT 2, you have to stop here
Very casual, order at the counter and bus your own dishes style.  We ate outside in the later evening and the mosquitos were a little bit of a nuisance.  There is plenty of seating indoors.

Hearty Eats is dedicated to healthy, sustainable eating.  The plates are compostable bamboo, we took them home.  They serve fish on the weekends which can be a problem for vegans because of the fryolator.  

Regardless, this was a great meal.  I chose all appetizers: beet gazpacho, rice balls with steamed greens, BBQ tempeh with cole slaw and the sample platter which was composed of pickled shredded carrots, curry, humus and falafel balls.  This was enough for two medium eaters with others sampling the platter.  The flavors were clear,  delicious and sophisticated.  We also sprang for the chocolate almond butter pudding and split it between the 4 of us- about 2 bites each.  It was smooth and did not have the whole foody
dessert quality one sometimes gets with vegan GF/SF/DF desserts.

Definitely a visit again restaurant.
Great healthy eating reasonably priced..
Must check it out went with wife great little find clean and window seating for wife to People watch. Lol
Local organic with great service and reasonable prices, I couldn't find anything I didn't like about Hearty Eats!
We were really hungry when we walked into this restaurant. It is a nice little place inside to sit and eat. All the different dishes we ordered pre-dominantly had quite a lot ginger. I love ginger as an condiment, but not as a main ingredient. The hostess was nice there and accommodated for some diet restrictions in the dishes for us. 
The brownies tasted like a shot of cocoa with no sugar. 
I wouldn't go here again for the main dish taste reasons. 
This restaurant blew my mind! I wish I lived closer because I'd eat here all the time! It was incredibly delicious food. We went with a group of 8 and they were very accommodating! Did I mention the food! OMG YUMMY! The restaurant was also incredibly clean and full of great energy! I LOVE LOVE LOVE this place! Makes me salivate just thinking about the food. I think the people working there thought I was crazy because I kept telling them how much I loved it! I was really blown away! :) GREAT FOOD at GREAT PRICES... plus they include the tax in the price like in Europe so it's much easier that way. LOVED IT! :)
This restaurant is dedicated gluten free and I could not be happier. I had fish and chips for the first time in 7 years and it was delicious! There are many things to choose from, most can have fish added. (There are no other meat options) The drinks are interesting as well! Try the hibiscus ginger iced tea yummmm! 
Even if you do not have celiac/gluten intolerance, definitely stop in, you will find something you like.
This is one of the best meals I have had in a long time!  We happened to park right in front of Hearty Eats while enjoying the Bridge of Flowers and the potholes, and it seemed like a good choice for lunch.  My daughter is vegetarian, and it is often difficult to find more than a couple of options on a menu, but that was not the case here.  They serve some fish items, but everything else is vegetarian -- in fact, vegan -- but this is not your typical run-of-the-mill veggie fare.  My daughter ordered French lentil soup and could not stop eating it!  My brother and I each ordered a different item, and we all shared.  There was more food than we could finish!  Everything was fresh, and the sauces were phenomenal!  Although we were stuffed, we couldn't resist trying some desserts, and we were happy we did!  I would pay for their cashew cream recipe that topped the incredibly dark and delicious brownie I had.  My daughter had an almond butter cup parfait that was also delicious, and my brother had some sort of ball that was a mix of nuts and seeds and raisins covered in chocolate.  The best part was how good we felt after we ate, full but not weighed down.  You really should try this place!
Been wanting to eat here for quite some time, and I finally took the opportunity to do so the other day when a friend asked me to meet her there for a conversation.  We sat at one of two outdoor tables and loved it.  I had already eaten, but wanted something cool and refreshing, so I chose the slaw.  DELICiOUS!  My friend told me she loves coming here and particularly likes the tempura.  I will definitely return.  You order food at the counter when you walk in, select your seating and they bring you your food.  Nice little spot in town, right next to Molly Cantor's pottery and the Shelburne Falls Art Co-op.  Enjoy!
I had the mezze; my partner had the Indian; the sauces were out of this world, and I cannot recommend more highly!
I loved my meal at Hearty Eats. Thoughtfully prepared and presented and best of all delicious. Prices are very reasonable, staff is polite and accommodating. Many choices and again, delicious. Very nice flavors and of course healthy and hearty. I can't wait to be back in the area so I can go again. Hearty Eats is by far the favorite of any organic / vegetarian option type of restaurant I've been to.
Loved the "welcoming" atmosphere and loved, loved the food!! Thai noodles, tempura and falafel. Would that I lived closer!!! I'd be there weekly. So reasonably priced and the presentation and portions were certainly impressive. Oh and not "pretentious" about what it offers. As they "used to say" - Good Vibes all around. Please consider opening a restaurant in Falmouth.
Haven't been to their restaurant but was delighted when I saw their food truck at the Brimfield Antique Show this year.  I have celiac disease and have to eat gluten free.  Last time I went to Brimfield, I brought my own lunch so I was very happy to have this option. I ordered their felafel salad and it was great.  Service was fast and friendly and the food was delicious and healthy.  I would love to try the restaurant.
Worth the 30 mile drive to get there and I will most decidedly be back again. Small and warm little restaurant right on Bridge Street in sweet Shelburne Falls.  I had no problem parking (free!) on the street on a Saturday noon. Ordered a seaweed sesame salad and the Indian Curry. Total- $15 (tax is included in the prices!)- and there was so much food, I didn't finish it. Absolutely delicious, fresh, filling, and wonderful. The seaweed salad had an amazing sesame dressing on the greens that paired well with the seaweed salad.  The Indian curry was rich and filling, served with brown basmati rice and loaded with chickpeas and carrots. Just scrumptious. You order at the counter, help yourself to utensils, and find a seat and they will deliver food to your table. I sat in the window at the counter (quite deep and spacious) with a great view of life on Bridge Street in town. I can't wait to tell my friends about this place and bring then with me next time. Awesome meal. What a gem.
Dropped by this little ice cream/cookie/coffee/smoothie shop on a visit to the Bridge of Flowers and the Glacial Potholes.  Upon entering, we were promptly greeted and told we could try their unique flavors - and they certainly were unique! Generous taste portions so that you can really decide which flavor to commit to. Tiramisu tasted exactly like tiramisu - delicious and creamy. But I opted for the Pear Ginger, which was refreshing and divine (if you like pear and ginger).

I ordered a single scoop, which is literally a single scoop (probably equates to a child scoop at some other larger creameries I've been to). One of best and most unique scoops of ice cream I've ever had!
First of all, how can you not love a name like that? Tucked in an adorable little side shop in Shelburne Falls near the glacial potholes, this place is a little gem.  As soon as you walk in your greeted with the scent of home baked cookies, YUM. Their homemade ice cream (which they happily provided samples of all of the flavors for us) is to DIE for. The Peanut Butter Fudge, Samoa, and Happy Monkey flavors are especially highly recommended. Very friendly staff made our sweets even sweeter :)
If you are visiting the Bridge of Flowers, then you should also visit the Glacial Potholes and on the walk there, stop for an incredible ice cream treat!
Today's special was sliced turkey with dressing on bread with gravy with a side of corn and cranberry sauce. It cost $7.99 and my husband loved it. The cranberry was canned and it would have been nice if it was made homemade like the rest of his meal.  I had a grilled tomato, spinach and feta cheese on rye bread. It came with pickles and chips for $5.25. We then ordered strawberry, rhubarb and apple crisp with vanilla ice cream. The dessert was homemade too and delicious. The service has very friendly and quick. We would definitely come here again.  
Maybe I'm being too harsh, but I think the inside of this diner could be a lot better. It's not that it's bad, it's just that it could exude a lot more character.
I ordered the burger with the fried egg and added bacon. Nothing special, right? This was definitely not fast food: I watched the guy cook the beef patty. When he brought it over to me, this had to be the neatest burger I've ever had. It was just a thing of beauty. And taste? Wow, they do it right, right here. 
Go to the museum if you want art on the walls. Fox Towne gives you art on a plate.
Nothing pretentious about this place, but go for the breakfasts (we did on Sunday) and the friendly staff.  Big portions and modest prices.
My husband and I love breakfast so when the locals recommended this place, we had to try it. Unfortunately it was just average breakfast food that lacked flavor. The French Toast was soggy and mushy, the homefries were very dark and had no flavor. The waiter came to take our drink order, breakfast order, then to deliver the check, never to ask if we needed anything in between. Again, we wanted to love it, but it just falls short.  
Solid food. We had typical breakfast fare and it was well prepared. Be prepared for cash only policy.
We stopped in for breakfast and had a good experience. The food was good and the service was friendly. I ordered the cheese omelet with bacon and sausage on the side, with the deep fried home fries. Although the food was good, I wasn't impressed with the home fries and the cheese in the omelet was hard to find, even though I asked for extra. Overall, the experience was good but the food was nothing to "write home about."
We eat here at least once a week.Good breakfast choices..great family run business.Friendly and small town good eats.
This is the same place as Fox Town.  Great little place to eat breakfast, a snack, lunch or dinner.  Pretty good prices too!
This is a quaint little diner in our town.  You can eat in or order out. Service is fast and friendly.
Staff was quick and attentive but the food ranged from bad to awful. The burger was just barely edible but the onion rings were greasy with old oil anduneenenly gooked
Not fancy but hamburger and BLT were excellent.  Good coffee too. Good portions, good value. The staff was friendly and attentive.
It is regular food and wait staff great. Friendly place. Coffee not to my taste. Pancakes were good. 
If you are looking for simple, but great tasting food, then this is the stop for you. It's a treasure that looks pretty much like it did in the 50s or 60s, I imagine. I had the Monte Cristo and was blown away.
My husband and I go here everytime we are in Shelburne Falls.  We love the small hometown feel and the food is great and reasonable prices.  I tried the fried chicken bacon bbq wrap the last time we were there and it was delicous!  The service is quick and the they are always nice and friendly.  Love getting a table by the window to people watch and look at the great old architecture of the buildings on the street.  Love this town and love this diner!
We love this place....a few years ago we stumbled in there to eat and realized what a great bargain and great food we had found. Now we stop to eat lunch there everytime we are in town....have yet to be there early enough to catch breakfast but would assume it is good too.  The service is friendly and good.  Had a fried chicken w/bacon bbq wrap there last weekend and it was great.  It's a lovely little town and it has that homey small town feel that you can't find most places anymore....add in great tasting food at a very reasonable price...how could you go wrong!!!
Foxtown is a favorite in my family.  We live a mile away, and my kids have to go back when they're in town.  Foxtown has the basics and a price you can afford.  Nothing fancy, but good food and good service.
We were in Shelburne Falls before visiting a relative.  I used to go into town with my aunt when I stayed with her as a child and wanted to see what the town looked like now.  Since we were there during lunch hour, we stopped at the Foxtown Diner.  What a pleasant surprise.  We both had sandwiches and soft drinks that were really good, and well-priced.  

The atmosphere is that of an old-time diner.  Our waitress was very helpful and pleasant.  It appears to be a popular place because it was close to 1:30 pm when we went in, and the place was crowded.  There is parking on the street in front of the restaurant.
Don't forget your cash. That's the first thing I can tell you, after that enjoy. Good breakfast/diner type food. Nothing to technical, fancy or amazing just good food and good service sitting right in town. It almost like you stepped back in time a little bit.
Efficient, friendly service. Old style diner with chrome & vinyl stools and counter. Eggs, pancakes, muffins etc. Cash only! They cooked the poached eggs right the first time!
A great and economic place for a tasty breakfast at a very reasonable price. Love their veggie omelett and my husband likes their eggs Benedict.  Lots of locals are regulars there. Good place to meet up with friends and natives. You are treated like family.
On a busy Saturday night when we arrived without reservations, they settled us on the porch for drinks (with a great view of the river and town), comped us a beautiful cheese plate, and visited us several times to keep us up to date on when a table would be available.  Once we had a table, the service continued excellent, the food was first rate, and the setting (in an old factory) was very pleasant.  My top recommendation in Shelburne Falls!
This is a very well situated restaurant overlooking the Deerfield, river at Shelburne Falls. There is some outdoor seating, but the main dining area is beautifully restored with high ceilings and a modern, yet comfortable feel. It was very busy and noise level was a bit of a problem at times. The food is quite imaginative and interesting, though not spectacular. There is an extensive bar, but I was not able to have a top end tonic (e.g Fevertree) with my gin, and one of my friends was served with a very small glass of plain club soda and ice (no lime) on a very hot evening. Other than these comments, it was a very pleasant evening!
Love the Blue Rock. Holly and Chris have created a charming restaurant in their new location with a gorgeous view of the Deerfield River. The apps are delicious, and entrees always a creative approach. Everything from vegan to carnivore favorites with a great list of cocktails.The bar is a great choice for a quick bite and a conversation among neighbors or newcomers.
This place was such a lovely surprise. My husband went to college at UMass  Amherst, so we've spent a lot of time in the area but hadn't heard of this new-ish spot. 
Holy cow, everything was  phenomenal: ambience, cocktails, local beer/wine choices, food. WE WILL BE BACK, BLUE ROCK!!!!
Also, side note, there is a lovely art gallery attached if you get there before it closes.  And the chef/owner was super gracious and friendly when we happened to meet him.
Came here as a recommendation from our guide at Zoar Outdoor. 

Ordered the ribs for an appetizer, highly recommend the coleslaw with it. Enchiladas for the main course were perfect. Loved that they offer a flight of beer for any four you choose. I usually only see this at breweries and tap rooms. The cookie as part of the sundae for dessert was amazing!
We decided to go on a day trip/ drive on August 8th 2016. We eventually ended up in the village of Shelburne Falls in Massachusetts. While there we stumbled upon this great restaurant. Cool story bro? 

The food was AMAZING! That particular day they had poutine on their special menu. We are HUGE fans of poutine. The cheese curds and the duck fat gravy was to die for. 

We also had the BBQ duck wings for a second appetizer. I believe that it is on their normal menu so you will be able to order it anytime. 

The service was amazing. Our waitress was very attentive. We had our small pup with us and they allowed us to sit outside with him. They even brought him some water to drink! 

When in the area we will definitely return to eat some more of their scrumptious food. Thank you for making our day at Shelburne Falls! 

Follow us on Instagram @LIVING_TO_TRAVEL
..over the bridge and to the left! As you go half way up the hill it's immediately to your left.
 It moved about 7 months ago. There are presently 2 postings for this restaurant as of 7/25/2016
which hopefully will be corrected by T/A soon. We started at 10 bridge and were advised by a neighboring store.
The food at the 1 Ashfield street is incredible.. Nicely presented perfectly cooked and an excellent bar.
The maitré di is a pleasure as well. 
I suggest everyone try the new space and the ambiance at least once...I think you'll be hooked. Go upstairs after dinner and check out the local artists fare..It's a wonderful array of eclectic art, a must see!!
Enjoy!
I stopped in here with a girlfriend on a day trip to Shelbourne Falls. We weren't too hungry, so we just grabbed drinks at the bar inside and headed out to the outdoor seating. They had some comfortable cushioned couch-like outdoor seating overlooking the water. It lended a bit of privacy for us to be able to catch up. I will also say that there was a cement stairway leading to the street above the restaurant and it was fun to watch people in heels and flip flops try to navigate it. ;)
Truly Outstanding quality and ambiance.. Wonderful range of choice and costs. Everything plated well and food fresh & delicious. Portions terrific. Best everything, including the most well prepared soft shell crab you'll ever taste. This Chef can achieve Michelin Star status..Commendable!!
Friday night, very busy early dinner crowd.  The dining room was completely booked, but it was a perfect summer evening so we sat out on the porch.  We ordered a variety of things to share and all were delicious.  The menu had a lot of very interesting chef created special dinners.  The standard menu has some good standby's and some inventive dishes.  Lots of vegetable choices.  We had a delicious salad with beets and goat cheese, the melon soup, a baked pretzel (or two) and the burger with fries which were excellent.  Good beer, wine and cocktail selection.  I appreciated the smaller (not small) portions and a smaller corresponding cost.  We ate everything on our plate and didn't break the bank, not even close.
The best place to dine when in Heath Ma or Shervonne Falls.  Nice atmosphere friendly staff creative cocktails and desserts.  Excellent food
Went back to the Blue Rock for college graduation celebration dinner, and it was great yet again. The chef/owner does a great job with local ingredients and general deliciousness. We shared some nachos and a fried fish appetizer. We picked from the specials menu. The salmon was divine, and the bolognese was substantial with a little pepper kick. Very nice.
If it weren't for the exceptional food here, this might be a forgettable restaurant. And if you want heaping portions or the fastest service ever this may not be your place. But if you want gourmet quality food in a casual atmosphere this will be the perfect spot for you. I'd suggest this place for adults more than families, although our preteens were happy here. The salted caramel gelato was probably the most delicious I've ever tasted, and the homemade ravioli was a small portion but tasted incredible. Mixed drinks were very well done too, and the steak was top quality and cooked perfectly.
We went to The Blue Rock for dinner tonight and it was a delight ,start to finish.
Lovely space,our waitress Emily was very knowledgeable about the food and drinks and a tip top waitress.Great service.
THEN the meal...I had rack of lamb and my husband the chicken entree.FANTASTIC.Beautifully prepared and presented, and just right sized portions.
We had started with the calamari   which was crisp and light and not in the least greasy. Really nice.
And then we had dessert.My husband's apple crisp with ice cream was alittle underdone  I thought but taste wise was spot on.
I had the orange sugar creme brulee and it was wonderful, rich and perfect .
A wonderful place to dine ..nice atmosphere ..what a surprise...

Four of us had excellent meals -- calamari, crab cakes, chicken liver pate and rack of lamb.  Each plate received rave notices.
Lovely view and well- appointed lobby and dining area.   
The parking area is not as convenient as one might wish but don't be deterred -- the meal is worth it!
The restaurant has reopened in new great location 1 Ashfield St. Shelburne Falls just across river from old location. It always had good food and its new location is great. 
This is our first time in Shelburne Falls and the bar has been set quite high.   Our meals last night were excellent - spiced beautifully and prepared skillfully.  Everything on our table tasted as if the chef truly wanted the diner to enjoy good food.  This is the kind of meal where you leave very satisfied.   
After reading of their opening in our local paper, We stopped in to check out the fare.  We sat at their classy bar and Loved their special martini.  We had an Asian fish cake for an appetizer and the curried  chicken dish for dinner.  We loved both the food and the decor furnished some of the local artists.  Both staff and other folks at the bar were very friendly.  Although we didn't try the regular tables they did not look too comfortable.  This is definitely a place we will come back to when we are in the area.
Took our daughter to the Blue Rock for a celebration dinner. Excellent meal from start to end. We had mussels, scallops, and a great braised rib dish. Dessert was delicious and decadent. 

Note: The location has changed to 1 Ashfield St, just a few blocks away from the former location on Bridge St.
This place has the best food. I have eaten here a handful of times and loved my choices.  It's so good you can't stop eating even though you are stuffed.
Fantastic atmosphere with very friendly staff. Gluten free options and even gluten free cheesecake for dessert. Couches or table to suit your fancy. Will definitely be back. 
Down a flight of stairs and into a small, warm, inviting room.  It seems they have recently changed hands and the staff were all very new, but friendly and helpful. About 8 local beers on tap and about 10 local and imported beers in bottles. No mass-produced swill in sight. Had a cheese plate which was very good. They have several sausages in different states of dress, Mexican, kimchi, BLT etc. I will return.
Warm and friendly scene at Underdogs—craft cocktails, exotic sausages and hot dogs with names like the  "California" the "Greek," the Ball Park," using fresh local ingredients and coming with sides of kale slaw or homemade sauerkraut. Want just a quick app and a drink? Then go for the curried white bean dip. Music on weekends, from jazz to DJ. And enjoy the cushy lounge furniture and great bohemian atmosphere. They're hitting it out of the park.
Decided to stop in to Casey's to grab a couple of grinders for a weekend picnic. Looked like a nice enough place... clean, plenty of parking, fairly decent selection of not only grinders, but pizza, salads, wraps, sandwiches, burgers, wings, etc. And that's where things began going downhill.

First, the place appeared to be staffed solely by two high school girls, one of whom had to ask the other everything from what meats were included in a cold cut grinder to how to run a debit card through their machine. Fine... we've all suffered through first days on the job. I understand. But... there should have been an owner or manager on site to help with the awkwardness and especially the training. Second, although grinders cost $6 for a small and $8 for a large, toppings beyond lettuce, tomato, cheese, and a dressing cost .25 extra each, and I'm talking about what should be basics, like onions, peppers, banana peppers, and others. All of which might still be fine if you could tell that any of those extras actually made it into the grinder, which brings me to my final point. Our grinders were absolutely stuffed with shredded lettuce, but everything else, including the meat and cheese, was so sparse we could hardly find evidence of them, let alone taste them. And the "spread"? It was one *very* thin shmear on only one side of the roll. Which naturally, led to a couple of the most boring, driest grinders ever (and a couple bottles of water each to get them down).

Despite being the only customers at the time, it took a good 15 minutes for our two grinders to be made, which I find unacceptable for a place that makes grinders all day long.

So although I'd love to recommend Casey's, I just can't do it. Nickel- and dime-ing customers is not how to build up a loyal clientele. It's a shame really. With the location they have, it wouldn't take much extra effort to make themselves a go-to stop for all the locals and tourists looking for good, inexpensive eats.
This place is located nearby a laundry (with which they share the bathroom!) and has a decent space inside plus additional seats outside. Basic american food (fries, burgers, wraps, american pizza) in very big sizes. 
Casher was very slow in taking the orders (and was missing parts of it). Tables very dirty (need to clean them by ourselves).
It was a gorgeous day; we decided to slip the leash and explore Massachusetts a bit. We ended up in Shelburne Falls. It was a first visit, and a fun place to wander and relax.  Around lunchtime we were across the road from Casey's, so stopped there to eat.  It is very casual - a flip-flop and t-shirt sort of place, with picnic benches out front and tables inside.  Lots of pizzas and all sorts of grinders were on the menu (along with snacks and salads) including a potato pizza with bacon and white sauce with a bit of blue cheese - surprisingly tasty, sort of like scalloped potatoes on delicate pizza crust.  Our cucumber salad was crisp and fresh - nothing gourmet, but refreshing on a warm day. Service was casual and friendly - we felt like locals instead of tourists.  Locals beat a steady path to the outer window serving ice cream.
We got take out...service was great and it arrived fast, food wasn't the best are chicken fingers were hockey pucks, the Pizza was ok.
What a great find! I was referred by a friend, I owe her. Should have known, as she always knows the best place for great cheap eats and a drink. The West End Pub is small, but charming with an eclectic menu- something for everyone. I went with a large party and everyone had an excellent meal. I had seared tuna with a wasabi sauce, perfectly done! Staff is nice, albeit overwhelmed by the large party. Everything was excellent, drinks and food alike. To go to the restrooms you cut through the kitchen, very patient and agile staff there- must have taken dancing lessons. Done a long narrow staircase to a rustic restroom, redone after the devastating storm, Irene. Charming, but hard to get to if you have people in your party with bad knees. My tip, go early or late so you dont' have to wait and ask to sit on the 'porch' so you can overlook the river and the lovely Bridge of Flowers. I only wish I was closer!
We've always wanted to eat here but the wait has usually been too long.  So on this Columbus Day weekend we ate earlier than usual to ensure getting a table with a short wait.  Lovely view of the Bridge of Flowers and the river.  Crisp white wine and great local beer.  The appetizer pot stickers are delish.  Great sandwich and salad menu.
Shelburne Falls is a beautiful village located at the eastern end of the Mohawk Trail. The West End Pub is just across the very pretty bridge of flowers and we had a lovely, unfussy and reasonably priced meal at around 4.30pm during the week. Excellent burgers and friendly, helpful staff in a fantastic location overlooking the Deerfield River.

Highly recommended. You will not be disappointed.
This is an excellent Pub with many craft beers and local wines.   There were great burgers,  salads, and desserts.  The service was efficient  and the view of the bridge  made it a special evening.  Price was reasonable considering all we had for the 4 of us. 
My wife and I drove to Shelburne Falls to see the Bridge of Flowers.  Looking around town for a place to eat we discovered the West End Pub.  After reading the menu we just couldn't resist.  What a great menu for a pub.  We had the Lobster Bisque and the Shrimp and Artichoke Scampi Pasta.  Both were excellent and the Pale Ale was terrific. We will definitely stop here again on our next visit to the area. The view is great too.
Eating here made me laugh.
You feel like you've stumbled into your aunts kitchen.
I had the Haddock Sandwich with fries which were delicious.

The staff treats you like you are a treasured relative coming from a distant place for a 1/2 day visit to see the relatives.

Getting to the bathroom is very special experience. :-)
Was our first time out in Shelburne to explore the little town and the falls. Being the type of person that loves to find new places to eat and West End Pub was a fantastic find. I had the breakfast burger and it was a delicious hot mess of goodness and the fries were in the top 3 I've ever had!! The downside is I didn't have room to have what looked like some great deserts desert :-(
Small space but right on the river and the view  of the Bridge of Flowers is spectacular. The food is local and prepared with fresh herbs and spices. Reasonably priced and so good.
I have been coming to the West End Pub for years. Living close by affords me many opportunities to eat here, while enjoying the Bridge of Flowers. The food is delicious offering a little something for everyone,. Terrific salads, burgers, vegetarian choices, fresh fish and great drink selections. The bar is a neighborhood favorite, the cozy atmosphere being a big draw.
Went to this pub twice in two days while staying in the area.  The food was great and the staff was fun and friendly (we sat at the bar) which made for a great night.
This is a great spot to have dinner at. If you want to guarantee that you'll get a seat I would make a reservation. There is very limited space, we ate at the bar. I had to falafel sandwich and LOVED it! No matter what you are ordering make sure to get the house made broccoli cole slaw.
Hard working team make this a delightful stop for lunch. Their local beef is showcased in a terrific burger.
It's worth a detour to visit this and the Bridge of Flowers.
Great food! Local grass fed beef from foxbard farm makes for one of the tastiest burgers you'll ever have! Try the kimchi burger made with local kimchi and local beef for a delicious assault on your palate. Great service and warm inviting staff...
After visiting the Bridge of Flowers, several people in my family recommended this spot to me. My husband and I had been camping at the Mohawk Trail State Forest all week, and opted for a meal out. It was casual enough that our camping clothes sufficed (not the campfire smelling ones, of course) but lovely enough that the food was very tasty. 

The bruchetta is one of the best I've ever had, and the crab cake was also good, albeit a bit spicy (which we like.) My bloody mary was fantastic, and we were seated right at the edge of the Bridge of Flowers so the view was top notch. For our meals, we both had the shrimp scampi and steak. Our steaks were a bit overcooked (we ordered medium rare) but they were still tender and tasty. We didn't have room for dessert. 

The services was extremely friendly and the prices are completely reasonable. This is a very cute town and I would definitely visit this restaurant again.
Small, comfy pub right on the water next to the famous Bridge of Flowers. Friendly, great service and the appetizer we had was excellent. Next time we'll plan on having dinner. Liked the menu.
Just tooling around the area and crossed the Bridge of Flowers.  Just on the Buckland side waited for lunch around 1/2 hour for a table.   But oh so worth it.  The host kept us appraised of the wait. The food was amazing.  We had a chicken and cashew wrap. A bun less burger and a roast beef sandwich.  All made exactly to our specific request 

Small place.  Great food and view of the river
This was our first stop on our long weekend in Shelburne Falls, and we talked about it for the rest of our trip! We were recommended to go here from friends who are life-long locals. From the moment we walked in the door we knew it would be a great experience. We arrived on a Saturday evening around 7:30pm, there was a 15 min wait, the host offered to take our phone number for us to walk around outside or offered to get us drinks if we stayed and waited. The famous Bridge of Flowers is right outside the door, a great place to visit while you wait, which is what we did! The pub is small but so cozy and plenty of space that you don't feel cramped. The service is excellent, the waitress was very tentative and friendly. We highly recommend the Philly Steak and Cheese Fries, Chicken Parm, California Burger (made from grass-fed beef) with the broccoli slaw! We already cannot wait to go back! And best of all the prices are GREAT!
After touring the Bridge of Flowers and Glacial Potholes we were hungry, so we decided on lunch at the West End Pub.  Great decision!

We were ahead of the lunch crowd, so no waiting for our party of  7 (4 kids, 3 adults).  We were seated in the chicken room (chicken art), but half the table could crane their necks to look out the back porch room to see the river and Bridge of Flowers.

The peanut lime chicken appetizer I got as my main lunch (no sharing!) was delicious with tender, moist chicken; very flavorful!  My son enjoyed his beer-battered thick-cut onion rings and ate half his chicken parm sandwich (I finished the other half--it was yummy).  My husband enjoyed his Greek salad.

Our friends shared a couple of Caesar salads, an order of the onion rings, a fish sandwich, and I can't recall what else.  There is a children's menu.

The one and only bathroom is through the kitchen, down a very narrow, tight staircase, on the right.  It has a sliding door.  If it's in use, please wait on the stairs as the kitchen staff uses the bottom floor to access the freezer and storage doors.  The bathroom has cool, raw rock walls (marked with a flood line from a few years ago) and nicely varnished wood.

Our waitress was pleasant and attentive, coming around several times during the meal to refill drinks and make sure everyone was doing okay.  We were too full for dessert.  By the time we left the restaurant was packed with several groups waiting for tables.

Would definitely return for another delicious meal.
We got there at noon and the place was packed. The receptionist was very nice and offered to call us on my cell phone when a table became available. It was well worth the wait. The food was perfectly prepared and outstanding. There is also a great view of the river from certain tables. 
The bathroom can be challenging if you have a problem with steep stairs, so be forewarned. 
This lovely restaurant is right next to the quaint and beautiful Bridge of Flowers, which should not be missed.
The place was hopping at 5 PM on a sunny, hot summer afternoon. Though we had reservations, we were not seated on the porch, which has a lovely view of the Bridge of Flowers (so be sure to request that if interested). For the most part, average pub fare, though my husband had a summer blueberry salad that he liked a lot.
Stopped for a quick lunch. The pizza was very tasty and we ordered an order of French fries. The didn't have a lot of choices for drinks. Other than soda. They had Gatorade and Powerade and water but that's it. Otherwise clean and staff were friendly. 
I came for lunch with my boss and we ate almost a whole large pizza between the 2 of us! The crust was great, crunchy outside, chewy inside. And a very generous amount of toppings. It was excellent. 
I was visiting Shelbourne Falls over mother's day weekend and few places were open for brunch.  My son and I opted for Buckland Pizza house over food from a local market.  This was an excellent decision!  The pizza and was freshly made - the crust and sauce was clearly homemade.  The mozarella stick was actually a brick of mozarella and was amazingly delicious.  It was a delicious mother's day treat!
Buckland Pizza House is a great little family restaurant in Shelburne Fall across from the Bridge of Flowers.
Great pizzas and salads,grinders, pasta dishes..beer ,wine as well as soft drinks.
All around nice place to eat.
Small, but worth the meal.
I hesitate to write Sicilian style, maybe I call it that bc it's cut in squares (even though the pizza is round) and it's sorta deep dish though the crust is fluffier. The cheese mix is interesting: mozzarella and cheddar, the sauce is "ok" it's definitely the best pizza in Shelburne Falls. We have had a few things here, chicken fingers and fries with my neice, also ok. Eggplant sub was twice good, and once soggy. It's rather hit or miss but in a jam, it's edible, the people are friendly and it's good to shop local!
Buckland Pizza is right in the center of Buckland and right across from the Bridge of Flowers.  I love their spaghetti and eggplant parmesan. They portions are big enough to get a few meals.
We stopped at Buckland for some pizza after walking the bridge of flowers. We went with the taco pizza and were not disappointed! The service was nothing special and prices are higher than normal for the size, but I'm sure it's much cheaper than the restaurant across the street. The taco pizza was good enough for us to get it again on our return trip this weekend- I would recommend.
Went in to buy two sandwiches to take on a tubing trip. By the time we drove the 10 minutes back to where we were staying, both sandwiches were drenched with pickle juice. Gross. Service wasn't very friendly either. Overall, I would skip this place.
Good hot oily pizza.  No frills, no pretensions.  Probably the only place in this tourist town with neither.
Family and I stopped in for lunch. The service took forever, the food wasn't worth the price and the management was unprofessional and actually rude.
I couldn't believe that someone so bad with customers could actually be running a pizza shop... the guy is litterally out of control and scary.
Avoid at All Cost!
This local place is centrally located, directly across from one entry to the Bridge of Flowers.  My son and I ordered a pizza to share.  The prices were reasonable and the pizza was good.  Their sauce is zesty and flavorful, the crust clearly homemade.  The atmosphere is nothing to shake a stick at - just a typical brown booth with minimal decor.  There is an old menu from the original restaurant opened in the '40's. It's fun to look at the prices back then (10-cent sodas and 25-cent hamburgs).  You order at the counter and they tell you they'll bring it out to you.  The service was pretty standard.  The prices were competitive .  Good place.  I was happy we ate there.  
Horrible food, horrible service, just not worth the visit when there are so many good restaurants in the area with better food for the same price.
My family and I have been to Buckland Pizza House at least a couple of dozen times over the years, and I can honestly say we've never had a bad meal there. It's a must stop whenever we're in the area. I love Greek pizza, and I'd rate their pizza in the Top 3 Greek pizzas I've ever had - lots of toppings, tasty sauce, and perfectly crunchy and chewy crust.

That's not to say pizza is the only thing we've eaten there. They also have some of the best tasting buffalo wings (deep-fried of course) I've had anywhere, and the grinders, burgers, and especially Greek Salad have always been consistently good, visit after visit, year after year. Portions are very good-sized. You definitely won't leave hungry.

It's always fun to get one of the tables in the front windows and people-watch too, especially in the summer, since Buckland Pizza House is practically right across the street from the entrance to the Bridge of Flowers. If you're in the area, don't miss this place!
We stopped in for a quick lunch. Good, basic sub but nothing special. Biggest plus was the location & view. good people watching. We'd eat here again, but only if other options were unavailable.
The food was awful the service sucked the pizza was very greasy
and the grinder roll was like a brick
I love pizza....This place has it down to a science always fresh and tasty,...Lasagne was pure perfection!!!! Salad was generous and love they're dressing!!!!
I truly enjoyed visiting this pizza restaurant after 25 years.  My parents would take me here as a child with my brothers.  As we traveled recently to MA, we noticed so many of the places we visited as children were sadly closed.  
However, Shelburne Falls still has a superstar in this restaurant.

First, this is not a large place, but the seats are very cozy and comfortable.  The feeling is of stepping back in time when pizza restaurants were run by families, not corporations.  Actually, the original owners, I understand, retired.  The new owners are a family and they have pride in the food.  

The large pizza was everything I would expect from this area.  The cheese was tasty, lots of sauce, and thin dough.

We also had the salad which was fine, and a meatball grinder.  Now, having had the grinder years ago, I did not think it was as good as it used to be.  The bread was great, crunchy, and complimented the sauce.  However, the meat was sliced which I think causes the sandwich to lose its appeal.  A meatball should be just that, a ball.  However, overall the taste was fine.

The quality and quantity for the price was excellent.
Food was served promptly.

On the night we went, the lady up front seemed very tired and did not want to engage in conversation but, I cannot let that alone hurt the score.
For a pizza restaurant, it is a five star joint and I would recommend it.
We ate here on a Friday night; most of the other diners were local, so we knew it had to be good.
  The menu was varied. I had a roast-beef grinder and my wife had ravioli. We drank a glass of wine and a bottle of Opa Opa lager, both very good.
  Service was fast, the food was plentiful and delicious, and the price was reasonable.
  Next trip to the area, we'll eat there again.
Looking for a good pizza pie? Look no further than the Buckland House of Pizza. They don't rest on the fact they are the only pizza house in town.  We've always enjoyed their food. I hope you will, too.
Yummy is the word to describe their pizza.  Mushroom, pepperoni and extra cheese is our favorite!  Subs are good too.  Great location next door to McCuskers Mkt. near the Iron Bridge.  Walking distance to potholes and down town Shelburne Falls.  
Great décor and the sweet, sweet smell of fudge are enough to make this place memorable. But we didn't go in for fudge...we went for ice cream and we weren't disappointed in the least. I only went a couple of days ago, but I cannot remember what flavors I got in my sundae. And, honestly, I don't think it matters much: it's creamy deliciousness that coaxes an unbidden sensory response (just remember, you're out in public). Located right across the street from the Bridge of Flowers, Mo's makes the trip across the bridge a delightful romp through your second childhood. 
They offer a full suite of toppings (though they should make their fudge toppings a standard offering, in my humble opinion) that will make you evaluate life on a whole other level. And along the wall behind you as you face the fudge and ice cream are candies of every conceivable taste: Swedish fish, mint lentils, tennis balls (don't ask me, I've never tried them), and the list stretches on from there. 
And I couldn't resist (not that I tried): right at the register was a bottle of Butterscotch Beer. Yes, please! I've not opened it yet, but this non-alcoholic brew threatens to cast me into a reverie from which only the deepest realities of life can free me. 
Your turn!
We stopped in to grab some salt water taffy for a friend. The store is so cute! We got taffy by the pound, but I enjoyed the wall of fun old-fashioned candies that brought me back to childhood! 
We wanted a bit of ice cream after dinner and wanted to take a short tour with our cones. Enjoyed the strawberry ice cream very much. The rest of the party also loved their cones. Love the feel of the Old Fashioned Ice Cream store and the candy while I didn't have any, looked good too.
Great location, right in the center! We visited Mo's twice on our trip, once at night for ice cream and once before we left to take home fudge. The ice cream was great with a large selection, and great sizes for the price. They also offer free samples to help you pick. There is a bench right outside to sit and enjoy your ice cream and take in the town scenery, or there is seating inside if you prefer. We enjoyed the beautiful view and weather outdoors while indulging in our ice cream! The fudge was even better, so many choices, we had to sample a few before we made our selections. You can get 4 decent size pieces for $12, why not? The folks behind the counter were so helpful and friendly! 
We love the fudge, but they also have ice cream, chocolates and candies. It's a fun stop in the tour around town. Good to grab an ice cream and then walk the flower bridge!
You'll notice it from the pic as well that the sundae was awesome. I took green tea, chocolate chip and chocolate caramel with hot fudge, caramel, almonds and cashews. Topped with whipped cream, it was all included in the $6ish cost.
stopped in to cool off after a nice motorcycle ride. very clean and friendly. they have assorted ice cream flovors locslly made. penny candy for sale as well. 
We had  dark chocolate orange fudge and it was intensely delightful.  I liked it so much I will have to mail order some more as we don't live nearby.
My husband loved it. I knew I couldn't go in or I would have a triple cone! I loved the idea... I stayed outside and directed someone who was going to hit a pole in the diagonal parking place. I love ice cream, just don't want to eat it!
Wonderful fudge. Ice cream was spot on. I had the maple walnut. Heavenly. Great old candy store.Worth stopping to see especially if you have kids.
Always end of here for an ice cream cone in the summer or with the kids for penny candy.The fudge is wonderful too.Exotic flavors!
Went to Mo's on a recent visit to Shelburne Falls. We got fudge and a few other treats. Was not impressed. The fudge did not really have any flavor. Will not go back.
This has the best fudge with many flavor choices.  Also have an assorted candy selection and great ice cream choices as well.
So disappointed. I am a candy store lover I have never left a candy store without buying something until now.  The fudge did not even look fresh.  I hate to give a bad review but I wish I had read reviews before I went.  
If you love fudge, this is the place. Several varieties are usually on hard and they are creamy and delicious. Overpriced, but worth it if you really love fudge. Some other traditional candies, too. But, ask for the freshest.
I live in this town and today was a day just to stroll along and pop into the shops like a tourist :)  Mo's has a fun selection of candies and of course fudge, fudge, fudge!
I didn't have any today, but their fudge is yum, yummy.  I've tried almost all of them.  Can't go wrong here.
I never ever eat a cone fully, but I decided to try the waffle cone- with the salted caramel.... DELICIOUS! it was the best - absolutely the best ice cream waffle
Cone I have ever eaten.

Strolling the Buckland side of the Bridge Of Flowers on 6/22/16, past the Closed on Monday's Buckland Pizza shop brought us to Moe's for an ice cream cone, and it did not disappoint ! The server was very pleasant and the shop was a bit warm so we ended up outside at tables eating our treats. Could find many other delectable delights there without looking too far....
Mo's has the best peanut butter fudge that I have had anywhere...PERIOD! It was so creamy and delicious, it was difficult not to eat it all in one sitting. In addition, the whoopie pies are just fantastic...best that I have had anywhere! On my last visit there, I tried the dark chocolate peanut butter cups, and they too were delightful, with delicious chocolate and creamy, plentiful peanut butter filling. You can't go wrong with any of the items made at Mo's!
The creamiest fudge around with so many flavors to choose from! Cute store with "penny candy" displayed in help yourself jars.  Also has Herrell's ice cream-locally made.. and great whoopee pies made right there. Coffee made to your order and freshly squeezed lemonade during the summer.
Right up the hill from the Bridge of Flowers.  Relaxing dinner on a big old porch with distant view of town and the river. We had a long wait due to a big family gathering but I would say it was worth it.  I can't remember exactly what we ordered but it was good but not memorable.  I would go again.
First: The blue rock restaurant is no longer located on 10 Bridge St. Shelburne Falls! It moved 7 months ago to a larger more accommodating space in BUCKLAND as shown above.
Wonderful food for the most part. An eclectic collection of Liquors, appetizers and deserts, a short list of main dishes, an excellent bar, (albeit a bit slow) and a wonderful art gallery upstairs. 
We four were first presented with a wonderful dish of local cheeses, crostini's, cornichons, crackers and greens as a welcoming gift. A very nice touch. The chicken liver paté was wonderful. The encheladas too spicy hot for my sweetie, the nachos were o.k.The truffled potato wedges didn't taste much of truffles but they were still good. 
The other dishes we had were very very good, and delightfully presented, and we tried several! Most tender callamari I've ever had. Good portions. We enjoyed this restaurant so much we wish we weren't an hour away.. 
We will be back, regardless! Maitré dé was truly a people person. Service was good. food perfectly cooked.
And if you don't like your fish fried, ask Jeff to grill it!  Big portions/ great taste/ absolutely wonderful.  Don't miss this place!
This is a great place to stop and dine on your way through the Mohawk Trail. They have great burgers and fish (will grill fish without the batter for those who are trying to avoid breaded fried foods). They have a great vegetarian burger and I love their sweet potato fries.
Love this seasonal quick stop for burgers, hot dogs and clam and lobster rolls with the usual fixings.  A nice place to sit out under the umbrellas and watch the travelers on Rt. 2.  It's popular with work crews who stop by for a quick lunch.
Don't be put off by looks. Fast, friendly service and really good food. The whole belly fried clams are the best I've ever had. I'm told by a couple that have a summer place near there that all the food is good.
fresh seafood comes in on Thursday usually gone by sunday don't let the location scare . it is pretty good
Was right on rt.2  Great prices!!! Great fresh seafood specials, Great little spot/ Will Def be back.  So quick and deliscious!!!! YUMMY.
Stopped in for dinner last week and was so impressed by the menu and the food, we can't wait to too back.  As a former organic farmer who is definitely a foodie can't tell you how happy my family was to find this restaurant. Not only was the food amazing, so were the prices.
You will get your daily dose of veggies prepared uniquely and deliciously in this original vegetarian friendly spot right in the center of town. They also have fish on the menu. This is a great place for health conscious folks. 
I have eaten here twice and have enjoyed both of my food choices. The portions allow for two meals out of a serving.
A nice restaurant in a quaint little town.  The restaurant can be very crowded and has limited seating but is well worth the wait.
We stopped into this little restaurant after it was suggested by our AirBnb host. It was the end of our foodie road trip and my belly was in need of something healthy. 

It is so refreshing to see a restaurant getting creative to ensure they are offering fresh, healthy and delicious alternatives to guests. Also a huge commendation to them for offering this at a very reasonable price. 

My boyfriend ate the tacos and we shared the vegetable tempura dinner. I would definitely go back to try the falafel if we are ever in Shelburne Falls again.
We popped into this little eatery as we wanted a light lunch. We didn't realise it served organic and vegan food but there was a varied selection on offer and we enjoyed the fish bites that we had. The freshly made iced tea was nice and refreshing but not sweet. Was a little disappointed with the slice of dairy free cake we took home as it was a bit dry. This would be a good place to visit if you wanted a quick, healthy snack.
A perfect place to find a balanced, delicious, and healthy meal on the go. Evolved from a popular food truck this attractive new cafe offers a sit down experience to savor your meal. Falafel is wonderful, and so is the curry. Fish and chips are offered, too.All come with salad. 
Hearty Eats moved into the space previously occupied by the Cafe Martin and then the Baker's Oven on Bridge St. in Shelburne Falls. My first visit today and I had the squash soup and the wonderful risotto balls. Both excellent. Very nice, casual and friendly atmosphere. Vegetarian food, and everything on the menu looked yummy. I will definitely return. Go across the hall to the Shelburne Arts Cooperative for wonderful locally made items. Good eats and good shopping!
We stopped for a late lunch and we're bowled over by the curry bowl! If we'd been in Shelburne Falls longer we'd have been back to try the other options which all looked interesting.

As the previous reviewer says the world needs more places like this. Fast food can be healthy and tasty. The service was excellent and we has a table on the street to watch the world go by.
Delicious, clean, healthy, food at a reasonable price. Good service.
Falafel bowl and Curry bowl were delicious.
The world needs more places like this.
They have the BEST pizza!!! Right amount of everything! Never burnt just perfect. Love the Calzones and the Cheese Steak sub isn't bad either. It's a bit of a wait sometime but well worth it.
Pizza Pizzazz has delicious subs, salads and pizzas. They make food quickly and it is always hot and fresh. My favorite dish here is the cheese pizza, but I am a bland eater. They put a lot of cheese on their pizzas though. My brother says that they have the best Chicken Caesar Salad he has tasted. I highly recommend Pizza Pizzazz. 
Ordered a cheese-steak with mushrooms and a spicy fries.  Delivery was timely (so food was relatively hot) and the delivery driver was pleasant and friendly.  Sub was good-sized, meat portion about average in terms of volume.  "Toasted" sub didn't seem very crisp but was OK.  Spicy fries were generous and crisp and tasty.  I rated this average because there are other restaurants in the area that deliver better-tasting cheese steaks, but there was nothing negative about our first experience with Pizza Pizzazz.
We chose to eat outside for dinner. The little dining area is very quaint and set up nicely. The waitress was very nice. It was fairly busy. We had to keep asking for things like flatware, napkins, butter but she got them quickly. Don't order the coffee unless you like it extremely dark. I did mention it to the waitress and she said she has heard it before. I told her I hoped she was letting the owners know. Otherwise the Filet Mignon was excellent even though it was more well done than we asked for. The mashed potatoes and broccoli was delicious. Bread was brought to the table nice and warm. Prices are reasonable. Good amount of parking space available. Overall you can take your family here for a reasonably priced dinner.
We have gone many times as a family and with friends and we have always had great food.  The service can be slow but when the food comes, it is delicious!  Sometimes they have live music ourptside or in the bar.  Have their special drink the Boston Harbor.  It looks terrible but tastes great and has a special treat at the bottom of the glass.  
Very family oriented, with great comfort food! Family recipes, I know this first hand. ;) Awesome music on the patio in the summer, inside when its cold. One thing is, you'll never go hungry and the desserts are great too!!!
I have been here many many times and have not been disappointed.  The food is delicious and the servers are fantastic.  The menu has just about everything that you would like to eat.
The restaurant's parking lot is always full, so we weren't sure how the long wait would be for dinner. No wait on this Tuesday evening! There is plenty of seating, and in warmer months you may dine outdoors. They have a fun seasonal drink menu, so I enjoyed 2 Bailey's Martini (white chocolate martini with Amareto - yummy!). Their menu is diverse, so there's something for everyone. We had potato skins to start, which were good. My husband had a turkey club which was also good. I had a burger with bacon and mushrooms and it was delicious. The chef cooked it to order and the brioche bun was the perfect touch. Both dishes came with fries (regular and sweet potato). We passed on dessert, but the desserts looked yummy too. We left knowing that we would return and probably dine here one or two times a month.
We tried Bailey's after a friend sampled their chili at a Brookline, NH chili cook off and recommended it. My husband had a small cut of prime rib that he said was very tender. I just had a sandwich and fries which were very tasty. Our service was almost too quick, if that's possible! The bartender was generous with the gin and bourbon in our drinks, as well. Our meals with tip were only a little over $60. A nice casual place for home style cooking. 
I think that Bailey's offers some real good food and the perfect atmosphere. In a town where there isn't much for food options Bailey's really steps up the game. You can get bar food or some great Italian meals. Really something on the menu for everyone and so many things that look good you will have a hard time picking. The bar area is great for friends or a bit, and they have live music there on weekends which is always a nice touch. I would recommend this spot to anyone in the area.
I just found this place and live about 40 min away but worth the trip.  I have been twice. Once for dinner and once for lunch. Excellent service! Excellent food and agreed by all in my party.
First, let me speak to the service.   Initially, there was an oddly long wait when there were many open tables and no line.  Our server was a bit slow during the meal, but then exceptionally abrupt at the end.  He had just cleared our dinner plates and slapped the check on the table without even asking if we wanted coffe, tea or dessert!  I found that especially odd considering we had passed an incredible looking dessert tray on the way in.  As for the food we did get:  the salad was fine, but uninspired, and the baked sweet potatoes with my entree were tasty and well cooked.   On the other hand, my broiled scallops were overcooked and had an unusual, bitter taste to them.  The best part of the experience was the live music playing in the bar that we could hear in the dining room.   It was singer/songwriter pieces with vocals and guitar.
Enjoyed a great lunch after a day of shopping. We both had the soup and wrap sandwich special. Both soups were great, one a chicken vegetable, the other cheeseburger soup. Both served piping hot! The chicken wrap was delicious. Our waitress was efficient and pleasant! Looks like a nice stop for large groups to enjoy a meal as they have separate rooms and a bar area. It was festively decorated for the season!
We've dined here a few times and had different experiences. The food has always been good, but the experience has varied. Sometimes the customer service is spot on, other times it's missing. It can even be a bit quirky: the lamp at the podium is from someone's bedroom. Yup, that's what I was told when I said I liked it - quirky!
The Trouble with Baileys is it wants to be a fancy, high fluent restaurant but unfortunely "You are what you are", They have a huge staff, mostly younger people, some where hanging around talking about their night before, I saw someone else texting. Then we were seated in a small room with a man and woman and their baby, all three of them were sick with bad colds, hacking and coughing and making sounds not very appetizing. The waitress we had was fine, but you could tell she wanted us to run up a big liquor tab, I had steak and my wife had a scallop dish. Again bland, disappointing, not noteworthy. Wasn't exactly cheap for Townsend , Massachusetts but got through it, left and pretty much we are done with that place. Its too bad because I wanted to like it. The dessert tray did not look appetizing, looked tired and worn. Maybe they will step up their game but I cannot recommend this place, I'm sorry.
We went for a Sunday night dinner.  I ordered the special, Beef Burgundy and chose a salad to go with it.  When the salad was passed under my nose I almost gagged from the intensity of the onions.  They were transluscent and floppy from hanging around in a fridge too long and a  substantial portion of the mixed greens were actually spoiled, black mush (my husband's salad was good because he asked for no onion and they made him a fresh bowl with loads of veggies). Obviously my salad was old and something the kitchen staff should have noticed; it was an insult.  As was the "special" .  Not only did it not taste good, almost all of the "beef" was actually fat that I used to decorate my bread plate. One expects a $17 SPECIAL to actually be edible and tasty. I meantioned it to our waitress but she just giggled.  Otherwise, the service was great,and the bartender pours a good glass.
Great place for drinks and pub food. Staff is ALWAYS receptive and polite. Ambiance rather cool. Lots of TV monitors which makes this place a great sportsbar when major games are playing.

They also have acoustic bands playing from time to time. Well worth a visit.

Don Campbell
Pepperell, MA
We held our daughter and son-in-law's baby shower at Bailey's.  There were 50 attendees and the Bailey wait staff never skipped a beat.  They did a superb job for us.  Many of our guests were mingling among themselves and the wait staff was still able to keep track of who ordered what.  The food was excellent and our guests had the highest compliments for Bailey's.  Pam the owner,  went over and above to be sure the day was success.  I can't thank Bailey's enough for the wonderful day and we highly recommend this restaurant.
Great Service, Steak was out of this world, Price was average
Would go back again No problem ,Plenty of parking and you can eat outside.
A great place to stop by.  It is friendly, clean and the food is excellent.  Service was good as well.  They even have a 'meat lover' burger.  It was very impressive and huge.  Well worth your visit.
Happen to be in Townsend area for a hike and past by. Decided to stop because of the outside patio. At first glance of menu it was a bit pricey for lunch but just the same ordered up some chicken nachos which were alright but have had better for $13. Friend had Chicken Primavera which was also well made but a bit overly cheesy. 
Went with family for lunch - this is an excellent place to get a tasty burger or sandwich for anyone - including gluten-fee. I am always pleasantly surprised by good gf bread - and this place has it! Not just good - awesome. I had a turkey reuben with coleslaw (really wish they had a dedicated frier - their sweet potato and regular fries looked yummy). All of us emptied our plates. Next time I'm in town, I'm going!
Good food, good service, good menu selection - in short everything about this place qualifies as good.  The service can be a bit slow at times, and they don't have the most diverse menu, but there's a fairly decent selection and everything is well-prepared.
This is a great family restaurant. The food is always good, you can have Chinese or Japanese even Sushi if that's your thing. The drinks are great!!! My fave is the Planters Punch, Lg on please!! Service is fantastic, always there to refill your glass. Take out is ready in 15 min. if your not in the mood for dining out.
Generous servings.  Ready for pick-up in about 20 minutes.  A family favorite for Chinese food and for sushi.  Prefer to take out rather than to dine in.  Never crowded except on New Years Eve.
First the good news, this little restaurant is nicely decorated and it appears clean, our waitress was very good ...and then there's the food, the pork was overcook and uneatable "like a rock".... General Tao's chicken did not appear to contain much chicken and the Sesame Chicken did contain plenty of chicken but did not have any vegetables ...just the chicken & rice??? and a very pretty garnish which I would of traded for a serving of broccoli...
    The ladies room didn't appear dirty, but it smelled bad, very bad.
This is a mid point to meet family members.  We all enjoyed our selections, including Japanese and Chinese.  The server was helpful and friendly.  My scallion pancakes were delicious.  There were enough to share with others at the table.  I enjoyed my salmon/avocado roll.  Also enough to share.  Others enjoyed their miso soup.  One of the kids enjoyed his beef teriyaki, more than he could eat, so he shared.  The place looked newly refurbished and had a nice oriental atmosphere.
Superb Ambiance! Receptive, polite and knowledgable staff. Kitchen management at its best turning out perfect dish after dish. These folks are on top of their game. This has to be the best Asian cuisine on the market!

Don Campbell
Pepperell, MA
We have been coming here for our night out for quite some time.  During the summer months we had a server named Bing who got to know us and our preferences, which was very pleasant.  She went off to school in the fall, and we continued to make this our bi-weekly local night out.  Tonight we had another Bing, who was very friendly and engaging.  Apparently there is a new chef, as our dishes were much spicier than they had been (lots of red pepper taste).  We like the spice, but were surprised by it.  The appetizers (fried dumplings and chicken fingers) were hotter (temperature) than normal, which Bing warned us of, but they were very tasty.  Our mains (Chicken with Garlic Sauce and Kung Pao Chicken) were also very good.  We'll have the leftovers for lunch tomorrow!  We do wish the strip mall they are in would find and fix the source of the septic smell, which you walk through getting to the restaurant, though.  It has been going on for months, and while it's not everywhere, it is off-putting when you are walking to dinner!
I love Chinese and Asian cuisine.  I'm not a connoisseur, but I've eaten a lot of it in my long life, in many cities.  Panda Wok not only treats you abruptly on the phone and at the front desk, but the food is just passable.  I ordered a shrimp luncheon option as take out, and when I opened it at home it was those little canned shrimps with black veins and canned taste.  I used to eat there more often, but there are other options now that stand out in the area that are much better.   But I think they focus more on their bar crowd than their eating crowd.  It's a shame... there's no reason to not be the best in the area when you have New England seafood and produce at your fingertips.
This has become one of our favorite Chinese-Sushi places in the area.  Our experience is that the food is always nice and fresh, perfectly cooked, and well presented.  The staff couldn't be more pleasant or accommodating.
Always a bad sign when the fish smell knocks you over as you enter. I wouldn't touch their sushi if they paid me.
Rest of the food was just bland.
Been here many times. It's clean, the staff is very friendly and very efficient. Although it across from the local high school and gets crowded at the end of the school day, it is well run establishment.  
I'm generally hesitant to order salad from a pizza place but a few years ago, I gave them a shot after seeing one my coworker ordered. Now I order salad from them at least once a month. Their greek salad with grilled chicken is AMAZING. If I was ever on death row, this would seriously be my last meal of choice. The greek dressing is homemade and so delicious I would swim in a vat of it if it was socially acceptable. They do not skimp on the chicken which is grilled to perfection. The greens are always fresh and crisp, unlike the typical sad wilted brown lettuce most pizza joints pass as "salad". I've had a few of their other offerings as well - their pizza, burgers, pasta dishes and pickle fries (Can you tell I work down the street? haha). Everything I've had there has never disappointed. Their facility is very nice and clean and they even have drivethru pick-up which is so convenient. Patriot is the BEST.
Unlike other Pizza places Patriot Pizza is big -open -bright and clean!
It's great for the family. Or with friends.
You can have a Beer with your pizza and watch one of the big TV's.
Thursday is pizza night with my grandson and so while we are on the way home I call ahead and order and 15 minutes later pull up to the drive through .  So convenient.
Convenient pick up window for call ahead orders. On line ordering available. Delivery up to 5 miles. Spacious comfortable seating. Outdoor patio seating. Great service and very clean. Menu has lots to choose from. Fresh baked cookies  cannolis and make your own Fro yo.
This is a great place to get that last minute dinner.  The pizzas & subs are great.  The staff will work with you for that Pizza you want. Try the white Pizza with chicken.
When you arrive, you order your meal from a wide variety of pizza, calzones, salads,  subs or Italian specialties.  They give you a number and bring the items to your table.  The meals are delicious and we usually have leftovers. Beer is served also. If you order something for pick-up, there is a pick-up window so you never have to leave your car. We especially like that the tables are large and so a group of six can sit comfortably together.
Got delivery of wings, pizza and a piece  of baklava.  All of it was hot and yummy!  Wings were super crispy and juicy. So
Sauces were good too. The baklava was a bit dry but has good flavor. Would order from them again!
We have been here twice and ate in the new building. The pizza was very good, the place was very clean, and also busy. 

All the patrons seemed to be enjoying the food us included. I will definitely go again. 

The service was prompt, no complaints. 
They has easy online ordering, and fast delivery. The pizzas are salads are very good, and their menu includes many healthy options. 
Ordered multiple items. 2 calzones were wrong. I said just feta for one and mozzarella only for the other. Both came with both feta and mozzarella. When I called to complain I expected since they delivered that they would offer to bring new ones. Instead cook got on the phone and argued with me. He insisted he did not put feta on it.... I explained I was looking at and eating the pizza and he did. He also mentioned he puts a mozzarella and cheddar mix regardless of what people ask for. So basically they ignore what you say. Quite dangerous considering some people can't eat aged cheese and that's why someone would say "mozzarella only" 3 times and confirm before getting off the phone. He told me to bring it back and show him.... I explained I had 3 small kids and I could not do that. You would think he would have sent new one or taken off bill but he wouldn't. I told him if he didn't fix it I would not go to his establishment again and he hung up. I can't believe a small local business would treat a good customer that way.
I've been here a few times and it was good. New location is def nice upgrade. Located on busy 119 across from high school and next to dunkin ds...
It's been a long time since I've had such bad customer service. We ordered a pizza and sat down. After 15 min a kid came over and asked us what we ordered. 10 min later I was told it will be up in a few minutes. 15 min after that I went back and was told a few more minutes. After 50 min we asked for a refund and the owner seemed annoyed with US! I've had some good food there, but won't be going back. 
Basic and nothing wild off the charts but never go wrong here, they have daily specials,also a location in Gardner which I go to more often.
I have been gong to Patriot for subs, pizza and salads for many years. They have recently moved into their own stand-alone building which has enhanced the ambiance and seating capacity. The portions are always large, and the food is prepared quickly and served with a smile. They also do delivery that I have used several times; fast and the food was hot on arrival.

If you are in the Pepperell/Townsend area this is one of the better sub/pizza places to grab a bite.
What more can I say..  The pizza was poor.

On the bright side,  They have the best salads for take out around...
I ordered online.  The pizza showed up on-time and was delicious (chicken and broccoli).  I'll order from Patriot again!
We used to order from Patriots regularly - enough so that the caller ID was enough to tip off the order!  The service and food went downhill over time and we stopped using them.  Once they moved we thought we'd give them another shot, and we are glad that we did.  We ordered subs and zesty fries, and picked them up rather than take a chance on the delivery driver getting lost (we are 1.1 miles away down the street they are on!).  The fries were crisp and very tasty, and the subs were very good - we had a cold turkey, steak bomb, and hamburger subs.  Will likely order from them again as they are closest to us and seem to have addressed the issues we had with them in the past.  The acid test will be whether they can deliver to us without getting lost!
I usually am the one to rate a place a bit on the high side but if there was zero rating, this place would be the easy winner. The food seems a bit on the old side and the general conditions are very dirty especially the bathrooms. Some one please call the Townsend Board of Health.
We ordered over 40 minutes ago, just got a call from the driver who cannot find out street.  We are less than 2 miles east of the store, on a dirt road immediately off the road that the store is on.  Getting very tired of ordering food only to wait for cold, soggy food to be delivered.  This is not rocket science, we're not that far away!

Called the restaurant to lodge a complaint - response was "Sorry, I'll call the driver".  No offer to make things right in any other way.

We finally got the delivery - driver said "Sorry about that, can I get you to sign?"

We had order a sub and fries - fries were lukewarm, sub was cold.  After reheating the food in our oven, it was passable - just.

This will likely be our last order unless either:
(a) Management understands that "sorry" doesn't really make up for cold, soggy food, or
(b) Management gets delivery drivers who know how to read a map, or gets GPS that's up to date.  This road has been here for over 15 years, and we never used to have this issue with delivery drivers not having a clue.

Would love to hear back from management at Patriot Pizza and Subs - their food is good, but not when it takes over 30 minutes to drive it less than 2 miles!
It's the best ice cream I'm town!! So flavorful, creamy and very fresh with so many different kinds it's always hard to decide! They also serve food. They just need to stay open longer on the weekends.
I have been here many times since it has opened and have never been disappointed. The prices are the best in Town and the ice cream is fantastic.  I am waiting for them to reopen for this 2016 season.  Great place and great staff.
This place is popular in the area...another location in Lunenburg as well. Each offer great selection of ice cream so expect crowds during warm summer mos. Friendly staff at ea location
The ice cream is fresh, creamy and full of flavor. I just wish it was open a little later on Friday and Saturday nights.
Really Good, Huge Portions, Homemade, other location in Leominster near Lunenburg, Cones, Sundaes, Frappes all are good. 
I come from an ice cream loving family and married into an ice cream loving family. I used to have a favorite flavor and order that everywhere I went. Then we tried Cherry Hill Too. They have the largest variety of favors and every flavor is the best. Now it is so hard to choose because you want every flavor. Raspberry Truffle, Moose Tracks, Freedom of Espresso, Cake Batter, and on and on. This season they even added a new flavor. It's great too. Peanut Butter Oreo!  You must try.
Large scoops!  Fresh ice cream, and lots of choices.  I always get the kiddie size.  I wish they would stay open all year!
Cherry Hill Too is such a great ice cream stand.  There flavor selection is one of the best I have seen and the quality of the ice cream is probably the best I have had.  The girls that work there are always friendly and I have never had any issues with orders being mixed up.  The only problem is that it is a minute drive from my house so the temptation is always there :).  I highly recommend Cherry Hill Too if you are local or even if you are just passing threw, it's worth the stop.
I have been going to Cherry Hill Too for several years - for the past 2+, the order has always been the same - regular hot fudge to go on Freedom of Espresso, whipped cream, nuts, and a cherry.  All of the staff has been great to work with, but special recognition goes out to Rene - she knows my order and often starts making it when she sees me in line or approaching with window, so it's ready for me to pay for and take home for my wife.  She has also learned over the years that my wife loves the hot chocolate, so she doesn't skimp on that when she makes the sundae.

I also had the occasion to visit two years ago with my sister and her children, one of whom has an epi-pen level nut allergy.  When we asked the staff about our options, they brought out their ice cream menu, which listed each flavor and any potential allergen it contained.  They are clearly set up to handle this, as they had a regular routine established - hand-washing, separate utensils and separate ice cream containers.  My nephew had a great sundae with no reactions (other than Yum).  The team at CHT also knows which ice cream flavors they have available in allergy-free containers, and I had the opportunity to watch them work with another customer at the window.  

I'll definitely keep coming back, and I hope the management can keep their team of servers, as they take a good experience and make it great.
A Tuesday night and I get it that there was one waitress that also was a hostess. We knew we were not in for the best service even though there was only one other party (of two) in the restaurant. Our drinks came out pretty quickly ( btw byob) but our food took a really really long time and every dish was cold and bland as could be. Bummer. We are local and wanted so much for this place to be good. A Mexican cantina is about the only type of place that would do well in that spot. It's off the beaten path and nobody knows that it's there so obviously they can't staff up for good help. 

Beautiful dinning room. Is our second visit and the food has gotten better. The Mediterranean House Salad, cucumbers, tomatoes, olives, onions with lemon dressing was delicious (no lettuce-true Mediterranean Salad). I had the Falafel, my weakness. Perfectly cooked with raw veggies and tahini sauce. I added Hommus to it, made the Falafel even better. My wife had baked eggplant with ground beef , tomatoes over a bed of rice, special of the night . Very light but fulfilling.
We are always willing to try new places to eat.  Upon arrival we were not sure where to enter this little building in a beautiful location off the beaten path. There were 2 white arrows pointing to the proper door.  Would help to define the entrance with a planter or something.  It was a warm summer night and they have no AC. There was one ceiling fan as you entered.  We asked to be seated with a bit of privacy but the lights were turned off in the area of the room and the tables were not set.  Server could not have been nicer.  Just 2 young men around 18-20 years old serving and seating guests. Never saw anyone else.  The pita bread and oil dip were very bland.  We got the cheese platter which was goat cheese, plain, raw cucumber and tomato slices and green olives. Next we got the vegetarian sampler and everything was bland. The falafel was tasty but so very dried out. The stuffed grape leaves were actually the best thing on the platter.  Being in food service I am big on keeping hot food hot and cold food cold and this food was all room temp.  We ordered coffee and it came room temp and weak as water.  We ordered baklava and it tasted different than any baklava I have ever had and I love baklava but not this one. Service was excellent but the food we tried was at best fair. Felt strange dining in a small place with half the lights off inside.
I invited six friends/family to join me at this fairly new restaurant in Pepperell, MA. The food was very tasty and fresh Mediterranean fare. They also allow you to bring your own wine without a corkage fee.

Our entire group enjoyed our meals. The service was first rate. I felt badly that we were the only patrons the evening we went. But also happy that our noisy conversation and laughter did not bother anyone else.
I went with my sister because she heard there was a new restaurant open. We tried a few things. All the food was good and fresh which is rare nowadays with all the microwaves out there. Service is excellent. Eating healthy is always a good thing but it has to taste good too. We also had the baklava for dessert. Just ask the waitress for recommendations if you are not sure what to try.
This is not your typical American restaurant. This lovely bistro is set in a country setting but easy to find. It was a Scottish restaurant and reopened after being closed for several years. It was done over and is lovely with white linens etc. Looked very clean with a nice relaxing atmosphere.
The food: It is Mediterranean food like wraps, kabobs or Greek type food. I enjoyed the bread dipping sauce and the diced salad of tomatoes and cucumbers. I ordered a wrap which I enjoyed with the seasoned fries. My husband got kabobs with rice and a salad. 
I didn't notice the typical fish dinners on the menu.The deserts were great. We had baklava and a sundae -- yum.
They serve lunch daily and an American breakfast on weekends.  Friends went for the breakfasts and were very happy and returned.
We enjoyed playing with the little goats in the petting area. They will be raised for milk to make cheese for the restaurant. 
Prices -- wraps $10, kabob dinner around $12, nice deserts under $5. Best of all they are waiting for a liquor license so you can bring your own booze and save $$. 
Would I return? Oh, yes because it is nice to have food that is not pasta, pizza or steaks. Something different, lovely, and close to home.
I went yesterday with my mother-in-law for a nice lunch.  She got the spinach salad with a light lemon dressing.  I got the lentil soup and chicken wings.   They brought out an appetizer of fresh soft pita bread and a dipping sauce.  The sauce was so good, my guess is olive oil, sesame seed, lemon, maybe balsamic.

The chicken wings were tender with a nice spice, but the lentil soup was amazing!  My MIL said that she likes lentil soup but she is super picky and won't order it unless she knows about it's like.  She took a bite of mine and was instantly jealous she didn't order it.   

I love the land that the building sits on, it sits on a hill with goats and a farm house - so cute!!  The restaurant itself has such charm with amazing red oak floors and white tablecloth dining.
Today my wife and I biked to the next town for brunch at Altali's Mediterranean Bistro. What a difference from the old, informal Scotch Pine place that disappeared in 2010. Altali's has been completely redone and is much more formal with white tablecloths, unhurried dining, reasonable prices and fresh ingredients. We would have rated it 4 stars but added a fifth star because the owner stopped by our table to check that everything was OK. We learned about his Italian and Lebanese background and he shared stories about his family. He likes to collect antiques and some are decorating the restaurant. He is planning to sell Christmas trees this year in order to make room for apple trees, pear trees, peach trees and blueberries. He has goats and wants to make fresh goat cheese and he's also planning to raise sheep. Like Arnold says, 'I'll be back.'
My daughter and I enjoy Mediterranean food and are excited that Altalis Mediterranean Bistro has opened close to home. We love supporting our local businesses, and this one is definitely worth your time. We enjoyed a wonderful dinner. 
Altalis Mediterranean Bistro is where Scotch Pine Restaurant was located -  on Elm St.  tucked away - head up the long driveway and be pleasantly surprised!
Had breakfast today-  will go again for sure.
Had dinner a few weeks ago-  will go again for sure. 

Definitely need to spread the word about Altali's Bistro!!
Altali's Bistro is a nice little oasis in much needed culinary desert. 

We went there for a lunch on a beautiful spring day and were not disappointed in the least. The setting is very casual/rustic. The restaurant was previously the home of the Scotch Pine Restaurant that was locally fairly famous for hearty breakfasts and amazing brunches. The decor is very log cabin on the outside, but is spruced up inside with middle eastern and Mediterranean doo dads and such. We were eventually seated at a nice table for 4 (they seemed a bit short staffed that day with one person doing the job of hostess and server). The menu has some very interesting choices (see picture below once TripAdvisor allows pictures of this restaurant), and we all ordered different things. The spinach salad was excellent, the chicken kabob wrap served with fries and the burger with middle eastern spices were "wonderful" according to the diners that ordered them, and I had the Mediterranean Combo appetizer which was superb-5 different appetizers along with large servings of hummus and tabouli.

Altali's does not have a liquor license, but you can BYOB (wine & beer). Pricing was very reasonable and the portions were large. They are closed on Monday, open 11:30am-9:00pm Tuesday-Friday, and 7:00am-9:00pm Saturday and Sunday.

If you find yourself in the Pepperell area, Altali's is well worth the visit. You won't be disappointed.
Just had lunch here and it was great! Chicken shawarma wraps, which have grilled chicken and tiny sweet pickles with a mayo-like sauce, cooked like a panini. I don't care for pickles, but they added just the right crunch and flavor. Fries and vegie  kabob were also very good.

The restaurant is not on a main drag, and it's tucked up off the road. But it's not far from Route 111, 119 or 113. I recommend that you try it next time you're headed out for dinner or just worked up an appetite from the Rail Trail :-) 
Mid-sized, beautiful restaurant in Pepperell, MA with beautiful red colored wooden flooring. (It looks like repurposed wood that has been lovingly refinished.)  

The food was excellent, the hummus perfect! The house salad is a more traditional Mediterranean/Middle Eastern salad with no lettuce just tomatoes, cucumbers, red onions and olives with a wonderfully light house dressing. The stuffed grape leaves were beautifully rolled and very very flavorful! I got baklava to go and when I had it later it was as good as the rest of the food had been. 

At the moment it is a BYOB for alcohol as they are in the process of obtaining a liquor license  so the bar area was closed off.  I believe that they also would like to do live music and traditional dancing according to what the waitress said. I really hope they do as I love middle eastern traditional dancing and have been to many middle eastern/greek/syrian restaurants and this one from a food standpoint is just as good if not better than most of them and on par with some of the best.

They also on the weekends serve a traditional american breakfast, I will be going back soon to try it!!!
Been going to this local restaurant (pizza place) for 30 years.  Same quality over all those years.  They expanded their menu over the years to include cheeseburger dinners and such.  The Roast Beef Sub is one of my faves.   My son loves the BACON PIZZA as well as the CALZONES.  Wide variety of food for a small place.
I grew up in Pepperell and started going to C&S Pizza when I was six years old and about when they first opened. The quality of the food is always excellent ......steak and cheese is been my go to sub for a lifetime. I really like their pizza too it's just different not like any other. I live out quite a ways from here now but every time I'm in striking distance I will stop in for a meal
My family started going here when we moved here almost 14 years ago. They have good pizza but better when owner makes it. We don't go as much due to the teens they hired to make the food.  If only the owner took more time with his employees to teach them better.  We have found a better place where the owners make everything. We are regular customers here.
While the nice folks have been in business in town forever and are very nice, the food is ok.  Nothing crazy good, but not bad.  Try the meatball sub as they make it a little bit different and its good!
Lived in Pepperell for 2 years now. We usually order from another place but decided we wanted to try c&s. Very disappointing. We ordered a large chicken and bacon pizza. You'd think bacon would make anything taste good but unfortunately the bacon on our pizza was barely cooked. Only some pieces near the crust were cooked. Super soggy, greasy, the crust corner was okay but the rest of the dough was super soggy. As soon as I picked a slice all the toppings and sauce would just slip right off. I'm usually not a negative reviewer but it was pretty bad. Also, the staff all seemed very young. 
Of the 4 pizza places in towns, C&S is the first choice. Although we have a favorite place out of town, if we want to stay local this is the place to go.
Stopped by for lunch with our 91 year old relative (who had been there before).  She was welcomed warmly by the staff, we were seated quickly, and the owners came over to speak with her, making us feel really at home.  We ordered a grilled chicken and onion pizza - came out piping hot and very tasty.  The pizza was more than we could eat, so we took home leftovers.  Reheated the leftovers the next day for lunch, and the pizza actually tasted better on reheat!  Might have been that it aged well, or that the flavors came through better when it wasn't quite as hot.  In any case, we'll definitely be back!
Always been one of my favorite places since I was a kid.  We used to drive from the neighboring town I lived in to get it, now I live down the road!  Bill and Christina are great people and care about their business, the quality of food, the customers and also the town.  The pizza has always been fantastic and always fresh.  Highly recommend it if you are in the area.
C&S has been our "go to" local pizza and sub place for the past 15 years. It always has consistently good food be it a hot sub or cold, pizza or fried haddock dinner. The owners are great people and help out in the community in any way they can.

If you find yourself in Pepperell, swing in for a tasty lunch.
Every year my family and I travel to Pepperell and we stop into this little restaurant up to 3-5 times. It's one of our favorite places. Love going here! Don't let one bad experience ruin the food! Lots of flavor and huge portions! 
The quality of the food was good and the size of the sub was larger than a typical large size sub. My only issue is paying $8 for a half filled large sub which make this place less than desirable. 
It would be nice if I could like this place, but... Other than the salads, this place is pretty bad.. Just had a pretty bad pizza and they gave me chicken wings instead of chicken fingers.. I wish there were better options around, but the choices in Pepperell are pretty slim.
Great subs and pizza. The owners Bill and Christina are great people. Nice to see in a small town. Reminds me of the small pizza places in my home town.
Sometimes the pizza is great sometimes not. Sometimes it is over cooked and sometimes under cooked and sometimes perfect.  They deliver though!
Had a large cheese pizza greek style.  Great flavor, cheese and crust were perfect.  It was amazing.  I will return to try more of the menu.  
We had visited this restaurant at its former location and didn't like it.  We had hoped that with the move to the better, roomier location that the food might be better. But it isn't.  Greasy, and unappetizing.
We live in town and order often from here. I can only write based on what we order. We don't order pizza because we don't eat much pizza. We do get wings, subs and spaghetti and meatballs. They recently redid their menu and it's pretty good. The steak cheese sub is nice and you can add whatever you want to it. Wings are meaty too. Nice staff and clean place. 
Having just moved to the area- we were missing our old favorite pizza place. This one is very good- great crust (2 kinds) with fresh flavors. Nice.
Horrible experience with take out only. The hamburger was raw. The salad was brown. Do I need to continue? Spent the night in the bathroom.. Ugh
Yeah I know Pepperell has too many pizza joints but PizzaPizzazz really is the best.    They deliver but we eat in often before/after ball games or just have a picnic at playground/town field. Staff is great and really care about your experience.

Best steak&cheese in town, bread is amazing.  I'm not a pizza fan but love their greek style pie. Got a salad w/ grilled chix this week and was pleasantly pleased it was fresh throughout with carrot slices v. shreds, red&green peppers, calamata and no pepperocini.  The chicken was fresh, plentiful and lightly seasoned.   
Would like to see dessert added, traditional greek but maybe a dessert pizza or giant choc chip cookie. 
I wish them much success in this crowded market!
I was here twice and both times the food was terrible.  Has to be the worst pizza I have ever had.  Pepperell has many places for pizza. Go to C&S if you want grest pizza and subs. Stay aware from this place.
The usual MO of a dedicated small ice-cream shop - many, many flavors of ice-cream, a handful of frozen yogurts. Decent selection of hand-packed quarts to go. A bevy of young-girls serving with typical warmer weather hours...  

One down-side is a dirt parking lot if you are into keeping your car clean...
When we discovered that Dr Davis was near a house we were looking at, it sealed the deal. The ice cream is wonderful and it's such a treat to stop in on the weekends or after work.  
very low key compared to kimball farm, so if you want a peaceful visit to an ice cream stand this is the place to go.  the ice cream is good quality and the place looks like it hasn't changed since the 1950's (i find this charming).  the help is friendly too.
I live right around the corner from this place, and I REALLY wanted to like it here, but I just can't do it. The pizza (which I've tried twice) is soggy. You can't pick up a slice without it drooping and falling apart. The taste is good, but I prefer a crispy crust, not a droopy soggy one. One of the positives is their dipping bread. It's like a focacia, and it's very tasty. I just went in for my 3rd attempt this past week and decided to try pasta instead of the pizza, and also one of their apps the Tuscan wings. Okay, the wings were just gross!! If you want a nice crispy chicken wing, do not order this!! The skin is a soggy, drippy mess. My son & I love wings...and we were peeling the wet soggy skin off the wings and just ate them plain. I think it was the first time the two of us didn't finish a wing app!! Yuck!! Then came the pasta dishes. My son ordered spaghetti and meatballs....and I ordered chicken/brocoli alfredo. My sons spaghetti was a watery mess. The meatballs were sour, and reminded me of what you get from a can of spaghettios!! My son will eat just about anything...and he left 3/4 of his plate. My chicken & broccoli alfredo was just okay. The sauce has a nice texture, but it tasted like milk. I couldn't taste any garlic,cheese, or spices at all....so bland. I can't say how disappointed we are in the food here. It's too bad, the people & service are very good, and they did try by taking my son's meal off our bill. But after 3 attempts, I'm sorry but we will keep going to Nashua to find good eats.
Mariano's is an awesome place to grab lunch, dinner or drinks.  The small bar is comfortable with a view into the kitchen and the general dining area is spacious yet cozy.  I am addicted to the Tuscan Salad (I add on chicken or steak) and the brick oven pizzas are to die for.  I am lucky enough to know the owners and can attest to their immense level of passion and commitment to providing exceptional dining experiences to their customers.  Everyone should go here at least once.......but I bet you'll keep going back!
Yummy Italian food in a cozy atmosphere.  Good service and delicious desserts that change frequently!  Enjoy every bite.
The best pizza in town and the best chocolate chip cookies we have ever had. They have great Italian meals and drinks too.
They've recently updated the menu.  I've only had the pasta dishes.  I truly enjoy that you can order half size of the pasta dishes.  The sauces are wonderful and I like that you can choose which pasta shape you would like to enjoy.  

They've done a very nice job on the atmosphere and everyone makes you feel welcome.  For such a small town, they've made the establishment feel upscale without being stuffy.

When I visit this area, I make sure I stop at least once for my Mariano's fix.
My family lives in Pepperell and when we are visiting we go to Mariano's.  The food is nicely priced, the service is great and the staff is very attentive.

I have had pizza, entrees and salads and have never been disappointed.  The have a bar and a nice selection of wines.  A great place to go.
If you like soggy pizza, then you have come to the right place.  We have been there three times and the pizza was terrible.  We spoke to the manager/owner and she offered us a certificate to try the pizza again, which we did.  It was still very soggy and wet.  They appear to do a lot of take out, though.  We like a well done pizza and were not able to get it there.   

We haven't tried the Italian fare that the restaurant offers, only the pizza, so I can't speak to it.
They have the BEST ice cream in town!!! You can now see a movie with the family, while you enjoy your icey delight. Or get a bite to eat. Stroll around and see car show. There's always something going on!
Great Ice cream  Exstream choc is BEST OMG And a great car show on Thursday nights  And the price is great 


Very good service, food was great and ice cream really good. Inside eating area is very clean and comfortable. We'll be back. It's worth the trip. 
Homemade ice cream, and smiles..not much not too like about it, also located in Leominster !!!  I would go back, I think its cash only, but do leave a tip !!!
The food is terrible and the drinks are watered down.   The staff is fun and there is Keno so if you go drink beer or wine and eat before you go.
Pleasantly surprised that the pizza was as good as it was.   Ordered long time ago when this restaurant was in a different location and dont remember the Pizza being so delicious.    I had guests and we all enjoyed the pizza, if they ran a pizza special some nights it would be even better !!!
Great place for BBQ. Centrally located in Pepperell, this comfortable restaurant offers a variety of BBQ dishes. I had the pulled pork BBQ plate and it was delicious! They also have a 3-cheese macaroni and cheese - mmm!  They menu is huge, so there's something for everyone in the family. For those who still have room - fried dough! I can't wait to return for the chicken and waffles.

I ordered a pulled pork sandwich that I didn't like the taste. It was bitter and the after taste was gross. I couldn't eat it:
And I was charged for it. I didn't even take a bite of it.  Wasn't even asked if I wanted something else. The waitress was actually a bit rude at the fact I didn't like it. 
So yeah, Never again. 
With all of the pizza places in Pepperell, you'd think one of them would get it right.  Not here.  When they moved we thought things might get better, but the food is the same.   Found the pizza to be greasy and overdone.  My son had a chicken finger basket and it was also overdone.  Subs are just average, but better than the pizza.  One of the other options in town will get our business.
You can order for pick up, sit at the bar and eat, eat at tables in the small bar area or sit in tables or booths in the small restaurant section.  The food is bar food like pizza, barbeque, quesadillas, burgers and subs.  The choices in this town are very limited.
What a cool little working man's place this is.  On alternate (I think) Thursday nights they provide music from local musicians (headed up by Marty Nestor) with no cover charge and you'd be surprised at just how good the music gets, which is not to neglect the tasty quality of the food and drink here. Try the bbq.  You'll be amazed! Staff and clientele are all very friendly and out for a good evening. There's a real sense in the room that everyone's together and hanging out.  Check it out. You won't be disappointed.
I had the pork ribs.  They had good flavor but could have used more sauce.  Clam Chowder had lots of clams and great flavor.  Menu has many choices.  Service was good to excellent.  We would come again. 
There are limited lunch options for a bike ride on the delightful Nashua River Rail Trail but we wanted a place with a varied but basic menu as a rest spot for a loop ride.  We were warmly greeted by what I believe would be the friendly owner.  It was mid-afternoon so the place was very quiet.  The decor is small town bar but the dining area (and menu) is suitable for families riding the bike trail.  The Depot is a short distance across the river on main street; located in a nondescript strip mall.  Unfortunately there are no bike racks but there are some support poles to chain up the bikes.  The gender neutral bathroom could use some cleaning; better yet to appeal more to the biking families separate male / female or at least an optional family bathroom.   We ordered the hamburgers, one with cheddar cheese, sweet potato and regular fries and selected from a fairly decent list of local and national beers.   The food was served and prepared with care without any unreasonable wait.  So what is with the Depot name?  There is no evidence of a tie-in with a railroad; maybe a grain depot?  It could just as well be called the Strip mall Cafe.  But for a good lunch its worth the short detour off the bike trail.  We will stop here again on our next ride.
I live in the same town, and our food choices in this small town are pretty bad. With that being said, I have ordered from this place for the last time. The food itself is okay, but the service is some of the worst I've have ever dealt with. I see I'm not alone with my comments about the horrible service. No matter what you order, and no matter what time of day you order, it's 30 mins. Really? For a couple subs? 

Add to that that they screw up the phone order every other time we ordered. The last time we ordered, just 2 burgers & fries, they quoted their usual half hour. I show up 30 minutes later, and wait another 20. Finally my order comes out, no apology, no anything. Whatever...I just went home to eat. Get home to find out they gave us two burgers, and no fries at all.....really? Was it that complicated? So I call and ask for the manager, and was told: "She's too busy".....what??? So I demanded to speak with the manager, who finally gets on the phone, and could care less about taking care of the mix up, and told me that it must have been our fault for not speciffically ordering fries!! 

By far the most useless manager in a restaurant I have ever dealt with in my life. What a complete joke she was!! This is the worst review I have ever written (see all my reviews). This place not only lost a customer for life, but everyone we know in the area will hear what a joke the management is. With such limited options in this town, you'd think they would at the very least hire a manager that has a clue....seriously....wow!!
Forget the pizza, but the rest of the menu is quite good. The BBQ is good for New England and the fish and shrimp are great. The drinks are the best in town. Service is top notch. 
Tried this place a few times now in an effort to give them a chance but when you screw up three times in a row, its not just a bad employee, the whole place is incompetent.

Each time we've ordered they couldn't get it right. This last time we ordered 2 subs and were very specific about what we wanted. Again.

They pretend like they're getting it down, then it takes a half an hour for two simple subs and they still get it wrong.

What they never get wrong is how much you pay... They always get that right because that's what's important to them.

Never again.
place is dirty coach roaches crawling across counter they prepare food in a common hall way shared with other stores and people constantly passing threw with the food left out
don't eat here even if your starving
None of the food we have had from here tastes like Chinese food should...   won't go back.  Hopefully they have corrected their previous health code violations.  Never seems very clean.
I always stop here when I have a cold for their Hot&Sour soup - it is liquid medicine.  Those spices and vegetables are very therapeutic, and it tastes delicious!
This place is less than a mile from my house, and until a second place opened I would drive 15 miles away to avoid this place. I tried it 3 times at least, never very good.
I live in the area, and our food choices are beyond limited in this town. We have 4 or 5 places for pizza & subs that are all average at best...and two chinese joints. If you don't feel like driving anywhere, this place is okay from some quick take-out. Don't think I've ever seen anyone actually eat there. They do some thing good, and others...not so much. I love their chicken terriaki, and veggie lo mein. Some of the meals were a little scary. If we want real food, we drive over to Nashua. And for those recommending the Tea Cafe.....it's just more average chinese food, so take your pick. Lotus Blossum in Nashua blows them both away, and that isn't saying much.
Decent food, not a great place to sit down and eat. Not great parking, very tight entrance to the parking lot. I would recommend you try Tea Cafe instead.
The food is average but it is best as take out as the atmisphere needs some redoing.  The quality of the foid is ok but the stmosphere is sorely lacking. The Tea Cafe in town is much much better
This place must be doing something ok as it's been here for over 15 years, but its not a place to sit down at and if you have time, you really should go somewhere else.  Horrible.
Наши друзья в Пепперелле посоветовали этот ресторанчик китайской кухни. Небольшой, милый, взяли еду на вынос. Порции большие, очень сытно и недорого! Особенно понравились вегетарианская лапша-вок с овощами и оладушки! Супер:)!
This Subway is always clean and the food fresh. We didn't need another sub shop in town but I like the fresh bread at subway.
When fist open was great but now customer service is no longer a priority. Stopped in on a Saturday night @ 8:50 pm lights were on and sign said open until 10:00pm. The worker said we close at 9 but it wasn't posted on the door. Wouldn't make a sandwich for me and I said your hours are posted for 10 he said they're not. Told him I wouldn't be back again.
Good selection of bread types to choose from.  Usually several types available.  If you ask, they will not chop your salad.  Lots of coupons available for subs.
Stopped in late for a couple of sandwiches to bring home for dinner.  Service was terrific and the sandwiches were completed to order. A great stop for a great sandwich.
Great subs as always and nice to have a place even though its a chain that has such an easy access, great food and even can be ordered on line via your phone app or your other device.

Stay away from their pizza though.  Nice that they have small personal pizzas for one but no matter how many times I've tried it to give them a chance to fix it, the center is always cold and uncooked.
It's the Dunkin Donut chain and this establishment has a very nice crew.  I go there to get my coffee.
The staff at this Dunks is always pleasant and cheery.   The only complaint I have about this particular Dunks is that they always seem to be out of our 'favorite' donuts!
I tend to like most of what DD's has to offer and will inevitably stop several times a week at a store, but NOT this particular one.
Here is what this store is good at:
Not getting the order correct despite 2-3 attempts at telling the clerks what you want.
VERY long wait times in the drive-thru that are a constant.
Rude and "care less" attitudes by the employees and management staff.

Take the extra 5 min. ride in 3 other directions to the DDs in Townsend, Dunstable or Groton and avoid this one.
DD is usually a go to place for a quick coffee. This particular one is one to watch out for as they seem to let things that can spoil sit on the shelf. The cream for the coffee has a tendancy to go bad at this place too often for me to trust them any more. Other places in town have better ciffee at a chesper price.
I always get the Ice Cream Sundae.   Really good.   Too bad I'm now on a heart healthy diet or I'd still be going here a lot!  Took the kids and grandkids here for years.
Dr Davis has been dishing out their own homemade ice cream for a long, long time.  We are relatively new Pepperell residents, but Dr Davis has captured our hearts as far as ice cream goes.  It's a classic New England old school ice cream stand.  A ridiculous number of flavors... Grahamtastic (graham cracker flavored) ice cream is absolutely amazing.  As are their old fashioned malted frappes (my personal favorite is chocolate malt with extra malt and peanut butter sauce!).
Go eat their ice cream!  You will be happy!  Promise.
Many different varieties of ice cream to try.  Delicious ! It also makes its own waffle cones dipped in different toppings
We have been going here for ice cream since my first son's first ice cream.  He is now 32 years old.  Lots of varieties to choose from, lots of outside tables, and they even have free ice cream for your pups.
Doc Davis has it all - they've been in business here forever (well, for decades, anyway), they employ lots of local kids, they have plaques showing all the Little League teams and such that they've sponsored - and they make EXCELLENT ice cream!

I particularly like their peach ice cream - real chunks of fresh peach - but everything from butterscotch to banana coconut cream pie is delicious.

It's a very small place - 1 table inside and a few picnic tables under a giant umbrella outside. Buts the service is fast and it's never real crowded.

It's also a bit tricky to find. If you're on Main St in Pepperell going west, turn right onto Mill St. just after you go over the bridge and keep going and it'll be on your right.

If you're on the Rail Trail, go down the street beside Breen's Diner, go over the covered bridge and take a right and it's about 3 blocks down on your right.
What a wonderful group of kids working in this small local ice cream shop.  I enjoy the fact that they make their own locally.

Thank you for the shady picnic tables to enjoy my cool treat.

So many flavor choices, keep up the great work!
Dr. Davis ice cream is a good local businesses, friendly staff and good ice cream. The doc special is a treat for the kids.... Too big for me.
Great service, pleasant folks, nice shaded outdoor table area. They make their own ice cream. A nice place to stop in with the kids.
My boyfriend had a coffee frappe and thought it was great!
I had a cone with a scoop of chocolate coconut almond and a scoop of coffee Oreo. Overall the ice cream was good but it could have used more fillings. I only had a few almonds and didn't taste the coconut in the chocolate almond coconut. I also didn't taste pieces of Oreo in the coffee Oreo. 
We sat with a couple who raved about their frappes and sundaes and said they have been coming here for years and love it. 
Nice seating area outside. Quick service. 
Delicious local ice cream, lots of flavors, homemade cones and an idyllic setting on a summer's eve!
DOC'S  is THE place to go when it's time for a cold treat. Their ice cream is homemade by the family that owns Doc Davis and  it is certifiably DELICIOUS!!  High school kids usually serve at this counter counter-only establishment., the servings are generous and there are a few picnic tables outdoors where you can  relax and enjoy your cone. I have been coming here since I was a little kid , then my kids were little kids and hopefully they will continue the tradition.
Nice local place, but the ice cream quality is basic. There's better ice cream by driving a bit further.
Ice cream is really good but too expensive.  A short drive away and you can get just as good ice cream for a lot less.
The sundae was so small and for the 6 bucks I paid, not worth it. So now I go to Cherry Hill in Townsend, Ma
My first time here, I must say I thought the ice cream was delicious. I had the peppermint ice cream and my friend had the mint chocolate chip. The portion for a small cone was enough for two people. As for the price, It was very reasonable.  I am definitely going back for more. Yummmm!!!
Doc Davis's has been around for a couple of generations. The building is "vintage" and the parking is adequate. Seems to do a big business on the weekends.
They claim they make all of their own ice cream. Good quality product, if a bit pricey.
We found this wonderful ice cream shop when we were house hunting. The ice cream is so delicious, that I think it's the reason we bought a house near by!
Of the 4 choices in the area, this is my least favorite.  Pricey for what you get.  Portions are not large enough for the amount that is charged.  Our last visit was on 4th of July and I was sick all the next day, hopefully the ice cream had nothing to do with it!
Nice rural location in a peaceful setting. There are picnic tables. The service is quick even at busy times.  There is a lot to choose from.
Very nice local ice cream stand with some different varieties you can't find anywhere else! I love the raspberry truffle but it is not always available. 
Hoping for one of those cute small town spots, was looking forward to breakfast but really wasn't wowed. Home fries had no flavor, just partially fried potato chunks.  Omelette filling was minuscule bits of minced vegetables with absolutely no flavor. Coffee was terrible.  Restroom as another stated needs much improvement. Seems like others liked it, I wouldn't be able to recommend though.
Family style dining, the owner Charlotte is a sweetheart and is always there to share a smile and a kind word. Great wait staff and cooks. Great fried food and yes, they even serve liver and onions!!! Breakfast is my husband's favorite meal there at Charlotte's.
We've only eaten at Charlotte's Cozy Kitchen once. The food was fine, but the place needs a facelift. Looks more run down instead of "cozy". Months later, we decided to try another meal here. We were sitting at our table for a good 10 minutes without any acknowledgement. We were only one of three tables that were seated, while the rest of the restaurant was empty. Unfortunately, when we decided to leave, no one noticed. I'd like to try Charlotte's Cozy Kitchen again, but I'll have to have time , just in case it takes too long. We love Pepperell and it's only a benefit to the town when the restaurants and stores have high standards.

Now, their little ice cream window is a definite bonus to Pepperell, as it sits across from the Nashua River Rail Trail. They have outdoor picnic tables with lovely hanging flowers. This helps to make Pepperell a quaint New England town.
Always friendly and always a good meal, breakfast and lunch is what I have done there and not been disappointed.
My husband and I are regulars here for fresh haddock on Friday night and Sunday breakfast.  Good value for the money.  Charlotte must be great to work with because the staff remains the same from year to year.  I like the feeling of continuity there...not too many things you can count on anymore!
I almost feed bad giving this restaurant a poor review but the whole place has seen better days. Old formica, salad was iceberg. Bathroom was questionable.
Went with my kids and they loved the staff. Food was great! Nice and clean. Kids friendly. Frequent visitors. Also has amazing ice cream for great prices!
Excellent breakfast. Best home fries and toast and omelets. Very friendly. Visited while doing the bike trail. 
Food is always good here, whether it's for breakfast or lunch (have never been for Friday night dinner)...   too frequently there is too long of a wait before a server shows up, and I can't stand it when your coffee doesn't get refilled!
Located on the Nashua River Rail Trail this is a perfect place to take a break - you can order at the window and eat on the benches.  The small size cones are ENORMOUS.  I highly recommend the peach - it really hit the spot.  
Keep up the energy to continue the ride.
We stopped along the Nashua River bike path to have lunch in the very small town of Pepperell. This is the only place to eat along the short main street across from the bike path. It is probably a typical small town diner. Were it not for the customers who were obviously biking the place would have been empty. Still the service was slow, the server was surly, and both my soup and coffee were served lukewarm. In any other town I would have given this place only 2 stars, but maybe in Pepperell this is what to expect.
Went to this Restaurant over 4'th of July weekend and used a Gift Certificate from Restaurant.com and the waiter brought us our receipt and we saw it was not processed correctly so he took it back and gave us a receipt for the correct amount. The following week we saw we were actually charged twice for both receipts. We went back to the Restaurant and were told by the owner that there was nothing she could do and that they don't issue refunds at store level and told us to put a claim in with our bank to take care of it. She also stated that it was very busy and she did not have time to deal with us. The waiter was there and admitted right in front of her and us that he made a mistake and still she would not fix it. I have never been treated so rude in over 30 years of eating out. Avoid this place at all costs!!
I still like the "small" town atmosphere of Pepperell, where I was born. The food, service, value all make Charlotte's a place we stop when we make our annual pilgrimage back to the ole home town. Don't like the cold winters, so we live further south!
This review is based soley on dinners on Friday night. The choices are good especially the fish. The wait is a bit long but everything is cooked to order. The atmisphere is small town New England and the service is up and down but a good place anyway.  It's worth a try.
Bicycling up from Nashua on the Rail Trail, this is the perfect place to stop for a cold drink or treat.  We were here late Saturday afternoon - the staff was extremely pleasant and helpful, the ice cream was delicious and the servings were quite large.  Lots of people seem to agree - there was a steady stream of customers and all of the picnic tables were occupied.
Pepperell MA is loaded with sub shops/pizza places/ fast food etc. but only has two sit down places for breakfast that most locals go to.  Unfortunately, most locals go out of town and don't stop at these two places as often as they could.  Charlottes has an ok menu and is accessed often because its close, but it's often very dirty and the food always seems to be soaked in grease.  If you're stuck for time, then go here, but after trying it many times for years, it just doesn't seem to get better (or cleaner) and some locals are just ok with that. Price is ok for what your going to get and you can park out front- be careful if you park across the street!  It is what it is, an ok place for breakfast or lunch but be prepared...
We love stopping here when we're biking the Nashua Rail Trail. Clean place, friendly staff, fun decor--even outdoor tables. Most recently, I had a wonderful veggie melt sandwich with gluten-free bread (not always available in a small place like this), but the freshly made, hot chips were a revelation--best potato chips of my life, bar none!
Huge servings and great price. On the weekends you could wait a little bit for a table which there are not a lot of them. There is also places to sit at the counter. A must eat if in Pepperell or in the area.
Best breakfasts place in town by far. They have consistently good food, great portion size, and service is excellent. Sometimes the service can be slow at busy times so keep that in mind with small children.
A nice clean and inviting establishment.

My go to sandwich there is the Rockin' Reuben, but sadly on the day of my visit they were out of corned beef so I had a burger and fries instead - yummy.
I know, a diner with a 50's theme has become cliche but this pulls it off pretty good. Not sure exactly why but Breen's seemed more authentic than most. I was there for lunch and had the Coney Island Hot Dogs. Not exactly what I call Coney Island style dogs but they were good. The fries were nice and crisp and plenty of them. All in all a nice little place. I'll go back. 

Breen's is a 1950's revival diner, juke box, checkered floor and stools, as well as booths.  Food plentiful, fries done to perfection, large burger about 1/3 lb, not frozen formed.
Large portion of fries, with lettuce and tomatoes.  BLT had lots of bacon well done.  Waitress dressed in 50's uniform was very pleasant and accommodating.  Drinks were large.  Would go back.
Friendly atmosphere and a fantastic omelet. I would recommend it to anyone. Bring your appetite. You will leave with a smile.
Food is fantastic, service is great, an A+ diner experience. The newly redecorated interior is real nice - good retro 1950's touches without overdoing it. I had the steak and eggs - perfect over easy eggs, hash browns were the best I've had in a long long time. not too salty, great flavor. The kids loved the Eggs Benedict. Coffee is A+ too. Our waitress Ashley was wonderful. We'll be back. New owners as of about 1 1/2 yrs ago, and they've done a great job. A real asset to Pepperell!
Great breakfast, friendly service, nice hometown feel maintained in this Lical spit. Would definitely go back!
Breen Diner makes a great breakfast at a reasonable price and a very generous portion. One omelette serves two people very well. One thing I appreciate is that they will substitute hash brown potatoes with a fruit cup if you prefer, which I do. This is not just a greasy spoon. The cook is a real chef and he cares about what he serves. Do yourself a favor and eat at Breen's when in Pepperell.
Went today around noon for breakfast or lunch (we were on the fence).  Decided to start with 2 frappes (both Chocolate and Vanilla were delicious, and filling - topped with whipped cream and served in old-fashioned shake glasses).  We had the Big Bopper and the Veggie omelet.  Big bopper was too big to finish - 2 large pancakes, 2 eggs, a ton of bacon, home fries, and 2 pieces of rye toast.  Everything was delicious, though a couple of pieces of home fries were too salty for our taste.  The veggie omelet was also generous - 3 egg omelet, loaded with sliced mushrooms, diced green peppers, and diced onion, along with cheddar cheese.  That came with 2 pieces of toast and home fries as well.  We were both stuffed and left 1/2 piece of toast.

Service was a little uneven - started out great, we had people checking to make sure everything was OK, but it took a little time for someone to notice that we had put a red credit card on our check to pay.

Will definitely return for lunch - watching some of the lunch plates coming out it looks like they are equally generous and probably just as tasty!
This is a small place but offers lots of choices of very good food in really great surroundings. We had the Big Bopper breakfast that was more than we could eat! Friendly staff that welcome regulars as well as new visitors. It features 50's music and memorabilia. I'm sure lunch would be just as good.
Good food, great service, nice atmosphere. Nice little diner off the Rail Trail. I visit often, always consistently good.
Always great food and excellent service. We go there every weekend.The manager comes by the tables to get a real opinion of the food and service. It's very clean even the bathrooms 
We were biking the Nashua rail trail and stopped in Pepperell at Breen's Diner for lunch. Cute 19050's diner atmosphere.Food was delicious. I had a great  big omelette with real spinach-not frozen, delicious feta cheese, and mushroom. I think the homefries were real potatoes that were fried up- not a can of potatoes fried up. Others had fruit cup that was fresh fruit, again not canned.Salad with grilled chicken was great. Owners came over to check on us. Highly recommend this place. Much better than the other eatery in the center of town.
Really love the decor. Prices are great, especially for larger families! The staffing is great! Coffee is made perfectly. The kids love the food!
This place is turning into a little gem in Pepperell. This is a great place to bring the family. i reccomend that you try the cornbeef hash, it's outstanding!
For something a little different for breakfast or lunch, visit Breen's Diner.  Don't miss the chef's homemade corned beer hash - his "Irish Benedict" is the best!
The new owners are doing a great job. The place always looks clean, the staff is very friendly and the food is really good! Nice to have a go-to diner in town. I no longer have to drive to nashua or tyngsborough when I want a quick breakfast. 
Here you will find large portions, food cooked to perfection, friendly staff and a great family owned and run business.  Such an improvement over the last place, and so nice to be able to come in and sit down without worrying about whether or not you're in a 'regular's' seat/table.  Prices are reasonable, cheaper than some of the other breakfast places we stopped going to because of cost.
I order here frequently however the customer service is really bad. The lady who takes your order over the phone is extremely rude. The food is average but i recommend seeking out alternative pizza places just because of the terrible service 
This place has one of the few pizzas that my children can agree on, but the women who answer the phone (the mother or the daughter who own it I believe) act like you are bothering them when you place an order. I would never order from there again if my children didn't like the pizza so much.  
I have been eating there for 20 years.  they have been there forever so  obviously they do something right.  the pizza's great and cheaper than most  other places.   great delivery too. 
Ordered a chef salad thinking it had meat such as turkey ham and cheese.  Was highly disappointed when there was no meat.  Secondly pita bread was so hard and nasty.  Worst salad I ever ate.  
I have been eating at Expresso's pizza for years.  The pizza is delicious and is the most reasonably priced in Johnston's west end/north scituate area.  not a huge fan of the grinders, but i will recommend the pizza 100%
It is difficult to rate this place because parts of it are really good.  The service is quick, friendly and fun and the food is ok but parts of the place are a total dump.  They may have the grossest bathroom I've ever seen. The menu is extensive if not also a little campy but there is something for everyone and they make a nice crisp french fry.  The only thing really missing is a good salad but then again, it is a pub.
Excellent neighborhood bar. Friendly people, great service, nice food. Clean and upbeat. Great place to watch the game or meet your friends.  Try it out. Becky and Lana are great behind the bar.
Excellent neighborhood bar and restaurant.  Great outdoor seating and patio with fireplace. The owner Tom is always around. Lana and Becky and Diane great at the bar. Food is good, drinks are awesome and the atmosphere is amazing.  Give it a try.
Great Food ,Great Atmosphere,Nice Outdoor Area,Very Friendly Staff ,,,, Nice place to meet Good People... Decent Prices...

This is a local tavern that we stopped for lunch on the way from the Providence Airport. It is essentially a bar that serves food beyond the average bar food. We had the meatball parm sandwich and chicken noodle soup for lunch. The soup was very good and the meatballs were home made. The meatballs were served on a toasted Italian bread and topped with home made sauce and cheese. 

Dinner menu is more extensive than soup, appetizers, sandwiches and salad. They have a full menu that includes seafood and meats.
This tavern is a possible hidden gem overtaken by regulars that wonder why you are in their bar and a hungover bartender that didn't add anything thing to the place. The food was just right and the beer was nice and cold. The building is a beautiful old building. The main bar was a classic looking tavern but didn't seem to be open. Instead the smaller bar was being used which was fine but nothing special like the main bar. All in all the price was just right for a quick lunch.
Very lay back,  easy going with tasty food!  They offer great beers too.  It's also priced right! We went in around 6pm on a Thursday,  wasn't quite busy either!  If you want a quiet night and avoid Providence rush hour,  it's a decent alternative! 
Being in the area on business, we popped into this pub for a pint and a quick bite. Can't say that it's plush in any way but the staff were friendly and the food and drink good. We'll probably call in again if passing.
Please check your account that you put your bill on. The waitress that waited on us changed the slip and charged us more than we said. Found out when I checked my account. Called to see if anyone could help me only to be told the owner is away for three months and no one could help me. Had to dispute it with my bank. Will never go back again and please beware and check your receipt.
Very good food served in cozy, casual atmosphere. It's great for watching sports with several large-screen TV's, although it can get somewhat noisy. It also has a great outdoor area.
Good food, large menus however it is a bar atmosphere, TV's on wall, service a bit slow & not very knowledgeable.
Not fine dining but what a fantastic neighborhood type of place.  I pulled in around eight after many hours on the road.  Not many cars in the parking lot.  The Red Sox on every TV. I did my usual and asked the bar maid why people come back.  She said the hamburgers and the ribs.  I tried the ribs, a special that night.  I have neve had ribs like theirs-very meaty.  They came with a salad, a side of gilled chicken and a huge plate of pasta.  I like to eat but I could not finish all this.  The pasta was good-nice sauce, well drained.  People were friendly.  One person told me about places in Providence.  As I ate the place filled. If I lived in this area, this would be my place to go.
Heading home to MA, I wanted to stop and get a quick bite to eat with my boyfriend. Stopped there on a Sunday to get some of the .30 wings. We ordered 20, but I was still hungry. While looking at the menu, I found the craziest burger ever..a regular burger sandwiched between 2 grillcheeses. OMG!! I needed to try this, but didnt want to look like a pig, so I offered to split it with my bf. Bad move. We both liked it so much, we're driving back down from MA, to get it again this weekend. Best burger ever and now I'm addicted.
They don't batter their wings, and they'll fry 'em for ya as crispy as you like.   

Other than that, though, this is a hard-core dive.  Lots of drunken old men with big red noses who are flirty with the cute bartenders.  The girls who work behind the bar need to learn how to wait on patrons, not just flirt with gross old guys because they think they'll get a big tip.

I ate there with a girlfriend last month, at the bar, and the bartender (they all look the same...cute, 20-somethings with big boobs) was spraying cleaning fluid all over the bar.   The smell was overpowering, and we asked her to stop.  She rolled her eyes at us and said, in a bored voice "I have to clean, YOU KNOW."  That did it.  No more sitting at the bar.
amazing cheap food whats wrong with that. I love the .50cent wings on sunday nights the are amazing not dry like some other places. I also get the penne vodka which comes in such a large portion i cant eat it. They also have this sandwhich i have yet to try called the fat bast*rd which is a double cheese burger but instead of normal american/swiss ect cheese they put mac-n-cheese on it and instead of a bun its two grilled cheese sandwhich. It looks like a heart attack waiting to happen but my friends all love it. if the owner ever reads this i just have one little complaint.... can you please put angry orchard back on tap
This is my and my wife's favorite little stop for lunch. Great burgers, great beer and relaxing atmosphere. Doesn't look like much and is more or less a hard-core bar but good people. They have a very nice looking larger dining area but we have never gone there for dinner. I'm guessing dinner would be good too.
I've been visiting Bishop Hill Tavern for several years and never thought to review it.
It's one of my favorite places to eat. 
For a small place the menu is impressive.
I've had the veal, pork, and swordfish but my favorite dish is the "chicken allegro".
It's breaded chicken breast prepared like chicken Marsala with prosciutto ham and provolone cheese in the center.
I've never been able to finish it. The portions are large. One meal is definitely plenty for two meals.
The one thing I don't like about the dining room is the poor lighting. It's pretty dark. Seeing your food isn't a problem but reading the menu can be a chore if you are there at night.
This is only takeout; no eat-in or delivery. Vast menu, cooked when ordered. Food is always ready when you arrive for pickup. Friendly staff.
Anyone who knows the area also knows the options are limited.  It was great to find a Chinese restaurant closer to our home.  The food was good.  We had multiple dishes to split.  I ordered the Gen S chicken which could have been spicier and I will ask for that next time.  Keep in mind  - it is take out only.
The food is very good and they do give you a lot but $11 for a tuna grinder is a bit much. Another factor is sometime when you call in certain items they do not make it until you arrive.
Excellent pizza and Italian sandwiches.  Owner Joe was always there making sure your happy and full. TRY IT OUT YOU WON'T BE DISAPPOINTED. 
This is one of the best pizzas around and the guys there are great.  Everyone is always happy, friendly, helpful and quick.  Sandwiches are really good too.....can't go wrong here!
Excellent pizza, no matter how you like it! There's thick Sicilian, thin crust, even whole wheat. Delicious hot and cold grinders, and pasta dinners. LOVE the eggplant parm. and garlic bread. Not much of a dining room, so you might want to order your food to go and enjoy this yumminess at home. :)
The people at Cuozzo's, including the brothers Danny and Joe, make every visit great. We eat lunch there several times a month. I have food allergies and they are always mindful and careful about every step of my foods preparation, serving, and presentation. The food is fantastic (try the White pizza!) every time.
Great fresh pizza with good sandwiches.  My kids love the pizza.  Delicious homemade soups and very good salads. 
My favorites are the shaved steak wraps and the white pizza. Their steak fries are the best around! They're a bit pricey for this type of place.
Joe and Danny have got to be the 2 hardest working guys in RI.  They are always there (that's a good sign...the owners on the premises during business hours.)  The pizza is EXCELLENT; consistently good, lots of cheese, a great sauce, and a crunchy, delicious crust. 

I also like their chicken parm dinners and italian grinders.  And the prices are decent; much better than that ridiculous Famous Pizza down the street.   

High recommend!
The pizza is great but the grinders need more meat.  The best staff in town
Cuozzo's has delicious spinach pies. They deliver and that is good because the seating is extremely limited.
Cuozzo's has been in the IGA plaza for years, and i have been eating there ever since.  they make normal "thin" pizza and thick rustic sicilian pizza.  I prefer the sicillian style.  the pizza is always fresh, reasonably priced, but not the best tasting in the area.  Where Cuozzo's really excels is their grinders.  They make excellent hot/cold grinders that are huge in size, taste great and are the lowest priced in the area.  The chicken parm grinder is one of my favorites i have had.
My husband and I have been to Cindy's for breakfast many times, usually on our way to Mohegan Sun.  We have never had a bad meal, the service is always great and the prices just can't be beat.  My husband's favorite is their steak and eggs, mine is their pancakes and bacon.  Looking forward to trying their lunch sometime!
Four people ate very well for under $40 - breakfast.  The coffee was delicious, the service was excellent.  Waffles with blueberries were just perfect.
This diner is a true gem. Mom n Pop style diner that offers fantastic food and even better service. My boyfriend and I have been going there for breakfast at least once every weekend for the past couple of years. The food is consistent, we're delivered our good in no longer than 10 minutes and the staff is super friendly. I highly suggest supporting local and checking this place out!!
Most of the parking is behind the building and not convenient (1 handicap spot). Greeted as we entered, seat yourself. Decent lunch menu and my mushroom cheeseburger was quit good and cooked well. My wife had a BLT which she liked. Place was clean, service was good & friendly, Prices were generally very good (except the high price for a standard snack bag of chips). There are other places in the area I want to try but I would go there again,
Home style meals and polite waitstaff. Love the decor ! It really reminds me of back when I lived in New Hampshire & Maine.
A very assuming establishment. Ordered the grilled salmon over salad. Fish, very well prepared, salad all fresh from the field. Quite impressive for $10.95. Looking for great food that won't break the bank, this is it. The servers all very friendly with nice service.

A real old fashioned diner with all the classic breakfast food including pancakes, omelets and eggs any way you like. 
Cindy's is the locals' secret sport for a great breakfast and lunch. Great old fashioned diner food at great prices. The Irish Eggs Benedict is excellent!
Stopped for a quick bite on the way home from the Mohegan Sun.  Hubby ordered chicken cutlets and I had tenderloin tips.  both quite good.  salad was freshly made with dressing that was not from a bottle.
We met friends who had recently discovered Cindy's  Diner since moving to the NW corner of RI. The food was good, plentiful, and at frugal prices! I wish we lived closer! We live in SE coast of RI.
On our trips to Martha's Vineyard we have passed by many times.  Stopped for a late lunch and were very pleased.   Plusses:  clean, great waitress, home style choices.   One in our party had the hot turkey dinner that he loved!!  I had the turkey club which was good but using the roast turkey here would have been better   Fresh beef for the burger.  Great sweet potato fries!    One negative- the tuna in the tuna melt was still cold. Window where we sat needs repair (bullet hole?).   Cute decor.  We'll be back!
We stopped for a quick, cheap late lunch after the Scituate Arts Festival and we're delighted with Cindy's! Convenient location, plenty of parking, super clean, extremely friendly and prompt service and a delicious lunch! Nothing fancy, but it is a diner...
It's refreshing to still get a good sandwich for under $5. The sweet potato fries were yummy too!
Classic diner look, love it! Service was great, the ladies working there are so nice and quick. Very welcoming. Had a great bbq chicken panini w fries. Great BBQ sauce. Messy!! Couldn't finish it. Crispy fries. Should have had a salad but, oh well!!!
I had read a number of great reviews about this place and since I pass by here on a regular basis, I made a point of stopping to try it for dinner.  The day I stopped in, one of the daily specials was broiled salmon.  I would normally be hesitant to try fish at a small roadside place like this, but I figured it was one of the specials, so why not give it a try?  What I got was a small square piece of salmon that was clearly from one of those plastic frozen packages which was broiled without any apparent seasoning so much that it was dried out, a scoop full of canned green beans, and it was clear they were right out of the can and also had no seasoning, not even a little butter. The highlight of the meal was the baked potato, but of course I had to ask someone for butter and sour cream to go with it.  Definitely not the typical home style cooking you expect at a place called a diner.  The only good thing I can think to say is that the place seems to be kept clean.

If this is a sample of what their regular cooking is like, then it is no wonder there were no other customers in the place at the time--which should have been my warning, but I have passed by here a number of times when the parking lot was full, so I figured this was just an off hour.  After this experience I would not stop here again.
for diner food Cindy's is great. The service is fast and friendly. The prices are to die for and they give you more than enough food.  Great place for Seniors!!
Had a great breakfast at Cind'y's while staying at America's Best. What a treat! In walking distance from the hotel. Service was great  and the food was wonderful.  A great little diner with lots of personality!
Forget about dinner. Had baked haddock and it was terrible. The breading wasn't even cooked. Fish was mealy and bland. Green beans and french fries were cold. Waitress almost looked embarrassed to serve it, but didn't say anything. I picked at it and left. The place wasn't even busy and that was their dinner special. Poor effort.
Delicious and fun atmosphere!! We had the Belgium waffles, country eggs Benedict, wonderful experience. Zany motif with a busy helpful staff. 
Great food 
old diner menu
clean and good customer base 
pot roast with mashed potatoes 
fish and chips 
good soups
The waitstaff was fantastic but aside from that not so spectacular. Canned corn was more tan than yellow, shepherd's pie was tasteless from the instant mashed potatoes right down to the puddle of hamburg grease in the bottom of the bowl. Even the salty brown gravy I ordered to try to flavor it up didn't help. 
On the up side our very sweet waitress dressed up my instant hot chocolate which was actually pretty good! 
It is now leveled !! Hopefully something good will go there soon.  Heard it might be a Honey Dew will have to wait & see
How does a McDonald's serve a burger that is cold in the middle, slow service is a must so don't be wanting fast food
It is exactly what you expect mediocre food at a high price. Its is McDonalds don't expect healthy just expect quick.    
The worst service and slowest service around. Consistently asked to pull up and wait at the drive through and most employees have awful attitudes. Johnston Mcdonalds owned by same people totally different service. Go to Johnston instead if you can.  The North Scituate Mcdonalds has been awful for at least a decade no sign of changing anytime soon
We stopped here around 9 PM since we were staying across the street.  The food was horrible. Burgers were lukewarm and the fries were cold, hard and dark as were the chicken nuggets. We asked for new fries, which the young manager pleasantly obliged.  The new fries were hot, hard and dark as if the oil in the fryer was old and very hot,  He apologized and said it was like that when he arrived that evening. If the fryer was off, he should have done something to alleviate the matter. Instead of new nuggets we asked for fish filet and that was the same. When another couple heard us, they also said they complained and they said other people complained too that had already left.  We just gave up and left.  This is the worse McDonald's we have ever been to for food and the owner should really try to alleviate this matter so people will FLOCK to his/her establishment.
Wanting to get some local apples, we settled on Knight Farm because we also could get breakfast. It was a pleasant drive from southern Rhode Island on a gorgeous Sunday morning. We were not disappointed with the food or the apples. The servers were friendly and attentive; they kept the coffee coming.
Our friends in Providence and Boston love having brunch with us here in the country.  The pancakes, veggie hash, and eggs are all high standard.  Fresh food, accessible but with an extra touch.
This is my son's favorite breakfast. The portions are large and the food taste do fresh. I had the Farmers market omlette and my son had one of the specials that comes with a lot of meat. The service is ok and the pricing is a little high for breakfast, but worth it for the quality.
Breakfast was good. Nothing special about it. My compliant is it was hot in there. I guess no a/c or maybe it was broke. I had a ton of flies drive bombing my food. Sorry, but that grossed me out. Could not finish my meal.
Yummy breakfast! Like eating at home. Friendly service. Good price. We love the omelettes. We love the pancakes. Very pretty place especially in Fall. 
We went for breakfast a few times & it has always been great, sometimes there is a bit of a wait, but well worth it.  Friendly people.
Have eaten breakfast here several times but since not on Trip Advisor decided to add. I am from out of town but meet my friend with her sister and granddaughter. Food is very good and good friendly service. They have indoor and outdoor seating (weather permitting). Looks like they have ice cream and a popular place in warm weather. Saw a sign out front advertising fish and chips for Friday's dinner. This is a very comforting place. check it out!
On the way stopped here. Sat for 10+ minutes before having to ask if we had to go to counter to order. Had to go to machine with $ to purchase sodas. Side of sausage tasteless, same with turkey grinder. No personal touch at all. Had to go to counter to pay, didn't even ask if everything was ok!
Me and bf decided to give famous a try. We ate at the bar. We got free water and coffee with our pizza. Boy it was hit and loaded with the small pepperoni. It was cooked perfect. Normally we would not finish a large pizza, but it was so good we did. No one puts the small pepperoni on pizza anymore and they should like famous does.
Our family has been eating Famous pizza for years! Love the cheese and pepperoni! The Italian grinder (heated) is great! Also like the meatball parm. 
We generally call ahead and get take out. Call them if you plan to be in the Scituate area.
Great location for the area. OK pizza, nothing special but close by and reasonably priced.  Salads and sandwiches also available.
Great pizza, sandwiches & salads !  Friendly atmosphere.  Have eaten here often always satisfied.   Nice menu choices, something for everyone.
I have been going to Famous since about 1976. It my eyes it will always be the best pizza. With their crispy curled pepperoni cups of deliciousness. Their grinders are excellent as well as their NY System Wieners.
The pizza is excellent with many choices. The Greek Salad is amazing. They also have Del's Lemonade there as well!
Famous has very good pizza and sandwiches. I especially like their tomato sauce, meatballs, barbecue chicken pizza, and seafood salad. My only wishes are for them to carry wraps, shaved steak,and bring back their delicious wieners!
Have picked up pizza here in the past and always enjoyed.  Stopped in for lunch on the way to drop our daughter off at school and found that the grinders were delicious as well.
Chicken parm sub - overcooked. Tuna on subs....almost non-existent. Pizza was just average.  Not going back. There are better things in driving range.....
This place used to be great but not anymore. Nobody's running the show... inmates running the asylum. Can't find the owner to tell him his business is going to the dogs but I suspect he knows that already by looking at the numbers.  What you will find here is an inattentive staff using f- bombs at will in front of customers and nobody having the authority to force professional behavior. Attitude is everything in business and this place has developed a culture of apathy and disregard for their customers... sad really but I wouldn't go back if you paid me.
We stopped in this little pizza joint coming from Connecticut on the way to Massachusetts. The subs were great, just a little too rich for my blood. Granted, the large sub was 2 subs, so it was worth it. The staff was excellent and friendly. There are some really cool pictures in there, and the guy making the pizzas was telling stories about the different pictures and autographs. Plenty of room to sit, and they had highchairs so that was good for my 2 year old. They also serve beer so that's a plus. Will definetly be back when I am passing through Western Rhode Island.
What happened to Famous Pizza?  The food is awful and the prices are double what other pizza joints in the area charge.  

Sorry, Famous, but you've lost my business.
Best pizza in town, and the grinders are great too - nothing like an Italian grinder with oil and vinegar under the broiler!
This is the best pizza place around. I have been ordering pizza here for 20 years. The cheese pizza has no equal.
I have been eating at famous as far as i remember.  The pizza with the pepperonis that curl up like little grease bowls is a trait i have only found at famous.  Their pizza is the best around in the North Scituate area.  The grinders are excellent but I have been really disappointed since the prices got raised a few months back.   I would religiously eat at famous 1-2 times a week, but since increasing his prices I find myself going to other alternatives for larger cheaper grinders.  I will now go once every month or two just to get my fix, not like before.  I believe a large grinder is now about $8-9 and the same large can be had down the street for a lower price and about 4-5" longer.  

Overall, the restaurant is a North Scituate icon and landmark, which still is the best around.
My family is making the trip from Southern NY to RI this year 1. for the beaches and 2. for a hallowed out italian "grinder"-a hot sub sandwhich- from Famous Pizza.  I used to live up the road and whenever a choice came about what we wanted to eat out for lunch-it was always Famous Pizza.  Their Grinder's and Pizzas are out of this world.  The atmosphere isn't anything special but WHO CARES?!  The food is just SOOO GOOD.  The help there are really kind as well-and after a while remember what you want and how you want it.  I particularly remember an awesome guy named Vassar (sp?).  Not sure if he still works there.  After introducing my fiance to their food a few years back he fell in love.  On a business trip to Boston from NY he went out of the way to swing by here and introduce his coworkers to a New England Grinder.  They loved it as much as we do.   Also, in the summer, nothing like topping off your meal with an ice cream from the creamery right next door!
Very nice local restaurant. We live in town and go frequently. Always good! Prices are reasonable.  Feel lucky to have this close to home!
Yummy food! Friendly staff! Good atmosphere. They have small bands play certain nights as well. It is small inside, but it is very cozy. They also have a little patio out the side door. A must try! 
Driving back many times  from Plymouth MA my husband and I would see tons of  cars in The Village Tavern parking lot.  We would speculate that if the locals went it must be a good place to eat. So today we decided to stop and we are so thrilled that we did. 

It was cheery, very clean with a homey feeling. The place is small but the way the tables are positioned it gives the illusion of space. They have a bar and an outside eating area.

Our server, Brandi,  was prompt, knowledgeable and very friendly. She added to the wonderful experience. 

We ordered The Bentley Hamburger platter and it was delicious and cooked to order. I gladly recommend this restaurant. You will not be disappointed and will leave very happy and we'll fed.
Anna Belliveau  
I loved this comfy pub.  It's just the sort  of neighborhood place for a good meal and local bar scene.  Our table of 4 shared an enormous berry salad, then we each got sandwiches - meatloaf, smoked salmon, grilled cheese - all delicious.
My husband and son are big meat eaters. The burgers here are great quality and cooked to perfection.
I had the steak sandwich, tender and delicious. Saved half for lunch the next day and it was just as good.
Goddd food close to home!
Very pleasing food - neat and clean - pleasant staff - have never been dissatisfied with the service or food
Went for a meal in my old home town.  Nice atmosphere but a bit noisy.  Great food and service.  Bluegrass band was playing that night which added to the atmosphere.
Neighborhood style, noisy, happy place visited on a Saturday early evening. Very good service. Crowded, and I didn't see any table for more than 4 people. Have been there for lunch -good salads - and dinner - best ever steak sandwich. We will go back.
Stopped in on way home from MOHEGAN sun. Cute cozy atmosphere. Good service, great hamburger! Very good drink. Would go again! 
Decided to try Village Tavern while staying at a rental nearby. Blew in for a late lunch, around 2:30PM, with four friends. Tight space, Irish pup feel, clean, a bunch of old regulars around the bar eyeballing us from time to time with mild curiosity. Kinda funny. Wish I knew the waitress’s name, she had us laughing right off the bat. We were happy to be together and in high spirits, I think she recognized that and played along. Non-alcoholic drinks came all around, then we ordered. Took a little while to get our food, which being in serious chat mode we did not mind. Let me tell you, the beef tenderloin sandwich is KILLER. “Tender” being the main word here, melt in your mouth. Chicken caesar, tortolini salad, cranberry and walnut salad, all good. My friend had the special Cajun chicken with pork belly sandwich, too much pork fat for her (like a think bacon), but good sandwich overall. It’s a big fave there we were told. Hoping to go back to Village Tavern today!
I've been going here for several years.  It's a small local bar and restaurant with an Irish pub feel.  It's always crowded, which is always a perfect sign for me.  We went last night and had to wait.  But the owner was great, helped us sit fast and even bought our group a round.  Very impressed.  The food is good and in good portions.  The sandwiches are awesome, the burger and meatloaf being two of my favorites.  There's music on the weekends.  And it's a great place if you just want to come, listen, and have a drink.  You will not be disappointed.
Ordered a white clam sauce. They brought a broth. Was expecting a sauce and they added milk to try to rectify it. Then before I could get through half of it. They declared the meal was over and started cleaning up the plates. They counted the clams I ate and stated I should have been happy and I was at fault.
Ruined the night. Some manager came up and started  defenfing there actions.
My daughter and I just stopped at the Village Tavern for lunch because we were so hungry and hadn't passed another restaurant in quite a while. It was a pleasant surprise. Bright and clean inside, the bartender/waiter (owner?) was friendly and efficient, and the food was excellent and generous. Both of us ordered the turkey club with a side salad and neither one of us could finish. Definitely a great place to stop.
Nice stop for lunch. Ask for Jen, she is a pistol-funny and kind. Wish I could bottle her attitude up.
She recommended the local Quahogs. What are they I asked.
They are super sized stuffed clams with seasonings and sausage, with or without hot sauce, they are fantastic!
Rest of the meal was ok. Chicken ceasar salad and loaded nachos were ok. The nacho dip was not worth the dipping. Atmosphere was easy, fun and a live band played.
We stopped here for lunch and will be back for sure.  The food was excellent and the service quick and friendly.  Although they don't have a kids menu, they are willing to make any accommodations on the menu which is great.  The dinning area is small and cozy which really creates a warm atmosphere.  It was a great lunch for the value and we will be back for sure!
The food is as good as ever. New menu but chef is very accommodating, made my husband his favorite dish from the old menu. We always check out whatever the special is, chef always has something delicious to try.
We have been here once before,,,The bar server came over to ask for our drink order,,,,We said,,,ahhhhh...do you have a Highchair??? No....we don't,,,, I guess we don't cater to babies....Ok,,,,so we still tried to make a meal of it.....Asked for a diet coke,,,and They gave us a water,,,,,beer mix ups,,,,,We ordered Burgers,,,They offered us many options with our Burgers,,, this and that for  a little more,,,When the Burgers came,,,There was a burger on a bun,,,,When we asked why it didn't come with cheese,,,our server looked surprised...You have to order it with cheese,,,,They never offered it,,,Ive never been to a Family style restaurant tavern  with no high chair and plain burgers dry.......
What's to say, it's the best place around. Awesome food, awesome service and a good pour of wine. We travel route 6 a lot and it's our go-to place. Sure, the locals will check you out as they sit at the bar watching the game but why are the locals there? Cuz they know where it's at. Classy pub food with good service. Not gonna do better in the area.

I stopped in on the way to meet a friend, I was early for the appointment. I am so glad I did! This is a new favorite spot for me, not far from where I live. Great food, nice bar. I went again on a Friday night and there was a very talented guitarist playing, not too loud to drown out conservation. I will be back.
This is a nice little (won't call it a bar) pub type restaurant - great place to stop for a beer or beverage and supper.  Their grilled chicken sandwich on a ciabatta roll with salad on the side is delicious.  They are very generous with the side salad - adding greek olives, roasted red peppers and cherry tomatoes with a shaving of parmesan cheese - topped with their balsamic dressing - super good.  If you chose to be bad and order the fries - well, they are certainly worth it - hand cut, well done fries - all they need is a shake or two of malt vinegar and a plop of catsup.   The bartender make a great Cosmopolitan - and serves a nice generous pour on the wines - after a few trips there she'll know your name and what your favorite drink is.
Village Tavern is in a town that has only a McDonald's and a pizza joint for competition.....it's noteworthy that there are many Connecticut cars in the parking lot but usually it's filled with locals.
diner atmosphere, friendly staff, good food and portions, good coffee, a breakfast stop on a road with few choices.
If you like pancakes, you must visit gentleman farmer. Best pancakes around!! They are huge, fluffy and delicious! My favorite are banana chocolate chip!!!  I've had breakfast here about 100 times in the past 13 years! We love it
large selection of breakfast and luncheon items, all fresh, well prepared and tasty. Prices are very reasonable, portions are large, wait staff is pleasant and quick. Minor complaint - coffee not very strong.
A good place to eat, uncrowded, and food cooked to order. Nice staff, with descent pricing. We would definitely go back.
Breakfast here is decent.  Recently went for lunch and ordered chowder and clamcakes.  Thought we ordered the "special" but were served larger portion.  Waitress did offer to take it back but we declined.  Wish we had as the chowder lacks clams and is thickened so much it is more like wallpaper paste than a chowder.  Clamcakes were o.k. with some clams.  The price for what we were served was outrageous.  Spent $15 for chowder, clamcakes, coffee and tip.  We usually get the same waitress who apparently does not like us as her service borders on rude.
I recommend this restaurant for breakfast. Prices are reasonable, servers are very friendly and the food is good. It is very welcoming to sit and talk while having a breakfast. I often take friends there. Everyone loves the Belgian Waffles..but for me, I like the cinnamon apples I order with eggs.
great down home restaurant, friendly staff, good food.  Great for breakfast, lunch.  Dinners are OK, nothing elaborate.
Good basic breakfasts, pancakes and eggs,etc. The service was friendly and quick, the atmosphere is upbeat and the place is full of locals.
We had dinner here while staying at the Sky View Motor-Inn, very impressed with atmosphere,staff, especially the food!  great value, great choice!
While we have only ever been here for breakfast, this is my girlfriend and I's favorite.  If you like omelets you will love all the choices they offer (though its obviously not limited to omelets)!  This place has a homey feel, fair prices, and very friendly service.  No complaints.
Went to try a different restaurant(in Johnston~~won't name it), walked in and there were 5 guys @ the bar. They were the only patrons. Did not see any employees. A couple of the guys turned around and were just staring. My friend and I decided to leave and try Gentleman Farmer, and are glad we did.
We both order the turkey dinners(wow!). First we got soup; not just a cup but a bowl of soup. And then the dinners came with turkey, stuffing, homemade mashed potatoes, veggy, and cranberry sauce. We ate about half and had enough left for another meal.
Great food, great price, great staff. We will be returning with friends!!!!
Hearty portions of good breakfast food and low prices.
I live in Scituate and this is one of the only restaurants tht we have.  so u really dont have much of a choice if u want food.  their prices r exceedingly high. they have everything tht a local dunkin donuts would have, except the prices r atleast doubled. the food isnt bad, but u could get it at ur local coffee shop for much less.  the service as well wasnt terrible except when i ordered a hot choc. with whipped cream, she capped it and it spilled all over the lid, then she just handed it to me w/out even bothering to look me in the eyes.
We frequent this place the food, service, atmosphere, its all excellent. And the fact its haunted also draws our attention.
This restaurant is one of our favorites..food is always fresh, good and very satisfying.  We've been stopping by probably once a month and always greeted by the owner or courteous waitstaff.  The variety of the menu is always a surprise to us.  Every week there are specials..warning they go fast so get there early.  Seafood, steaks, prime rib, steak tips and of course wonderful Italian food are all on their menu to choose from and for dessert..we love their strawberry parfaits..lovely!  The restaurant has two fireplaces and has been around for years..Try it, I'm sure you'll like it..reasonable priced too!
The Greenville is has a great menu selection. The atmosphere is great- the food quality is also always great.  Nice bar area to sit and have a cocktail or dinner. If you are looking for a great Italian meal without paying high prices this is your place to go!
We visit the Greenville Inn once a week food is good staff is great. The owner Jimmy is so nice. He is the cook an always makes an appearance. They are very reasonable. Great bar
Many, many, locals, so you know it's good. Varied menu, limited wine list.i would recommend this to all. I have been here for 2-3 coalitions and they do an excellent job.
The staff at Greenville Inn took great care of us and made planning easy for our small reception.  The food was delicious, and they even provided takeout containers for all the extra buffet items.  We couldn't have been more satisfied!  Thanks!!
Nice surprise, while this Inn is nothing fancy it is clean the staff is friendly and the food was very good.
The Greenville Inn is a beautiful restaurant with intimate atmosphere and a varied menu. They offer pasta dishes, seafood, steak, pork and chicken. Their soups and salads as well as their appetizers are fresh and delicious. The ambiance is quiet, soft lighting, wonderful wine choices and reasonable prices. The prime rib offered on Fridays and Saturdays is cooked to order and so very tender and mouth watering. The staff is warm and friendly and the service provided is excellent. I would recommend this restaurant for a quiet romantic evening or for a family get together.
I have eaten here every year for what seems like a lifetime.  I had the dinner after my father died after the wake and again after the funeral.  I did the same when my mother passed away.  I ate hear with my aunt a couple of weeks ago and everything was great.  I have never had a bad meal here, the food is tasty, drinks good, service excellent.  The owners are extremely friendly.  Only made it once this year, but last year ate here 5 times in three weeks.  I love this place.
I had gone here once before for an after funeral luncheon and the food was very good.  We had heard it was even better during their everyday fare, so for a special fathers day dinner my husband and I went again ... The food was even better as we had been told.  We were impressed with the service from our waitress Greg, he was very attentive and more than efficient.   I had steak tips in a brown mushroom sauce over white rice with green beans almondine, and salad.  It was a generous potion and more than half I took home.  My husband had a baked seafood plate, which consisted of  baked scrod, scallops, stuffed clams, liguini with red sauce, he also took some home.
Was in the Smithfield area and this was a recommendation for dinner.  Good parking and cheerful staff.  A large menu with lots of selections.  Went with evening special which was a pasta with shrimp.  Soup was cool and mostly pasta.  Main course pasta is not home made but prepared well.  The shrimp and sauce were very good but only three shrimp.  Bread was not bread but dinner rolls.
Acceptable dinner, fair price but I doubt if I would return.
I have long heard of The Greenville Inn but had never been until Sunday Dec. 8, 2013 with a party of 6.  The experience was not good. A piece of glass (YES GLASS) was found in a pasta dish, my veal was cold, my beer was near room temp and my wife's chicken was dry. The waitress was immediately told of the ONE INCH piece of glass, retrieved it and the "manager" returned to our table with a 15 min denial of how this "could never have happened here". She made us all feel that we made this story up and in her " 16 years" had never heard of such a thing.  They took the pasta dish off the $ 75.00 bill but none of us could believe how we were made to feel. 
Things do happen in restaurants and people do try to "scam" but this is a factual event that taught us a lesson not ever to return to The Greenville Inn.
The Greenville Inn is a popular fine dining restaurant that has been around for over 40 years.  The currently owners took it over in 1997 and have expanded its appeal.  They have an extensive Italian-American menu with my favorite being their Prime Rib which is served on Fridays and Saturdays or on special holidays.  On occasion, they will serve it if you have a group that requests it several days in advance.  I have it ala mama style which is with their mushroom and garlic sauce.
Sadly closed, John and his family who ran this great place closed and left with no explanation, how sad as it was awesome.
My family and I go to Liberina's regularly and I can say that I have NEVER had anything short of a great meal there!  Everything is made to order and they are extremely accommodating of special diets (no gluten, dairy, etc) and all of the crazy requests made by my kids.  We always leave with full stomachs and enough leftovers for the next day... at an extremely reasonable price!  The staff is super friendly which creates a sense of community with everyone in the restaurant.  If you are thinking of checking out Liberina's, I'd highly recommend it - and bring your favorite bottle of wine (they are BYOB!)
My husband and I stopped in for dinner one night recently.  He was skeptical because it's a small place and he expected everything to be thawed out frozen servings.  Just the opposite!  Everything was really fresh, homemade and really tasty.  I had picked up fish and chips here before - as takeout - and they were delicious.  Huge portions of both the fish and the chips - enough for 2 people to split one order.  After reminding my husband that he had eaten their takeout, he opted for the fish and chips again (part creature of habit, and part knowing he liked them).

Again, the portion was huge, the fish was perfect - super flaky, not at all greasy, light batter.  I had eggplant parm with spaghetti, and it was delicious.  The eggplant was just right - not chewy or stringy, not greasy, and really flavorful and tender.  We had a small mix up with the order and they corrected it immediately and apologized way more than was necessary.  My dinner came with a salad that was big enough for us to share and was really fresh.  We both took home our leftovers because there was just a ton of food.  

Prices are reasonable and the staff (owners, I believe) are super friendly and funny and great to chat with.  We will definitely be back!
I ordered eggplant parmesean and it was RAW inside.  Looks like a bunch of drugged-out kids run the place.
We met some long-time friends, and this was our first time at Giuseppe's.  We each ordered a different entree, and we were all extremely pleased with our choices.  Our waitress, Debbie, couldn't have been better.  She understood we wanted to visit so didn't rush us.  In addition to her great sense of humor, she was knowledgeable about the menu and didn't hesitate to recommend an apple dessert, which was individually baked and we all enjoyed it.  We also noticed that the pizzas are huge.  The only drawback was that it was quite noisy.  We went on a Tuesday night, which was quite busy (that's a good sign of a great restaurant!).  We definitely will be back--and we travelled an hour to get there (a mid-way meeting point), so that says something positive!
Went for the first time last evening. The food was excellent and the waitstaff was fast and efficient. I had one of the specials. It was scrod topped with fresh crab. It came with fingerling potatoes and a generous amount of asparagus. I would rate the dish a 10!! My bil had chicken parm which he rated a 10 also! We can't wait to return!! Tommy was our waiter whom I would also rate a 10 in customer servive! He knew all the latest drinks and was very personable. 
Our meals were delicious, and  they were quite accomodating when we didnt have a reservation. In fact, we were enjoying our dinner sitting in a booth neear the kitchen, when all at once the chef began yelling at a wait staff. It was totally inappropriate  and made us feel uncomfortable.  I am uncertain if I would return to this restaurant because of the way they treat their staff. I'm disappointed because we really enjoyed our meal. There is definitely a more appropriate way to speak to someone. This was unacceptable  behavior for any environment,
Recently added more dining space and bar which certainly has given Giusseppes a happening place vibe to meet friends and have a good time. Having dined there often since opening, food is consistent, staff friendly and now full liquor bar tops off for a great Friday night choice.
Pizza is unique and quality ingredients so we order take out from here over competing chain restaurants.
Try it... You won't be dissapointed

My friend & I had a wonderful dinner, great waiter. Will definitely come back very soon. Pizza appetizer was excellent. (Chicken & rosemary)
Was pleased with a nice Sirloin Steak med rare , cooked perfectly . Just ask about substitution on sides. I opted for pasta, rather than potato and was charged$5. Decent bar area with great Tvs for sports etc. Was a little surprised with many families with children having pizza. Was not an issue and everything was good. I would go back . Plenty of parking. Service was top notch. 
Don't expect a pizza joint.  This is so much more.  A first class full service restaurant.  With the addition of the new (Beautiful) bar, Joe and Rachael have created a go to destination worthy of a special occasion.
Don't miss it.
My wife and I live nearby and this is one of our favorite spots. The food is always consistent and delicious. They recently expanded the dining room and added a new bar. The owners and staff are all wonderful and this restaurant is a treat to have in our town. 

All of the pizzas are done to perfection and their main courses offer variety with creating a crowded menu. You can't go wrong at Giuseppe's!
This is a relatively new restaurant (about a year) but it is the best Italian food!  A very cozy, family oriented business with a great chef, Joe!  We try to eat here about every other week.  The menu is limited, but the food is fantastic with several specials every day.  The food is fresh, tasty, and authentic.  You have to try this place!
Great food and staff! Breakfast is outstanding!

Kountry Kitchens has recently increased the number of specials. Some great additions to the menu!
Totally enjoyed the breakfast with my parents. The service is great and quality food with a big selection of crepes, omelets, pancakes and home made corn beef or vegetable hash. I had the egg white omelet with tofu scramble and it was great. Highly recommend this place.
My family and I have been visiting this establishment for more than 30 years for breakfast or lunch!  Food is always good and promptly served!  The owners have a knack for hiring very friendly and effective wait staff, so dining here is like visiting family!  If you are in the mood for breakfast or lunch and in the Greenville area, this is a great choice!
I have always enjoyed Kountry Kitchen....my favorite meal is the veal ...mmm..crispy fried veal with a brown gravy that is indulgent.  Kountry Kitchen is a staple in Greenville..we love it, it is comfortable...close to home, and the view is pretty nice too, and if your lucky to be there on a Sunday..close to noon, you will hear the beautiful church bells ring next door....I love Greenville.
Came here on a rainy Memorial Day. There was a 20 minute wait for a table but sat at the bar instead since there were a few free seats. Had the hash and eggs and was very happy with the real, homemade corned beef hash. Most places have the canned stuff or blend their mix into a mush. This was cooked well and you could actually tell that it was a brisket at one time. Eggs over easy to perfection and the home fries were crispy on the outside and soft inside with a nice subtle seasoning. Will be back again!
I really enjoyed my breakfast. Portion sizes were very good. Prices are a little high for breakfast but the cute decor and service make it worth it. My french toast was excellent. My other half has eggs toast and home fries. All were cooked perfect. You will not be disappointed. 
Not sure what the attraction is.  Over-cooked eggs, so-so home fries, canned veggies and not-so-good coffee.  I guess if you don't want to pull out a pan at home.
We love going here for breakfast, if you go on the weekend, and get there after say 930 am, the parking lot will be packed and you may have to wait. People know good food when they find it. Its an older building, but the food is top-notch, coffee piping hot, and an attentive waitstaff. 
Our family favorite for breakfast! Love the hash and eggs! Love the omelettes. Also great for lunch! Been going here for over 20 years. 
A good place to take family or to meet friends for breakfast or brunch, lunch or dinner.  There is booth, table and counter seating, whichever you prefer.   The food is good and the wait staff is personable, efficient and very friendly.  You'll want to return again and again.
They offer a good breakfast. The service has improved greatly over the past few years. Eggs seem very fresh. And I love their blueberry pancakes.
Quick eats, good food, best for a weekend breakfast. Consistent year-round. The wait usually isn't that long when they are crowded.
This is a great little restaurant for breakfast or lunch. There are tables by the windows which overlook a quiet little pond which is very relaxing. The prices are reasonable and the food is hot and delicious. Their breakfast crepes are very good but I have to warn against ordering the bacon. It is precooked, paper thin and not at all tasty. Everything else is recommended....
Was dragged here by a friend this Sunday morning.  I usually go to a couple of small trendy places in Providence on Sunday morning. I was very surprised by this place that's been in my backyard the whole time.  Atmosphere was great, place was full, lots of action and plenty to please the senses. I had a Chourico Hash special that was one of the best breakfast items I've ever had.  My friend had an omelet of homemade corned beef hash that was also exceptional and we shared an order of Sweet Bread french toast that was amazing.  Food was hot, cappuccino was great and the service was great.  Place was packed and we were in and out in under 30 minutes.  I think I found a new Sunday Morning spot.
Good service....a little pricey......good variety of breakfast foods......but my coffee was lukewarm....only one item on my plate was hot.   If the food is not served at the proper temperature it ruins it for me.   I ordered a special....two eggs, toast, home fries and homemade hash.   The hash was HOT, moist, freshly made and delicious.   The eggs, toast, and home fries were barely warm.    This cost $9.75!!!!!!    Need I say more......
Stopped by while in the area late on a weekend morning. Greeted with a friendly smile and were seated in a booth by the counter.  Breakfast menu is extensive...quite a few selections serving everything from your traditional breakfast fare to crepes and a few other specialty items. Prices were fair...perhaps slightly higher than some other local breakfast spots but, in the end, well worth it!

We ordered the eggs benedict (based on another TA review) and the corned beef hash...what a surprise when we were asked if we wanted FRESH or canned corned beef hash.  We opted for the fresh and then the next questions was...with or without onions. GREAT options!  We decided on onions and sat back to wait for breakfast to be delivered.  

Breakfast was served prompt and hot out of the kitchen. Portions were on the just right to a little hefty size but SO good.  The fresh corned beef hash was just that....fresh with onions and the perfect seasonings.  Hash browns were seasoned to perfections and still had a bit of crunch and the eggs benedict was superb as well.  

All in all, an excellent breakfast in an old fashioned, homey family restaurant.  No frills here but decent service and a really delicious breakfast!
This place has been around forever!  Years ago my dad would go here after a early golf game and loved it. We would try to get in a a Sunday sometimes did other times, not!  The food has always been good.  Yesterday, I took an old friend here for brunch.  I must say,if anything,  the food , the place, the menu has improved!   I was happy that my friend from Florida enjoyed her meal.  Her meal came with hash that she really liked.   My combo included an egg, bacon and a yummy apple crepe!  Guess where I'm going again!?
Moved to Greenville in 1980 & that's when I discovered the Kountry Kitchen.  A hidden gem, it's my favorite breakfast place.  Not one complaint in 34 years!  My favorite is the eggs benedict.  I have taken many people there, and everyone has always loved the food!
We have been for breakfast many times but never lunch or dinner. Breakfast is always excellent. They offer many choices like daily specials, fresh fruit (always fresh), freshly baked breads and muffins, and espresso. They accommodate dietary restrictions by offering egg whites, egg beaters, gluten free bread, fresh fruit, etc. The kids menu is very good and inexpensive. Service is friendly and professional.
Best breakfast and waitresses around. Weekdays are the best time to go because there is no wait. Plan on waiting a bit on the weekends. Once you try it you will go back.
While visiting my friend in Smithfield my friend and I stopped here for a quick afternoon treat after our 4 hour drive from Long Island. It's an old fashioned type restaurant and ice cream place. We ordered ice cream sundaes and they were delicious. I highly recommend stopping here if you're in the neighborhood!
Honestly, I used to dread when my kids picked this restaurant. But they have come a long way. The new menu us very good. The ice cream has always been good and still us.
A couple of us swung in for a special treat one afternoon.  We each ordered a sundae.  Server was a very nice young lady who brought waters right away and delivered our ice cream with a smile. 

Two ice cream sundaes were $13 with gratuity...either a bit high or we just haven't been out for ice cream in quite some time!
When I come back home to visit i like to grab my parents some hot wieners and an Awful Awful from Newport Creamery..they live just down the road in Johnston...the awful awful is actually just frozen milk and I am not as fond of it as i was as a child..good burgers and fries if you want to sit and grab a snack
Great ice cream, but so-so service.  Did enjoy having low fat, no sugar options for ice cream that was surprisingly good.
if u come to rhode island this is one of those places tht u just have to go to!! from its tuna club to the clown sundaes with crazy vanilla ice cream (<u have got to try this stuff kids!!) the service is usually excellent and there is almost always seating, even for larger crowds, u can get two booths next to each other.  but it is a great place to take kids when u r away on vacation here or just looking for a place to chow down! u get ur meal AND ur ice cream at one convenient place!!!
Decnt food - good ice creame
So good. The best pizza---oh so  lots of pepperoni...love it! My favorite. The fish and chips are amazing-what's better than fish and chips on a Friday night....fresh hot and yummy...always Athens...
Pizza is very good from Athen's. They do need to have more help some days. It can take awhile to get a pizza. Other then that pizza is really good. Fries and onions rings are frozen which you expect from a pizza place. Grinders are very good. 
Whatever you are in the mood for- pizza- sandwiches-dinner-wieners- you name it they have it!  I have been coming here for over 25 years and food and prices are great!
I ordered a chicken and broccoli pizza.  They put the Mozzarella UNDERNEATH the chicken and broccoli!  WHO DOES THAT?  As a result, everything was burnt including the garlic.  It was AWFUL.  I have one star because the crust was tolerable.  Stay away.
An amazing family owned and run pizza house.  If you are lucky you'll be there when they have greek spinach pie (made occasionally by the women of the family!).  The spinach salads are the best ever, and a very nice/good size and you can customize (I never have onions, but usually want extra olives, and dressing on the side.).  Hot wieners better than most places, and we're picky about those.  Pizza is really good but I do wish there was a thin crust option.  It is cooked perfectly with fresh, plentiful toppings.  I would rate it excellent if there was the opportunity to get a thin crust.
Athen's is great. It's a cute little family owned pizza joint that has a little of everything. They have great pizza, wings, wieners, subs, fries etc.. You really can't go wrong with anything here. Fridays they offer fish&chips which are always top notch fresh fish. They serve their own tartar sauce which is addicting and I love it. The workers are always super friendly and make you feel really welcome every time :)
Straw Bale Cafe at Hanging Mountain Farm serves really good breakfast. I haven't been there for lunch sobcan't say how lunch is. But I've had breakfast there probably a dozen or more timed and I've only had one meal that was just so so. (And I think it was just an off day because I've eaten the same thing (baked oatmeal) many other times without complaint. 

In addition to the usual breakfast fare they serve some creative and delicious treats. The aforementioned baked oatmeal, baked eggs (a concoction that includes cottage cheese as well as other ingredients) and us just plain yummy. For those who can't decide among the many options they allow you to pick three as a combo plate. 

They make their own maple syrup on the premises and don't charge more for it (any restaurant in new emgland that does is just plain nuts).

My only demerit is for value. Breakfast can be costly. Today's pancake breakfast for four with coffee set us back $70 with tip. That's a little rich but I think they jacked  the prices for the maple sugaring tourist season and expect when the regular menu returns next week that the prices will moderate a little. 

If you are visiting Northampton MA a trip to Hanging Mountain Farm's straw bale cafe (constructed from genuine straw bales) is well worth the trip off the beaten path. It's a quick detour from downtown 'Hamp. The owners couldn't be nicer or more proud of their great restaurant. 
We had an order of the pumpkin bread French toast that came with toasted coconut and maple butter and and order of the blueberry pancakes and both were delicious.  So many blueberries! And the pumpkin bread French toast was really yummy. We had an order of the hash which was tasty. Excellent decaf coffee.  Great service and reasonable prices.
This was a quaint little cafe on a farm. Nothing real fancy but the food was great! The service was great well. You could eat in or out, weather permitting. The prices were very reasonable for the quality of the food that was served! Everything was nice and fresh! I will return again! 
How to eat a stack of delicious pancakes with all the trimmings, including maple syrup fresh from the sugar shack in the yard and not feel guilty? we walked there and back from the outskirts of nearby Florence, a long trudge through the woods for our brunch. but definitely worth every blister.  wonderful building, great story, super people, excellent meal and we even got interviewed for the local paper!  would i do it again?  you bet!
First, this is an interesting strawbale building with family history & devotion. Interesting reasonable breakfast options with gluten free options or egg free choices. Great people.
Eat outside in season.
Breakfast for two.   We decided to take a drive to the country to break the normal routine of the usual breakfasts we normally enjoy.

The Strawbale cafe, is a labor of family love, rich with history nestled in the hills of Westhampton on a farm.   The decor is quaint and warm.   The dining room reminds me of a huge family kitchen.   Real maple syrup is made on site as with other kitchen provisions.

The food is farm fresh, but they are missing on a few things and this is why they are getting a three.   When you have everything in place, the atmosphere, history, ambiance, character and a real maple syrup shack...why, would you skimp on bacon?!  It was razor thin, tasted awful and reminded me of something from a fast food joint.   

Everything else is fresh.   Kale, eggs, pancakes, toast....

Although staff is friendly, the lack of waitressing experience is apparent.   Not listening to our order, I had to correct and repeat several times, only for the order to come out wrong.  I'm all for high school kids to have a job, but make sure they are qualified, or at least have the drive.

Meals were priced appropriately.

I like this place, it has potential but it needs to have problems corrected.

Last visit for some time.
Great location and interesting history. Hidden in Westhampton, Strawbale Cafe a great place to relax and enjoy a weekend breakfast! Service and atmosphere was friendly and welcoming. It was our first visit, but we are sure to become regulars. Highly recommend a visit!
We went to the Rapids for an easy affordable dinner with friends. It was a nice time, the Rapids has a casual atmosphere. Food and drinks were very good. I had the taco salad which was huge and very tasty.
Typical Pub and Grub. Worth a stop if you're on the motorcycle. Deck and view of the river is nothing to write home about. Good beer selection. 
First time back after new management. Friendly & pleasant wait staff. Order a burger medium with all the fixings. It came well done, no flavor & dry, bun was over powering, way too much bread & an older roll, not fresh. Even the in season tomato slice was green not ripe. For a $10-12 burger one would expect something half way decent, not the case. Disappointed, would not order an other burger from the Rapids.
First time we were there in over 4 years. Very disappointed. My  wife's meal was ok but not mine. She had the tacos and I had the prime Rib. Prime rib came with NO salad, had a rubbery taste to it but was kind of tender. It was cool but not hot. The juice was also cool.Baked potato had some black in it and the spinach was undercooked. I brought it to the waitress' attention and she came back and said the prime rib had just come out of the oven 15 min ago. No one else showed up. At the end she said sorry about the prime rib, took the receipt and money and put it in a manila envelope--no cash register!!!!!!!  hmmmmmmmmmm
My husband and I went on a motorcycle ride today and stopped at Rapids for a drink and snack. The location is nice, but when we walked in it smelled like old and moist. The bartender was very friendly but the drinks were tall with only one shot so they tasted like seltzer and cranberry. It was 1/2 price appetizers so we ordered the sampler platter normally $13, sounded good, but it was the worst food we ever eaten. Everything was over fried and old, we couldn't even eat it.
We went there for lunch on the day that the Whitewater Race is run - great atmosphere.
They have the par and restaurant upstairs and another bar downstairs where you can get drinks to take outside to the fence above the rapids so you can watch the races.
Live music on the upper deck where there is more service for food and drink.  If your party includes kids, they will have lost of fun.
Visited for lunch based on TripAdvisor advise, it did not disappoint at all.
it is a local place with indoor/outdoor options, and all American kitchen.
Location is great, food is fine, not 5 star, but you don't need that either.
service is great, food is fresh (salads).  do not forget to visit Little Ville Lake near by,
little gem known with the locals.
We are locals living down the street from The Rapids. We dine and visit the bar here every week and have been doing so for many years. The management changed just over a year ago and the result is really evident now. Menu choices have expanded with specials available each week. Food quality and portions are very good. The place is rustic, but is part of the appeal. This is not a cookie cutter chain, but a local joint with character. River front for outdoor dining or sit at the bar for some local color. New TVs, pool table and live music are some of the other perks. The craft beers available on tap is another nice touch. If you haven't visited in awhile recommend you give the Rapids another go. 
I have eaten her like 3 time. Each time they seem to get better. The bar is nice, people do not get real load and rowdy. You are right on the river so you can enjoy it while you eat.
Glad to see the Rapids have returned to the Hilltowns.  The Rapids  offers good tavern style food and a fantastic view along the river just upstream from Gardner State Park.  They also offer toasted raviolis, something that is hard to find in Massachusetts.  Our service was good, the prices fair, and all in all a place to return to on our visits up the watershed.
Came from Northampton to see Glendale Falls for the first time. On the way the packed parking lot caught my eye.  The sun was setting at seven on a Saturday night so thought I would give it a try. 

What a gem!  Friendly courteous welcoming hostess and delightfully attentive but not hovering waitress.  Sat on the deck overlooking the early summer bright green trees and ferns on the far bank of the gently flowing river with the water  burbling happily in the background.  

The menu is ample without trying too hard.  Just straight ahead tasty good food at a good price, served fresh and piping hot, in a place with a great vibe.  

Give it five stars for the package. 
Will definitely be back.  And will bring friends.
The Rapids has changed hands several times over the last dozen years or so but the most recent owners are doing a great job. The food is quite good and the view of the Westfield River is great. If you sit along the wall of windows in the dining room you can see right into the water! 
We usually gravitate to the bar but there is often no available seating there. There's a large outdoor deck that also overlooks the river.
The food is tasty and fresh, not terribly exotic, couple more options for vegetarians than the usual veggie burger. Come for the outdoor view in the warmer months, lively conversation in winter! Try the thincrust pizza cos that is delish (as are most of the Italian items). My one gripe is that the decor reminds me of Psycho: all those dusty birds and deer heads staring at you while you eat is unnerving and kitschy. Liven up the decor! How 'bout some local (rotating) artwork?
I came here with friends for beer recently. We sat outside. A gorgeous view and a wonderful location. I have never been here before but we were in the area and one of my friends had heard it had changed hands some 6 or 8 months ago.

We did not eat a meal, although the menu looked nice. The place was a dump. It was empty and so dark. If the new owner just put a fresh coat of light color paint to the inside of the restaurant, it would be a thousand percent better than the dark & gloomy interior now. Walking inside from the parking lot was underwhelming. A big rock greeted us and it certainly did not belong there, someone could easily trip over it.

I'm thinking that if a new owner just bought the place, invest some money to clean it up, beautify it and if the food is good, people will come back! It's a shame to buy a new restaurant at such a pretty location and to wait around for customers is tragic. Spruce up the restaurant, not just the menu. I would NOT go back again unless it was brighter, cleaner, less dingy and had more people frequenting it. Even though the food is supposed to be better, I would not want to eat it if no one comes to eat............who knows how long the food was there before being served?

The owner was sitting by the bar playing on his phone just waiting for guests to come in. My advice: Fix the interior and exterior and you will not need to sit playing on your phone. People will come, especially if the food is good. And the place is bright & cheery.
Yes, it's reopened. Good food, wonderful view of the river. Paddled past it in the morning and got the urge to go back for dinner.  Decent choice of draft beers; basically pub food; enjoyed the spring rolls and the fish & chips. A comfortable mix of all kinds of folks--I think anyone would be comfortable here, whether you come post-whitewater, bike ride, or motorcycle ride, walk in from the neighborhood or drive up from the city. My sweetheart is very particular about noise, so for others who are too, here's the scoop on that: Jukebox can be very loud inside but was barely audible to us on the deck. Currently there's scheduled music on the deck, but only on Sundays.
The new owner took over in November of 2013 and really made this back into a prime restaurant.  The food is spectacular and prices are reasonable.  The view is simply beautiful (on the river) and the deck is so relaxing.  There was music playing on the deck, the day we stopped in. Highly recommended!!!
Poor service......food not that great.......A band was suppose to play there the nigh we went....we were told they canceled...well I am related to a member of that band, and they lied to me.....They (the rapids) called the band and cancelled on them! Will never go back to a place that would out right lie to their customers! The food isn't good anyway.....
Disgusting, I couldn't believe that a place like this is still open. Couldn't get any worse, awful service,  couldn't get a chicken sandwich right.Scallops were over cooked which shouldn't have been a surpsie since the chicken was so dry that it got stuck in between my teeth. Husband got served first, then myself (wife) after waiting 10 minutes. Maybe if they brought it out at the same time the chicken wouldn't have been dried up. We grabbed our own highchair, which we cleaned off cause it was filthy. PLEASE save your money, save your time spend your money at The Russell Inn or at Four main or better yet even Mcdonald's would have been better.
The exterior of the restaurant looks a little sketchy but there is a great view of the river on the back deck. The dry rub wings were great as well as the mushroom Swiss burger. The service was really slow but I would absolutely recommend this place for a relaxing lunch.
The newer dry rub wings were really good...Cesar salad was excellent.  It was the first time having the pizza, It was also pretty good, reasonably priced.. Its probably one of the better tasting pizza's in the hill towns.
The coffee is outrageous. There breakfast was amazing. Fresh ingredients and original recipes.  Will return if we come back to the area.
Great country store, with really nice bakery, fruits and vegetables. also have apple orchard, pick your own. They have artist loft with a nice collection of things for sale. Pork products, especially the bacon and the pulled pork, are awesome.
We love Outlook Farm! Whether you are looking for a delicious sandwich (Try the Happy Hog or John Wayne) or a tasty breakfast, Outlook Farm is a great place to go. It has a cute shop attached with lots of fresh and local produce and goodies from MA. The meals are very reasonably priced as well. Definitely worth a stop!
Homemade baked goods,the best meat,fresh veggies,and breakfast and sandwiches. Delicious! All locally grown and home bakesd.
you order food at counter and then pick it up.  restaurant in middle of a country store.  quaint rural atmosphere.  food was good.
Outlook Farm is the only 'game in town' so it is a go to for many locals. The sandwiches are basic, baked goods do not deliver (except for the pumpkin whoppee pie with a cream cheese filling), but their pork products are fresh. The market seems to be experimenting with more local gourmet items which is offering hope. In general their priced are high and eatery service slow.
Outlook Farm has something for everyone: farm stand, grocery, restaurant, and local gathering place. The employees are friendly and helpful. A true taste of the Pioneer Valley.
Went for breakfast with a gent who uses a walker.  The people were friendly.  Had to order at the counter, but they did bring it to the table.  The scrambled eggs were runny, the sausage was hard, dry and fairly tasteless. On the other hand, the potatoes and toast were good and the coffee was excellent.
We stopped and enjoyed a good lunch. My husband wanted to have lunch there on our way home. They are closed on Sunday. We will definitely stop by again.
We go to this "sugar shack" every year and have never been disappointed.  Great pancakes,
great maple syrup and great hospitality.  My wife always orders the french toast with almonds but I like the classic pancakes with sausage.  This is a family run operation and sometimes it can be a long wait to get a table but it is worth it!
Have to say i was really disappointed with this place. Atmosphere was "ok" but not great like some of the other sugarhouses in the area. Staff were not overly friendly. Food was "average" at best!
Not worth the trip
Way out in the woods is the Red Bucket Sugar Shack.  It has been many years since we had been up there and decided it was time for a return trip.  Off we went on a Sunday drive to the bac roads of Worthington to reach the Red Bucket with its Maple Tree growing through the restuarant ceiling.  By the time we arrived there was little room for parking - which doesn't say much as there is little parking available.  Memories are tricky thing sometimes as we both remembered the interior as being nicer - but then it has been many years since we have been there.  Luckily there were several tables open so we didn't have to wait.  I ordered the french toast and my partner ordered the cider pancakes.  Both arrived in due time on the paper plates with the plastic flatware (for a place that takes it resources from the land I hope that they have a way to recycle/compost the paper at least).  The french toast was hard on all edges and lacked cinnamon - or at least enough for my taste.  My partner stated that the pancakes were good.  The syrup came in a nice glass decanter and was warm.  I liked the syrup well enough but my partner found it to have too much of a clover taste - liking a maple syrup does depend upon your own taste and each area/sugar shack, we have found, has a distinctive flavor depending on the trees and the environment they grow in.  We both prefer a light amber - the 1st run of the season.   

When the bill came this is where we had a problem - the bill seemed off from what the menu stated so when I went up to the cash register I asked to have it doubled checked and I was right.  INstead of charging us the price for french toast or pancakes by themselves, we were charged the price for the french toast and panckaes with meat - whcih we had not ordered.  There was over a $5 difference.  So do double check to make sure your bill is correct.  

Overall ok but leaning toward a disappointment.  One nice feature is being able to see the evaporator working and having the maple products readily available for purchase.
When the sap starts to run in Worthington, MA it's time to head to the Red Pail Sugar Shack where you can watch the sap being boiled and pass through the glass doors to a small simply furnished dining area with views of the sugar bush.  

A simple menu of flavored pancakes (including pumpkin, blueberry,) and french toast with daily specials like cranberry-orange pancakes and Almond Joy French toasts.  They also serve eggs, hash browns, bacon and a mean cup of hot chocolate.   A little expensive for breakfast fair but everything was delicious.  And maybe it is worth a little extra to slow down and relax and gather with family  the way it used to be.

The Red Bucket Sugar Shack  (413) 238-7710
Off Rte 112, go 2.7 miles S to 584 Kinne Brook Rd. Maple products and gift packs available year 'round. Pancake restaurant open weekends mid-Feb to mid-April.
Brian, Karen and their family Do a great Job every Spring and Fall! Bring your Family and stop by Soon!
Very rustic and unique.  A true Sugarhouse, stone floors, picnic tables and wood stoves.  Dine in same building they make maple syrup in.  With all sorts of  vintage articles on the walls and ceilings.  Very kid friendly with kids picnic tables too.  Table booster seats for younger kids also.
The all you can eat buffet is a must.  Includes pancakes, French toast, scrambled eggs, home fries, bacon, sausage, ham, a pitcher of pure maple syrup, OJ, coffee, tea, milk, cocoa, toasters to make toast and try maple cream & Indian sugar and cold cereal.  Come hungry.
Quaint gift shop where they sell their maple products.
Open Seasonally 7 weeks in spring & 5 weeks in the fall.  Last weekend in Feb. - 2nd weekend in April and month of October.  They set up an awesome Halloween display in the fall.  Located on scenic by way Rt.112 in Worthington on the Huntington town line.  Beautiful ride any season along the Little River.
Once you go it will soon become a family tradition.  Open since 1991 and family owned and operated.
Reservations are not excepted it's first come first served.  When busy the line moves quickly, very well organized operation.
Worth the drive from anywhere!
Brian and Karen run a great family sugar shack.  They do the restaurant buffet style and it is truly "all you can eat".  They have authentic maple sugar products in the gift store but the syrup for your pancake meal is all you want and refillable. I had my family of 18 in town for Easter and they were able to hold two tables by the windows overlooking the Mill Stream...the kids loved it.
Very rustic- but the food is homemade and it is quite tasty.  The seating is picnic tables and if you plan to go, then go early as the limited seating fills up quickly.
Saw an ad in the newspaper for this place.  Great buffet breakfast in a great atmosphere.  Everything is delicious but the bacon should not be missed.  We went on Easter Sunday.  The dining room overlooks a river that is very scenic and there is a wood burning stove to keep everyone warm.  Open for the buffet breakfast every Saturday and Sunday from 7-2 during maple sugaring season (this year 2/28-4/12).  Also open in the Fall (10/3-11/1) during foliage season.  Can't say enough good things about the staff--GREAT!!!  Gift shop attached with their maple products, etc.  Will be visiting this place often.
First time visit and boy are we glad we did! The food was great and the atmosphere was just what you would expect from having a buffet breakfast in a maple syrup sugar house!!! Rustic and comfy. Staff was wonderful, owner came to our table and explained how long they had been in business.  We even bought some fresh made maple syrup.  It was a great experience and we look forward to going back soon.
This place is a great family breakfast experience.  First, if you are looking for a nice floor and building this many not be for you but for a maple sugar experience it is great!  I love the very rustic feel.  You are actually in a barn with rocks for a floor.  You can smell the fire from the maple syrup that is cooking in the other room.  Their are large family sized picnic tables to sit at and plenty of food to eat.  So, lets talk food.  Well there are tasty pancakes, mouth watering ham, sausage, bacon and eggs.  Plus a variety of bread to toast.  Drinks include milk, juice, coffee and tea.  We love coming during the maple season.  You can even hear the river behind the building.  The family that runs this establishment are wonderful and give you great information on how they make their syrup.  There is even a store to purchase items in.  Highly recommend!
Ok, it is a shack.  So if you need hardwood floor, cushioned chairs and to be waited on, this is not for you.  But every Spring, when the maple starts 'a flowing we head north to Worthingon, MA for a down home all-you-can-eat breakfast of pancakes, french toast, potatoes and eggs and a choice of meat (sausage, bacon and/or ham) and of course the nectar of the Gods....Maple Syrup.

We come here a few times in the spring and at least once in the fall during the fall foliage season.  In the fall, they set up a fun Halloween display.  It is a family operations and makes for a wonderful road trip.

Highly recommended.
Rating High Hopes is about memories made and atmosphere and not really centered on the food.
The family that runs this sugar house have created a charming and mostly unique experience that most people may not see due to its remote location but it really should not be missed. They advertise as rustic and it is indeed that. All-you-can-eat buffet of breakfast items and served along with their maple syrup are hearty and basic, not diner or gourmet but filling. You eat in one of 2 rooms, with the sunny windowed back room being our favorite as it has a wood stove and picnic tables with cinder like gravel floors. It looks out to the woods and sits atop a sloping hill to the stream below and is so pretty in the winter. I just really can't describe this gem easily but it is my favorite sugar shack and is a family tradition for several years now. They also open house in Sept-Oct during leaf season and it is an equal chance to discover the area without traveling to Vermont as we do it as a day trip from NJ and the back roads are beautiful old New England. You just should come here at least once to make your own memories.
- $2.25 slices, and 1 slice is actually like 2-2.5 pieces of pizza, so if you are super hungry order 2, or if you aren't then order just 1 slice
- inside the restaurant, there isn't anything spectacular. could be cleaner
- staff friendly for the most part 
- seems locals seem to enjoy this spot
We love The Hut for its soft serve ice cream and go there even when we have ice cream in the freezer. We've never tried the food.
Love the varity of food offered. You can have a pizza, calzone or a full course dinner. Gino is not going to let you leave hungry or disappointed.
I love that the hut is now mor then just ice cream in the summer! The pizza is VERY GOOD! The dinners are real good and I just love the grinders! Oh and Fried dough! And yes ice cream year around. If you are EVER IN HUNTINGTON you have to stop by!
I read reviews about this restaurant and I expecting bad service. The waitress, Amber, was very attentive and pleasant. The food was superb. The soup, a tomato, basil and cheddar soup was remarkable. I had the New Orleans Pasta. It was rich, a touch on the hot side and delicious.  Everyone liked their meals. Great place to eat.
I agree with serenitynow77 about the service here ... I kind of felt like I was on Candid Camera or Punked and kept waiting for someone to come about and say "hee hee just joking" ... 
Upon arrival, I had to approach someone even though I was waiting in clear view of the check in area. Then my the taking of the order took awhile and my entree came before my salad; which arrived for dessert. I never was offered or received a drink refill and sat at my table for several minutes after finishing thinking someone (my waitress?) would come over. All the while my waitress was about 5 feet away futzing with the cash register. I finally approached and asked for the bill and she acknowledged me then kept up the futzing for a few more minutes. I finally went and found someone else to get my check and take my money.
The food was average and the place is homey but the (lack of) service unfortunately overshadowed the experience.
OMG!!!! Got here at 6:00 with a reservation. Per usual, no acknowledgement from the hostess as we stood behind the other couple for 5 min. It is currently 7:27 and we are just now being served our dinner. Waitress came out with totally burnt pizza and assured us they are making another one. Perhaps we could pick it up tomorrow morning. Unfortunately this is our experience again and again. Not sure why we keep coming back. Perhaps a brainwashing ritual?! My fisherman's platter includes 2 teeny shrimp, 2 teeny scallops and a smidget of cod. All of which is dry and hard. Very pleasant waitress, but overall horrid experience. Buyer beware!!! See you there again soon.
We had dinner here before the Aaron Lewis  concert and I have to say myself and my two friends enjoyed every last bite.. we had nachos and fondue for appetizers which were really good. I got the steak salad for an entrée and the steak was cooked perfectly, my friends really enjoyed their meals too. We had delicious drinks called the painkiller. All in all, I'd can't wait to go back, limited gluten free choices, fair  prices
Their $5.50 lunch menu is great.  Love the roast turkey and real mashed potatoes.  Gravy needs help, bouillon would help.  Fresh rolls are served but lack salt big time.
Usually pretty fast service, and friendly wait staff.
OK..... the service was good and there aren't many other places to eat but I really didn't enjoy the bland french fries and the intensity of the stuffed portabella mushroom - too much blue cheese! (the order included 2 mushrooms and I gave one away to a fellow diner and she had the same opinion) I also ordered a small salad and added shrimp.  The shrimp were tasty and a bit tough. I wasn't told that the shrimp (3 large) would cost $6.99 while the salad was $3.99.  I still would have done it but would like to be told beforehand. The greens and dressing were fine.

I went with a vegetarian and she had the veggie burger which seemed to be prepackaged and heated to order.  Our other companion ordered the taco salad with chicken.  She was happy!!

On the other hand, I spoke with my sister who lives nearby.  She said this was my mother's favorite restaurant in this area and she was finicky about what she ate!! My sister, also, does not choose to frequent this restaurant.  

Will you like this tavern? I think it depends on what you order and what your expectations of a restaurant are. It is large.  I don't think you will ever have a problem getting seated.  I saw an event happening outside, buffet style, so clearly they have a happy clientele.
Large, varied menu in a really beautiful old home and barn. Food is usually delicious, but the delivery of it can be a bit slow. Waitstaff is good, but hostesses tend to be surly. Tons of seating inside and out. Haven't tried the beer, but it is an impressive looking brewery set up. Worth a stop. Wacky Wednesday special = a burger and a beer for $5.55!
Where else can you get reasonably priced comfort food combined with home brews in a historic setting. Friendly staff as well. The5.55 specials are a great deal. Beer batter is the bomb. I wish they had a place like this in Florida. You won't be disappointed. 

It's hard to find a nice combinaation of good food (pizza terrific) salads good and french onion soup!!  Nice varied menu, brewery, great put atmosphere and seating outside on a beautiful day!  Can't beat the combination.
We've been coming here for years now..we love it here so much that we call it OUR Place..it's even listed in our phone contacts as such. The locally brewed beers and delicious wines only enhance the experience of the delicious apps and entrées..the atmosphere of the dining room will transport you back to a time long ago, when stage coaches stopped after a long trip.. we have never had a bad dining experience here..we know you will not be disappointed..enjoy!
We sat out back in the open air courtyard; there were six of us for dinner.  Each dinner was different and everyone liked what they ordered.  They make their own craft beers here and we had several kinds.  Guys always like their hoppy brews!
A great variety of foods. The beer selection changes during the year.  Had the blueberry beer yesterday with lunch. It was very tasty.  My hubby's burger was spot on rare. Two thumbs up to the cook. Service was awesome. The waitress was pleasant and bubbly. A great place to get together,and try different beers
The atmosphere is wonderful, waitstaff attentative,and food plentiful and flavorful.  Have been there several times and enjoyed it each time.  Have several lunch specials for $5.00
The architecture of this old building is truly lovely - thus 2 stars.
Our server was nice and had an infectious smile.  But our table was sticky dirty.  The salt and pepper shakers were sticky dirty.  The menu had a wide variety of options.  My husband ordered baked scallops and I ordered prime rib.  His scallops were overcooked, dry, and tasteless.  It had a coating of what looked like seasoned bread crumbs but he said there was no discernible spices or herbs.  
My prime rib was cold.  The "au jus" served with it had no flavor at all and had a thick layer of grease floating in the top.  Yuck.  My knife was dull and, when I asked for a new knife, it was also dull.  I had to saw it to cut the prime rib.
Our mashed potatoes had been overbeaten and were gluey.  Also way too much liquid.  They were a wet puddle on our plates.
Canned green beans were the other side item. 
Overall, I consider this to be a typical Yankee cooking style restaurant.  A lack of seasonings and a misunderstanding of what constitutes well made food.
A group of 30 adults had dinner at Brewmaster Tavern.  Everyone loved their dinner.   The majority ordered the prime rib special, and all were happy with their dinner.  Our one waitress, Cher, was superb!  Pleasant, efficient, friendly, accurate and did a fantastic job.  She got all the drink orders correct, as well as the dinners, desserts, coffee and more!
My wife and I visit once in a while. Sometimes the food is good and the staff is bad. Or the food is not so good and the staff is good. I hope someday the staff and food is good. Its a great staple for the town and the area. They always have a good all around menu with early bird specials. 
They advertised half price gift certificates on the outside marquee and they would not honor their advertisement. I had even called to check.  Over an hour after I first stopped in, the outside sign still said half price gift certificates!!  FALSE ADVERTISING!  I had spoken to the manager when I first  went in and she said "Not my problem." I was appalled that they had not even changed the sign if they were not honoring it!!!!!
An earlier reviewer said this was a waste of a trip from Northampton, I wouldn't go that far (because really Williamsburg is not that far from Northampton) but I don't think the Brewmaster's Tavern (food-wise) is as good as it used to be. Now before getting into this review I can only personally attest to the food because I got takeout here, but my mother and two of her friends went there a little while ago and she gave me a pretty good report of her visit so consider this a sort of a "secondary review." BUT again please do keep in mind I DID still have the food. First I'll reiterate what my mother experienced on-site then I'll talk about my experience. 

So my mother had the Baked Haddock which came with rice and vegetables. Her complaint was that the breading was bland and was unusual as compared to a standard Haddock breading. She did not feel the need to bring home her leftovers, which is for her is a good indication she did not like it because she loves haddock and if she liked it she surely would have brought it home, haha. As for her dining companions they both had the Lemon Chicken which came with vegetables and pasta, which I understand was really nothing to write home about. To end with that bit of the review I think I would agree with yet another previous from earlier this year who said that the Brewmaster's Tavern is not about their food as (to quote) "there is nothing innovative or interesting" about it. 

My mother also mentioned to me that the service is was okay at best and one thing that really bugged her was were her party was seated. Now their party had reservations and their were not many people there yet  however they were not put in a very good seat. Now this something that really has started to irritate me as well about many restaurants lately is their ineptitude in seating their guests, what I mean is just shoving guests in crummy seats when they had made reservations and when the house is not that full. Its almost like hosts want to create an uncomfortable situation by making the guests ask to be seated elsewhere. I don't know that's just how I feel and sorry for that little rant. 

However, I personally will over a little positively into this review, remember I did have takeout. I had my mother get me an Open-Face Turkey sandwich, typical setup: White Meat Turkey, over slices of white bread with mashed potatoes and gravy. Ok, it was great, the meat was perfect (nice big generous slices) and the mashed potatoes were good too. My only compliant was that I did suspect that the gravy was not homemade, however it was not the biggest tragedy in the world for me but c'mon I know how to make homemade gravy, its not that hard. 

Finally (I'm almost done guys, sorry for the length really, but I like to be thorough especially when I have to give out an obscure 3 out 5), as my title indicates I have been here in past, a few years ago (unfortunately I don't think I bothered to review it) but it was MUCH BETTER then in terms of both the service and their food. Whatever they were doing then in my opinion they might consider reverting back. That's just me. I do have to say I looked at some of the other recent reviews here and took another look at their menu (which is huge by the way, I don't think it needs to be that big at all) and I noticed that many of the positive reviews noted having good meals which were of the typical pub/tavern fare (sandwiches, burgers, the turkey dinner etc.) So it seems to me based on that, if you are planning on going to the Brewmaster's Tavern stick to ordering those kinds of meals and you should at least be a little more satisfied. 

Thanks for reading!!!
My family on a drive to Northern Massachusetts stopped by here for dinner. It was our first stop  and our last stop at this restaurant. 

The service was slow, the bread was not your typical yeast rolls and the steak that my wife ordered was so tough that she could not eat it. The pulled pork sandwich was smothered in sauce and you could not taste the pork. The pasta dish my son had was just average. We did bring the issue of the steak are waitresses attention and they did take it off our bill and offered my wife something else to eat but by then she was done with this establishment.

My other son had pizza! Fortunately the saving grace of this meal was the chicken pesto Pizza, it was very good. The food and service where average at best . 

Good luck!
I dine at Brewmaster's Tavern on a regular basis.  The food is always good and they have amazing special offerings.  You can find a delicious choice of lunch entrees any weekday for just $5.55 and they have a great selection of their own beers.  Most evenings there are other great values, such as Wednesday's Burger and Beer for, again, just $5.55.  The bar is a relaxing place to eat and drink and play a game of keno.  The bartenders and waitresses are friendly and knowledgeable.  The restaurant is a real asset to our community.
We were looking for something local and came upon this semi-permanent food truck set up on the side of the road. We generally like food trucks, so we pulled in. The menu is nicely varied and we were also pleasantly surprised to see grass-fed burgers on the menu.  I ordered the grass-fed burger with green chiles and it was absolutely outstanding. We also ordered the onion rings and out came these giant, heavenly rings of deliciousness. If you're riding down Route 9 and are hungry, I recommend you stop here and search no further!
Great spot to stop on a summer or fall day.  The quality of the meat is good, but there are no real beverage choices and the ketchup and other condiments are processed in contrast to the local, fresh meat choices.  Probably great for families.  Ice cream next door and outside, too.
Pleasantly surprised by the very good food.  We've been to Local Burger in the center of Northampton and liked it also.  This place has great brisket, fish tacos and burgers.  Seating is at picnic tables and assorted round tables outside.  Very pleasant.
the service was awesome the food friggin outstanding and serving size more then enough.the taste was like going to a bbq competition i will go back again as i have every year for last two years .this place rocks the traditional and above in everything.
This is the place to go for an awesome burger. I customize mine with bleu cheese crumbles and sautéed mushrooms and onions. The fries are also amazing and very clearly homemade. If you have room, which you probably won't, there's an ice cream stand just feet away!
Went here last night a group of 12, from pulled pork, to burgers, onion rings, fries, brisket, lobster roll ,it was all just wonderful.  What a local treasure, wish I lived here enjoy again.  Yum yum
I stopped here yesterday and ordered a Williamsburger.  It is a burger featuring local beef  with pulled pork, BBQ sauce and 1 huge fried onion ring.  It was a mouthful and more.  I don't get here that often but I know that they have very creative and tasty burgers.  Next time I will try their BBQ ribs.  A great summer destination in Williamsburg MA
The pulled pork, brisket & ribs are the best. Love it. Great outside dining with music. Next to village green. So you can have dessert after 😃  Their burgers are great too.
As someone who frequents route 9 from the Berkshires to Amherst to see family, we pass by here all the time.  Husband had the look park burger and I had the pulled pork sandwich.  It was very reason all price wise and delicious! We'll have to stop by again, I am intrigued by the captain crunch chicken tenders!
I stopped for lunch and had a burger with apple smoked bacon lettuce pickles ketchup mustard and a side order of fries. The burger was delicious; thick and  perfectly cooked. The fries were very good too. The staff was very friendly. Will definitely go back.   
Not the best BBQ in the country, but certainly the best I've had in the area. I've been there a bunch of times and always enjoyed the pulled pork. The Carolina BBQ sauce that comes on it is to die for. The brisket is good, but inconsistent. Staff are always friendly. Any issues I've had have been minor and I dreamed of Local Burgy all winter when they were closed. 
A fun location in my neighborhood, but this calorie laden menue is best split with a friend.  Wish they had sliders.
Found this pot of gold on Mother's Day (5/8/16) just as the sun replaced the rain clouds and we stopped for a 2pm lunch. The wind was brisk, but my craving for a REAL burger was satisfied, and the large order of scrumptious fries was a bonus. The table service after you ordered was unexpected, and the place was bustling as I commented to my wife that more cars turned into the lot than drove by. We will be back !
I like outside dining.  This is outside dining at it's best for family time, or just hang time.
Great food. Good service.  The homemade bar-be-cue sauce is excellent.  The brisket is out of this world and the onion rings are to die for!!!
Local Burger is closed now for the season but I can,t wait for it to open next Spring. Their menu of locally sourced food includes delicious hamburgers with meat from local farms. Their  onion rings were the best around!  It was so nice to eat out on hot nights. 
Food is fantastic! Fresh local ingredients make this place a popular destination. Had Mac and cheese which was okay, chicken fingers were excellent, burgers were fresh, and the fresh cut fries were awesome. Only thing I would like to be able to get a butter toasted roll and it would be perfect.
The grass fed burgers are sinfully good as are the fries and onion rings. Low key, fast yet personal service. Yummy and well priced, take out and outside dining only. 

Go , before they close for season!
I could cook the brisket with a fork. A plastic fork! Love their Carolina mustard-based barbecue sauce. The slaw was very good. 
Huge onion rings cook fresh. 
No words, ok I have alot of words and they're leaning towards BEST BURGER EVER. Juicy Lucy and Brisket fries with cheese curds. A bit pricey but the portions are so huge it's three meals in one, worth every penny. 
Thank you Local Burger for bringing your slice of burger heaven to Williamsburg.
Stopped with a friend for lunch - we each ordered a burger, with sweet potato fries to share - We built our own burger, mine with bacon and bleu cheese -  cooked just as ordered, and the fries were perfection.  The seating is outdoors, and only some of the tables have shade, so bring a hat if it's a sunny day.    Perfect lunch and food served quickly!
this place knocks it out of the park on both the pizza and subs.the quantity of food for the price is well worth the stop but the quality is right there and better
This has been my family's go-to place for take-out for years. The pizza is consistently good, and our favorite combos are ham & pineapple, or tomato & bacon. We also like their hot oven grinders. Better for take-out than dining there as it's a small place, but really good either way!
This is a very casual spot. Mostly takeout. Good generous servings, and mostly Italian-like meals. An excellent Greek salad. Good hot tuna grinder. Friendly hometown people.
Been getting pizza and wraps here for years. The White Pizza with any toppings is delicious. My dad RAVES about the buffalo chicken wrap he gets them multiple wraps a week.
While my kitchen is being renovated, I have eaten out a lot.,one of my favorite places is A1 Pizza. If you order a large you get a second pizza for the same price. Try the Hillltown, it is delicious!
Some things never change.  Always tasty and their products are consistent. A little more expensive than in the city but worth the cost, just remember to bring cash or you will have to use the ATM in the back.
I stopped in A-1 HIlltown Pizza on a run from Northampton to Berkshire County.   It was a spontaneous decision, breezing through.   I ordered a pizza for my son and I to share when the counter lady suggested I take advantage of their Buy 1 / Get 1 Free promotion.  Initially I said no, but then figured I could have leftovers.  The pizzas included one plain cheese and one with two toppings.  

They were 16-piece pizzas, but cut into teensy tiny slices; truly this was just an average 14-inch pizza.  I was stunned when I got the bill to see that the price was $24 and change.  I looked it over thinking she forgot to subtract the free pizza.  She didn't.  One cost $19.99, the second one a little more.  Plus two cans of soda - no cups, no ice.  

They do not accept credit or debit cards, but have an ATM onsite where you must pay a $2 fee to the owner of the machine.  They have a pretty good thing going here ........ for the owners, not the customers!  

The pizzas were good, but not gourmet and not supersized and not spectacular.  The atmosphere was dated but clean - certainly the high price wasn't going toward some avant-garde , ambient place that gets writeups in Yankee Magazine.  I'm still scratching my head, wondering why the high price.  The sauce was good but not outstanding.  The crust was thin, just ordinary.  They were generous with the pepperoni & onion ........ but this isn't like gouda or sundried tomatoes, certainly this isn't a real expense.  

This place was neither bad nor good, but the price is appalling.  I always tip on the grand total before specials or deductions but couldn't justify it in this case.
On a recent trip through Williamsburg, my wife and I stopped for lunch at A1 Hilltown Pizza. Located in a non-descript building next to a package store, it didn't look like much from the outside, but the inside was clean and bright with around 8 booths for seating if you'd like to eat there, which we did. We decided to order pizza and hot buffalo wings. The wings were nothing special to me, just dipped in Frank's Hot Sauce, coated in what seemed to be a fine crumb mixture, and fried, but my wife commented that they were among the best she'd ever eaten and she liked them done that way. We both agreed that the Greek style pizza was excellent. It was loaded with the toppings we ordered, all very fresh and tasty, and the sauce was exceptional. We'll definitely be back when we're in the area again.
Clean kitchen and prompt service with beer on tap.
Pizza was okay, but I grew up in Boston where the pizza is great.
I have been ordering cooked salami grinders here for about 10 years. Great onion rings, too. Reasonably priced and delicious. Friendly and polite wait staff and cooks. Good place for a quick and tasty lunch or dinner. The menu includes a wide variety of grinders, pizza, pasta and other dishes. Beer and wine, too. Not fancy, but comfortable and good.
Really like their pizza. Not gourmet - just straight forward pizza done very well. Good value. Fast take-out. Service is friendly and food is consistent.
First time visit with family and we were impressed with the good quality food and clean out door eating area.  We had fun hitting a few balls after.
Great time for family, friends, couples, or alone. Outdoor seating with or without shade. Real soft serve ice cream, very affordable. Reubens are especially good and their lobster rolls are surprisingly tasty and well priced. 
You can watch mini golf or play. Often local coupons are around to get two-for-one buckets of balls. 
Beautiful view of greens and mountains while eating. 

Only drawback: drinks and milkshakes are in styrofoam. 
Scotti's is a roadside driving range and snack bar which you would assume has mediocre food.  However it's actually very good.  Sandwiches, burgers, and fish and chips are consistently good.  I particularly like the Reuben and sausage grinder.  Good soft serve to cap things off.
Scottie's has the best lobster rolls, tuna rolls, grinders and burgers.  An order of fries is huge. Lines are always long.  Well worth the wait.  And you can get ice cream for dessert.
I had heard about Scottis before I started working in Leeds. So naturally I had to try it. AMAZING lobster roll!! My coworker in Greenfield was soooo correct:-)
The line is always long-- well known and great.  Famous for their lobster roll but everything is excellent and generous.  As it is also  golf range where you can practice your swing, that is also entertaining and just fun to watch.  Outside dining casual and great. Friendly people. A must if you are in the area. Cannot say enough about the quality of food-- perfect!
A must stop for lunch or dinner, wide variety of food from burgers, hot dogs, steak grinders, lobster rolls, fried sea food weekends in season hopefully,
 all are excellent choices, gets busy, can have long lines ,best to call order in as take out
There's always a line, but it's so worth the wait. I especially love the Leeds Burger, and pretty much every time I go they ask if I want "single" or "double" - the double is listed on the menu, and it's really nice that they ask. I know there is other good stuff on the menu - before I tried the Leeds Burger (which is what I end up deciding on every time now) I also enjoyed the hot dog, and the steak and cheese. The onion rings are delicious too.
The food is pretty good and the portion sizes are good for the money. The wait can be awhile, especially on the weekends during the summer, so if you can, I recommend that you call ahead and place your order. It also has a driving range attached, so that has a tendency to bring in the crowds and make parking there a bit of a hassle.
I have been a long time fan of Scotti's and wish I had taken more photos the last time I was there (about a week ago). Originally from western Mass, I have eaten my share of drive in / take out food from hot dog stands and fast food vendors on road trips in the area. Nothing, literally, nothing surpasses the steak & cheese at Scotti's on Route 9 in Leeds. 

The food is always made fresh to order - and as customizable as you can imagine. Their recent addition of seafood to their menu (recent within the last handful of years) has been tremendous and I am hard pressed not to make that my focus - but my heart does lie with the steak & cheese. Oozing with cheese fresh off the grill, topped with whatever you like (my preference: sauteed mushrooms, lettuce, pickles and mayo), served on a toasted freshly baked roll cannot be beat. Their french fries are a crowd pleaser for sure. Hand pulled through the potato slicer, they are cooked up fresh daily with nothing added to them. Top em with chili if you like, but I say salt and vinegar is the way to go. The outdoor seating is covered for the most part - a few picnic tables sit in the open sun - and overlook the long lawn of the driving range. Window/counter service is always with a smile and the place is clean, fastidiously so (unlike some drive ins where there is old ketchup crusted on trays and on the picnic table seats).

Not only is Scotti, the owner of the family run drive in and driving range, a familiar friendly face which is always present in the kitchen, but his wife, Tammy, is there at his side most of the time or on the golf side (which was formerly run by Scotti's parents). I love nothing more than good food made by good people with strong family ties. Both the food side and the driving range are staples in the area for employing young high schoolers - oftentimes as their first job during summers. He has helped many a youngster earn money to put toward college and helped them garner confidence during what can be a trying time in a young person's life. 

Do yourself (and your family - if you have one) a favor and stop by here your next time through the area. I promise you won't be disappointed and if anything, may stop and make it a regular tradition!
This was among the best breakfasts that I have every had.  The place is unassuming, the staff is courteous and efficient, and the chefs clearly care about their craft.  If you are in the neighborhood, you should definitely stop in.  The locals clearly eat here, as it was packed but still had no wait to be seated or delay on service.
This restaurant looks unassuming from the outside and because the parking lot is at the side it almost appears closed.  But when we stopped there for lunch it was very busy and seemed to be filled with a lot of local customers who were enjoying chowders, lobster rolls, clam bellies and other treats.  The interior is quite cheery with picnic tables painted Aqua and yellow as well as painted tables and chairs.  Tables carry sayings that are all different.  (Ours said "A golfer's diet: live on greens as much as possible" and " For happy health, fuel yourself with dreams and greens."). The proprietor seemed to know just about everybody and each server was cheerful and hustling.  We got clam chowder which was well seasoned with tender clams and a creamy base; it was really good.  I got the special of the day, a lobster roll which was stuffed with plump chunks of tender lobster.  I ordered mine warm so it was served in a toasted split bun with drawn butter on the side.  They also serve them cold with the lobster bound in mayonnaise.  My husband got a fried shrimp platter which was good as well though the French fries are forgettable.

We visited this place while camping in The DAR. The food and service were excellent and we returned on three occasions! The belly clams and lobster rolls were the favorites with everyone. We also loved the clam chowder and a fried scallop dinner that was being offered as a special one of the days.
Good, quality lunch food at the Burgy Snack bar. We are always amazed at the generous portion sizes. If you order a reuben, you'll definitely want a leftover box, unless you're very hungry! Their seafood is very popular, and I myself enjoy the Crabcake Po'boy. My only wish for them is that they had better homemade fries. That's the only small drawback for me. Oh, here's a tip: don't be deceived by the number of cars outside- it may look like the place is packed, but inside is a very large rectangular bar that fits many people, and there's also several picnic tables. They are limited in parking, but there's almost always a seat available inside.
I didn't expect much from a "Snack Bar", but wow was I surprised! Their fresh lobster roll was packed with choice lobster held together with a tad of mayo. As someone who dislikes a lot of mayo, I was pleased that it in no way interfered with the taste of the lobster. The lobster roll was superb, and so was the price which at $10.50, made me do a double take. 

We sat at one of the painted indoor picnic tables, and read from a surprisingly large menu that even accommodates vegetarians.  I was intent on lobster roll and was offered a choice of cold lobster with toasted buttered bun (that I got), or of a hot lobster roll with melted butter on the side.  

I very much look forward to returning to this gem of a spot whenever we return to this area.  I highly recommend it.

The Williamsburg Snack Bar serves breakfast (the breakfast menu also looks good) as well as lunch, and some nights dinner.
I stopped in on my way out of town and my friend was right -- lobster roll with chips for $10.50! Generous portion, would be $14 anywhere else. Not too much mayo, no celery or cucumber or anything to dilute the simplicity. Roll was soft, white, and grilled to perfection. There are tables outside under an awning and lots of picnic tables inside; I sat at the bar. (They do not serve alcohol, I don't think.) I am from Rockport, MA, so have had my share of lobster rolls since childhood, and I deem this one excellent. Served with a small wedge of lemon, which is always nice. Free refills on soda and the staff were all very friendly. I wish my appetite had been bigger, because I read from others that the fried clams are excellent. Maybe next time! And next time, I will hopefully sit at a table with friends -- the tables all have sayings painted on them. Cute place. Air conditioning inside.
The Williamsburg Snack Bar was a nice place to stop while driving up Route 9 into the hill towns.  It came highly recommended for its seafood and most notably the lobster roll.  The snack bar is unique in that it is air conditioned with the picnic tables inside, probably 8 to 10 tables and a large lunch counter.  The menu is quite large and they serve both breakfast and lunch.

Sitting at the lunch counter, I was welcomed, handed the menu and the specials were recited.  The snack bar was busy at lunch time and the food came out in a reasonable time.  There were many families and friends enjoying this venue and would say this is where the locals tend to meet.  

The lobster roll was of average size with chunks of lobster meat, not a lot of mayo but had too much paprika sprinkled on top which took away from the flavor of the lobster meat.  The price was reasonable, the service was good but disappointed in the lobster roll.
We enjoyed fresh lobster rolls, fried clams and very good service. Portions were generous and atmosphere, a bit quirky but welcome air-con on a hot summer day. No alcohol. Worth a stop.
The owners are usually working in the kitchen and out on the floor, and it shows: there's attention to details here. Food arrives quickly, even when crowded.  It can get very crowded at lunchtime. Wide-ranging menu with seafood given a major role, but there are also chicken and beef entrees. Famed for lobster rolls, and "platters" of various kinds. Comfy and low-keyed, nothing fancy, worth a stop if you're heading to the Berkshires.
Extensive menu, delicious food, generous portions and very reasonable prices.  Efficient service with a smile, no matter how busy they are.  Seating is not super comfortable.  There are a few traditional tables, but most seating is either at the bar or at an indoor (or outdoor) picnic table.  The acoustics are poor, so it can get very noisy but don't let that deter you. I promise you won't be disappointed.
Thank you God for this amazing dining experience! First time here. Thought I was dreaming. The love flows from the chef to the food to the wait staff right into my mouth. This place should be on the TV news.
The clam chowder is the best!  My sister had the lobster bisque and said the same.  We always enjoy the whole belly clams as well.  One of my sisters loves the lobster blt as well.
The Snack Bar is one of my favorite restaurants.  They have a wide variety of breakfast and lunch offerings with plenty of fish and seafood items and the prices are very reasonable.  Try the hash or benedicts for breakfast and don't miss the soups and chowders for lunch.  Dinner is served only on Thursday through Saturday and often feature specials.  Don't miss it!
The food is terrific at the snack bar; the staff is welcoming and extremely nice. The theme is fun and the restaurant is extremely clean. They have numerous options on their menu and everything we ordered was excellent.
OMG. This place is off the charts. My sisters and I stopped for lunch yesterday.  We had the whole belly clams, clams chowder and lobster bisque. The lobster bisque had chucks of real lobster in it. It is amazing. It was so good . Hopefully we will head back this was for I head back to Florida.
The Snack Bar has the best blueberry pancakes for miles with real maple syrup. Their  staff is friendly and you will meet lots of local folks who enjoy eating there. On the weekend it tends to be a bit busier but it is worth the wait. An easy stop if you are on your way to the hills of Western Mass for skiing or a Sunday drive. It is located just past the center of Haydenville and there is plenty of parking. Easily handicapped accessible!
We loved this place when they were in the old location. It has gotten better. Expanded menu, sit down service. Same great prices and portions. Great bang for your buck!!!!!!
Rich is a great cook. 
 
The veggie burger is great, just need to have some cholula sauce. 
 Awesome local spot, such cute decor. Like going to Margaritaville. 
We stopped by the Williamsburg Snack Bar the other day to visit it's new location, about a half mile east from the previous location.  Same great lobster roll.  We noticed an expanded menu, and a great crowd for early lunch
Love love love this place. It is where community comes together. Locals and passersby mingle in this inviting restaurant enjoying good food and good company. Kudos to you Dianne, you and yours have hit a home run.
A great family stop. They have the best flavors. Hand scooped and Soft served. Along with tons of other treats. 
This family owned establishment has been there since I can remember. This is a must when driving Rt 9 in Western Mass. 
Village Green is a nice neighborhood place to stop for ice cream.  Soft serve and hard packed ice cream available.  We usually go for the soft serve.  The ice cream itself is nothing special, but it's a fun easy place to stop.  Staff (local teens) are always friendly. 
Favorite place to go for ice cream cones, sundays, dishes -- run by a local family who owns the green house business there.   American ingenuity and perseverance has made this a top notch experience.
This is a nice family run greenhouse with awesome people, ice cream and plants. If you get a chance to stop and browse grab a cone and wander. The owners are most helpful and knowledgeable of their products. And the best part they are local.
Have stopped here many times and the quality never disappointing  Great selection and variety..  Usually a line, but it moves quickly.
Our favorite ice cream stand of all time. You can't beat the quality and the price.Great selection of hard flavors, sundaes and soft serve.
Had a great chocolate malt milk shake with real hard ice cream .. junior size was plenty .. an excellent treat!! The sundaes my crew enjoyed drew equally rave satisfaction.
A great variety of hard and soft ice creams served by friendly people. Very good quality and big servings. Creative sundaes. Frozen yougurt. Lots of cone licking going on. Sometimes a line, but it's fast moving.
Great service. Very generous sizes.  I got a large the first time - lets just say I didn't warn you :)  their soft serve is some of the best in the valley.  Might even try a sundae next time.  Worth the trip.  With the local burger trailer/shack just down the way made a summer evening of it.  Perfect for a mid summer evening as the sun was setting.
The Village Green has so many choices for ice cream, floats, sundaes, milkshakes, etc. and they keep adding more! I love having this place close by. it's nice to do a little plant shopping while you enjoy a peanut butter and hot fudge sundae on coffee soft serve or a cone with coffee-black raspberry twist.
Great service and decent number of ice cream and frozen yogurt choices from roadside location, sm children's play area, limited parking, fast service, good portion sizes
This place is a family favorite of ours for years serving generous portions of
a variety of ice cream choices.  Their soft serve is the old fashioned stand by..
serving vanilla, chocolate, Raspberry and my favorite Coffee soft serve....or a
combo of any....and frozen yogurt soft serve too. ....the closest to home made
taste. This place is located at one end of a plant stand/store with a few picnic
tables to sit and mini play area for the kids. Sadly it is a seasonal business and 
closes towards the end of October and reopens in the Spring..so hurry before
cold weather !
Wonderful spot to grab a nice cold treat.  Cones, sundaes, shakes & much more!!  Big variety, wonderful staff!  
Conveniently located off Route 9.  There were lots of choices for flavors, and it's a popular place with the locals, judging by the number of people there.
I was one of those diehard Dunkin Donut fans before I realized the coffee was tasting worse every year. When this place opened, I was curious, so my friend and I went, and we haven't looked back. Now we would never go to Dunks over Elbow Room. The coffee is amazing, Melissa (the owner) is sweet, funny and a joy, and you feel really good about supporting someone local. She also has amazing pastries for sale, and the nutmeg donuts are our fave. Yum, yum!
A great local roaster, try the little lebowski & you
will want more than one of those perfect cinnamon  nutmeg donuts.  Wow
Owner by Mellissa who used to work for Dean,s Beans , this is a local favorite. Mellissa knows coffee and has a roasting business as  her main stay.  She will find the right coffee for you. This morning I am having Peruvian. Worth a stop on your way west to Pittsfield, located in the picturesque town of Williamsburg.,
LOVE the new patio area, replete with birdsong, shady umbrellas and garden flowers. Would encourage even more blooms next year; howzabout an overhead trellis? I am always on the hunt for fresh decaf: this place is quickly becoming my go-to spot. Those scones are dangeously delectable! Love this place!
Freshly baked local goodies! Huge sacks of fresh bean from mysterious ports of call! A VERY friendly hostess! What is not to like? If you are craving a good quick wakeup call with yummy ingredients, stop here. Plus the local gossip is tasty too. My one hope is they open up the front space a bit, make it a sunny hangout spot. That coffee is pure poetry, pure liquid bean.
We feel lucky to have Chinese food close to home, and it's a nice change now and then. However, the place has changed hands a few times, and we do find it to be pricey for the quality.
I've had good meals here and terribly oily fried rice and rude service and great service. It's a crap shoot what kind of meal you will have.
Very nice cat meat, and the staff were good people. All the Koreans ate noodles whilst the others ate my dog.
My husband and I have been eating here a lot lately; the staff is always very friendly and chatty. There is such a variety, we have yet to taste it all! Excited that they have so many vegetarian options. All the food is fresh, especially the veggies, and not drowned in sauce. The wine is vapid, as is the cool jazz. I REALLY wish they'd zazz up the paint job, which at the moment is made up of muted purples and peuces. Embrace the Chinese! I'd love to see some bold whites, golds and reds,maybe have a bamboo plant or some insence. I'm cheesy enough to like those lazy susan tables, I hope they get a couple for big parties.
This restaurant has relatively recently changed hands and now seems to have an inventive and dedicated chef.  My family, which includes some discriminating asian relatives, finds this restaurant to be the best Chinese in the area.  We live nearby and have been there often.
The food is  very good,  and they offer all the standard Chinese fare ( our 6yr old grandson especially likes the house Mai fun noodles) But the food is really good if you order off the gourmet menu, happen to like spicy szechwan style food and are prepared to be a bit adventuresome. 
I have had hotter in China and NYC, but the heat level here is is not quite of the numbing, ear burning variety. The cold tofu in spicy scallion sauce, the szechwan wontons in hot chili oil, the beef tendon and stuffed tofu with pork are our favorites. The vegetables that come with the dishes are always fresh, the rice is great.  Service is quick and friendly. Big booths available, so good for groups and families, tho not much for romantic decor.  Prices are more than reasonable. Highly recommended.
Panda Garden in Williamsburg is under new management. We ordered online tonight. The food arrived at the right time, nice and hot and delicious! Their white rice is fabulous - different than most, chewy with a bit of the hull still on. We also had pork fried rice, General Tso's Chicken and Pork in Garlic Sauce. The spring rolls are nice and crunchy and not too fat with cabbage. I highly recommend the new Panda Garden.
This place recently changed hands and now is operated by the previous owner of Butterfly in Hadley. The quality of the food has improved a lot, the atmosphere is the same as before. Definitely order off of the gourmet menu. 
The food looks and tastes nice. The service need to be improved. the atmosphere is not romantic. I like the food. It is up to you to choose. Thanks.
      
I've eaten there a few times, with wildly inconsistent results. But I understand Richard Lau, who owned and operated Butterfly in Hadley, is coming to Panda Garden. Fingers crossed.
This is a funny  little place. We've had  inconsistent results with  take out,  but  I can't now remember why, one day we ate there.

It was  really good. the food was  hot and fresh and well done. And the  service was  charming. The place itself is  not prepossessing, but , and I hate to use this word,  it has an aura  of calm and comfort. 

Another reviewer mentioned the great Wall in Florence. When they were good, they had superb food,  but it was NOT a place to sit and chat and eat in comfort. It was dark and  in a faintly creepy strip of shops.

Panda Garden has decent, sometimes really  good food, and is  a comfortable place to  sit and actually  enjoy a meal. If you  don't want the  hustle and  bustle [ and cost] of nearby Northampton, stop in and eat  here.
This restaurant puts out consistently inconsistent food.  When they first opened, I visited once and didn't return.  Months later, when The Great Wall in Florence went south, I returned to Panda Garden and found the food to be delicious, especially the B-B-Q spare ribs.  However....the last 3 encounters were poor.  Perhaps a new chef?  All the food is brown and tastes the same. Did I mention mushy? The B-B-Q spare ribs remain as delicious as ever.
Not that pizza is all that you can get at this delightful cafe hidden away in Haydenville MA north of Northampton. It is a casual country place with lots of wood inside and natural light streaming in, open-air tables among flowers and plants in-season, and a rustic comfortable atmosphere. We did try the pizza on recommendation and were not sorry. We created our own with mushrooms and roasted red peppers on a tomato sauce and cheese base; our friends had a "white" pizza with lots of garlic, olive oil and mozzarella. We also sampled the salad with home-made dressing. I chose the Caesar dressing and could taste the anchovy in it; it was so delicious that I had to eat every bite. We also got a loaf of hearty bread to take home with us, which apparently often sells out. I loved everything there including the waiter we had. He was so warm and friendly that it added a real level of comfort to the meal. I definitely plan to go back!
Stopped for a quick snack.  Ended up getting slices of pizza, coffee, juices, quiche, and baked goods.  Outstanding!
Great bakery and cafe.  The breads are all extraordinarily good.  Pizza and sandwiches are also excellent, as is the coffee.  Atmosphere is casual, funky and very down to earth.

Highly recommended.
Amazing freshly made sandwiches, salads, desserts, breads and pizza. Use locally grown ingredients whenever possible. Fun cafe like atmosphere. Some outdoor seating (though little shade) amongst flowers and sculptures. Definitely a worthy stop of a meal, fresh bread or a sweet treat. 
Don't let the unfinished outside fool you to make you think they don't take their food seriously. The food at Bread Euphoria is always great and freshly made.  Make sure to try their pizza! Usually plenty of spaces to eat inside or outside in the nice weather.  I have also enjoyed their BLTs and chicken Caesar salads; no matter what we have ordered we have never been disappointed.
Very homey atmosphere, but with carefully prepared breads, pastries, pizzas, and plates. Saturday night music is often great fun. Not very big, seating later in the evening can be tricky.
Cozy, quaint, and wonderful coffee and homemade food!  Good selection from baked goods, delicious breads, quiche, pizza and more and the coffee was stellar.  I even bought some freshly baked biscuits for my dog.  Modest interior, but the food was very good.  They even stocked some local cheeses and ceramics for sale, and while we didn't get to enjoy it, live music on some evenings.  I'll be back next time I'm visiting! 
Stopped in for the first time for a quick snack. We were greeted by several friendly staff members, it was so welcoming. Everything on the menu sounds delicious, and looks so good and fresh. We got a sandwich which was great, the bread is awesome!! We will definitely be back.
I stop here often on my way to and from work.  Always easy to get a good quick meal: salads, soups, sandwiches, pizza, quiche.  Especially quiche - it's very rich, cheesy, light and with a pastry crust rather than traditional pie crust.  My favorite bakery items are morning bun and ginger scone.   Only complaint:  they are a bit overpriced. Obviously, it doesn't deter me because at least I like what I get in return.  
The food is so freshly prepared, the baked goods are sublime, and the service is excellent.  I wish it was a little less expensive, but then again, I would gain 30 pounds if I went there too often.  Everything is so yummy!
We were three hungry people looking for pie one weekend afternoon. Well, to be honest, the 5 and the 7 year olds were moving rapidly from hungry to hangry, and I wasn't far behind. We'd just left a cafe that had "pie" in its name, but was only serving a couple of esoteric options (maybe in another life my kids will scream delightedly for some more Shaker Grapefruit pie, but not this day). Euphoria Bread...totally lives up to its name, and then some. The most lovely aroma envelops you at the door. Breads, croissants, cakes, pizzas...and pie, actual simple delicious apple pie! They also make a smooth latte, offer local chocolate milk, and have live music in the evenings. The dining room is airy, light, and warm.  As is the bread! Enjoy!
This bakery and restaurant produces excellent breads and desserts and tasty lunch fare. Friendly staff, informal, and a local institution.
Bread Euphoria started as a small bakery around the corner many years ago.  With lots of really hard work and a commitment to quality, this bakery / restaurant has grown to become quite the operation.  There is even entertainment on Saturday nights!  We love their fresh baked breads and the staff is always so friendly.
It is the consistently best lunch in the area.  The vibe is cool and relaxed.  Close to Northampton but out of the fray.  Great pastries and bread, to.
Bread Euphoria is a baking gift to the Northampton & Western Mass Hilltowns and a happy, busy, friendly place to sit down and have really excellent coffee and a really delicious pastry. Their muffins, croissants, breakfast buns, and our favorite  -- pecan sticky buns -- are all very very good. To take home, breads and cakes are definitely also worth a trip. Sometimes a bit expensive but always a special treat. Perhaps the only question is whether they haven't gone too far in trying to provide too many kinds of dishes (pizza, breakfasts, salads, sandwiches soups, gelato) for too many kinds of hungers.
Terrific breads and food.  We always buy several loaves to take back to New York!  Highly recommend Euphoria!
Best cinnamon raisin bread. Toast or French toast will make you come back for many visits. The muffins are moist and fresh! 
Everything is from local sources, and the quality of the bread and baked goods is fabulous.  The prices are a bit steep, but it feels to be worth it as a special treat.
Good bread, dry pizza, very overpriced but attractive cakes (but not tasty), had Mac and cheese and felt sick, but many folks love it. It is a gathering spot for the Whole Foods crowd.
My staff and I look forward to the start of our work day knowing that Bread Euphoria is there to provide coffee, breakfast sandwiches, and pastries. The food is fresh, healthy and delicious! We're lucky to have them close by!
It is a small and dated restaurant but the food is very good. Don't let the facade stop you from going in. The restaurant is clean. The staff is very friendly and attentive. The restaurant is clean. The food here is not your typical Chinese. More attention is paid to the preparation of better ingredients. The food tastes fresher, more authentic. We manage to come here twice a year because it's about 15 miles from home. Whenever we are in the area and we are in the mood for Chinese food we go.
Lot's of people think Great Wall is the best Chinese restaurant ever. I, for one, can't really understand why it has this reputation.  My father in law wants to eat three whenever we go out. 

I'll admit that it's better than a run of the mill Chinese restaurant and sometimes they use local vegetables but it follows the basic Chinese restaurant formula.  It's fun, a bit quirky and better than average and a lot of people seem to really like it. 

It does have a nice affordable lunch menu.
The food is good, no denying, but not worth the cost of the small portions, the fact that you will get all the way home before realizing they left stuff out of your order or got some of it wrong, and having to deal with the rudeness of the staff. Like they are doing me the favor of waiting on me....I'm doing them the favor by giving them the business, but no more. We just moved here a couple of months ago and wanted to find a good Chinese restaurant. I was hoping we had found it because of the close proximity to home, but I don't mind going a little further if we are treated with respect.
As my dad was reaching his 100th birthday, we brought him from New York City to an assisted living facility in Western Massachusetts.  While spry and fully alert, he could no longer continue on his own in his own New York apartment.  As soon as he settled in, we debated how to celebrate his centennial, the answer was easy: Chinese food.

"But," said dad, "is there Chinese food that people will enjoy up in this part of Massachusetts?".  Words wouldn't persuade him, so one day, we piled him into a car, and took off for the Great Wall.

To say that my dad was skeptical would be understatement.  "Are you taking me to a restaurant in a strip mall in Northampton, Mass. that serves Chinese food that we're going to offer to friends and family coming in from all over the United States to celebrate my 100th birthday," he asked? "Well, yes," I said, "but let's see what you think after the meal."

We were a gang of about six for this try-out dinner.  We ordered all of the fresh vegetable dishes on the Great Wall's menu.  There are farmers in western Mass. who have developed a specialty of growing oriental vegetables, and with whom the Great Wall has a close relationship.  Each of the Great Wall dishes was better than its predecessor. Dad's continuing refrain: "I've never tasted any vegetables this fresh. Ever!"  We ordered off both the "regular" and the "gourmet" menus. Each items was a triumph! Each one was fresh! Imaginative! Creative! Old favorites were presented in perfect style.  New dishes with which we weren't familiar were successes following successes!

Understand that the Great Wall is devoted to food.  It is not fancy.  Service is plain.  Lots of people order food by phone, and then drive by to pick it up to eat at home.  But, the food is outstanding! Chicken, duck, pork, lamb, beef and vegetarian dishes. One after another! Each one superb, and each one challenging our group: "Is this the best dish or was that one better?"  Each dish had its champions.  None of us disagreed.

The Great Wall does have some Chimerican dishes. Ignore them.  The Chinese food is what you're going for.  The value is terrific! Prices are fair! Portions are abundant! And special requests are honored with no mickey mouse about "Well, that will cost an additional $3.00!"

I'm not an over the top person, but for me and The Great Wall -- five chopsticks!! (There is no higher rating!!)
This was my first experience with dim sum, and I'm happy to say it happened here at Great Wall, a small, friendly place with a family feel. All we had to say - there were 6 of us - was "Yes" when asked if we wanted dim sum, and the plates began appearing. I wish I knew all the names of the various dumplings with their tasty fillings; the server pointed out which were chicken, pork or tofu, but to me they all just tasted very, very good. Steamed, except for the sesame balls and a plate of greens, so it all even tasted healthy. Good time, very good food.
Came at a quiet time, very friendly staff. Ordered curry chicken extra spicy with extra veggies. Yummy and I felt very comfortable dining alone. Lots of take out orders but dining in was OK. 
Mediocre food delivered late and cold. Never an apology. We live five minutes away from the restaurant. No excuse for one hour and ten minutes delivery time, and all food was cold. Unhappy - won't do it again. This is not the first time we have been disappointed. Slow learners, but it's the only game in town. Good excuse for poor service - no one else to call!
Great Wall is a family run Chinese Restaurant in Florence, MA, near Northampton.  They serve a special "Dim Sum" on Saturdays from 11 AM until 2 PM.  I have had Dim Sum before in Hong Kong and it is different than regular menu items.  You are offered a big variety of small portions of pork or shrimp, steamed buns etc. with tea, like a brunch.  Unfortunately we arrived after 1 o'clock and the rolling steam cart had been picked over so we didn't have too many fresh choices.  What we had was good.  Next time we will get there at 11 AM!
This place was recommended to me. I went there for takeout and was disappointed by both the food and the attitude of the owner. I tried it a second time with the same result. I gave up and found a better local Chinese restaurant.
We've been going to Clara and Ken's GREAT WALL  restaurant for several years, located in Florence MA just outside of Northampton.  Do not expect to find your usual type food as they cook specialty dishes that will make your toes curl with delight.  Whenever we head towards Boston from upstate New York, this is a MUST STOP opportunity.
This restaurant has been around for many years, and because it is in my neighborhood and because it is family owned, I do not want to write a bad review. I do want them to continue their business and do well. At the same time I wish the owners could recognize their problems and put in a little effort to improve. Many friends used to love this place. Now only the truly faithful are still visiting. Recently I visited with one of these truly faithfuls. The food is still good! But you may have to put up with (1) getting the wrong order (2) waiting for a long time for the check (3) portion is too small. But think of it this way, if you are trying to loose weight but craving for delicious food, this is your perfect place. You come here not for the "My name is so and so, I will be taking care of you tonight" type of service. You come here just for the food. The owner is a no non-sense person. She is busy and she is going to take your order fast and run away. Your food will appear and you will finish its entirety and want more - so you have to come back next time.
maybe the best in the state. but be sure to order from their small "gourmet" menu. Stuffed Tofu, Dragon skin, fabulous pan-fried talapia -- and their dim-sum on Saturdays is something very special.
We were looking for a new Chinese restaurant and came upon Great Wall. We were seated right away in a booth. It filled up quite quickly after we were deleted. I prefer the Wonton soup for an appetizer and my husband ordered the Scallion Pancake. My soup was just ok, nothing special. The scallion Pancake however was very good. I would be sure to sample that if we are evert to return.  For the meal I had the meal of sesame chicken rice and an egg roll. All good and fresh. My husband got theCrispy Crackling Aromatic Roasted Pork. He said that it was very good and he was very happy with his choice. The waitress never asked if we wanted something to drink so we just had the tea and water that they searched with the meal. 
As part of a monthly Girls' Night, my friends and I come to eat here every month.  While the decor is a little "vintage traditional" - the food is stellar.  The employees are very friendly and the people in the kitchen obviously know their stuff!  So much so that the girls and I have stopped wandering.  The plan to  "eat our way through the menu" is under suspension because we get our favorites most of the time.  In he end - the food is the real deal - not what I term "fast food chinese"...
They have a traditional menu as well as a gourmet menu for even MORE traditional asian delicacies.  You will love anything from either menu. 

The Great Wall serves dim sum on SATURDAYS ONLY from 11-2:30. It is idiosyncratic, full of surprises, very very fresh, local whenever possible  and totally wonderful. The place attracts families and Asian college students who eat and eat and eat for remarkably reasonable prices. Two of us stuffed ourselves for $27!

Service is always somewhat chaotic --an inscrutable mix of a rolling steamer cart, a buffet table and food ordered from the kitchen. I have never managed to figure out the drill, but we keep making the one hour drive from Vermont because the food is so very good and there is always something interesting we never had anywhere else. The service, a friendly family affair, is always gracious and warm. When Mom says "thank you for coming," I am rather touched.

In addition to the Saturday's dim sum, the restaurant's claim to fame is its separate Gourmet Menu. I rarely get beyond their awesome soups and the chef's signature Dragon Skins (stuffed tofu skins -- and I basically hate tofu but this dish is fabulous). The husband gets occasional uncontrollable yearnings for another unique dish in which pork and veg are kind of steam cooked in a clay pot. 

I have only given it a four rating because it is indeed as shabby as others have mentioned and because of the confusing dim sum service but the food is some of the best anywhere!
The food in great wall was deli
today i went there with my kids.
my kids like the Chinese dumplings, because  it is soft and tasty for kids 
This is good, real food. The location is humble but food is authentic. We more often order for takeout and that seems the norm. But dining in is fine and some dishes are best eaten in the dining room. Our favorite Chinese restaurant. 
When we saw the "Chinese-American Food" sign over the door of this place in a run-down strip mall in western Massachusetts, we were, to say the least, wary.  But don't let that scare you. What came out of the kitchen was some of the best Cantonese food we have had outside of China.  We ordered from the "gourmet menu" exclusively—we're not into chicken fingers and spare ribs.  Go elsewhere for those.  We started with Dragon Skin made with layers of tofu skin and ground meats and shrimp.   It was surrounded by perfectly prepared, bright green al dente broccoli.  
We followed this with stuffed eggplant—again perfectly coked, soft and creamy without being mushy; and stuffed tofu over a layer of sautéed bok choy, prepared with a stuffing similar to the eggplant but different enough in taste and texture to keep the meal from being boring.  
The only weak dish was sautéed watercress: The tough stems were left on, and the leaves were overcooked.  
Like much Cantonese food, the sauces were prepared with sugar but happily not in the amounts that seemed to be used in so many Chinese restaurants.
Service was attentive and thoughtful—important when you have a six year old along.
Ambience is bit dark and dreary but cozy, reminding us of the old time Cantonese restaurants from the 1950s.  I far prefer this to the brightly lighted and highly mirrored.
We'll definitely go back.
The food at this rather shabby restaurant has gone from mediocre to bad to worse. The management is completely incompetent, and the waitstaff seems to operate in a daze, perplexed by every question or request that comes their way. We decided to give the place one last try this evening (after staying away for over a year) and that was it. The food took over an hour to arrive (and was cold when it did) and our order was screwed up. I can't imagine that this place will stay in business much longer.
Warm, hearty dishes! Strange atmosphere but wonderful service. Don't be fooled by the awkward strip-mall location; you'll have a delicious homestyle meal here. Great for sharing and for Chinese New Year!
After discovering another Florence cafe didn't offer gluten free options on their sandwiches, I discovered Sunrise Over Florence.  I wavered between the salmon burger and the portabello sandwich, and picked salmon.  The gluten free bread isn't fancy but it's good. The salmon was cooked correctly and came with lettuce and cucumber and topped with a dill mayonnaise that could have used more dill, but it is January, so I understand.  Also included were a few potato chips and a nice dill pickle spear.  For the money, a very good lunch and no parking hassle like downtown. Nice friendly atmosphere. Good looking cookies, too, but they weren't gluten-free, of course. I'd go back.
I'm gluten-free...and the GF crust is the best I've ever had (not grain-y!). For years we've been bringing out-of-town friends and family to show off this great local place (and the other locations too!)...and they are always impressed. Well worth the price and always fresh, filling and tasty, tasty, tasty!
The chicken and salmon were excellent- especially for a catered event.  The pasta was a little dry but the salad and vegetables were delicious. Of course the Pizza was devoured first.  The portions were big and the prices very reasonable. I would definitely get catering from there again or just go to have Pizza.  
Just arrived in area, it was late and most places were closed.  Fortunately Hillsode was open and had some pizza still available.  What they call a slice is about a quarter pizza.  I was hungry and it was good pizza, great combination.  Reasonable price and good food.
This place is great for its casual atmosphere, friendly service, and fresh pizza. Salads are good also. Note that there's no bar service.
Amazingly wholesome food! My family does both take-out and eat-in, about every couple of weeks. I honesty cannot get pizza, wraps, or salads anywhere else now, simply because I'm spoiled from eating here. You WILL NOT get better service from anywhere else; it's such a friendly atmosphere. 
Prices are quite reasonable...in fact, they're VERY reasonable, considering everything is super fresh and organic. You can't go wrong by choosing Hillside Organic Pizza.

Once, we took my husband's aunt and uncle here to eat. They though we were perhaps taking them to "just another pizza joint". They were pleasantly surprised that that wasn't the case.
I've had pizza, wraps and salads never been disappointed. Food is great and if Jill made cupcakes their awesome too!     I've eaten here since they opened, they also cater my mothers tea party and friends wedding always great service and food
I've been going here for several years and LOVE the pizza and salads. You will not be disappointed dining here!
Pizza was yummy every time we go there. I also love the fact that everything is organic. The butternut squash pizza is the best pizza overall that I have ever tasted.
Love having lunch here. Fresh and delicious pizza, wraps, generous salads and more. Take some pizza home! It's yummy!
The best Pizza I have ever had… I am a pizza snob… My favorite is the kalimatta olive and feta.  Crust is not too thin and to too thick, just perfect…. 
Fresh, Organic, they give back to the community all the time. I usually get the chicken pesto pizza but the salads are very good too. They have gluten free crust too! I will often get the take and bake pizza for the weekend. The thin crust is just right, crunchy but not dry. Wish the hours were longer - sometimes I just miss them to get food. But I understand. 
Not many places in Bernadston to eat. Thank you HIllside Pizza. Great service and wide variety of items. Everything is real fresh and they are very accomodating.
I admit to trying Hillside Pizza 5-6 times before finally writing this review. It's rare that I'm conflicted for that long, but there are so many plusses and minuses that I'll just lay them out and you can decide for yourself.

On the plus side -

1. Fresh, locally-sourced ingredients
2. Outstanding, tasty gourmet pizzas, salads, and wraps
3. Friendly, knowledgeable, and courteous staff

On the minus side -

1. The standard build-your-own pizzas don't come loaded with toppings, making them expensive for what you get
2. No beer, wine, appetizers, calzones, or grinders
3. Somewhat limited hours and no delivery

To expand on some of the above...

Hillside Pizza really does have some of the tastiest gourmet pizzas, salads, and wraps you'll find anywhere. The gourmet pizza combinations are creative and unique, but there are only 6 options. That said, you probably won't find them anywhere else and they're all very good. The pesto pizzas are a personal favorite. They also offer whole wheat and gluten-free options. The wraps are a great value for the price. However, Hillside doesn't offer appetizers, grinders, or calzones. In a nutshell, they do what they do extremely well, but I wish they would expand that to more offerings. Hours are somewhat limited, as they are open 12-7 on Wednesday & Sunday and 11-8 on Thursday, Friday, and Saturday. Bernardston is no metropolis, I get it, but it would be nice to be able to pick up a pizza until 9, especially in the summer.

Since there is a very cozy seating area, I think Hillside Pizza would be well-served to start offering beer and wine. With all the local wineries and craft breweries, this seems like it would fit in perfectly with the niche market they're going for. There have been several visits where a glass or two of a good wine would have complemented the gourmet pizzas I got perfectly.

If I could give Hillside Pizza 3 1/2 stars, that's what I'd do, but I'm erring on the low side because to me, despite all the great things they do, they could be doing so much more within the same business model.
I had the gluten-free crust (not due to any health issues, just a preference) with turkey sausage, cheese, tomato, and pesto.  It was delicious!  Staff is always pleasant.
Finally got here. Yummy. Great local ambience. Kind family style service. Right by highway. Good prices yet local foods and organic. Don't you dare go to a chain restaurant!  Where locals eat!
Hillside is a one of a kind place. Organic, fresh ingredients. They even offer gluten free. The best deal for us, is their "take and bake". They make your pizza, but you bake it at home. Comes on this handy oven safe tray for baking. Comes out perfect every time!

Our friends used them to cater their wedding, and I can't say enough about the food and their service. They prepared several salads, meat dishes, veggie dishes and of course pizza! I would not hesitate to use them for any event I might hold. 

Along with being great pizzas, the owners are true Humanitarians working closely with local fund raisers. Their Mission Statement is: 

We are…
A restaurant, fundraising company, and catering operation with a focus on sustainable and responsible business practices.

We believe…
That quality foods and a clean environment create thriving communities.

We strive…
To provide great-tasting, high-quality, and healthful foods to people in our communities.

Check out their website for their three occasion.
fresh, flavorful, gluten-free options, more than just pizza, often locally sourced, some unusual combos like pumpkin in the fall
We stopped here for the first time after visiting the Kringle Candle Co.  We went in for lunch and were one of the only tables in there.  It is very simple inside which is fine!  The young hostess/waitress was very attentive and friendly.  the pizza was amazing!  Loved the big pepperonis and all of the topping/sauce choices.  Enjoyed the unique crust.  The small pizza was more than enough for my boyfriend and me.  They also serve slices which is wonderful!  Would recommend!
I am very committed to seeking out quality food when feeding my family, not just for taste but for nutrition. When it comes to pizza one could easily generalize it as junk food but Hillside Pizza uses fresh, local, high quality ingredients in all of their menu offerings. We tend to choose pizza for our family over their delicious wraps and salads (something the adults frequently choose on our own) and are never disappointed. Our family deals with allergy and dietary restrictions and they offer vegan toppings, allergy avoidance when notified, and the option for a "take and bake" where we can pick up a pizza of our choice to bake at home or freeze for a later date. Not only is their food excellent but they specialize in fundraisers for community groups and support local special needs organizations. They stock interesting beverages and have unique desserts and fresh cookies available on most days.I HIGHLY recommend! A casual atmosphere with only moderate seating but the friendly staff is very polite and accommodating so I've never minded an occasional wait.
One of the best pizzas around, aside from Village Pizza.  The crust is what I think makes the pizza amazing.  I like a thin crispy crust and this did not disappoint!!  Lots of toppings and combinations to choose from.  Staff are very friendly!!
Eight of us stopped for lunch.  Even though the place is small, a table was pulled up to a booth so we could all sit together.  Great service and good food.  We could not believe the size of the pizza slices and the variety of toppings available. The small salad was much bigger than expected and loaded with veggies.  The lunch specials were very reasonable.  We would definitely come here again!
We attended the US Canoe Association's National canoe races and we were not familiar with the  area.  We were looking for a particular restaurant and we found this place after we turned the wrong way.  I ordered a slice of pizza that came with a bowl of soup, hot rolls and soft drink for less than $6.00.  Everything was good.  My husband was equally impressed with his 2 slices of pizza and beer.  Service was fast and friendly.  We wanted to go back the next day but we were attending a fund-raising dinner at some local school.
I will definitely go back if I were in the area again.  Great food and a bargain!
My parents ate here two nights ago and recommended to us. My family ate here last night. The place is clean, the staff was pleasant, the owner wanted to know if we were happy with our meals which were nice sized portions and reasonably priced. We will certainly be back and recommend to others.
Looking for good place to eat in the area and this was recommended..  They were quite busy and we showed up with 6 people.  Could not get seat but owner offered take out or a long wait.  We elected the takeout and went back to house.

Everything was great, I enjoyed my spaghetti and others has several other dishes.  Bread and rolls were great side.  We will all be back next time we are in the area
     We were traveling - Stayed just down the road at Travelers Wood's RV Park - checked Trip Advisor, located this pizzeria. Made a call - gentleman explained specials & prices quickly - we ordered Two 18" pizzas - 1- Hawaiian and 1 pepperoni with extras cheese - couple large bottles of pop about $40. But it served 10 people plus plenty left over.
       Pizza was excellent - great find will repeat next time in the area. 
Antonio's 2.  Always has hearty slices and a great choice of craft beers on tap.  If its IPAs you like they always have a great variety.  The prices are very reasonable and you get an extra 5% off with cash.  A slice and a beer around $6. Such a deal.
We have had both pizza and grinders form Antonio's  Too several times.  We have never been disappointed in the food, service or the frendly staff !   Good food, good prices !
So my wife and I have this "thing". When we go to our school's basketball team "away" games, we like to have dinner at a "local" establishment on the way home. We prefer the small "Mom & Pop" places. So driving home from a game in Bernardston, we stopped at Antonio's II. 

My wife got her favorite dish, Eggplant Parmesan, and I got a small one-topping pizza. We get this combination quite often at our favorite spot near our house. I use our favorite spot to rate almost all similar spots.

It's funny, but both my wife and I agreed on every aspect of our initial visit to Antonio's II. Very good but not great. However, the prices were so good you can't help but go back!!!

I don't remember the prices exactly, but the Eggplant dinner was something like 7.99 and my small (14 INCH!) one-topping pizza was like $8.00. 

Our families live just off I-91 in Vermont and New Hampshire... which means we drive through Bernardston OFTEN. WE WILL BE BACK!
If you want pizza, try Hillside Pizza just down the road from this god awful establishment. If Hillside is closed, drive to Greenfield (Mag Pie or Athens), Brattleboro (Hazel), or Keene (Romano's). 

If you prefer to get verbally abused in person or even on the phone, this place is fantastic. The owner, THE OWNER!, gets off on yelling at you, forcing you to make decisions because he doesn't have time for you to "dilly dally", has no business ethics, and apparently based on is behavior was abused as a child. 

And on top of that, if that wasn't exciting enough, the pizza tastes like it came out of a can. Go somewhere else. This place doesn't deserve your business. 

(This review is based off of multiple visits....its not the first time I've encounter this...the first time I just thought he was having a bad day and didn't really cook the food enough)
I did not know this place was part of the greenfield's Antonio's when I ordered my pizza,only when I started to eat did I suspect that the two were one in the same.
The pizza is always made with fresh ingrediants and I have never been disappointed,I have taken my grandchildren here and they love it,the owner is a hoot and makes your stay there fun.
My wife likes the pasta and always comes back for more.
Great Pizza, been going to the original one since I was a kid.  Now this one is closer to home and I never leave with an empty stomach.  Good selection of beers also
Loved this place. Came highly recommended from the owner over at the Inn at Crumpin Fox. We had the Kickin Chickin pizza which was to die for. Great selection of brews on tap that they let up sample several before we made our final choice. The owner was a hoot. Lot of fun. 
Great Pizza! Prompt delivery and very affordable. Fresh ingredients and unique and delicious specialty pies.
I admit to being very pleasantly surprised by the quality of the food at Antonio's II. I've tried several of their specialty pizzas as well as a few "build your own" combinations, and I've never been disappointed. The pizzas always come loaded with toppings, the sauce is flavorful, and the crust is cooked just right - not too thin but not overly chewy either. An added bonus is that the pizza reheats really well... it doesn't turn into a soggy, sloppy mess, which is great because I always end up with leftovers. The "small" pizzas at Antonio's II are 14", and at $10.00 for a 2-item combination, the prices can't be beat either. 

I've found the grinders to be fresh and tasty as well, with plenty of meat and generous toppings, and Antonio's II offers micro- and craft-brews on tap and by the bottle if you'd like to have a beer or two while you enjoy your meal there. 

Oh, and if you pay cash and pick up your order yourself, you get a 5% discount. Who offers that anymore?
As the only place bernardston ma it's a average place. This time I went in and had ok service because the owner was not there at the time. The owner is a horrible person to deal with. At that time of night didn't feel like going to greenfield for pizza.   
Four of us ate lunch there.  My wife and I ordered the soup and salad combo for about $5.00 each.  The soup was chicken noodle and the salads were good sized with lots of variety in them.  I would order that again if I did go back.  The other two had the cheese pizza, which was large but they thought wasn't that great.  You order at the counter, so it is hard to really judge the service.  Food was delivered quickly and the woman who took our orders was friendly and nice.  So I would rate the service good.  So overall, it was not bad, but not really good enough to make me want to go back.
I see in the reviews that their customer service sucks. Well it could be better but the pizza rocks. Great pie and good beer so sometimes yA gotta suck it up. 
The pizza might be good but the hospitality is horrendous. Wouldn't suggest ordering from here unless you want to; be verbally assaulted, hung up on, or even threatened to come to your house to fight. Terrible business ethic. Spend your hard earned money elsewhere. Wrote this same review on his Facebook page and he openly admitted to threatening my family and tried justifying it as well as continuing to insult me when I never once insulted him and only made valid points. Save you and your family from being treating unnecessarily and get Domino's or Hillside Pizza.
Pizza place close to home and the owner answers the call to place delivery and is horrible.  Food is good but how good can food be with such negative energy in the place.  Clean it up and I might be back otherwise good luck!
Incredibly rude.  Abruptly told me I had to hold on. Told me the grill was closed a half hour before closing. He was extremely rude and interrupted me repeatedly. I will never go back.
Delicious!   Fresh and tasty.  Kids and adult approved.  Good menu, great service. Delightful staff. Fast service. I also catered an event and Was able to do everything through email.  Impressed with how well everything went and fresh ingredients. 
This pizza crust is my favorite of all time.  Thin, crunchy and not overpowered by cornmeal (yuck!).  The assiago-pesto sauce is to die for.  A truly grown-up taste.  A nice variety of toppings.  Hillside also has great wraps and salads.  One of their great features is the take and bake.  It lets you bring it home and bake it there...very nice when you live a distance from the restaurant, which is easy to do in western Mass.  Their fundraising programs are also excellent and raise a ton of money for local causes.  You rock, Hillside.
Delicious, fresh pizza right off Rte 91. They offer slices as well as pies. There is usually a daily slice special, and it's usually terrific and wholesome. The salads are also tasty and fresh. They pay a lot of attention to getting fresh, local ingredients. The service is friendly and casual. And fast. Note that they do NOT have an alcohol license. Further note: They ARE now open Monday nights, though some online resources still list them as closed that day.
This is a great addition to small town Bernardston. The salads and pizza selection is vast. The atmosphere is inviting and the house special pizzas are very creative. 

I have also enjoyed the option to take a pre-made bake at home pizza as well. Great spot right off of RT 91! 
Accidentally stopped here because of road construction on I-91 in western MA.  This is a restaurant,  a fundraising company, and a catering operation with a focus on sustainable and responsible business practices.  They happen to also have delicious pizza.

The business model includes helping to create a clean environment and a thriving community.

Google this company to learn more about people putting great ideas into action.  How refreshing to have the bottom line involve helping others versus getting as much profit as possible.
Popped in here for a coffee on our way down to Connecticut. What a surprise inside, the owners hard at work making meat pies in full view of us. Heaving with meat in each one! And so friendly too.....they were only too happy to have a chat with us & put us on the right road on our further travels. The young lady who served us was most pleasant and helpful too. We took an apple pie home & had it that night. Wonderful,  lots of real apple filling & a really nice pastry. Overall a nice stop.
The coffee wasn't bad either!
I am sad to say that I gave this bakery cafe a sincere try, really thinking I had just picked off times for baked goods and food selections, but this last visit just put me over the edge because they advertised "strawberry rhubarb pie" on their signature black board that tells what has been baked that day.....Well, strawberry rhubarb pie is one of my absolute favorites!!  I love the sweet and tart combination of the fruit and the stalks of rhubarb, but my husband and I could not even choke down one bite, it was so chemically tasting, AND there was not one single strawberry in the entire pie.  We composted the entire pie....The more I thought about the three disappointing visits, I thought I definitely had to commit to warning others about this FAUX bakery.  Even Stop and Shop Bakery items are better than this place.
My wife had the Rueban with waffle fries, loved it.
I had the Turkey Club.
Turkey was tasty and fresh, my only gripe, which a lot of places do, is the bacon was precooked  turning it into a rubber band, when you bite into it the whole piece of bacon comes out with half in your mouth and the other half flapping against your chin. Not a pretty sight.
Located in Bernardston, Ma, right off Rt. 91 at Exit 28, take Rt 10 North for about 1.5 mi. the the Crumpin-Fox Country Club where Zekes grill is located. If you want a rack of ribs with meat done so it falls off the bone try Zekes! The outside dining area overlooks the golf course.
We wanted to go somewhere close to our hotel and this was the only game in town.  So we decided to give it a try.......our suggestion is to pass it by!
I always hate giving bad reviews, but I guess that is one way they can try and improve.....so here goes....
Service was SLOW!  There were three tables with customers and only 3 people at the bar, including us.  There was only one bartender and one waitress working.  We received drinks about 15 minutes into sitting down at the bar.  I had the cajun shrimp......and it was sent back due to the fact that the shrimp tasted like they had 5000mg of sodium in each one.  It was not edible.  My husband had the ribs and they were just ok.  They did comp the shrimp and apologized.  The meal took rather long to arrive as well.......................I hope they improve becasue although it was hot and stuffy, the building was very nice.
This place is located at the Crumpin-Fox golf course.   While the food that is served is pretty good, the menu is limited and seemed more of what I would consider a lunch menu rather than a dinner menu.  The staff was very friendly and responsive.   The outside deck has a very nice view of the 18th green.
Nach einer netten Runde Golf wollte ich noch was essen und da das Zeke's direkt am Golfplatz liegt fiel die Wahl darauf und ich wurde nicht enttäuscht. Die Chicken Wings waren die besten die ich je hatte. Ich hatte halbe/halbe BBQ und Knoblauch/Parmesan ein Traum. Und da der Smoker so gute Resultate bei den Wings lieferte habe ich noch ein paar Spareribs genommen. Man darf keine Haute Cousine erwarten, aber wir bewegen uns hier weit oberhalb von einfachem Pub Food. Dazu gab es leckeres lokale Bier aus South Deerfield. Und preislich völlig im Rahmen, geradezu billig.
We came to the restaurant as a place for a family reunion. It was central to all the families.  The hospitality was great.  The food selection was fine. However, I had to add salt and pepper to enhance the taste, and some other condiments to flavor the food. I notice that the others in our party had to do the same in enhancing their menus. The ambiance and old style restaurant made up for the difference. Oh yes! The Pancakes were very good with the Vermont Maple Syrup.
Second visit (6/6/16), still a good place to stop and this time I got lucky with 1 of the 2 handicap spots. (This time I noticed it's a popular spot for seniors.) Wife said the Ruben was "pretty good" (she's a tougher critic than I am). Fries & slaw still very good as was my stuffed tuna roll. The only drawback is that I've become very salt conscious and tuna salad is VERY salty. Was busier than the last time but was seated right away & service was good. Prices still very reasonable. Would go again.
I've eaten here on numerous occasions over the years. Its a comfortable atmosphere thats a combo of a loved mom and pop cafe, with your favorite local Irish pub. The food is your standard american diner style fare, but really well made and tasty. If you want something that feels like your mom cooked it for you, this is the place. Wait staff has always been friendly to me over the years, with just that right balance of checking up on you. but not feeling intrusive.  If your looking for a nice casual place, this is where you want to be.
I don't get there often but I am glad to drive 65 miles for their seafood platter featuring the best fried scallops ever. Their rolls are excellent and they also have great steaks. All the New England dishes like pot roast for example are also good. Quality of food for the price is as good as it gets. 
this restaurant provided our meals, as guests at Inn at Crumpin-Fox...Very unique arrangement...every morning our food was made and delivered by 4 Leaf Clover chef...our lunch to go was ready for us and when we came back from our daily adventure, 4 leaf Clover was awaitin us  w/mouth-watering meals...
This is a very casual restaurant with fabulous lobster rolls- not expected from the more casual, diner look. The food is good and reasonably priced. The pies are delicious.  You must order dessert when you are there!
This well-worn restaurant has served generations of people from the area as well as those passing by.  The staff is friendly and the food is traditional...good not great!
The menu here is not innovative, just solid and middle-of-the-road.  Staff is capable, but not distinctive (in either direction).  Their Dead-band period (10:30 to 11:00 AM break between breakfast and lunch) is unusual, but realistic and allows clean shift-change and menu conversion, so good focus when lunch starts.
First off, my family and I have patronized this restaurant for the last 30 years.  We have watched it become shabbier and the cleanliness drop in recent years but have continued to go there as we like to support local business.  Last night I stopped for a bite around 5.
After waiting for some time, the hostess finally came back. I asked to sit in the dining room as I am no longer able to sit at the counter.  I was taken to a table right next to the steps leading to the rest room.  I told the hostess that I preferred not to sit there and asked to sit in the booth next to the table.  I was told " you have to sit here".  I was not offered another choice even though there were many empty tables available.  The hostess then disappeared.  I waited about 10 minutes for her to come back so that I could request another place, she never did.  Finally the waitress came over. I know she recognized me as she has served me many times.  In a very loud voice, she said "you have to move". I explained that I didn't want to sit next to the stairs. Again no offer of another space just it's our policy, you can't sit there. It didn't make sense to me since they put me at a table set up for 4 and the booth was only set up for 2. But the waitress was so unpleasant about it I just walked out. Today I called and spoke with the owners wife.  Her only response was "well it's our policy".  So after being a loyal customer for
over 30 years, my family and I will never go there again.  Apparently they don't realize that the key to success for local establishments is customer service.
1st choice in Brattleboro was mobbed so kept going to Four Leaf Clover Rest. It was worth it. Got there about 1:30, adequate parking with 2 handicap spots (both filled). Parked @ side door with longer walk to dinning room. Place was clean. People at table next to us was really enjoying their meal My wife had the large chicken salad sub with no sides - said it was OK but not the best she;d had. I had the daily special double cheeseburger which was cooked very nice. The cold slaw was also good and the fries were great - little or no salt, The service was prompt & friendly and the prices accross the menu were great. Very happy with my meal and would go again.
Stopped after golf. First time there. Very surprised. Good food. Many beers to chose from. Its where the locals go, and I know why.
Four Leaf Clover has been one of  my favorite restaurants ever since I went there with my father over thirty years ago.  I grew up about ten miles north, in Southern VT, but now live near Washington, DC, where family style restaurants like this one are impossible to find.  Whenever I head north to visit friends or family, I make it a point to stop by for lunch.  I tend to order seafood, since they excel in it's preparation, and the portions are generous, to say the least.  The wait staff are unfailingly friendly and attentive. If you want a meal like Mom used to make (or maybe wished she could make), I can't recommend Four Leaf Clover highly enough. My one complaint is that they frequently post pictures of their food on Facebook, which to me is akin to torture. I am looking forward to my next visit. I can almost taste it.
We were headed to Kringle Candle around noon time, but found ourselves wanting a meal first. Seeing several cars in the parking lot, we assumed this was a popular place and decided to give a try. We bypassed the counter seating and headed for the table area, and waited to be seated. A bit to our surprise, we were taken all the way to the back of the restaurant, which was an actual addition that had been built many years earlier. With the exception of an elderly couple seated in a booth, we found ourselves quite alone....not a problem, just odd given that we passed several empty tables on the way.
     A friendly and cheerful waitress soon arrived and within minutes she had served us drinks and taken our order. We ordered sandwiches (a rueben and a turkey club), both of which were served up very quickly. Our fries were fresh, hot and tasty, and both sandwiches were quite delicious. As we were enjoying our meals, a group of 6 more customers were brought into the room and were seated at a long table directly adjacent to ours....Here is where the "BUT...." part started.
     Within a minute or two of the group having been seated, my wife's bare ankles began to be bitten by some sort of insect(s)!! The biting became so severe that we quickly finished our meals and left. Once in our car, I observed about a dozen small bite marks on my wife's ankles and watched her scratch at them in an attempt to relieve the severe itching that was going in. Raised welts were clearly visible. 
     Exactly what happened is a mystery to us, but we do know that within a minute or so of the 6 people being seated (2 normal looking adult couples and 2 college age kids ), the biting started. My best explanation is that the 6 pairs of feet must have stirred up some little critters that had been nestled in the carpet. The carpet was old and soiled, and this is the only plausible reason I can come up with, unless those people mysteriously brought something in with them.....????? A very unusual and somewhat disturbing experience to say the least!!!
       The waitress was great, the food tasty and delicious, and the prices were quite reasonable. BUT..... a nice lunch time dining experience that was mysteriously spoiled by gnats, fleas or the like that suddenly appeared and had their own little feast on my wife's ankles.
       Would we eat their again ????? We probably would, but would surely request to be seated in a much different area of the restaurant just to feel better.
      I hesitated to even write any review at all, but given what happened to us, I thought it best to be write what honestly happened and let others be aware of our experience, should something similar happen again in the future.
I have been coming to the Four Leaf for years suggested by my mom who has been coming since she was a teenager. My favorite has always been their baked lasagna. A friend of mine took me out for dinner and while baked lasagna was just as good as usual. There were alot of concerns and issues that need to be noted So I will be putting down a list of the Pro's and Con's of the Four Leaf Clover 

Pros
Their baked lasagna Is mouth watering and the best I ever had 

Service was fast and prompt

They gave me a Free sponge cake because it had been my birthday and encouraged all the parton's in joining in to sing happy birthday

Cons
The appetizer's of fries and mozzarella sticks  were very poor Fries were tasteless and mozzarella sticks hardly had any cheese in them.

My friend and I were trying to have a conversation but couldn't hear each other across the table mind you because two servers were near by and talking to one another so loudly it drowned out the conversation I was having with my friend.

My friend said their food was tasteless

Ate a little bit of the salad that came with the  baked lasagna but it was mostly an assortment of vegetables over Iceberg lettuce.

My advice the Four Leaf Owners need to work on the mentioned issues and bring back the Four Leaf Clover to being the best Restaurant that I remember


We've tried many Diners in our travels, and although The 4 Leaf Clover is a full restaurant, the food is old time traditional Diner at its best! Don't miss the homemade soups, from Turkey Rice to Corn Chowder, all excellent and never "leftover muddles". Wide variety of daily specials, plus large regular menu. Waitstaff are quick and friendly, always time for a smile. Best eggsalad ever and extremely reasonable prices.
A wonderful good old New England American food place. Nothing fancy, just basic "diner" food prepared really well with large portions. Lots of locals and a real welcoming atmosphere.
I had the classic fried clam strips and my wife had the lasagna. Both were very good. Exactly what we expected from a very casual place. Surprisingly, they had a great selection of local microbrewery beers both in bottles and on tap.
The service was excellent, fast and friendly.
It is not far off I-91 and would make a great stop while passing through the area.
We have stopped here twice in the past year while Christmas shopping at nearby Kringle Candle. The food is great. I had a doublecheeseburg special and my wife had a reuben. Absolutly outstanding! Our waiter was PJ. His customer service skills were great. He was friendly and prompt. If you're up near Bernardston, give this place a try. It's great
We eat here about once a month, and always have a good meal !  Good home cooked food, pleasant atmosphere.
We had dinner here using good reviews from trip advisor as a guide. They had a wide variety of choices on the menu. The food was very good, prices reasonable and great service. This is not a fancy place, but if you want good food this is a super choice.
We stayed at the Inn at Crumpin Fox where the food was prepared and served by the Four Leaf Clover Restaurant. The owner/cook Mark was awesome. The service for his staff was outstanding.  The food was great quantity and quality. They helped to make our trip a huge success. 
I had called the day before my husband's birthday to ask if we needed reservations. I told the woman who answered that we would be there around 6:30, and there would be between 4-8 people. She said no reservations were necessary, it was quiet on Tuesday evenings. We all arrived at around the same time, between 6:25-6:40 pm. We all got out and walked all around the place. It was closed up tight, and it looked as though they hadn't even opened that day. We ended up driving to the 99 Restaurant in Greenfield, and they accommodated us. It was just so inconvenient. A couple of people drove all the way up from Amherst, 3 from Erving and one from Montague. We just live in Greenfield, so it wasn't a HUGE drive for nothing, but it was my husband's birthday, and I wanted to surprise him with some place different for his birthday. He's been curious about the place for a long time. Well now we've seen the place, I guess that's all I need to know.
This is the restaurant in the club house at Crumpin Fox Golf Club.  It is pub food.  The staff is incredible, very fun group of people that enjoy their job.  The steak sandwich is better than anything you can find in Phili.  The hamburger is a half pounder and my friend raved about it.  Eat on the patio.  We ordered food at the turn and were rushed so they delivered the food to us on the 10th green.  It doesn't get any better than that.
Great service at this restaurant and the food was well prepared and pretty good. Pub style menu Burgers and salads.We sat on the deck and watched others play. Very nice atmosphere if you play golf.
I went for luncheon with a group of 15 people.  We were accomodated - with tables being moved so that we could semi-sit together.  Food was excellent - onion rings are very good and I saw a spionach salad that looked great.  This place is worth a little drive off the beatenpath.
Best outdoor seating in these parts!  Menu has lots of great options.  Portions are very generous.  Nice to have a place nearby to have a drink or causal meal & have space to sit outside.
The food and service and ambience were all excellent.  (I had a pork chop.)  However, I wish we had gotten there a half hour or more earlier, because the restaurant is connected to a shop that looks really interesting.  However, it was closing as we arrived, so all we had time to buy was a couple of greeting cards.  We'll have to go back and get there earlier.
The best part about this restaurant is the decor.... It's very well done and a comfortable setting to enjoy dinner... The service was friendly, and the food was pretty good...
My wife and I decided to try The Farm Table out after we heard good things about it from her co-worker.  We got there and the ambiance seemed pretty intimate once we were seated, however, the large dead fly on the ledge of the window adjacent to our table was a little off putting for such a purportedly fancy establishment.  We got the corn bread as the appetizer and that was the only highlight of the meal.  It was flavored with garlic, butter and hot pepper and was quite good.  For entrees, my wife ordered the Natural Chicken and I ordered the Whole Wheat Pasta special. The chicken was a little dry and lacking flavor for $27.00.  My whole wheat pasta had some good flavor combinations including feta cheese, figs and roasted tomatoes but the whole thing was ruined by the gelatinous ball of wheat pasta under all of the other components.  We decided to finish the meal with the Chocolate Chip Cookie that comes in a small cast iron skillet. The vanilla milkshake that accompanied the cookie was actually pretty good, but the cookie was very dry!  All in all, my wife and I agree that it was a lackluster meal and that we will not be returning since there are so many other places in our area that offer fine food worthy of the higher price tag.
We love coming to Kringle Candle and finally decided to have lunch at the Farm Table on site at Kringle and we are glad we did.  We came for lunch and everything was outstanding from the friendly staff to the outstanding food and the atmosphere. Yes it is a tad expensive, but I would consider this fine dining and it's what I would expect to pay for the experience so I don't consider it to be out of range of what I would pay.  If your looking for fast, less expensive then this isn't the place for you. If your looking for a quaint, quiet good meal then sit down and enjoy. My GF daughter absolutely loves the food here as well.
Last minute booking for dinner, we were welcomed and quickly shown to our table. The meals we chose were all prepared well and presented nicely and we all agreed very tasty. The service was attentive and the ambiance casual and warm. We agreed that the overall cost was a touch too high for the location - not the big city.
Really is a beautiful place: manicured gardens, cute gift shops. They grow their own herbs and some seasonal veggies, like lettuce and tomatoes. Interesting menu, but pricy for what you get, compared to other nice restaurants in the area. Service was slow, even tho the place was not full. They refused to separate the bill (there were 4 couples, one very elderly), in spite of the fact that their receipt was organized in a very confusing manner. Left me with a bad taste in my mouth.
So glad we had brunch at The Farm Table! The place is very cozy, the staff is so attentive and efficient, and the food is great. All local fresh ingredients nicely prepared.
Fabulous meal and service. Beautifully decorated, intimate, cozy restaurant. Great little spaces such as outside fire pits with bar service, beautiful bar area, cozy, fireside dining. Food and drinks were fantastic. Service excellent. Def worth the drive! 
We recently visited for lunch, and though there were quite a few people enjoying their meals, it was by no means packed. But it took a long time for our food to arrive. (Maybe that's considered "rush hour" for tiny Bernardston, MA!) My caesar salad was not the best I've had: brown pieces of lettuce tucked under the fresher lettuce. They should've left them out. My daughter's chicken strips were nicely fried and not greasy, as were the french fries. And though it was very fatty, the porchetta BLT was a great idea that was absolutely delicious, thanks in part to the tomatoes they grow right on the property. The Farm Table's on a beautiful piece of real estate, and it was a nice break from a long road trip. But there were inconsistencies.
A nice place to stop and rest for a while. Nice premises, warm staff and very good quality food. Wood Oven Flatbread is a must.
Friendly waitstaff - very knowledgeable and professional. Delicious food! Lovely atmosphere. We go for special occasions and have done their Easter brunch buffet 3 years in a row - outstanding!
We have been coming to the Farm Table for quite some time. We have celebrated birthdays, anniversaries, and romantic lunches and dinners there. It is consistently excellent. Food is varied for everyone. They also have gluten free items.  The staff is lovely and gracious.
The prices for such good food and ambiance is very fair.
Do yourself a favor and enjoy Kringle Kandle while there. It is lovely, but difficult to leave without a lovely purchase.
Enjoy.
Great food & great service. Farm fresh & local produce make this place a must visit if you're in the area or passing through!! 
Whether you are interested in Kringle Candles or not, the Farm Table is well work a stop for lunch or dinner. The menu offers unique take on many standards using locally sourced ingredients. The atmosphere is casual and comfortable. Its easy to reach off I-91 in a pretty area.
We went there as a family party of six.  They don't allow split checks, and they add 20% gratuity to large parties, both of which are fine with us.  The menu is somewhat limited, but they have creative and delicious selections.  It is conveniently located as part of Kringle Candle, which is worth visiting, both for the candles and the beautiful flowers and landscapes outdoors.
Best resturant to stop at located in old barn across the street from Kindle candle. There is parking for resturant as crossing at the crosswalk across the street at candle shop can be difficult with older folks. Great marble bar. Had lunch with a quiche of the day. Outdoor seating available as well as indoor. Great tables for two with comfy leather highback chairs. Nice respite off of rte 91. Can be very busy for dinner. 
Got a special occasion and looking for wonderful food, fabulous service, and a great atmosphere? This is the place! We go here for birthdays, anniversary, and we have done their Easter brunch 3 years in a row! Love it!
We happened upon this restaurant while driving through the area. My daughter did a quick review on trip advisor and saw all of the wonderful reviews so we thought it would be worth a  stop. We were impressed by the property as we drove up, the grounds were beautiful. 
When we walked inside we were asked if we had reservations as they were booked, we did not. The host offered to make some other restaurant recommendations in the area, we declined and asked if we could order to take out.  After some discussion, they were able to accommodate us at an open table.
Menu offered a nice selection and the ingredients were very fresh.  I have the entrée salad which was watermelon and cucumber which I loved but it could've used a few more arugula greens as the lettuce portion was very minimal. Other family members had the flatbreads which were delicious and a breakfast sandwich which was also a hit. It can be a little pricey but the quality of the food was excellent.

Prior to starting our shopping, we stopped for a fresh salad and soup of the day. Mall ingredients were fresh and delicious. The waitstaff was courteous and informative and it was a very pleasant dining experience, I only wish we lived closer so we could take frequent advantage dining at this lovely restaurant.  Try it, you will never be dissapointed.
My family and I were traveling back from the White Mountains in New Hampshire and saw the sign for "The Farm Table" off of the highway.  We were looking for a bite to eat and also candle enthusiasts. I couldn't believe how amazing this place really is. They have everything going for them. Fine dining, a candle store next door, home goods, toys, and so much more. Our waiter was fantastic and beyond our expectations. He even brought the manger over to explain more about the origins of the farm and business.   Try the flat bread and you will not be disappointed. All in all, it was so nice to support a business that in return gives back to the community. Especially by providing local farms the opportunity to sell their best produce and farm goods.
I can rest easy, knowing that the Townline Creamie is open again.  I have dreamt of their sweet potato fries and their onion rings.  No one does them better.  And I haven't even mentioned the ice-cream yet.  Divine.  This year they have a new seating area under a fixed roof - it's great.  This is a wonderful place - any time of day - whether you just want a quick cone or an entire meal, followed by a cone! PS - This year they added the veggie burger.  Thanks so much!
We go to Town Line Ice Cream quite often durning the summer for an after dinner treat.  There are generally many people there enjoying ice cream treats, or a quick dinner.
But its still good. Better than others in the area. The place is run by teens, and it would help if there were adults there to supervise, I think the place would be a lot better off. The peanut butter topping is like taking a glob of PB out of a cold jar and placing it on top of your cold ice cream. Not very appealing!
We were told by the sales clerk at Kringle Candle that there was a "creamy over the hill" south of Kringle on Route 5 where we could get burgers, fries, dogs, ice cream, water for our dog, etc.

Town Line is a small, neat red building nestled under trees in farm country. It's evidently quite popular. There are four or five picnic tables under the trees, ample parking and three swings (which were also popular on this Tuesday afternoon with kids and older humans alike). 

Husband had the pulled pork grinder and I had a grilled cheese sandwich - very good, Hot fudge sundae also great, and the dog loved his doggy dish. Good prices, friendly service.
We came here because reviews were very good, but our experience was not. Seated with view of the bathroom and noise from the open kitchen, our starter turned out to be very small and not all things listed were on the plate. Entrees were pork tenderloin dinner and smoked pork tacos. Nothing exciting to report and the smoked pork was very dry. Servers were very good and friendly. 
We tried this place for the first time recently, and found it delightful - a cool spot on a winding country road.
We began with a featured cocktail of the day, a grapefruit margarita. Who knew grapefruit and tequila was a marriage made in heaven?
We shared the charcuterie, which was a perfect appetizer for two. My husband ordered the rabbit entree, which had received raves in reviews we had read. I ordered a small plate of ribs, which were delicious.
For dessert, we shared a sampler of chocolates, made on the premises.
Sophisticated without being pretentious. Attentive service without the hovering.  We'll be back.
As a child  I was raised on an Angus farm not far from the general store. Back then it sold sundry items perfect for a child's world: penny candies, ice cold sodas for a nickel, a gentle old proprietor who sometimes gave you three penny candies for the price of one! The world is good when you are 8 and your Schwinn bicycle is your steed. As with time, the store proprietor passed and entereth The Gill Tavern. Modern and contemporary with having classic strains, it is good to be middle-aged and "come home again" to Gill from NJ, where good dining  and good memories prevail.
A recent appetizer was Rabbit Loin, a novel and tasty beginning to a meal.  The chef may offer rabbit-based dishes periodically,  and they are worth trying.  Scallops as entree were numerous and properly only lightly sauteed; seasonal dessert was strawberry shortcake, a biit modest in size but better biscuit than one usually gets.
Right in the middle of what seems to be rustic New England nowhere, is a charming, not too large, very cosmopolitan bistro.  The Gill Tavern is small and the kitchen, right next to the bar, is as big as a minute and manages to turn out some very nice meals.  It's more like a club, with fine food - the staff is friendly and the clientele is just - well, friendly.  It has become our new local.
We go here all the time. It's unusual to have a restaurant that is excellent in such a small town. We are very lucky. They are into using local ingredients- very fresh. The menu changes often but it's always amazing. Good bar menu and desserts also.
We'd been hearing great things and finally got there.  Make a reservation, because it's small and always packed.  Very clean, lovely atmosphere, wonderful staff, small bar for socializing but the side room was very quiet.  Wide variety on the menu and our food was not only wonderful but came out quickly.  We've started inviting friends and family to join us there, and we will definitely make it a regular stop for brunch or evenings out.
Quaint and cozy restaurant in a former general store. Service was top notch. My Caesar salad was very good, but the wine could have been a bit more generous a pour.  The Mrs ordered a mixed drink which tasted better after I stirred it, and her Irish fish cakes were a bit heavy on the potato vs amount of fish.
As long as you don't get spot by the front entrance! The other dining area is perfect, though. Its a nice, cozy place, and the food is good. They have nice, sometimes eclectic, choices.
Great service; wonderful dishes; friendly bistro-like atmosphere.  We went to the "dinner club" event and had wonderful duck dishes.  And the chocolate "cream" dessert was delicious.  Convivial atmosphere.  Some people on here have complained about the small menu, but it's a small restaurant with a tiny kitchen . . . so there aren't going to be 100 choices.  We have always had an enjoyable time here.  (And for the person who complained about having "to find the place," well , , ,  it's in Gill!  Of course it's going to be a little off the beaten track.)
Accent is on fine cooking with wholesome local produce.  Always a relaxing atmosphere and good dinner or Sunday brunch!  Just 3 miles north of Route 2 @ the Turners Falls bridge, or abut 4 miles east of Rt 10.  Even the beef is a product of Gill ranchers.
First of all, you have to find the place.  It's off a small road on a dirt road and it was pitch black and foggy - just a little unnerving. I was only a little hungry and had several appetizers instead of a main course.  The mussels were large and excellent, the Gorgonzola garlic bread was intense and the side salad quite nice.  My sister ordered the quail special and was underwhelmed.  It was one quail (the size of a sparrow as usual) with uninteresting sides and a puree of squash that was totally bland, mushy and cold.  It was compared to baby food.  This is not a picky eater, and I tried it as well.  Not a great creation.  However, they did have a fantastic tart sparkling Pippin apple hard cider.  Definitely recommend that!
Enjoyed a delicious meal with excellent service. We love the attention to local ingredients such as beef, cheeses, greens...
The kitchen is open so you can watch your food being prepared. The wines and bar drinks are appealing to the pallet. 
Tonight we enjoyed burgers, butternut squash sandwich, and Irish fish cakes!
The servers were attentive. We loved meeting Chef Andrew with the opportunity to compliment him on his delicious entrées!
Great food. Check out the specials. It can get loud and it can get crowded, but call ahead and enjoy the positive energy of the place. Ask about the daily specials and enjoy!
Recently returned to the Gill Tavern for breakfast, had breakfast there before and was very good. But this time I had a very bad experience  breakfast was terrible!  The toast was not toasted (1 slice) the potatoes were suppose to be home fries with rosemary but were tasteless and overcooked with a black oil substance I was told by the waitress it was because they were cooked in a iron skillet. I cook in an iron skillet but have never had a black oily substance that covered everything. Yuck!!!! I think the oil was burnt. Anyway I was not charged for my breakfast that I could not eat. But went away hungry. As a result I will not return there any time soon.
Once a favorite. New chef disappoints with overly complicated and poor preparation.Menu does not offer enough options for fish eaters or vegetarians. Mostly the energy is more ego driven.  I miss the last two chefs- their imaginations and delicate touch preparing fresh foods.
Second trip found interesting specials and daily menu, including special cocktails and beers. Innovative mix of entrees and side-dishes; some attention to seasonal veggies. Experienced, skilled, helpful staff, some outdoor tables for summer. Easy parking nearby. Worth a trip for casual atmosphere, open kitchen, good bar (with some stools for eating at bar). Under 20  minutes from Mass. Rte 2 exit of I-91, north of Greenfield.
Brunch is a family favorite and dinner is both creative & delicious. Beautiful dining room and friendly staff. 
We have been to Gill Tavern many times, and at each visit we are reminded how inventive Chef Jordan is, and how wonderful it is to have People's Pint beer on draft! The food is locally sourced, and creatively served. We have had casual meals, without making a reservation, and enjoyed every bite. We have also attended theme dinners here. The "Nose to Tail" tasting menu in July was outstanding--we were overwhelmed with the offerrings. We have attached some photos from the Nose-to-Tail dinner--amazing! On this occasion we were attending the German Dinner, four courses paired with People's Pint beers. The first was a creamy potato soup, followed by the best kale salad we have ever tasted, with holstein schnitzel, a poached quail egg and anchovy caper dressing. This was followed by Schweinenbraten--veermont raised roast pork marinated in wine vinegar and herbs, with house-made dumplings and sauerkraut. The dessert course was blueberry, raspberry and cherry pudding with cream--all were delicious and served (to a house of 50) promptly and courteously! 
The Tavern is housed in the old general store building, and has a comfortable kitchen view in the front room, and a smaller dining room off to the side. We highly recommend it.
We attended the Franklin County Cider Festival this past weekend. Although my husband grew up in the Amherst area we have not been back there for some time. Niether of us had ever been to Gill. the Gill Tavern was chance we took and we are more than delighted we did. Upon opening the door and striding in we felt the warmth and ambiance engulf us. There were tables of families and each new customer seemed to know at least someone already seated. What a happy lively scene. A community feel that is very hard to get these days. The staff is perfecto- a unified team. Our waiter, Cameron, was knowledgable, fun, and unflappable. I ordered a bevy of small plates. I had the potato/manchego tart, the house salad, and the antipasto plate. For dessert ( oh yes- always eat dessert) I had the pumpkin cake with cream frosting. It was all good. thank you Gill Tavern. We'll be back and we've already told 1/2 dozen friends they must go.
I have always wanted to try this little ice cream stand in Northfield, MA. On the way back from a trip to Northampton, MA. I stopped and ordered a medium vanilla soft serve cone at the window. The server was friendly and helpful. I love soft serve from the chains to the little independent stands. This ice cream was creamy and full of vanilla flavor. The cone was very crunchy. If you're ever traveling through this lovely and historic little town and are in the mood for ice cream stop here. You'll be glad you did.
I was visiting the area and the creamies were so good, we went every day. The only downside was that the sizes changed noticeably depending on who made them. 
Ice cream is okay but the portions are small and pricey. Don't open till noon. Very small parking lot.
We had never stopped at the Northfield Creamie, despite living only 20 minutes away.  We finally stopped in for some ice cream and will definitely be coming back!  Lots of options for delicious local ice cream and a nice variety of soft serve, malts and shakes as well.  I don't think they serve anything but dessert.  Very friendly teenagers took our order and payment.  The seating is all outside but there was plenty of room for all of their visitors.  It was fun to watch the procession of old cars that seemed to be cruising by there as well.  A great place to stop for dessert on a summer evening!
This ice cream place has been around since I was a kid!  They have locally made ice creams and soft serve in almost any flavor.  This is a summer treat every year for our family!
If it is a summer evening, you want a creamie.  Folks young and old have been coming here for years and most have not left disappointed - this is the real deal.

We stopped by, waited in what seems to be an ever present line (it moved fast).  I chose a small twist, my bride chose a medium.  When I was shown the first cone, I asked what size it was - - - it was a small.  This huge cone was more than I wanted, but it went down easy.  They don't skimp on their serving size.  The creamie is just that creamie smooth and tasty.  

Next time I will choose the children's (seniors?) size.
Terrific ice-cream, wonderful people!  Lots of variety and all of it is tasty.  There are places to sit in the sun or the shade.  Everything you want in an ice-cream place.  Does not serve other food, but when you have good ice-cream, what else do you need?
I have going to the Northfield Creamie my whole life over 48 years now. The Creamie is a must do and is better than ever under the current management. I am always saddened when they close for the season and look forward to the reopening next season. I have lived in the area my whole life and in Northfield for 23 years and life wouldn't be the same without the Creamie.
Terrific locally made hard ice cream exactly the way you like it.  The soft ice cream
is creamy and full of flavor.  There are outdoor places to sit with your family and appealing music always piping through the air.  Fun to meet up with neighbors or to talk to fellow travelers on their way to Route 91.
I've been eating at the Northfield creemie since I was a kid. It has had different owners, but the experience has always been fun, festive, and delicious!
What a delight to have a creamie in my own hometown! I have been here several times with the kids and the ice creams are delicious. Staff are friendly and the service is good too. A great place to stop on your way to and from New Hampshire or Vermont 
When you see cars parked on both sides of the road along Main St, your're there. They nickname their sprinkles, my favorite is the John Deere, yellow and green. Great local ice cream.
Delicious ice cream locally sourced.  Creamie is on the Main Street of Northfield, a beautiful NE town.  Only complaint:  it's open only from Memorial to Labor Day.
you wont be disappointed if you stop there they have 
 hard ice cream with several flavors to the vintage creamy twist,  sundaes ,floats, shakes  need I say more
The Northfield Creamie has had a number of iterations over the years by the look of the old clippings framed around the order/pick up window but never as classy, warm and 1930's retro as it has become under the careful cultivation of current owners Tim and Mary Bowen and Tim's sister Barbara, a retired local teacher.  It takes a great place to get traffic to stop on well-traveled state road, but on any given day you'll see license plates from New York, Connecticut, New Hampshire, Vermont, Canada (!) and elsewhere, testimonies to the delicious treats that lure hungry and interested travelers off the road and into another time.
Very  good ice cream and soft ice cream. Took my grandchildren there and my husband. The people are very friendly the service was great. I would highly recommend this place.
Creamie is a delicious ice cream stand right on Rt 10 (Main Street) in Northfield, MA. During a recent visit, we were encouraged to try out any flavors before we ordered. Each of our party of four ordered something different, all were very satisfied! Glad we stopped at the Northfield Creamie! We will be sure to re-visit when in Northfield again! Good job!
How can you not love a place that simply sells ice cream???  there is always a line even when it's not that hot of a day. Love the waffles cones with the added candy down in the tip to keep from your ice cream melting through and such a lovely town to take a walk through while enjoying this high quality ice cream!
Today, my wife and I stopped at the Northfield Creamie on our way home from southern New Hampshire for soft-serve.  Hands down, they serve up the very best soft serve, regular hard ice cream, frappes, and ice cream sandwiches to be found ANYWHERE!!!  It has become a regular stopping place for us during the summer months.  WE LOVE IT HERE!!!
Hands down one of the best ice cream places I have ever been to. The black raspberry chocolate chip frozen yogurt is to die for along with their homemade waffle cones! I was slightly disappointed to not find the M&M's at the bottom of my cone both time I went but that surely won't stop me from going there! Prices are great and reflect the amount of ice cream you get. The people that work there are super friendly and are willing to help you out in any which way. There is something for everyone to enjoy! From pistachio, to lavender, to chocolate, and cookie dough you can be as plain or adventurous as you want! Go to the Northfield Creamie, you will always go home happy!
Had a "real"breakfast egg sandwich & later that day a 9 inch natural casing hot dog with sauerkraut. It had a nice snap. 
Yes, I'm tired of the commercial chain restaurants & was happy to find Kens new owner at the window of the "shack" 
Coffee was good enough to drink black w/o milk or cream or sugar  ( my test for quality coffee). 
Their season is almost over because they are closing for the winter soon but catch them in the Spring if you miss out. 
We were told to try the Clam Chowder Soup here because it was good.  We did.  It was average and a bit pricey. Also, it was brownish instead of white.  We had to fall in line to order.  It was hot inside the first day we went.  The interior  was dark.  The decoration was eclectic and mismatched. It was more or less self serve except that your food was brought to your table.  You got your silverware and water from the corner.  On the last day of the USCA National Canoe races , we had lunch here again, because it was convenient for our  friends - close to the river where the races were held.  I paid for 4 people's lunch and it was not cheap.  It seemed popular with the locals.
We found this place by chance one day on a ride home from the Boston area. We were hoping to find someplace quick, good for the kids and not among the variety of fast foods joint awaiting us in Greenfield. We saw it, pulled a U turn at the Mobile and aren't we happy with that decision. We have loved everything we have had here including the food and the dessert. Love the ice cream. Love the home cooked food. Love the outdoor dining, great for the kids to chill out when they have been stuck in the car. Its so good, that i have been wishing they would open Wagon Wheel West in Williamstown.
We have in the past went right this place but the last year+ we have eaten here many times. Its a great place with a great mix of food and plenty of choices. We got a couple veggie options and the tacos where great. The outdoor seating area is big and has some outdoor games so is a lot of fun. If you go inside you can even get some Lefty's 
beer on tap, what a treat.
One negative is the service sometimes is a bit lacking.
Been going here for years...Lots of options AND great ice cream. The decor inside is whimsical and the seating and games outside make for a great relaxed atmosphere. Food is tasty, fresh and arrives quickly.
My husband stopped by on Aug 28 returning home from the Berkshires.  We'd had the ice cream on a prior visit and that was awesome!  However, lunch was an entirely different experience.  My Husband ordered a burger special, supposed to come with cheese on it (other items too) and fries.  He never got the cheese nor the fries.  he had a basic hamburger for 8.95.  I ordered the turkey sandwich and asked for no cheese on it and no mayo as I'm very allergic to mayo.  They did leave off the cheese but slathered on mayo on both pieces of the bread so I only was able to pick out and eat some of the turkey.  Service was just so slow we didn't even bother to bring the food back for correction - we'd have been there another hour just waiting on it.  We got there a bit before noon and they were not too busy so slow (painfully slow) service was not expected, for sure.  The order-taker at the window acted like he just woke up so the fact he asked 3 different times about the order details, but never got it right, I guess shouldn't surprise me.  Needless to say, we will not be going back.  My Husband is part of a group that rides to a lot of destinations and they will also hear about our poor experience there.
Great breakfast place. Home made cider donuts, eggs, pancakes - the works - Plus Bob's steel cut oatmeal with fruit and nuts. Great - friendly service.

this is my go to place enroute from boston to vermont.  delicious food in a homey setting.  nice help, lots of seating indoors and out.
This is a favorite stop!  For years, I drove past it, thinking it looked like "typical" roadside diner, and I see some reviewers categorize it in those terms.  However, it really is quite distinct in its combination of the classic old take-out/eat-in roadside stop feel with a very impressive menu... lots of choice and most all seem made from scratch, and often with some imagination and nice presentation.  The Mezze platter (with chicken) salad is  a great choice (and for two meals-worth of serving size).
This is one of our favorite, "go to" restaurants close to home.  Convenient for travelers headed east from R91 along R2.  Excellent ice cream stop as well as lunch and dinner.  Friendly staff, good variety including local, fresh and definitely healthy.
On the plus side, a lot of the menu is made from scratch. On the really plus side is the ice cream.

We ordered a tuna melt and and a fish and chips to be shared by two. The service was sit after ordering, they bring the food to you. Nice room, classic roadside look. Not modern, but perfectly fine. 

Server brought drinks, helpful with order questions and requests. When the food came, the fried fish was extremely greasy, but at least it was freshly breaded, not out of the freezer bag. Fries were a huge portion. The tuna melt seemed to have more mayo than tuna. Ok, but not great.

Overall, I commend them for the variety of the menu, the attempt to have  healthy choices, but I think the preparation needs a better effort, and the pricing show more value.
A fun place to have a meal.  It's kinda like an ice cream stand on steroids.  They have a great indoor seating area or you can eat outside on picnic tables.  You order at the counter and they bring out your food.  Plenty of burgers, fries, salads, chili etc to choose from.  Make sure you save room for the great homemade ice cream for dessert!
How can you not love these places? Your typical American Roadie diner. Great for a quick bite and surly to please everyone in your group. Basics burgers, fries & salads. Reasonable priced. One of the better spots on Route 2. 
Stopped here for dinner after going to Mt. Greylock.  Got a hamburg special.  It was very good.  Nice bun and cheese on the burger along with lettuce and tomato.  Done perfectly .  It was just the right amount of pinkness and juicy.
This place is truly surprising.  I guess I don't expect much from what seems to be a roadside stand, but the food here is excellent.  I recently had a buffalo chicken wrap, which was in a warm and fresh flatbread with freshly prepared ingredients, very tasty.  The ice cream is also very good, my favorites are the burnt sugar and sea salt caramel.  They are open year round and I will definitely be back.
When I am traveling in the summer along Route 2, I have often stopped here for a bite to eat.  Simple Menu, staff is friendly and the place is charming and somewhat nostalgic.  Picnic tables outside under the trees, very relaxing.  I usually get a burger, very good, homemade.  They also have a selection of homemade ice cream.  It's all good.
We stopped here to grab some dinner while travelling along the Mohawk Trail. We are glad that we did. The food was very good. The fried pickles are reason alone to stop here. This is your classic roadside place. Dont forget to have some ice cream too.
I have traveled Route 2 for many years but never stopped here.  It was a little confusing to start but after that it was a great surprise.  When you walk in you may be expected to be seated but you have to order at the front where the is no clear line.

Once I figured this out it was clear sailing. My wife and I both ordered meals and they give you a number if you want to sit down and eat. The food was fresh and hot and it was delivered to our table promptly.

The only negative was the local draft beer I ordered. There was no price on the menu board and it tasted like the taps had not been cleaned recently. Overall I highly recommend you make a stop at he WWR!!
Nothing fancy. Order at the counter, but it is delivered to the table. Good sandwiches, burgers, fries. Good breakfast fare and homemade corned beef hash. Picnic tables outside and great place to stop for ice cream. 
We have often stopped here, as we have relatives in New York,
and we go our separate ways from Route 2.  We have always 
had good food, but we would have preferred table service.
We love this place. Good food, and obviously a favorite with the locals. We always splurge for a copy of the local newspaper and enjoy our meal whilst reading the police log to each other.
Love Highland BBQ ❤️❤️
The ribs are great. Pulled pork is my favorite. The waffle fries and sauce are sooooooo good!!!! Great family run BBQ
Great menu. Trying to eat low carb, i ordered Blackened catfish w remoulade and chimmichurri sauces, greens, 2 sides, wife got excellent grilled carrot nut rice burger, gluten free,  excellent gluten free bun available; Cole slaw good (sweetened);  bean corn salad great.  Great taste profiles!
Eat outside on picnic tables. Accepts credit cards.

I ordered platters for a family reunion and was so impressed.  The staff was so easy to work with and the chef modified salads for me so they were low fat- such as pasta salad and potato salad.  The pulled chicken was excellent and the pork delicious.  The bean and corn salad and the lentil curried vegetables were amazing and unexpected touch to a bbq.  The prices were reasonable and I will definitely go back!
We were driving through Northfield and trying to find something good to eat. A beautiful night and the desire to sit outside drew us to the picnic tables in front of Highland BBQ. Who know the food would be so terrific. My son had the juicy pulled pork sandwich and I had the Asian sausage sliders. Mine was amazing, especially the slaw they put on the sandwiches and the terrific flavor of the sausage.

Also impressive were somethings not connected to the food: the kindness of the hosts/owners, the cleanliness of the bathroom, the serene setting, and the unusual choices for a barbecue place.

I highly recommend this place.No indoor seating.
Closed in cold weather. Awesome choice for take-out.
On a recent trip to Northfield, MA we stopped at Highland BBQ right on Rt 10 (Main St.) in Northfield. Dave the owner and chef smokes the meats himself and the BBQ smell wafts through the air as you pass by. We ordered our food and took home to eat, but they provide numerous picnic tables with colorful umbrellas to sit under while awaiting your order and consuming it, if you choose. We loved the many choices, we loved the flavors, the daily prepared sides are all terrific!
We love it there! right down the road from us. Great food! Very sweet family. The daughter is always playing outside. Its great to see them able to continue to expand the menue. 
Stopped just as they were closing after being on the river in Northfield. First time we stopped. Had the BBQ Chicken sandwich with 2 sides - cole slaw and macoroni salad. Wow - did not expect such a big sandwich and a great slow cooked taste. Tangy with full flavor, big pieces of chicken on a fresh roll. You sit outside on picnic benches, lovely night. Family owned - all made right there. It looks like a little nothing place - but the food is outstanding and I am so glad we stopped. I will always grab food when I go by now. For $10 I was FULL! Will try the pork next! So happy the food was so good!
Super delicious BBQ!  You can order a "small plate" for about 8$ Loved every bite of the Chicago style bbq tips with the apple cider glaze!  

Highly recommend this place, and  really wish it was a sit down restaurant, but picnic style is nice and take it home, even better!

Beautifully smokey and fall of the bone deliciousness!
My, oh my! What great bar-b-que!  Some of the finest bar-b-que I've had in the northeast.  The pulled pork is worthy of any Carolina bar-b-que pit and the riffs that went on to chicken and fish and are very good.  It's a seasonal restaurant. it only has outdoor seating, but let that be a deterrent, the bar-b-que and burgers are well worth it, and did I mention the fries and hush puppies?  Oh my.
Stopped by for lunch, ribs fabulous! Pulled pork incredible!!! Loved the variety of sauces, the cole slaw is fantastic, if you want  BBQ this is where you want to be!!!
Some good items like ribs and pulled pork were dragged down by sub par sides. Maybe he will pull it togeather
My husband and I come here at least once a month, so we are pretty familiar with the food and service quality.  

The cooks do amazing things with the food, steaks melt in your mouth along with amazing mouthwatering shrimp.  Now that I made you hungry, go check it out.  The prices are high, but the food is worth it!  Along with the beautiful countryside view while you dine.
Okay, let me start by saying that on a Saturday night I like to eat close to home. This restaurant is not close to where I live but I was dying for some good Italian food and Terrazza came up as closest with very good reviews. The parking lot was almost full when we got there and I thought, "oh great, drive all the way here for nothing" but lo and behold we were greeted warmly and offered indoor or outdoor seating...outdoor please! Watching the sunset over trees on the horizon is good for the soul. A busboy brought water and napkin wrapped utensils to our table before our waitress came to take our drink orders...house wine by the carafe plus a decent enough draft list? Please and thank you! Then the rolls arrived...smothered in garlic and cheese...I can't eat cheese but my husband was ecstatic. The menu had lots of tasty looking choices and although I was in the mood for chicken Marsala (my easy peasy go to favorite) I was intrigued by the Linguine Adriatico...decided to give it a try while my roll loving husband opted for the chicken special. First came salads, tasty enough. Then the entrees..after a couple bites I looked at my husband and said "well, there you go" he replied "you aren't happy with your meal, right." Nope...totally wrong, I loved it...it was the best Italian American food I've had in a long while. Already making plans for our next trip back...and next time we will save room for the Tartufo for dessert!
We tried this tucked away Italian restaurant on recommendations from friends. We weren't disappointed. Located at the greenfield country club and newly constructed clubhouse definitely found a great restaurant to compliment all the other amenities. Lobster ravioli as an appetizer was outstanding. Two different veal dishes we had were each expertly cooked and presented. The bar also did a great job on the margaritas and martinis. We found the waitstaff to be knowledgeable and attentive. 
Excellent food and wonderful service (Lenna)  Golf course views add to the ambience. I highly recommend this restaurant if you're in the area


Lunch on the patio, overlooking the golf course,  very good service,  we had Caesar Salad and the Spiedien,  fried cheese, with mushrooms, prosciutto and garlic,  I love garlic, but it was overpowering.
Whether you are there for a drink and a quick bite, lunch, dinner, or a large special gathering, the quality and taste of their food is always excellent. The owner and staff are friendly and professional, and seem sincerely intent on making your visit a special one. Seating on the outside deck provides a wonderful bit of the 18th hole of the golf course and beyond. You will not be disappointed.
Having eaten at Bella Notte, I knew that Terraza would serve great food.  How right I was!  Three of us went there on a lovely afternoon.  We sat on the patio where golfers were playing on the course.  Salads were the choice for all of us.  The traditional Ceasar Salad was not overly dressed.  One salad had the added salmon and the other added lobster.  The spinach salad was quite large.  The roasted red peppers and marinated mushrooms were a nice touch.  A basket of onion rings was crispy, light, and not greasy.  I was glad I tried Terraza and look forward to returning
I wish I had known about this location sooner. Lunch or dinner with a view- my favorite! Simple but good menu selection. Lunch is super affordable, dinner is pricier. Friendly service. I've never eaten inside, so I can't comment on the 'loudness' other reviewers have mentioned. The outdoor seating was perfect- not crowded, good views, covered so the sun isn't TOO much. Will be back!
As a seasonal visitor I was thrilled to find a new place I had not visited. It was a perfect spring day. There were 6 in my group. We sat on the deck overlooking the golf course. Beautiful views that we vowed to revisit in the fall! Our waiter was training a new waitress. They were attentive but not pushy. We each were very happy with our choices. We all happened to see people we knew so it is a popular spot.
The restaurant is located at the Greenfield Country Club.  Seat placement leaves a lot to be desired.  We were placed by the terrace door, so that whenever someone went to the bar for a drink to take outside the door opened and cold air rushed in, as well as the door striking your shoulder.  Service was slow.  Ordered a chicken breast with the Napoli option.  Recieved a chicken breat parmesian.  Stuffed mushrooms were not well cooked.  Extremely noisy and difficult to either speak or hear anyone at the table.  Needs work, especially for a Country Club environment.
This is a revisit for me.  I loved the Bella Notte restaurant which was the original location.  When they moved to the Greenfield Country Club, we came with them.  The food was great as before but the ambience, not so great.  It has been a couple of years so I wanted to give it another try.  Went on a Friday night and it was very busy - the owner was setting up folding tables and chairs as we were having our cocktails, making room for additional diners.  The evening started well--good service, pleasant room, good food and drink.  But ultimately, the room is a club house/bar.  As the golfers came in and infiltrated the bar, the room became noisier and noisier.  The owner has dressed up this main dining room up since my last visit - curtains on the windows, linen table clothes, etc.  However the acoustics are terrible.  Half of the floor is hardwood and the ceiling is a vaulted hardwood and the result is that the noise echoes everywhere.  Unfortunately, by the end of the meal (we arrived at 6 and left by 7:45) we were unable to converse at our table (a small table of three).  They do have a secondary dining room (we had tried that in the past) but it is down the hall past the kitchen and bathrooms, the service becomes slow, and all views are forfeited for a couple of windows looking out at the parking lot.  The room resembles a box and we all agreed that we did not want to eat in that room.  All this is extremely unfortunate as the owner appears to be a great guy, and the food is really outstanding.  The prices are up there but not outrageous.  What is missing is the atmosphere that will make the dinner enjoyable.  Unfortunately, for this reason we will not be returning.
This restaurant is on a golf course but you don't have to be in the country club to feel welcome. You will have an excellent italian dining experience here. The food was delicious and the waitress was very sweet and friendly. The food came out quickly and the warm garlic rolls were to die for. There is plenty of room here for a large family gathering or business meeting, and they have outdoor seating with a nice view of the golf course.
Heard all good things about Terrazza so decided myself and family would reserve a table for a birthday. Service was excellent. The owner/manager?? was actively (checking tables) asking customers thoughts along with the waitresses. This is a lost art and I loved that. What I didn't like; too few gluten-free options. I get that it can be hard to accommodate but a higher end restaurant should have a plethora of GF options to chose from/accommodate. The other thing was the atmosphere. I understand that the restaurant is connected to the pro shop but the dinning area suffocated you with golf. Mid-winter when the sport is far out of season I expected a lightened approach to the golf ambiance, and I understand that the majority of their clientele are golf enthusiasts but I received far too many questions from my family regarding the sport to feel comfortable. My family claimed their meals were mediocre as well. We'll try again thanks to the management and FOH staff, and to see if any ambiance approach has changed, but it'll at least be a few months before we're back.
I have been to this restaurant for many occasions (holiday celebrations, family gatherings, meeting up with friends, and a special anniversary dinner with my husband). Each and every visit is amazing. The attention is always perfect! The food is scrumptious! The prices are fair and reasonable. You WILL NOT be disappointed. 
Our next visit will be for the Easter brunch (our 3rd year in a row for this). Cannot wait!!!
I hosted a large group (79 people) for lunch at Terrazza Ristorante and was very pleased with the both the food and the service.  I chose a buffet with three choices of meat (Chicken Parmesan, Roasted pork loin, and meatballs), several side dishes (pasta, roasted potatoes, and green beans almondine).  I loved the Ziti Bolognaise and thought the green beans Almandine quite good.  Pork loin was tasty.  Meatballs and chicken Parmesan were just ok.  The cold antipasto salad was outstanding and garlic bread with melted mozzarella was popular with the guests.

The room itself is stylish with good draperies and lots of light from windows on all four sides.  Views of the golf course are a plus.  My group was seated at rounds for 8 and my guess is that another 20 or so people could fit easily in this dining room.  There were only two attendants assigned to our party, but between them they kept the food hot and kept replacing dishes as they played out.  They also cleared used plates and set out dessert.  I'd have to rate the service as excellent.  The food as very good...

I'd dine here again.  I was pleased overall.
The first couple of times here it was hard to find something light on the menu, but the last few times have been very good.  Great bartender, he handled a busy dining room quickly and efficiently while taking good care of everyone at the bar. Wish the stools were a bit more stable, with backs. Gorgeous view, lovely new building and clean restrooms.  Good specials, ok Italian food for the area.
Terrazza at the Greenfield Country Club is a enjoyable experience.....food is fresh and tasty, great variety on the menu....The Italian food is good, but you can get steak or fish if you like.....The staff is very good and Abaz is always there to greet you.....have also had their buffets and those are very good also...A great place to have dinner or lunch.....
Terrazza at the Country Club of Greenfield is a great dining experience.  From the wait staff to the food, it is outstanding.
We can not say enough to good things about having the reunion here. The food was awesome from the appetizers to the delicious buffet that was set up perfectly. Their attention to detail was wonderful.The staff friendly and very attentive.
Thank you for a wonderful evening.
We had heard great things about the food here, and were not disappointed! We arrived for lunch on a Sunday afternoon and were promptly seated in the dining room, which was pretty noisy because there was a full bar of the after golf crowd. When we asked if we could be served on the patio, we were promptly accomadated, and found the atmosphere wonderfully quiet and scenic. Our waiter was a gem and took wonderful care of our table of six. He told us that as well as the lunch menu, we could order from the more expansive (and more expensive) dinner menu, which a couple of us did. The wrap sandwiches were stuffed with meat and delicious.  The chicken parmesian was very tasty and came with ziti and a terrific homemade tomato sauce, wonderfully seasoned. But the Linguine Adriatico was the hit of all our chosen meals and my husband declares he will return especially to enjoy it again!  Lunch prices are modest and a good value by anyone's standards, although there is an extra charge for salad. Dinners are a bit more expensive, but not enough to make me avoid.  On a final note, this is one of the few places I've dined lately that still serves rolls with the meal....and the rolls were hot, hot and homemade yummy. I highly recommend you try this hidden gem.
  
when its busy the service tends to be a little slow but otherwise you get a pretty good meal. The specials are very good especially when they have the corned beef and cabbage, amazing.
A group of 7 of us came in for breakfast.  It is a small place so we took up two booths. We ordered some of the breakfast specials.   I had the Breakfast Burrito.  It was packed full of meats and veggies with eggs and cheese.  It was amazing.   My husband had the Prime rib hash.  He said it was the best hash he has ever had.  Our friends got the eggs Benedict and were very pleased.  The kids had pancakes.   They looked good and fluffy.  To top it all off, the our surprise they serve alcohol.  I had a Mimosa and my husband had a "Shady Mary"  The wait staff was friend;y and the owner was very pleasant.  We will be back frequently now that we found this place.
The last time we were there, the meal was cold.  It was not that busy, so would expect the meal to be hot
First return visit, after many years; decor has preserved 1950's nostalgia and even spruced it up.  21st cen. food tastes won't be catered to -- no gluten or local-from-scratch dishes --but good prep of familiar things.  On this visit I felt our server's mind was elsewhere, parts of the order were delayed a bit.  Location very convenient to park, bike path, downtown shops, and cleaned-up appearance is a positive impression.
After a Sunday bike ride along the beautiful trails in Turners Falls we stopped for brunch at The Shady Glen. From the outside it looks like your typical "greasy spoon" combo fast food and diner from a decade long past. Happily it looks that way from the inside as well with counter service (bright yellow tops, red pleather and chrome stools) and lots of booths along the walls, no stand alone tables. The place was packed so we ended up at the counter where there was an awesome model of the restaurant (see my photos). I had a Greek Omelet which was delicious - fresh spinach, tomatoes and feta cheese - my husband had Eggs Benedict (which were perfect). Staff was friendly (and busy). Not sure what lunch or dinner would be like but I would definitely go here again for brunch.
Met a friend for breakfast. It was a great diner experience, good food, happy customers, fun waitstaff, and very enjoyable.
The Shady Glen sits under a massive old maple tree, food was good, prices very reasonable.Quaint  50's decore, and very friendly people....not too far from the Bridge  that over looks th Conn River, cross Main St or  Avenue A, and walk to the local park. Took about  15 mins, thru an older neighborhood, and loads of older Victorian, and Salt Box type homes.
I am a local visiter of the shady glen.  The food is great and so is the waitstaff.  If your in town stop by for a nice experience.   Breakfast is a total hit.  Enjoy your day.
The food, the setting, the convenience to Route 2 just over the CT River in Turners Falls. A nice stop east of the Mohawk Trail and rt 5
If you have a hankering for a diner, this is a renown classic.
Stopped by for breakfast on a Sunday morning, really by accident.  The outside seems a bit run down, but inside the place is bright and inviting.  The chef had his white coat on and ran the grill single handed until some help arrived.  The wife and I had some crispy bacon and a waffle with blueberry topping.  I had a pancake and some excellent hash.  This might not be on my top ten, but the food and service were very good, and I would stop by again given the opportunity.
I visited my friend in Greenfield, I'm from Texas. It was freezing cold. She recommended we eat here since I was craving breakfast and it was delicious. We came back again. Best diner food I'd had in a while.
The Shady Glen is a wonderful place to sit down for a pleasant meal with family and friends. Located in the downtown area of Turners Falls there is both booth or counter sitting for full meals or stopping for a ice cream. The friendly staff will ensure to desire to return and try other items on the menu.
Overall, this was an acceptable lunch.  I went with a friend and we both ordered the special which was corned beef and cabbage.
The atmosphere is that of a local small town diner.  Could it use updating yes, but it is not uncomfortable. There are booths and stools at the counter.
The workers are very friendly and love to have questions asked about the food.
For the bathroom you have to go outside and back in through a back entrance which does make it hard when it is raining.
The food was good.  Beef was tender and the vegetables were cooked to a nice consistency.  The price is quite reasonable for what you get.
I will go back when in Turner's Falls but won;t go out of my way to get there.
I ordered sscrambled eggs noticed that they charge 1.00 extra for home fries. I love home fries so much I said why not. I must say I never understand why restaurants do this.  While i was waiting for the food i noticed the cook had no gloves on ( open kitchen)) was picking his finger nails touching his face gross or whatThere was enough home fries on that plate to feed mouse. black no seasoning tasteless looked like they have been around for days. The bill came to 10.00$$  the server was very nice and took it off the bill. I was so hungry when I left went to cumbys and bought huge coffee roll. Never will go back nothing like the old glen
When you walk into the shady Glen you get an upbeat vibe by the nice music and mellow colors accommodated by the happy people and laughter all around. You can choose from bar stools to sit or a nice booth all which are near a window for a nice outside few if desired.. The owner usually wearing his "bossman" shirt is very upbeat and lively and always willing to conversate with his guests. 

Ordering: the waitress on duty every time I've been here helps you right away the menu is very simple and yet very delicious.. and don't worry about the typical nasty diner coffee.. the coffee here seems to be fresh every time and actually quite tasty.. today I ordered the breakfast burrito and corn beef hash... made to order in ten minutes! And delivered by the chef on duty himself.. The corn beef hash is never too salty like some places are.. and the breakfast burrito was the perfect filling fresh combination of a filling tasty breakfast. 

I highly recommend this place to people visiting the village of turners falls, or even locals.. I know now to make this my regular Sunday stop since I'm new to The area. 

 pluses: nice music, nice staff, fresh food, bar stool option or bench options, coffee is delicious , you can watch the chef cook. 

No rest rooms. But it's a small place I don't blame them:)
When we pulled up we thought it was closed.   Very run down.   The orange awning is falling down.   Front door not welcoming at all.   They did have "open" neon signs though so took our chances.   "Shady" Glen .... the atmosphere fits it's name.   Service was warm and friendly though.  Food choices are all over the place.  Typical diner to oriental choices.   Wine menu too which I thought odd for s diner.  The new owner really needs to do some updating.   
I have been going to Shady Glen for breakfast on weekends for over 30 years. In the early days John always provided a good old style meal at a very reasonable price. However over the years the old place was starting to show the passage of time. The booths were getting a little more dowdy, the walls a little more drab, and the whole place was starting to look its age. Although the diner changed hands a few times since, the new owners did not make any fundamental changes, until now. This new owner is slowly bringing the old diner into the twenty first century. Not only has he modernized the decor he has updated the food, and expanded hours to include dinner. However the improvements have not changed the character of the place, the old pictures are still on the wall, the cook is still at the grill behind the counter, and the food is good and still very reasonability priced. Although I have not been there for any other meal than breakfast ( but soon will be) it is my understanding that things like the roast beef Cesar wrap and other goodies are a hit. What more could you want in a diner, good food, good service, low cost.
The Shady Glen is under new ownership, and it just doesn't have the old coffee shop feel it had before.  The food was okay, diner food, nothing to write home about.  What irked me, though probably none of my business, was how the new owner is ALWAYS on his comlap at the counter puter while the young girls who work there are busting b*tt waitressing, mopping floors, cleaning, etc.  I mean c'mon....it's February, maybe close up the laptop and go take the Christmas greenery out of the windowboxes?  :)  

Something just isn't the same with this place anymore....
We needed to refuel on a drizzly, blustery  late morning so impulsively chose the Shady Glen.  I wanted mashed potatoes (for comfort) and also ordered lemon chicken, though it was called something else.  My husband had (second) breakfast.  Our table to the left of the door , though private, turned out to be a bit drafty.  The wait-time was suitable and the food hit the spot.  I have fond memories from thirty or more years ago visiting my sister and coming here.  Back then the prices were about half that of anywhere else, which was too good to be true for impoverished young single mothers. It is still comfortable in a homey way and the menu serves homemade dishes, in particular I want to mention that the soups are all homemade.  I had clam chowder and was impressed by the addition of a blend of herbs.
If you want a bang for you buck, this is the place to eat. While it may be a little out dated, the food and price make up for the difference.
Usually call in, but most of the time the order is not ready when gone to pick up.  There doesn't seem to be enough help
Subway, is Subway, for the most part, but my one complaint is that the door has hours posted, but I more than once found them closing an hour earlier.  
Located in the center of South Deerfield, Ma, from Rt 91 north take exit 24, right off the ramp to the traffic light, go straight on Rt 5 north to the next traffic light and take a right. From the north, on Rt 91, take exit 25, left off the ramp, right at the traffic light, and a left at the next traffic light. Restaurant on your left after crossing the RR tracks. Nice small town atmosphere with gas and liquor available near by. 
The staff here for the most part are professional and fast  which to me is why I go here often for lunch compared to other fast food joints. 

They are always in Stock, and everything seems to be fresh.. Although it's subway and not fine dinning, I recommend the turners subway to people looking for a quick bite. 
Cheap beer, keno, pool table, dart boards and juke box. Good people, Good times, nice place to
Meet up with friends on night after work,
Not clean. Strange atmosphere. Went there to have a drink with my partner. Needed someplace quiet. Well quiet it was but the glassware was dirty, the table top was so sticky I could not lift my glass up after I put it down, and the "locals" were looking at us in an odd manner so we left after fifteen minutes. 
Unpaved, unmarked parking lot, no handicap spots and several steps to entrance. Not \ AC (on a 92 degree day) but fans kept it comfortable, Seat yourself and service was prompt & friendly. Wife had her Ruben (1/2 came home) with steak fries & slaw. I had the bacon cheeseburger with fries & slaw. Burger cooked well, and fries were very good (had to add a touch of salt to bring out the best taste). Cole slaw was a little too "stringy". A decent meal at a very good price.
I love the food here at Bob's, but I find the restaurant itself to be a little gross. Overall great service and a fun time with friends!
Home town dinner. Great food, great staff. Not and fancy place just good comfort food, large portions at a great price.  The best place to go for Breakfast. 
Great small family breakfast restaurant .  Very casual and friendly atmosphere .  Conveniently located.  Basic breakfast, lunch menu with a few specials 😀


The food is okay but the prices is a bit high. This place is very small though. I can get better portions at Budabing's.
great homemade dinners and breakfast all day long.  the service is always terrific and they have delicious seafood there.  The prices are fantastic for families and affordable for anyone on a budget.  Although it's decor is still in the 70's, it is clean and easily  accessible while travelling on route 109.  It is one of the hidden gems that locals love to eat at. 
A local favorite.  Excellent breakfasts, with interesting specials written up on the board.  All are fine, with unlimited coffee.  Lunch has comfort food and good burgers.  Outstanding service.  Easy parking.  Meet here with friends!
Bob's is a small restaurant, but is packed with big flavors. Have been for breakfast many times while in Massachusetts visiting our son and his family.  Very fast and efficient service...all the best breakfast options. Crowded on weekends,  but it moves quickly and at the same time no one is rushed. Your server is always nearby, so you are never trying to flag someone down for coffee or iced tea refills.  What a joy not to have to wait for anything...especially your check when you are ready to pay and get on with your day. Pleasant and positive...Bob's is a great stop for a hearty and delicious breakfast.
Off for breakfast with the grandkids to a haven I haven't visited in a long time.  How would I know they would treat me like a regular, with prompt service, exacting advice on some new dishes, and fabulous omelets for an extended visit.  There are some places that never go stale and deserve more frequent visits than the pocketbook can deliver. I wallowed in the excellent coffee, joked with the waitress and marveled at their ability to deliver such a high grade product.  Can you remember the last time you had to go through the kitchen with a friendly visit with the chef to get to the men's room?  The grand kids loved it and so did I. 
Bob's gives you that great old diner feeling without the actual diner car. Very good homemade food & soups, friendly service & great prices. Hard to beat for breakfast or lunch!
Bob's is a small, decidedly not fancy, country-style breakfast and lunch spot, which reminds me of the best small-town eateries that are throughout rural areas of the country. They do a great job on everything from Hash omelets and home fries to Eggs Benedict, and all for a bargain price, served promptly. They have a small counter and a few tables in the first room with booths along the wall, and two other small rooms with booths & tables. It's a comfortable place serving comfort-food breakfast and lunch, and I recommend it highly.
Just gross and horrible, I find they are skimpy with their fillings and it's not a good quality meats either. That place was shut down awhile back by the board of health, that did it for me, won't be back there!
Stopped in around 8 pm for a late night dinner. Friendly service, ordered a large salad and it was really good. 
just a normal subway nothing special about it normal food normal service and the same as the other thousands of them across america.
Wife and I shared the fisherman  splatter. Shrimp clams fish and scallops. Asked for an additional order of clams.  The waitress said they were included in the plate. And with that seemed like a normal portion of clams. Food fried but tasted good. Clams were good as the scallops were .... Ok. Salads and a variety of beer on menu to. Priced ok for what you get. 
Visited few years back, not impressed the first time but thought we'd  give it a 2nd try, food was so so, nothing to brag about, sweet potato fries was over done….. service was slow. Average food at a reasonable price.
I have eaten at Budabin's many times over the last 8 years.  The food  never disappoints.  Portions are very large and ther are numerous offering.  The servers are always pleasant and very attentive.
Budabings has something on the menu for everyone. The fish melt was  only average, but my friend's pizza smelled delicious.
Visited for the first time and it was fine but I wouldn't go out of my way to return. Booths are old and all are taped up. Food is average and even a little bland. Food was pretty reasonably priced however. 
Good food, excellent staff and cheap eats with a lot on your plate! Wish it were open on Mondays. Could use an update and bathrooms aren't so neat....
Breakfast is the best, dinner is also great but this has been our go to breakfast place for years. Staff is friendly & attentive.  
Good Food, Very Good Service, Good Prices, Nice Atmosphere...great for takeout, for breakfast, lunch or dinner.
Walking in, I thought of the 50's Diner at Hollywood Studios in Disney World.

The wait staff was very attentive and our order was serviced in a timely manner.  Very quick to come back with additional condiments.

I thought the tasty chocolate shake was a bit small.  Definitely thick.

The potato skins appetizer was huge and I had to stop eating more or I would not have room for the burger.  The waitress asked if I wanted to take the rest to go before I even suggested it.

The burger was OK...but I had a Bartley's Burger from Cambridge the day before.

I didn't see an AMEX symbol on the door but they do accept them.
Went on a Sat evening with 2 kids; they each had pizza, I had chicken sandwich. All delicious and less than $30 for the whole bill.
Just love this diner, one of my favorites and you cannot beat the prices and the food! It's good to see the familiar faces and the waitresses, I always see many people come back. I love their wood fired pizzas and seafood, I  sampled  many of their appetizers and those mozzarella stumps really is awesome! Oh, and the country fried chicken steak and Thanksgiving dinner is so good, it hits the spot for me. My fiance loves the ribs with chicken and scallops, those burgers is another favorite - better than McDonald's!
The breakfast was good however if you buy eggs with potatoes and you want toast, it cost you a buck, really. The place is a mess. Every single booth had seats torn to shreds. The air vents are filthy and I would not return here again.
So I haven't been here in probably 5-7 year's. I remember even before that when my son was little we came often and loved the place. Always clean, nice decor and great food!  Not so much anymore! Sat down and all the booths were torn to shreds. Not a good look! I was w/ a 4 year old child who even noticed and kept making comments on the condition of the seating. Even the table had big piles of dirty napkins under the legs of the table to keep it from wobbling !While sitting there we were accompanied by the many flies that spend their days in the windows hovering over your food while you try to eat! I ordered a corned beef sandwich. The corned beef was cut so thick it was like eating cardboard! The little girl I was with ordered pancakes and when I went to cut them for her they were so rubbery I could  hardly cut into them ......defiantly microwaved! This restaurant use to be so good I don't know what happened but very sad! So dirty and nasty I won't be going back! Clean up your act! Such a shame to see an old time favorite place go down the tubes like that! Hope someday the owners wake up and turn the place around!
Small but quaint little restaurant. Large menu with so many lunch items to choose from. The food was really good but the service was lacking a bit. Server forgot several items we asked for and right next to us complained about how other customers gave tips. I ordered a Mint Chocolate Chip Shake to go and was handed two small cups with a small scoop of ice cream in each with milk poured on top. Server said we don't have large glasses so I put your shake in two small ones. It was very strange. Overall food and restaurant is nice but our server needed a little coaching on how to act in front of customers and present to go items.
Stopped in for a quick meal after a long day of riding. The waitresses were extremely quick to great me and take my order. One of them also stopped to talk with me for a while about my motorcycle, even though they were pretty full with customers. She also made sure I constantly had a full glass of water; this was much appreciated after a day of riding in the sun. Food was pretty good, better than I expected from an old 'greasy spoon; type of diner. They also have a wood fired brick oven, though I didn't get a chance to try a pizza that day. Next time, definitely.
Stop in, its on RT 109, about 3.5 miles south of RT 27 in Medfield. they also serve alcohol, though I was riding so stuck tot he water.
Reasonable pricey, HUGE portions, friendly service! What more could you ask for. I have never had a bad experience at Budabings!
A very popular place.  Good location, very good service.  However, the food is quite average.  It is nice to have breakfast available all day.  But the actual food is not outstanding in any way.  You can get better food, and more interesting fare, at other local places.  They are good at accommodating larger groups, and there is plenty of parking.
Always crowded, but always great service and great food. We dine here often when visiting our son and his family.  Large and delicious pancakes are one of their specialties. Omelets galore and eggs any style, including several different benedicts. Lots of toast and muffin options too. My only minor issue is that the bacon is way too thin...transparent really...not appetizing to me or anyone in my party. I usually order the ham instead, which is very good. Service is fast and efficient, coffee is hot and refilled throughout the meal...Iced tea as well.  Very busy on weekends, but it moves quickly and honestly, it is worth the wait. 
Love going to Budabings for anything from breakfast through dinner! Went there for a quick easy dinner a few days ago. Good food at good prices. The portions are generous! Usually busy but we eat on the early side so we don't usually have to wait. We like our usual waitress Paula.
We've been here a few times and have never had a bad meal. We are usually seated pretty quickly but the service has been mediocre. We went here for lunch two weeks ago on a Saturday. The place was busy but not full. We waited by the front door for almost 10 minutes until someone finally acknowledged us and brought us to a table. Breakfast menus were on the table but lunch menus were not offered to us even though it was noontime. I had to get up and get one myself since we all wanted lunch. We got our drinks pretty soon after we were seated and then waited another 10 minutes to place our order. Food came out pretty quick but then we never saw our server again. After finishing our meals and waiting for our check, we finally had to ask someone else for it. We'll probably be back because it's convenient and the food is good but they need to work on the service.
only coffee and tea here for Keurigs but it is a must if you have fussy and different tastes! I love that I can get a few for hubby, few for me and then some for guest without purchasing a huge box. 
It is a little bit pricer but worth it, esp if you want to try something before buying a full box of 12/18/24.
This is not a restaurant and serves no food, but it's a great find for coffee lovers who own a Keurig or other one-cup coffee machine. Not only do they have a huge selection of "K" cups at the same or lower price as supermarkets, but they have a whole wall of open boxes grouped by regular, flavored, and decaf. You take a tray with 24 holes in it and browse the selection picking one or more of any coffees you want to try, and when all holes are full you are charged the regular box price plus $2. Great idea!

I've only seen one employee there, which is very adequate for the business flow, and she's both very friendly and happy to recommend coffees that will match whatever you tell her- light, dark, 
French roast, espresso, flavored, decaf, etc
This place is wonderful! Kcups in a big box for a small price.  So many varieties..  You can buy just one cup at a time too until you find your favorite. Johnny, Staci and everyone else are just terrific.  I  love One Cup!
This is a family owned and run business that is fresh and delicious.   The staff is great.   Food, service and cleanliness are what you want.
This is not a fancy eatery.  It is simply good food and affordable in a comfortable and clean place.   Explore the menu.   If you like what they serve, you will enjoy how it is prepared.
I recommend the cheese steak sandwich.
This place just recently opened and it still looks bright and clean.  Tried the steak and cheese sandwich which came on a toasted bulkie, there were other bread options offered. I liked it, The sandwich was hot and the cheese really melted into the steak.
Being nosy, i also looked at what others had since Kravings has both inside and outside tables & chairs.  The salad, as they were carried by, looked great and I notice folks brought home what they didn't eat because they were big salads.
Couple of guys came in and had club sandwiches, which also looked great, those came with french fries.
They have a rather extensive menu, so I'm looking forward to returning and testing other items on their menu.
Stopped in here for Ice Cream and figured why not try it. Hard Ice Cream selection was pretty decent and they of course had soft. As for the ice cream, hard was really good but the soft ice cream had no taste at all, tasted horrible and I was shocked. If you are coming here for dinner, this is a fast food type place with a large selection of fried seafood and burgers and that is about it. They did have outside seating and a large inside dining area. Reminded me of a Dairy Queen almost. It was just okay, nothing to come back here for.
We stopped into this new grille and ice cream spot to try their ice cream.  Ordered a large hot fudge sundae and small soda to split and it came to $9.14,  When they brought the sundae to our table we thought they had made a mistake and given us a small so we inquired with the employee as to if this was a large and it was.  Ice cream was good but size was very small especially for the $$.  Next time  we will go to the Black Cow down the road - better ice cream especially for the $$.
Newly opened, clean & cool little eatery.  We ordered Fish & Chips, buffalo chicken and a chicken salad and they were all great.  The chicken salad is home made, not a pre packaged concoction, that was served over a large fresh green salad.  The fish was cooked (fried) till perfectly flakey - they served the tarter sauce & cole slaw separately, so it didn't get the fries or fish soggy.  Chicken pieces were huge and not super hot - which was great for my son.  

We have already declared that we will be regulars!
This is a very casual sandwich, fried food, and ice cream restaurant in the center of Millis. They opened just a few weeks ago, and are off to a very good start, although they do have some things they could improve. Orders are placed at the counter, and then delivered to your table. The food is very good, and one of the reasons is the vendors- Captain Marden's Seafood and Richardson's Ice Cream are both highly regarded in this area- and the everything is expertly prepared. Salads, burgers, fish, and fried chicken were all excellent.

Now the problems- among their sandwich offerings is the time-honored deli item of Pastrami. But they don't have rye bread! Or pumpernickel, or any other typical deli bread. When we were there for lunch, only 4 or 5 tables were occupied, but the noise level was still annoying. It must be overwhelming with a full house, especially since they are family appropriate. It appears no attempt at noise control was considered when built, as all surfaces are hard and flat. One of our party was assured there were no onions in the chicken salad before ordering, but it arrived with lots of chopped chives in it. Strange that they would not know chives are a type of onion, when they are sensitive to allergies as far as their sorbet is concerned, keeping it in a seperate freezer to avoid contamination with milk products.

None of the problems will prevent our returning at least once to try again, because they've done so well so far, and will likely make improvements as time goes on.
The clam strips plate comes with coleslaw and french fries and were very tasty.  Loved the batter on the fried clams.  Also loved the hamburgers, especially the one with mushrooms and cheese.  It's a family restaurant with no waitstaff so you bus the tables yourself but the prices are so reasonable, you don't mind.  There's a separate window outside to order ice cream (soft and hard) in any form imaginable.
Very comfortable atmosphere with a nice bar.  Party of 12 and everyone was satisfied.  Food was great!
We went for dinner at 5:15 on a Saturday. There was no wait so it wasn't very busy. It started to fill up but definitely not crowded so I don't know why the service was so slow. Our server just kept disappearing. It was very disappointing because the food was very good. I'm sure we'll be back at some point but I hope the service is a little better next time. 
Nice change of pace when u don't want to travel but most of the food is fried or cream sauces. 
If you're into just that with a pint or two then this is the place just don't get high expectations and you won't be disappointed 
I was happy to try the newest addition to the area and hoping they would hit it out of the park. The service was excellent, menu was a little limited, but had the Irish pub standards; Shepherds Pie and Rueben sandwich. Lots of burger options including Veggie, turkey and chicken, which was wonderful to see. Pizza and entrees. 
Lots of room at the full length bar and the decore was perfect for an Irish Pub. 20 different beers on Tap.
We ordered buffalo wings, which is our test of a good restaurant, and they were just ok. Crispy but a little overcooked. My husbands Rueben and son's burger hit the spot. My chicken sandwich the Fuego Jack, with Jalepenos, jack cheese and chipotle mayo was quite good. I was very happy to discover that (fresh) Green beans or broccoli were an option to the fries as a side. All in all good standard pub food at a reasonable price. Just hoping for some really unique menu items, maybe the nightly specials with help that.
Brand new restaurant as of Aug 2016. Surprisingly large open room, high ceilings with very long bar. Very nice ambience, typical Irish pub atmosphere. Lots of beers & liqueur  selection (full service bar) Lots of giant screen TV. Friendly knowledgeable waitstaff.

Food are top notch.

My Saturday lunch;
Lobster bisque soup
Haddock Nantucket
Cheesecake.
Patron XO tequila. 
Love it.
Wife and kids were very happy with their food.  Well prepared and proportioned. We left very and will be back again.
Figured I would take a shot and visit this new spot in the center of Millis. Never have been to one of these places and I understand it is a chain but this location is brand new. It sits in a new  shopping center and it is quite a large place which you could never tell from the outside. Place inside is huge with a long bar and Irish pictures and beer signs all over the walls, pretty cool stuff. High top tables all around but these hostess working the door were quick on their feet and smart and saw we had kids and seated us in the corner with a booth and high top. Service here is exceptional, quick, friendly and just all around very good. Menu is traditional bar food but some cool seafood dishes and tasty appetizers plus a very extensive beer menu with some interesting seasonal flavors. I ordered some Haddock in a clam chowder soup sauce which was really good plus some spicy Texas egg rolls. Even the kids food looked great. Prices were decent and I will definitely come back and try this place again!
We have been to Napper Tandy's in millis twice now and have consistently got good service and food was great. The set up and atmosphere are very nice. The space is deceivingly large. We had a similar experience as the other reviewer in that they did not pay attention to utensils on the tables and we had to hunt for them. However the food was really great and the server attitudes were terrific an apologetic so I Believe this will be a kink that just gets worked out very quickly. I would definitely recommend as a great alternate with Victory Lane.
We have been to Napper Tandy's in Walpole and in Norwood and were anxious to try this newest restaurant in Millis.  We went on a Saturday night at 5:30 and it was already pretty busy.  We sat at the bar.  And sat...and sat...finally got waited on-there were 4 staff behind the bar.  The server took our order and asked if we wanted menus.  Again we sat...and sat...she finally took our order.  Meanwhile she is drinking her Dunkin Donuts coffee and chatting with her friends. The food arrived fairly quickly...no utensils.  I had to grab another server for utensils.  Then the original server disappeared and a new server helped us.  VERY noisy as well.  The layout is great and atmosphere good, but quite noisy.  Hard to relax.  We will not be back.  Going to Walpole from now on.
The pizza is very good here
Prices are average for area. I hear they are famous for the chicken bacon ranch calzones but I have not had yet.Love the homemade house dressing and that they make their own pita bread (pizza dough I assume) he waits for you to pick up your order when they heat it up so its warm and yummy when you get it.
We just moved to this area but everytime we go the Man who owns it is always so nice! It is what makes me want to come back to support local businesses.
My family and I discovered Marino's shortly after moving to Medway, almost six years ago. The pizza is outstanding! We have tried other pizza houses in the area and nothing can touch Marino's! All of their food tastes consistently fresh and obviously made with quality ingredients. They have beautiful salads that are served with fantastic homemade pita bread. Their subs and calzones are very tasty as well. The owners treat their customers like family and they make it known that they truly appreciate your business. A must try if you live in the area or find yourself passing through! 
there are at least 3 Pizza places and several restaurants that have pizza on the menu in Millis, all are good, this one is the best!
We get pizza from here a lot, and also dinner sometimes. Great food and really reasonable prices. Would like better bread for subs ( a little more crunchy crust) but that is my preference only. Their pizza is always good and ready fast, and they are very accommodating when it comes to my picky eating self. 
Moving out of the city to MetroWest I was afraid of what we'd find for restaurants, and Millis isn't exactly a bustling metropolis.  While we were still looking at houses, we ended up eating at Marinho's one afternoon and ever since they've been a family favorite.  The owners are so sweet and friendly, remembering us each time we pick up dinner.  But more than that, their food is really superb.  They use fresh ingredients, and the best dough around, IMHO.  My favorite is their chicken herb calzone.  It's huge (I easily get 2 meals out of the small), with big chunks of chicken and broccoli.  We're also big fans of their salads and pizzas.  Go.  You won't be sorry you did.
I have not gotten a bad meal here yet! So many great Italian options!! My Fav is chicken cutlet with poppy Mayo!!! 
Many choices for different taste 
They have a Gluten Free bread! 

Great choice of sandwiches. I noticed the eggplant parm had been frozen - came from some food service. Other than that great choices and value for the money.
Great Subs, lots of meat and condiments on sandwiches and subs, the staff is fast and friendly and helpful.
Isabella's is a great on-the-go sandwich restaurant that has many options. I come here about once a week! 
I'm from Northern NJ where they know how to make a great sub...finding anything comparable in New England is next to impossible.  Except for Isabella's!  Amazing selection...great ingredients... The best Italian bread (order the regular size and it will come on a fresh sesame seed roll that puts the sub over the top).  So many unique sandwiches, I am on a mission to try them all and I've never been disappointed.
Very tasty deli-style sandwiches, at reasonable prices, and prepared with care. They have a few tables, but not much room, so take out is often the choice. Family owned and staffed, and they do a nice job of making you comfortable.
Much more tasty than food places nearby, and healthier for you.
Bread fresh. Sandwich full and delicious.
This family loves food and loves to feed people who like food.  Try one of their many sandwich suggestions or make your own.  Salads available and also home made pizza. Super nice local family - they really love making food for you. Eat in or to go. 
Like the Simi's (#12 on the menu) sandwich the best.  There's a lot of choices and their pizza is great as well.  Highly recommended!
Great subs and selections. Very accomodating and friendly staff. Salads are plentiful and fresh. Just wished they carried whole grain bread or sub roll.

You know one of those advertisements on TV where they highlight "talk to a real person"? Well, I was concerned with multiple allergies and to different foods in the group who I was entertaining. No worries whatsoever! The staff here was very comprehensive during the ordering process, very knowledgable about every dish and both its ingredients as well as its preparation, and certainly patient as we made our choices. 

The food itself was superb, a great blend of spices where there should be spices, and good balance of ingredients to make everyone feel they'd had a very good meal. 

Thanks Saigon for a great experience. We'll be back. 

I have been coming here my entire life. The food is outstanding and the service is quick. It is one of the best Vietnamese food spots in New England. With consistent service it's clear they care about the food they produce.
Food was great and inexpensive. I have been many times over the past few years. It is BYOB which really reduces the cost. Service was friendly and attentive
Met friends for dinner last night. The wait help extremely friendly and patient that we wanted to take our time ordering. BYOB
Was great; brought wine. Ordered Chicken Satay which was extremely over cooked and dry.  Had a Shrimp with Vegetables which was hot and fairly tasty. Friends had friend rice and spring rolls (greasy).
Would return to try different items, but was comparing it to a restaurant nearby that closed last year, and not very good in comparison. Very reasonably priced though! I'll try again if in the area.
Everything we ordered was very good, the restaurant was clean and inviting, service was good and personal, and they provide appropriate items for whatever you bring to drink- corkscrew, glass, etc.
This is by far the worst Vietnamese food.
Their Pho (noodle in soup) 
was absolutely tasteless. Other noodle dish and chicken wing tasted awful. Made me sick and angry. Never going back.


The food can be tasty enough and is made to order, but it is not exceptional in any way. Decor is very simple and outdated. Menu is ossified. Absolutely nothing they make is spicy-- I've tried for years to get anything with a kick and have pretty much given up. Cilantrophobes: this is the place for you. They don't put it in any dish, ever. I have been known to bring my own. 

The proprietors make this local spot a real gem, however. You will be warmly welcomed and made to feel at home. 

This place is super popular with locals because it's friendly, inexpensive, relatively tasty, and you can byo wine and beer and hang out with friends and family. It's a lovely fixture in the area but if you are on the hunt for Vietnamese food like you get in the Big City, you will likely be disappointed. 
Small local restaurant with simple decor and friendly helpful staff. Wide variety of meals to choose from and a generous helping of food at reasonable prices. You can BYOB and they supplied the glasses.  Even my daughter whose a vegan approved of this place and she's a picky eater! 
The owner/waiter was helpful when we were ordering.  We didn't notice we were ordering things that were very similar, so he recommended we try a  couple of different things instead.  Crispy chicken was a favorite at our table.  Definitely a plus that you can bring your own alcohol with no fees.  Made our evening very affordable.  We had a large party of 10, and they were easily able to accomodate us.  Reservations are recommended on the weekends.  It gets very crowded between the hours of 7:00 and 9:00.  Would return often
I have been going to Saigon for years now and always have been very happy.   The owner is always friendly and greets everyone who comes in. All the food is prepared to order and made from fresh vegetables and meats.   This restaurant is BYOB, they will provide glasses and setups, but you need to bring your beverage of choice.   This makes for a very inexpensive evening.   The restaurant is very clean and not too noisy.   Parking can be an issue, but I usually find a spot not too far away.  My favorites are the Chicken Pan Fried Noodles and the Lemon Grass Pork Skewers.
First time diner. Went on a Friday night, no wait. The owner greeted us and treated us as if he knew us. He was helpful in what to select. My spouse loved the wonton soup, would have liked more wontons. I didn't much care for the spring rolls, center too mushy. The combination soft noodles with meats and shrimp was spectacular. Reasonably priced, simple setup of dining room. I did notice that for every sit down group there were 3x as many for takeout, each with 2-3 containers. Service was good and personable wait staff met our needs. We'll go again!
The Saigon has been open for over 20 years - serving 'real' freshly made Vietnamese food. The menu is large enough so something for everyone. Always consistently delish. The flavors just 'melt in your mouth' good. great for a group dining experience so you can share dishes. Love the owners - husband is out on the floor and the wife is in the kitchen. 
I've enjoyed eating @ Saigon ever since it opened and have never been disappointed with the food. The service is "leisurely" since everything is prepared to order, but the staff is always helpful and attentive. I usually order an appetizer as soon as I sit down to compensate for the wait for my main course. The food is not overly spicy. I expect it's been toned down for American tastes, but if you ask that it be "kicked up a notch" they will happily comply. The restaurant doesn't have much atmosphere, so you know you're paying for the food and not the overhead. Dinner for 2 with an appetizer recently cost us $30 plus tip. Can't beat that!

Saigon is closed on Sundays & Mondays, but is open from noon to 2 for lunch and 5 to 9 for dinner Tuesday through Saturday. Make reservations for dinner Thursday - Saturday as it can get very busy. Saigon is BYOB and they do charge a small corkage fee. 

Enjoy.
Ordering food for six adults for $75 is amazing but its not as good as the food!!!!!Authentic Vietnamese but very accommodating for all tastes, large portion sizes, helpful and friendly staff. Go to this place!!!
When I get the yearning for Vietnamese food, we love to go to The Saigon in Millis, MA.  The prices, portions, and taste are a good value.  The place is small, so reservations are recommended on Saturday evenings.
I have been coming here to the Saigon with a bunch of my friends since the place opened.  We love the food, talking to the owner, the leisurely meal we can enjoy, and it is all very inexpensive and casual.  You bring your own wine and they provide you with glasses and an opener and ice if you need it.  The soups are great, the curries are wonderful, the broccoli dish is a favorite and the crispy chicken is terrific.  The place has never changed.
Every review on here is right, just different views of the same thing. 

Yes, the service can be slow (if this is a problem, go early).
Yes, it is BYOB and cash only.   There is a liquor store 3 doors down.  
Yes, they don't serve Pho. 
Yes, prices are extremely reasonable...this is not an expensive night out. 
Yes, if you are going on a weekend night, you really want to have reservations.

There is a reason that this place is packed to the gills every weekend.   The food is phenomenal and consistently so.  Personally i'm addicted to dish #74.  The owner is extremely friendly, as is the service.  I went there once with my parents and now he always asks about them.  It's a bit of a drive for me so I'm not exactly a regular or anything, that's just the kind of guy he is.   

This restaurant is totally worth your time.
We've been to Saigon a number of times over the past few years including a visit last week. Each time we've enjoyed the experience.  The food has always been delicious, light and covered in tasty sauces.  In our experience, the service has been generally attentive and properly paced. The prices are very reasonable, and the BYOB policy is a plus. 

We recommend Saigon to anyone who might like Vietnamese food at reasonable price in a comfortable setting. 
First time here after living nearby for 20 years. I can't believe it!
Had about 15 minute wait without reservation for four of us at 7pm on a Friday.
Most of the customers seemed like regulars and greeted the owner as they were seated. Seemed everyone had brought wine or beer and this is obviously an attraction. We brought wine and our server promptly brought glasses and an opener.The owner took our order and when two in our party both ordered Crispy Noodles he suggested an order of Rice Noodles in place of one. We took his advice and were glad we did. Spring Rolls were very good. Shrimp with Garlic Sauce had large shrimp and a rich brown sauce. The decor is simple and somewhat dated but Hey - this is Millis! Restaurant was crowded but we were able to drive up and park in front of the entrance. Pricing is very resonable and with BYOB you could easily come here every couple of weeks. Maybe every week! Service was attentive and pleasant on a busy night. If you live nearby and like/love Asian cuisine. You have to check this place out. Worth the drive from a distance. We will back soon.
Strange, no frills restaurant with uncomfortable seating, some tasty dishes - curried beef, curried chicken - but look around! It's the bring your own alcohol that's the attraction! A good place to have some tasty food at a reasonable price and get feeling good. But maybe not good enough to feel happy about the owner who makes the wait staff fork over their tips to him. I wonder how that's divied up?
We have been to this restaurant many times. It has a fun, friendly atmosphere. The food selections consists of pizza, burgers and a variety of fried foods such as clams - good basic cooking. The pizza is reliably great. The salads are good generously sized with a variety of greens. The scallops which I frequently have are usually pretty good. I do the broiled, but I have a friend who does the fried. Overall the menu is varied. This is a popular place - a friend calls it the local townie bar. Very solid place.
This one of our favorite spots.  We have dined here 2 - 3 times a month for many years.  It is consistently good time after time.
Always a Great Place To Eat in Millis, Comfortable, Good food, Good Service, Fair prices...Great for Take out...They usually have Very Good Specials Menu.
Wow was I surprised. I have been by Victory lane many times and finally decided to stop in. Menu was extensive and food was excellent. It was a very hot day and the AC was a wonderful relief. It was very busy and the service was a bit slow but it worked out in the end. We will definitely return to this hidden jewel in Millis.
Reasonable priced drinks nice crowd  though I didn't eat the food looked good had a good time a mixed crowd in terms of age 
We took the family to Jalapa for the first time.  The portions were giant, and delicious.  I had the Asado Burrito and it was great.  The kids each devoured their meals, and enjoyed the music and atmosphere.
Went for lunch on a Saturday and enjoyed the meal. It's been a long time since I've had authentic Mexican food as there have been few options in the western suburbs of Boston. Nice and clean environment (new tables which are very good upgrade.) I had the fish tacos (delicious) and my wife had the taco salad with chicken (also delicious). Food tasted very fresh and flavorful. I'll go back and try some other dishes - good enough for a return visit.
Started off with complimentary salsa and chips which were Ok, I like a bit more spice in my salsa. 
Ordered the VEGGIE QUESADILLA which was outstanding, The tortilla was still crisp on the outside, not soggy.  The fresh veggies were cooked perfectly, not overcooked and they were hot. Came with sour cream and guacamole.  
It's kind of small inside but you're not on top of each other, they do have a separate bar area.
I've been by this place dozens of times and nothing motivated me to go in, on this day perhaps it was the heat.  Glad I went in!
Too much rice on burrito, 
little more bit of black beans, cheese, lettuce, tomatoes, sour cream, guacamole. 
Service was good, friendly waitstaff. 
Clean restaurant, nice Mexican atmospherics decor & music.
Cooks or Chefs should wear hats or hair nets.
The good about Jalapa is that the place looks clean. It's up beat and has a fun atmosphere. The service was ok. The girl that helped me was good and she seemed to know the menu. The bad is that the food was very bland. I expect mexican food to have spice, with more flavors. I had the burrito. Now, I have worked in restaurants, I know what food cost is and how it's important it is to turn a profit. The burrito was almost all rice. Rice is a very inexpensive item. There was a few pieces of chicken and I was told there would be refried beans in it but, it was scarcely added. Along with the shell of the burrito, that menu item probably cost Jalapa, at the most, $1.00 to make. Like I said, the burrito was almost all rice. I paid $12.00. It came with about a table spoon of this strange, watery guacamole concoction and another table spoon of sour cream. I'm not looking for large portions or anything but, that was very cheap. Also, there was very little cheese, and no salsa. I feel ripped off.  Like I said, the place has a good atmosphere but, they need a new chef. Also, they should change their philosophy about why they opened a restaurant. I may give them another shot because the food was clean, but I'm in no hurry to go back.
Went in for lunch and we were able to get a seat outside on the patio. BIG margaritas, really fresh nachos with a light salsa. Had a veggie burrito with a really nice light sauce. I could taste all the individual ingredients, and the veggies were all really fresh. These folks obviously take a lot of pride in food and their restaurant.
We love this place and eat there regularly.  Everything is so tasty, and though it seems some reviewers have had bad experiences with customer service, we've had nothing but good ones here. The owners and staff are so friendly!
We have been to this restaurant many times. The food is excellent, well prepared and creatively presented. The menu is varied so would appeal to a lot of different tastes. Nicely spiced and very good flavor to everything. My only complaint is that the wine selection is pretty boring.
Very small inside but a decent menu size. My kids love it here and actually will eat the beans and rice! They make a homemade cilantro pesto kinda sauce that is ahhhhmazing!!!! 
Good food! Not great Mexican but very good!! 
Most American palates these days trend toward the Tex-Mex style.  This usually involves lots and lots of cheese and "cheese foods".  If that's your thing, I would recommend you head toward your local "bell (and believe me, I like it too!)".  That said, Jalapa hasn't failed us yet.  Good authentic Mexican food without all the cheesy distractions.  
They don't have a huge menu and that is just fine, there is no need for 100 options if you only do 15 well.  We have enjoyed the gamut that Jalapa offers from the excellent warm chips and salsa to carne, vegetarian burritos and fish (the talapia on the bone is amazing!).  I'll add that the margaritas are wonderful, though my advice is to get the individual vs. the pitcher...for some reason they are just better.
We dined here 3 times and it has been very good.  Outside seating is what makes it complete. Wait staff on all previous occasions visited was attentive, however this time not quite as attentive but acceptable.
Great Mexican Food and Drinks, Great Service and Food is Plentiful. The Frozen Daiquiri and Margarita Drinks are Great
I won't come back here again, for the food there I can make it at home instead! The food is not that great and I find Alamo restaurant in Milford is much better, the food is tastier!
I've been to Jalapa several times now and have loved it each time. Food is very good, they do serve beer and margarita's, and have nice outdoor seating. This is not a fancy place, but a good solid choice for a local spot.
We waited for 45 minutes for a burrito and a salad. 45 minutes. We checked with our waitress twice and we were told that the kitchen is "really backed up." Great. At this point we've been at the restaurant for over an hour. I wish I could say that the food was redeeming but it wasn't. 

I got an avocado salad. It had four tiny pieces of avocado, one of which was COMPLETELY rotten. I asked our waitress for a new piece of avocado to replace the rotten one. She went back and checked with management and came back and said I WOULD HAVE TO PAY  EXTRA FOR IT. I will never return to this restaurant. 

Making a customer pay for rotten food when they ask to have it replaced is ridiculous. See attached pictures of rotten avocados. We live down the street and I will tell people not to go here based on the management. Totally ridiculous to haggle over replacing rotten food.
First time eating at Jalapa. What a nice surprise. Authentic Mexican food. Wait staff so great. Started us off with really crispy chips and excellent salsa. I ordered a burrito. Out came the largest burrito I have ever seen. It was incredible. The best I have ever had. The guacamole was awesome. Great decor. Fun place to go. We ate in as the terrace was full. Can't wait to go back again.
At first glance - this place looks like a charm - but buyer beware.  There are errors in the menu to start.  Burrito listed all ingredients except forgot to mention rice which was the primary ingredient to the burrito!!!  I definately would not have ordered it since I was low carbing!  Packed with rice and hardly any shriveled up burnt steak.  When I called it to the waitress attention she casually replied "Oh ha, that menu has lots of errors!  She then offered to make a a burrito with the listed ingredients - however, there was the equivalent of a mini tomato and like a half leaf of lettuce - this time there primary ingredient was slimy black beans :(   Too bad since I waited over 1/2 an hour for a lousy burrito.  When I refused to eat it, the waitress replied WE DON"T TAKE ERRORS OFF THE CHECK.  NEVER GO TO THIS DUMP in Millis save your $$ and get ingredients from local market - you'll fare far better.
Great Mexican food is hard to find - great Mexican food with great service even harder.  We were initially excited about Jalapa when it opened and ate there without complaint for a few months.  The food is good (not great).  The difference between good and great mexican food comes down to the flavor - especially how the good is spiced.  Too spicy and its not good at all, to little and its bland.  Jalapa errs on the too little side, so its good, but not great.  The one exception is the homemade guacamole - that is some of the best guac I've eaten and we've actually ordered just the guac for takeout on occasion.

Service, though, is where this restaurant is failing.  When we first started eating there we consistently had a waiter who was excellent.  Attentive, fast, friendly, recognized that we came in often and made us feel welcome.  The last few times we've been the service has changed dramatically.  We watched during one meal as our waitress continually attended to her (or her family's) children who were in the restaurant.  Getting her attention was difficult.  We felt like we were bothering her.  Another time we sat and waited for 15 minutes before someone even brought water - and its not like the restaurant is big or was crowded.  They just ignored us.

However, the last time we went was the proverbially "straw that broke the camel's back".  We went on a Saturday night.  The website says they are open until 10pm.  We arrived at 9:20pm (after driving out of our way to get there) and they told us the "kitchen was already closed".  Unacceptable.  You can't say you are open until 10pm and not actually be open (or at least tell people you close the kitchen at 9pm.  With 40 minutes we felt we could order and eat (it's Mexican afterall) in less than 40 minutes.  But even more - they were kind of rude about it.  After having eaten there 10-12 times I felt like that was pretty disrespectful.

So - decent (good) Mexican food but declining service.  We'll probably give it another try to see if they've turned things around but only because there aren't many other choices in the area.
I ordered a veggie quesadilla and quesadillas for my sons.  The cheese was awful. It was not a Mexican cheese and tasted like a very poor quality mozzarella.  I had asked them to add jalapeños to mine and I told the waiter they must've forgot to add them. He came back saying they were in there, but I never saw one and was charged an extra $2.50 (outrageous up charge) for them. The owner's family or friends were also eating there at the same time as us and they're young child kept playing with the lights between the wall and our chairs and no one said a thing to him. It was very uncomfortable and invasive. This was a terrible experience and we won't be back unless they change the quality of their food and the treatment of their customers.
Very pleasant experience...

Very nice quiet restaurant with Mexican romantica music... Lovely people... Smiling, courteous, easy going...

I had a delicious margarita (golden) very good and sweet...

Also good tilapia fish with rice and beans...

It was delicious!!!
We've lived in the area for years...have been coming to Millis House of Pizza before current ownership.  There pizzas are really good and consistent...their subs are also really good... especially the steak and cheese...  Although we have tried all of the pizza places in the area we still keep coming back here...  Reasonably priced... always get the order right... although the one time it was wrong..they apologized profusely and offered to deliver correct item free of charge...this is a solid choice....
Tried out tonight got the Fenway Calzone and it was good! 
even liked the side sauce.
Kids liked their pizza, I forgot to try but looked good. Will def be back to try more things
Always great. Terrific crust, wome wonderful sause year after year. COnsistent. Big portions. quick service.
They make good subs with lots of fillings, not skimpy at all! I do love their Fenway pizza, I usually get the family size :-) 
They are pretty good with the deliveries, they are one of my favorite pizza places. The people there are very nice, I always see many repeat customers there.
Wanted to try a pizza that wasn't from Medfield. It was a nice change. Enjoyed two pizzas - one regular crust and one with thin crust. Both were delicious!!! I would recommend. Tons of other dishes also... pasta, wraps, salads... 
I wouldn't say it's terrible but it isn't the greatest pizza. Comparable to Pizza Hut or Dominos. The wings were ok and the mozzarella sticks ok as well. Reasonably priced and fast service. There are better options for pizza right up the street.
This is the worst pizza I have ever eaten!!!!!!  If you are thinking of buying pizza here save yourself the $ and go to the grocery store and buy a Celeste frozen pizza for $1.25. It is far better!
Love coming here when family comes to town. Our family loves Italian food (second generation) and this is pretty close to being in Italy! The prices are amazing!! Although they do specials they do not skimp on portions.
My kids are super picky but love coming!
It can get crowded on Way Back Wednesdays (most menu items are $10, salads are not included in these specials)
We always make reservations and are seated within 5 mins.
I love that they do not rush you out when they are doing Early Bird or Way Back Wed
This is def are go to for formal dinner in this area
We really like Primavera....great place for a nice family Italian dinner. We have dined here many times over the years. Always prompt and great service...in a lovely atmosphere. We have even held two private functions here...both were well put together and the food was awesome. 
The menu is large and diverse, but quality is not compromised...food is served hot and well prepared...and most importantly, it is delicious. The pasta is great, salads are fresh, the antipasto appetizer is fresh, interesting, and huge. We have never ber5n able to finish the antipasto, but they do box up the leftovers nicely.  They have everything from classic Italian specialties, steaks and chicken to fresh fish and seafood options. Large parking lot. Clean restrooms. If you are in the mood for Italian, Primavera is a sure pick. You won't leave hungry.
My wife and I were joined by several friends at this surprisingly good restaurant. The wait staff were friendly and efficient, and the food was very good, and in large portions.

Dinner includes a soup or salad, and we both had an excellent New England clam chowder for starters. The past and veal were especially good, with 4 large slices of veal in the dish we ordered, which was an interesting variant of veal Marsala, with tons of mushrooms and vegetables as well. The dessert list looked inviting, but the main meal was so large we didn't have any room left to try the desserts. 
My family and I visited this restaurant about once a month for many years.  unfortunately we have noticed that over the past year or so the service has gone downhill.  our last visit on sunday in may was our last.  we were promptly seated by the hostess and then ingnored for about 15 minutes (when we received some water from the bus boy).  the waitress arrived about 20 minutes in to take drink orders, and then disappeared.  at the 30 mark we received our drinks (2 wines and 2 sodas).  The waitress took our orders and then disappeared.  we eventually got our salads and entrees (3 salads) 4 entrees.  the meal took over two hours from start to finish.  the restaurant was about 1/3 full and there were two waitresses and one busboy working the room (there may have been a bartender too).   The food was very good (as always) however the service was so poor we have decided that we will not be back.
Last night my family (4 adults, three boys ages 3, 4 & 6 plus a 5 month old baby girl...who are and were EXTREMELY well behaved) went to dine at Priavera to celebrate my son and his wife's 10th wedding anniversary (which was held at Primavera)...it was AWFUL!!!!
We arrived for a 5pm reservation....all 8 of us.
From the service, to the sauce is was lacking!  We were seated...our waters were filled and bread was brought to the table...the waitress then came to take drink orders...we asked for butter...she turned grabbed 4 foil wrapped individual slices and tossed them onto the table (REAL CLASSY...NOT)...our drinks came and mine was supposed to be a Bellini of some sort...but it was Persecco and some watered down liquid of no flavor...served in the thinnest small champagne flute ($8 mind you)...then...we waited....and waited...and waited....finally we went up to the hostess and had to ask for menus...when she brought them we politely asked for 2 additional children's papers to color as there was only ONE given out and the three boys wanted to color....can't they see and count to three?  She brought 2 more children's activity sheets and one half filled broken box of crayons.   As soon as our menus arrived the waitress saw them being handed out and rushed to our table to ask if we were ready to order!  Seriously I hadn't even had a chance to open mine and the hostess was still at our table!  We told her we had just gotten our menus and needed a minute...She then exclaimed..."Good...now I can take a break".....Then...we waited....and waited.....and waited........Finally she came back to us....we ordered two orders of calamari, which ended up being a few rings of actual calamari and mostly deep fried banana pepper rings (a cheap way to stretch the calamari)...we had to be very careful to seek out the actual calamari and not feed the boys hot peppers as they look very similar when deep fried.....VERY DISAPPOINTED as the little ones and myself do not like hot peppers!  Next came our salads and my soup.  The salads were average (lettuce, 2 black olives and a cherry tomato...nothing more)...my soup was supposed beef and barley...and it was watery, the barley was so broken down it was barely visible and there was no flavor...trust me a soup must be pretty bad for me to add salt to it....and I had to add salt!  This soup must have been made days ago since the barley was minuscule and you really could not tell it was even barley...obviously the soup was old, watered down and tasteless...and this was early in the evening.  Then we waited...and waited...........and waited.  Finally our entrees arrived.  My sausage cacciatore was GROSS....THE WORST I HAVE EVER EATEN!  The peppers and mushrooms were crunchy/raw and the sauce was bitter/burnt tasting yet seemed but not fully cooked.  My husband had steak tips which he said were tough as rubber.  Normally, I would have sent my meal back but I didn't want to cause upset as my son and his wife were upset enough with the service and there lack of.  I just could not wait to leave!  When it came time for dessert we asked if they had a complimentary dessert for the 3yr old as it was his true actual birthday (my son & wife's anniversary is April 29 and his birthday is the 39th).  We were told they don't have cake..........huh?  What restaurant didn't have a cake or brownie type dessert especially one that caters to weddings and functions????  They took a piece of chocolate pie and stuck a candle in it and gave it to him.  Thankfully, we have raised our grandchildren to appreciate and not complain.  Our bill was amazingly quickly presented then.  Needless to say we paid it, tipped and left as quickly as possible.  Now please understand, the place was semi-filled, there was plenty of waitstaff etc. and we had a reservation.  
If you are even thinking of going to Primavera....DON'T GO...save yourself the money...
the aggravation and the stomach ache that comes later.  We will NEVER EVER go back!
It's awful.....just AWFUL!!!!
After a poorly handled meal problem, and not great server training, I wrote the restaurant the following:

Dear Primavera:

We came in with another couple for dinner last Saturday night, on 4/23/16. I have a couple of complaints to share - First, I was NOT happy with the lobster ravioli entree that I'd ordered. After calling the waitress over I first asked her if I had perhaps gotten an incorrect entree? 

I explained and I showed her that there were shrimp, but absolutely no lobster. Further the ravioli's, when I opened them up for her with my fork, you could only see cheese filling and particles of what looked to be spinach - No lobster. 

The closest thing that I saw that possibly looked like lobster were strips of red peppers thinly sliced in the Alfredo sauce. The dish had zero taste of any lobster flavor... Instead, what it was is a shrimp dish with cheese ravioli's in an Alfredo sauce. 

After explaining my displeasure and questioning if I'd received the correct meal, our waitress left to go ask the chef, and then never came back to the table with an answer - Wrong move! 

Finally the other gentleman that I was with flagged her down, and said: "Excuse me, but what did the chef say now that we're finished with our meals?"

...We'll she told us that you make all the raviolis here themselves by hand, and that they could not understand why I didn't find any lobster in them? [Ah, perhaps they gave me the wrong raviolis by chance...?] However, that she'd mentioned it to the manager. 

Not once was there ANY effort by the waitress to ask me if I would like something else instead? Can I take it back and have the kitchen correct it? Or to even say, I'm sorry, but I have now taken your meal off the check - Nothing! I mean, this is Restaurant 101!

What probably would have been the correct way to handle this was that the chef should have taken a moment to come out to the table, or that your manager had come over to introduce themselves and ask: "I understand you had a problem tonight..."? And have at least then tried to make it right - NOTHING! 

Upon leaving, my friend went to the hostess desk and started to explain to them what occurred thinking that one of two ladies was a manager. When I stepped over and joined in the conversation, all we were told were excuses... i.e., "Well it was a busy night, we had several managers and we're not sure who our waitress spoke to... SORRY!" Again, there was no offer to adjust things and obviously no senior manager to speak with! It was a TOTAL FAIL!!!

Also want to mention that the four of us were seated at a table along the wall with a padded bench and chairs. The table was accessible from both sides for the wait staff to access and serve. 

Never have I seen a waitress, and a waitress in training serve people at a table, reaching over and handing food over then other people's plates, or reaching over someone else's meal to great cheese on another plate! You simply never do that! Instead you walk around the table to the other side and serve or clear! This was NOT some diner that we were in!

Further when you order a bottle of wine, the server should open it, pour a tasting, allow you to check and make sure the wine is OK and acceptable, before filling the other people's glasses. Also for the hose ordering the wine, you never fill the glass half way up before tasting. Again another "Failure" in training even with the seasoned waitress!

Overall I think your staff totally mishandled the overall situation, and instead of the customer being right, I was wrong, and all they did was make excuses for "why" vs. embracing the problem and correcting it - Period!

It is obvious that you need to better train your staff in dealing with a situation such as this, as well as your manager's and even your chef! Plus your wait staff needs some better instructions as to proper serving food and wine!

Needless to say, I will not be in any hurry to come back anytime soon. But I thought you should know about my very poor experience.

Sincerely,

JMS
At the last minute on a Friday night, we called up and they had openings.  We rushed over (we had to pick up our son a 9PM) and we were seated quickly.  A large parking lot that can get filled easily.  It might help to repaint the lines due to some folks who park creatively when given the chance.

The dinning area is sizable but the seating along the walls seem almost a little too tight...only almost.  I found it quiet.  Certainly not boisterous.

Plenty of wait staff and we got an extra drink due to an error on their part.  Recognized by them and no charge. Always checking if things were OK with drinks and bread.  Quite friendly and personable.  They serve beer but it is not listed on the menu.

Bread, appetizers, salads and dinner were served at convenient intervals.

I had a veal parm with angel hair.  I enjoyed the veal but the angel hair kept a lot of heat inside it.  The Cesar had anchovies!!!

We were quite stuffed and I regretted not ordering a dessert to go.

During other visits, we have enjoyed their Easter and Mother's Day brunches.
Brought our daughter and family to celebrate their wedding anniversary,had their wedding reception there 16 years ago.   Sad to say it was very disappointing... Service was poor, had to wait for an hour before we got our dinner. People  who came after us got served before us.... Place  did not have many people dining in at 5 pm on a Sunday afternoon but did notice a number of take outs.  Food was so so... Pasta was soft almost mushy. Don't believe it is the same Primavera restaurant that we remember..... Sad to say😩
Wonderful authentic European food and service! New to the Cape! Service was outstanding and dinner was outstanding!
Went with friends a week ago worst service took over 45 minutes to get waitress to take food order after we spoke to manager - party's arriving after us were waited on with no problem - took almost 2 hours after speaking to manager twice wrote letter to owner been over a week no response
We arrived at 12:30 and it was like the brunch was over although they are suppose to be serving till 2pm.  Items which were labeled were no longer available even after we asked.  Almost nothing was refreshed.  We had to wait 10 minutes for plates.  Luckily there was still someone carving and making omelets, but for more than $20 per person it was not worth it.
It's not a bad place to go for a brunch, I wish they use hot water steamers for their buffet instead of manual chafting dishes. A few times I had their scrambled eggs and for some reason I always end up getting sick when I get home. The scrambled eggs need to be replaced often if it's going to sit out there too long, same with the salads. Food is good, just those eggs and salads.
I have been to the Primavera twice recently and the food and service have been very good.   Their various specials on several days of the week are very economical and quite a good bargain.
Food was really good, but the service was a bit slow.  The outside patio was very comfortable with umbrellas for shade.  Very comfortable...would go back in a minute.
We went for the Jazz Nite and had a really nice evening. The food was very good, service excellent. A good value. We will most likely return for future JAZZ NITES>
Beautiful setting lends it self to a perfect spot for Sunday brunch!....only $17 buys a varied and fantastically prepared spread that is great for all ages and appetites!...only negative was having to pay for soda refills :(...
Went to try it after being away for a long time.  It was really disappointing. The wait for drinks and bread were unusually long. Ordered a drink on their menu and watched as the bartender made 1 than tossed it, made another that was brought to me about 5 minutes after my husbands beer arrived.  While I was a little surprised to see a prosecco drink in a martini glass I enjoyed it.  I ordered the second and it was in a fluted glass, no sugar rim (as stated on the menu) and much lighter in color.  My husband noticed a spot on the glass as I was saying to the waiter that it looked different than the first.  He returned the drink, and I could hear the bartender ask in an aggravated voice, what does she want?    Not good service!!!
Dinner came and it was missing broccoli as indicated.  After we asked for it, our waiter checked the menu and asked the chef to make us the broccoli.  We didn't want the very large order of sweet potato that came instead of the broccoli.  A bit of each would have been great.  The food was pretty good but it didn't seem like the staff knew much about their menu.  I did mention to the bartender that I could hear her getting annoyed at the waiter for correcting my drink and she never looked at me and never uttered any kind of apology.  NOT RETURNING and  I do live near by. :(
Went for the all you can eat Sunday Brunch.  They make the money back charging you for each refill.  (they never said they charge for each soda & each person would pay as much for soda as the entire meal.). When we showed the coupon from their Facebook page they would not honor it.  They said we had to print it out.  I can't remember the last time since the 80's  I have been to a restaurant without free refills or that wants you to waste paper for a coupon.  A lot of food choices.  All were okay to good.  Some items like the roast were cold.  Dessert selection was good.
This place is ok, overall. The atmosphere is nice and the service is usually good. The last time I went here was with my grandfather.The chicken parmesan I ordered was decent, but my grandfather's seafood platter wasn't that good. His clams were burned and bitter. I'm sure most of their food is ok, but I would avoid the seafood.
We went for dinner last Friday and to hear Street Magic, an A Capella group that performed on their patio. We were early enough to get one of the few patio dining tables they have outside, although there is also an outside bar and firepit area. The beautiful setting, good food, reasonable prices, and excellent do-wop entertainment made it a very enjoyable evening, despite painfully slow (although very friendly) service. If things had moved at a more usual pace, they could have turned the table twice while we were sitting there, and sold us at least one extra round of drinks, so their snail's pace was not doing them any favors, either. This had to be an "off" night, as we have eaten there many times and experienced acceptable service. For that reason, I still consider Primavera to be a very good restaurant.
The DD in Millis is very good...clean shop...and spotless restrooms. Love the decaf iced lattes and of course the iced coffees, iced tea, as well as the strawberry and orange coolattas. Love the mini coolattas...great for the grandchildren. Donuts and bagels...great. Centrally located on Millis on Route 109...a very convenient stop...morning, noon, or evening.  A great place to sit in and chat with friends...never rushed. When in Massachusetts visiting relatives, we always stop in at the Mississippi Dunkin Donuts.
Typical Dunkin shop. Most local places employee local folks but don't seem to here.  Clean, quick service.  Small parking lot.
I live in Millis so instead of going to the Dunkin Donuts in Medway or Medfield which is my usual pattern thought I would try the hometown franchise after a long absence.

Arrived at 8:35 am today and went inside, was fourth in line.   

After ten minutes of watching very slow service in front of me I got to the counter and went to the "second" of the two spots in front of cash registers because it was vacant.  When the server came to where I was she had two drinks in her hand that were for someone else, and then went looking for them.

Meanwhile, the "first" spot became vacant and the person who was behind me in line moved in and was immediately waited on.  This customer said "I have a long list," which was certainly true.
After another 3-4 minutes no one came back to where I was standing and I gave up and left.

In total I was there 12-15 minutes, and no staff person ever acknowledged my existence with a word or eye contact. I don't believe it is the customer's job to yell to get attention or to cause a scenen by interrupting another customer who was waited on  out of turn.    

Guess they don't need me,   and I can assure Dunkin Donuts of Millis that the feeling is mutual.
This is my family's favorite place, great roastbeef sandwiches and even better boneless wings. The garlic peppercorn sauce is our favorite. 
It's just a sub shop but the food is fresh and flavorful. 
When my children were young, it was the closest McDonald's...they loved the breakfasts and of course, the Happy Meals. Over the years, they have renovated several times, but still have great service and a convenient  drive-thru that stays opens extended hours. Now, my grandchildren frequent this particular McDonald's. Love the dollar menu, the ice cream, and the very reasonably priced iced tea. Something for everyone should be their motto.
It's not much better with the new owners (a group of 5 guys) that's running it now. It was just as bad with the old owner, Robin! Not only it needs a rehab, they need to improve how to take food orders correct in plain English, stop talking/texting on their phones while being idle. The fries was fried in old oil, too much salt after I told them no salt added. The burgers seemed smaller than ever and it tasted like it had sat in their warming tray for awhile. Hardly much of any fillings inside the burgers.

The owners also took over the other McDonald's in Medway, Bellingham, and two other Milford McDonald's - I haven't venture there yet.
Run down and sad inside.  Needs a rehab badly.  Old, broken decor and tables.  Don't eat inside - get it to go. Typical food and quality you find at any McDonald's.
Friendliest services.  Clean and neat.  Plenty of parking.  A loyal local clientele.  A good spot for biscuit sandwich breakfasts.
We live in Seattle but whenever we are in Boston, we always come here.  Today I read the bad reviews and it hurt my feelings, which is ridiculous because I don't have any share in ownership and I don't live near here.  I wondered if the place had gone that far downhill in the last 2 years since we were here.  Thankfully, it hadn't.  Our food (steak tips, bbq lamb and sausage, plus their delicious salad) was just as good as always, service was good and we are going back tomorrow.  It is quirky for sure, part of the charm....don't miss it!
The service is always great,the steak tips will melt in your mouth,order with the salad,the dressing will run under your steak,it is the best !!! I live out of state now,and will still drive over one and a half hours to this restaurant.I've been a regular  for 30 years. the only thing is you canno't order coffee,or tea,they only take cash.
What is there to say? I've eaten here since it opened close to 40 years ago. Great food, good value, consistency. Love the steak tips, house salad dressing, giant antipastos, steak fries that are as big as small logs, wind dings!! Wish I could say something about another entree, but in all the years I've eaten here, I've never gotten past the steak tips on the menu - they are that good. Only warning is that if you are a larger woman, plan on using the restroom elsewhere, because their's is tight!! And if you're out for atmosphere instead of food, stay home and miss a wonderful meal.
I went here 2-3 a week back in the 80s. The best. Had the  pleasure of going while buzzing through Boston area.  Still the same costs more but well worth it. Love this place.  
If you love steak tips then this is the place for you but don't ask what they marinate the tips in or they may have to kill you! Their salad dressing which is homemade is so good I could drink it. Everything on the menu is great. Whatever you order, you won't go wrong! By the way, CASH only!
We never order anything else.  We went back twice during a visit to Boston; only had tips, medium rare, salad and bread.  Not fancy, never was.  Back in the day, when we lived in Natant, a town north of Boston, the line was out the door.  Now, 35 years later, not so due to competition down the road.  However, this will always be our place to go.  We drove through rush hour traffic with two grandkids in the back seat for quite a distance to get here and were glad we did, both times!   We've never tried anything else so I can't comment on the other dishes.
I've been coming here for years and had a very good meal with my sister and cousin. After our meal, we were talking when I noticed a bug on the table in front of me. I killed it with my soda glass and asked my sister what it was. She said it was a roach and, unfortunately, I believed her because she at one time had a license to exterminate them. We were so grossed out after that. We should have called the manager or waitress over to see the roach, but in the state we were in we didn't think of it. We can never ever go there again even though the food was delicious. When you see one roach, there are hundreds more.
This restaurant has been a favorite of mine and my friends for over 30 years. There used to be a line out the door to get a seat but things have slowed down a little. I have to say that the flavors are the same as there were on my first time there. I'm thinking of going back again today.
Does not accept cash. Hamburger meat burnt. Waitress using unclean hands (played with hair) to put bread in basket.
Visited here in May, 2016, brought here by a friend who extolled the virtues of their steak tips.  Our group of 5 let him order for all of us.  We each had a giant meatball which was nearly the size of a softball, and excellent.  We shared a plate of their French fries.  This was enough for 5 because the fries are house cut from mutant potatoes the size of footballs, averaging in length from 6" to 8".  Yumm.  And, we all had the steak tips with salad, medium rare.  Melt in your mouth with wonderful flavor, and cooked perfectly.  Very nice wait staff.  Now, do not let the outside appearance of the restaurant discourage a visit.  Plenty of free parking across the street.  Not much to look at, but have you come here to EAT or photograph the building??  I cannot wait to return to this "hidden jewel".....
The antipasto is the best I ever have and thats saying a lot coming from an Italian family. The portions are generous but the service could be improved upon. The atmosphere is definitely all about the bar. I would recommend! 
I've been going there for the past 10 years.The food is excellent the bartenders are great a family atmosphere. Their specialty are the steak tips.they also have chicken,fish,turkey tips ,burgers.If you go on a weekend get there early the placed is packed.If you sit at the bar tell them Jimmy Fortissmo sent me 🍷🍷🍷.
This place was the best  for country style ribs and lamb tips for many years.Unfortunately my last visit was absolutely terrible ,
The quality of the meats  used and value has change dramatically. 
Overall a big disappointment for a classic  to go down hill after so many years in service. Major bummer.....
The steak tip dinner and their salad with their famous dressing wins me over all the time! My husband and I go here frequently and are never disappointed!  Also other favorites, pork tips, the meatballs and meat sauce are soo good, chicken lemons, chicken Parmesan! Only bring cash credit cards not accepted! Jeans and sneakers kind of place, well worth the wait, there is always a line to get in!
love the combo dishes pick a mix if you can't decide, great salad and hand cut french fries ! Everything from the grill is cooked to perfection , never had a bad meal here
Love the steak and lamb tip combo. The marinade is delicious. The one you can buy is not the same. I didn't like it. The salad is good. Nothing fancy. Dressing is my favorite. I buy it to go. This tastes just the same as in the restaurant. No atmosphere. It's a restaurant in a bar. Lot of locals. Gets busy on weekend nights. Good place to get a gift certificate for someone at the holidays. Portion size average.
Great people work at this restaurant/bar; the lamb tips are unbeatable, as are the sirloin tips. Make sure to get an Antipasto salad, but not one too big; the single serves two.
Having friends over for dinner, picked up 3lbs raw steaks tips to cook on the grill--salad eaten, sides ready-take tips out of the container and what. Tips look like scrap pieces--too late to do anything, cooked them up and gross. Paid good money, never again for raw meat from here. 
I have salivated over their steak tips, salad, and steak fries for more than 30 years; however, my last two visits were extremely disappointing and I will never go back.  Even the waitress agreed with me when I was shocked at the price of the steak tips -- now at $18.99!  The salad which normally was served on the plate with the steak tips along with the wonderful homemade dressing was instead served separately with the dressing on the side as well.  Therefore, that wonderful mix of the steak juice, marinade, and dressing was gone.  It was not requested on the side.  Plus, the salad had the end of the lettuce head -- how could anyone even put that on a plate for a customer or the waitress even serve it?!  I sent it back.

Then over the weekend, I got an order to go in a torrential rain storm.  Got home and had the wrong order.  

New Bridge, you've gone down the tubes.  Fare the well.
I've been enjoying the food from this place for over 20 years.  And I mean quite literally the food from this place, as in, not there.  There seems to be something about great food in urban dives that requires that the staff is deplorable (like Santarpio's Pizza in East Boston.)
We got the north end pizza.  It was ok, but I am spoiled in CT with good NY style pizza and this was not the same.  The kids did like it.  The oreo cake and whoopie pies were good, but we were staying at a hotel and the creamy cake came with no utensils.  No napkins either.  Will try another place next time.
This is a Deli type store they leans Italian in is style. The facility used to be called Rosetti's years ago. Nino had kept the style and flavor of the old and added his own touch. Great Italian bread by the loaf, and a TRUE Italian sub
The best cannoli can be found here. I have had them at many different places and none compare to Elm Street. My family loves the eclairs and cupcakes as well.
The lines out the door should tell it all!  Great pastries, cakes, pies, Italian specialties, fabulous cookies, bread, breakfast goodies.  Enjoy!
Elm Street Bakery has been in our neighborhood-city for many years…Holidays the lines are out the door and around the block….Great bread, snacks are yummy and the help is fantastic..
Love this bakery, have been going here for 30 plus years.  Everything is fresh and always tastes great!
The delicious cakes and pasteries are worth the added calories. The wait was that long and the girl that waited on me was very nice. I will go back again soon.
It is a cute little bakery on Elm St. Off street parking is available. Fresh breads, pastries and a assortment of other goodies. I have to avoid going in at times because I always leave with my hands full of some many goodies. cannoli's YUMM!! cookies and did I mention Bread? They have the very best bread around. people do come from other areas just for the bread alone. Customer service is always very friendly and welcoming. It is not a huge place but very nice. When you walk in you are really surrounded by all of the great things they make here. Never have I ever gotten a bad anything from this location. Definitely A must do if your in town or passing through. Elm Street Bakery, You guys are Rockstar man.. I'm telling you, they are the best outside of Downtown Boston and points north.
The bread, rolls, cookies and pastries are delicious.  They are always fresh.  The mini pastries are great for holidays!
I love this place. They have great chocolate dipped strawberries that r just huge. Their canolies and other pastries are to die for in this area...this is a great place to go and it's not expensive.
This bakery has the best mm cookies around
There pizza bagel are great for tailgating at games pick up some half calzones and slices of pizza 
Always has fresh bread and there cupcakes are amazing 
Enjoy
Gifted a ricotta pie.  Have been looking for a great one since our favorite bakery closed.  Creamy, excellent flavor, soft crust.  Def. our go to place for this pie.  Now have to locate it and try out other offerings as well.
Elm st bakery i think has the best pastries around even better than some northend shops the prices are great the services is the best cant go wrong  if you have to have something special made they can do it or  yoy can buy right off the shelf still the best 
This is the best bakery. it is old school and new school. you can get all the stuff we had as kids like a chocolate cake with the jimmys on the sides of it. i tried to get that at another bakery and they told me it was a soecial order. everything is fresh and delicious
The best ricotta pie I have ever had. No one makes it like they do. I have tried numerous times to make it like they do and I just can't get it right. It's worth a drive! 
OK, this is a bakery only locals would know and I would have no clue about it if someone did not take me there years ago, but me the cannoli-lover always find an excuse to go there even though it is really out of the way. 

It is by no means a fancy place, like a traditional neighborhood Italian bakery, but they do a lot of business and they are busy all the time, hence the freshness of their products. I do not like the weird colored Italian cookies, or cakes, so all I buy from Elm Street Bakery is cannolis and almond macaroons, at least a dozen of each, well I go through them like there is no tomorrow. 

I highly recommend their cannolis, they are fresh, well priced and very good. It is really hard to find a place that has that fresh cannolis, most places make them in bulk and they keep them sitting for days...Same goes for their almond macaroons, they are soft inside and full of almond flavor, s good. 

Other products are typical Italian flavors, I did not try them enough to rate them, but again the place is packed at all times so I am assuming they are not that bad. 

This is not a cafe, you pick up and go, they have parking at behind the building, very busy before the holidays.  They have a Facebook page if you want more details.
Excellent Thai food. The chicken pad Thai was so delicious. Quick service and fresh food. Would revisit. 
Location is just a 'hole in the wall' size but their service is great, fast, and the tasty fare has been well worth returning for!
I have been there around 5 times so far in 2015 and the food is always tasty and fresh.  The place is small and thus I would consider it more of a "neighborhood" sushi and Asain cuisine restaurant.   They have limited staff but they hustle and get the food out quickly.   Great selection of creative Maki rolls!
Sei Bar is my go-to place in the Everett/Malden area for higher end Asian food. They have Chinese, Japanese and even some Thai food that is a cut above the regular fast-food Chinese delivery places(they do deliver for a 1 or 2 dollar delivery charge). While we usually get take out, they have five or six tables and a tiny sushi bar. I have taken company there several times and they are always impressed. This is a small place and the tables are close together but it is nice when you just need to get out.
The Cold Sesame noodles are the best I have ever had. All the entrees are better than average. I usually go for Sesame beef or chicken. If I eat in I always have the Shrimp Tempura(tempura doesn't travel well); huge shrimp and veggies with a subtle dipping sauce. They have a creative sushi menu with the spicy tuna being the tip of the iceberg. The prices are medium but worth it. For the best value, go before 3 pm for lunch. They have a nice lunch menu with smaller servings at a great price. They have several choices of Saki and beer as well. This may be a small place but well worth checking out!
We are regulars at Companions.  The waitresses are great, food is good, atmosphere is nice, they are always able to accommodate us when we have a large group.  They always treat us very well.
We stopped here unexpectedly on our way home from a road trip and loved the place! The atmosphere is nice, the I Irish Bartender was just lovely and the food was very yummy! I had the eggplant rollatini, which was an appetizer. Not only was it delicious, I took half of it home because the portion was so big! My husband had the Sausage sub with peppers and onions and devoured it. We'll definitely be back!!
everything here is just excellent! chef bobby can create anything you like, the pizza is out of this world i would put it up to the best of the best!!! getting to the italian dishes well they speak for themselves baked haddock, chicken broccoli zit, steak tips i can go on and on and very reasonable too!!!
Great Italian food, cooked to order. This is a nice neighborhood eatery where the food never disappoints. Taste like home cooked authentic Italian specialties.
Went for lunch today with my dad. Have not been here in years. I was pleasantly surprised. The food was really good and not over priced. My father enjoyed his meal. The waitress was pleasant. I went to the bar to play Keno and the bartender was super nice. We really enjoyed ourselves.
On Saturday went for dinner. New clean great staff. The dinner we had was excellent .pepper encrusted pork loin with warm maple glaze. Grilled veggies cook just right. Cost $52.00 for 2 no alcohol. Will go back!!
love their salad with steak tips. Service is good. Good for lunch and dinner. Good for families and friends.
it is very seldom that you can find a stuffed artichoke at a restaurant but this places has the biggest and best stuffed artichoke you will ever taste. (except your own mothers). great atmosphere and very friendly.
Awesome prices, fast friendly knowledgeable service. They have a wide variety of ice cream & slush flavors to choose from. They give great portions. The girls working are in high school but take their job seriously. They are always so nice & helpful. My daughter just turned 6 & loves going there to chit chat with them. They always recognize repeat customers. Not to mention one time last year we ordered some ice cream & right away within about 3 seconds of holding it, my daughter dropped it. I offered to pay for another one but the staff very kindly declined & gave my daughter a new one on the house,  which I thought was exceptional & a rare thing these days. Dairy Maid is just an all around great local family place & I'm sad to see them close for the winter but my family & i will be there when they reopen in the spring. 
Love the new items they have - lots of slush and ice cream combos, different flavors of soft serve etc.  The coffee soft serve with chocolate jimmies was incredible - the black raspberry frappe was the best thing I ever had and the maple walnut ice cream is loaded with huge walnut pieces.
Their pistachio muffins are the best. I also like their corn muffins. Service was as good as any other franchise coffee place. Coffee is fresh although I am more of a Dunkin donuts person in terms of coffee honeydew is pretty good. They recently renovated and it looks great inside and out. Always clean. 
My husband & I order from Domino's occasionally.  The food is always great and got/fresh!  Prices are very reasonable and love the online ordering too!  Our favs are the pizza, salads & grilled veggies sub!
This Burger King love location is surprisingly great. The staff is always genuinely friendly and social. They pay attention to their customers, co-worker and what their doing so it is rare for them to screw up your order whether you go to drive-thru or inside and it's always clean, even their rest rooms. I hate using public rest rooms for obvious reasons but I don't mind theirs at all. Never any issues there. Also the drive-thru is quick and accurate. The staff speak clear and accommodate even the craziest of orders easily. This BK is the only location within miles upon miles that has an indoor play area for kids 2-10. It's a great place to go and let the kids let loose for a little while on rainy days. I just wish they would put apple SLICES* back in the kids meal options and had better toys.
After checking in to our park and sleep hotel, we found Volare open and still serving dinner at 10:00. We enjoyed the local vibe and food very much. My husband ordered a lamb chop special with a wonderful blueberry sauce and rosemary mashed potatoes. I liked the veal Marsala with tagliatelle and fresh Parmesan cheese. We didn't have desserts but they sounded good. Service was friendly and crisp. 
On our last evening in New England, we had a really great meal to remember our first visit to Massachusetts, New Hampshire, and Maine.  The manager at the Marriott not only recommended the restaurant but arrange for the hotel shuttle take us there immediately.  
As soon as we arrived, we were seated.  We had drinks and looked over the menu.  Now you should know this right away.  I'll eat Italian, but it is not high on my list.

Was I in for a bigga surprise.  I was packing a large appetite, and the first item was a large bowl of homemade soup.  I honestly can not remember a more enjoyable experience.  The bowl was the largest I have seen used in a restaurant.  And I ate every bit of it.  Next was the main course, can't remember the full name but it was something Marsala.  It was very good, my wife and I exchanged food bites her choice was was also very tasty.  But I just wanted to devour my meal and the serving was a little more than I should have, but it was so good.

Afterwards, we allowed our server to recommend dessert, it was a house creation, lots of different chocolates on a homemade brownie and vanilla ice cream. 

We have traveled the world, but this Italian meal is one that I will remember as one of the best I have had.

The wait staff, was very attentive.  They called our hotel and the shuttle picked us very quickly.  Wow what a great evening.
We went to Volare on a Saturday Niteand  sat at the bar Brittney was the best bartender, We told her what we liked to drink and she made us a drink OMG it was amazing, The eggplant was unbelievable, then I had Boscaiola ( Fusilli) with chicken and mushrooms, and the bread with oil, you just have to go and see ask for Brittney or Gianna
This was our second visit to Volate (obviously we like it here).   My favorite appetizer is the Bruschetta Trinacria - it is amaaaazzzing - the topping is made smooth by the creamy ricotta and it's a bit sweet because of the evoo balsamic glaze. Um!  The special appetizer of the night was  Lobster Arancini - I wish they were a regular on the menu - absolutely delicious. The Fettucinecon Panna is very very buttery. I got it with chicken and mushrooms. Unfortunately the chicken was a bit dry. The Bolognese is pretty good. Veal Marsala is fantastic - and I don't usually like Marsala!  The desserts are large but disappointing - save your appetite (and your money) for an appetizer instead - you won't be disappointed 
this is a very nice Italian restaurant in Revere, you don't need to go to Boston!  good service, excellent drinks and pleasant ambiance makes for a very nice dinner experience!
We enjoyed the atmosphere and food here.  We had the Veal Marsala and Lobster ravioli both of which were well prepared and delicious.  Their prices are affordable and service was very friendly.  Definitely recommend if you are in the mood for some good Italian food.
Dependable, reliable and good food. It offers all  the typical red sauce dishes and more. You can't go wrong here. Specials daily and fresh pasta. Enjoy!
I took my secretary here for Administrative Assistant's Day.  We had an excellent meal.  We started with a grilled shrimp appetizer that quite frankly we could have licked the bowl it was so good.  It came over artichoke, white beans, peas, tomatoes in a pesto sauce.  The bread was warm and excellent as well.  The wine was decent by the glass and a healthy pour.  She had veal marsala and I had chicken marsala.  Both meals were excellent.  We had a GROUPON so it was not expensive but the prices are reasonable even without the discount.  we will return
Love that Volare's has come to Revere. It is so nice to go to the center of town and have great Italian food! Although they don't have a parking lot, they do have free valet parking. I do prefer the high top tables over the regular seating in the back but that's just a personal preference! All my comfort foods in one place....for 28 years my sons have said that I make the best meatballs but now their favorite is Volare's veal meatballs (even I have to admit they are soooo good). My husband's favorite meal is their Chicken Marsala --which is excellent, moist, flavorful, great mushrooms, etc! Although there are so many delicious meals on their menu my all time favorite is the fusilli, rabe & sausage......and of course I always have to have a side of fried polenta! If you are not that hungry may I suggest a Vino della casa y zuppa di lenticchie!
A tavola non si invecchia. - Italian proverb. Translation: At the table with good friends and family you do not become old.
you can't go wrong with any dish here or any app for that matter, chef salvo brings to the table the freshest ingredients and most authentic italian dishes from his sicilian back round great drinks also a must try!!
Staff was very nice, and the Chicken saltimbocca was delicious!  Prices are average for fine cuisine.
I have eaten at Volare (mostly for lunch) many times.  The food is consistently good.  Never had a problem getting at table.  Would highly recommend.
Been 5 or 6 times. Always  consistently good! One of only 4 great Italian restaurants in a 20 mile radius. Favorite is Broccoli Rabe with fusilli and chicken. Great salads and apps. Parking sometimes a problem and atmosphere could be cozier. Service is always woderful at table service. Had a couple of not so great experiences with bartenders, but food makes up for it. Top notch and real italian. Great red sauce, which had to find! 
Great place.
Food was good but very loud music. I could not get in a romantic dinner with the loud music.more low keyed ballads needed.
Had an impromptu birthday/anniversary dinner here on August 13.  Outside of a little confusion with ordering...think I totally confused our waitress by arriving very early.

We had a nice antipasto.  Mom has chicken parm and my sister and I tried something off the menu chicken saltimbocca and fussili and rabbi.

The saltimbocca was a bit salty, but tasty. While the fussili wasn't what I intended, it was delicious.

Coffee was hot and strong and a great way to end the meal.

Overall a great meal.
Took my mom and wife there for Mothers Day because so many folks raved about the place. We had reservations and were seated right away, the atmospere is simple but nice. The waitstaff was nice but I ordered calamari for one of the appetisers  and it never came out. The food is good not great and while I was disappointed I think it was because I was expecting so much more because of all the hype. Had I not heard all the raving I might not have been disappointed although it still would not change the quality of the meal. My mom and wife felt the same...good not great. It was a little pricey but not bad. I don't see us returning anytime soon.
I read all of the good and the bad reviews! This is the scoop, the food is awesome! I have never received a bad meal here! 

The wait staff are just okay except for Paul who is amazing! Ask to sit in his section!

Yes, we tend to feel rushed also! Just order your apps and finish them and then order your food! Tell the bus boys when the come around to pack up your food before your done eating that you will let them know when you are finished! 

The owner does sit at the bar! He is a very nice guy and he can flirt with who ever he would like! He is single and ready to mingle! Lol

As far as people doing drugs in the bathroom, I have never ran across this, and yes after the kitchen closes it is a bar! People drink! 

I suggest that you should go to dinner  between 5-8 and you will not run into any sort of bar behavior! 

The bottom line is the food is good! I love this place and when I am in the mood for pasta I love it here!!!!
Me and my wife wanted to try this place since we moved to Revere in January. I had read reviews and driven past daily. Last week we decided to give it a shot. The food was ok, the service was very slow. After we were done we moved to the bar for a couple of cocktails while waiting for some friends. It called our attention that there was a bold guy giving free shots and trying to hook up with girls at the bar. We asked who he was and a woman close to us told us that it was the owner. What a shame! My wife went to the bathroom and saw some girls using drugs. How can this place be in business? We are never going back!
This place was awful. I would give it zero stars if I could. The wait staff was horrible. Inattentive and rude. The management did not seem to care at all and seemed to be more concerned with hitting on girls at the bar. The place seemed more like a club than a restaurant. I'm shocked it is still in business. The food was mediocre at best.
Flying out of Boston tomorrow, checked trip advisor for dinning in the area. Stopped in here at Volare's and I must tell you the four of us were very impressed.. The food was great and the service staff was friendly and on the ball..  A must try if your in the area for sure..
Our meal was obviously prepared fresh and everything was delicious.  Loved every bite.  Started with the guacamole and chips and then had a combo plate of taco, enchilada and pupusa.  My daughter got a chicken quesadilla and my wife got the roast chicken.  Good sized servings.  After stuffing ourselves we each took half home to have for lunch the next day.  Obviously well liked by Latinos...we were the only English speaking folks in the place.  Don't expect great ambiance, but you will love the food.
Sketchy neighborhood with quick service and decent food. Cheap in price tasty morsels. Watch your handbags don't leave table unattended  and you'll be fine. Little rough but found was hot and satisfying. 
My wife Tara and I were married at the North House last month and cannot recommend it highly enough! Born and raised in CT, my wife and I have been to over a dozen weddings in the area and did extensive research on comparable venues. Compared to nearby options, the North House had by far the best location, flexibility, customer service, food quality, and overall value. We first looked at the venue a couple years ago when it was Belle Terrace. We loved the location, on-site ceremony option, and proximity to Avon Old Farms hotel for our guests, but had some initial concerns about management, catering, and service. These concerns were alleviated immediately during our second visit when we learned the Chabot family (Farmington Gardens owners) had purchased the property and taken over management. We met directly with co-owner Nick to discuss the space and choose a package that worked with our budget. Nick and his staff went out of their way to address our concerns, customize the menu, make exceptions to our package, recommend vendors, accommodate a rehearsal, decorate the space, and help us with all planning aspects for our big day. The family-run feel was pervasive before and after we signed our contract – a feature of the North House that stood out from the other venues we considered, which felt more like rigid wedding factories. We worked with coordinators Saleesa and Tori who were honestly as valuable as wedding planners. They met with us on weekends, took countless phone calls, kept us on task, collaborated with our vendors, stayed late the night of our rehearsal, and made sure we were calm and fed on our big day! After the reception, we invited guests for cocktails and late night snacks at the North House’s classy new restaurant, which was a quick walk from the ballroom. It was a great way to end the night and definitely a better option than the crowded hotel bar across the street. After our big day, guests raved about the food, drinks, servers, staff, venue, and overall experience. We cannot thank the North House and their staff enough for an absolutely perfect wedding day!
I expected more from a place with their reputation but I had not been there in many years.  I cannot imagine why they think that 42.00 is a reasonable price for a buffet that probably is not worth 25.00  and then add 20% service charge to the bill.  when I asked the reason for the service charge the manager told me that it is for electricity.  they don't even give it to the servers on mothers day.  wont go back
Mothers Day Brunch rundown.
$42. Plus 6.35%tax, PLUS 20% service fee which is also taxed at 6.35% (26.35%)
But this bill does NOT include gratuity!  Unless you ask, servers are paid $22. Per hr.
We were outraged! Advertised as $42 buffet without mention of a "Service Fee".
Total.  $56.75. Excluding gratuity.  Are you serious?
Buffet.  Breakfast, typical with an omelet station.   Nothing special.  Cold roasted vegetables.
Romaine. Cold beat salad.  Mixed vegetables in a chafing dish as well as fingerling potatoes.
Chafing dishes barely kept items warmer than room temp.  Carved baked ham and roast turkey.
Oh no, there was no beef for this price.  A two meat item brunch with vert few hot foods.  Shrimp cocktail, lox and bagels and cold lobster which was brought out sparingly.  And a dessert buffet with typical chocolate cake, cheesecake, ice cream, and misc pastries. 
This is not a place we would recommend for future family get togethers.  
There were 15 of us and for nearly a grand, I could have bought a ham and turkey for much less and provided a wonderful dinner.  The buffet price was ok but to add a service fee which they taxed for an additional 26% put this meal and restaurant at the bottom of our list of places to return to.  No wonder half their tables were empty.  Won't return
Had the Mother's Day brunch today and for $42 a plate it was not worth it. They advertised "grilled, chilled lobster"...this is what happened: we arrived at our dedicated reservation time and when asked where the lobster was we were told it was just brought put with the shrimp. Went immediately over to it and the ratio of shrimp to lobster on the tray was 95/5. Took some lobster, asked for clarified butter....between the waitress checking with the chef to see if he could provide butter, coming back and telling us the chef said he would prepare some for us, and the searching for the waitress, asking her about the butter and her telling us she forgot it and then finally bringing it to us...took about 20 minutes. I ate the few pieces of lobster before she delivered the butter and finally when she did I went back to the tray....no more lobster! I heard others walking by my table saying they were going for lobster.... There was none. The little they put out for our reservation time was all they were apparently planning on putting out. The other food was just average...scrambled eggs, bacon, sausage, omelets, sauteed veggies, fingerling potatoes, a pasta dish with no meat or fish,carved ham and turkey, some scones and other bread items....for me the lobster was the reason I would pay $42. I asked our waitress if they were bringing out more lobster and she said she would check....the result? I was brought a few pieces of lobster on a plate from the kitchen. That answered my question... $42 a plate bought you a few pieces of lobster and begging for more  provided a few measly more. Never again. Never.
i got married at belle terrace in avon ct this past august. the facility is very beautiful inside and the food is wonderful. however the staff is rude, disrespectful, and will do absolutely the minimum to get by. I worked with a woman named elizabeth furgeson and she was so short tempered, she had no interpersonal skills, and made promises just to get money from us but never came through with any of her promises. For example she promised us that the landscaping would be taken care of by the day of the wedding and when the day of the wedding came she went to stop and shop bought a few muffs and placed them in the court yard... no weeding was done, the mulch was old and lumpy, and the lawn was mowed very sloppy...long story short it looked awful and i had to move my ceremony inside. She also never took the time to go over my itinerary and there was no organization through out the night. my husbands brother had to take time to work with the dj to bring the night together after the guests just began to eat with no blessing given and we realized that no one from belle terrace was around to make sure everything was in order. be prepared to be on your toes and to do EVERYTHING yourself because there will be no wedding coordinator like they promise. when i say everything I mean i pretty much set the tables the day of the wedding because when i arrived early to get ready nothing was done in the ball room and i was in such panic i could not bare to just go upstairs. I was down stairs cleaning and making this presentable with my family and so stressed out. They do not make it a relaxing day for you at all. I went there the day before as well and they promised me they would take care of everything and i should not worry, when i returned the next day nothing was done. Also if you are planning on having air conditioning forget about it because magically the powerful ac they have during your tours and visits will not work the day of your event... ALL of my guests and vendors were complaining about it all night which was very embarrassing. So if you do choose this place please be prepared to be on top of everything yourself or hire a wedding planner because i looked tiered and stressed out in all of my pictures ... things where going wrong left and right... let me just say i was in the back kitchen area in my wedding dress during the ceremony because no one was there to do anything and make sure things were going smooth. In addition to all of this the cake vendor i chose from their list " creative cakes by donna" had my husband and I go for a cake tasting. The cakes we tried were amazing and delicious. we chose a vanilla cake with almond filling. i even took the time to draw her the designs i wanted on the cake and the decor I wanted on the top. she delivered a marble cake with plain butter cream frosting. the cake tasted old, had freezer burn, and did not have any of the decoration i had asked for. It was very disappointing :( she had placed dirty flowers on the top so there was dirt all over the top and by the time we cut the cake all the flowers on top were wilted. keep in mind she promised me she would not use real flowers on the topper because i do cake decorating myself and I have first hand experience with flowers wilting when the cake is left out for even an hour. Everyone who tried the cake said it was "disgusting" so dont plan of saving the topper for your one year anniversary because its barley edible the day it arrives. please dont make the mistake of trusting belle terrace or creative cakes by donna ... I dont want any bride to go through what i went through.
We went for Mother's Day brunch, and were actually very sad to see that the old Avon Old Farms building is no longer where they serve brunch -- instead there is a very large, impersonal room without any of the old inn atmosphere.  The food was excellent; I will say that.  What earned the "poor" rating was that they slapped a very large service charge (25%) on our bill without any notice that would be the case, and it was clear that a tip was expected on top of that.  We are a family of five and this was an extra expense that should have been explained when reserving the table.  We will definitely not be back.
I attended the Mothers Day brunch and was BLOWN away! The food presentation and quality was to die for! With unlimited mimosas, smoked salmon with all of the accompaniments,  an eggs benedict station, carving station and a full spread of desserts, $42.00 is a steal! During my experience, I was told that the property was under the management of Riverhouse Properties, which made it all make sense! I wish they did this every Sunday and not just on certain holidays! Make your reservation early! They sell out fast! Will definitely book my next party here!
My family and I went to Belle Terrace for Mothers Day brunch and found it to be wonderful! The food selections were incredible, the smoked brisket was the best I have ever had! The seafood hash over the poached egg was my wife and daughter's favorite. I was impressed the manager was not only helping his staff with their tables but made a point to stop at each table to ask how everything was. Overall it was a wonderful day and highly recommend Belle Terrace.
Went for Mother's Day brunch and for 42 dollars per head I was expecting more in every avenue. Food was nothing special and service was poor, at one point the Buffett heater candles went out and were not replaced until most food had cooled off. Unfortunatly nothing like the old Avon Old Farms Inn brunch of old. We will not be back 
I had brunch here yesterday with a friend and we were disappointed.  The setting and flowers on the tables were lovely but the food and selection was nothing special. Brunch is advertised from 11 am to 2pm and our reservation was for 1215.  We had some bagels with smoked salmon and then wanted to go back for more but by 1245, the salmon platter was empty and it was not replaced.  There is an eggs benedict station which is unique. It is served in a martini glass over hash with a choice of hollandaise or bernaise sauces.  The station attendant rolled her eyes when another diner asked the difference between the two. There was a fajita station to make your own which looked good but I didn't see anyone take any because no one wants fajitas for brunch.  There was a station with 3 salads. One ran out by 1230 and was not replaced. The table with eggs, bacon, and french toast was average, the same as available at any breakfast buffet.  There was a nice choice of granola and what tasted like home made yogurt which was the best item offered. Finally, there is a smore station which was a nice touch although indoor smores do not compare to campfire smores.  The other dessert station was also a let down.  There was chocolate cake and a stand of small individual cookies that didn't have much taste and  individual pots of a cream cheese fruit mixture over a graham cracker crust. They were good but I feel overall this brunch was overpriced for what was offered. The service started out good but then quickly lacked.  I was offered more coffee but not another mimosa. I have been to other brunch buffets in greater Hartford that did not cost as much and the choice and quailty exceeded what Belle Terrace offers. I would not go here again.
While it's not a buffet style brunch any more. The menu choices were excellent. Our waiter went above and beyond to make sure our kids had menu choices they were happy with. Giant waffles for the kids were the best !  Topped with whip cream and sprinkles .... We had the shrimp and grits and we had trout - both perfectly prepared. So glad to have visited the old Forge Room !
Food is outstanding and service is too, most of the time.  Never close to poor.  Bar noise can get loud but it is a bar and especially busy some times.  It doesn't have to take second place to any of its competitors.  I go there frequently.
Great food, Great Service, Great Atmosphere. We had six at our table, and we all eat out often. There is nothing else we can say. Everything was Great.
I booked a party for 25-30 guests to celebrate two milestone birthdays in my family. I was blown away by the staff. Not a single guest was disappointed by the food, and the restaurant made the experience seamless. The calamari was exquisite and the steak melted in my mouth. The blacksmith theme in the back room was the icing on the cake for our guests in the equine industry.
We were in town for a funeral and did not know the area well yet we wanted to find something nice close to the hotel--- the online reviews were good so we gave it a shot. Food was great. The service was prompt and caring. We sat in the back in the Forge Room, built as a blacksmith shop in 1832, it was really intimate and easy to have a normal conversation in. Highly recommend and look forward to a return trip when we are in the area.
We went here on a Sunday for lunch....we had appetizers and drinks...best Mojito I ever had made by Jessica M 
Had calamari and Raw Bar which we enjoyed ...very fresh seafood...use to be Old Avon Farms Rest...beautiful atmosphere loved it so much...brought friends the following Sunday and had eggs Benedict ...excellent
This is located in  a newly renovated  staple of Avon. When we visited it seemed too big but hopefully it will catch on and be as popular as the old Old Avon Inn Restaurant. Food was good but nothing special
We celebrated my dad's 79th birthday with lunch at the North House - and all five of us enjoyed it. I had wings and onion soup - both delicious. Mom and my son had chicken Caesar wraps (with fries) - gone in an instant, while my wife had a burger (very good). Dad had the short rib sandwich (he said it was great). While the food was all good, the service was extra nice. Our waiter Reid was very attentive as was his manager, Dylan! Thanks guys - looking forward to Happy Hour - cheers!!
The North House facility is wonderful, and we're so glad that it's open as a restaurant again.  Everything has been refurbished, and it's light and bright while retaining its historic charm.  Lovely bar, beautiful dining nooks.  The forge room remains darker and cozier, with the smoky fireplace smell lending ambiance.  We noticed that the menu comprises classic dishes but often with little twists to them:  absinthe foam, sunchokes, and purple potato puree, for example.  Unfortunately, however, that care doesn't always translate into a noticeable difference in the flavor (unless, perhaps, you have a better palate than ours).  For example, the French onion soup is topped with Cato Corner's excellent Dairyere cheese, but when melted onto the soup, it just didn't taste different from many another good cheese.  However, one of us had the burger from the bar menu and thought it was really great.  In the end, the majority of people in our group decided that North House isn't quite up on the pinnacle of top restaurants in greater Hartford yet, but it is very good.  We enjoyed the setting, the service was very good, the food was very good.  Plenty of parking.
The many rooms are nicely done - especially the big bar area and the old stone room in the back. The food seems fresh, but it's not health food! Not great for a vegetarian, but still a fun place to go. Very happy and lively. Co-workers, couples, friends all seem to gravitate to this place.
We used one of the rooms at the North House for a few days of business seminars with my company.  I have not sampled items a la carte, but did partake of a buffet lunch.  I have to say it was some of the best food I'd experienced in that kind of setting.  Definitely piqued my interest in returning there for dinner some night....just haven't done so yet.  Some colleagues went there for lunch in the restaurant lately and were very satisfied.
This is a beautiful rustic building with excellent service an interesting menu but the food was just okay. The corn chowder was superb. The main courses were just not that flavorful from the duck to the salmon it was just okay. 
My husband and I decided to try The North House recently having seen large crowds in the parking lot often.  He liked his Caesar Salad, but I was disappointed with the Whipped Ricotta.  Although the the cheese and tomatoes were very good, the toast was really burnt.  Our waiter offered to take it back, but I decided to eat all but the toast.  My husband chose the Grilled Trout and really like the presentation and the sauce drizzled on it.  My Stonington Scallops were delicious and the vegetables were enjoyably crunchy; the Romesco sauce was especially good.  We both liked the wines we picked.  For dessert we each had the carrot cake. It was good and unusual, but the extra sugary caramel sauce was too rich and the cake itself was not as moist as I prefer.  Overall, the service was slow and not up to what one would expect at this type of restaurant.  We had long waits in between courses, had to ask for extra water, and the dessert menu, the table was not cleared fully and no one asked if we wanted coffee or tea.  Perhaps the wait staff is still learning, but I think there are a few things that need to improve.  
My daughter and I ate here during a quick trip to the area.  So very glad we stopped.  Our server filled usin on the history of the house and made some excellent suggestions for food.  Whether you order off he main menu or the bar menu the food is excellent.  Save room for dessert!  Michelle, our server, was outstanding.
Booked my daughter's shower there before it opened placing my trust in them and they did not disappoint.  It was spectacular.  The brunch buffet was delicious and plentiful.  The venue itself is gorgeous.  Everyone in attendance was very impressed.  The event planner, Saleesa was a pleasure to work with and made sure everything was perfect.  I would not hesitate to book future events there.
I first tried North House several weeks ago for Saturday Brunch with my husband. We did apps to share and were very impressed - smoked wings had just the right flavor of smoke without being overpowering, deviled eggs 3 ways was delicious and different (ham was my favorite flavor), and the steamers with pork belly was a nice flavor combination. My only complaint with that was I did get a bad steamer which sort of put me off from eating anymore of them, but my husband had no issues. We also had a side of amazing buttermilk biscuits and some delicious craft cocktails from Jason the awesome bartender. 

I returned there today for a client lunch and had the Grilled Colossal Shrimp salad which was delicious. French bread served on the side was warm and soft. I will definitely continue to come here!!
Ate at the bar which is open and friendly. They have a happy hour menu which is nice. Food pretty good and pretty good staff. Nice stop for couples after work or just to go out for drinks and snacks. There's also a full Resturant that I hear is quite nice.
My wife and I stopped by for Happy Hour at the bar, which runs from 3:00 pm to 7:00 pm every day. The Happy Hour menu is posted on the restaurant's website, but most food items cost about $6.00. The bar is cozy and particularly well stocked with different brands of scotch, which really suits my taste. The personable bartenders were Travis and Jessica. My wife and I each had a cocktail; my wife a Spanish Sangria and I a Penicillin, which is made with Laphroaig scotch, honey, ginger liqueur and lemon. It's my new favorite cocktail! We each also picked a food item; ahi tuna pokē and fried Rhode Island quahogs. The pokē was served with wonton chips and was fine, although my own preparation is better. The quahogs are fried whole and served four to an order. They were excellent. Other food items of interest were clams and oysters on the half shell, each served on ice at six for $6.00. We WILL be back for another Happy Hour and, eventually I'm sure, a full dinner.
Bar area very noisy for us. Smoked wings greasy and no drummies. Hamburger rare instead of medium well. Service ok.  We should have eaten in the dining room instead of bar area.
We are so glad that this historic inn is back in business with new owners.  We specifically requested a table in the forge room.  This room is original to the inn.  The food we had was excellent as was the service.  We went on a Thursday, which turned out to be half-price on bottles of wine.
I have been to this restaurant on several occasions to dine with friends.  I have had mixed experiences that run the gamut of extremes.  The negative things that stand out in my mind are:
It is often too loud to have conversations
Longer than projected wait times

The positives are:
Great wine selection
Friendly staff

Give yourself plenty of time when planning to dine.
Nice spot. Second time here. Good food. Nothing too fancy but the pasta dishes are all good. Nice lunch or dinner spot in sleepy Avon.
Very "unhappy" about their happy hour restrictions.  We went there specifically for happy hour, having been to Max Fish's and Max Amore's happy hours.  At those two Max restaurants, the happy hour menu is available in the bar area--at the tables and at the bar.  I was VERY curtly told by the unhelpful hostess that the happy hour was only available if you sat at the bar (about 12 stools at most--all were full at the 5pm time we went).  When I pointed out that this was not the way it is done at Max Fish and Max Amore, she became indignant and said "well, THAT'S the way we do it here."  So that's our last visit to Max-a-Mia---the restrictions are one thing, but rudeness should not be tolerated.
I loved their food. The food is fresh and the cheese platter has great pairing options.
The meatballs were good, as was the steak. We also got the prosciutto Di Parma which ended up being quite savory.

We were a party of 4 this past Saturday evening. Our reservation was for 7:15 and we were seated on time. Each of us ordered a different entre and were very happy and pleased with our selection. We had dined there previously but not recently but will definitely go back again soon. Great food and waitress staff. Can't wait to go back.
The menu while not gigantic had something for everyone. You can get a good glass of wine with a nice pizza, an Italian classic like chicken parm or go upscale with some interesting, modern fish and veal preparations. 
Great atmosphere. You can always expect to find the dish you last had to taste exactly like you remembered it. Good wine selection.
Always crowded. Specials are usually good. Half chicken especially good as well as the many salad options
The food is always delicious and the service great.  I usually go for lunch with friends and have one of their great salads.
we celebrated my wife's birthday there earlier this year.

The food was delicious and the service great!!!
Nice family dinner.  Food and service was good.  I ordered the halibut special and the fish was a little over cooked, otherwise a five star meal.
We were six got a good table with prompt attention, we got six different entrees al promptly served and great deserts
Visited this restaurant on a trip to Avon.  The service was very good - warm and welcoming.  The food was good - Italian and lots of it.  Seating is booths - quite tight to get into but very comfortable once you are sitting down.  Good place for dinner with friends.  There appeared to be a number of sizeable groups dining there with little impact on the service. We ate the salmon and steak - both really good.  My first order of trout was sold out - but the salmon more than made up for it.  
The restaurant is located in a strip shopping center on Route 44 in Avon.next to a dry cleaner. But, once you are in the door you know its going to be good. The kitchen is open to the restaurant and the staff  keeps busy providing excellent service. We enjoyed their caprese salad and chicken and veal parmagana. Their bread basket that greets you when you sit down is fantastic. The design of the restaurant with an open ceiling makes it a little noisy but especially when some of the guests are celebrating!
Another great dining experience at a Max restaurant. The location wax not typical for a Max eatery being in a strip mall, but the food was as delicious as the rest of them. 

I had the house salad which was very light and tasty. I had the scallops as an entree which were served over a shrimp and lobster risotto. The scallops were cooked just right and very good, as well as the risotto. The service was very good too. I think I like this better than Max Amore.
Great atmosphere, good customer service, nice music and great food.  My husband and I especially loved the salmon dish.  We ordered the same thing both times we visited it was so good.

My most recent visit to Max a Mia was with family, celebrating a birthday. The staff is very accommodating. They happily split the salads we told them we were sharing without our asking for the to be split. The food was excellent! My favorite thing on the menu is the Tuscan salad. 
This is actually in the same town as my office.  I often meet friends there for drinks after work, but have also dined there many times.  Some favorite items include the pasta bolognese, many of the stone pies, and the Tuscan Salad.  The salad with chicken added is a common takeout item me, too.  Hip, modern vibe.  Great service.
We dine here once or twice a year for special occasions, as we have done for years.  Honestly I've never had a bad meal or bad service here, its always been good.  I highly recommend Max a Mia in Avon.
I went here with my girlfriend for lunch the day after a wedding. The food was great! Prosciutto pizza was different and amazing! The service was great. Couldn't have been happier with my day after wedding lunch!
This THAI resturant started off with a bang....however they progressed too quickly. Parking lot and access on rt 44... horrendous .. Service terrible...waited..waited..waited..then bammm aweful & cold... Send it back...same thing.had out of town guests.. What an embarrassment. Spoke to manager.. No apologies..just a blank stare. I have lived here a long time. We'll hang the banner that u are wonderful outside, but try somewhere else. You will thank me
If you are into Thai food then this is your restaurant!! The food is outstanding...it is a family owned restaurant that makes you feel like you are special. The menu is varied and every thing is flavorful and mouth watering good. The food is authentic so be ready for a treat. 
If you want good Thai food, this is the last place to go to. Suggest going to Thai Basil in West Hartford, Sweet Chilli Thai in WH or East West Grille also in WH (fusion of Thai and Laotian). The Elephant Trail - went there with my family, appetizers we asked for which is on the menu, they don't cook or sell anymore...then why have it on the menu??? One of the chicken dishes ordered - the chicken wasn't even cooked properly. The chef came out and tried to convince me it was cooked...and it wasn't. I left the dish as is...most restaurants would offer to replace or not charge for the dish, not the case here. The green curry (which is the simplest Thai dish to make) was bland and in fact seemed to taste exactly the same as a basil based curry!!! The service - poor to say the least. Qualify this - has to do with the person who took our order - unfriendly and nonchalant. The server who brought out the food was good. 
I will never go back.
Elephant Trail has excellent Thai food. I have spent a lot of time in Thailand so if you are looking for authentic food, go to NYC. However, ET has excellent food, as good as you can get anywhere in CT.
The food is absolutely wonderful! We had Thai spring rolls which are my favorite!  fried wantons, pineapple fried Thai rice with beef, chicken with ginger, all very delicious! Service is excellent, may need some
Plants to soften the look and create barriers but other wise exceptionally clean even the rest rooms and comforting
Great service and great food.  It is a good choice for lunch in the area with a wide variety of items on the lunch menu.  Prompt service will get you in and out during your lunch hour.
Passing through Avon we found this oasis at the foot of Avon Mountain. A warm, spacious, colorfully lit restaurant greets you the moment you enter. A semi-formal / in the country vibe complete with an outdoor patio makes this a unique culinary find. The dishes were full of warm, spicy flavor balanced and tossed to perfection. The soups were deep and rich with just the right balance of veggies and meat. Prices were surprisingly reasonable for "Avon" - the same as a typical, inner city, corner shop.
Add to this a 1st class jazz duet tucked into an alcove combined to make this a BEST in Harford area ! Five stars for friendly smiles,excellent service and savory creations! Call for Jazz dates **
Started going to this wonderful restaurant when they were tiny...the family are delightful and are dedicated to good food. They are always willing to explain all the food choices. 
You will not be sorry if you eat here.
We really enjoy eating here. The atmosphere is very casual. For us, it's more of a midweek place than an evening out. The seating is comfortable. My favorite thing is the seafood Tom yum soup pot. The specials are usually good too.
People often recommended this for their lunch specials. I understand that some people think their Pad Thai is not up to par, but I thought it was pretty great!  I was surprised by the beauty inside this restaurant.
My family has been going to Elephant Trails since they were in their old location. The food is simply amazing and the staff is super friendly and always welcomes us! There are a lot of great menu options. This is a restaurant I 100% recommend!
We went this past Friday. We ordered chicken pad Thai and chicken satay. Simple, right?
Guess again. The wrong order was brought to our table twice. We were not upset at all. We laughed it off. These things happen. This is where things went south. A different woman then approached our table and curtly said, "Exactly what do you want?"  We just wanted the two items we ordered. Where was this hostility coming from?  A few moments later the same woman came back, put the plates on our table, and said, "Happy?"
No. We were not happy. You messed up our order twice. We were totally ok with it and you had to become angry and confrontational toward us for no reason. We will never be back. 
Great Thai Food. Always fresh ingredients. The staff is really courteous. Being a vegetarian I must say good spread of choices. They close a little too early for general crowd i.e. at 9. So I  literally have to run if I wanna eat there. The new item on menu, Curry Puffs are an awesome addition to the menu. If I am really hungry, the Drunken noodles (my most regular option) feels a little small on portion, but exceptional on taste. One thing to keep in mind is, if you like spicy don't just order spicy until you have tasted the regular. N there is a huge difference in the spice level from normal to spicy. Must Try!!!
Wife and I had dinner at the Elephant Trail a week or so ago. The night we went there was a large office party there so perhaps the service and food was 'off' for the night.  The waitress seemed to lack professionalism but again perhaps because the large office party was taking her time and attention away from us and the other patrons. Having said that the office party was eating from a buffet so it wasn't taking that much time from the staff.  Anyway, service was slow and the food was just so so.  The restaurant was clean but the ambiance was non existent. Maybe for takeout Elaphant Trail would be okay but for going out for a nice evening we will find another establishment.   Unfortunate because it's such a convenient location.
Excellent food and reasonable prices. Good service. Big variety of dishes. Love their sticky rice with mango. 
Very disappointed with my recent experience here, as my boyfriend really likes the food and the new building looks promising. 
Since I have dietary issues and can't handle rice or rice noodles, I decided to skip the rice with my meal and instead ask the server if I could have a side of steamed veggies, saying that I would be happy to pay extra for them. She says she needs to ask and I say of course no problem.
A person I presumed to be a manager came over and said there was a "problem" because on their ordering screens with an entree they can only select rice or noodles for a side, not veggies. This is crap, I know. I was a server for more than ten years. They are acting like I am trying to trick them into giving me free veggies. I repeat to the woman that I don't mind paying for the side of veggies, I just can't eat rice. She stares at me like she doesn't believe me and so, feeling like I'm begging her I'm like "I'm diabetic, I just can't eat rice it has wayyy too many carbs". Finally she abruptly says "I understand" and walks away. Oh and after all that rudeness, they did in fact charge me $4 for a side of veggies.
It just makes me sooo angry that I had to endure a cross examination and reveal a medical condition in public in a crowded restaurant to be able to order a side of vegetables. I personally prefer to be private about my medical issues. I feel that there is no reason a stranger who is not a medical professional needs to know my business.
We thought we would give Elephant Trail Thai restaurant a try in Avon.  This was a big disappointment.  First the ambience is terrible with a big open room featuring a row of tables in a big open room with terrible lighting and just bad atmosphere.  
The spring rolls were fine but the sauce which came with them was poor.  The Chicken Pad Thai was passable but the Tofu Garlic dish was terrible with burnt garlic being the main problem.  I was glad that the others that were going to join us changed their mind as it would have been a disappointment for them as well.  How this Thai restaurant was voted best Thai in recent years I do not know.
Delicious Thai food and reasonable prices! Great atmosphere and very attentive staff. Great for dining in or take out.
This is one of my favorite local go-to restaurants. The atmosphere is relaxing, non-intrusive. The staff always extremely courteous and attentive, and it offers, in my opinion, the best Thai food in the vicinity - besides it's sister restaurant, The Blue Elephant, in W Hartford.
The fact that is it BYOB also means you can eat great food and not blow a ton of money by accompanying it with a couple of glasses of wine or beers.
This happened a while ago, maybe 6 months, but it's been bugging me, so I finally decided to write a review. Been there 4-5 times in the past year, and the food has always been above average to excellant. However, the last time we were there, with another couple, we were still eating and there was maybe one other table of folks still eating. I think it was around 9:45. To our horror, they start cleaning up. Out comes the brooms and the mop buckets. Really? It really was low class imho. In retrospect, I should have said something to the manager, or the owner asking them to cease and desist until the paying customers had left. My wife essentially refuses to go back, even though we like the food. So if you plan on going in there anything after 8 pm to sit down, I would make it clear to the manager that if you are still eating and the brooms and mop buckets come out, you are getting up and walking out.
My family were up for the weekend attending a wedding. We were invited for a Sunday brunch to meet the guests after the wedding on a more informal basis. The food quality, ambiance, and service were excellent. The room was held upstairs from the hotel lobby and the food was buffet style outside. Although they tried to place 10 people to a table, everything else was terrific.
I had two meals here.  The food was good and the brunch was a nice spread.  The meals are expensive, so I would rate this as a place that you would take a significant other for a special meal.    The best part of the experience were the bartenders... They were terrific!
They had some unique items on the breakfast menu. The scrambled eggs on a toasted English muffin with cheddar on top was delicious. 
We stayed at the hotel on the Sunday night and the main restaurant was not open so ate in the bar.  Great food.  We had the wings - went for the hot wings which were hot!  Then ate the burger and some fish.  Both very good.  The warm bread rolls they brought out at the start of the meal were great. 
Service was good and attentive.
My friend lives in Avon and he took me here, saying I would not be dissapointed, well he was right.  Fantastic food, service and overall experience.  Not sure about value as my friend paid!  But it was was great.
The food is outstanding. Nice menu options. The staff was great, Shawn,Lanay and Jeff are super! we will be back soon.
I took the family for dinner to try something new and local.  We chose this place because it was #1 in Avon on TripAdvisor.  

It was a little odd to find because the entrance is s part of the hotel in the back, which I did not realize.

The lobby, bar & restaurant were very pretty with a true colonial decor.  

We were greeted and seated promptly and there were only a few tables occupied.  There was a man playing the piano which created s very nice, elegant ambiance.  

The waitress was satisfactory as was the food.  We had mushroom appetizer, fish burger, beef burgers & the eggplant entree.  Everything was good.  

I cannot rave about the food or service, but I have nothing negative to comment about.  It was solid. 
This is an overlooked excellent dining experience by many because it's in a hotel but don't miss it!
My wife had the eggplant which was  fabulous and I had the ribs which had a wonderful nutty rub with peach BBQ sauce. 
We came early and had the place to ourselves. Don't let the location fool you this is a wonderful dining experience.
Great drinks, excellent food, a live piano on  Saturday and first class service. Don't miss it!
So surprised at how DELICIOUS this was - from the drinks, appetizers to the main meal! We had the barrata caprese neopollitan eggplant and braised ribs - absolutely YUMMY! I wanted to lick the plate clean! This place is a hidden gem!
Being a business traveler, alone in a new place, this hotel is charming but not really walkable to restaurants. I was leery to try the "overpriced hotel food", but Chris in the pub made it all worth it.

After flying all day, it was nice to be greeted by a friendly face. Chris had much more to offer behind that smile.

She was kind and so informative. My dinner and was outstanding, fairly reasonable, and Chris really pointed me in the right direction. 

Chris told me about the area and how to get the most out of my stay. This really beat dining alone. 

Great experience!!! I'm glad I have 3 days here.
The Seasons restaurant has a very nice atmosphere.  The food and the service are consistent and great!
After a long drive from Maine, met up with a friend and enjoyed a nice dinner in the pub of Seasons Restaurant (apparently in Sunday the dining area is closed) our waitress Alania (sorry if I spelled it wrong) was lovely, very friendly and welcoming. (She was also very funny) Ordered the steak tips with mashed and veggies and it was mouth watering. I have never had tips so tender, they were cooked perfectly. Wanted to end with a slice of tiramisu BUT they didn't have any, I was so sad!!! It's a nice restaurant the pub is very pleasant the bartender was pleasant and we really just had a good time even after dinner sitting around visiting.
We weren't able to get a reservation for the Sunday Brunch, so we decided to do breakfast on a Saturday.  They had some nice choices along with typical breakfast faire.  Dining Room was quiet and enjoyed the table service.
Residing at the Avon Old Farms Hotel, one's restaurant choices are very limited especially in walking distance, a tavern across the road and this in-house restaurant.  Fortunately, the food was quite good and, since our party were the only patrons in the place that evening, we got the waitstaff's full attention.  I had a very well prepared veal chop; others in our party expressed satisfaction.  The wine list is somewhat limited, but the waitress was kind enough to allow a taste or two before we made our final decision on a little known Pinot Noir. 
Went to brunch at Seasons with my boyfriend a couple months back and the buffet was very good. Will definitely be back soon! 
Went for my first time today to Sunday Brunch at Seasons.  I've been to a lot of Sunday brunches, and except for the $10 price difference, this was basically the same.  Set in the Avon Old Farms hotel at the base of Avon Mountain, the food was typical brunch fair.  The only alcoholic drink included in the price is a mimosa; I saw a whole bunch of them pre-poured on a side table, which meant the taste was not fresh - champagne loses something the longer it sits around.  My decaf coffee was bitter, again meaning it wasn't fresh.
The restaurant itself is pretty, and the view nice as well.  The staff is extremely friendly, but that does not make up for the price they charge.
Bottom line is, I'll go elsewhere for brunch.
I have to start my review by saying two things:
I LOVE brunch and I hate buffets...usually.
My husband surprised me with brunch at the Seasons Restaurant in the Avon Old Farms Inn this Valentine's Day--this is the restaurant *inside* the hotel, NOT the old Avon Old Farms--I know, confusing to out-of-towers but I think local folks will know what I mean.
Anyway on to the food,
Maybe because it was a Sunday as well but there was a large buffet, reservations were required, and it was crowded. We sat in a lovely area overlooking the woods and the service was good. We didn't feel rushed at all. The available items were cereals, pastries, lots of fresh fruit, breads. Then delicious waffles with strawberries and cream, an omelette station, the usual breakfast meats, blitzes, potatoes, carved meats, shrimp cocktail, eggs Benedict, and then some pretty delicious cheesecake and chocolate mousse cake. 
The chocolate covered strawberries alone are one reason to allow GMOs to continue, lol.
We had a nice meal and would try it again.
My husband and I stopped in on our day off to grab some lunch together. 11:00am-2:00pm is their lunch hours. It is rather pricey but for the ambiance, quality of ingredients, and service it is worth it. 
Coffee -$3
Tea - $3 many flavors to choose from just ask.
Chicken bbQ sandwich with fries $14
Chicken Caesar salad- $12-$14
In total with tax our lunch came to $38.50 

The service was very polite and helpful. The room was spotless! It was very warm and cozy inside which was VERY nice considering the room is all large windows. It was so relaxing and Romanic. We will be returning 5 stars  
Had a phenomenal meal a couple weeks back. We started with two onion soups,  calamari that was a special, and a winter salad. Calamari was crispy and tender perfectly cooked. My mother loved her salad and the two onion soups were great as always. I stopped the chef walking into the bar area to compliment the food and he was very kind, and helpful for choosing desserts. I believe his name was Mike, or Matt. Any how the mint triffle, and passion fruit mousse was to die for. Beautiful presentation and the taste was exquisite. Everything from food to the service was incredible. Looking forward to coming back and having the trout and salmon dishes again.
I visited Seasons for lunch with my mother on a recent Friday afternoon.  The overall experience was excellent despite a long wait for our food due to a large group order that went in just before ours.  I had the French Dip, which was one of the best I have ever had.  My mother had the Fish 'n Chips and really enjoyed them.  The service was very attentive and the atmosphere was excellent.  I will definitely return for lunch.
Good food and drink off the main drag in a commercial center located amongst other bars and restaurants in a suburban area.
Sat outside patio very nice and clean. Drinks were great, apps were half price before 6 so had a couple of them. They were 5 of us and all our meals were excellent and more than enough. We didn't have desert too full, but next table to us deserts looked great. All and all  5 star for us.
This restaurant, not known to nearly as many people as it should be as it is hidden from the street has become one of my favorites for good reason. The menu is diverse and the food is very good quality - they have a number of gluten free dishes to boot. Their gluten free calamari is superb as are the pasta dishes which are also available as gluten free. The outdoor area is serene and the lovely flowers and fountains are ideal. Great bar area and very good service.
This was our first time dining at the Local Grill meeting  with friends. The food and salads were delicious. We all chose something different and everyone enjoyed their meal. Suggestions would be the Red Snapper, Swordfish, Pork shanks and the blackened chicken/pasta as well as the beet  and apple salads. We especially enjoyed the cookie dessert with ice cream. The staff was very friendly and attentive. The only thing we would have liked to see were more people in the dining room making for a more festive atmosphere. We definitely would recommend this restaurant as the food and service were very good.
Needed a cozy place with a good menu selection. This place had a smallish but varied menu.

I had citrus shrimp with spaghetti squash and vegetables. Excellent gluten-free option.  Friends had pork/potatoes  and swordfish/risotto.

Chocolate chip cookie with ice cream was to die for. Unfortunately one order was missed, therefore service was sketchy.

The acoustics was not good.  A group of 15 showed up and drowned the room with noise.


Went with a group and everything was very good.  I went with a group and everyone liked what they got.  I started with the crab cakes which where good and had the Tuna entre and it was the best Tuna I have had at any of the Farmington Valley Restaurants.  It was served on arugula with a wasabi aioli.  The service and atmosphere were good.   I will definitely go back.
We visited for dinner and happy hour on a Saturday. We were the only 2 people in the restaurant and our appetizer wasn't even hot. We both enjoyed our dishes (I do recommend the shrimp and spaghetti squash meal) but I don't think they were worth $20 each. Bar service lacked - a lot of socializing with other patrons and staff going on. We were glad we had a coupon as this experience could have been better. 
Upon returning from three dinners at some of Nantucket's highest rated restaurants, we went to Local Grill and we're delighted that our local restaurant far outpaced the others and at a fraction of the cost.

We've dined at LG a good two dozen plus times in the last year and have always been pleased.  The food is just simply delicious and outstanding.  An added kicker is that the prices are very reasonsble.  The menu is broad and varied.  We often go for one of the specials if we visit on a weekend as they are always special.

In my humble opinion, this is one of the very best restaurants in the greater Hartford area.  Their reasonable prices are an added kicker.  They are so worth a visit!


Best value for fine cuisine in the Farmington valley. Friendly staff. Great place to unwind after a long week of work. Don't forget to try dessert too. 
So many restaurants have come and gone in this location over the years. We figured we'd finally try it, but we may have been too late. The place was virtually empty and the staff did not seem interested in helping anyone. What really got us was the fact that they were out of two of the entrée items. Are they going out of business too? Ugh. 
We had a delightful evening at the Local Grill.  The ambiance was excellent.  There were three adults and four teenagers with varying food tolerances.  I am gluten free, while my niece and sister in law are vegan.  We were all accommodated and had excellent meals.  
great outdoor seating, app.s are good. my favorite is the homemade pita chips and hot dip.  usually eat in the large bar.  The restaurant food is a little pricey. 
The atmosphere may be low key, but the food treads the line between nice gastropub and fine dining. The eggplant pillows are a great starter for any meal or great for people looking for a bit to eat while throwing back a few at the bar. The entrees tasted as good as they looked, and despite the reasonable price, the portions were ample. The Avon-Simsbury-Canton area has too many overpriced, mediocre restaurants, so it was great to find such a great meal without having to travel to West Hartford. The Local Grill is only open for dinner, so plan accordingly.
There has been a lot of turnover in this location.  Hopefully the Local Grill has staying power.  I would not call it fine dining nor would i call it casual, but something in between.

There is a nice bar, indoor seeing and a nice patio for outdoor seating.  The manager does a great job offering new menu items and the menu is varied and interesting.  You can order pub food (burger, wings), pasta, seafood, steak and chops, or comfort food like meatloaf or pork shank.  We dined the with 4 and took advantage of the different offerings.  Everyone was happy and it was reasonably priced.  This place is only open for dinner so plan accordingly.
Went here for a low-key, not-too-fancy anniversary dinner and were pleasantly surprised.  Service was great, friendly staff and cozy environment. And the food was great!  I definitely recommend this place, a little bit of a hidden gem as it is off the main road, but worth it.  Great prices too!
We discovered this place with friends a few weeks ago while looking for a nightcap. Little did we know this world become a regular stop! The owner was working the bar and brought over some Old Bay wings on the house (not knowing we are originally from Philly and love Old Bay crabs and fries!). Best wings ever! 

Super attentive staff, unique cocktails and a nice beer selection rounded off a great night.  We went back the next week for dinner and were not disappointed!  
TripAdvisor reviews were SPOT ON with respect to this great little restaurant. 
We live 45 min. away, but happened to be in town on a Thursday evening and needed a quick bite. What a nice surprise!

Brian- bartender/waiter/host extraordinaire was very helpful. Manageable sized menu with interesting variety. Wine, crab cakes and Rib-eyes were really outstanding. Caesar salad was good if a bit light on the dressing. Very reasonably priced. Don't let the location  fool you. Surroundings scream local/after work pub but the food, service and price will bring us back for sure. 
After considering 5 different restaurants in the Simsbury, Canton and Avon area for a family function for 40 people I chose the Local Grill.  To be honest, I had not eaten there before but went on the recommendation of a friend.   Butch, the owner, was willing to work with me in every respect.  Mostly, what would happen if we got a snow storm (a January event)?.  No problem, he worked out a very reasonable plan.  I am frugal and what really sold me was the diverse, tasty menu complete with appetizers and a special alfredo macaroni dish for all the children that came at the most reasonable price.   He FAR exceeded quantity AND quality of food in the menu over and above the other popular restaurants I had considered. He accommodated my every need.  Attention to detail was tops.  I cannot praise them enough.  This event was a very important one for me and my family and I left so happy at the end of the afternoon.   I just cannot say enough good things about this place.   It is my utmost pleasure to give them the best of recommendations.
Started with the veggie pillows - eggplant stipules with a ricotta cheese and herb mixture on top of plum tomatoes. I had the pork tenderloin Wellington - the tenfpderloin was wrapped in a puff pastry with a fruit chutney surrounded by arugula and a mustard creme fraiche. My wife had the local stuffed chicken - the chicken was stuffed with smoked bacon, caramelized onions and gruyere cheese served over creamed spinach. The service (Brian) was top notch.  Best deal in the area - $48. 
We enjoyed our first visit to Riverdale farms restaurant LOCAL GRILL. The menu has a wide variety of tasty options at sensible prices. We tried the eggplant pillow appetizer which was delicious eggplant with ricotta cheese with tomato based sauce.  I had the mac n cheese with andouille sausage which was very good and rich. My wife tried chicken which was thinly pounded , ecrusted with pecans on a bed of arugula with pesto sauce. Our friends had the crab cake which was reported to be great. They enjoyed their two shrimp dishes. We both had the creative apple crisp . Overall a good meal. I would return to try more. The menu gets updated frequently.

I used to enjoy Tower View Pizza for quite a few years from time to time.  Don't go there, however, because the restaurant is sadly gone.  It has, however, been replaced with an excellent Thai restaurant!
Don't let exterior make you think it's just a local slice joint. It's a great friendly affordable Italian restaurant. Quiet ambience, white tablecloths, dinner menu. And an excellent value 
We've driven by Tower View Pizza many times, but had a chance to try it for the first time last week. We were pleasantly surprised by the quality of the food and the very reasonable prices. We came in thinking we'd order pizza but ended up doing that plus ordering appetizers and main course meals. All of that was much more than a simple lunch, but it made a very nice, quick dinner after reheating later in the day.
tuna wrap bag of chips drink and a cookie $8.50 had everything on the menu never a surprise
staff and owner always busy eager to serve you slices fresh salads and a dozen + pasta meals
You won't be disappointed in quality or quantity.  Their tomato sauce is the best around, wether on spaghetti or stuffed shells or lasagna or whatever it is really tasty stuff.  The nicest people, service is great.  Best take out place in the Farmington Valley.
My husband and I have been coming to Tower View for the past 7 years and we love it! The portions are huge and staff is very friendly. We love the ceasar salad, chicken parmegiana and texas fries. It is our favorite place to go for lunch on Sunday after church.
I've been coming here for years. Very reasonably priced and the portions are HUGE!!  Myself, coworkers & family all love the food and staff (owners)!!  Very hard working, dedicated and friendly!! Must give a try!!  
The taste was ok but the ingredients were skimpy and the crust was big. If you like thin crust pizza with loads of cheese, peperoni or other ingredients this is not the best choice in Avon.
Great place to grab a pizza to bring home.  Love the toppings - although cheese remains my family's favorite.

Friendly staff.
We sat on the patio on a lovely Fall night. Unfortunately the kitchen got backed up. Seemed like us and several others orders were messed up. Ultimately we asked for ours to be boxed up to eat back at our hotel. But I will say the waitress was very kind and they comped our drinks for the inconvenience. The food was good. We had burger, chicken strips and a salad. We really think it was just an off night. 
My wife and I stopped by for something new and we'll be back. There's outdoor seating with a view of the Heublein Tower. Nice friendly waitstaff. Simple but delicious burger. Nice margarita. Loads of fries. Hornets didn't bother us but there were a few flying around if that kind of stuff makes you nervous. Looked like the full menu had lots of good stuff to try next time. 
Patio seating is really enjoyable. I have yet to be inside! Been here for dinner a few times and all of the food has been great. Ample portions. Good beer selection, although the Sip of Sunshine had run dry by the time I was there last time. (not a surprise - it never lasts long anywhere)

Will hit this up for happy hour definitely.
Food is pretty good,  we've tried several things and we were happy with everything.  The outdoor area is large and very festive.  Great at night.  During the day it's in full sun but there are umbrellas for a little shade. Great for couples, family and small groups.
My husband and I stopped in the the Lime Bar & Grill to have a drink.  It was empty except for a people at the end of the bar (one being the waitress) who seemed to have already had a few to many.

They we loud and obnoxious so the bartender turned up the music.  About ten minutes after ordering our drinks we heard the bartender tell the people at the end of the bar "suck my dick".  We immediately asked for our tab and left.  Never to return.
I have heard and read many reviews and thought it would have been better. The shrimp lettuce wraps were tasty, the French onion soup was pretty good. Cesar salad was nothing special. Unfortunately the Piccata pasta said sundried tomatoes, but showed up with fresh tomatoes...the ribs were supposed to come with Cole slaw and corn bread... apparently they were out of both! Too bad they were out of most of the menu listed ingredients ... We'll try it again, and see if it was just a bad night...but we were told the different chefs change the dishes sometimes...hopefully it will be better next time! 
Beautiful patio but when we arrived we were the only ones there and ordered our meal...sat for 45 minutes and watched other tables come and go! Mentioned it to waitress due to majority of those tables ordered the same dish as we did and the only response we got was "so do you a to go box?" Not for sure how the kitchen staff works but it obviously isn't working.  Also the meatballs we finally got were cold and raw.
Cobb and Caesar Salads were really good and very generous.  Onion soup way above average, also generous.  The service was great.  The BUT is that I think they allow smoking on their dining patio and there was a group of six, just a table away, most of whom were smoking.  I'd forgotten how unpleasant cigarette smoke can be while eating.  Choosing not to create an issue, we ate and left and left a nice tip, also.  I wish they would not allow smoking.
Went here with friends for late night drinks and some appetizers. Small bar, but the food was great, and the beers on  tap were fresh. The value was good and I would definitely go back again.
We stopped in to see friends on a Friday after work and had a great time. Appetizers are half price and they do a great job with cocktails.

Our table shared the chili chicken wings, cheese quesadillas, lettuce chicken wraps and calamari. All of them were very tasty and enjoyable.
I am not a huge fan of the food at lime bar but a very good place for some drinks to watch a game or catch some live music. Seems to be consistently busy during the week and is definitely a great little watering hole in the area. Not a huge craft beer person so it doesn't bother me that they don't hsve every beer choice under the sun on draft, I know a lot of people are into that, however the bartenders are great and the atmosphere is always inviting. I do enjoy grabbing a drink at the lime bar and I definitely reccomend trying it out.
This little place tucked up on a hill in the plaza was just the tonic we needed for a quick lunch. Admittedly we got there just when the place opened and hardly any of the servers knew we were even seated, but once they realized we were there, they were quick attentive and helpful. The burgers were fresh and tasty and they had a full bar too. The menu had a good variety; a touch more than most bars and a little more creative too. It was a nice little oasis on our cross state journey!
I had been here on a saturday previously with family, and service was fine as we were in no rush & enjoying the outside patio. I returned for lunch on a weekday and sat in the bar area. there was only 1 couple outside when i arrived. we sat & ordered 2 sodas, calamari & garlic parm chicken tenders. as 45 minutes rolled by and about 3 more groups came in & got their burgers before we got our appetizer, we grew upset as we only had our sodas given to us. The waiter finally looked over to us & as we were on a 1 hour lunch time had to get our food wrapped to go! due to this, i have not gone back, as i cant waste my entire lunch break drinking soda & not being able to eat my food. portions are decent & price is average. closed for lunch weekdays in the winter.
The food here was good.  I had the mahi mahi over grilled fall veggies.  Very good.  The patio is nice for drinks and/or dinner.
Fun atmosphere.  Great place to head when the weather is nice and you want to relax outside with some great drinks.  Fun spot day or night!
We just stopped in for an after dinner drink. I had the most wonderful martini! It was made with Pearl cucumber vodka, Madori & muddled with hot peppers!  It was fabulous! My husband had the espresso martini and he thought that was very tasty! (they weren't cheap...$9) We sat at the bar to enjoy our drinks.  The bar area was busy with some people enjoying dinner also.  After we finished our drink we decided to check out the restaurant area on our way out.  Much to our surprise there was not one table taken...not a soul was having dinner and it was after 6:30! We commented to each other before that the menu looked good and we should go for dinner sometime. So we were very surprised no one was there. But we will try it for dinner sometime.
This is the bar all the locals go to. Great atmosphere and great service. We only had a bite to munch on so can't comment on the food.
Originally from Avon and in town for a wedding.  Decided to give Lime Bar and Grill a try. We ate in the bar, but the outside dining area is very appealing.  Our bartender was friendly and service was excellent. I had the pulled pork nachos and they were very good. Only one negative issue, the background music was way too loud and the music being played was just so annoying. It was hard to have a conversation. We will definitely try the restaurant again if we are in the area, but will choose different seating. Enjoy!
I went there on a Monday night to watch football with friends and thought the food and service was great !  I definitely would go back!
The Lime Bar is a very pleasant experience.  The view from the outside terrace is very nice, the menu is nicely varied and very well prepared.  The staff is very attentive and the whole atmosphere is very relaxed.  If you are into sports, the bar is a great place for viewing.
We enjoyed the Italian ice at Rita's.  It tasted great and hit the spot on a hot day.  The place is small, and can be hard to find in the shopping center but well worth it.  
They do a great job. Recently had them cater an outside event and they came with the truck and the kids were thrilled.  Staff was excellent as well.
I lived in Philly for a while so it was like angels come to earth when Rita's came to CT.  Unfortunately, whenever I go there aren't many people there--so please go so it doesn't close.  Traditional lemon ice so good and all the fun flavors are always tasty.  And the custard --oh hello soooo good!
I used to drive all the way into Farmington/Bristol area for Rita's Ices and Custards, so I was psyched to see one move into Riverdale Farms. 
We walked in on a work night and it was empty. I'm glad, because it is a very SMALL restaurant. There are two tables inside that can seat two or three people, but they are cramped. I would definitely eat outside on a nice day. 
As for the food, I had the Cotton Candy Ice, and the people I was with had the vanilla custard and alex's lemonade flavored ice. Everything was really delicious! The kid who served us seemed like they really hated their job, but was pleasant enough I suppose. None the less, I will definitely be visiting again soon! I highly recommend it.

P.S. - If you have food allergies/sensitivities, the company is really good about posting charts online of food allergens.
We have enjoyed Thai food for years at many different restaurants and this is the best.  Food is meticulously prepared, beautifully served, perfectly seasoned and absolutely delicious.   The restaurant is attractive, with well-spaced tables, as well as a patio that is lovely in warm weather.   Very friendly staff make the visit extra enjoyable.  This is a special place.
I tried to review this several months back when they first opened but couldn't seem to get the review online. The location is quite nice in Riverdale Farms facing the ridge, with a patio and seating outdoors. My friend is a foodie, and a fan of Thai, we sampled about 6 different items and we liked them all. My niece is a fan of bubble tea and theirs was flavorful and refreshing. The service was attentive, with a smile. The pricing was good as well, you could spend a little or a lot depending on how much you wanted to eat or spend. Wish them much success.
This pretty much sums it up. Decent sushi. But nothing to get excited about. Rolls are ordinary. 

Impatient servers. Food came out quickly so that was nice. 
It's in the way home from work so that makes it good for me. I've had much better, I've had worse. Definitely not the most polite staff. I see a lot of reviewers kill them on that. Maybe it's a language barrier?!?!
Service was horrible, and only three tables had customers. The food was greasy and had no flavor. The only thing we enjoyed was the water. It was crisp, cold and refreshing.
When we want sushi and sahimi, we usually go to Toshi where we can get generous portions at reasonable prices. We usually sit at the sushi bar where we can watch the skillful preparation and unique presentation. Favorites include the sushi and sashimi sampler, the chef's choice sushi and various rolls. The house salad with ginger dressing is also a favorite.
Very Good Sashimi and Sushi!
I have been eating Sashimi for 25 years and this is very good.
Service can be a tiny bit slow, but when you eat, you will forget about it.
Sit @ sushi bar.
Over all very, very, good place to eat.
Nice people also.
We visit Toshi almost every week to get our "sushi fix". We prefer to sit at the sushi bar where we can interact with the chefs and sample different items. A favorite of ours is the sushi/ sashimi combo. We've also sampled many of the rolls and appetizers. We really enjoy the friendly atmosphere, the fresh food and the excellent accompanying ginger salad.
Nicely revamped the interior. Sushi is good. Last time I was there we had a tremendous server. Very positive young man with lots of energy that made plenty of conversation and was genuinely entertaining. 
For those who live the Farmington Valley, do yourself a favor and skip this restaurant.  We work within walking distance of the restaurant.....my co-workers and I dine out every day...today we decided on Toshi for lunch.  We walked in and stood waiting to be seated.....an Asian waiter motioned to us to walk up the stairs while he rudely threw 2 menus on the table and promptly walked away with out any interaction.  We sat waiting patiently while the same waiter walked by at least a half dozen times.  We have an hour for lunch and as time ticked by, it was obvious that no employee of the restaurant cared to take our order...no eye contact was made at all.  We were hoping that their service had improved but, unfortunately we encountered the same rude reception we've encountered in the past.  My co-workers and I will never waste time attempting to dine here in the future. The poor service is a strike on its own. Now on to the food.  When we have dined at Toshi in the past, the food was mediocre at best.  The sushi chefs seem to lack experience.....no consistency with the rolls or the amount of fish in them.  The last time we actually sat for a meal, I ordered chicken Katsu.......which was almost raw.  We keep hoping for improvement but it's become crystal clear after today's experience that service is of no importance to the staff.  We will be sure to pass our experience with Toshi's rude staff along to the community........
We have eaten at Toshi on a number of occasions.  A few of which were wedding anniversaries.

The sushi is fresh, tasty, and well presented.
Sorry, but when you go to a new restaurant and spend as much as we did you tend to set your expectations high... The service was great! But the food was just OK. Why?, because they either forget to season the meat or forgot. Never in my life have I had this problem... We love Asian food... Too expensive for the quality. The restaurant was nicely decorated... 
Unfortunately, I find this place to be very inconsistent.  The tastes are generally good, but the servings are not consistent.  Some visits yield large cuts of fish while others yield small pieces that leave me hungry after the meal.  I even ordered sushi with brown rice which ended up being a mistake - the rice was watery and tasteless.  My guess is that they did not have the rice prepared so they rushed it to make my dish...and charged me more for the rice and never apologized for it being bad.  Fortunately this was not my first visit so I knew it was an isolated incident. 

This place has been in the same location for a number of years, but the ownership changed recently.  I am happy it is close to my office and I do visit it often, but I would be a happier customer if the dishes were more consistent - I like the large cuts over the small cuts.
Since Toshi remodeled their restaurant several years ago, it has become a favorite of ours for a light dinner of edamame and sushi. We prefer to sit at the sushi bar where the chefs will often provide a complementary appetizer and we get to watch the skillful preparation of both the Sanshoku sashimi dinner and our favorite Summer roll. The price for a flavorful and filling dinner is very reasonable and the ambience reminds us of past visits to inns in Japan.
We enjoyed the happy hour sushi and appetizer menu at Toshi the other day.

The food was great and the happy hour pricing is an excellent deal on the items which are included.
We tried eating there last night but after being seated, near the water stand, we were not even acknowledged by our waiter for 15 minutes.  when he came over to take our order he said 'i will be right back'.  we did not give him the chance, as we got up and left.  we also walked right by the 'hostess' but she was too busy watching the baseball game to ask us why we were leaving.  now i know why the restaurant was not crowded on a Friday night.

i would not recommend this restaurant at all as there are other japanese restaurants in the valley that do welcome having customers.

this was not an isolated incident as we have had poor service on the two other times we had tried the restaurant.
Sushi is good, fresh, well made.  Staff is very aloof and cold. They do not make you feel welcome, but as an interruption to their day. There are other, better sushi bars in the area
When you are in the mood for sushi, the decision is "do I drive a distance for great sushi, or have good sushi right around the corner?" If you are not up to the drive, Toshi is nice option. The quality of the food is consistently good, but never quite makes great. The decor is pleasant, but like the sushi, not distinctive. The service IS lacking in consistency. They will sometimes close the kitchen a bit early if business is slow, occasionally charge the dinner menu price at lunch, or mix up orders. Usually it takes three or so employees to fix any errors made.
Good food, excellent value.  service is exceptional. there is alot of competition in the area and I think this establishment is worth a night out.  Good specials and dinner combo's too! If you sit at the mezzanine you can watch the sushi chefs create.
We've been there a few times, but not regularly.  The wait staff gives the impression that if you don't know them from earlier visits, you are not worth their time.  The food was good, I suppose, but the poor service drove us away.  And, by the way, we are not service snobs.  Usually, we give the waiters the benefit of the doubt.  At Toshi, it was hard to do that.
I go for lunch a couple times a month and I'm never disappointed.

The bento boxes are always filling and tasty without being too salty. The sushi always tastes fresh too. The servers are all very nice and efficient. The restaurant is decorated in the typical Japanese minimalist fashion, which I love.

Toshi's is hands down the best Japanese food in the area.
Toshi has the best Japanese food in Connecticut. Always fresh, always delicious. Sit at the counter, and they will make you exactly what you want too.
Great service no waiting for the bill you have it before your finished nice Patio over looking penis mountain
Visit on Sat. Morning for breakfast.  Good omelets. Does not have French toast. Pancakes are so so . No refills on drinks. Breakfast sandwhich is the best. Not a large place.  Staff is friendly.
We have gone here a few times now and the food here has always been a family favorite! The breakfasts and lunch's are very good. I always get the pancakes for breakfast and they are always consistently delicious especially the Nutella ones. For lunch the salads are always good and the iced tea is delicious. 
The Avon Country Deli is on Rt. 10, in Avon, just north of the intersection with Rt. 44.  It’s even closer to the Sperry Park ballfields, where the Farmington Canal Trail crosses Rtes 10 and 44, so it’s a good stop for bicyclists.

It’s an unusually nice breakfast/lunch stop for an al fresco meal; there’s an outdoor veranda with roof and shade nice patio tables with umbrellas , away from the main road, giving it a bucolic feel.  There are nice views east towards Heublein Tower.  There are plenty of tables inside as well.

The deli closes at 3 PM most days; it serves only breakfast and lunch.  It’s a nice, varied and creative menu, with several vegetarian options for lunch as well as breakfast. The service is  pleasant, professional, and attentive.  Self-serve coffee (very good) gives you good flexibility and refills in a ceramic mug (much preferable in my book to a cardboard cup)

I had the Mediterranean omelet with home fries and coffee; everything was really good, and it came to a bit less than $10.  The whole menu seems pretty reasonably priced.  I will be back!
We stumbled on this restaurant for breakfast on Father's Day and were pleasantly surprised. The food was great and they accommodated us at a table immediately. Thank you for a great breakfast treat!
Smooth jazz, your breakfast favorites and an amazing view with outside seating.  The portions are hearty - you will not leave hungry.  The best part is the reasonable price.
Welcoming atmosphere, great breakfasts, freshest fruit, and the music is just right. Friendly, accommodating staff. Outside deck is beautiful! Flowers and a cool breeze.  Bike trail takes you right to it. 
My wife and I were there this morning for the first time.  We chose the patio and it was comfortable, bright and sunny.  The service was friendly and food was served relatively quickly. 

I gave it a five rating but would offer some suggestions.  The coffee was serve yourself inside the building, so my wife went in to get it.  But I am a tea drinker and there was no tea at the coffee set up.  The server had to bring me the hot water and bag.  Later my wife went back for a refill of coffee and on our bill was a $1.00 charge for the refill.  In 99 per cent of the places we go there is no charge for refills and sometimes the server comes back 2 or 3 times. They should reconsider that charge and also make accommodations to serve the coffee and tea.
Another thing they should do is put up a hand railing at least at the top three stairs going to the patio, if not, from the parking lot to the patio. Not everyone is young and limber.

Lastly,  to make the restaurant's food truly great is to change their  recipe for home fries.  They take away from the presentation. A crisper, larger, less mushie home fry would look so much better and a slice of orange for garnish would add color to the presentation.
I have had breakfast here dozens of times. I like the food and, the service, is very good. The canned, Musak like music is awful. Please just turn it off. Why not ask the customers how they like it?
This is my first and hopefully last horrible review. My clients wanted a deli and this came up in their search. We only had time for takeout sandwiches and while I had eaten at every restaurant in the complex, I had not been here. We ordered a BLT, Italian sandwich and a Roast beef ( signature). I specifically asked I the RB was rare or red and was assured so. We were out of the parking lot and at our destination when I took a bite of my sandwich, the meat was very brown and smelled funk, so I only took one bite and politely put it away. By the time I dropped my guests off, and called the restaurant, since I wanted to return it and tell them it was rancid, they were closed. I left a VM in case they thought it best to reach out to me. One week later-- nothing. Seriously, the meat stunk so bad, it needed to be thrown away. What a waste! There are so many better places nearby, why would I even think to go there. Probably why no one I know had ever mentioned this place to me, or suggested I go there in the past.
We discovered the Avon Country Deli this summer where we had a thoroughly enjoyable family breakfast on the outdoor patio. The deli serves both breakfast and lunch and is dog friendly.
Stopped by with a friend for a quick lunch.  We were promptly seated, our order taken and delivered in very good time.  It's self serve coffee, just fyi.  Everything was fresh and delicious.  I will go back.
We really needed a great breakfast spot in town and this is it!! Consistently good food, friendly staff, cozy atmosphere. We love it!! 
Found this place last year while visiting CT. We had a delicious breakfast everything was made to order and so fresh. We were back in CT yesterday and decided to try lunch there it was so good !!!! Pastrami was lean the bread was fresh very good also the grilled veggie wrap with hummus was nice. Went back this morning for breakfast pancakes are a must have. Nice atmosphere sit outside and look a the mountains. Wish they served dinner I bet it would be great. The prices are a real value
We found this place by accident.  It is tucked in the back of a small shopping center near The Grist Mill restaurant.  I knew it must be good because there were so many cars parked near it and people waiting to be seated.  It is small but the service was great and the food was outstanding and plenty of it.    Go for sure if you are in the area.
We were pleased beyond belief. Our breakfasts were fantastic and the people were so friendly. I'm used to gruff waitresses at breakfast joints that aren't fully awake yet. 
For a great breakfast with lots of choices for everyone, this spot is a wonderful destination when family members of all ages are out together.  Inside in winter is cozy (few tables) but outside in nice weather the views of the mountains are spectacular.  
under umbrellas.  Coffee is self-serve while wait staff pleasantly serves everything else.  It is great to find a reasonably priced breakfast, avoiding those long buffet lines in fancier restaurants. 
Have had several breakfast meals at the deli. From the standard eggs, bacon, pancake to the more high end Benedict choices. Very friendly atmosphere; can get a little loud if at capacity. Great menu variety and reasonable prices.
Excellent breakfast spot with wonderful views!  Good food, quick service, great prices.  This is one of our weekend "go-to" spots, and the outside patio is wonderful in the summer.
My husband and I were excited about the ambiance.  We sat at the counter overlooking the kitchen.  We both ordered omelets and they were a awfully dry.  The rye toast was dry as well.  With no butter in sight.  I could only eat half of my meal and had agita for the rest of my morning. 
Also, I won't say what I saw but they don't have the most sanitary cooks.
I find the coffee weak, the food fat-laden and artery-clogging, and the help kind of surly. Aside from those issues, it is like any other Dunkin' Donuts, which I try to avoid at all costs.
coffee is consistently hot and excellent in flavor. Starbucks is terrible in comparison. I always say I have to know where every D&D is when I am traveling.
What can one say about a Dunkin in 100 characters?  It is a typical Dunkin, clean and good coffee.  Love their breakfast sandwiches too.
I love dunkin donuts coffee. Fresh and tasty. Good muffins too esp. pumpkin muffins and glazed donuts/
Love the fact that it is always clean and inviting.  Good place to sit, relax and read the paper or meet someone for good conversation
Best local spot for bagels. Several varieties of sandwiches too.  Coffee is great.  Can get busy at times but certainly worth the wait.
Eat there occasionally.  Great bagels, sandwiches and soup.  At Avon Old Village Shops.  Convenient access.
this location offered good options, friendly staff, overall as expected. The parking was adequate and situated just off the main rd.
A good lunch gathering place.  Smoked salmon pumpernickel sandwich.  Turkey with tomato pesto on sesame bagel.  Brewed ice coffee hit the spot on a brutally humid summer day. 

The layout allows for friendly chatting.... there is ample space between tables. Free wifi.


The bagels are crisp on the outside, tender on the inside and come in many interesting and tasty flavors.  The everything is classic.  We also love the western bagel sandwich with egg,bacon, peppers,onion and special sauce.
I know Brueggers is a chain but they are my favorite bagels in the area. A little crunchy and a little chewy (not "a roll with a hole" like many Connecticut bagels).
Reliable and tasty, lots of flavors, good brownies too:)
Bagels are some of the best in the area. They do a good job of keeping a variety in stock and freshly made. The lines can get a bit long on the weekends but they staff up and try to move people through quickly.

Coffee is OK, nothing exceptional.

Decent amount of seating. Location is in a shopping center overlooking Route 44. Parking is usually pretty easy.

Always have had a good experience here for many years.
 The bagels are consistent with what you would find at any Bruegger's , however the folks behind the counter are very friendly. Especially when you go early in the am , you get the feel of a neighborhood establishment, where the manager/owner knows the customers. For that it is worth going to 
Good place to stop for a quick bite to eat.  Clean, moderately priced, and quick service.  Delicious coffee!
The food is good but too expensive.  I don't think 3 burgers and one frech frie should cost 30 dollars.  
They no longer serve fruit.  Salads are not made with the variety they once were. This one in Avon is very convenient and a nice spot to meet a friend if you want coffee and a bagel.
Great local fresh bagel place.  As good as any.  I've tried most of their sandwiches and they were all tasty.  Excellent choice for coffee too.
OK, they aren't NYC bagels but they are prepared in that manner, boiled and then baked and light years better than the bread bagels the supermarkets and some local bakeries dare to call bagels.  Cream cheeses are also excellent, and I have had a few breakfast sandwiches that were wonderful (when you ask for a well-toasted bagel, they actually listen).
if you get them fresh they are pretty good, not NYC good but good.  Get them more than a few hours old and just don't do it
shmear prices are high
a dozen is actually a pretty good value
I guess I'm one of those kind of people who tends to order the same thing over and over, especially when I'm at a specialty shop like Breuggers. I always get the Cinnamon bagel, with half plain cream cheese and half strawberry. I would highly recommend it! The shop is always clean and the staff friendly. The only complaint I have is the prices are high, I never come without a coupon. 
My buddy is into pumpernickel bagels so anytime we travel and we find him one it is a plus. Well in the beautiful town of Avon,Ct Bruegger's did not disappoint. To my pleasure they bake up this flavorful Asiago soft bread for my bacon, egg and cheese breakfast sandwich. The service was very prompt even with a busy morning rush. So if you need a quick delicious bite be sure to give them a try.
There are some tasty bagel sandwich combinations here, along with salads, soups, and desserts.  (One favorite sandwich includes sundried tomato spread that provides a nice sweet contrast to the cream cheese and onion.)  The bagels are very good.  The food quality has always been good when I've eaten there.  Service is usually very efficient.  Tables are usually clean, and the atmosphere is pleasant if it's not too busy.  Good place for lunch.
Bruegger's is a fundamental restaurant of my childhood. The bagels are delicious, and the chicken spaetzal soup is great. I will forever be a fan.
The bagels looked like they had been crying( ha ha ) but what I did not like the most here is the way they cook the eggs and bacon. What happened to a grill. They use this machine that I think makes dunkin donuts eggs look organic. The staff was ok but very very slow
Over priced. 
We were so excited to happen upon this wonderfully adorable sandwich/breakfast restaurant. The food is outstanding, every meal we have had there has been bursting with flavor. They use all local ingredients and could not be nicer or more helpful. The choices on the menu are varied and different from the norm. This is a must go!!!!
Party catered by Avon's Bee's Knees. Just sublime. 10/10 for food and also presentation. Farm to table courses presented beautifully with thoughtful comments between each course of a customized tasting menu. It didn't hurt that the hosts were able to elevate every part of the dinner party from a "10" to an "11"
Planned on eating inside.  You have to go up 20 stairs to a small attic space w a few tables. When our order was ready we had to go back down these 20 stairs to get our food and head back up the stairs. The food was ok. Fresh but not a lot of flavor. The owner was there and didn't say a word to us or anyone else.
We did a take out order for lunch.  It was tasty and fresh.  Would like to try it again when we have time to dine there
Great tasting, fresh, healthy, innovative dishes. A sunlight dining area. A separate take-out area. And they cater. It's a happy place!
We happened upon this place accidentally,  but what a find.   We were in the area on a Tuesday night, and saw that they offer large cheese pizzas on Tuesdays for $9.00.   That was months ago, and we have been going back every Tuesday since.  I'm usually more of a thick crust pizza gal, but they have won me over with their delicious thin crust.  We add fried eggplant to our pizza for an additional $2 as well.  The sauce is delicious and the eggplant is always thin and crispy and never bitter.   I highly recommend that if you enjoy pizza you check this place out!!!
We were looking for a fast quality lunch and found it in this small little restaurant while attending a local craft fair. The price was right and the food was excellent. The pizza was the way we like it, not greasy and filled with dough. Thin and crisp underneath with quality toppings. Daily specials. We will be back when in the area.
These guys have the BEST garlic knots...ever!  I wish we would have ordered more. The pizza was good, the toppings were a little sparse, but  I enjoyed the selection...portobello mushrooms with Carmelized onions and the margarita pizzas were both your typical thin crust pizzas.
They were courteous, quick and friendly. It was a little tricky finding the front door, buts it's a cute quaint place.
We walked into Hot Heaven for lunch on a Saturday.   Only patrons in the restaurant.   Good menu.   Tasty food.  Friendly service.    Excellent value.
Small, quaint, a great place to come with another couple and a bottle of wine and stay a while. And I LOVE the pizza AND the salads. 
Small place with absolutely awesome pizza! Garlic knots were outstanding as well. The service was great... funny, welcoming, and pleasant. 
We have had the delicious pizza and decided to go to  the "All you can eat" pasta special on Thursday nights.  It is absolutely the best find in the Valley.  Dinner starts with a huge, fresh salad, accompanied by garlic knots which are fresh and delicious.  Figured for the $7.99 cost- there'd be one little meatball.  There were 4- all large and homemade- not all bread stuffed.    My husband extremely fussy about his sauce- and thought it was delicious.  He did go for seconds- which was a very generous new bowl! The new owner is really pleasant and nice,the restaurant very clean,  and the waitress was delightful.  Oh- and it's BYOB!  If the location was more visible there would be lines!
Delicious pizza and wonderful salads!
Use them for office catering. FRESH ingredients and wonderful menu!
Prices fair.
They use DineinCT.com for deliveries and they are wonderful!
Great pizza, pasta, sandwiches. Very friendly service. Small-ish restaurant, but I've never had a problem getting seated. I believe it's BYOB. The garlic knots stand out in my memory. Highly recommend. Fresh food, everything seems made to order. 
I got a couple of pizzas from here the other day and they were very good! I eat pizza a few times a week and I am happy to add these guys to my rotation. Crust is nice and crisp with a delicious sauce!
We love the pizza at Hot Heaven.  Its great for take out, as well as eat in, but the place and dining area is pretty small.
This review is from a visit a few months back. Very low quality food. In my opinion the pizza was a notch below what you'd get at the supermarket. There is obviously little care for the customers dining in as I could clearly hear streams of obscenities from the staff that wasn't visible on the floor. There were children there!!!! I'll never go back there. I was so appalled. I'd recommend not bringing children here either. There are plenty of better options. 
Connecticut is right in the middle of the pizza belt, and with so many decent places around, it's hard to stand out. Hot Heaven does just that. The pizza is thin-crust at its best, and every pie that I have eaten has been hot, bubbly without being overly greasy, and so tasty that I continuously take home less than initially planned and need to scramble for lunch the next day. The salads and appetizers also are fresh and delicious. Mark and Alicia do a great job making you feel at home, especially if you are a repeat face. Hot Heaven is a great neighborhood place and has become my favorite in the area.
Stopped in for a quick late lunch and wow! ended up with pizza-making lessons in addition to tasty thin-crust pizza.  We ordered ours with white-sauce (have heartburn issues with tomato sauce) and were happy to get a  just-right pizza, not gluey or overloaded with cheese, sauce and toppings. Comfortable place to sit and enjoy lunch, cozy, fresh - nice place, nice people.
I was staying in the area and stopped in to get a take out Pizza. I placed my order, payed,  and was told 25 minutes. I walked outside and waited the 25minutes, went back in and they "lost my order". No apologies, no concessions, just asked me to order again. The pizza was certainly not worth the hour wait. I'd rather do Pizza Hut.
The pizza by far is the best you will find in CT. We have been going to this restaurant for several years and it has always been great. Keep up the good job.
Hot Heaven has the best pizza...This is great little place with friendly service and good food - BYOB but there is a nice wine store next door if you want to grab a bottle to enjoy with dinner !!!
My son and I tried Hot Heaven for the first time. The restaurant is in a cluster of buildings. It seemed like we had to go through a maze to find the entrance - a bit hard to find. The atmosphere overall was attractive with all tables and chairs (no booths) and burgundy painted walls. At around 1:00pm, the restaurant was about 1/4 full. I did not care for the large mural on one wall. We ordered a large BBQ Chicken Pizza ($19) and a caesar salad with chicken ($10.50). 

The pizza had lots of flavor, plenty of sauce and delicate thin crust. I really enjoyed it. I felt the price was fair. The caesar salad was topped with a few chicken pieces nicely cooked, but the salad was nothing special. It was a bit short on the dressing in my opinion. 

The server took our order rather promptly. The food arrived in a timely fashion. Once our food was served, the server never asked us how everything was nor did she say thank you when giving us our bill. Furthermore, she was on her wireless or remote phone talking to someone on the phone while handing us our bill and later picking up my credit card. My teenage son even commented the food was good, but the service lacking. 

I would return to try this restaurant again.
I was eating alone but it did not feel "wierd".  Nice place.  Had a glass of chianti with a calzone which was as big as my head:).  Friendly town, friendly people and good food.
One of the better pizza places in town.
They have Avery's Gross Sodas which the kids really enjoy.

Small place with just a couple of tables don't go here if your kids are overly active/noisy.

Service is a great.
Stopped in here my first night in town while looking around Avon. Great service, friendly staff, and a cold treat that really hit the spot. 
Overpriced by a landslide- .51 cents an ounce and somehow three yogurts rang to $10 even. How?? Smelled strongly of cleaning products and the woman behind the counter was rude and void of personality. Yogurt lacked flavor and was watery. We will never come again.
It's a colorful place that is fun to take kids.  Everyone enjoys selecting his/her own different kinds of frozen yogurt.  They have many varieties and will give you sample tastes.
Today was my second visit and I left unimpressed. We went at 7:00 on a beautiful summer evening- we were the only ones there. The store is nice and clean and the outside patio is very nice. 

The yogurt is average to below average. They had 8 flavors but two were not working- when you pulled the handle just liquid dribbled out.  I got the nonfat chocolate and the NY cheesecake. The taste was okay but it tastes a little watery.  The texture was not creamy. This wasn't bad yogurt- but not something I'd return for.  I thought the price was high for the amount we got.  The employee looked totally interested.  The flavor variety was not very diverse - mostly chocolates. Much better choices around for ice cream and yogurt. 

Stopped here for a treat and walked away with a mediocre mess. The yogurt itself was watery and simply flavorless. After we left we ate a little and dumped the rest. Not sure why this place is allowed to continue serving this.
Passed this place on our way home, the woman behind the counter was rude and was on the phone. The frozen yogurt was bland, flavorless and over priced. With all the choices out there just drive on past this shop. 
One person working was totally disinterested.  Didn't look up from texting when I entered or even while I was paying.
I love Frozen Yogurt - I frequent the TCBYs, Peachwaves and FroyoWorlds in Greater Hartford. I was really excited to have another one a short drive from home.

However, I was underwhelmed. The outside is decorated with a fountain, which is pretty but LOUD (my friend and I were sitting near it outside and could barely here one another speak over it.) While we were serving ourselves, I realized there was no nutritional information (except calories, which is good also). However, this is problematic for those with serious food allergies.

The toppings bar is pretty typical, but they also sell soda, cinnamon twists and fresh baked cookies. My major beef is that the people who run the restaurant have a seriously sour attitude. They never smile, seem bothered when you ask them questions and have NO customer service skills.

The yogurt itself was hit or miss. The red velvet was delicious, but the greek yogurt was tasteless. My friend had the cheesecake yogurt and said it tasted like butter. 

Overall, I will stick with the tried and true choices in the area.
I admit, I am a fan of Subway.  This particular Subway is located in a fun area.  There are a few shops.. fewer than there used to be but still fun.  Service is quick.  Seating, as in all Subways, is limited.  Looks very clean and the food is good.
Is there anyone still who isn't familiar with Subway?  The Avon location is very much like the others you would visit, at least from a menu standpoint.  What differentiates the locations is the seating and the service.  This restaurant has rather limited seating, and most people I've seen there (including myself) go for take-out.  The service has always been fast and efficient at this location.  
Most of the time we do take out,  but dining in the restaurant is a nice too.  Fast, courteous staff and consistently good food.
So we tried several dishes and we recommend them all. I got the penne Vodka, it was delicious, creamy, good flavor...needed salt, as did all of the dishes we tried. We tried the lasagna, spaghetti and meatballs and the carbonara. The lasagna was hearty and filling. The carbonara was nice and creamy. It was a great find and a wonderful place for dinner.
The service is always good and the meals are always plentiful. The desserts are amazing!!! The salads are yummy and almost any meal can be ordered family style. The decor and atmosphere is very nice and comfortable and good for long dinners and lunches. The food overall is good and you won't be disappointed with any meal you order.
Comfortable dining, including an outdoor patio. Food (and service) are consistently good but be aware that portions are quite large. A varied menu offers something for everyone. This is our go to place when area restaurants are solidly booked. Though usually respectfully busy, we have always been able to secure a table with no wait.
Decided to stick to my gluten free diet and ordered a gluten free pizza, it took very long to get my order and when it finally came I was disappointed to see how small the pizza was and to make matters worst the crust was horrible, it was dry, over cooked and tasted like cardboard, literally cardboard with a little sauce and cheese.   The salad however was huge and great. The atmosphere is nice but service pretty slow.
Da Capo's is one of my favorite local spots with good selections of beer and great pizza with very consistent service.
This is our favorite local spot. The bar is fun with a great happy hour, tv, and great bartender, Mark. We always prefer to sit on the bar side of the restaurant, if not at the bar.  The pizzas are good, the salads are great, and we've never had a bad entree. 
We visited on a week night in April. Our party of five was seated quickly, but after that, the service went downhill as our waitress seemed to be only mildly attentive. The Calamari and salads were good, and he two teenagers in our group definitely liked the Penne al Forno but the risotto I ordered was gummy and did not have many shrimp in it.  
It took us a while to find our waitress, and by that time, we were ready to leave instead of order dessert.
De Capo has a nice casual atmosphere and the food and service are consistently good!  I have had had lunch and dinner there and have enjoyed every meal.
For a place that claims to be Italian we expected to be wowed with the Italian staple of marinara. We were so let down. I hate to come across as crass, but it was no better than bland jarred sauce. Very let down. There are much better Italian restaurants on that strip that we'll stick with in the future. 
My husband and I went there for my birthday dinner on May 4th...even though I have lived in Avon for years we have never been.  We arrived and were promptly seated.   Our waitress Christine was friendly, attentive and nice. We told her it was my birthday dinner.  I had the Frutti di Mare ... a delish blend of big sea scallops, shrimp, calamari,clams and mussels served over a nice spicy marinara & linguini.  Very good.  My husband had the delightful chicken parm.  Before we went to the restaurant we checked out the menu online and saw that if we were there before 6 PM several bottles of wine were just $19...We ordered the Malbec with our dinner..it was very good.  For dessert we ordered a tiramisu to share.  It came with a happy birthday written on the plate and a candle...very thoughtful..
When we got our check it stated that the wine was $30...We told Christine of the error and showed her on the website on my smartphone that it said it was $19.  She went and got the manager who was very apologetic and changed our check to the $19 that the website had stated...but was concerned that it said that.   He then came over with a glass of Malbec for each of us as an apology ....Very classy!  The way all that was handled was very professional and classy.  We will be back after such wonderful and fair treatment (and delish food) Good food, wonderful service, very pleased. Sorry we didn't come here sooner :-*
Well put together entree salads, completely satisfying. Friendly polite service. Bar cozy with good TV viewing.
Love Da Capo! Food is always great and ambience was very romantic. Servers are all very nice, professional and knowledge. Perfect for a date night.
Da Capo is always crowded with diners who appreciate the great Italian entrees and pizzas. Both indoor and outdoor seating is available and takeout is and alternative. Our favorites include the Fruiti de Mare and the Verduretta pizza accompanied by one of the house salads.
After eating many times at their Litchfield location, I decided to return to this location for a third time. Great salads , excellent tasting food .Very attentive and prompt service. I do however,, always feel like I am spending a bit more than I would like when I get the bill. Salads and some dishes can be purchased and served family style, nice feature.
Nice Italian restaurant with good food and atmosphere. Be sure to check out the specials. Salads are nicely presented. Servings were ample, but not over the top. We all had clean plates., indicating a great meal. A little noisy.
Da Capo is underrated - we have gone a number of times an had consistently good, fresh, delicious meals. The garlic bread with cheese is to die for. My husband loves the chicken Parm. I am vegetarian and they are more than willing to alter a dish to fit my requests and tastes. I love that!  Sit outside if you can and just take your time!
I should have known something was amiss when we didn't need a reservation on a Friday night.  Our waitress Sara was inattentive and distracted.  My wife enjoyed her chicken Marsala. Their take on chicken cacciatore was utterly disappointing.  Extra salty, full of fat and chicken skin and since when are there whole legs and wings in cacciatore?
The food and the service was pretty good.  I enjoyed the lasagna and my wife and kids enjoyed the pizza.
We live in the area and were heading home from my son's soccer game, when we decided to visit Da Capo Restaurant. We called from the car and were able to get a 5:45 reservation. Service was very good, though it did seem to slow down a bit as the restaurant filled up/got busier. Our server took our drinks order and brought them back with a nice basket of delicious bread, with butter and olive oil for the bread. Our dinners were all delicious. My son had a calzone (chicken and bacon, though he wasn't keen on the bacon, which was different from typical breakfast type bacon) which was delicious. My other son decided to try the ravioli of the evening, which was filled with braised short rib and ricotta and had a demi glace sauce - again delicious. My dinner was Penne Vesuvianna - penne with olive oil, fresh tomatoes, oregano, and fresh mozzarella. Delicious and nicely presented - even one of the employees at the hostess stand thought it looked good and asked what I had ordered. We decided to split two desserts - Tiramisu and Chocolate Mousse cake. The desserts were fantastic! I asked and they make all the desserts in house. I was told the owner's wife was a pastry chef and they use her recipes. I'm really looking forward to a return visit.
This restaurant is excellent. Lots of choices for everyone. We will go back when we are in Avon for sure. Kids had grilled cheese and we had salmon & scallops with veg and the stuffed chicken. Both delicious! Thanks first and Last. 
Family favorite for sure. We have been going here for 15 years at least. It is delicious on every level, the spaghetti and meatballs are out of this world. The grinders are amazing as well as almost anything on the menu. The desserts are also delicious!!! Service is always with a smile and if there is ever a problem they are always kind and will make it up to you immediately. I forgot to mention the pizza, and the entrees which are always great!! You really can't go wrong whatever you order. This is a win win!
Great Italian classics and their upscale offerings are fresh and delicious. Super home made bread and desserts. A definite "go-to" for great take-out. Great wings too!
The food was fantastic! We ordered 6 different dishes and 3 of the desserts. The carbonara was perfect! We also recommend the sliders and the panini grilled cheese.  The lasagna was hearty as well...delicious blend of flavors.
The brownie and ice cream had so many layers of flavors.  The carrot cake and cheese cake were lovely. I do wish we had tried the chocolate tart. It looked amazing.
Their cracked pepper bread was very savory as well.
I've been to First and Last many times over the years. It is a solid, good family restaurant that serves consistently good food. 

I went a few nights ago for the first time in a while, and I was happy to see that they had expanded their menu. I recall a few years back when it was pretty  much just pizza and pasta (meaning just shells and meatballs). Now they have half a dozen sandwiches, grinders, and at least a dozen entree dishes in addition to the pizza and pasta. I got the chicken scallopini which was really good! Cooked well and the angel hair was in just the right amount of lemon butter sauce. Tasted really good. My wife got a penne a la vodka and she really enjoyed it. 

Service is good, and the restaurant is comfortable and nice. 

With the new menu additions First and Last is back on my list of restaurants to go. 
In town on business and stayed at the hotel near First & Last Tavern in Avon. Called in an order and it was delivered to the hotel lobby in a reasonable amount of time. Boneless wings were spectacular, as were the meatball sliders. Would definitely eat there again!
The food here is always consistently good. My favorite is the buffalo chicken chopped salad and the pizza.
Had reservations for 4 adults, 2 children. We were seated in a half booth with chairs on the other side of table. The booth had crumbs all over the back of the seats. The dining room floor had food and crumbs on the floor. The bread was served and no butter. Restaurant out of butter. The calamari came under cooked without taste. So disappointing. Then my veggie wrap came with so much grease dripping from the wrap I had to send it back. The second wrap was good. My husbands meatballs were not hot, only the sauce was hot. Again a big disappointment. The two pizzas ordered were okay the other guests in my party said. I can't comment on them as I didn't eat any. The waitress was fine as well as the other waitstaff.
We sat at the bar for drinks and wanted to get some raw bar items. You'd have thought we committed a crime. The bartender said, "Yeah", listened to our order and walked away. After more then ten minutes of doing absolutely anything besides help us she finally came over and said, "So what did you want?"
No way we'll ever be back. Sorry we bothered you.
We had a fantastic experience with First & Last. We planned a surprise party there for a group of about 70. The management was extremely easy to work with in making the arrangements and our waitress, Que, was fantastic. Food was abundant and delicious. 
The first indication that we were in trouble was when I went to the service station and got salt, pepper and butter.  Our arugula salad arrived, the waitress left, and I wished for parmesan and fresh ground pepper.  She came out later with our entrees and I was able to ask for these....$9 for a small salad of only arugula. 

My linguini with clams was tasteless and didn't have any garlic wine broth.  I sent it back. The meal returned with lots of broth, but it was thin and watery, still no flavor.  When I told the waitree - nicely - that it had no flavor and I didn't want it, she told me that all of her other customers loved it.  Not very classy.

She never said another thing, didn't offer a glass of wine or free desert, took the entree off of the bill.  We left, knowing we'd never go there again.

By the way, my husband had the stuffed eggplant which he said was very good but cold.  Side of shells was flavorless and cold.

Max a Mia is down the street, similar prices and always good. I won't return to this restaurant.
This place is really nice inside and a grate place to take a date. But it's a little pricy for most things. 
The food is good typical Italian comfort food. Both meals have been good, but nothing fantastic.

My biggest gripe - and why I might not return - is when a kitchen closes early. We walked to the restaurant on Saturday night, arriving at about 9 pm to hear, "the kitchen closed because it was a slow night". I will at least call first from now on.
Enjoyed a lovely evening at a 50th anniversary party at this establishment.  Food was very tasty and service was excellent.
We celebrated a milestone birthday with 30 family members at this nice Italian restaurant in Avon. Staff and cuisine were excellent and everyone enjoyed themselves.
Great Italian food. This is our go to restaurant every time we think of pizza or pasta. They have great meatballs and spaghetti among a variety of many other things to choose. Their menu is varied with many delicious meals. The food tastes fresh and is always delivered with the best tasting bread. They also have wonderful desserts.
Met up with a friend for lunch.  Spacious interior with various seeting.

Slightly slow service and it was not full of customers.  Good place to chat and catch up.

My tomato soup had too much cream, but it was cheap for a big bowl.  The basket of bread was ample and filling.

I would return because it's convenient, but not strictly for the food.
I've been to First and Last quite a few times and they have been really good on all occasions! The atmosphere is nice and they have a good menu with varied options.
quality was poor. bread cold. ordered spaghetti and meatball/sausage. sauce tasted bland and like it was straight from a can costing 35 cents. So incredibly disappointing as I used to like this restaurant. Saw girl in kitchen without gloves on moving spaghetti around with her bare hands. where have the standards gone?
I am, and always will be, the Diva of barging hunting. Not saying that First & Last Restaurant is a bargain, necessarily. However, what I'm saying is that returning through the doors of this restaurant for the second time, a Saturday afternoon, WAS happily facilitated by the fact that I had a coupon. I signed up to be on the mailing list of F & L the previous time I ate there. Shortly afterward, I received a 15% off coupon inviting the receiver to use it, "as often as you like during the month of October." The Nemarich Brothers (their names--Curt, Rich and Russ--were on the bottom of the coupon), are savvy to market discounts to their happy customer base. This gives us the opportunity to return full of anticipation for another positive eating experience. It's Pavlovian in a way, (I'm salivating already), buy works for me! I always say, positive reinforcement is the best way to encourage behaviors that you'd like repeated. The gluten free pizza crust was crunchy yet not dried out or burnt. The spinach and feta were fresh arranged in generous amounts atop the crust. The red sauce had a pinch of spice but in a good oregano/basil/Italian sort of way. Making awesome GF pizza, is an art form. All I can say is try it and I bet you'll like it. More later . . .
I stopped in on my way to an Art Show at the park 2 weeks ago as there isn't much for food up in that area.  The previous reviews seemed good so I went in with my 11 year old daughter.  There were two women working and a couple eating at a tables.  It literally took over 40 minutes to make 2 sandwiches with one being a bacon egg and cheese.  I also bought 6 iced coffees and when I asked for sugar, you'd think there was a ration.  I had to ask twice since they literally handed me 6 tiny packets for 6 large coffees.  Oh, and the cost for 2 sandwiches (one being a bacon egg and cheese) and 6 iced coffees???  $40+.   And, the coffee was weak.  I'll never go there again and I'm shocked at the service and prices.  I'll never go back.
We stopped by on a whim and found the staff to be incredibly accommodating and upbeat. They were attentive to the kids' requests and the food was very good.
Lovely roadside stop in Woodstock. Great coffee, pleasing service, good food, reasonable prices. What's not to like?
We decided to give the place another try after visiting when we first moved to Woodstock; 4 years ago.  
No better and no different, except for higher prince point.  Misleading breakfast menu items (not stating it was fake bacon, ham or sausage), overpriced up-charges resulted in an $8 breakfast sandwich made with the worst quality turkey substitute meat with a taste resembling sawdust.  

What a shame...fresh tasty bagel, nice cheese, fresh egg and horrible meat.  Clean enough, but who cares when the flavor is so poor.  At these prices they can afford to use real meat.
Woodstock Fair Goers, skip the Java Jive and go right into the fairgrounds for better quality food.
Nice quiet little cafe to meet with friends.  Quick courteous service and the scones are the best!  Go there often and love it.
We stopped here on our way home (they close at 2:00 p.m. during the summer) and were a little disappointed in the coffee.  The hot mocha latte was too sweet and the flavored iced coffee didn't have much flavor...and the prices are high.
need to grab coffee and have it up to your quality standards...stop here. Need to get that quick sandwich or breakfast goodie.......stop here.
If you're looking to meet with friends for a cup of coffee, this is the place.  It's warm, inviting, and best of all......great scones to accompany your coffee & chat!
Carefully prepared food and flavorful.  Great variety of really good breakfast and lunch choices.  Just a bit pricey - but worth it.  It was just what we were looking for.  The vanilla Chai tea a bit too sweet.  The western omelet chock full of ham, peppers and onions.
The "never-ending" cup of coffee was great!  I also ordered one pancake, which was HUGE.  Nice place for breakfast.
We asked for their strongest coffee and it was so weak, we had to spill it out.  The selection of pastries looked good, but after trying the coffee, we decided to skip the sweets.
Went exploring in Woodstock, and after checking out the antique shops (lovely!) decided to have lunch in that area. We had seen this Java Jive place driving in, and it looked homey and cute. We can always walk in and walk out. Well, we walked in, and everything looked so super fresh and delicious, that why go looking elsewhere.
I saw that they had "egg salad sandwich" on the menu, and decided that here I could order it. (I have always loved egg salad sandwiches, and then, about 12 years ago, I had one in Blythe (California) and I had never tasted anything so horrible in my life! It was like eating fat free mayonnaise by the mouthful. Saw almost no egg in that sandwich, it was just some low quality mayo out of a jar.Since then, I have never risked ordering one again! But, from the looks of things here, I knew that this would just be the kind of egg salad sandwich that I had always loved.) That is really a very serious compliment, because for me to trust someone to make a good sandwich after  my bad experience, took a lot.
Unfortunately, they were all out, and I had to settle for grilled cheese, which was as good as I have ever had. Tasty and hot. My husband had the Reuben and loved it. They make the sandwiches when you order, and use only the freshest ingredients. The place is spic and span spotless.
We really enjoyed our lunch.
This little place was a last minute choice since we missed breakfast at our inn. It was decent...service was friendly but portions were not huge...if you are really hungry try another place. Overall I would say this was kind of quaint but average.
Next to the Woodstock Fairgrounds lies Java Jive, where you can get gourmet coffee, a light breakfast, wrap, or a sandwich for lunch.  It's a cozy, small place, a favorite for locals.  This is Woodstock's version of Starbuck's without all the hype of the Green Mermaid.  Expect to wait a bit for your order at crush times, but it's worth it.
Very nice but somewhat small. Food was good as was the coffee!
Ever since she has moved from the Antique District in Putnam CT, it has gone from a quaint, whimsical tea room to a more commercialized lunch destination. We loved to write in the little guestbooks - and see the anecdotes and stories of other visitors. Tea was ALWAYS in a china teapot and everything was served so delicately. The décor was British and there were so many little treasure to admire. While the food is acceptable, the atmosphere no longer is. The owner is a lovely woman, and for those who never knew how it was, I am sure it fills a niche. However, having been to many tea rooms, including the Plaza in NYC, I am truly disappointed in losing such a treasure so close to home.
This sweet English tea restaurant is where I take my 6 year old daughter to for our mommy-daughter dates.  It's the perfect place for a beautiful lady to enjoy some tea and English lunch!  We LOVE it here.  
Mrs. Bridges Pantry is a shabby chic British tearoom in the scenic Quiet Corner of Connecticut.  When it's time for tea, I like to head there for their "Farmhouse Tea" (tea sandwich, scone, and pot of tea).  If I'm really hungry, I add either a garden salad or their excellent homemade soup.  They always have a great selection of teas and freshly made scones with lemon curd and Devonshire Cream - yum!  There is outside seating in good weather and a small shop inside.
We had a wonderful time at this little restaurant with very British leanings. The sandwiches, quiche and pasty were all delicious. The waitstaff was friendly and very helpful.
Simple good food. Loved the lemon lavender scone. Country decor and gift shop. Good service. Overall, a delightful lunch.


Delightful freshly prepared soups and sandwiches and the other expected elements of a British tea are for sale at Mrs. Bridges. It's like a slice of England in America, and we love it here. Expect a crowd at certain days (weekends) and be prepared to wait,  but there is a store to peruse British goods.  When you are seated, you will find the tea options are plentiful, and the chicken salad fresh, delicious and nicely served. Don't forget the soups though, they are amazing, especially the carrot ginger, mushroom, pea, potato and bacon; they usually have only one variety, but we are NEVER disappointed.

I took my two granddaughters here for a birthday lunch/tea.  They both have served "tea" for years so I was looking for a real tea experience.

Mrs. Bridges was the perfect place.  It is not the truly authentic informal or formal teas I experienced in England fifty+ years ago, but it was very satisfying nevertheless.  The girls loved(!) the British canned spaghetti on toast (or not).  

We enjoyed the genteel atmosphere, the excellent(!) service, and the food.  We plan on many repeats for special occasions.

The prices are reasonable.
Again a recommendation of Trip Advisor we searched out.  Charming place with small tables, a fascinating gift shop of British items.  Enjoyed British hot chocolate and British cookies served by a charming older woman who engaged us in conversation about local lore.  A delightful interlude when exploring the Woodstock area.
This is a nice out of the way place for tea and sandwiches. There is a gift store there to. They serve multiple kinds of tea. 
A long lost friend drove 2 hours and wanted to try a new place for lunch.  We met at Mrs. Bridges Pantry and spent almost 2 hours talking, eating, looking around at all the adorable tea related "goodies". My friend could not stop gushing about how embarrassed she was, because she's been driving past this place for many years and didn't know what was inside.  Freshly made sandwiches, salads, every kind of tea; homemade desserts and all kinds of little British gift items. People have "tea parties" for special events; and people of all ages will find it quite welcoming.
This tea room came highly recommended and I was eager to try it out with my husband. Checked the hours online and planned to go on a Sunday morning. Online posted hours said the restaurant opened at 10am on Sundays, so my husband and I drove from Webster, MA and arrived shortly after 10am. When we arrived, the door was still locked -- sign still said "closed." Bummed because we were looking forward to having breakfast. Returned to the car to figure out a plan B. At about 10:15am, a car with 3 people (restaurant staff) pulled in, parked next to the restaurant, and entered the building. We gave them a few minutes and then went inside. Had a great "English breakfast" of tea, scones, and toast with beans. Super cute place! Hoped the timing issue was just a one-time thing. Two months later, we decided to try for a Sunday breakfast again. Arrived a little after 10am (hours posted online still said opening time of 10am), and we had the same experience as before! No cars, door locked, sign said closed. A few minutes later at about 10:15am, the same car with staff came up the driveway. At this point, I was really frustrated and didn't feel like waiting longer for them to get set up, so we left. I don't understand why it is difficult to open on time. If 10am isn't doable for some reason, change the opening time to 11am! Recommend this place for a super cute, traditional British experience, but can't trust the hours.
A sweet experience for afternoon tea, a brilliant reminder of why we love British tradition. The tea here is what you are looking for in atmosphere, sweet treats and a lovely variety of tea. So worth the trip and the staff are delightful ,helpful and attentive. Love coming here for Valentines Day!
I have been coming here for years and I always find it nice however the last time I was there I was a little dismayed to find that there were some ant crawling on the table and on the window and floor near me.  I have never had this happen before and it creeped me out a little.  Every other time I have been there it has been excellent.  I always take my mom there for mothers day.
I have been here a few times. It is just an adorable place with a large tea menu and great homecooked food. 
Nice selection of teas and British candy, pastry, and other items.  The restaurant serves British dishes that are excellent.  The service is good as well. 
I met up with a couple of friends for afternoon tea at Mrs. Bridges' Pantry in Woodstock.  Service was great.  My friends and I had a cute little table with nice cups and plates.  The sandwiches were good and there were many different types of tea to choose from.  There was even a gift shop where you could buy tea accessories.  
Mrs. Bridges' Pantry in Woodstock, Connecticut is a quaint little tea house that serves teas, sandwiches and scones. The farmhouse tea is my favorite, with a choice of a pot of tea, a sandwich with the crusts cut off, like the salmon and cucumber sandwich, and an English scone. The atmosphere is charming, but avoid it on a cold, windy day, since it is not insulated nor well-heated. In nice weather you can eat indoors or out on the deck. It's located right across the street from the Woodstock Fairgrounds. It's an especially nice place to have a ladies' afternoon English-style tea.
My best friend and I go to Mrs. Bridges' Pantry several times a year and always end up ordering the Farmhouse Tea ... saves money over ordering the same items separately.  Currently, for $14.50 you get a pot of tea chosen from the extensive tea list, your choice of scone served with strawberry jam, Devonshire cream, lemon curd, and your choice of a tea sandwich (salmon salad and cucumber is a favorite).  Food is always delicious and service is prompt and courteous.  The atmosphere is relaxing and we have never been there where we felt rushed.  In addition there are many products available in their gift shop.  This is a wonderful place to go in the "Quiet Corner" of CT.
My daughter and I drove over an hour to get to the restaurant.   It was worth the drive.     Menu is limited but you cannot go wrong with their daily specials.    Absolutely enjoyed the apple cider tea.  It's a great fall tea! We could not believe the fresh taste of the pea soup.   We enjoyed the turkey, Brie and cranberry mayo sandwich.   The apple crumble with fresh custard was out of the world.  The ladies and men's rooms are outside next to the antique shop.  My daughter gave me this look.  When I returned she asked me if it was an out house.  It was a real restroom so gave no fear.   We loved it so much we bought meat pies to take home for dinner.   Our waitress, Faith, was cute and very nice
The shop offers teas and items that are hard to find elsewhere.  The teas are excellent.  They offer lunch and deserts that have British roots.
I have been here quite a few times and although the bread is wonderful, some of the other things in the case taste stale and day old to say the least. But that is not the worst part.  Every time I have been in the early morning, the manager, or the owner is yelling and throwing the F'bomb toward his female employees. I have never seen anything like it. Good bread is not worth watching these employees be treated in this way. Very disturbing. Prices are way too high as well.
We love this bakery!  The breads are delicious and out favorite is the sun dried tomato!   They make awesome whoopie pies, my favorite is pumpkin with maple filling!  They've started coming to out local farmers markets, which is fantastic because it makes them that much closer to home!
Outstanding! 

If you are on a diet do not come here.

This man is a baker! and a dam good one! check him out on Facebook , he post all of the delectable baked goods of the day there.
For some reason, I was anticipating something more, but was not very impressed with this bakery. It's small and offers the usual items. Perhaps we missed something.
I ordered a birthday cake for a surprise party with 30 people attending.  
The cake was beautifully decorated - they did a great job with that.
When I took my first bite I was so surprised - and not in a good way.    It was curiously lacking in flavor.   As I tried a few more bites, I realized that the top layer of the cake was so dry it was crumbly.   I've never seen anything like that before.
Out of everyone at the party, only one person took a piece home.
I expected a great experience and instead was disappointed.  
The saving grace was that it was beautiful to look at.

Very delicious healthy breads and pastries, made from many local ingredients.  They are very community minded as well.  A hidden gem in north east Ct.
Based on reviews on Trip Advisor, we sought this place out.  Hard to find with small signage in a strip mall but worth the search.  Stopped in for afternoon coffee and a super chocolate chip cookie.  Family owned and small it produces what we used to get when small bakeries used real ingredients and small batch baking.  America at its best in a small town setting in the quiet corner of Connecticut
the croissants are quite good outside of france--- not too greasy-- the scones are also fantatstic outside of the UK!
A friend recommended this bakery and we were thrilled to visit.  As we entered, it was so obviously a real bakery- the smell was incredible!  Before us in the cases was a really delectable array of treats-- we were like kids in a candy shop!  We typically "over order" when trying a new place, so we tried many, many treats: eclair, cinnamon scone, cinnamon roll, chocolate croissant, plain croissant, raspberry/cheese danish, cherry/cheese danish, breakfast pretzel.   Everything was very good.  Behind the cases are huge metal shelves of gorgeous breads.  We got two loaves:  Asiago cheese and Kalamata Olive... oh, yum.  The cheese bread was still warm and we started in on it while driving home.  The olive bread was also good-- a little tougher, but still very yummy.   
Though we didn't try it, there was a large freezer with gluten free options, and a coffee bar that served Baronet coffee.   
While we were there we struck up a conversation with a gentleman who travels over a half an hour regularly to get their treats.  One of the employees reminded him to call ahead to be sure his apricot danish would be on the baking list when he wanted them!  Several customers came in and were greeted by name.   It is bright, clean, and delicious.   I totally recommend it.  
One other note-- the cinnamon scones were good, but I tasted cloves, which I wasn't expecting-- just something to note if it influences your purchase.
Love the bread from Soleil & Sons.  Bill strives to make things that feed the body and soul.  I've bought several birthday cakes, countless loaves of bread and the occasional sweet.  I am never disappointed.  It's where I go when I don't make my bread myself. 
AMAZING in one word. Happened to be nearby the day before Easter and decided to pick up some breads to bring to Easter dinner. So thankful I decided to do so. And, glad I got there when I did as all the specialty pastries and Easter treats were pretty much gone but there were still breads left. I ended up with a loaf of olive bread and another loaf of garlic and sundried tomato. They are both heavenly. I don't eat bread often but, if I did...this place could get me into a lot of trouble as I'd be here all the time.  I only tried the cupcakes on my first visit and they were good. But, the bread....oh the bread...was delicious!!
Great neighborhood bakery, great people, great products!  Good member of the community. What more can I say?
I love their breads especially the Olive bread.  It is to die for.  Wonderful cookies.  The staff is very friendly and helpful.  The Bakery is a great supporter of the community.
The staff at the bakery are top notch~ Everyone is friendly and helpful.  The bakery uses only the finest ingredients and will make exactly what you ask for... Special orders are always perfect. If you have 'wants'  but no specific ideas they'll come up with something wonderful and amazing!  The artisan breads are amazing and the toasting buns are out if this world! It's always worth the drive, no matter where you're driving from.
Everything is fresh and very yummy. We have not had one single thing that we did not enjoy. Their breads are awesome (especially the one with asiago cheese). 
Owner is always having a creative moment! Everything is amazing so far.. breads are by far the best! Place is family owned and owner is always helpful and cheerful! 
Love this place. It's my go to place for artisan breads and amazing sweets. You can't walk out without a special treat.
Just the best bakery around.  Breads are wonderful, sweets very special.  The staff is friendly and very helpful.  I  stop nearly every time I drive from Putnam into Woodstock. 
 Bill is a caring citizen and generous with donations of product to non profit fundraisers.  Can't say enough about Soleil. 
pastry is very very dry. no taste. spent $20 and through all away.family members went to check out the bakery bought bakery items ended up tossing in garbage. lot's of choices of pastry but not worth buying.
I found this bakery by chance recently, and am so glad that I did! The cookies, cupcakes, and muffins are all very good.  Not your typical sugary flavorless frosting on the cupcakes, but unique and flavorful.  The muffins were delicious as well. The staff was very friendly as well.  This is what I wish my local town bakery was like!  We will definitely be back.
A friend of mine recommended this, after the quality of the old pizza restaurant that I went to dropped. I'm not sure about their other food, but I can definitely say that they make a great pepperoni pizza.
Good Greek style pizza. My fave is buffalo chicken. Always get the baklava. Good. Some interesting specialty pizzas. Tried them all liked them all. Fish and chips are good.  Not open Sunday's.
The 2 words do not go together, Greek & Pizza, I won't judge stuffed grape leaves, but pizza I will, cheap ingredients and lousy dough make for below avg pizza. Decent sandwiches, but really just common food.
Always like to support local businesses and this place is no exception.  Their party pizzas are very good, and they always try to accommodate short notice.
Pretty good for a pizza place . It is like any other nothing special, just your ordinary types of pizza place fare.  We  had  good food from here and will go back. It is closer for the country folks!!!
This place has great pizza however their customer service needs a ton of work. We order from here fairly often and give them a lot of business but after tonight's experience that is about to change. I called and asked if we could get a large pizza half one type and half another, something we have done at least 2-3 times here previously. The man on the phone responded with "we don't do that here" to which I said "oh well we have done it before" his response was "no you havent". I said "well that's an interesting thing to say we definitely have" there was silence and all of a sudden a woman was on the phone asking if she could help me. I said "I'm confused the guy I was just talking to was taking my order and now you are on the phone" she said "because I am the owner" I said "oh I didn't realize the owner took all the orders is that something new?" "She said he said "he didn't know what to do and handed me the phone" I said "Well he was very rude to me" she said "who was rude to you!?" I said "the guy I was just talking to there" she said "well what can I get you?" I said "I think I should take my business elsewhere" she said "fine lady take your business elsewhere then, I'm busy" so they have lost a loyal customer. 
If you're looking for a good pizza at a reasonable price this is the place to go.  We were getting pizza for ages 5 to > 55 including carnivores and vegetarians.  Everyone enjoyed the pizza and there were NO leftovers!
It was pretty nice. The food was standard pub fare. The service was great. There were some veggie items on the menu.
We have had 4 different specialty pizzas over the past month or so and all have been great. Very consistent and they don't skimp on the ingredients   Moussaka (eggplant extra cheese and hamburger) is fantastic.   Very heavy as it is loaded.  Recommend for takeout although they have 5 or so 4 person tables.  No beer available but some soft drinks etc   Place is clean and modern tucked in the corner of the plaza.   This looks like it will be a regular place for takeout pizza.  Will be trying some of the more traditional pizzas soon.  
I had heard great things about the pizza and happened to be in the area one weeknight, so I stopped in to grab a couple of pizzas to go.  

As I waited for my pizza, I had a chance to chat and found the couple working to be very friendly and interesting.  Pizza was cooked perfectly and, it was tasty. It didn't "wow" me as I thought it would've thought...I had been hearing some great reviews about this pizza and I only found it to be average,
They have a good size menu with lots of options. If your in the mood for Fish and Chips, come hungry! 
I liked  the set up but the food was pretty lame  like the chicken parmajon was dry and the sauce was bad
We went again to Sherwoods after a long absence. What a supreme disappointment. The fish portion was small and dry and uninspired, the fries standard coated frozen variety that taste of oversalt rather than genuine potato. 

It seemed to us that the restaurant is focusing on the loud, obnoxious drinking groups that are beyond boisterous on the other side at the bar.  We couldn't hear ourselves think. On the plus side, the salad was fresh and crisp, but that's about it..the waitress was unconcerned about our complaints. 

When we first moved here in 2012, we were so impressed with this 
restaurant, we went here at least 3x a week and got to know the waitstaff, tipped most generously. But since the quality of food has taken a nosedive, we won't return. As I have always said, only spend the money if it's better than you can make yourself, or worth the extra money.
Have never had a bad meal. Low key, local spot, friendly  atmosphere.  Some of the best ribs we have ever had.
Have been here a lot since our first experience. Great food, quick service and reasonable cost. Will continue to visit!
We have gone to the Sherwood both for lunch and dinner, we were very satisfied each time. The service was timely, the waitress knowledgable of the menu, the atmosphere is comfortable and clean and the food has been very good. This last weekend we took friends, I had steak tips (recommended by some guy outside having a cigarette), my wife had the pulled pork sandwich, our friends had the ribs. Each of us walked out happy. It's a pub so a person could stop in for a cold one and something less than a meal. One evening there was entertainment but I don't know the schedule for that. Give it a try.
Sherwood's is short on ambiance and high on food quality. Meals have always been delicious, plentiful, and well presented.
We visited this place for dinner after seeing the good reviews on Trip Advisor. You enter the bar and next to it, partly separated by a partition, is the dining area, consisting of a small number of tables and some booths.  It was not too busy on the Tuesday we visited but still had a nice lively feel to it. The menu was varied and you could add a starter of lobster bisque to a main course selection for just $3. Both the bisque and the mains we had were nicely cooked and served in generous portions. Service was very friendly - efficient without being hurried. We also enjoyed the rock/pop music being played from around 8.00pm.  We had no room left for desserts, but they looked good.  The bill (check) was a pleasant surprise and we felt Sherwood's offered good value for money. We will be back if we visit Woodstock again. 
Nothing special, very consistent product, good service, decent bar and beer selection, wines are 1 step above boxed wine. 
We arrived tired and hungry and this awas the first place we came across. It appears warm and friendly. The staff were very friendly when you actually saw them.  The owner came out and asked the tables if they were being tended to and we replied that we were but service was very slow.  They were very busy.  My husband ordered a burger and it was average.  He said he was too hungry to be picky.  I ordered a Lobster roll.  I thought since I was up around and area known for lobster I should get it.  I did.  I was never so sorry.  It was the worst I ever had.  I remember it was in some funky roll that did not compliment the Lobster.  I have wonder if they were out.  I at least hope so.  And it was bone dry with no taste. I would have been better off to go to the grocery store and just buy a cooked tail.

The place overall was so loud.  We tried to have a conversation but finally gave up because we could not hear one another.  If I were in the area I definitely would not return.  There was a pizza place in the same plaza that we almost went to.  We left regretting our decision.
Sherwood's is a restaurant and bar that offers really good food at reasonable prices.  The wait staff is friendly an attentive.  The have two dining areas.  One is closer to the bar.  The other is quieter.  
So we go there a bit. Food is usually good, creative menu/specials. The one thing we cannot get beyond is the noise level, even when seated in the back room it's intrusive to dinner conversation. If we could wish anything for this spot: move your bar into the back room and make the entire front area for dining.
Just two of us on Thursday evening in search of a decent meal. We sat at a table on the lounge side, not realizing there were additional booths & tables in another room.
Service was very quick and friendly. We ordered artichoke dip with tortilla chips for an app; happy with the choice. For entrees we had salmon and a chicken wrap with sweet potato fries. Both were quite good. 
Sherwood's was a pleasant dining experience and we will return, if in the area once again.
No consistency and it's too bad. The food used to be tremendous. Not so much anymore. The ribs used to be so flavorful and juicy but now they are somewhat "okay". The service the last time we went was poor. It's too bad. It used to be one of my favorite places. If anything changes, I'll repost.
While my expectations were admittedly quite low, Sherwood's did surpass them, slightly. The restaurant and bar area are both quite small but seem to be sufficiently well up kept. My meal was ordered and came out quickly. It came out hot and the presentation was nice. The meal was tasty, and the portion was very generous. I found the atmosphere both bland and lackluster, and the staff member I dealt with struck me much the same. The pricing I found a tad high, but given the nice sized portions didn't bother me much. This was my first and only visit, so far, so perhaps the help was having an off night. I will likely visit again and would not dissuade anyone from giving Sherwood's a try as well. I would just caution one not to go in with unreasonably high expectations.
Noisy and dark.  Food was unremarkable - not bad, but not good either.  If you like short order, fried food in a "family bar" setting then this is the place for you.  We won't be returning.
Monday night visit, not a regular customer.  The place was somewhat busy, and staffed with one waitress, one bartender, and no one at the door.  No sign indicating to wait to be seated, or seat yourself.  After standing at the entrance for five minutes (seemed like an hour, with all the eyes on us) I walked over to the bar and was told to seat ourselves, and that there were tables in an adjacent dining room.

We grabbed a couple menus and walked into the adjacent DR.  There was one party of two and I knew at this point that we were in for some bad service.  After 6 minutes the bartender made her way into the room and told us she would be our server.  

Well the so, so start was quickly improved with drinks and our salads.  But the real hit was the food.  My date opted for the backed haddock.  Cooked perfectly, moist, seasoned lightly, good portion, well presented sides.  A solid entree.

Mt meal was a real hit, blackened haddock and scallops.  What a fabulous job with the blackening, the fire was there, but not overwhelming.  

I highly recommend this spot.
We ate here because we found a $5.00 coupon on restaurant.com after we booked our hotel reservation in the area.

I think that I got a better deal than my husband.  I had a delicious chicken sandwich smothered with melted gorgonzola cheese for $9.00.    They gave me so much cheese that I took a lot of it out of my sandwich and ate it with the baked potato and lettuce and tomato that came with it.  I was very happy that they allowed me to substitute a baked potato for the french fries.

My husband had the chicken parmesan dinner that came with a salad for $13.00.  They allowed him to substitute a baked potato  for the linguini.  Although the chicken was delicious, it was not a generous portion.  

We had a very pleasant and accommodating waitress.

The restaurant is located in a strip mall close to the Putnam border on route 171.  One side of Sherwood's  is the bar and the other side is the dining room.   

The weakest part of the meal was the bread.  I love bread, but this bread was tasteless.
Sandwiches and pub fare are decent. Dinner is lacking - in many, many ways. Filet was overcooked, potatoes overcooked, frozen reheated veggies, scallops overcooked so badly that they were similar to hardened rubber. I can't see how a chef could feel good about sending the food that was delivered to our table out of his/her kitchen...it was an embarrassment to look at.  Similarly, had I been a server, I wouldn't have served it.

Menu needs updating (we ordered three things that are still on  the menu but that the server informed us that they no longer carry.  Speaking of service...it was also lacking. Server was scattered, never once checked on us, didn't ask if we wanted additional beverages. She dropped our plates on the table and took off. Had to lay our credit card on the table to let her know that our wait for our check was much too long. 

Visit the bar, order a burger or sandwich and fries but stay clear of anything/everything else!
Service not that great but food's not bad.  Atmosphere lacks coziness or something.......can't figure out.
Enter into colonial times and step into a beautiful mansion on a  well groomed property. The meals are exquisite and we'll portioned. Save room for their wonderful selection of desert options. 
Lovely dining room and bar.  Cozy sitting by the fireplace on cool evenings.  Food and service superb.
The Mansion does everything.  From fine dining, to events, to relaxing while sipping cocktails.  It's exquisite, and it helps that some pretty amazing people run it.:)
My sister and brother in law treated us along with them in the celebration of our 54th and 51st anniversaries respectively. We had never been there, but they had and it is one of their favorite spots. We all enjoyed an appetizer. among them being onion soup, crab bisque, and some sushi rolls. The rolls and the onion soup were especially good.. Lamb chops, scallops and a tuna appetizer were had for our entreescapped off with 2 delicious desserts that we shared. We hope to return for another special occasion.
Wonderful setting Wonderful food, great server,(Allison). This place is the best. All four starters were great but nice portions, and the entrees the best. Ahi tuna great and super presentation. All others were perfect too. Creme brulet the best and a nice port finished off a great evening. Will return soon.
Janet organized my daughter's bridal shower at The Mansion, and it was AMAZING! My daughter, who likes to be in charge had to give over the planning to her mother and maid of honor and I went right to the Mansion for the best place in town.

Janet was open to our requests, and made sure a great time was had by all. The food was beautiful and the NY guests were thrilled.  My daughter's comment was that she wished the day would never end.  Thank you to the Mansion's staff including Janet for an  excellent event! 

We are now regulars for dining at the Mansion for Sunday brunch and occasional dinner and the consistency has been spot on.  Where else can you pay 16 for an amazing brunch experience including fresh baked mini pastries, fruit/yogurt parfait and a huge plate of delicious inventive breakfast offerings?
Our daughter and son-in-law invited us for a dinner at the Mansion at Bald Hill in Woodstock, Ct. It was Mother's Day, May 8, 2016.  It was our first visit after hearing such wonderful accolades about this restaurant.  Unfortunately, the only meal that was considered "wonderful" was my husbands' which was some sort of a pork roast dinner.  My son-in-laws steak was overdone, my daughter's seared tuna was not good, she left most of it in her plate and my chicken with a small carafe of shells with bacon bits and cheese spread on the top reminded me of something I would whip up in the kitchen, when in a hurry.  So disappointing.  This was Mother's Day, a special day when any restaurant should be at their best......our waitress came over and related to us that certain food items which came with a dinner was not available..........!!!  This certainly wasn't a dinner prepared by a sous-chef.....sorry.
We took another couple from out of town to try out this facility and were not disappointed at all.  The food, service, and ambiance were at the top of the order.  We all had the rack of lamb which was fantastic.  In short, a place I would not hesitate to revisit again.
Beautiful dining venue, adorable bar, wonderful food. We had a great evening eating a fabulous meal then moving to the bar for after dinner drinks. My only complaint is we couldn't stay there. I truly didn't want to leave, can't wait to go back.
The Mansion at Bald Hill is a beautiful place to spend an evening at anytime of the year. The food is excellent and consistent. The dining rooms in the house are lovely-especially either the library or bar with a fire in winter. In the summer, the terrace and gardens are wonderful. A beautiful place for a wedding or other occasion small affairs in the Mansion itself or large affairs in the new Banquet center. This building is beautifully done if a bit noisy.The staff is friendly and efficient. Janet Waterman, is especially helpful when planning an event.
The Mansion at Bald Hill has great food, atmosphere and friendly waiters.  The Sunday morning brunch is great.
We only went to dinner and did not stay there.  The service was excellent and the menu selection was varied. Everything we had was excellent. We ordered the filet mignon and the rack of lamb. Both were cooked to perfection. Desserts were also very delicious would definitely go back to dine as well as stay. It was very enchanting
The dining room is absolutely lovely and I enjoyed visiting from the aesthetic perspective. I started with the French onion soup which was good overall although it had a slightly stale taste to it. The three others in my party were all very happy with their clam bisque. I ordered the seafood bolognese which was generous with its servings of lobster meat and shrimp which were delicious, but was otherwise lacking in flavor. The homemade tagliatelle was overcooked and the sauce was significantly under-flavored. I added salt which is something I never do in restaurants and also noted that even adding heaps of Parmesan cheese could not bring the pasta to life. One other person in my group ordered the same dish and felt the same way as I did. A 3rd ordered the cod dish which she described as bland. Our 4th loved the duck special and rated it as excellent. The service was ok but could have been more attentive. I would go back again to give it another try.
The restaurant in this old mansion is lovely with beautiful architectural details and working fireplaces. The bookcases in the large rooms are filled with books, artifacts and photographs which suggests you are dining in someone's home and keeps it from feeling too stuffy. 
The staff are pleasant, helpful but not overly attentive. 
As for the food itself, I have dined here four times and have found it to be consistently mediocre in relation to the prices they charge. If I pay $29 for a pork medallion, the entire table should not rock back and forth while I attempt to saw through it. The potato wedges should not have that soggy consistency which indicates they have been previously cooked and then reheated. Whipped potatoes should be silky and smooth, not dense enough to allow your fork to stand upright on it's own. An appetizer that included a chive biscuit crumbled into a mess on the plate and could not be used as a vehicle for the pork belly that accompanied it. The plates are always well composed and the flavors are there ... it is just that things seem to be prepared ahead and when they are reheated to serve, everything is overdone. I would rather wait a little longer if it means my pork comes out juicey and even a little pink inside. The wine list is "ok" but was surprised that there was not a single Willamette Valley Pinot Noir to be had. In this part of CT, there are not a lot of restaurants that can offer the same ambiance and elegant feel - so I suppose they can get away with the prices they charge. This would not work where they had more competition. 

One of our favorite places to eat, the food is always great, the winter fixed price menu is a real bargain.
This is our choice for a special event birthday anniversary etc. The food and service are always excellent. We also enjoy their Sunday brunch (a very good deal).
The food is so delishius and the service is superb.  Charming old mansion plus new banquet center for large functions.  
Lovely new building, perfect size and lovely outdoor spaces, (fire pit, and outdoor fireplace).  This is a great venue for a wedding reception and the staff was attentive and kind. 
A lovely restaurant with antique charm, excellent menu, service  and atmosphere for a nice evening with friends. Nice drink and wine selection; delicious Sunday brunches. Highly recommended!
Our recent trip to The Mansion was wonderful. It was a deligtfull end of summer early evening to sit out on the patio.  The Seafood Bolognese was to die for. The Filet never disappoints either.  Allison is always a delight.  Another wonderful dining experience. As usual, compliments to the chefs!
We received our food before our drinks. The food, although is tasty and fresh, is way over priced for the service and the atomosphere. We were a party of two.  Once our waitress started with a table of ten, we were forgotten.  My husband had to hunt down the hostess for our check.  After leaving, we realized we were overcharged for one of our appetizers. This was our third try with Roots Down and we will not be going back.
If you want to pay $16 for a hamburger then this is the place to be. It was a good hamburger but nothing to warrant the price.
So excited to be go but menu is weak. Thought we would have tons of vegan and fish options but no. Bar is very expensive. Appetizer limited and tiny. So sad. Wanted this place to really shine but too expensive, limited, and you will leave hungry. And with thinner wallet. Staff was nice but not enough to overcome the basic issue of too little for too much money. 
We have heard good reviews of Roots Down and finally had the chance to experience this restaurant yesterday for brunch. The entire 'feel' of this place is welcoming. Outdoor seating, indoor seating, you name it. Everything is amazingly clean and crips. Our breakfast was fantastic and the ingredients oozed of freshness. Staff was very professional and friendly. Can't wait to go back!
What a wonderful experience dining on the patio of this upscale eatery! With all locally sourced food, the diverse menu offers numerous selections to please most palates. And the chef was most accommodating in agreeing to dietary requests.
We stopped here for dinner before the Brooklyn Fair and will revisit next weekend before the Woodstock Fair.
Its a good reason to visit Woodstock.
Went in for brunch. Everything was made from scratch even the Bloody Mary mix. Wow I was so impressed. Everything from the food to the service. I will be back no question. Don't miss this place. 
The best burgers around. Plus all New England or mostly some from N.Y. (beers ,whisky and others) Great place and service is excellent which is important to me.

the best burgers around
What a nice place. Well thought out for a place this size (yes small & cozy) with a nice outdoor seating area. Food is all local & fresh which explains the prices. A bit high for the portion or an every week stop, but the food is very good. Our favorite is without question the Sunday Brunch. NOT a buffet, but a well balanced brunch menu for the moderate budget. Try the Scotch Eggs--wow! So I would say give it a try anytime, but Sunday brunch is my call. Eat, Drink & Live Well.
We went for dinner tonight 07/14/16 and had a really good time, good food and nice ambiance. Our server Jen was great, very pleasant and knowledgeable of their menu. We will definitely come back to Roots Down when we are in the area.
Highly recommended!!
We stopped for dinner in our travels, and had a delightful time. Waitress audibly skillful, and very helpful. First time here, and we were not disappointed. We enjoyed wine, and tapas. The scallops we had were perfectly cooked and dressed in a very tasty sauce. 
We just loved the ambiance, the restaurant was very clean and well lighted. When traveling through north eastern Connecticut, this deserves a stop. You won't be disappointed.
It was hard to choose from the well described selections.  I really enjoyed the drink menu also for it's specials.  The prices are out of my range for making this a regular stop but I would definitely return for special occasions. 
they were fully booked for Mothers Day but the hostess told us to come in around 2pm and they would find us a spot. They gave us a table by the window and a lovely server by the name of Amanda came over and told us about the restaurant and the farm to table idea and as much as possible it was local sourced. the menu changed with the seasons. She was the perfect server we all felt we were very lucky to have gotten her. The Mothers Day menu was eclectic I got the honey braised pork belly over a bed of steamed ramps and Chanterelle Mac&Cheese it was beautifully served and the food was incredible. 2 others in our party got Lamb burgers stuffed with feta
pine nuts garlic and eggplant  they raved and the final person got Mousaka and stuffed grape leaves she ate every bite and said it was the best she ever had had.  We had a Margarita with fresh lemon and lime juice. and sangria which was spicy and refreshing. Our desserts were the stuffed dates which were fabulous and others got the coffee ice cream which was made with coffee stout. all in all the service the fabulous food made for a wonderful dining experience and we would go back in a minute
Been to this place often and always fabulous. Planned Mothers Day with my family. Checked the website for specials and to see if they took reservations.  I even sent and email regarding any specials. On the website it said they don't take reservations.  I checked for a reply and there was none.

So off we go Sunday morning @ 10 the 3 of us.  We get there only 3 cars and 1 table in use. We were asked do you have reservations?  I said no the hostess said sorry we are booked this is our 1st Mothers Day. I told what the website posted and that I did text them. She said did you get a reply I said no. Again she said sorry. 

She wasn't too concerned with our disappointment.  Very short and terse. 

Not a good experience. 
Their faux pho is always delicious and just tastes fresh, tried the spicy chicken wings, killer and not overly hot. The halibut special was incredible.. was looking forward to trying their cucumber martini while I waited, good but fell short.
Roots Down took about three years to open and still doesn't seem to have everything together. The food we had(party of four)was very good but not a bargain- considering the portions-and we had not order the Tapas but full entrees. Wine was $12.00 per glass. Our waitress was very good. The place looks a lot like an new/old rustic country eatery-all hard wood banquets-or tables and chairs quite noisy and too bright. I don't quite get an overall idea of what they want to be. We'll try it again but with all of the good restaurants around here it may be a while.
Farm to table at it's best!  They make everything in house, from dressings to desserts. The farms they purchase from are all local! (within 15 miles of the front door)  They smoke their meats, oh my! My compliments to the person who does that!  Rich flavor without being overwhelming.  There was no detail overlooked. Service was friendly and knowledgeable and it's definitely my favorite new place! :)
Went last Friday night with wife and another couple. I heard some good things and some bad things about this restaurant.  Our experience was pertty average. My friends wife ordered fish tacos and the taco itself was like rubber. The inside was below average. My friend had the regular cheese burger with truffle oil on his fries. Other than the truffle oil he could have gotten that burger at any restaurant in the area.  My wife ordered the moussaka the flavor was ok but no ground meat to be found. I ordered the fish and chips and was surprised to find it was prepared with char (I failed to read the menu closely enough ) my bad.  I must say it was well prepared but not to my liking as I don't eat trout or salmon. The atmosphere was OK but a bit noisy and the person at my back kept slamming his back against the booth to my irritation. All in all a very average night. Service was OK.
This place is just starting. They have a great menu but, they don't have control of how much of FRESH stuff to order. The prices are WAY too high for what they can deliver at this point. If you want good booze and a fancy drink that you will PAY for.....go there. Thee place looks nice.
This new place in the quiet corner is worth the drive from anywhere in New England.  It is unique yet familiar with it's fresh local grown fare. 
Went there last night because I  had heard some good things about it. Also, I wanted to go to someplace that offered a more eclectic menu.  I was thrilled.  My decided to go with some small plates and chose, bone marrow, stuffed dates and seared scallops. She was overjoyed with the taste, presentation and overall quality of her choices.  I had rack of lamb.  I know it is tricky to get just the way someone wants it so, when asked how do I want it cooked, I said let the chef decide. Wise choice, it was exactly the way I wanted. Rare, juicy and flavored just right. I venture to say it is is the top 3 racks I have had in restaurants. 
Our server, Anna P. She is a gem. Knows the menu, how things are prepared, very friendly and works Wednesday and Saturday.  Needless to say I will be there on those days. You might be wondering why only four stars if I am so pleased with everything, noise level in the bar area.  Turn down the music just a bit so we don't have to compete with it.  That combined with the fact that there aren't any sound absorbing materials in the bar makes the bar just a bit louder than I would expect. 
Some people have said the prices are high.  Well, there is another restaurant in the area that people say that about and they both have one thing in common.  The menu changes constantly and they are both good.  Ok, so two things.
We had 2 glasses of wine, my wife also had a tequila (brave little thing) the food I mentioned and the total was $102.00 before tip.  It would have been the same at the other place.

It is a wonderful addition to the culinary choices in the area.  I wish them all the luck with the business model they have chosen.

My wifeasked if we would be back.  I replied I am not leaving.
We try to dine weekly at the Inn. The service here is wonderful, the waitresses and Herb are the best! Very attentive and pleasant! The food is of the upmost quality and plentiful. Great chefs🍴Very glad we live in the area so we can enjoy this wonderful Inn. They also have some fun events such as Bunko and Stew and Story that we wouldn't miss , especially the Halloween Stew and Story!  Never fails ! Go and enjoy🍽
My wife and I traveled scenic 169 on an early fall day and stopped for lunch at the Inn. Elegantly set tables, and the meal was terrific! Artichoke bottom appetizers were delicious. My wife reported that her butternut squash soup was the best she'd ever had. My lobster panini had a tasty Vermont cheese that set it off from other lobster fare I've had in NE. Service was friendly and helpful. We were referred to other places to visit, and the bill was very reasonable for the quality of the experience.
We dined on the patio and had a wonderful dining experience. The patio is surrounded by plants and flowers. The tables are spaced very far away from each which allows for a great deal of privacy. The food was very good, and our server was terrific.
Love to come to this charming restaurant for it's wonderful ambiance and good food.
We find it especially delightful when the wood fireplaces are lit on a cold snowy night.
One of our favorite places in the Quiet Corner.
We have been to this beautiful restaurant for both our Rehearsal Dinner back in 2008, and more recently for my birthday in 2015.  It hasn't changed as far as perfection is concerned.:)
Very nice and quiet. The grounds are beautiful. The rooms are very cozy. The complamentary breakfast is ok. I would recommend this inn to everybody.
Stayed here after a terrible experience at another place nearby. They were able to accommodate us last minute and were so nice. The grounds are meticulously landscaped and has a beautiful outside seating and patio area. Inside room was so clean and perfect and beautiful! Loved it and will be back!
We had s beautiful suite with a gas fireplace.  The room was immaculate, the four poster bed very comfortable and the bathroom clean and efficient. 

While only two bath towels were in the bathroom when we checked in, a call to the desk and two more were delivered with a smile. 

Breakfast is included, but not the most appetizing we have received. The breads and pastry were all store bought, probably from a grocery store. The coffee was warm, not hot, the fruit, instant oatmeal and yogurt selection was so so. 

We ate breakfast away from the inn the second day. We will stay here again, if we come back to this part of CT, but we will plan breakfast out. 
My family - a crowd of about 18 people - goes to the Inn at Woodstock Hill for Christmas Eve. We have been going there for several years and it very nice. The staff is very personable and the food is awesome. We have had the same private room every year and the decorations are more special each year.
Our Valentine dinner at the Inn at Woodstock Hill in Woodstock, CT was tremendous. From the moment we arrived (it was -2 degrees with the wind blowing and felt like - 25) to the time we finished our experience was exceptional. We were warmly greeted by our Host and walked to our table in the lovely formal dining room (there are also other smaller rooms). From our first course of consisting of hot French Onion soup and warm Brie crapes to our salads, and then the sorbet (very nice touch we might add) to our main dishes of Vegetarian Risotto and seared Ahi Tuna, we were enthralled.  Desert included hot coffee, a warm apple tart with vanilla ice cream, as well as a hot molten chocolate lava cake with vanilla ice cream. What a meal! This was fine dining at its best. The piano player and fiddler kept us entertained. This was out first time at the The Inn at Woodstock Hill. After reading a food review (all 5’s), we knew we had to there for our special Valentine’s Day dinner.  We were very impressed. We can’t wait to go back. Thank you Inn at Woodstock Hill.
A perfect Valentines Day!! ❤️We frequent the Inn quite often and came here for dinner on Feb 13. What a nice surprise we encountered...... It was decorated so beautifully for Valentines Day. They also had a special menu with excellent choices! We had the ravioli which was heart shaped and absolutely delicious.Then as we sat there was a violinist walking through the rooms playing love songs. There was also a pianist who entertained. What a lovely night and surprise! We are always pleased when we dine here. The wait staff is wonderful! 
Stayed here a few nights for business, but would come back for personal travel, definitely. Comfortable rooms, beautiful area of the state, cozy (and spacious) sitting areas. I liked the breakfast in particulars--continental but with fresh fruit, deli meats & cheese, toast & English muffins, pastries, coffee, hard boiled eggs, etc. Fire in the fireplace, soft music in the background, and friendly staff & vibe. Only minor drawback is pint-sized ironing board in the room, but it's an inn, not a hotel. Overall a lovely experience.
Had a family get together at the same time 2 others were taking place.  We still felt like we were the only ones there and the staff was part of our family.  Breakfast brunch excellent.  Real table cloths, napkins, and even wash cloths in the lavatory.  Never experienced such exclusive treatment.
Staff was most solicitous and friendly.
A nice, calm, and yes elegant place to meet.
There are but a few very good finer dining establishments in the area, this is one. Good menu, great service, excellent execution, excellent bar and good wine list. I recommend it. They also have on premises lodging.
Beautiful old home made into a fine dining restaurant.  Staff is friendly, accommodating and expert.

Food is excellent.
We happened to be in the area at lunchtime on a sunday and came across this inn- thought it might be interesting to check out. The only problem we had was that we went in where it said "restaurant" and there were menus posted but  on one was there. I sort of gave up but my husband went in, wound up going into the kitchen where we heard some noises and then directed to the dining areas in the inn proper (I guess the restaurant door should have been locked). We didn't want a "fancy" meal and asked if they offered any of their lunch sandwiches. The chef said, no, but then when we asked for a place that did offer more casual meals and told her we were just looking for something like a turkey club, she said she did have fresh turkey and could accommodate us. We were seated in an elegant, traditionally appointed dining room with just the right amount of air conditioning (there was a patio set in the gardens but it was pretty toasty out there that afternoon). Our turkey clubs were very generous, along with chips, cherry tomatoes and orange pieces. We enjoyed our meal and the service was fine- we then checked out the rest of the common areas. It appeared to be an elegant restored inn (or what was once a house turned into an inn). We appreciate the chef accommodating our request.
We were in the area for a wedding and were directed to this Inn.  It is lovely!  The grounds, gardens, breakfast (included) were all worth the expense.  But the best meal (not included) was Sunday Brunch!
If you are into the Victorian style decor than you might enjoy it. We came here just for dinner on a gift and am glad we had it. While the food is good it is way too salty from the bisque to the sauce reductions. The service was the most disappointing from the warm bottle of white wine to having to ask for more water three times. The electric pepper grinder was obnoxiously load but did add sound to the dead air. You honestly have to whisper or everyone will hear your conversation. Perhaps it was because it was a Monday but when paying 27 plus dollar for entrees I expect more on the service side. Would probably not come back for food but may try the inn sometime. On a positive note we took our bottle of now cold wine to the outdoor patio which is beautiful. Not a wasted Monday night, just could have been better.
We are regulars here on Friday evenings and love, love , love it! The food is superb and Herb,our waiter, is awesome! I say call before you go because I have tried to go during the week for lunch only to find there was no chef that day. Another time,I believe it was a Monday, I went with my daughter and the place was deserted so we walked out, even the kitchen area was dark. Hated to go elsewhere but.....
Had a lovely dinner with my husband. Terrific wait staff, impeccable service and food. Pretty pretty location. A must do!
Happening to be in the area one weekend morning, we stopped in for breakfast.  Breakfast is just one of those things...it's quite difficult to have a bad breakfast.  And, we likely wouldn't say this was a "bad" breakfast.  It just wasn't a very good one.

Service was OK - our server was very nice, prompt and courteous. The menu was basic - nothing special and prices (compared to other breakfast excursions as of late) seemed a bit high.  Regardless,we each tried something different.  

As everything was just OK...I'll just note a few key point...
-You can't order a side without getting an order of toast.  Thus, if you order a breakfast (they already come with toast) and want a side of bacon and a side of sausage, you get another 4 slice of toast...added to the two you already have! 
-Ham is not a good tasting ham...tastes quite funny to be honest.  No one in our group finished (or took more than 2 bites of) their ham and the server didn't ask why so we are led to believe this may happen quite often.
-There was more oil/butter/something on each piece of toast than in the world's largest oil spill...no kidding. Toast (and,between us, we had wheat, rye and white) was drenched with an oily substance.  Not good.

Finally, I do  believe that the Village is in Woodstock and not Putnam but not really sure. We've had some great breakfasts and, again, it's hard to not get breakfast right.  I wouldn't say that the Village got it wrong...it just wasn't very good.  Breakfast averaged $12 person - with coffee and juice.
I went to the Shire Cafe with high expectations as it was recommended to me from a family member who gave it rave reviews for its sandwiches and the Lord of the Rings theme.  Sorry to say it was a miss on both points.  Yes the Corned Beef was plentiful and clearly freshly made but I wish they held the grease (butter) a bit as I shouldn't need to use multiple napkins.  Service was pleasant.  So for me a miss, average at best as I was looking for a fresh, sandwich on artisan bread and unique ingredients.  I will keep looking.
When we got to The Shire, the place was packed to the gills. I was a little concerned with so many people the service would be slow, but the whole experience was fantastic! The food was delicious, and the plates were literally overflowing. The waitress/owner was personable and treated my group like we were family coming in for our weekly breakfast, even though it was our first time. Everything was fresh, everything was homemade. Prices are reasonable, atmosphere is great! We will be regulars, and whatever you do, treat yourself to the Gollum's mess. It can't be beat!
Deliciously cooked food and yummy baked goods.  One baked items could feed several people.  Interesting items (jams and such) for sale also.
Came across this lil' place on a Yelp bakery search looking for Lemon Meringue Pie. I called Soleil & Suns in Woodstock but they needed 48hrs notice for special orders. The Shire fell right below it in my search so I decided to take a drive over @ 9:30a & beg. Joanna said my special order was no problem & would be ready by 2:30pm! No begging was necessary! I also ordered a bacon egg & cheese bagel w/hash browns & was floored…HUGE & DELICIOUS! (See pics) My only wish is that they consider carrying sesame bagels at some point in the future…fingers crossed! The potatoes were perfectly crisped, the breakfast sandwich, I'll describe as Heaven b/c there are no words. The Lemon Meringue Pie was THE ABSOLUTE BOMB! I hate lemon pie but had some w/my boyfriend's Mom b/c it's her fav & we were having a late Mother's Day celebration! Guess who had a 2nd piece…me! I guess I don't hate lemon pie after all! The center was smooth & silky, tangy & sweet…the crust thick & firm…and the meringue…a blend of sweet, salty & fluffy, browned perfectly.  This place was so good, I dragged my boyfriend out of bed early the next morning & we had a full breakfast (see pics). The side of Hobbit Hash we ordered came home with us b/c we were too full to finish it. That became our awesome dinner! This morning before heading back to NH, He asked if I wanted a bacon egg & cheese for the long ride home. Took me 2 seconds to say "YES"! 3 breakfasts at the same place in one week…that's never happened before in met 51 years! The Shire gets my stamp of approval. Hoping to see a Hobbit peak out from the kitchen on my next visit. It would be nice if they had some more Hobbit/Lord Of The Rings decor on the walls to really give it a shire feel, but that won't keep me away. The food & service are exceptional…the very best in all of Putnam! For a quick bite to eat, don't pass this lil' place up! Give it one try & I guarantee you'll be back! Thank you Joanna for all your hospitality & to your Mom for baking the exceptional pie on such short notice. To the cook…you are a Chef to me & Dan…great food!!!

This place is the best! Everything is homemade, great prices and family run. The place makes you feel like you're a regular even if it's your first time. Lunch specials are the best! If they have the prime rib sandwich make sure you get it! Very clean and fast service. 
We have eaten here at the Shier many times and the food is fantastic but this post is about their CUP CAKES....they are Awesome!!!! We just had 100 of them made for our daughters baby shower and they were delicious!! The Boston Cream, Chocolate Bomb, Carrot Cake, Almond Joy and especially my favorite the Maple Bacon. Good job! Fantastic! Go there and get some. Thank you Judy!
Very nice little sandwich shop. The people were warm and friendly. I had hash and eggs, but was surprised by hash. It was chopped fresh veggies with corned beef, no potato. Yummm E!. Veggie Girl had a grilled muffin. She loved it. We will be back.
Where else in northeast CT but the Shire Cafe can you sit with your favorite hobbits, J.R.R. Tolkien, and great food?  You'd have to travel to New Zealand for a similar experience.
the food was old and also it was burned i very much disliked it also it wasent very good quality oh yeah it was bad
This café has incredible sandwiches, deserts, and soups! The staff is super friendly and homey! Oh and did I mention huge portions!
We were looking for place to meet up with some freinds from Rhode Island. I came across this gem of a restaurant on the internt. They also hold events from business meetings to Weddings.
We went for lunch during the week. They gave a regular menu as well as a list of lunch specials. The food was very good reasonably priced. After we ate, the hostess gave us a 'history tour' portions were built in 1792. George Washington visited this place when it was a home. 
My husband and I have had dinner here many times - we love the food!  It's the service that is intermittent.  We've experience 4 different occasions where they appeared to be short-staffed, and dinner took the better part of 3 hours.  But a couple of weeks ago, we had what I believe was a new server.  She delivered our drinks and appetizers, then disappeared.  I waited 15 minutes for her to come back so I could order another glass of wine, and gave up - so my husband got up and asked the bartender (who is excellent!).  Then, the meals came.  My husband's entire dinner was cold, including his steak.  Server STILL missing - she never came back to check on us.  We waited about 10 more minutes, and still she didn't appear.  So my husband got up and told the hostess.  When the server finally returned, she took the dinner to be reheated (no apology by the way).  Back came the dinner about 10 minutes later - still as cold as it was when it arrived the first time.  We waited a few more minutes, and she reappeared.  My husband told her the dinner was still cold, so she said she'd take it back and heat it up again.  My husband said - don't bother, I don't want it back, and please take it off the bill.  We spend a fair amount of money here, and dine here at least once (sometimes twice) a month.  On the way out, my husband stopped to speak to the hostess about the situation and her answer was "I don't know what to say".   My husband said in reply, that we won't be back.  And what a shame, because the food really is good, but the hit or miss service, the waiting and the occasionally cold meals are not acceptable. We were seated at 6:30 and it was 8:45 when we left. Everyone has a bad night sometimes, but this has happened too many times, and this time, it seems nobody really cared about it.  We're certainly not complainers, but after experiencing 5 of these types of incidents, it needed to be brought to someone's attention.  I hope you're listening Grill 37.  We would really like to come back, but the reaction to this issue was pretty disappointing.  I can't see spending in excess of $100 for dinner and having anything less than prompt service and a meal that is delivered while it's still hot. Five stars for the food, Two stars for the service.
We stumbled upon this wonderful restaurant will driving through rural Pomfret.  It looks like an old bed and breakfast when you enter.  But it is just a large restaurant with several private rooms, for larger functions, and quite a few smaller cozy rooms for dining.  Each room seems unique with fire places, local pictures on the walls, and some rooms with quite a few windows for outside views.  The bar area is very nice and cozy.  The staff was fantastic.  They were attentive and helpful with any questions about wines, food on the menu and the good and unusual variety of draft beers.  The food was excellent and the wait was not long from time of order till food was delivered..  It's a nice combination of good food, really pleasant staff and warm inviting interior.  Will definitely be stopping back as often as possible.
Bridal shower brunch was amazing. The private room was wonderful for our gathering. The food was delicious and the staff not only nice but accommodated spot requests. We relaxed and enjoyed from start to finish. 
My wife and went for a Sunday drive. We went to Grill 37 to use a restaurant.com certificate.  We were seated promptly. We were served water and our server took a drink order. That was quickly filled. The server told us about their brunch specials. Shortly she returned to take our order. Then the wait began. The table next to us, they were sat after us, got their food quickly . There wasn't a bread basket presented. The water glasses were never refilled. And we waited. The server apologized for the wait. My breakfast potatoes were cold, there was no English muffin with my eggs Benedict. Still no water refill. When we went to pay and use our certificate the server explained it was only for food ,not drinks. We will not return or recommend Grill 37.
We met friends at Grill 37 a week ago for dinner. Had heard mixed reviews but seeing as we are moving back to the area, we wanted to see if this could be a 'go to' spot. Our waitress was fantastic. Knowledgeable and friendly. Appetizers and soup were fine. The only issue we had was the undercooked meat. I ordered a burger medium (to be safe on my maiden voyage here) and I got rare. Our friend ordered a salad with steak, she too ordered medium and received rare. We have all agreed to give it another shot but will most likely avoid beef choices.
Driving in the Pomfet area and stumbled on to Grist 37. The restaurant is much larger than it looks and some private rooms . The food was very good, our waitress was friendly , and the prices were fair
Stopped by on a recommendation and was happy with the referral.  Grill 37 is in a beautifully quiet area of Pomfret CT and has several separate rooms for smaller and larger gatherings.  Staff was very accomodating, professional and kind.  Brunch menu had about 10 items on the menu, ordered Stuffed French toast, Fish & Chips, Ceasar Salad with Seafood cakes and Eggs Benedict along with a side of biscuits and gravy.  All food was very good and the biscuits and gravy were really flavorful.  Fish & Chips used panko and the fish was thin so it was different than the traditional cod or haddock battered fish which was very nice.  Seafood cakes were tasty and ceasr salad was fine.
Would go back again to try more full menu in the future.
Took my aunt here for lunch, beautiful summer day and we sat outside on the patio. Inside dining room was very nice, but dark, wanted some sunshine. Very friendly service from hostess to our server . We both chose the zucchini fettuccine, made with zucchini noodles sauteed in garlic and olive oil tomatoes and shaved parmesan. I ordered mine with grilled salmon. The dish was done to perfection. My aunt had never had zucchini noodles before and she loved it. Very nice menu with many options from steak, salads burgers, fish. There is a full bar. Beautiful location. It was 38.00 for both our meals and ice tea. A little pricey but so worth it.
Nice menu with many classic American dishes especially steaks.  But a nice special menu featuring fresh local produce.  My crab and sweet corn risotto was yummy and a good size portion.  It was surprisinly very busy place for a Tuesday night and it was a little noisy!  Service from the kitchen was a little slow but the waitress was very attentive and overall it was a relaxing evening!
A warm welcoming is to be had as soon as you enter, the hostess is friendly and helpful.  The menu is diverse with something to interest everyone's appetite. The filet mignon hardly needs a knife to be cut and melts in your mouth. Well worth a visit.
We have been to this quaint restaurant several times and have found the food, service and ambiance to be excellent! Beautiful setting paired with attentive staff and well prepared, interesting dishes.
We went because they were offering a folk duet during the dinner hours.  The music was wonderful, but the food and service were lackluster.  The wine and salads we ordered were very nice.  However, we were both disappointed with the entrees and the service.  The portions were small and both were quite salty tasting.  We frequently had to find our waiter for water refills, the check and other needs.  Very glad the evening was salvaged by the wonderful folk duet.
Grill 37 is a beautiful place, whether you want a casual evening (the lounge has a nice bar and TV, and entertainment on Friday nights - music is never too loud, so it's really enjoyable) or a romantic dinner in one of their dining rooms.  I love the rib eye steak, and there are many other great choices on the menu.  The services is prompt and friendly, the carrot cake is the best I've ever had.  I wouldn't recommend taking infants and toddlers unless you are dining very early.   We dine here twice a month!
We had a gift certificate from friends to be used at this location.  That helped since this place is a little pricey for the region.  We enjoyed the food, there was live music in the other room for entertainment, and the atmosphere was nice.  The deserts were terrific and quite memorable to top off a special visit.  

It is a little pricey, but if they had budget specials I would go there again and again, and bring out of town friends when they visit.
Our family of 6 had an AMAZING meal at Grill 37! It was a very busy day the place was packed. We did not feel rushed or forgotten! We even had our 7 year old daughter with us who is very picky and she loved everything.
We visited this establishment with another couple to celebrate both our wedding anniversaries and it was a good thing we called ahead for a reservation.  The place was very busy but we got right in and seated at our reserved table in just a matter or minutes. Our waitress was very attentive and took care of our drink and appetizer order in just a few minutes.  She came back after our drinks were served and then took our order for the main meals... each person ordered something different with different sides and we all got them just the way we ordered.  The 4 ample meals were delicious and left us with just enough room to split 2 deserts between us.  Overall, it was a enjoyable evening with good food and great friends... worthy of a repeat visit.
This  restaurant is a wonderful eatery, not only is the setting and interior elegant the staff is wonderfully attentive to your every needs. The diverse menu is worthy of the most sophisticated pallet and everything our party of 6 picked was cooked to perfection. Their portions are large and the price based on the quality is much lower than what I expected. Although I only get to this area 4 to 5 times a year I expect to eat at Grill 37 every trip. I suggest reservations as this restaurant draws a full dinning room.   
The menu is diverse, everything is cooked to perfection. The ambiance is gorgeous,  very well decorated,  great view and the location is convenient. The wait staff are friendly, timely and on point. I loved this place so much,  it was the only resturant I dined at during my three day stay. I highly recommend this resturant!  Try the cheesecake it is out of this world! :-)
Found this place recently on the recommendation of family. Great food start to finish. We tried salad, soup, entrees and dessert! Local beers on draft and new wine flights. I love the options of salads. All are delicious. I love the one with onion strings and blue cheese. Onion soup is so good. We had the garlic fettucine alfredo with sirloin, meat cooked perfectly to order. Also the aubergine, eggplant wrapped around ricotta and vegies with marinana pasta. Highly recommended. Live music on the Friday night we were there. We took pistachio cheesecake (so good) to go and lots of leftovers. Big portions, so lunch tomorrow! Great ambiance. Beautiful restaurant with unique touches. There's a bar and several rooms for seating. Call ahead for reservations on a busy night. Very accommodating and friendly staff. Highly recommended!
Been stopping in here when we're in the area for 20 years or so now, generally for lunch.  As my title suggests, the chili is excellent and has been included in chili recipe books.  I usually get a cup and a half sandwich.  I'm particularly fond of the reuben.  The burgers cooked on the outdoor grill are also yummy.

Has live music some evenings.

Is almost always busy and can be a little chaotic, but it's worth it.
We pass by this place on our way home from our camp site almost every weekend and it's always hopping. Last weekend was the most quiet we had ever seen it so decided to give it a try. I had the catfish sandwich with fruit as a side and Lou had a pulled pork sandwich with (potato) chips. It took awhile to get it delivered to us on the deck but the people/bike watching made the wait tolerable. We'd eat here again, but only if it's not packed. The parking can be tricky. 
Wonderful Cafe and music on Saturday evenings.  Sandwiches are huge and scrumptious.  Outside eating on the patio is delightful on a hot summer night.
Come for the ambience and youthful hipness.

We had coffee and cookies, the maple chocolate chip cookies were too sweet.  Coffee hit the spot. We should have tried the desserts.

Cute decor and artwork.  See photos.  Good place to vent political views. Jazzy background music.
Not much around in Pomfret, Putnam, Thompson area so finding this was a treat.  Friendly counter service with a nice fun vibe throughout.  Had a great burger - friendly service, live music playing in the other room.  If you in this area, check them out for snacks, lunch or dinner.
I had really fabulous clam chowder, with a half turkey with bacon sandwich. Everything was fresh and good. My companions had the special heirloom tomato sandwich, chili, and a hamburger. Everyone loved their food.
They have outside or inside dining, and according to the brochure, have live entertainment on most Friday and Saturday evenings.
Stopped here on the way to a winery nearby to get some lunch. It's a place where you order at the counter, but they will serve the food to you at your table. I had a black bean burger which was very good, and my mother had a tomato and mozzarella sandwich which she enjoyed.
Looks nice from the exterior, interior fun and pretty... but the prices are awfully high, even for CT! The staff was less that enthusiastic, and for the $ spent, I would have liked to gotten a smile at the very least. Not the worst by far, a step up from Dunkin's but not much more than that. 
The Vanilla Bean is perhaps best known because it hosted the official launch of Vanilla Coke for the entire U.S a number of years ago. The town in which it is located apparently is considered "posh" because of the 2 private schools located there.  It is definitely a favorite stopping place for motorcyclists cruising the picturesque backroads of northeastern Connecticut.  We had an engaging conversation with the customers at the next table. Our meals were of quality ingredients but were not well-prepared.  One of the burgers looked and tasted as though it had been cooked too long on a grill that had not been cleaned recently enough.  Another sandwich which had not been cooked enough was sent back to the kitchen by those same friendly customers  at the next table.  None of the all-female staff in the kitchen were wearing hairnets which fortunately did not affect our meals.  We would not stop here again.
Great place for lunch.  Their soups are the best around.  There was a piano player to enhance the mood of a relaxing visit.  
Coffee /Sandwich shop +. Chicken salad,soup, were good. Lots of locally sourced products but... Mac n cheese was mild, chili was very tomato-pasty tasting, desserts... 7layer was great, brownie and boston cream pie cake were old. 
Numerous motorcycles stop by on beautiful days out on a ride 👍🏻 some days up to 50 bikes are in the gravel parking lot parked under trees hanging out on the veranda or at a picnic table or sitting inside the restaurant , that was an old barn that was added on to. The menu has many items gluten free - whole grain -- soups that are made on site . Daily specials. Sea bass wraps 😃buffalo burgers 😃 extra lean pastrami ruebans 😃 various cold sandwiches 😃 daily made muffins expresso 😃 cold brew coffee 😃 daily fresh brewed flavored coffees 😃😃 A GREAT PLACE TO HANG OUT 😃 weekend nites music from open mike to folk music 🎼🎼  
This is an eclectic restaurant from the motorcycles parked in front to the piano player inside.  the food was delicious - served both "regular flour" and gluten free products.  I was able to eat 1/2 a sandwich - usually I have to stick with salads.  Friendly service, good food, and you can eat outside.  We stopped here for lunch then went to the Roseland cottage.
This place is a must to stop in and enjoy a great meal. There was someone playing the piano when we were eating. The staff are friendly and helpful when trying to pick between all of the options they have to offer. Great vegetarian options!! I highly suggest the vegetable sandwich. 
We have been going to this wonderful restaurant at the 4-corners bordering Rt 44 in Ct. for years.  They have wonderful soup and the sandwiches which are excellent. It is casual dining and on weekends have many motorcycle clubs stopping here during the summer.  Not to be missed, if you are in the area.
A large variety of choices for meat eaters, but only a few for those who avoid red meat. The half-tuna rollup was very tasty, but probably the smallest rollup I ever had. 

The cup of gazpacho was perfect as was my friends vegetable soup. The service was prompt snd friendly. 
I really, really want to give this little coffee spot 5 stars but on this trip, a 4. The staff were all very nice & professional! The atmosphere was cozy & quaint. It would be an excellent place for a first time online date if you're looking for a memorable, happy, little place. My first question looking at all the beautiful baked goods in the case was if they were made onsite. I was surprised when told that most are from The Cheesecake Factory restaurant chain & another place in NJ. I skipped anything sweet as the only things made in house were pointed out, wrapped in Saran. I ordered the Eggs Benedict from reading other reviews, but was told they are only available on weekends. I then ordered French Toast (also from great reviews) but was told that too is only offered on weekends. I will post a pic of the limited "weekday menu" offerings so you can decide if it's worth the drive on a weekday. I reluctantly ordered the Bacon Mushroom Omelet. It was ok, but I could have made that at home & really craved one of their signature type dishes. It came with an english muffin, one pat of butter (had to ask for additional), no jelly was on the table & the side of fruit was grapes that were a bit sour, still needing to ripen & cantaloup (Not my favorite fruit, but it was ripe & juicy). The young man who took my order did come to my table and told me they could do a piece or two of French Toast as a side for $4. I thought the price in addition to the $7 was a little high as an add on, so I skipped it. Plus, I already had the English Muffin. The coffee was fabulous...extra strong & fresh! I do give their Joe & the atmosphere 5 stars. They do have an expanded lunch/dinner menu with daily specials offered. Hope at some point the signature breakfast dishes can be incorporated into the weekday menu for those of us who work every Sat & Sun, 12 hr hospital shifts.
My daughter and I arrived at 11:30 AM, miraculously between the Porsche and motorcycle entourages of the day. We shared truly FABULOUS "soups of the day" and loved the ambience as well as the courtesy of the wait staff. What a treat!
Good food, great atmosphere. Come for lunch with friends, an evening of music or even a glass of wine and a good book by yourself.
I reviewed this cafe 9/2013 and had great hopes today, as the owner responded to that review, that they now recognized gluten free for celiac v. those opting to eliminate gluten from their diet. Unfortunately, they do not understand gluten free for celiac. Food is great - said all the members of our party - if you are eliminating gluten from your diet. All GF items are NOT safe for celiac. Same toaster for all bread items, no special handling to prevent contamination on shared cooking surfaces, etc. Only option for a celiac is their yogurt and fruit breakfast parfait as they use a certified, packaged GF granola - so long as they are told you are celiac and need the fruit cut with a clean knife, on a clean surface, and hope there is no cross contamination from earlier servings of the granola. 
Great food at great prices! Must try the Seafood Alfredo Pizza and their Chicken wings are Amazing!! They even have fish and chips which are fabulous! Plus they deliver -happy days!
I've had their pepperoni pizza, a few times. The first time, it was decent, but nothing amazing. The second time, it was sub-par. Same with the third. The fourth time, I had a slice, and then threw the rest away, before going to get a pizza from a different restaurant.
I have only gotten delivery from here but both times, we had really good food. We ordered here when we first moved to the area and ordered $91 of take-out since we didn't have any food. there was a lot! and they gave us some soda and money off. the delivery was not fast BUT we did order a lot of food. however, even the 2nd time we had to wait a while for delivery.
I spent 65.00 on pizza, fries, potato skins, etc. Everything item was dripping in grease. The pizza box was like a full kitchen sink of water. Everything was nothing but Grease and Grease. I was very disappointed. We will not be going there again. Stay AWAY
My husband and I used to frequent this rest. a while back but the last few times, when we ordered out, the meals were mixed up and I did not receive what we ordered. We went there last evening and the waitress was not informed enough to answer my questions. I ordered the steak tip sub and I asked her many questions about the food as the menu had changed quit a bit. I asked her if the steak tips were spicy and tender. She told me that they were not spicy, which they were, and I could not chew the meat. I was very disappointed as the food in the past was very good. I do not know if they had changed ownership but something had changed. I only took 2 bites of the sandwich and my mouth was burning. When I told the waitress that it was indeed spicy, she said that they did marinade the tips in barbecue and Worcestershire Sauce. That is spicy to me. They were so well done and the meat tough. I was so disappointed as I had just had tips from another rest. and they were delicious. I even asked her if she would order the tips or another selection from the menu. She said that she would order the tips. She had never eaten the tips before. We will not be going back there again. You need to be honest about the food. I do ask a lot of questions and I should have known that she was not knowledgeable about what she was serving. 
We stumbled on Zoe's after checking our a second hand gamer store and couldn't believe we had never been there before. This pizza is as good as NYC's. The hawaiian is my favorite
Nice variety and sauce and dough are very tasty.  Parking is a bit difficult, however.  Mix up your toppings and you'll be very satisfied.
We've eaten here many times. We especially like the calzones and the Greek salad with grilled chicken. They have a great variety of many things to choose from on the menu. You can call in your order ahead of time and swing in to pick it up,or have it delivered !
Pizza was cheap i worked and have worked at all the zoes around and this one was the worst of them all. Im sorry for the people that live in putnam because for them to get a good zoes pizza they would have to go to the plainfield location ran by the orignal owner of zoes.
Love going here for a roast beef grinder.  The staff is friendly, the prices are reasonable, and the porrtions are good.  It is your standard pizza joint, but i think the consistency sets them apart.  There are about 500 pizza shops in the area, and this one is your best bet for a grinder.
There are many places in Putnam to get pizza and Zoe's gives them all a run for their money.Their chicken pizza and their roast beef grinders are my favorite. Have tried some of their other meals and they are all very good.  You have to give Zoe's a try you won't be disappointed.
Putnam is known for there many pizza places and Zoe's gives them all a run for their money. LOVE the meat lovers and their grinders are great!
For years I enjoyed the value and consistency that  Zoe's provided me and my family, but something has changed. For the past five or six months the delivery times have skyrocketed, and the food has been seemingly sloppily throw together.  I don't know if they changed the recipe, but the pizza is definitely not the pizza my family fell in love with years ago.
pretty good place; overshadowed by others though
Went to Verrilli's twice when it was open and it was good, but it has been closed for well over a year. The place where it was housed, is now a professional office.
A taste of the city here in this CT bakery from ambiance to beautifully decorated desserts. Family and Couple friendly. Comfortable enough to want to open up my brief, relax in one of those living room style chairs with my material and enjoy a solo coffee with portion sized "something sweet". Highly recommend.
Dr. Grace and Dr. Gerry, Marty and Fi, Dr. Bill. A+
I go to Mexico for business, found I really like tacos. But what I got just fell short, not bad mind you, but nothing special. I can't say there was much effort to develop atmosphere - certainly not up to McD standards. If I were sitting in my car across the street with a friend thinking of where to eat lunch, I might go to Turtles but I would see if my friend had another idea.
We eat lunch here every couple of weeks.  I have the chicken tacos and they are yummy!  I've also tried the tostada, salads and nachos.  
Great flavor! Well made tacos and burritos! Gotta try the hot sauce. It goes well on everything even the salads.
You don't go to Turtles for the atmosphere or comfort but the food is good, fresh and plentiful.  The staff is always willing to accommodate with special requests.
I have traveled throughout Mexico and Turtles is the closest thing I can get to the real thing. I have friends from Mexico and the absolutely love Turtles as well. It is not your standard Mexican American sit down. The service is relatively quick if the restaurant is not busy. I usually order the California burrito or the mini tacos for the most bang for your buck. The red and green sauces are a must as well. I agree with one user that turtles has to fix its' soda machine, but that said I love this place. 
Not exactly certain when it happened, but somewhere along the line this place went seriously down hill.  For the first couple of years the food was excellent, the place was spotless and the help friendly. First the place is just gross now, dirty soda machines, dirty floors and walls, dead cactuses (still sitting on the counter, really how do you kill a cactus?) I went last Sunday afternoon and placed a to-go order with a seriously obnoxious arrogant guy.  It was not my first time placing and order with him and he has never shown a tad bit of personality (on a scale of 1-10 he's about a -5.) Anyway, I ordered a loaded fry with steak and asked for the fries crispy and also ordered an O & P quesadilla. I ask for 3 hot and 3 mild sauce to go with it.  I specifically say well done fries because the last time I ordered them (well done that time too) they were complete mush and not even cooked through. I'm told 10 minutes, so I sit and wait.  I am the only one in the restaurant at this point. They take a large phone order and tell the guy 20 minutes.  Suddenly the guy comes in for the large order and it was ready.  I went around the corner and ask about my food.  I'm told we looked for you but didn't see you...Huh?  I'm sitting in here by myself!  So, they give me my bag and I ask "is it even still hot?"  So they open the bag (which contained NO hot sauces as ordered) and this guys holds his hand over the food and says yes, it's still hot.  So I take a French fry out which is complete mush and barely cooked through and I said I wanted them well done.  So, they tell me they can put them in the oven for a bit, but then said they would just re-make them. I said OK, but can you please cook the fries well this time.  He says "no problem".  I return to a table and wait...again.  This time I hear no freezer open for fries, no deep frying sounds which I heard the first time they cooked them...nothing! Within a few minutes they tell me it's all set and are stuffing my food into the bag.  I asked to see it and I find it is the exact same food they were trying to give me the first time.... Really???? The put the whole thing in the oven sour cream/guacamole included.  Now I have mushy fries with warm sour cream and guacamole. Also, still not hot sauce in bag.  I again ask for hot sauce again, and then told him I didn't want the fries like that.  This guy starts getting really obnoxious saying I didn't understand the process and they could not keep the fries crispy because of the toppings etc.  I said I've gotten them for years, crispy with no problems! I asked for my $ back because I didn't want them.  He just tossed the money on the counter  which I picked up.  I then asked for the sauce which was still not in the bag.  He then says listen Lady, were just trying to get your order right.... everybody loves our food, blah blah blah....Lady????
I was so very aggravated at this point it took everything I had just to walk out without telling him off.  Nuff said, I will never set foot in there again, which is a shame it used to be very good, and I will miss what it used to be.  People don't waste your time.
Smelled good. Small menu but things I like and that taste good. Staff is willing to accommodate requests. 
I've eaten at Turtles several times over the last year and have had great food every time. I get the sense this isn't a stop and grab place like a food truck.  It looks like the stuff is made to order.  I really like that part.  The shredded beef and the simmered brisket are seasoned well and don't over power the meat.The fish taco has a great marinade and is served fresh grilled, and not from a basket of pieces sitting under a hot light.  I haven't tried the burritos yet because I started by worj=king through the taco menu.  Since I'll definitely be going back there, I'll update this review once I get to them.  Turtles is a five minute diversion off of I395 and worth the effort if you want something outside the fast food/chain restaurant box.
You can also call in your order and save any waiting time.
We wanted to like this place... we really did. We love all mexican quisine, tex mex, mexicali (the food style, not the restaurant chain), etc. We visited Turtles a total of three times, each time a disappointing experience. 

Visit #1: August 2010 - about a month after opening.
Staff is friendly and focused on good food and service. The place is comfortable, lots of smiles, seating room packed, and people are loving it. Nachos were good, however I was grossed out with the chicken burrito. The chicken was minced with each bite having a chunk of gristle in it. Hubby's beef burrito was the same - pulverized ground beef with too many gristle bits. We didn't finish our burritos that day.

Visit #2: Summer of 2012
We came back because our friends LOVE this place and visit frequently. For sake of comparison, we ordered the same thing... and experienced the same result. So much gristle.

Visit #3: December 2013
Back again by our friends request. The hours of this establishment seem to be different depending on what platform you use to get info (google, facebook, or hours on the door). We were under the assumption that the business closed at 9pm this day. We arrived at 7:30pm, placed our order, and as soon as we sat down to eat, a staff member began cleaning the dining room. She appeared aggravated, sighing loudly, making lots of noise moving chairs and condiments. I asked if we made a mistake with the hours and if we needed to leave, but she said no we were all set. As soon as we left, she flipped the closed sign. It was 8:10pm but the hours on the door said the place closed at 9pm. Feeling really awkward, combined with a watery Baja fish burrito and a gristle steak burrito, we left and will not return. When I checked the hours on Facebook that evening, it indicated that their hours of operation was indeed 8pm that eve. Apparently the hours change for the winter, but are not reflected on the door. We would have taken our order to go had we known. 

Our advice is, try it - you might like it, but then again you might get gristle. Some LOVE this place, but apparently it is not for us.
 
After a couple bad experiences last fall I stopped coming to Turtles.  Gave it another try...slow sullen service. Inaccurate order...did not give me food I paid for...they said I didnt order it. then checked receipt and I was correct.  Rude and never apologized.  Stay away.  Place deserves to go out of business.  Oh and food not good either.
First and foremost, Turtles' food is INCREDIBLE. I've sampled just about everything on their menu and nothing has been a disappointment. 
They have signature/classic sauces, red, green, and the like. They are truly a spunky, well rounded, delicious restaurant and they deserve every good review to be written about them.

That being said, I do not go there nearly as many times as they've popped in my head. Why? 
1- Because, who has the time to go somewhere and look at a menu then wait for the food to prepared after a long day of work and just wanting to get home? No one I know. 
2- If you're not extremely familiar and comfortable with this type of cuisine, how is one to choose what to get when you call in an order? People might get a little crazy and want to try outside their comfort zone, but they can't because the website has been down for over a year. The "link" to download the menu has been corrupt and non-working for some time as well. 

It's 2014! Our grandparents generation have a Facebook now, and you don't even have a picture of a menu on yours! C'mon guys : ( 

You have a great, spectacular little spot with authentic and MUY BUENO food, and you are limiting yourself. It just hurts my heart...and my hungry tummy!
Seriously... This place is INCREDIBLE!! The food especially their chicken taco salads, the place is perfect in the summer for a quick place to go or out and around.., just everything.. I can not say enough good things!! 
I worked for a cable company in this area and I tried this place maybe 3-4 times about one and half years ago. It was the best fresh food that I tried in this area.  I quit and got a better job and I worked in this area about a month ago and went here for lunch.  Lets say I don't know what happened to this place.  I ordered steak quesadilla's and their nachos, like I did in the past.  The steak taste like sardines and the chips were not that fresh.  I ended up tossing it out my window.   It was great when they first opened but they are going down hill.  I really don't think I will go back here due to the fact that I hate fish and that's the last thing that I will remember from here.
Today November 3rd my husband and I were driving by and I saw they were open I asked my husband to turn around so we could try it. I had recently read a great review on it and didn't want to pass up the chance. He is not a big Mexican Food fan and reluctantly did and I am so glad we decided to stop. It was a wonderful lunch! We both had the Steak Conga and I tried the soft shell shredded chicken taco and my husband tried the shredded beef it was all amazing! The boss was there and he was so friendly! My husband even loved it and that is saying something! The portions were huge we each broght home 1/2 of our Steak Conga. SOOOO glad we stopped if you are in the area try them out and I am sure like me you will be going back!
We have been to Turtles quite a number of times. Its a real nice little mexican restaurant to either eat in or to take out.  The menu has a great variety to choose from,and is reasonably priced.
 We have tried a lot of different things on the menu and thoroughly enjoyed them all. Our favorite is the loaded nachos ,taco chicken salad and the California burrito. 

We heard its under new ownership,hopefully it stays the same !?!?!
Very good food, very good prices, very good service, what else can you ask for? Well worth a visit if your in the area.
This place is what most motorcycle riders look for.. A great mexican style take out/eat in place that serves ice cream.. With a really nice staff and this cinnamon/rice drink thats worth a try.. Its almost like a flavored milk drink.. really good.. The taco salads are incredible.. 
Seriously.. if you haven't gone.. GO!!!
Eaten here many times. Love the mini tacos.  Caution,, The portions are so big it's easy to over order.  I get a table full of food every Time. The soft taco's, the drinks, Everything is "Top Notch" Here!!
I had the shredded beef tacos.  They were good but not a lot of seasoning.  Not at all like the ones I had in December in San Diego. They forgot our nachos but charged us for them and we had to go back to get them...needless to say, we won't be going back soon.
Try the California burrito it keeps me coming back! The food is delicious and decently priced for the portion sizes! Wish it felt more diney but its quick service and great Mexican food! Definately a place i visit often! 
We stopped by years and years ago when they first opened and we didn't have a very good experience. However, when in the area again, we decided to give it another shot and I'm very pleased we did. Food was piping hot even after a drive home. And, everything was great...lo mein, fried rice, several chicken dishes (even with requests for no spice or extra spice)! All in all, a very good experience...good food, hot, HUGE portions and especially for a very reasonable price. We'll never think twice if and when in the area again for where to go for Chinese takeout! The only one thing they could do better would be to use rangoons with more of that delicious filling!
Bland, tasteless, common, expensive poorly prepared executions. If it was the last place for food in the northeast, I'd begin foraging on my own.
Great staff... Excellent egg rolls & house mustard rice is tasty.. good price and portions are good...
Good food there. I from HK this is similar Chinese style with my home taste. I recommend that for my friends who want try Chinese food.
ordered General tso chicken and sweet and sour chicken. General tso was a pretty dismal portion......especially for the price. Crab rangoons were rubbery and gross. Pork fried rice had no flavor. Sweet and sour chicken tasted burnt, like it was in fryer to long or they need to change the oil. For almost $30 I would of rather spent it elsewhere. We won't be going back.
Nice place to have very good Chinese dishes. Very nice selection on menu. You can eat in or take out . Easy to order online for quick pickup. Good value for your $.
How many times have we heard about terrible Chinese kitchens?...well, this isn't one of them. Sparkling clean, fresh and delicious, the China Star makes Chinese  take-out a pleasant experience again! Jimmy runs a tight ship and the food is  consistent good quality. Our go- to place for take-out.
We took a take out with shrimp fried rice crab ragoons, beef teri, egg rolls.    All was good.  Plenty of larger shrimp in rice.  Good taste.   Egg roll very good.   Crab ragoons a bit sweeter than most other.     Decent/average size for price.   Was ready when arrived.   By the time we returned home a bit cool but that isn't their fault.     Seemed pretty clean inside but very little inside seating
Excellent choice for Chinese in Putnam. Food is good and plentiful. Service  is quick and staff is pleasant.We love the variety and the combination plates.
All your food is cooked to order and fresh. It not greasy or over loaded with salt. Their Special Combo meals are reasonably priced and you get a ton of food for the money. I also want to mention that this place is very, very clean.
They have delicious food here,and reasonably priced. The owners are super nice,their always there and they take your order and help to prepare it. You can eat in or call ahead and swing by to pick it up. 
Highly recommended ! 
Average to poor food, and really expensive! No atmosphere. Typical Chinese fast food place. Nothing special but you pay a high price.
Love the house pad thai and jimmy makes it so it is just mildly spicy.  great won ton soup as well. The dining in is shabby chic at best but the food makes up for it.  Friendly staff.
The menu is typical for Chinese food and heavy on the sauces.  My kids love it but it is just ok .  Convenient in a nearby shopping center.  Takeout also
China star is consistantly good. Staff is friendly. A great place to go if you want chinese food. My opinion the best in Putnam by FAR!
This is by far one of the best Chinese Take Outs I have ever had.  I ordered Mongolian Chicken, lots of big pieces of chicken and  the sauce had a nice "bite" to it.  The staff are very friendly.  Will definitely go back for MORE!!!!

Check out their VIP Club discount!!!!
We order from China Star a few times every month. It is your typical Americanized Chinese takeout joint, with everything available a la carte and in combinations. For $8 or so, the combos offer more food than I like to eat at one serving, so it's a great deal when you figure it can be most of tomorrow's lunch as well as tonight's dinner. There's nothing especially distinctive about the food, but I've never had a bad experience here either. The kitchen is wide open to customer view, and the people are friendly. Located in Riverfront Commons shopping center, next to Rite Aid.
Palmieri's has good pizza with a nice crust.  If you are sitting down, try the eggplant rotini.  Yum! 
Garlic knots and the spinach knots are a great choice too. 
The pizza here is awesome! Some of you are so nit picky get over yourselves. Ive eaten 4 times and its always been awesome! Buffalo chicken pizza is the best! 
Friends and I have been here before- last time about 2 years ago. My hubby and I went on Mothers day around 1pm- we were the only customers. I thought it was a little odd, since in the past the place was always packed. They put in a  bar upfront. There was one waitress- who was great. We ordered a Greek salad which was really good- but they are known for their pizza- we got a Philly Steak & Cheese Pizza- it was awful. The pizza was soggy as soon as we got it, must have been from the shaved steak- not sure- it had a weird taste to it- both my hubby & I were floored as we had always loved their food- not sure if this place has changed ownership- but we will not be coming back. The bathrooms were spotless and the waitress was a doll- we gave her a great tip, I figured it might be the only one she was getting that day-
Choice of either thin crust or Sicilian pizza, Lots of toppings to choose from . Better as a take out then eat in restaurant in my opinion due to size . Many Italian dishes & subs also.
We've been to Palmieris quite a number of times. Our favorite is their pizza of course. 
We feel the crust and the sauce is what really makes a pizza,and they've got it right.
They have a menu with quite a few other options to choose from as well and everything is reasonably priced. You can dine in or take out. We highly recommend Palmieris....we shall be back !!!
Maybe it's our fault for ordering this kind of pizza but my boyfriend and I ordered a steak and cheese pizza to be picked up and it was absolutely disgusting. First of all, the pizza was already waiting for us after 15 or so minutes and by the time we got it back to the house a few minutes away it was luke warm. The sauce on it was gross. It wasn't a red sauce. Some weird tasting brown sauce. The steak was average at best. The pizza was smothered in American cheese that tasted and looked like that processed "cheese food" crap that is individually wrapped. We each ate about 2 bites and stopped. It was pricy too. Waste of money. 
Just got home with our pizza and it is so bad, I'm writing this review now so I don't talk myself out of it. Was told pizza would take 20 minutes. I was there at 15 and the pizza was already in the box. Fifteen minutes home, open the box, absolutely no heat left - why, because the pizza isn't cooked through, cheese isn't cooked, two toppings I paid $5 for are piled in the middle of the pizza. Heated it up on a pizza stone and it was still not edible. Wanted to give this local business another try, never again. If you want good NY style pizza, go to Sweet Evalina's  in Woodstock. 
Seriously can you not have smalls? So you and your other HAS to get the same pizza. And bruschetta pizza is not pizza. It's BRUSCHETTA! 
Went for a mini road trip this weekend from Cumberland RI and ended up here for lunch on account of the good reviews. BEST. PIZZA. EVER. The restaurant itself is clean and comfy. Wonderful service. And delicious New York style super thin pizza! Omg it was delicious! We will be back soon!
My son a I have frequented the restaurant for several yrs. And the food was usually good, but the service not so much. They made me feel like we were an inconvienence.  My son really loved their pizza, and I thought it was pretty good too, so I overlooked the lackluster service. Although the food was good, I find the service and decor a bit lacking. I'd rate this restaurant slightly above average. 
Great place.  Nice newer bar area w/ good specials.  Nice NY style pizza.  Friendly people there.  Just go!
I ordered the pepperoni, and it was the best that I've ever had. The cheese, sauce, and pepperoni are delicious, and the crust is just right. Not only that, but the size of the pizza is VERY large, and the people who work there are always friendly, and will remember your name if you visit often. The pizza is a bit expensive, at 17.45 with one topping (12.95 for just cheese), but it tastes amazing, and is 16 inches, so it's worth it. All in all, I fully recommend eating here.
Went to Palmieri's and cannot go to another pizza place!  Other pizza now seems fake and greasy.  My family usually gets the Tomato Pesto or the Neapolitan Special.  Today we tried the Stuffed Veggie pizza...wow!
For years we have had to travel to New York for pizza like this. Great and tasty. Can be crazy at times   
We had the "Early Bird" special, with reduced prices...my husband had the chicken parmesan with pasta and I had the linguine w/clam sauce.  Both came with salads and breadsticks (warm w/garlic/cheese).  The portions were generous and the service was great..even the chef came out and asked how our meal was.....people came in often while we were there to pick up orders so the locals know about this place!!
Finest actual pizza around the area!
Fine thin crust, good sauce and cheese, plenty of options for toppings, what is "gourmet" in most local places is everyday fare at Palmieris!
Always well prepared, whether slices or whole pies. 
It is an exceptional pizza restaurant, anything else is just avg. Service is ok, no atmosphere to speak of! It's not a night out kind of place, it functional but I highly reccommend the pizza. Now with a bar!

At least twice a month, my daughter and I get a large, cheese(sometimes extra) pizza from Palmieri's It is the BEST pizza in town. Flat, thin, crispy  NY Style pizza, piping hot and delicious... The next best thing they offer are their homemade garlic knots... oh yea... 10 thumbs up for PALMIERI'S!!!!
My family loves the food and enjoys going to this restaurant because they have great food, great staff, and great owners. They take pride in making every customer feel welcomed.
Great pizza and it is traditional pizza which is good. Lots of toppings and good prices. Not very fancy but good food.
Yum!  You can order slices of pizzas.  Great meal of 1 pizza slice and salad along with wine of beer.  Friendly staff.
I'm sure it's the main manager or the owner that run and work it, she's a loud and awesome lady. Not what you'd expect from a subway sandwich artist, but it's never dull going in there to grab sandwiches on lunch break. They're to the book and the food tastes as subway should. 
No sanitary issues. Ample parking as it's by the supermarket, and there is appropriate seating if you're eating there. 
We took a long drive last night and ended up in Putnam, CT. A Trip Advisor search  showed many restaurants and we settled on Thai Place. We were early and the only patrons.  The staff was friendly and attentive.
We enjoyed the Fresh Roll (Summer Roll, not fried)  appetizer and a Glass Noodle soup. My main course was the Beef Supreme, My wife had a Ribeye steak special.  Both dishes were nicely prepared with the vegetables hot and crunchy. Mine was a "Spicy" selection and the broth had a wonderful flavor and a nice heat. Not too hot at all. 
The restaurant is clean and nicely decorated. The bathrooms were clean.
One problem is the front windows face west and the strong sun was a problem.
We will definitely return another day to try more dishes.
This is one of my favorite dinner spots in Putnam.  The service is fast as is the food.  Always have leftovers to take home.  Most everything I have ordered there has been good.
I have eaten here many times this Spring and Summer. Excellent food. Nice wine and beer list. Different appetizers. Small pretty place. 
Been looking for a good Thai place and this is it! Food is delicious and fresh. Portions were great and price was very good too. Service was great. The waiter was very attentive and had a great attitude. It's so hard to get good service these days but this place has it! Again the food was delicious! W will be going back for sure!
They have a good variety of small plates and entrees. Their wide noodles are very good. Try the sweet (iced) tea!
I will be back. 
We recently moved back to NECT, and am extremely appreciative to have delicious Thai food so close to home! 
I have been impressed by every dish so far. My favorite is the vegetarian spicy noodles, with tofu in lieu of meat. While tasty in normal form, this time I opted for level 1 spiciness, and phew, it is full of heat. But in a good way, with a sweet beginning flavor followed by a major kick! The tofu is consistent, and soaks the spice nicely, even though it appears fried. 
Service is prompt, friendly, and accommodating. 
On a side note, my wife is a veteran, and they offer a surprising discount, far more than the average restaurant! 

We visited on a rainy Wednesday evening and arrived at 6:30 or so - we were the only ones there! It was evident soon after taking our seat that the restaurant does a lot of takeout business as people were in and out all night picking up orders.

Our server was OK - sweet but often disappeared for several minutes at a time and, many times, another server (who may have been cooking) served us instead. I never really understood what was going on with that. Regardless, we were served.

Food was good...beef satay was a favorite!  Pho, rice dish, Pad Thai, basil noodle were all very good as well. Food was served piping hot and we all enjoyed our dishes. I hadn't been here in years so the return trip to the Thai Place was nice. We wouldn't hesitate to return if looking for Thai again in the future.
Everything is prepared fresh.  Real Thai cuisine, no fat loaded sauces.  So yummy. Staff is fast and capable.
Food is great sometimes, OK others.  My boss loves this place, I probably wouldn't go otherwise.  Word of warning....spicy means spicy.  Like my buddy from India couldn't eat it spicy at their 2 star level (out of 5 stars). And he likes spicy food.  I am asking for it mild every time I go now.    
Worst food ever. Hey, person who prepared our dinner tonight, Pad Mee is made with egg noodle strips, as it is described on your menu, not rice noddles. If I wanted Lo Mein, I would have ordered Chinese. Third time they screwed up signature Thai dishes. All done with this restaurant.
We hadn't been here for years, but are glad we tried them again. Many different items on the menu will keep us coming back for a while. The chef was very accommodating to our tastes, asking for one sauce over another. We went early (5:30 PM) on a Friday and there was hardly a table taken, but it filled up quickly, so plan to go early. Being so small, once it fills up you could wait a long time for a table. The service needs some work; it's slow, items for different people at the same table came out separately, wrong items delivered to wrong table, long wait for a scoop of ice cream, never asked about a second drink, etc. Lots of take-out business which interrupted the waitresses. We'll go back for sure, when we have time.
This is the Thai restaurant that I compare all others to.  My favorite is the choo chee curry with Duck or chicken even fried fish.  On Tuesday you can get 15% off for lunch.  The service is always good.
I really did not expect to find such a good restaurant in a shopping center. Staff is quick and food is good. They were having computer trouble the last visit and delivery was slow but this isn't normal. 
Ordered takeout for a family of five - Thai entrees were disappointing - food was very bland, even the Supreme Beef which was labeled as 'spicy' and the Curry Chicken, which should have a curry kick. Portions were small considering the $10 price. Portion for the steamed vegetable entree was tiny considering the $7 price. Got the order home and then found that they shorted us one of the orders of white rice (billed at $1 each, which I thought was cheesy to begin with - most entrees at Chinese, etc. restaurants give you rice with the entree. Called the restaurant to report this - said a manager would call me back, but no one ever did.
Excellent sticky rice, crab rangoons, shrimp/veg tempura, and Thai chilli sauce. My boyfriend has tried many other things, I'm not that extroverted regarding food, but he has liked it all as well. Pad Thai, etc... 
Cons: The restaurant has no real check out area so  you have to stand in a line awkwardly at the (unused) bar and wait for your food. They aren't always timely, but as stated above- worth the wait. I have not yet eaten there as it's small tables with candles on them no booths or privacy. They are definitely jam packed on Friday and Saturdays though, so if you don't mind eating in rows with your chair back to another you're fine. 
Great food. 
I was driving through tonight and thought Thai sounded good and I was very pleasantly surprised to stumble apon a great menu and decent prices. I got the coconut soup with chicken and the tofu pad thai. The tofu was cooked really well (and I've eaten a lot of not so good tofu) and the soup was tasty. The staff was also very welcoming and quick! we also have plenty of leftovers  which is good. I will definitely be coming back.
An interesting menu,with a real nice variety on it and reasonably priced. We've eaten in a few times as well as got it to go. Its always delicious and highly recommend it ! 
Al-ways  have fresh rolls, tomkki ( Coconut soup),. Phat ti , Thai place duck.  Only bad part is all the food comes at once.
Last time we even warned the server, Please give us time before the meal. No way,, all the food still comes at once.

Great food, too fst service. I have eaten there  more that 20 times..
What a great place. Easy location, polished/clean interior, and a menu I'm still eating my way through.

We're huge favorites of the Yellow Chicken Curry and Beef Satay in particular. It's become our family's special treat to order from the Thai Place. Even our kids (four and two) like it, and we like that it tastes so fresh. 

They excel in seasoning. Unfortunately, I've not yet mastered the spiciness level -- wow, it'll warm you up! -- so if you haven't been here before, make sure to specify whether you like it mild or hot.
Edible. Just tried this based on reviews. I can't even support the Good not great rating. No flavors. Beef Satay was ok, but the peanut sauce wasn't. Sea of vegetables would be ok with me, but these weren't good vegetables. Wooden carrots. How can you screw up carrots?
Fine breakfast with friendly service by the professional staff in a quiet and readily accessible location.
A great place to go for breakfast. The food is very 
good ,reasonably priced and the service is really fast. 
We highly recommend it !

